Captioning made possible by turner entertainment group marching in the winter marching in the fall marching in the summer but spring is best of all
'cause then it's march, march, march, april, may, june june, june, june, july, august, september sept, sept, september, october, november, december january, february, march, march, march, april, may, june june, june, june, july, august, september sept, sept, september, october, november, december january, february, march, march, march, april, may, june june, june, june, july, august, september sept, sept, september, october, november, december january, february marching in the winter marching in the fall marching in the summer but home is the best of all hey!
Well, well, well, if it isn't the rover boys.
Aren't you guys ever going to grow up?
Is this any way to greet your american heroes?
Come on, tim, don't spoil our last day together.
Yeah, give us a pleasant smile.
We've been over there cutting the german lines, protecting your right to cut your scotch.
We've been gone over two years.
Haven't you missed us, tim?
Sure, i missed you.
I got a little tab here exactly two years old.
Take care of it, banker.
$75.80. fork up or no liquor.
You're a sentimentalist at heart, tim.
Listen, this is a bar, not a barbershop.
What do you got there? Hey, silvio!
You guys act as if you own the joint.
Hey, silvio!
Hey! Hi!
Silvio!
Hey!
Hey, silvio!
What's he going to make?
3 ham sandwiches. Great cook.
Come on, tim, set 'em up. Put 'em on a tab.
No more tabs.
Cash.
You're civilians now.
You owe me a buck for this, and i think you're overtipping.
Tim, what do you mean? We can't- i just wanted you to know i didn't forget it and you can't put anything over on me.
Keep the dough.
You're going to need it.
Gee, tim- tim, i'd like to leave you with a little remembrance because we're all busting up and going home.
This is for you.
Take it, save it, frame it, put it up over the bar.
Someday it'll be worth millions.
What is it?
What is it?
It's an original douglas hallerton.
Security for your old age.
I'm trying to attract patrons, not scare them away.
Tim, this saloon will be famous someday because this painting's here.
Yeah! Like places that say george washington slept here. Like that.
Yeah, like that.
Coming up!
That's a pretty picture.
Looks like a pizza pie.
Yeah, we call it the picture you eat with a spoon.
Stand back one second, silvio. Do you mind?
Just a little room.
Huh! Hoo! Huh!
Ted, got some mail for you.
I hope it's the one.
It is!
A dame?
The future mrs. Riley!
Wife of one of the future lawmakers of the united states.
This no-goodnik?
No-goodnik?
Head man in his school.
President of the pittsburgh junior debating society. Phi beta kappa.
Student of english literature.
A born leader!
Both: Vote for riley!
"Dearest ted,
"i have missed you so terribly and worried about you constantly,
"so far away and in such danger all the time.
"You know there is no one in the world
"nearer and dearer to me than you, ted, dear.
"I know you'll have a brilliant career when you finish law school,
"but we haven't seen each other in several years, and people grow up and change.
"Ted, i hope it makes no difference in our friendship
"just because i happened to get married last month.
Joe is the most wonderful guy in the world."
Hey!
Oh, back again.
Come on, tim, give us a drink.
All right. All right.
One more and that's it.
It's closing time.
It's 4:00.
Closing time?
Where's the clock?
Well, we got to help old tim close up.
Well, of course.
Come on.
Hey! Watch that!
Sorry.
The war's over.
People don't love drunk civilians like they love tipsy soldiers.
Hey!
We're civilians now!
Oh, the time has come for parting and the marching music ends no matter where our lives may lead us in our hearts, we'll still be friends though the time has come for parting and the future lies unknown although the years may come between us we will never feel alone for friends we are now and friends we'll stay until we meet again one wonderful day although the time has come for parting we'll be friends until we die tim: Stop, you guys.
What are you kidding yourselves for?
A month from now, you won't even remember each other's names.
All: What?
Sure, you're great buddy-buddies now.
I've seen it before.
It's like a girl you meet up in the catskills.
You never see her again when you get back to the city.
Hey, what are you talking about?
This is different.
We've been together 4 years.
The war's over, kids.
In a month from now- all right, tim.
You give us one month, huh?
I say we're friends for life and nothing can change it.
5 years, 10 years... look, tim, i'll make you a bet.
10 years from today, october 11, 1955, at 12:00 noon.
No matter where we are or what we're doing, the 3 of us are going to walk right through that door and meet here.
Right, guys?
Both: Right.
You're crazy.
You want to bet $1,000?
Please.
All right, then. A buck from each of us against one buck from you.
Enjoy. Enjoy.
Not to be opened till 1955.
In the safe.
I'll make a little memo here for ourselves.
October 11, 1955.
You said it.
Good luck, guys.
I'll probably never see you again, but good luck anyway.
You'll see us.
You got a date october 11, 1955.
Start chilling a bottle of champagne right now.
You sure you're going to be all right, ted?
Sure. Sure.
Well, so long.
Kid mariacchi.
Go ahead, kid.
Nashby, sports herald.
You manage the kid?
Yeah.
Hiya, rocky.
What do you say, sport?
Why don't you give him a little squib?
Why don't you have him over at stillman's about 4:00?
We'll shoot some glamour stuff.
Thanks very much.
You're new in the fight racket, huh?
Yeah. Didn't even know i was going to be in it until about 8 months ago.
I won the kid in a game of chance.
Huh?
A crap game.
No credit to me.
I figured i couldn't get anything with him if i tried to hock him, so i tried to do something with him.
You sure did do something with him.
This kid's no punk.
8 knockouts in a row.
Number 9 tonight, huh, kid? Yeah.
Mr. Nashby, sports herald.
You look great, mariacchi.
Best of luck tonight. Thanks.
How you feeling, kid? I'm ok.
Look, get a couple hours of shuteye and then meet me over at stillman's gym at 4:00.
The newspapers want some pictures.
I don't need no pictures.
Any pictures.
And you do need pictures.
Give me something for a cab, will you? A fin?
A fin? I got exactly
$2.00 and some loose change.
Here, take it all.
Hey, what's this?
Confederate money?
Hey, give me that.
October 11, 1955.
Hey, that's today.
Today? That- oh, doug and angie.
What am i talking about?
If i go over there, nobody will show up.
I'm the biggest sucker of all time.
Where do you have to go?
Tim's bar on third avenue.
It's a long way from here.
You're nuts.
It's 10 minutes.
No.
It's 10 years.
What can i do for you?
Oh, could i just have a glass of water, please?
Say, uh, when did you get this?
Ex-g.i. Gave it to me a long time ago.
Funny thing. Lots of people ask me about it.
He went off to europe to paint or something.
Long distance. I'd like to place a call to chicago.
Long beach 1-0-8-8-0.
Mrs. Douglas hallerton, please.
Tune in tonight at 11:00 for miss mop-up, miss mop-up, miss mop-up.
Don't forget, tonight miss mop-up presents midnight with madeline, brought to you by klenzrite.
Channel 89 at 11:00.
K-l-e-n-z-r-l-t-e spells klenzrite!
Hello? Hello, dorothy?
This is doug.
I'm in new york.
No, not on business, something much more important.
Dorothy, what is this number where they reached you?
Oh, your lawyer's.
Well, dorothy, look.
Do you have to go through with it?
I know, but if you love me, why a divorce?
We've been over this a thousand times.
What do you mean, i've changed?
What's changed about me?
Dorothy, i don't know what you're driving at.
Hi, tim!
Well, chum, what'll you have?
Don't you know me, tim?
I'm angie!
Angelo valentine, united states infantry.
A lot of fellas come and go in here, buddy.
Yeah, i guess they do.
Have you seen two other fellas today?
I wouldn't be doing such a good business if i hadn't seen two fellas all morning.
Sure.
Should've known.
Number one sucker of all time.
Doug.
You're ted. Hey!
You haven't changed much, doug, except for that brush.
Get a load of that brush, will you, ted?
Ha ha ha!
Where'd you come in from, doug?
Chicago.
How about you?
Schenectady.
Same old place.
How about you, ted?
I've been here the whole time.
You have? I didn't know you'd been here all this time.
Yeah. Well... yeah! Well.
We're us!
Hey, tim!
Tim!
Tim, we made it!
Well, well, well, if it isn't the rover boys.
He didn't even know me when i first came in.
Tim, you said we'd never make it, and here we are.
You got no faith, that's what's the matter with you.
Come on, set 'em up.
Got to break open a fresh bottle for this.
I don't think i could handle a drink, ted.
What?
I'm not too fit digestion-wise.
Little bit of a nervous stomach.
Oh. Well, come to think of it, i haven't had a drink at noon in a lot of years myself.
Maybe i could handle one.
I'll take a couple of these pills.
Ok by me. I'm game.
Boy, this is great.
Well, to us.
To us.
Cut that out, will you?
The sacroiliac.
Oh, i'm sorry.
If connie could only see me now- drinking in the middle of the afternoon.
I got some pictures here of connie and the kids.
Very nice.
You kept pretty busy these 10 years.
Yeah. How about you guys? You married?
Yes, i'm married.
Pictures of the kids?
No. We don't have any children.
Well, i'll lend you a couple of mine!
And how about you, ted?
You married?
No, thank you.
Well, let's have another drink.
Yeah. Let's have another drink.
Boy, this is great.
Great.
You know what?
Let's drink to old bootsie.
Who?
Who's old bootsie?
You know. Don't you remember? Bootsie.
That kid in our outfit who was always tripping over everything.
From the south.
We always used to toast old bootsie.
Don't you remember?
It was good luck, and then we always used to laugh.
Why?
I don't know.
Sure.
Come on, doug. Old bootsie.
No. I couldn't handle another one.
All right, angie.
Bottoms up.
Bottoms up.
Here you are, tim.
No, here.
Let me get this.
No. No, i'm the host here.
This is my hometown.
Hey, 50 bucks.
You're doing all right, ted, but i always knew you would.
I'm doing swell.
I borrowed it from my barber this morning.
It's strictly temporary.
I'll be in the chips tomorrow.
I got to call connie and tell her about this.
She didn't believe you guys would show up.
She's a great girl, connie. Sometimes a little bit jealous.
Guess you know what that's like, huh, doug?
Oh, sure.
I'll tell you what we'll do.
We'll have a few more drinks here, and we'll go somewhere for lunch, huh?
Yeah.
Florio's.
Florio's. Veal parmigiana.
Lasagne.
I couldn't handle that heavy food.
I have to be a little careful, restaurant-wise- go where they know me.
Why don't i take you two chaps to the turquoise?
The turquoise?
Whoo.
I'll handle it.
No. I can handle it.
No. I wouldn't think of it.
I'll just put it on the expense account.
I'll charge this whole day off as a business trip.
That's just swell.
Doug, you never did get back to europe to paint, did you?
No. Career-wise, it didn't seem practical, but i've been creative in the advertising line with little miss mop-up for klenzrite and jolio the gelatin man.
No. I don't miss la vie boheme one bit.
Little miss mop-up.
You did that?
What do you know?
If you're ever up schenectady way, you have to drop in at my place.
Real red meat at the cordon bleu.
At the what?
The cordon bleu.
That's the name of my hamburger joint.
Ha ha ha!
That's rich.
That is priceless.
What's so funny?
As far as names go, it seems to me little miss mop-up and jolio the gelatin man are pretty priceless themselves.
Oh, well, l- come on. Jolio the gelatin man.
Your call to schenectady, sir.
Gee, thanks.
Hello? Connie?
Hey, it's me.
I'm talking to you from a table at the turquoise.
What a swanky dump.
What do you know?
They both showed up.
Oh, it's great.
Like old times.
How are the kids?
Good.
How did johnny do in the columbus day school pageant?
Oh? He forgot
"oh, columbus, we salute you"?
Went over that line a thousand times with him.
Look, connie, i'll call you back later.
Tell you when i'm coming home.
Miss you, too.
Yeah. Good-bye.
Ted, how about you?
Law school and the political arena?
The midtown arena is about the only arena i know.
Which reminds me- i have to get up to stillman's gym later and look at my fighter.
Racketeers in the fight game, huh?
Glad i'm in a respectable business.
I shouldn't have come i shouldn't have come this thing's a mistake an awful mistake that guy's such a snob and who is that hick?
Can these be the guys i once thought i could never live without?
Doug: Who do you think will win the world series?
Both teams look pretty good to me.
Yeah.
Yeah.
May the best team win.
This thing is a frost i'd like to get lost old pals are the bunk this guy's a cheap punk and that one's a heel and i'm a schlemiel can these be the guys i once thought i could never live without?
This thing's a bad dream why can't i just scream?
Aaaaah!
Oh, why did i fly to new york from chi?
To drink scotch at noon with a hick and a goon can these be the guys i once thought i could never live without?
This guy is a punk, a punk, a punk this guy is a snob, a snob, a snob this guy is a dope, a hick, a square i shouldn't have come, i'm in despair our dreams are dust and down the drain this thing is a bust, and i'm insane oh, why did i come? Why am i here?
A hick a square a snob a punk a hick a square a slob a ha ha ha ho ho ho ho a hick, a square, a snob, a punk why did i come?
Why am i here?
Why?
Good afternoon, miss leighton.
This way, please.
Thank you, carl.
Thank you.
Scotch old-fashioned, please, carl.
That's what i like.
An old-fashioned girl.
I'm an old-fashioned boy, myself.
Here we are, gentlemen.
Salisbury steak medium for you, sir.
Thank you.
Medium rare for you, mr. Hallerton.
Thank you.
And well done for you, sir.
Thank you.
Hey! You call this a hamburger? For 4 bucks?
Angie, shh, please.
Come on, ted, you taste it.
You know about horses.
I tell you this hamburger ran in the kentucky derby.
Forget it, angie.
Listen. If i served stuff like this, i'd be run out of schenectady on the third rail.
Will you shut up?
What did you say?
I said be quiet.
This is very embarrassing.
Angie, don't act like a yokel.
We're in a very high-class place.
Didn't stop you from trying to make a quick pickup, i noticed.
I've picked up dames in better places than this.
I doubt that.
I don't think either of you crumbs could get in a place like this without me.
Who's a crumb?
You are.
You cheap snob.
I'm sorry.
Me, too.
So am i.
I guess we've had it.
Yeah.
Guess so.
Waiter.
Check, please.
Man: Hey, hallerton.
Well, well, well.
Oh, mr. Fielding.
I didn't know you were in town.
Just for the day.
How's the missis? Fine, thank you.
Is she with you? No, not this trip.
Oh, mr. Fielding, these are two friends of mine.
Mr. Valentine, and this is mr. Riley.
How do you do, mr. Fielding?
We were in the war together.
We're having a little reunion.
Haven't seen each other in 10 years.
Must be a lot of fun getting together to talk about old times.
Mr. Fielding, excuse me.
Oh, miss leighton.
I've been calling you and couldn't reach you.
It's very important.
Miss leighton, i want you to meet hallerton of chicago.
He's one of our executive vice presidents out there.
He's responsible for the miss mop-up campaign.
Oh, you're the one.
Miss leighton is one of our best idea men.
I should say women.
You certainly should.
You know, she's the program coordinator on our biggest klenzrite tv show- midnight with madeline.
What do you know?
Doug, aren't you going to introduce us?
Oh, certainly.
Miss leighton, this is mr. Valentine and mr. Riley.
Ted riley.
I suggest we skip lunch and get right over to madeline's rehearsal.
You know how she is.
Sweetie, i can't.
I'm waiting here for stamper and trasker.
And donner and blitzen.
I'm afraid we really better go.
All right.
Doug, why don't you come along and have a look-see?
We're rehearsing over at the fontainebleau.
I'd like that very much.
Well, so long, fellas.
Bring your friends along.
No!
I mean, we're just about through here lunch-wise, and i'm sure they're very busy appointment-wise.
Not at all, doug.
We'd love to come along.
I've got about an hour to kill before i have to be at stillman's gym.
You see, i own a plug-ugly who's going to be engaged fisticuffs-wise tonight, and i have to stop by and put the lead weights in his gloves and wise him up wise-wise.
Sure. Sure.
Come along.
You, too, mr. - i'd sure like to meet madeline in the flesh- maybe get her autograph to take home.
Yes, you could hang it on the wall of your hot dog stand.
Hamburgers.
Hamburgers, of course.
How crude of you, douglas. Shall we go?
Man: Say, fielding?
Oh, stamper and trasker.
Yes. We're just on our way over to the fontainebleau, and this is- the fontainebleau, please.
7 of us couldn't fit in one cab.
Of all the- now, don't get mad.
I had a crazy notion you and i should get better acquainted.
I see.
Besides, i think you're about the prettiest program coordinator i've ever seen.
You know, a fella's not safe alone in a cab with a girl these days.
All right.
Ok. Satisfied?
I just couldn't face the boredom of fighting you off for 10 blocks.
It's the simplest method, my own invention.
Remove the initiative from the brute male, and he'll retire in confusion.
Now, while you retire in confusion, i'll do a little work.
What kind of a screwball are you?
To save you the strain of trying to understand me, i'll give you the salient facts.
Graduate of barnard, summa cum laude, career girl.
I'm fairly pretty, which is a nuisance.
I attract a lot of men at first, but i can always find a way of getting rid of them, and then everybody's happy all around.
In short, i can always scare them off.
I don't scare easy.
No?
No.
Did you ever hear of planck, who discovered the quantum theory in 1895?
Without that and maxwell's field theory, there never would have been a theory of relativity.
And did you ever hear of magadization, the pre-medieval musical system of voices singing or playing octaves apart?
And did you- time.
Did you ever hear of kid mariacchi?
Kid mariacchi?
Yeah.
Middleweight.
Fighting tonight.
5 foot 9,
8 straight knockouts in a row.
Good chance of flattening helding tonight.
You're flattening me right now.
It's just a trick.
It doesn't mean anything.
It has nothing to do with intelligence, but men do find it an awful bore.
And i'll tell you something. I don't care.
Because as shakespeare said in the tempest, act 2, scene 7:
"Most friendship is feigning, most loving mere folly."
"Most friendship is feigning, most loving mere folly."
Well, in some ways, you and me and shakespeare see eye to eye.
I got my diploma this afternoon.
You and your war buddies?
Yeah. You saw it.
We met at our old wartime hangout, little place called tim's bar.
We expected to pick up where we left off 10 years ago.
What a laugh.
Never mind.
It's on klenzrite.
See? You didn't bother me in the least on the rest of the trip.
My own invention.
That invention's going to explode in your face someday, einstein.
Well, so long.
Aren't you going to say good-bye to your pals?
We said good-bye a long time ago.
But don't let that worry you. You'll see me again.
Just take the male initiative and pick me up at stillman's gym about 4:00.
I wouldn't bet on that.
You know, there's a lot of things you shouldn't bet on.
Like that shakespeare quote, for instance.
It ain't the tempest act 2, scene 7. it's as you like it act 2, scene 7.
"Hey-ho, sing hey-ho unto the green holly, most friendship is feigning, most loving, mere folly."
Oh, i'm around stillman's all the time.
Man: Quiet. Quiet, please.
Rehearsal.
Klenzrite presents... midnight with madeline, starring... madeline!
Music is better than words you break the spell when you start to speak that technique is all wrong just forget about words and sing her a song music was made for romance love and a sweet song go hand in glove every lover knows this and the sweeter the song, the sweeter the kiss when you're without love, you cry and your song is the blues but when you've got love, you're high and your song is a gay refrain a happy strain that sings out the news don't let the night go to waste looking for ways to say i love you take your cue from the birds music music is better music is better than words applause, applause, applause.
And now, you dear ladies and gentlemen, we come to the part of the program which is always my favorite because it means something.
Because it means this big, cold canyon we call new york really has a heart, and if you listen very hard, you can hear it throb.
The throb of manhattan.
Last week we brought you thomas w. Jackwood, reunited right here with his wife and children after 30 years in jail.
Tonight again, our surprise guest or guests are somewhere in this room.
Spotlight.
Could it be you?
Yes. Yes, it's you, mr. Kebbner.
This, ladies and gentlemen, is donald w. Kebbner of the bronx- one of the last army of little gray men struggling along from day to day gallantly making ends meet.
Everyone has a dream, ladies and gentlemen.
Such a one is mr. Kebbner- a simple man with a dream of visiting the orient in its unparalleled splendor, but all his life he has spent in his candy store on superior avenue, where he has brought the orient to him by constructing, for 16 years, a complete table-sized model of the taj mahal executed entirely in chewing-gum wrappers.
No. No. No. No!
I will not have this on my show!
It's terrible!
Jackie, what are you trying to do, ruin me?
Madeline, it's the best we could do as a last-minute substitute.
We had something so wonderful- a totally reformed drunkard who was going to tell us his inspiring story.
Yes, but he got drunk.
You geniuses will just have to put your heads together.
I won't do the show tonight.
I just won't go on.
I want 40 million people to sit home and cry and love me.
Sam, get me a club sandwich, a double order of french fries, and two cans of beer.
Make it 3!
Madeline, please, your diet... you know what happens to your figure when you start eating.
Who cares about my diet or my figure?
I'm unhappy, and i want to eat.
Here's a nice pimento cheese sandwich.
I don't want a pimento cheese sandwich.
Sweetie, it took you so long to take off those 20 pounds.
You mustn't give up the battle of the bulge.
Ha ha ha!
Ha ha ha!
Look who's talking, fatso.
You didn't get that corporation on lettuce and tomato sandwiches.
Yeah, but, sweetie, nobody pays to look at me in an evening gown.
Who cares? I'm not going on tonight!
Madeline, wait a minute.
This chewing-gum man has no sympathy!
Look, sweetie.
You got to lay off those fat sandwiches.
Now calm down, everybody.
I think i've got the spot solved for tonight.
It's the foulest notion i've had yet, but after all, it's for the glory of klenzrite.
The show must go on.
What is it?
It's human. It's up to the minute.
It's guaranteed to tear your guts out!
Yes?
It will take coordination- everybody pitching in, even you.
Darling, what is it?
The 3 war buddies.
They met today for the first time in 10 years at their old hangout, a little place called tim's bar.
You mean hallerton and what's his name and what's his name?
Right.
And tonight, much to their surprise, they will meet again at 11:00 and be interviewed by madeline on throb of manhattan.
Oh! It's beautiful!
Beautiful!
Our boys and me and the whole nation watching and weeping.
That's very good. You think we ought to talk to hallerton about this?
No. This has to be a surprise show.
Something tells me these 3 old pals wouldn't want to do this.
You just take care of hallerton and get him to the theater by 11:00.
And, madeline, you take care of mr. Schenectady.
How am i going to take care of mr. - don't let him out of your sight.
Take him anyplace he wants to go.
To dinner?
Yes. Eat your head off.
Now, let's see, that's hallerton and valentine, and i guess i'll have to be responsible for number 3.
Nashby: Get that.
Ok, that's enough.
Hey, what's eating you?
Huh? Oh. Nothing.
I was just thinking about the fight.
Ted.
Thanks, nashby.
So long.
You mad at me about something?
What have i got to be mad at you about?
Man: Riley.
Someone to see you.
Someone about 6 foot 4 with a broken nose and an i.o.u. In his hand?
No. About 5 foot 5, neat little nose, and "i love you" in her eyes.
Hey, lady.
Come in.
Hello.
Well, well, well.
Right on the dot.
Are you always this prompt?
Yes. I'm just a machine.
Good. I love to tinker with machinery.
I had a couple of hours off, and i remembered your kind invitation.
I thought i'd drop in and see all you colorful folk of the world of fisticuffs in action.
Sort of research, huh?
In a manner of speaking.
You're just in time for a nice hot cup of rubbing alcohol and crumpets.
Miss leighton, this is, as if you didn't know, kid mariacchi.
How do you do?
Hello.
Ok, kid, get dressed.
You'll be great tonight.
And lefty louie.
Delighted.
Butch mcsween.
Charmed.
Boys, miss leighton.
Pleased to meet you.
Hello.
Miss leighton is here to do some research.
She says she wants to see the colorful folk of the world of fisticuffs in action.
I'm sure you'll oblige.
Mariacchi: Hey, ted.
Mr. Riley, i'll be delighted to escort miss leighton until your return.
Louie, you're a gentleman and a scholar.
It's a pleasure.
I'll be right back.
Fellow colleagues, do your stuff.
Yeah!
Look at me.
I'm shadow boxing.
He's got a glass jaw.
This is headgear.
It protects me.
Sucks wind in the third round.
Boxer:
1, 2, button my shoe, 3, 4, shut the door.
Louie:
Good counter-puncher.
Well, charming little place you have here.
Charming little place?
Lady, this is an institution.
It's been like a mother to us and to our fathers before us.
These old walls are as steeped in tradition as the ivy-covered walls of harvard.
Over on new york's eighth avenue stands a building gray and grim it's the home of broken noses our alma mater, stillman's gym though the plastered walls are peeling and it looks a mess to some we point with pride to that spot on the northwest side mmm where john l. Sullivan always parked his gum stillman's. Stillman's.
Rah, rah, rah!
Hit them in the breadbox.
Uh. Uh.
Fight... for stillman's.
Fight.
Sock them with a right hook.
Ouch. Ouch.
Make him hear the birdies.
Peep. Peep.
Fight... for stillman's.
Fight.
Stillman's, dear old stillman's home of famous fighting men for you, dear old stillman's i'd lay me down for the count of 10 rah, rah, rah stillman's, dear old stillman's we worship at your shrine for you, dear old stillman's i'd get me up at the count of 9 as we think of stillman's graduates our eyes begin to mist for the fighting game has its heavyweight hall of fame with john l. Sullivan leading off the list and after him came, uh... james corbett.
Yeah. And then... bob fitzsimmons, james jeffries, jack johnson jess willard, jack dempsey, gene tunney, max schmeling primo carnera, max baer, james braddock, joe louis ezzard charles, joe walcott, and rocky marciano yay!
Yay!
Just a minute!
In what round did dempsey knock out firpo?
Round two.
Where?
The polo grounds.
When?
In what round did louis knock out schmeling?
First round,
2 minutes, 4 seconds.
When?
In what round did jeffries knock down fitzsimmons?
The 2nd, the 10th, and 11th.
Yay!
Yay!
What a dame, what a dame she belongs in the hall of fame baby, you knock me out you're the dame with the frame they whistle at you're the dame with the brain in the picture hat you're the doll with a wallop like a baseball bat boing, i'm flat baby, you knock me out you're the missis with the kisses super-sweet you're the top, people stop you when you're on the street you're a wower with the power, i admit defeat boing, i'm beat star light, star bright, i see stars when you move in one, two, left, right, you win you got me hanging on the ropes baby, you knock me out you're the broad i'd applaud in a broadway show you're the chick with a kick like a rodeo honeybunch, you got the punch that lays me low boing, k.o.
Baby, you knock me out
6, 7, 8, 9, 10, bong how strong bong, come on you got me hanging on the ropes!
Boxers: Baby, you knock me out you're the broad i'd applaud in a broadway show you're the chick with a kick like a rodeo honeybunch, you got the punch that lays me low
6, 7, 8, 9, 10, boing k.o.!
Left, right, hear me shout baby you knock me out thanks, fellas.
Good-bye.
Bye!
Bye! Bye!
I see you made quite a hit with the fellas.
Thanks. If i'm staying with you for dinner, i have some calls to make-my office, for instance.
Dinner?
Don't you want me to?
Look, i hate to curb your male initiative, but a guy likes to ask once in a while.
Well, then ask me.
Miss leighton, would you do me the honor- yes. Come on.
Look, it'll have to be a quick dinner.
I got the fight tonight, you know.
Oh. I'll go with you to the fight.
Hello, roy.
Is madeline-good.
And fielding? Fine.
Now, what about the costumes for the singing girls?
Have we any cute military outfits around?
Oh. Well, listen.
Right after the rehearsal, i'll meet the girls at the grove costume company.
What do you say, sport?
Hiya, rocky.
Hi.
Hi.
You're pretty smart, sport.
I mean, you're cagey, you know what i mean?
No. What do you mean?
I mean, you're so cagey, you won't even discuss it with me, what's in on it.
In on what?
On it.
Oh, on, uh... the fix.
Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah.
The fix.
Sure. You don't have to worry about nothing, ted.
Charlie culloran set it up great.
Charlie culloran's pretty good at that sort of thing.
Oh, yeah.
We been rehearsing.
We got it down perfect.
You and, uh... me and marl- me and mariacchi.
Look, rocky, don't you think you ought to run over it once again just to make sure?
No. I got it down pat.
Uh, in the fourth round, me and the kid, we come out, and we dance around a little bit. You know.
And all of a sudden, i throw a beautiful left hook.
Catches the kid right on the button.
He does a neat half gainer into the canvas and swims the length of the ring. Huh?
Sounds prettier than the russian ballet.
Well, it'll bring us maybe not fame, but fortune.
Listen, rocky, play it cagey, will you?
I mean, don't go around shooting your mouth off to somebody who might not be in on the fix.
That would be, shall we say, silly?
What-what do you take me for?
I'm... sheesh.
Uh, i'll see you at charlie culloran's after the fix- i mean, the fight.
Sorry. I need the phone.
I'll call you back.
Come on. Come on.
Well, really!
Get me a load of dimes. Who do you think- hurry up!
Well, that's that.
You've been on that phone for years.
I'm sorry, baby.
Last-minute changes, urgent business, but now we'll concentrate on you.
We'll go to some nice quiet place- listen, there's something i have to do.
I must go to the grove costume company and see about some changes for tonight's show.
Do you mind coming along?
What have i got to lose?
Oh, what a day.
The end of old friendship's beautiful dream, and now a frame-up.
Taxi!
What?
They're trying to pull a fast one on me, but i outsmarted them.
Who?
I just found out that sweet kid you met inside- mariacchl- is taking a dive tonight.
What?
Yeah. The fight's fixed.
A big fat combine behind it.
Oh, that's awful.
Taxi!
Is that what you were phoning about?
Did you tip off the boxing commission?
Did i tip off- you think i want to get my head bashed in in a dark alley some night?
Oh, no.
I played dumb.
Took a lot of doing, but i managed to get all my bets switched to rocky helding.
I should make a pile of dough out of it.
Hey, taxi!
Oh.
Situation-wise and saturation-wise, i think this fiscal year is going to top them all.
What do you think, hallerton?
What wise?
I said situation-wise.
Excuse me.
I thought you said saturation-wise.
I did. I said situation-wise and saturation-wise.
Definitely.
Mr. Fielding, i've got to get home.
I want to see dorothy.
I'm just beginning to see- nonsense. You can't leave now.
You've got to stay and see that program tonight, and celia's expecting you for dinner.
Trasker, where were we?
Trasker: Sales-resistance-wise and competition-wise, we have nosed out every other brand from coast to coast.
That's consumer-wise and housewife-wise.
Fielding: But soft-spot-wise and danger-wise, we've got to keep our eyes on november, december, january, and february.
All: I think this fiscal year is going to top them all.
And sales-resistance-wise and competition-wise, we've nosed out every other brand from coast to coast.
But situation-wise and saturation-wise, i think this fiscal year is going to top them all.
And sales-resistance-wise and competition-wise... we've got to keep our eye on... we've got to keep our eye on... keep our eye on... november, december, january, february, january, february, january, february... march, march, march, april, may, june june, june, june... oh, excuse me.
I have a little bit of a headache.
Pardon me.
I'll just step outside for a minute.
I'll be here.
Ok, madeline, that's all.
Girls, over to grove's costume.
Oh, schenectady!
Meet you in the lobby as soon as i change.
Don't forget, you're taking me to dinner.
I'll be there.
Well, bye, girls.
Thanks a lot for showing me everything... and everything.
You're welcome.
Can't wait to see the show tonight and watch donald kebbner's face when he finds he's a surprise guest.
Boy, they really keep it secret, don't they?
That's the whole fun.
Hey, look at that.
I always dreamed of having things like that in my restaurant in schenectady.
Do you own a place like this?
Well, it's not exactly like this.
It's only, uh... it's more modern.
Oh. Bye.
Bye.
Man: Oh, there you are.
It's late.
Come on, girls. Line up.
Jackie: I know, max.
I'm terribly sorry. Sorry, girls.
Oh, max, the hats are all wrong.
It's supposed to be america, not mauritania.
We'll have to do something about them.
Let me see.
Get me those little overseas caps, number 9764-j in your catalog. Come on, girls.
Ok, girls, follow me.
I'll be right back, ted.
When the time has come for parting and the marching music ends no matter where our lives may lead us we'll be friends until we die once upon a time, i had two friends once upon a time i thought that friendship never ends once i had a dream what a joke all: Gone is that dream up in smoke all: Once i had a dream what a joke gone is that dream up in smoke gone is that dream up in smoke ted.
Ted, shall we go?
Look, lady, you're excused.
You don't have to hang around with me all evening.
I wish i didn't have to hang around with myself.
Jackie: But, ted, we were going to have dinner and go to the fights.
Don't you remember?
I don't get you.
First it was strictly no dice, for which i can hardly blame you, and now- i don't figure a broad like you.
I don't get you.
You talk like a mug, or you try to, but obviously- well, that shakespeare quote.
Oh, no. I used to have quite a fund of useless information.
Just ask angie and doug.
I don't have to ask angie and doug.
You know something?
Those two used to think i was greater than babe ruth, justice holmes, and dick tracy rolled into one.
What did they think you were going to turn out to be?
Oh, nothing much, just a great man.
I have a sneaking feeling i've let them down just a wee bit.
If they knew about my, shall we say, helpful attitude toward this fix, the boys would be real proud of me.
Don't you think so?
Don't look for any sermons from me.
I've been involved in some fixes myself.
I suppose everybody's in some racket or other.
Say, what is this tough-woman-of-the-world pose of yours?
What's your problem?
Some man done you wrong?
Oh, really.
No. You'd never let anyone get near enough.
You think you know all the answers.
You take the initiative. You- actually, you're just plain inhibited. That's your problem.
Look.
Don't give me any two-bit snap psychoanalysis.
Anyone can do it.
10 years ago, fresh out of the army, you were going to amount to something, but you had a disappointment.
I don't know if it was a small blond one or a tall dark one, but ever since then, you've been taking it out on the world and yourself.
That'll be 25 cents, please.
That was no snap analysis, lady. That was my life.
I'm sorry.
Nah, that's all right.
You were terrific, doc.
You hit it square on the hose.
Speaking of snap analysis, i owe you 25 cents.
Hmm?
You hit it square on the nose about me, doc.
Sorry. Got to lock up.
Oh. We were just going.
Here. Go get yourself analyzed.
The chicago concert season sounds just divine.
Mrs. Hallerton and i have subscription tickets to everything, but she always has to go with her cousin minnie because old fatso over there keeps me working too long.
Who? Ha ha ha!
How is dear mrs. Hallerton?
How should i know?
I'm married to her.
Does she still have those awful headaches?
Yeah, and she's tried everything- pills, analysis, astrology, witchcraft.
Nothing helps.
It's very simple- she's dying.
I'm boring her to death.
Ha ha ha!
She has a certain look when she's with me.
It's a combination of boredom, disgust, and pity.
I saw that same look on ted and angie's faces today.
You know who's looking at me right now with that same look?
Not me?
No, not you,
4 eyes. Me.
Hey, garcon! Hey!
Boy, i wouldn't have any more of those if i were you, doug.
And i sneaked
5 on the side. That makes 8.
Hey, you!
Fielding: You've got to stay in shape tonight, my boy.
You're coming to madeline's program, you know.
Do i have to witness that maudlin, disgusting junk- see some poor, helpless surprised guest make an idiot of themself?
Well... ha ha ha!
There must be some more dignified way to sell klenzrite- like you taking a bath stark-naked in macy's window.
Well, why don't you fire me?
I wouldn't dream of it, my boy.
I just want you to stay in shape tonight, that's all.
Where do you get off owning paintings like these- picasso, braque, rouault, renoir?
What do you know about painting anyway, you old goof?
Your art appreciation ended with mutt and jeff.
Ha ha ha!
Do you have any idea what it takes to be a great artist or even an inferior one?
The dedication, the sacrifice, the time?
Come on, meathead.
Fire me.
Speaking of meatheads, that reminds me.
Dinner- just a second.
Just a second.
Doug. Doug!
This is a surprise for ted and angie.
Ha ha ha!
It's a surprise for ted and angie.
Voila! No mustache.
Huh? Ted and angie would know me now.
Doug, i'm glad you're down.
We're a little late, dinner-wise.
Dinner-wise. Gee, i wish i'd have said that-wise.
Whoop. Drink-wise.
Drink-wise, drink- sorry-wise.
Apologize.
Sorry-wise, apologize.
Sorry-wise, apologize.
Sorry-wise, apologize sorry-wise and apologize-wise apologize-wise and sorry-wise apologize-wise and apologize-wise situation-wise, saturation-wise, competition-wise sales-resistance-wise, television-wise, and meathead-wise and fatso-wise and wise-and-wise ba ba ba ba ba bap situation-wise, saturation-wise saturation-wise and situation-wise drink-wise, pill-wise audio-wise and video-wise and video-wise and audio-wise audio-video-wise and video-audio-wise i dream of jeanie with the light brown hair situation-wise saturation-wise situation-wise, saturation-wise, and sl- be my love, for no one else can end this yearning for you, i'll make the sweetest music time for the party-wise!
Do do do do ha!
Do do, ooh ooh, hee hoo hmm hmm hmm hmm hmm doodle oo, doodle oo, doodle oo sound retreat!
Damsel in distress!
Charge!
Follow me!
Over the moat!
Dinner-wise, i'm with you, jerry-lewis-wise.
Stand back.
My old trick.
Nothing up my sleeves.
No mustache.
Max.
Think he'll win?
Sure. Hi.
Hi.
Well, if it isn't ted riley.
Well, if it isn't charlie culloran. What a nice surprise.
What are you doing here, charlie?
Just came over to say hello to you and wish the kid good luck.
That's swell of you, charlie.
He looks great.
Thanks.
Frankly, when i lost him to you, i thought he was just nothing.
You've done wonders with him.
Thanks again.
I'll see you around.
A few things i want to talk to you about soon.
Sure thing, charlie.
I want you to come up to the house.
I'll have my wife cook us a nice chicken dumpling dinner with all the trimmings.
And bring the young lady.
Sure thing, charlie.
Good luck.
Thanks.
Who is that?
That's little miss fix-it and his crowd of debutantes.
Oh.
Ted: Hiya, kid.
Where were you?
You're late, ted.
I get it.
Good luck tonight. Thanks.
Ok, georgie, i'll finish here.
Wait outside.
Thanks.
Get a good rest?
Sure. I feel swell.
I'm glad, because i got everything i own riding on you tonight, kid, but i know i'm a cinch to clean up on you.
Yeah.
You seem a little nervous.
Who, me? Uh-uh.
You got nothing to be nervous about.
It's a big night.
Yeah. It was a big day today, too.
Remember that date i had to keep at 12:00?
Yeah.
That wasn't with a girl.
It turned out to be a date with myself.
Huh?
First time i met up with myself in about
10 years.
You sound nuts.
But i'm glad i got you, kid.
You're my one accomplishment.
Yeah, you're right.
The boys are real proud of you.
Huh? What did you say?
I said the boys are real proud of you.
The boys.
Look, kid, remember what i told you about keeping your hands down? Come here.
See, you got them down like this, all relaxed.
George: Come on, kid!
They're waiting for you!
Ok, go ahead.
He'll be right up.
Come on.
Let's get out of here.
You go on, georgie.
I'll bring him right up.
Taxi.
530 east 48th street.
Ted, you idiot, what did you do?
Those men are going to kill you.
Between the two of us, we can handle anybody.
But, ted, aren't you in terrible danger?
Yeah. Yeah, i'm in terrible danger.
I'm in danger of believing that look on your face.
You know,
10 years ago, i told myself i'd never let this happen again.
And then- oh!
That's nothing, darling. It's only the car.
No, it isn't.
Remember?
It's my own invention... exploding in my face.
How's he coming, swenson?
Fine, mr. Fielding.
I'll have him shipshape in half an hour.
Good. We have to leave for the telecast at 10:30.
I'll give him deep massage, and he'll be good as new.
Oh. Somebody stole my mustache.
Fielding, i want that mustache returned, every hair in place.
Ha ha ha!
Miss leighton, what on earth are you up to?
Hmm?
You've been living here two years.
You know our simple, steadfast rules- no men beyond this line.
Couldn't you make an exception in my case?
I'm a traveling salesman.
I'm sorry.
And besides, miss leighton, what are you doing here at this hour?
You're usually at your broadcast by this time.
Oh, the broadcast!
Ted, will you please wait here for me?
I have to change.
I'll be down in 10 minutes.
And listen, there's something about the program i've got to tell you.
I'll tell you on the way over, and you can make up your mind.
About what?
It's ridiculous, and i'm sick of it, and i'll explain it on the way over. I'll hurry.
I'll be here.
Have you a side entrance here?
Yes. There.
Tell miss leighton i had to leave.
I'll meet her at the broadcast. Thank you. Good-bye.
Why am i feeling so good?
Why am i feeling so strong?
Why am i feeling, when things could look black that nothing could possibly go wrong?
This has been a most unusual day love has made me see things in a different way can it be i like myself?
She likes me, so i like myself if someone wonderful as she is can think i'm wonderful i must be quite a guy feeling so unlike myself always used to dislike myself but now my love has got me riding high she likes me, so so do i she likes me, so so do i ladies and gentlemen, in just 3 minutes, midnight with madeline will start.
Now, don't forget, we have a battery of television cameras cleverly concealed, so be careful what you say to your neighbor or how affectionate you are with your partner of the evening because remember, you may be on tv.
What am i doing here?
Doug, if you stand over here at the bar, you'll be able to see everything.
All right.
Host: If you look up to the right of the monitor... right this way, mr. Valentine.
Host: Each time you see the applause sign... yes, sir, what is it?
I want to see miss leighton. Tell her it's ted riley.
Oh, mr. Riley, i'm trasker.
The show's just going on.
Please step over here.
She'll see you right afterwards.
Oh, thank you.
Host: Yes, yes, yes, it's 11:00, and the makers of klenzrite, dozerite, isrite, and wasrite, also manufacturers of h2o cola, that effervescent cola that's pure as water, as nonfattening as water, but, oh, boy, that cola taste that zooms you up to the skies, presents midnight with madeline, starring... me. May i come in?
Remember that klenzrite is the only washing soap for you remember that klenzrite is the soap that washes things so new please remember the many things that only klenzrite can do remember to call your grocer to send you klenzrite and now you dear ladies and gentlemen, guess what i'm going to do.
I'm going to sing you a song.
It's my latest recording, and i do hope you just love it.
But even if you don't, i don't really mind, as long as you love me.
I'm watching and waiting hello, sam. Hello, joe.
I'm waiting and watching hello, max. Hello, bob.
Hello, jasper.
I hope and i yearn hello, bill. Hello, phil.
Just for his return hello, fellas!
Thanks for the present of the silver-blue mink thanks for the plane and the ice-skating rink thanks for the yacht and for the solid-gold sink thanks a lot, but no, thanks thanks for the scrabble set with platinum board thanks for the factory once known as ford thank you for finding me the famous lost chord thanks a lot, but no, thanks for i am just a faithful lassie waiting for her faithful lad and there's no gift, however classy by which this lassie can be had thanks for the banks and for the santa fe line thanks for the darling uranium mine but i'm a gal with only one valentine thanks a lot, but no, thanks thanks for the champagne and thanks for the state of maine and thanks for the autographed picture of john wayne thanks a lot, but no, thanks thanks for the cruise and thanks for the oil wells that ooze and thanks for that pair of fred astaire shoes thanks a lot, but no, thanks for i am just a faithful lassie waiting for her faithful lad and there's no gift, however classy by which this lassie can be had thanks for losing your mind and thanks for fort knox, sealed and signed but i've got a guy who's clifton webb and marlon brando combined thanks a lot, but no, no, thanks now, ladies and gentlemen, our weekly featurette, the throb of manhattan.
Dear ladies and gentlemen, we come to the part of the program which is always my favorite because it means something, because it means this big, cold canyon we call new york really has a heart.
Somewhere in this room is the surprise guest or guests for this evening.
Could it be you?
Yes, boys, you're on television!
Oh, the time has come for parting and the marching music ends no matter where our lives may lead us in our hearts, we'll still be friends for friends we are now, and friends we'll stay until we meet again one wonderful day let a million miles divide us let the years go rolling by although the time has come for parting we'll be friends until we die ladies and gentlemen,
10 years ago, these 3 g.i. Joes returning from the war made a solemn pledge to meet again today.
They had their glorious reunion at noon, proving true friendship never dies.
Yes, friends, this is ted riley, angelo valentine, and douglas hallerton.
Boys, this reception is also being given to you by millions of people sitting in their homes all over the country, and i know that just like me, they are all feeling a wee bit misty.
Bless you.
Oh, look. Little angelo is blushing.
Bless him.
Isn't this wonderful?
Isn't this a great surprise?
It certainly is for me, though i think i was about to be tipped off.
This is why you spent every minute of the day with me.
I should have smelled a rat.
Hey, connie, if you're watching, nothing happened!
Ha ha ha! Connie, ladies and gentlemen, is little angie's wife, who is watching the show from schenectady.
And this is douglas hallerton, everyone, who knew nothing about it, even though he is one of our own executive vice presidents from chicago.
Now, really, doug, isn't this a great moment for you, being the surprise guest on one of your own shows?
Madeline, sincerely, i deserve every bit of it.
It's truly a fitting climax to 10 years of self-degradation, and if anyone interested is watching, i know what she meant, change-wise, that is.
Uh, yes, yours is a true success story, doug.
But not all of us can reach the top, ladies and gentlemen.
Some of us sometimes need a helping hand.
Take mr. Valentine, for instance.
Now, mr. Valentine is a sweet, simple person, one of the vast army of little gray men who struggle along from day to day, gallantly making ends meet.
Angie, we are going to give you, absolutely free, a klenzrite washing machine plus a 5-year supply of fishmayer's non-scuffle shoes for your poor, dear little kiddies.
Bless you. Here is your klenzrite guarantee and mr. Fishmayer's personal certificate.
Thanks a lot... but no, thanks.
I'm not looking for any handouts, and i'm not one of any vast army of little gray men.
I'm doing all right, and i can take care of my own family.
Thank you.
Isn't that wonderful, ladies and gentlemen?
And you, mr. Riley.
I understand that you are engaged in the glamorous world of sports.
Tell us about yourself, won't you?
There's nothing to tell. I'm a bum.
Hmm?
A bum. You know, a small-time operator.
I'm mixed up with some of the shadiest characters in town.
As a matter of fact, knowing the inspiring, uplifting work you do on this program, i feel terrible about showing my face in decent homes all over the country.
Boys, don't be like me.
Live clean. Use klenzrite.
Uh, why, thank you.
And now tell us about your glorious reunion.
The three of you walked into tim's bar- look, madeline, i'd like to help you out and give you all the phony sentiment and corn you want, but i'm afraid i'll have to disappoint you.
When the three of us met today in tim's bar for the big moment, it was horrible.
The years had- the years had made us strangers.
We-we hated one another.
I know now why i hated them.
It's because i hated myself.
But i'm glad it happened because i'd like the guys to know that whatever they think of me, i don't blame them, and i'd give several arms and legs to win their friendship and respect again.
I'll try and spend the next 10 years winning it back.
Good night, madeline. It's been swell.
Uh- and now, ladies and gentlemen, the klenzrite cakewalkers.
Hello, riley.
Charlie culloran.
Hi, rocky.
Dirty crook.
Ted: I'm sorry you feel that way, rocky.
Charlie: We hate to interrupt your evening of nightclubbing- nightclubbing?
Why, this- oh, yeah?
Yeah, but we'd like to have you come along with us.
To your house for that chicken dumpling dinner?
Ted, i'm afraid you won't be able to enjoy a chicken dumpling dinner for 3 or 4 years.
Cover ted riley with number 3 camera.
Get that mike down closer and keep it there!
Maybe after 5 or 6 months, you can take a little clear broth.
Oh, really?
I'm afraid so.
Well, why this attitude, charlie?
Of course you know, ted, there was no fight tonight.
When the kid regained consciousness, he told us how you'd knocked him out.
When charlie culloran fixes a fix, he wants it to stay fixed.
What was that, charlie?
I say when i fix them, i want them to stay fixed.
Oh, fixed? Oh.
Thank you very much.
Yes. Well, i can understand that, charlie.
Pride in one's work and all.
Ted: I kind of felt that tonight, too.
I was a little annoyed at the kid for wanting to throw the fight after all the hard work i had done with him, so i thought the best thing to do was to incapacitate him and prevent the fight from going on.
Of course, if it was just a matter of me being upset, i'd forget about it, but there are several other gentlemen involved, and they'd like to have a little chat with you.
Who could they be?
Barney gaber, larry treadman, zeb o'flair- barney, larry, zeb?
They're all in on the, uh, fix?
Yes, and i think it would be a little rude to keep them waiting.
I have a couple of boys here to escort us out.
Say, charlie, have you ever been on tv?
What?
Have you ever been on tv?
You know, you got a beautiful full face, but let's see your profile.
The profile is very important for love scenes and so forth.
That's very, very nice.
Rocky, don't you think charlie would be good on tv?
To tell you the truth, i never thought about it before, but up on the screen, there's an actor there who ain't no prettier than charlie.
If i didn't want to be deemed crazy, i'd say it was charlie.
What are you talking about?
Yes, charlie, you're on television.
You've just given a nice, clear statement before about
60 million people.
Why, you- ted, you all right?
Doug: Angie, cover me!
Ready on the right.
Ready on the left.
Ready in the firing line.
Charge!
Charge!
Ted: Bombs away!
Hit the dirt!
Yay!
Yay! Yay!
Fire one!
I'm coming, angie!
Hey, look.
Let's get out of here before they ask a lot of questions.
Ladies and gentlemen, your madeline has done it again.
You have witnessed not only the reunion of the 3 ex-g.i. S, but also our additional surprise guest, charles z. Culloran, notorious racketeer and gambler, making a spontaneous and unrehearsed confession which will doubtless send him up the river for 50 or 60 years!
All this on our weekly human-interest featurette, the throb of manhattan.
March, march, march, april, may, june june, june, june, july and august, september sept, sept, september, october- what happened to the rover boys?
We've been on television.
Come on, tim.
Set 'em up.
Sure got to hand it to you guys.
10 years, and the same old pals.
Nothing changed.
Ha ha ha!
Tim, we love you.
You got a sharp eye.
Hello, dorothy?
It's me-doug.
I just wanted to tell- what?
Oh, you saw the program?
Oh, you do?
Yeah, well, so do i.
Listen, darling, i don't know how you stood me up till now.
Yes, i am.
But now i've got a chance to show you- listen, dot, i know we can make it.
Yeah. L- well, i... i can't say any more right now.
Just- i love you.
Bye.
To dorothy.
Dorothy.
And one for connie and the kids.
And the cordon bleu.
No. No more cordon bleu.
From now on, it's just going to be plain "angie and connie's roadside diner."
Well... hey, i remember old bootsie.
The kid from the south that was always tripping all over himself?
Sure. His name was george something-or-other.
Bootsie.
Brown?
No, no.
George barry.
Barry! That's it!
We were always toasting him.
It was good luck or something.
Why?
I don't know.
I remember.
When we landed at anzio on the beachhead, he fell over his big feet and fell flat on his face.
We followed him down.
We thought it was orders.
The machine guns opened up to let us have it, but we were down flat.
That's right.
That idiot saved our lives.
Gee.
Old bootsie.
Bootsie.
Bootsie.
Hey, you remember corporal zimmerman?
Corporal zimmerman!
All right, all right!
One more, and that's all.
I got a license here, remember?
It's closing time.
It's late.
We all got homes to go to.
Pay up, and let's go.
Let's see.
That'll be 4 bucks even.
I got it.
I got it.
Hey, hey!
Wait a minute.
The safe!
The safe.
The safe.
There it is.
4 even.
4 bucks.
Tim, that about wraps it up.
Jackie: Not quite.
There's a little unfinished business.
I think everything's going to be all right with you, too, ted.
What do you think, angie?
Vote for riley.
Tim: Though the time has come for parting and the marching music ends no matter where our lives may lead us in our hearts, we'll still be friends though the time has come for parting and the future lies unknown although the years may come between us we will never feel alone chorus: For friends we are now and friends we'll stay until we meet again one wonderful day let a million miles divide us let the years go rolling by although the time has come for parting we'll be friends until we die captioning made possible by turner entertainment group captioned by the national captioning institute -www.ncicap.org-
I hope you split your breeches, kid!
Control yourself, Aicha.
They talk like they were Herculeses, all of them.
And after a few turns, they pant, they gasp, and they wheeze.
- One has to give them smelling salts!
- What is the matter?
My shoes are soaking wet.
I shall die of cold.
- Then take them off.
- I can't. I haven't any socks on.
When the wine arrives, you pay for it as if it were your own money.
You should not drink so fast,
Monsieur Lautrec. It burns your stomach.
I'm thirsty. Please.
Wine is for thirst.
- At least you did not say water.
- Water is for Americans.
Some men can swing by their heels on the flying trapeze.
Some men can become President of the Republic. I can drink cognac.
Henri, I thought I'd find you here.
I've great news.
Maurice, have a drink.
- You're made, Henri.
- Again?
This is serious.
Guess who came into the gallery today.
- Who?
- Camondo!
To get out of the rain?
- And what do you think?
- What?
He halted by your canvas of the woman ironing.
Stepped back two paces, nodded twice.
- You realize what this means, of course.
- What?
Henri, you've arrived!
He's the greatest collector of contemporary art in the world.
When he buys, the painter is made.
- Did he buy?
- Not exactly.
I see. The sun came out and he was in a hurry.
Mark my words, he'll be back.
I'll make a frame for the canvas tonight.
You'd do much better to sit and have a drink.
Trust me, Henri, the sale's as good as made.
Did you see that dirty-necked Algerian step on my foot?
I saw you kick her in the derriere.
Kick her?
One day I'll go right down her throat... pull her heart out, and feed it to my cat.
If you can get at her.
She has long arms, Aicha.
I'll break them! I'll...
- You kick me.
- You kicked me.
This calls for a drink. Cognac?
Thank you.
Now we're all friends again.
I tell you, Monsieur Lautrec,
I am fed up with these Lorettes!
They behave like alley cats.
A regiment of angels with flaming swords could not keep order.
- That's not bad.
- Thank you.
- It might make a good poster for the Moulin.
- It might at that.
I'll tell you what I'll do, Monsieur Lautrec.
You make that poster, and I'll give you free drinks for a month.
- Well, that's the best offer I've had.
- Think it over.
Away
The river goes rolling
O may, O may
Our love remain true
It's April again
And lovers are lining
The banks of the Seine
It's April again
And every eye is shining
Was it love let your lucky fingers
Seek mine that you were meant to hold
Was it love sang a song that lingers
Now both of us are growing old
Lie closer, my dear
And hear the refrain
Of your seventeenth year
In the sun and the rain
Beside the River Seine O
Away, away
The river goes rolling
O may, O may
Our love remain true
It's April again
And lilacs are springing
The length of the Seine
It's April again
And everyone is singing
Was it love led me on a Sunday
To dance with you beneath the trees?
Was it love echoed on a Monday
The music of the river breeze?
Lie closer, my dear
And listen again
To your seventeenth year
In the sun and the rain
Beside the River Seine O
Away, away
The river goes rolling
O may, O may
Our love remain true
Lie closer again
I danced with you here
In the sun and the rain
The very next year
Beside the River Seine O
They like you tonight.
They are cruel.
They only pretend to applaud my song.
What they really want is another glimpse of my broken heart.
What is wrong with me, Henri?
Other women find love and happiness.
I find only disenchantment.
- But you find it so often.
- I know it's all my fault, Henri.
I see them as I want them to be, not as they really are.
The mist of my dreams surrounds them.
They walk in beauty to the music of a shepherd's pipe.
And then the morning wind blows, and the mist is swept away.
Poor Philippe. I can see him standing there in the cold light of dawn, shivering.
Philippe? Oh, Philippe.
What has he to do with it?
That has been over for ages.
Forgive my confusion.
You were telling me only last week...
Last week, last year, so what's the difference?
Though now that you remind me, he was in many ways superior to Etienne.
So many ways.
Now, who is Etienne?
Have you ever had contact with the legal mind, Henri?
It's beyond belief.
I wasn't the vision of his dreams.
I was "the party of the first part."
He didn't declare his love.
He merely acknowledged:
"Whereas a state of affection exists."
Why couldn't you be tall and handsome?
Two more of these, and I shall be.
You are the only man who has never bored me.
I am the only man who has never loved you.
Henri, over there.
There is the most beautiful creature.
Look at those shoulders.
For your sake,
I pray that they are not padded.
Bravo!
- Good night, Monsieur Lautrec.
- Good night, Sarah.
Can I drop you, Monsieur Lautrec?
There's one drink left, Zidler. I will finish it.
No offence, little man.
With hunchbacks and midgets,
I always rub the back for luck.
Yours is a great heritage.
Your great, great, great, great,
great-grandfather...
Your great, great, great, great,
great-grandfather...
Raymond, the fourth Comte de Toulouse,
led the Christian knights to Jerusalem...
and rescued the sacred tomb
from the wicked Turks.
We were dukes of Aquitaine... counts of Louergue, Gercy, Albi... marquises of Narbonne, Gothea, viscounts of Lautrec.
But, above all, we are and always will be counts of Toulouse.
Today I am the head of the house.
Some day it will be your turn.
Then your first son's turn.
And his son's and his son's son's.
As long as there is France.
Mademoiselle Denise de Frontenac... may I present
Monsieur Henri de Toulouse-Lautrec.
One, two, three.
Papa!
Little one...
My legs.
The bones are not knitting as they should.
We need the advice of a specialist.
An operation may be necessary.
Unfortunately, madame, the operation has not been a success.
It will be necessary to re-break the legs.
Then perhaps a better union can be effected.
Madame, you must both know the truth.
All that can be done, has been done.
- The legs will never grow again.
- It's not true.
- You are first cousins, are you not?
- We are.
I am afraid that is the root of the problem.
You don't remember me?
I'm Denise de Frontenac.
The time has come to be honest, Adele.
We should never have married.
Henri's poor misshapen body is the proof of our mistake.
We dare not have another child.
That is why I must leave this house.
But I don't love you, Henri.
It never occurred to me...
I'll spend my life trying to make you happy.
I swear you won't regret marrying me.
Please, you're hurting me! I wouldn't dream of marrying you. Why, the idea's absurd!
Why is it absurd? Because I'm a cripple?
Is that it? Because I'm a cripple?
Yes, you ugly little monster!
No girl will ever marry you, ever!
Do you hear?
It is so easy to deceive oneself, Maman.
By degrees you minimize your ugliness, your lameness... and you begin to think of yourself... as a presentable young man with a slight limp.
Until you are brought face to face with the grotesque, stunted thing you really are.
Someday a woman will have eyes to see you tall and straight.
And she will love you.
No woman will ever love me.
I have it on the best authority.
Maman, I'm leaving here.
I am going to Paris.
I shall become a painter.
I shall try to make a life for myself.
You will be lonely there, Riri.
I'll be lonely anywhere, Maman.
Monsieur, please say I'm with you?
- Let her go. You're hurting her.
- Don't interfere!
- Leave her alone or I'll tell the police.
- Police? That's a good one. I am the police.
Why aren't you in uniform?
I am Sgt. Balthazar Patou.
Here are my credentials.
It's all right, I believe you. But this young woman has been with me all evening.
All evening?
Don't take me for a fool, monsieur.
I know this girl, who she is, where she comes from. Everything.
She's as bad as they come.
A real rotten apple.
I am not a moralist, Sergeant.
I do not blame people for what they are.
Only for seeming to be what they are not.
- You're Monsieur Toulouse-Lautrec?
- That's right.
I'm only doing my duty, you understand?
It's all right, and I understand your mistake in the dark.
As a matter of fact, we just saw a woman going that way.
- Didn't we, my dear?
- Yes, she went down that way.
Very well, monsieur.
If you choose to give her your protection, there is nothing I can do.
But you shouldn't amuse yourself at the law's expense.
You really shouldn't.
Good night, Sergeant.
Come along, my dear. It's getting late.
Can't you walk a little faster?
What's the matter with your legs?
You don't have to stay with me.
He'll leave you alone now.
Once I knew a man who got his arm caught in a machine.
He was lucky, that one.
He got 500 francs from the insurance company.
- Please hurry.
- Go on, why don't you? You're safe.
I'd like to spit in that policeman's face.
He let you go, didn't he?
Because of you.
They're hard to fool, the police.
You're a sharp one.
Look, here is a hotel. They are open all night and you can get a room.
- Have you got any money?
- I don't want to go to a hotel.
They won't even let you in unless they know you.
And if they do, they charge you twice the price.
And in the morning, they tell the police just to get the 10 franc reward.
- You live around here?
- Yes, a little farther up the street.
Let me stay there. I won't make any trouble.
When you wake up in the morning,
I'll be gone.
Please, you can trust me.
I won't steal anything.
You're an artist.
Once I knew one.
He painted Cupids on soup plates.
Got a cigarette?
Looks like real gold.
Once a man gave me a pair of gold earrings. But I lost them.
Match?
Were you born that way, or what?
Go away! I don't want you here.
I didn't ask you to come.
Why do you get so mad?
When I was a child, I broke my legs.
The bones wouldn't knit.
The stove's going!
Do you keep it going all the time?
For an artist, you don't talk very much.
The one who painted soup plates, he never stopped talking.
You can undress in there.
Take this lamp.
A bathtub! You have a bathtub.
Let me have a bath, please. Please let me.
I'll clean up after myself, I promise.
If you like.
It'll be the first time I ever had a bath.
In a real bathtub, I mean.
- Are you still there?
- Yes, I'm here.
You will sleep here.
"I am Sgt. Balthazar Patou.
"If you don't believe me,
I'll show you my credentials."
I believe you.
"Give her a good, stiff sentence,
Your Honor. She's a habitual offender.
"A menace to the morals of my district.
Also, she called me the name of a dog."
There, I made you laugh. I knew I could.
I'll make you like me, too.
You have beautiful eyes without those spectacles.
It's the first time I was ever told that by a policeman.
What was it that policeman called you?
Monsieur Toulouse something?
Yes.
What kind of a name is that?
My own.
It isn't a name. It's a town.
People don't go about calling themselves
Paris or Marseilles, do they?
But, come to think of it,
I knew a man once they called Five Points... after that corner in the Temple district where all the streets come together.
He was born while his mother was crossing the road.
She was delivering washing.
He said she put him in a wash basket and carried him home.
Are you from Toulouse?
Is it the same with you as with Five Points?
More or less.
You didn't waste any time getting into bed, did you?
What's the matter? Afraid I'd see your legs?
Get out! Put your clothes back on and get out of here.
Stop shouting. Do you want to wake everybody in the house?
Look, I don't care about your legs.
It makes no difference to me that you are a cripple.
- Do you want the light on?
- Put it out.
You don't really want me to go, do you?
Do you?
Did you used to sing in the mornings, before me, I mean?
Does a man ever sing in the morning, when he is alone?
Oh, rats.
What's the matter?
I always mean to sketch you with your hands in your hair.
But the sight is so enchanting
I forget to do anything about it.
You're nice, Toulouse.
I never thought
I'd be wearing real silk stockings.
Bbert always says they do things to him.
Even on a plaster leg in a window.
Who is Bbert?
A fellow I know.
But I don't like him anymore.
I finished a long time ago with him.
He'd give anything to have me back.
But when I'm through, I'm through.
If I saw him now, I'd spit on him.
Pretty.
Very pretty.
Real silk, and three pairs.
Did you ever go to the Rue Mouffetard?
Where is it?
It's where I was born, in the liquor district.
There is a thick slime all over the cobblestones, from the wine.
It's so slippery even the cats can't keep their feet.
And talk about a stink.
I was 12 before I found out the whole world didn't stink like that.
When I did, I left.
I was glad to get out of that, I can tell you.
I've only been back once, to see my mother.
She still lives there?
She likes it. One thing you can say for the Rue Mouffetard:
You may go hungry, but never thirsty.
My mother has a pushcart.
She was smart.
When she was my age, she put a little away each week... and got herself a license.
You know, saved up for it.
When you've got a pushcart license, you'll never starve.
Once you get it, you never have to buy another one.
It's good for life.
- You need a new dress.
- They cost money.
- We'll go and pick one out for you.
- You mean you'd buy me one?
We'll go down the Rue St. Honore.
We'll find you the prettiest dress in Paris.
I know just the dress. I've even had it on.
You won't have to come with me.
Just give me the money.
But I want to come with you.
It's on the other side of town where things are not so expensive.
It'll save you money.
As you wish.
100 francs!
You're so good to me, Toulouse... and I'll be good to you.
Nicer than ever, you'll see.
There'll be no complaints out of you.
I'll smother them like this.
It's getting late.
When will you be back?
One hour, as soon as I get the dress.
Come in.
It's you, Madame Loubet.
- Are you all right, monsieur?
- Yes, of course.
I didn't see you about last night or this morning.
I was afraid you were ill or something.
This room is as cold as ice and your stove's gone out.
- I'll make some soup and bring it up.
- Please don't bother. I'm going out.
- It's no bother. It's on the stove already...
- I'm going out, I said.
I'm sorry, Madame Loubet.
You are very kind.
If I starve...
I'll never take another canvas to that dealer.
He sucks blood, that one.
I've always got 7 francs for an Ascension.
This morning he offered me 5 francs.
He says religious sentiment is waning.
Everybody knows it's a lie.
Go to any church on Sunday, even a Protestant one.
Packed to the doors.
Henri, sit with us.
Hello, Seurat, Gauzi, Anquetin.
Waiter, a cognac.
A round of cognacs, if you're paying.
Is that why you called me? Bring the bottle.
How is the work going, Henri?
The smell of paint sickens me, and painters.
- We missed you at the meeting last night.
- Meeting? What meeting?
The Society of Independents.
I had better things to do. Independents!
Pariahs, rather. Outcasts.
It is not ideals which bind us together, but failure.
Call me any name.
Insult the memory of my mother.
But do not dare speak so of the Society of Independents in my presence.
What a dismal bore you are, Anquetin.
Drink your drink. Then we'll go to the Louvre and refresh our souls.
The Louvre, that graveyard.
Graveyard! The home of the Mona Lisa, and he calls it a graveyard.
The Mona Lisa.
Truly the greatest painting in the world.
At this moment, I could kneel down and give thanks to Leonardo.
How do you know it is the greatest painting?
How do you know it was painted by Leonardo?
How do I know it? Because I feel it.
I feel it here in my heart.
I feel in my heart that you're a pompous ass, but that doesn't make it so.
Only Leonardo could have painted that smile.
- She smiles with her eyes.
- I don't care if she smiles with her navel.
That still doesn't say da Vinci painted it.
The technique, the brush strokes.
Each bears his signature.
There is only one way you know the Mona Lisa is by Leonardo.
By the little brass plate with his name on it.
That is what you bow down to, a name printed on brass.
Good day, gentlemen. I'm leaving.
If I hadn't needed this drink...
I'd have thrown it at him.
I wonder what has made him so unhappy.
I've been looking for you.
Guess what happened.
I know. Camondo did not come.
You did not sell a painting.
Who cares about him? This is important.
Figaro's art critic wants to write about you.
Is this another delusion?
I saw him outside the Caf Noir where he breakfasts.
I was waiting for him. I introduced myself, told him about your work.
I was eloquent. He wants to write about you if your paintings justify my words.
I invited him to the gallery.
He said he would come.
- When?
- When he has time.
Idiot!
How do you like my new dress?
I got it from a friend. Only 50 francs.
That's cheap for real velvet.
My friend wanted more.
She wanted 75 francs, but I beat her down.
I love the feel of velvet.
Feel it, Toulouse.
Where have you been?
- Is that your idea of a welcome?
- Answer me.
Hey, watch yourself, Toulouse.
You didn't buy me with that 100 francs.
I don't have to account to you for anything.
If you want to know where I've been, you'll have to ask me nice.
I don't have to. I know already.
You followed me?
I can imagine your night out.
I can see every move you made... from the first sour-smelling kiss in a dark doorway...
Well, it doesn't matter.
You'd better go, Marie. Quickly.
Go? I just got here. Go where?
I don't care. Wherever you were last night.
All right.
Whatever you say.
So long, Toulouse.
I'll tell you where I was, though.
First I hunted for my friend to buy the dress.
Then I went to see my sister. She was sick.
Very sick. She was in bed with a fever.
I had to call a doctor.
He said someone had to stay with her.
What could I do? My own sister.
Am I supposed to believe all that?
I don't tell lies, Toulouse, except sometimes to the police.
I was a fool ever to let you stay in this place.
You said I made you happy.
I wish I'd never laid eyes on you!
You are.
You're in love with me.
The real thing.
Aren't you?
That's why you're acting like this.
You're in love with me and you're jealous.
Imagine being jealous over me.
Nobody ever was before. I like it.
But you've no cause to be jealous.
Honest, you haven't, now or ever.
I'm so crazy about you,
I wouldn't look at anybody else.
How many times have you said that before?
I'm all yours, as long as you want me.
And if you ever stop wanting me,
I don't know what I'll do.
I'll never stop wanting you.
Hold me, then. Hold me tight.
Hug me. I love it.
What day is today?
Friday.
My sister will be worried to death.
She'll think I've been murdered, or in jail again, or something.
Hold still, my dear.
- What are you doing?
- Painting you.
- How long will it take?
- Not long.
I've got to see my sister.
- You've seen her almost every day.
- But I've got to see her today.
Please sit still. And if you like the portrait,
I'll give it to you.
How much is a painting worth?
It all depends who painted it.
One of yours, I mean.
It's too soon to tell.
How do you mean, too soon?
Some 300 years ago, a man named da Vinci painted a portrait of a woman.
Her husband did not like it and would not pay for it. Today, it hangs in the Louvre... and no one man in the world has enough money to buy it.
What good does that do old what's-his-name the painter?
He had his reward. He painted it.
Doesn't make any sense to me.
How much do you pay your models?
The usual rate is 3 francs for the morning, and 5 francs for the whole day.
Then you should pay me.
I didn't ask you to do my portrait.
So you must pay me the same as a model.
- I said I'd give it to you. Isn't that enough?
- How do I know it'll ever be worth anything?
If I've got to work, you've got to pay me.
3 francs.
A model poses four hours for that.
You haven't posed five minutes.
If you won't pay me, then I won't pose for you.
It doesn't look like me.
I'm prettier than that!
I knew you didn't know how to paint.
The one who painted soup plates, he was...
Get out! Leave me alone!
Go back to him. I don't care.
What about my 3 francs? Now you don't want me to pose so you need not pay me.
- You owe me the money!
- Here, take it!
You bet I'll take it.
And I'll get out, too, like you told me!
I'm sick of this place, sick of you!
Forgive me, Toulouse. I'm awful.
I don't know why you put up with me.
All the other men I've known would beat me up and kick me out.
Is that what I should do?
I could, you know. I'm very strong.
My arms make up for my legs.
I wouldn't hurt you.
I want to be good to you.
Please let me, Marie.
Let me have the joy of giving you things freely.
Don't put a tariff on everything you do.
I'll try, Toulouse.
I don't know what gets into me.
I don't know why I say the things I do.
If I were sick of you,
I'd have kept on going down those stairs.
I'm just as crazy about you as ever I was.
I know you don't mean half the things you say.
The streets of Paris have taught you to strike quickly and draw blood first.
Maybe that's it. Maybe it's being cooped up in this room that's getting on my nerves.
I've never been so long in one place.
Sometimes I feel like I was back in jail.
We'll go out.
We'll make tonight an occasion.
We'll dress up and go to the Pre Catalan in the Bois.
You'll love it, Marie.
You'll have a wonderful time.
I don't like those fancy places where the waiters look down their noses at you.
How do you know? You've never been.
All right.
- Monsieur Lautrec, this is a pleasure.
- Good evening, Felix. It's been a long time.
Too long. Your father, the Comte... did us the honor of dining with us last week.
- Do you have a table for us?
- But of course.
Thank you, Felix.
Good evening, monsieur.
You have a good champagne nature?
- It is perfection.
- Good. A champagne nature to start.
Then for food,
I think a Coquille St. Jacques first.
Then Pheasant Under Glass.
And the sauce...
I know, monsieur. With the armagnac.
And to drink, Pommard '89.
Very good, monsieur.
- Have you ever had champagne nature?
- Sure, plenty of times.
What did he mean, "Your father, the Comte"? Is it a joke or something?
My father still lives in a world where people use titles.
The wine.
To you, my dear.
That man over there is staring at me.
And who shall blame him?
Every man in the room would be looking at you, were he not afraid of his companion.
- More wine?
- Slop.
Would you like something else?
Why doesn't that orchestra play something with some life in it?
They'll play anything you ask for.
Why don't they bring our food?
The service isn't very good.
It takes time to prepare.
Anyway, they ought to have things ready.
They charge enough, I bet.
- How much do they charge for that wine?
- You must learn not to think of the cost.
Isn't it a lovely room? That table is reserved for the President of the Republic.
- I'm sick.
- What's the matter?
I don't feel well, that's all.
It's too close in here. There isn't any air.
- What's the matter?
- Nothing. Why?
Are you really ill?
Can't you walk any faster than that?
- How did you break them anyway?
- I told you, I slipped on the floor.
There must have been something wrong with you.
Kids fall all the time and they don't break their legs.
- Did you have to use crutches?
- Yes, for a while.
- What did your mother do when...
- That's enough!
There you go again, losing your temper.
You're a hard one to get along with.
- I was only talking about your legs.
- Shut up!
Go ahead, hit me.
Make out you're a real man. I dare you.
Go off, before I do.
Look at him, full of fight.
Throw it at me, why don't you?
Or buy yourself a new pair of legs.
Go back to the Rue Mouffetard where you belong!
That's right, Toulouse.
My father wasn't a count.
I'm scum. Real scum.
That's why you hang on to me.
You know if you can't hold someone like me, you'll never hold any woman!
Before morning, you'll come crawling after me... begging me to come back, if you know where to look!
Hey, cabby!
So long, Toulouse.
You won't be singing tomorrow morning.
Rue du Poirier, and I'm in a hurry.
Let me in, Toulouse.
I know you're there.
I saw the light from below.
I didn't mean all those things I said.
Please, let me in.
I'll be good. I'll be good to you.
I'll do anything you want.
I'm so crazy about you.
Would you like me to pose for you?
I won't charge you anything.
I'll pose in the altogether, if you want.
Only don't send me away.
I can't stand it if you do.
I'll kill myself in the Seine.
Honest, I will.
Let me in. I'll never quarrel with you again... or say mean things.
All I want is to be good to you.
Make you happy, happier than you've ever been.
You'll never get another girl like me.
Please, Toulouse, don't be mean to me.
I won't come back again, Toulouse.
This is your last chance.
I'll count to three, that's all, and then I'm gone.
One... two... three!
Madame la Comtesse,
I'm so glad you are here.
Where is my son?
Upstairs, as I wrote you.
In 11 days, he has not left that room.
I send him food, but it comes back untouched.
He always drinks. He will kill himself.
But why? What is the matter with him, do you know?
There was a girl, madame.
Go away.
Maman, I'm so sorry. Why did you not write?
I would have met your train.
How are you, Riri?
Never better, Maman.
I've been working very hard.
Will you just give me five minutes to comb my hair and put on a tie?
What kind of girl is she, Riri?
Your bearded son is just as transparent as when he was a little boy of 9.
Tell me.
The kind you will never know, Maman.
When she was a child... she had to choose between the streets and the river.
But you love her?
It is all I can do to keep from going after her and begging her to come back.
What happened between you?
Her past was too strong for her.
The world she lives in is a jungle, where people prowl like wild animals.
They go without eating when the game is scarce.
And when there is a kill, they claw and bite each other over it.
It is a world of cruelty and cunning.
But it is free.
I put chains on her.
They only made her vicious.
One night she broke them, and escaped into her alleyways.
How could you expect such a woman to care for anyone?
In the jungle they feel neither pity nor revulsion.
The sight of me did not offend her as a woman.
She did not see me tall and straight as you once prophesied.
Her eyes were wide open.
She loved me for what I am.
If only I knew more of the world.
It is your father you need now.
To what purpose?
To tell me that a Comte de Toulouse... does not permit himself to fall in love with such a girl?
To say that a cripple has no right to...
Forgive me, Maman.
It was the cognac speaking.
How are things at Albi?
As always, Riri.
Your room kept ready for you.
Perhaps next summer
I can spend a few weeks.
Come home now, Riri. Give up this life.
It is the only one I have, Maman.
It is not all dissipation, as you might think.
There is some virtue in it, too.
These canvases are your son.
Not a miserable cripple with shrunken legs.
Can you not paint at home, Riri?
The countryside is so beautiful.
I have a friend, Maman. He is a painter, too.
His name is Vincent van Gogh.
He paints wheat fields hot with the sun of Provence.
A man can stare at one of his canvases and go blind with the light.
I cannot paint his fields... but he cannot paint my girls of the Moulin Rouge.
I am a painter of the streets and of the gutter.
It is no accident that I met Marie Charlet.
Show me your latest painting, Riri.
This.
The paint is dry.
Sometimes one's inspiration falters.
- Forgive me, Maman.
- Go and find her, Riri.
You cannot kill the pain of losing her with cognac... the way you can the pain in your legs.
You can only kill yourself.
I offend my own conscience by saying this... but I care more for your survival.
Bring her back.
Stop here.
I'm sorry, mademoiselle.
I mistook you for somebody else.
She can't be much if she'd take up with you.
Monsieur?
Cognac.
- Rum only.
- Rum, then.
I used to have a bottle of cognac.
But my wife, she likes it.
She drank it up herself.
I'm looking for a girl.
You may know her.
Her name is Marie Charlet.
Her sister lives in this neighborhood.
She has no sister.
You know Marie Charlet?
Rue de la Planchette, the Bon Vivant.
She hangs out there. You have only to wait.
Want to dance? Buy me wine.
I've come to take you home.
Hello, Toulouse.
Come on, Marie.
- Marie, I said that l...
- I heard you. You've come after me.
What do you want me to do? Kiss your feet?
Hey, Giselle, send your man over here.
Look who's here.
My rich cripple from Montmartre.
He's come after me.
He'll give me anything I want, won't you?
50 francs a day.
100 francs. It makes no difference to him.
He's got millions.
Haven't you, Toulouse?
His father is a count.
Now, Bbert, what have you got to say?
Don't listen to her, monsieur. She's drunk.
For sure, Bbert. My Bbert!
Why did you think I stayed with you one night even?
For love of your ugly face?
A runt, that's what you are.
A runt and a cripple!
It made me sick when you touched me.
I'd never have come back except for Bbert.
To keep him in silk shirts and pomade.
Monsieur, I beg of you.
She doesn't know what she's saying.
Believe me, she holds only the tenderest feelings for you.
Get out of my way!
I told you he'd come back, Bbert.
I told you he couldn't live without me... but you wouldn't listen.
But you wouldn't listen.
You threw me over for a mangy redhead... with a few measly francs in her stocking.
You sold out cheap, Bbert.
Too cheap.
Monsieur Lautrec!
- A cognac if you please, Sarah.
- Where have you been? It has been weeks.
- Have you been ill?
- A malady of the mind only.
- Where is Zidler?
- In his office.
Now that you are back, he will have no cause to complain of bad business.
I am no longer an asset, Sarah. Zidler has to supply me with free drinks for a month.
I am furious with you.
Why did you allow me to make such a ridiculous fool of myself?
That mountebank of a guardsman.
Have you ever had contact with the military mind? It's fantastic.
There is nothing one does except according to the military manual.
But absolutely nothing.
- I was afraid those shoulders were padded.
- What has padding to do with it?
Monsieur Lautrec, where have you been?
How we have missed you!
- I have something for you.
- What's that?
You commissioned me to do a poster.
Well?
It's good, very good.
I like it immensely, but...
- But what?
- It's so very different.
I hope so.
If you are going to do a poster, it should be of me.
I am the attraction here.
It's my singing that draws the crowd.
Forgive me, but it's much harder to draw a song than a dance.
- I also dance.
- To be sure, and most exquisitely.
True, monsieur, it is striking. Most striking.
But doesn't it make the Moulin Rouge seem a little small?
After all, it holds some 2,000 persons... and you only show, one, two, three, four.
- I have not got an Adam's apple like that.
- True, Valentin, true.
It is an exaggeration. But you must allow an artist to take certain liberties.
But not with my Adam's apple.
The point is, Zidler, this makes
La Goulue seem to be the star here...
- which is false and misleading.
- I leave it to anybody.
Have I got an Adam's apple like that?
Is that supposed to be me?
It couldn't be. Her linen is clean.
- Which could never be said of your neck.
- Ladies, ladies!
- Carrion!
- Gutter filth!
- You will drink your own bathwater.
- You drink other peoples'.
- You can't print that.
- Why not?
Because there are no such colors in lithography.
What kind of green is that?
It looks like green, but it isn't.
It's blue, pink, yellow, gray.
Anything but green.
I mixed the paints. I shall blend the inks.
Imbecile. What are you doing?
- Stippling the stone.
- No, it's impossible.
Nobody has ever done crachis with a toothbrush.
It seems to work.
Perfect.
Not enough acid, and the solution won't bite.
Too much, and the fine lines will break.
Good evening, Monsieur Toulouse-Lautrec.
Good evening, Sergeant.
I was wondering could I ask a great favor of you?
- Name it.
- I have a daughter. She is to be married.
Her fianc is a good man. At present, he is a guard at Roquette Prison... but he has already been promoted to the guillotine section.
A post of trust.
Mark my words, some day he'll be a captain.
Perhaps an inspector.
You will congratulate your daughter for me,
I hope.
Thank you, monsieur. But I shall miss her.
If I had a portrait of her,
I could keep it on my mantelpiece.
Of course, I am a poor man, but I could pay something.
Bring your daughter to my studio.
The portrait can be my wedding present.
Monsieur, I would be so grateful.
- Would you do me a favor in return?
- As you said, name it.
Here's 1,500 francs.
I want you to take out a license for a pushcart... in the name of Marie Charlet.
See that it is given to her.
It's an outrage.
It's disgusting!
Magnifique.
You should be horsewhipped for smearing our name over every kiosk in Paris.
That revolting poster is a disgrace.
I'm sorry you do not like my work, Father.
But I shall continue to sign it as I please, for it is my name and it is my work.
Work? A pretext to hang about cheap dancehalls and drink all night.
You call that pornographic trash work?
Yes, I call it work.
On this, I am more of an authority than you, Father.
You've never worked. Our kind never did.
We are the grands seigneurs.
We are above work.
We cloak ourselves in the glory of our name as if it were an achievement just to be born.
The truth is our world died with Versailles and Marie Antoinette.
We are the fossils of a bygone age... and I have dared to break the pattern.
I work. And, as you say, I drink.
A little more each day.
Thus I forget my loneliness and my ugliness... and the pain in my legs.
We each have our own escape, you see.
Mother, her prayers.
You, your horses and your falcons and your dreams of an age that is no more.
And I... my cognac.
So let us put an end to this scene, Father, for it serves no purpose.
We won't meet again, Henri.
Live as you please.
But don't call on me for help as I shall not give it to you.
You did not give it in the past.
I shall not expect it in the future.
- Big crowd tonight.
- Too big, thanks to your poster.
I know I'm making millions, but I liked the Moulin Rouge as she was:
Lightheaded and hot-blooded.
A little strumpet who thought only of tonight.
Now she's grown up and knows better.
She has money in her stocking... wears corsets, and never drinks a drop too much.
Worst of all, she never sees her old friends anymore.
She has gone into society.
Last night, she entertained a cabinet minister, his wife, and daughter.
It's disgusting.
You are to paint my portrait. Life-size.
- He insists.
- Who is he?
I haven't heard around whom your life revolves this week.
Don't be cynical. It's not for this week.
It's for eternity.
- He is the most divine...
- Of this, I am sure. Has he a name?
Paul Biradiaut.
If you must chose for eternity, one can hardly do better than the Bank of France.
Don't be coarse. You know that money means nothing to me. But nothing!
- You see what's approaching?
- Is that...
Can that be...
Before, she was difficult.
Now she's impossible.
There you are, Zidler.
- Don't "Zidler" me, you...
- You will rise, please, on my approach.
I insist upon politeness.
I am the premiere danseuse here... and entitled to courtesy.
Good evening, Monsieur Lautrec.
Waiter, a glass for La Goulue.
- I only drink champagne.
- But naturally.
Mot et Chandon, and be sure it's '78 vintage.
I think I shall sell out.
Driver, stop a moment.
The morning wind is cold, but not so cold as the waters of the Seine.
You are mistaken, monsieur.
I am not a candidate for the river.
We are all candidates when driven by the mania of love.
Must it be love that brought me to the Pont d'Alexandre?
What else?
The latest creations are not worn by those in dire poverty.
Believe me, monsieur...
I didn't come here to throw myself in the river.
Only this.
So now we can both go home.
- My carriage is at your disposal.
- Good morning, monsieur.
I do not see the signature.
I buy nothing that is not signed.
The signature is on the back,
Monsieur Camondo.
But if you would like one on the front of the painting...
I'm sure Monsieur Lautrec would be glad to...
Where is he?
Supposed to be here, is he not?
Yes, Monsieur Camondo, of course.
I expect him at any moment.
I buy nothing that is not signed.
Do you suppose he really looks like that?
From what I've heard, it's very flattering.
Here he is, in the flesh.
Madame. Monsieur.
- You've been drinking again.
- One must be fortified for such an occasion.
Monsieur la Fontaine,
I am honored by your presence.
- Camondo's here.
- Is it raining?
Are you Monsieur Joyant?
- Yes, madame.
- You should be arrested.
To hang such a thing on your wall!
Look at this woman. She is undressing.
With a man looking on.
Disgusting!
Forgive me, madame.
The lady is not undressing. She is dressing.
The gentleman happens to be her husband.
They are celebrating their 27th wedding anniversary.
They are going to have dinner with their oldest son. He is a taxidermist.
I am appalled that you should thus malign these good people.
It goes to prove what I have always maintained... that evil exists only in the eye of the beholder.
I will thank you to stop looking at my pictures.
You're right. I am tipsy.
Perhaps if I can wash my face...
How much is it?
- 4,000 francs, monsieur.
- 4,000 francs?
Look here, Lautrec is still a very young man.
So was Raphael, monsieur.
I'll take it.
Excuse me, monsieur,
I am negotiating for this painting.
Deliver it to my hotel.
Yes, Your Majesty.
I must have slipped off.
- I'll go right in.
- It's all over, Henri.
The last of the guests have gone.
Well, in that case...
Including the King of Serbia.
I'm sorry, Maurice... but don't take it too hard.
After all, his forefathers were tending sheep in the wilds of Bosnia...
- when mine were kings of Navarre.
- You can't go on this way.
- Quite.
- Work or dissipate. You can't do both.
Don't lecture me, Maurice.
If I could be different, I would.
I know I drink too much, but I can't stop myself.
- I wish I could.
- You must stop.
At the rate you're going, you'll never reach 40.
Neither did Raphael, nor Watteau, nor Correggio.
I shall be in good company.
Anyway, it's all for the best.
Think how my paintings will soar in value.
You stand to benefit hugely.
That isn't funny, Henri.
No, it isn't.
Forgive me, Maurice.
Now let us get out of here. I need a drink.
It's so sweet of you to come.
But then you know how important this dress is to me.
This is going to be the greatest opening
I ever had... and I just have to look like a dream.
Mademoiselle Avril. How ravishing you look.
Isn't he sweet? Monsieur Paquin,
Monsieur Toulouse-Lautrec.
I am honored, monsieur.
Won't you sit down, mademoiselle?
We are all ready for you.
I will call your mannequin.
You've traveled a long road. A few years ago, you were singing for your supper... and here you are, a full-fledged star at 29.
- Twenty-five.
- Of course. I beg your pardon. 25.
I have been 25 for four years, and I shall stay there another four.
Then I'll be 27 for a while.
- I intend to grow old gracefully.
- Voila, mademoiselle.
Myriame, darling!
Ravishing! But then, what isn't on you?
It isn't fair to your customers to have her model your things.
Forgive me. Mademoiselle Hayem,
Monsieur Toulouse-Lautrec.
- Well, Henri, what do you think?
- How do you do, mademoiselle?
We've already met, haven't we,
Monsieur Lautrec?
Of course, Henri knows everybody.
Well, Henri, what do you think? Will it do?
If it looks as well on you, it will do admirably.
Don't talk nonsense. Of course it will.
Au revoir, darling.
Don't forget, you're coming to my opening, Thursday.
Henri will bring you, won't you, darling?
I'll tell him where to pick you up.
- I shall be delighted, mademoiselle.
- I shall be waiting.
Au revoir, Paquin. Au revoir, darling.
Come now, Henri.
She's lovely to look at, but I'm not sure I approve of Myriame... if what I hear is true.
They say that she buys her own clothes, pays her own rent.
What I mean is, there's no telling where something like that can end.
Men will start getting the most ridiculous ideas.
I know it for a fact... that Marcel de la Voisier wanted to give her one of his thoroughbreds.
I ask you, what is the world coming to when a girl won't even accept a horse?
I had one fine son
Born to be a sailor
Singing
Wine can leave you pale
But a man can leave you paler
Wine can leave you pale
But a man can leave you paler
He has his father's eye
Never was a bluer
Never walks a maid
But he is her wooer
Singing
Wine can make you true
But a man can make you truer
Wine can make you true
But a man can make you truer
Victor, you do the ordering.
No problem. Caviar, bowls and bowls.
And keep the champagne flowing.
It's enough, isn't it?
I adore generals.
They come right to the point.
I'm surprised at you, Jane.
I thought that you had given up the military years ago.
Oh, this is different.
I might even marry Victor.
Perish the thought.
Marriage is like a dull meal with dessert at the beginning.
I have it on the very highest authority.
Pay no attention to him.
He's a cynic. He doesn't believe in love.
Love is a purifying influence... that ennobles the heart of man.
On the contrary, General...
Iove is a state of confusion in which the victim cannot distinguish... between spiritual aspiration, carnal desire, and pride of ownership.
The wise man satisfies the different thirsts at different fountains.
And the wise woman?
The wise woman patterns her life on the theory and practice of modern banking.
She never gives her love, but only lends it on the best security... and at the highest rate of interest.
- Don't you agree?
- Tomorrow I'll think of an answer to that.
In the meantime,
I prefer to change the subject.
Come on, Victor, I want to dance.
- Will you dance, mademoiselle?
- No, thank you, not this evening.
I hope that wasn't because of me?
I shan't be lonely.
I enjoyed your exhibition very much,
Monsieur Lautrec.
I have been back three times.
- You are interested in paintings?
- When they have wit and elegance... and truth.
I am flattered on my account and sorrowful on yours.
What do you mean?
One should never meet a person whose work one admires.
What they do is always so much better than what they are.
Is this true of you?
More than of anyone else.
Do you drink for pleasure,
Monsieur Lautrec?
Is there any other reason?
Many. My father, for instance... because he sought oblivion.
Mercifully, he found it quickly.
- Your father was very fortunate.
- Then do you, too, seek oblivion?
I meant to have so understanding a daughter.
Myriame, you are incorrigible.
The first time you're out with a man, you tell him your father died of alcoholism.
Anyway, whose father didn't?
Good night.
Thank you for a most pleasant evening.
- Won't you come in?
- Need of sleep brought you home.
Not really.
And I have something that may interest you.
Curiosity is my cardinal weakness.
It's not really an apartment.
Just one room over the courtyard.
- Where did you get that?
- Are you surprised?
- Where did you get it?
- I bought it years ago in the flea market.
What's the matter?
- Nothing.
- Who is she?
Her name is Marie Charlet.
She owns a pushcart.
My congratulations.
If you bought it in the flea market, you made a good investment.
It didn't come cheaply.
The King of Serbia bid 4,000 francs for his Lautrec.
Camondo, 6,000 francs.
But I paid all I had. 2 francs.
I was an apprentice in a dressmaking shop.
1 franc a day for 10 hours' work in a crowded, unventilated room.
My evenings were spent sewing buttons on gloves to earn a few extra centimes.
But having the painting was more important to me... than the suppers
I should have to go without.
Why?
Because her eyes told me there were worse things than cold or hunger.
Or even loneliness.
I should think loneliness would be unknown to a beautiful woman.
Not when the man you loved is dead,
Monsieur Lautrec.
Forgive me.
And the key to all the dreams you shared lies at the river's bottom?
He has been dead for five years.
That key was to another door in the Avenue du Bois.
Had the offer included marriage,
I might have opened it.
But it didn't.
And not being the wise woman of your description...
Ioneliness still seemed to me the better choice.
Will you go to the opera with me tomorrow night, mademoiselle?
While you decide, let me remind you of the ladies of the Spanish court... who kept pet apes, so that they themselves would look more beautiful.
Is your wit always turned against yourself,
Monsieur Lautrec?
This is to assure you that, in my case, there will be no advances to repulse.
I will ask for no more than an occasional handful of peanuts.
Until tomorrow, then.
Good night, mademoiselle.
Henri, how nice to find you here.
Good evening, Myriame.
I was passing by and could not resist these.
- Now that I am here, may I take you home?
- Yes.
Excuse me.
Good afternoon, Myriame.
Good afternoon, Marcel.
Monsieur de Toulouse-Lautrec.
Monsieur de la Voisier.
I am honored, Monsieur Lautrec.
You are the lucky owner of Magnific?
Congratulations. He's a fine individual.
- It's all in the breeding.
- Not necessarily.
- I beg your pardon?
- An idle comment.
Perhaps one day you'll honor me by sketching Magnific.
Horses are my next-to-favorite subject.
I am overwhelmed, Monsieur Lautrec.
I shall treasure this.
Au revoir, Myriame. I have missed you.
Thank you again, monsieur.
Now that I have seen him...
I admire even more your courage in throwing away that key.
He is as handsome a man as his horse is a horse.
Conformation isn't everything, Henri.
All we know is that a Greek peasant found her in a cave... and sold her to the French government for 6,000 francs.
She is so beautiful, we forget how old she is.
She is older than Paris itself.
She was before Christ, before Caesar.
Until the end of time... men will try to penetrate the mystery of her perfection.
But it will always elude them.
It is not true that great art is simple.
Why should it be?
Life itself is not simple, nor is the human mind.
Nor, for that matter, is the human heart.
Won't you come in?
Not tonight, Myriame.
I have another engagement.
Where does one go at this hour?
Where does one go at this hour?
Some of the fountains at which I drink flow ceaselessly.
Please.
Good night, Henri.
On the Bateaux Mouche the only polite direction in which to look is up... at the moon.
- You're shivering.
- It is cold and I need a drink.
The first words you ever said to me:
"The morning wind is cold, but not so cold as the waters of the Seine."
- Was that only one month ago, Henri?
- Four weeks and five days.
I am cursed with such a memory.
It is exactly 11 weeks and 4 days since I last saw my tailor.
Two weeks and three days before
I deliver Madame Natanson's portrait.
My mind is a storehouse of such trivia.
Really important things, I forget instantly.
The bar is one deck below.
Henri, tell me about Marie Charlet.
- What do you want to know?
- Were you in love with her?
Let us say that she opened doors for me that might better have remained closed.
- It's a long time ago.
- And have you never loved since?
My dear Myriame, any man can play the fool once, no more.
Unless he enjoys the role.
That's how it went.
And then I toured Spain.
I can still hear the applause.
Nobody held a candle to me.
I was the one. Only.
I danced rings around all the others!
The musicians got tired... before I did.
I could dance faster than they could play.
Look at that.
There was no one who could kick like me.
Once you'd have paid 5 francs to see that.
You never saw 5 francs.
You're a liar! I got 50 francs a night.
Every night.
I fed my cat better than you eat.
I was a star.
People came from all over Paris to see me.
- In a sideshow.
- You don't believe me... any of you. But it's true.
Yes, it is true.
I hope you remember me.
We've pledged many a glass in our day.
The little gentleman... with the funny legs.
- Of course.
- The little gentleman.
I was the star of the Moulin Rouge!
Wasn't I, Monsieur Lautrec?
- Yes.
- Tell them I was a star.
When you made the poster... it was La Goulue you put in the middle of it.
Who else but the great La Goulue?
Here, cab.
What do you think of that?
Now will you believe me?
To the hospital in Passy.
You made her very happy, Henri.
They say men kill the thing they love most.
My posters did their part in destroying the Moulin.
With great success, it became respectable.
There was no place for La Goulue, or any of us.
- I'm appalled at such extravagance.
- One of the joys of being independent... is to buy an occasional bottle for a dissolute friend.
And long-stemmed hothouse roses for oneself.
We'll have to hurry or we shall miss the first act.
Would you mind very much our not going out tonight?
Just as you please.
There is something
I want to talk to you about.
Well?
The roses are from Marcel.
I should have guessed.
He came here last night after you left.
Did he offer you another brighter key?
He asked me to marry him.
So withholding yourself from him turned the trick.
Congratulations on a signal victory.
- Henri!
- Forgive me, my dear.
I forgot that once accepted, it's vulgar to suggest marriage isn't arranged in heaven.
- You're even blinder than I thought.
- On the contrary...
I saw clearly the other day, that your Marcel is fighting a losing battle with himself.
- How do you know I accepted him?
- It stands to reason.
He is everything that a woman could desire.
Tall, handsome, rich.
And, thanks to your strategy, an abject slave to love.
Do horses bore you, he will sell his stable.
Do you like a moustache, he will grow one.
Will you change your mind, he will shave it off.
Stop, Henri!
Forgive me again.
I was merely rejoicing for you.
I haven't given him my answer.
Excellent! Keep him on the rack longer.
He deserves it for being so tardy.
Thank you, Henri.
You have told me what I wanted to know.
And what is that?
That you are not in love with me.
- Did I ever act as though I were?
- No.
I am moved by your concern for my feelings, but it is quite without cause.
And now that I have set your mind at rest,
I think I shall go to the play.
So please give your devoted monkey his hat.
Don't call yourself that!
Good night, Myriame.
Will you be outside Paquin's tomorrow?
You can count on me to perform faithfully... as long as it pleases you to keep Marcel in torment.
- Monsieur Lautrec?
- Yes.
- From Mademoiselle Hayem.
- Thank you.
"Dearest Henri, Marie Charlet
has worked her evil on us both.
"I have tried to win your love,
but know now it is hopeless.
"I cannot endure things as they are.
"I am marrying Marcel.
"He knows I do not love him, but is content.
"Adieu, Henri."
Driver.
Myriame, where are you?
Myriame, where are you?
- Are you there?
- What do you want, monsieur?
Mademoiselle Hayem. Where is she?
She gave up the room, monsieur.
She left no address.
Bring me more absinthe and be quick about it.
Now, Monsieur Lautrec, you've had enough.
Besides it's time I closed up.
You insolent lout.
Don't argue with me.
Bring me more absinthe, or I will break everything in this...
He'll fall and break his neck some day.
This is the last one, Monsieur Lautrec.
I close in five minutes.
Thank you, Victor. You're a good man.
You are my friend.
For a year I've told him to take his trade elsewhere.
But, no, he keeps on coming back.
Can I do anything about it?
Not unless I want Patou down my neck.
I'd throw him out in a minute if it wasn't for Patou.
He's told every bistro owner in Montmartre:
"If anything happens to him,
I'll put the screws on you."
Nobody wants trouble with the police.
Look at him.
Reading the same letter over and over.
You'd think that after a year he'd know what's in it.
But, no, he keeps on reading it.
It gets on a man's nerves.
- Victor, get me a drink.
- There's no more absinthe.
I didn't ask for absinthe.
Here, give me a glass.
Your health, Victor.
Take him out of here, Inspector.
I don't care if you close my bistro,
I don't want him in it.
He'll kill himself, and I don't want it to happen here.
It gives a place a bad name.
- Time to go home.
- Take your hands off me.
- How dare you...
- Come on. Be sensible, Monsieur Lautrec.
- It's time to go home.
- It's you, Patou.
We're old friends, Patou and I.
You didn't know that, did you, Victor?
Come on, let's get out of this rat's nest.
Let's go somewhere, just you and I, and have a drink.
- By all means, Monsieur Lautrec.
- You think you're fooling me, don't you?
You say you'll have a drink, but you really mean to take me home.
What are you doing here anyhow?
Always putting your nose in other people's business.
Why don't you stop pestering me?
I'm a citizen.
Have you a warrant for my arrest?
It's a mystery how he can go on.
He still works.
He drags himself to his easel and paints in spite of all.
He is sleeping soundly enough now.
Nothing will wake him, not for hours.
I must report to the prefecture that he needs medical attention.
He must go to a hospital.
They'll know what to do.
They'll give him things to make him sleep, and they'll keep him away from the bottle.
Wait till tomorrow.
Then if he's not any better,
I will send for his mother.
Madame Loubet!
Where are you? They're back, the roaches!
Millions of them!
Where are you? They're back, the roaches!
Millions of them!
Amen.
His eyes are open.
Can you hear me, Henri?
Listen, this is from Maurice Joyant.
Listen.
"The Louvre has accepted
Camondo Collection."
This makes you only artist to be so honored in his lifetime.
This makes you only artist to be so honored in his lifetime.
Do you hear me, Henri?
Your paintings are to hang in the Louvre.
I didn't understand.
Forgive me, Henri.
I didn't understand.
Henri, my dear,
we just heard you were dying.
We simply had to say goodbye.
It was divine knowing you.
We will see you later, of course.
But now, if you forgive me, I must fly.
There is the most beautiful creature
waiting for me at Maxim's.
Goodbye, Henri.
Dora!
Dora !
Harry and Freddie.
They should hurry up now
Harry, Freddie
Poppa waits already
Lower the coal for me now
- What did you get?
Oranges and apples, and coffee.
No milk?
- No milk.
And the children?
They should have milk.
And I should be John D. Rockefeller.
Milk is 19 cents a quart
I am only Dave Goodman.
Coffee, 45 cents a pound,
I can afford
But ten quarts milk, it's $ 1.90.
Such a thing.
Everything goes up except your wages
Hey you kids, get away from there.
Here come the Cops!
Look.
That's the new police car.
That was the primo gang Pop.
- The hardest guys in Chicago.
Some of them even carry gats.
- I don't care what they carry.
You keep away from them gang boys
Read good books.
Listen to good music.
Without a good education
You'll never get nowhere
Look at me. What am I?
A cutter in a pants factory
Why?
Because I got no education.
Come on, get a move on
Where are we going, Pop?
- You'll see.
Hey, Pop?
Can I come too?
- What do you wanna tag along for?
Why don't you play with the other kids?
They're playing shinny.
I aint got no skates
Alright Benny. You come along too.
'Band Room'
Professor?
- Yes?
A fella by the pants factory was telling me kids can come here and learn to play music for free
Is this really true?
- Well, yes.
So how do kids get into your classes?
They come here and they ask me.
The instruments are free.
The lessons I charge for
Fifty cents an hour.
My name is Schoepp. Franz Schoepp.
Formerly of the Chicago Musical College.
I'm Dave Goodman... and this is my Harry and my Freddie.
Hello.
You got maybe a couple of instruments for them?
Well, we'll see.
Now what can I pick for them
Oh, that will be good.
No, dummkopf here,
That way!
See?
Now try it
That's it.
Gee, Could I have one like that too?
For you, we find something smaller.
Now - Oh.
How about that?
- Thanks.
Please Pop
Can I have one too? ahh Benny,  you're  too young yet
I'll find something.
What's this? A flute?
That is a clarinet.
A clarinet?
Wanna trade? nahh
Never you mind, Benny.
You're lucky you got anything
Yeah, I'm lucky.
I gotta clarinet.
'Lazarus Method for Clarinet.'
'Scales and Chords for Clarinet.'
Wunderbar Benny, wunderbar
When I didn't hear it
I wouldn't believe it
For 40 years I've been playing and you already play better in 6
That's because I've had a good teacher
Mr. Schoepp.
To play like that, no one teaches you.
You come born with this
It's a great gift, Benny.
Don't go and waste it
For you, no more exercises.
Only the great works of the masters.
Next week Mozart,
The clarinet concerto
Mr. Schoepp, about paying you .. I
Forget it Benny, anytime.
Hello, Mr. Schoepp. Hello, Benny.
I gotta new clarinet.
You wanna see it?
- Sure.
Say, that's a beauty. Selmer, huh?
Wish I could afford one
How'd you earn the money?
Playing with that dance band?
Yeah. Only I gotta quit.
- Why?
Well my folks raised cain,
Didn't want me playing on the lake boats
And they are right.
This is ragtime.
Say have you told the band you;re quitting yet?
No, I'm supposed to play tomorrow.
Special Excursion, 4th of July
Do me a favor. Let me go tomorrow and substitute for you? I need the money
Sure. Why not? Save me the trip
Ask for Murph Podolsky
Only you will have to join the union.
- Thanks, I know
No, No Benny. Not you.
Not that ragtime.
Don't be that way!
Get off that bandstand kid
Stop messing with those instruments.
- I'm playing here, I'm in the band
You are? A kid in short pants?
Taking Dick Reiner's place
- I'm Gil Rodin.
Hey, where is everybody?
If I don't get offa this tub I'm gonna be sick
The ship's not moving, Murph.
- Oh, yes it is I can feel it
Aren't you coming with us?
- With those waves out there? Not on your life.
Say who are you?
What are you doing here?
I'm Benny Goodman. I'm playing clarinet Mr Podowski
Dick Reiner can't come any more
Why not? He doesn't get seasick.
His folks won't let him
He sent me.
Come on, fellas. Let's get going.
Can't use you anyway kid. You're too young.
Gotta belong to the union.
I joined the union yesterday.
You 16?
You expect me to believe that?
The union did.
Alright, alright
You're hired.
Now I gotta get off o'here
Mr. Podowski I'm Kid Ory.
Good, good.
My boys will play the first set, see and when they're resting, you boys take over
Big day, big crowd
Gotta have continuous music
Just put your instruments up there on the piano, and sit down over here.
I gotta go, I'll see you back here at the dock tonight.
- Yes, sir.
You know you can die from sea sickness?
I just read an article.
Gil, start the boys to playin'
I'll see you tonight.
What do we start with?
- How about,  'By the Sea'?
Ever play in a band before?
- Not exactly.
Just take it easy
Don't let it worry ya
It doesn't
Velma, I've got a date for you.
This is our new clarinetist Benny Goodman.
I'm happy to meet you
This is Jane.
- Hello, Benny.
What's the matter?
- Nothing, really. It's just that...
Well, I didn't know...
- Didn't know what?
Well it's nothing...
I just never had a date before with a boy that wore short pants
You won't have to now
Say, that was great.
- Did you like it?
You boys certainly have a style all your own, don't you
We just play in New Orleans style.
It's nothing different about us
No music, no arrangements, no nothing, huh?
Half of these boys can't read.
- That solo, did you make that up as you went along?
That's right. You just swing on out and play the way you feel like
Playing the way you feel
This piece you're doing, has it gotta name?
Why sure.'Dixieland One-Step'.
Have you ever heard of this kind of music before boy?
- No
Lot's of the boys come up the river from New Orleans.
Down there everybody plays this way
Joe Oliver, Louis Armstrong,
Fletcher Henderson.
Are they all in Chicago?
- No, Henderson is in New York.
But Joe and Louis they're right here in Chicago
Say, could I sit in?
Dora, what you doing up so late?
What am I doing. What am I always doing?
Working
But you should go to bed Dora
Come the new baby
He needs baby clothes.
Baby clothes don't grow on bushes
I got a fix order from Jerome
Where'd you get the money?
Benny.
- From Benny?
Yes, he made the money playing with that band
He knows you're not working so he gave it to me.
The new baby should have new clothes.
I'm worried about him Poppa
You're worried? ahh, he's a good boy Benny
Yeah, but I want him to meet nice girls
Go out with them
Like Harry and Freddie, dance with them.
But no,all he does is tootle all the time
From dancing with girls you don't get paid
- No
Where is Benny?
- He just walked down
Is something wrong with him Dora?
- No
I hear him playing all alone up there.
I'd better go talk to him.
What's the matter Benny? hmmm?
Always when something's wrong you go away and you play like this
What is it? Tell me.
I had a job Pop and a trip to California.
California?
Ben Pollack's starting a band out there a band that play's the kind of music
I want to play.
Gil Rodin wrote him
He wants me to come out, Gil too
He's getting the very best men
And what kind of music you'll going to play, Benny?
Mozart, maybe?
Bach?
- No, Pop. Dance music.
But not the same old stock arrangements.
Freestyle, so you can improvise, so you can express yourself
What about high school, Benny?
You still got two years yet
You don't learn about music in high school, Pop
And that's what I want to do play music
But you learn other things, Benny.
Those things are important too
Not for me.
There's only one thing that's important
Are you sure this is what you want to do?
I was all set to go.
They paid the fare and everything.
Only ...
Only what?
I need a tuxedo.
So that's it.
A tuxedo, hm?
Alright Benny, you're going to get one.
- But, Pop...
I talked to Mr. Strauss today.
He's got for me next week a job for sure
As soon as I start to working...
- But a tuxedo costs a lot of money
No never you mind what it costs.
- You've got so many other things...
Never mind, never mind, Benny.
All these years you wanted lot's of things like other boys, roller skates, a baseball glove.
Never could I get them for you
This time, for once,
I'm going to get you what you want.
As soon as I get my job you'll get your tuxedo.
Couldn't the sleeves be shortened?
Sure, we could shorten the sleeves now.
But Benny, next year when you will need them a little longer there'll be a crease here what you can never get out.
'Ben Pollack and his Californians'
Well, what happened?
I'm sorry Ben I was meeting the train
It was five hours late.
And where's Goodman?
- I'm Goodman.
You?
Alright fellas, 'Waiting for Katie.'
One, two...
What's the idea?
We aren't opeing at the Neopolitan until tomorrow night.
Yeah, I know.
Well aren't we pretty dressy just to arrive in Chicago? oh, Mom wrote me. They're having a little party for me. You know, just the family. mhmm and you always wear black tie at your family parties?
Pop gave me this tux.
I just want to show him I've grown into it.
What is it Harry?
It's Pop Benny.
There was an accident.
On his way over here
He was crossing the street
You mean just now?
-  Just an hour ago.
By the time we got him to the hospital...
Does Mom know?
Benny
He was so excited that you're coming.
So was I Mom.
Oh, and he never saw you how you're all grown up a man already
'Neopolitan Cafe.'
You sure this is the right place?
- Of course
But those were gangsters.
- Nonsense.
My name is John Hammond.
Ben Pollack left a reservation for me.
John this is a dive
It's a speakeasy.
John, I'd like you to meet Benny Goodman.
Well hello, I've been wanting to meet you
- Nice to meet you.
This is my sister Alice.
- How do you do?
Sit down
Ben, the reason I wanted to see you
I got a long distance call from Willard Alexander.
He's got a spot for a hot band the Club 50.
How would you like to play in New York?
- A New York date?
Yeah Ben that's the chance we've been waiting for, to play our style again
But hot stuff doesn't seem to go over
We laid a long line of eggs all the way from California
That's why we're sticking to stock arrangements.
But Ben.
- Well, maybe this is our chance.
Exactly. Let's call him right now
Go ahead, before he changes his mind.
- Well, okay.
Excuse us, please.
We saw these men when we came in
They really look like gangsters.
They are
Don't you find it nerve wracking, playing here?
They don't bother us
They pay us very well.
Why?
Little Jake's girl likes our music.
He owns the joint
Your brother a booker?
A booker?
You mean like at a racetrack?
No, that's a bookie. Booker's a fella who finds spots for bands
That's how he makes his money
- Well, John's always trying to help bands
But it always seems to cost him money.
You live in Chicago?
New York. I'm here for the opera at Ravinia, staying with my aunt.
Do you like hot music?
- Oh no, not at all.
So what are you doing here?
I just came to keep John out of trouble
It worked. You got the date.
You're going to New York.
No kidding?
- It's getting late John. I think we ought to leave.
Good night
Well, good luck fellas. See you tomorrow.
- Yes, se ya, John.
Hey how 'bout that, Hammond has got us a date at the Club 50 in New York.
Yes but we've got a problem.
How are we gonna get outta here?
Just tell him we're leaving that's all
It's a free country.
Sure if little Jake gets sore we'll never get out of here alive
Well he wouldn't do anything like that
- What makes you think he wouldn't?
Maybe if we played lousy for a few nights...
- nahh, they wouldn't know the difference.
Could you talk to his girlfriend? what's her name?
You know what happened to the last guy
Jake saw talking to her
The only thing to do is go talk to little Jake
Tell him the whole story and appeal to his better nature
Yes, but who's gonna do it?
- Aren't you Ben?
He'd say no
He hates my guts
You actually saw Jake huh?
- Yeah, once. That was enough.
I'll do it, this is too good a chance to pass up
You mean you're gonna see him now?
- Worst he can do is bump me off
Well go in that door. Good luck, kid.
Thanks.
If I'm not back after next set
Notify my mother
Where do you think you're going son?
- I wanted to see Jake.
Oh, you did? and who are you?
- One of the boys in the band.
The boss is very busy.
He don't have  time to talk to no musicians. hmm, well maybe you better let him decide about that
There's a fella here from the band, says he says he wants to see the boss.
What's your name?
- Benny Goodman.
Okay.
Here's the musician, boss.
- What do you want?
Ben Pollack wanted me to talk to you.
Why he didn't come himself?
He was afraid.
- Why'd he send you?
He didn't,
I volunteered.
You don't know me and I figured you wouldn't bump me off so quick
I hope I'm right.
Well, what's your problem, son?
Well we've been offered a job in New York.
It's a great break for us and, ah, we want to go.
What's the matter?
Don't you like it here?
Oh yeah, yeah sure like it fine
Why ain't got nuthin in New York we ain't got
You'd be making a big mistake
Hey, you look familiar to me.
Benny Goodman.
I heard that name too
No, you must have me mixed up with somebody else.
I play the clarinet. It's all I've ever done ever since I was a kid
Did you live on Francisco Avenue?
Oh yes, I did
I thought so
You used to play shinny without no skates
You're Jake Primo.
You used to throw rocks at me
Yeah, ha ha ha
I've come a long way since then ain't I?
Yeah. Oh yes, a very long way.
So you guys want to goto New York and play for them Broadway weisenheimers eh?
The sides, boss?
- Yeah
Sammy, take care of the boys in the band
Well?
- How did he take it?
I don't know. All he said was
'Take care of the boys'
What's this?
- A farewell party.
Good luck and best wishes from the boss.
Yes, sir.
- New York, here we come
'Trombone Club Teddy Wilson at the Piano.'
Evening.
Hi
Hi, Benny.
Hi. Excuse me.
Sit down
- Thanks John. Hi, Gene.
This is my sister Alice.
- Hello I'm Benny Goodman.
Hey Teddy's terrific isn't he?
- Oh, great.
Do you like hot music
Oh no, not at all.
- Then what are you doing here?
I just came to keep John out of trouble
Say, didn't we ahh...
No, I guess not
Hi, Benny. Keepin' busy?
- A few record dates, Ted.
Can't live off them
- You should have stuck with Pollack.
He died here in New York, but he's doing alright on the road
Yeah, playing those same old stock arrangements.
I hear Kel Murray is after you Benny offered you real dough
I turned him down Gene.
- Turned him down? Why?
Same reason I left Ben Pollack.
I want a band that plays hot music that really takes off and where would it play? There's no place outside Harlem for a band like that
Yeah, like Fletcher Henderson always says:
'Hot bands are cold turkey in this town'
I don't know about that
It's never been tried.
Never been tried?
What about Pollack and the others?
Not the way I mean
I have a few ideas.
I don't know if they're crazy...
- What kind of ideas Benny?
They're musical ideas.
I can't put them into words
But when we get together in a joint like this and jam
The people come in and they sit down and they listen.
The reason they sit and  listen, is because that's the way we play.
Oh sure, they love it. just not enough of 'em
Maybe if we played our kind of music so they could dance instead of just listen
You might have something Benny
- What are you aiming at? Get up a band of your own?
Looks like I'd have to
Be practical, Benny.
You wouldn't make a nickel
What can you hope for?
A few recordings? A college prom maybe?
Dance or not dance, nobody wants this kind of music.
I do.
- I know how you feel, but it's hopeless Benny
It's a wild dream
Don't be that way
I can't help the way I am
See ya later
Oh, it's nice to have met you
He's one of the greatest clarinetist in the business and the stubbornist
John, every hot musician isn't another Paganini.
As it happens, Benny is.
Oh, come now
Some day I'll prove it to you
Well, I must say...
Benny does have his own strange kind of integrity
I admire him for that.
'Call Chicago operator #183'
Hello. Harry?
Is something wrong?
No, it's about Mom.
What's the matter with Mom?
- It's her frame of mind, Benny.
She's getting lower and lower
There's nobody home now except me and Irving
She doesn't know what to do with hersel
I'm worried about her
We thought maybe she should go and live with Ida.
No, Ida has her own family to take care of
Maybe Mom needs a change Harry
Bring her to New York
What about the money Benny?
I'll wire it to you
We'll find an apartment some place
You gotta job
Yeah
Look Benny
Maybe you could find something for me
I'm playing a bull fiddle now you know
Yeah sure don't worry Harry
Bring Mom and your bull fiddle come out as soon as you can eh?
Okay. so long Benny.
Alright
Come in
Hi, John.
- Hi, Benny.
You remember Willard Alexander.
- Yeah. How are you?
I just told Willard about your idea.
- What idea?
About a new band. It sounds very exciting
I's like to hear more about it
Some other time
Right nowt, it's just an idea.
Is this stuff for the new band?
- Yes, some arrangements.
I been talking to a couple young fellas named
Deane Kincaide and George Baseman and we got together and worked out a few ideas
You don't want to talk about?
- Some other time.
For the time being I guess
I'll have to get a job
A job that pays well.
With Kel Murray.
Why? What happened?
A whole lot of things. My family, all sorts of complications
Train fares, and apartments,
I guess for now the band will have to wait.
Whenever you're ready, just give me the word.
- Thanks, Willard.
You been working on this, Benny?
The Mozart concerto, yeah.
Professor Schoepp would be proud of me
I wonder if you'd do me a favor, Benny?
- hmmm?
You know my family has these musical evenings at the house
All classical stuff, of course.
They're having one in a couple of weeks.
A small string group
They've been wanting to do the ' Clarinet Concerto' and I'm supposed to find a clarinetist.
Why do you want me?
- I have my reasons.
I'd have to have a couple of rehearsals with the other musicians
Oh, it isn't that formal
Listen, if you'll do it, I'll invite some of your friends too, for moral support
I guess I need it.
Is Alice gonna be there?
Well, yes. Why?
- No reason. just wondering.
This can't be it
This is a mansion.
No, this is the house Mom.
Come on we're late
I am Mr. Goodman.
- Second door on the right, sir.
Thank you.
Such a thing
People live here?
This is a home?
- Sure. What do you think?
I think it's a museum.
Come on, Mom.
That poor woman.
What a poor woman?
That every day has to dust this place.
Come on
Oh Benny, there you are.
- Hello John. Sorry we're late.
Father, this is Benny Goodman.
- Pleased to meet you Mr. Hammond.
How do you do Mr. Goodman, I'm so glad you could come
- Thank you.
Now this is my mother and my brother Harry.
Very happy to meet you
This is my cousin Mrs. Vanderbilt.
How do you do, likewise
You're playing my favorite concerto.
- Well thank you, It's mine too.
Let's find a nice seat for you Mrs Goodman
How about over here?
Thank you very much
We're just about ready Benny
I'll be with you in a minute
Right, John.
Knock'em dead Ben.
- Play good Benny.
I'll see you later.
Well, hello there
- Hello
Do you like classical music?
- Yes, very much.
Well, I had no idea.
- I'm even going to play.
You are?
- mm hmm
Are you the Goodman?
- Yup
Was this John's idea?
Yes, he asked me.
Where is he? I want to speak to him.
Excuse me
John, this is outrageous.
I couldn't be more upset.
Outrageous? What is?
You're asking Benny Goodman to play
Don't you realize what you're doing?
I know exactly what I'm doing.
You and the rest of the family look down on these musicians because they play in cabarets and dives
This is as good a way as any to show you.
- You told Benny that's why you asked him?
Does he know these other musicians are professionals from the Philharmonic?
He's used to playing with professionals.
Oh John, really.
It is high time you got over being such a musical snob Alice
You're shocked that a hot musician should come here and play Mozart.
Not at all, I'm shocked that you could expose a friend to such humiliation.
Don't worry, Alice.
He's not going to be humiliated.
Oh yes, he is.
I wish I could stop him
Well, you can't.
As a matter of fact
I'm going to get him started
Looks like they're getting ready
- In a couple of minutes, boys.
They are all from the Philharmonic you know...
But this Mr. Goodman...
I have no idea where he comes from.
He's from Chicago madam
He was a student of Professor Schoepp.
Oh? Thank you very much.
Thanks
It's water!
It's going to be awful for him Father,
I just know it
Oh, I hope not.
With his mother here.
His mother? Where?
Just down there in the second row
Mrs. Goodman? I'm Alice Hammond.
Very pleased to meet you
He doesn't seem very nervous, does he?
No, he isn't.
I was just saying to Harry, if only his father could be here when Benny is playing good music.
Good for you, Benny.
- Thanks, John.
Let's get you something to eat
- you bet
Nice going, Benny.
- Real nice going, bud.
Oh Mr. Goodman, I've never heard the rondo played better.
Yeah he's a mean man with that licorice stick.
Benny, I thought you were in the groove tonight
Did you really?
I thought he played brilliantly.
Thank you.
I guess maybe we gotta learn some lingo
- yeah
Mr. Goodman. - Yes
May I speak to you for a moment?
Certainly.
I owe you an apology.
Apology?
What for?
When you told me you were going to play,
I was quite upset.
As a matter of fact, I told John that I thought of him for asking you
You did? Why?
To be honest, I thought it would be very embarrassing for us and humiliating for you.
Is that why you went and sat with Mom?
Yes.
Well, that was real thoughtful of you.
You fascinate me.
Anyone who can play as well as you devoting himself to that strange and unpopular popular music.
I don't understand it
- You don't understand the music.
You are perfectly right.
- Have you ever tried?
Of course I've tried
It just sounds loud
So do a lot of symphonies
But there's nothing simple about it or melodic like chamber music.
It can be, sometime I'd like to show you
If you'll listen
Of course I will.
I'm not that much of a musical snob in spite of what John said
John says your idea of a musician, is a guy who plays in Carnegie Hall.
That's right
You are the exception.
You are quite eloquent, aren't you?
Huh?
Nobody ever called me that before
Oh, with music, not words.
- Oh, I see what you mean.
You fooled me completely
You ah,  look and act so calm and quiet then all of this emotion comes pouring out
I can't remember when I've been so moved
That wasn't me, that was Mozart
Why that's Benny Goodman.
Hey, who'd you say that was?
- Benny Goodman.
He's a clarinet player. Plays with dance bands.
He's a friend of Johns
I can't believe it.
Benny with a band like this
You said he play with dance bands and that's exactly what he's doing
Oh, You don't understand.
- I certainly don't.
Hello, Alice.
- Hello, Benny.
Roger Gillespe, Benny Goodman.
- Hello - How do you do.
Won't you sit down?
- No thanks. I don't have time anyway
I'm disappointed in you
- Disappointed? Why?
This is the kind of music you don't like, isn't it?
It sure is
Well, I expected you to stick to your convictions
My convictions haven't changed.
Well, I'm afraid you hurt his feelings
I'm sure I did
As I was saying ...
I'm sorry.
Your friend is late.
Are you quite ready, Mr. Goodman?
I'm not in the habit of waiting for musicians
Nobody is indispensable you know
I'm warning you, don't let it happen again
It won't
Why, he's walking out on him
Yes, he is
I feel terrible
- Why?
He had a job,
Now all he has are his convictions
I'm afraid I'm to blame.
'NBC Lining Up New Bands for New Dance Program.'
Excuse me. Would you mind turning  to page 24?
It's very important.
Hey, it sounds good.
Look fellas, we could play together all the time, play the way we want.
That's really why I asked you to come
- What are you talking about?
I mean getting up our own band
- Oh, It's hopeless, Benny.
Well, I know it's a long shot but we've got a chance for an audition
NBC is looking for a swing band, and
I had Willard talk to those fellas
He convinced them I could get up a band that would really be different
They'll come and listen to us.
If they like us, they'll give us an audition
You mean, this'd only be an audition for a audition?
Benny, don't be that way
- How you gonna do it Benny?
This is how.  I've had
Deane Kincaide and George Baseman work out some special arrangements.
They knew what I was after and they gave it to me.
They've given us plenty of elbow room to improvise and work out our own licks
Well, how about it fellas?
It looks pretty good.
I'm with you, Benny.
- Alright   - Me too  - okay
Alright, let's get to work.
I got only one suggestion to make Benny.
If you're gonna be a band leader, you oughta change your name.
Why?
Who's gonna remember a name like 'Benny Goodman'?
'Let's Dance.'
This was 'Valse Brillante', played by Kel Murray and his orchestra.
Fine music in an old tradition.
Now we've got a brand new band, with a brand new style.
So thank you Kel Murray, and welcome
Benny Goodman and his orchestra.
Where to, boss?
Anyplace, Ed I just wanna listen.
And that concludes our program for the night
We hope you'll be with us again same time next Saturday.
Benny Goodman
- Yeah
I heard your music on the radio tonight and I came down to congratulate you.
Thank you.
- I'm Fletcher Henderson.
Mr. Henderson, I can't tell you what this means to me.
We've listened to your records since we were kids. Your band's tops with us.
We've been playing  for 15 years.
We had good times and bad, but we never made it
I was beginning to think no one ever would
Then I heard you boys tonight.
I think you stand a chance.
Do ya?
You boys have the real feeling like Oliver, Dodds, and Louis, all the boys from New Orleans.
But you got something different, something new
That's why I think you might make it
And I want to help
- Do you mean that?
If you could use some arrangements,
I could use the money.
Wonderful !
Gee this is a real break
And now, a new Fletcher Henderson arrangement
'Stompin at the Savoy'.
'Eastern Time.'
'Central Time.'
'Mountain Time.'
'Pikes Peak Chalet.'
'Pacific Time.'
'Southern California.'
Thank you, Benny Goodman
That's all folks.
Let's dance again next week, same time, same station.
Well, how'd we sound?
Oh, great Benny, great
What's the matter Willard?
Well, we're finished in three weeks.
They're not picking up our option
They're not?
- Why not?
There's a shut down at the factory
They're not making any biscuits so they don't want to sell any
Well, that's it then, I knew it
Just when we ere going good
No more Goodman band
Not necessarily.
We still have a fighting chance.
How? What next?
Well, these broadcasts have stirred up some interest, especially out west.
I've had some enquiries
We might be able to book a tour
Starting when?
- Couple of months, maybe.
That's alright, we're just getting started
We could use a little more work, more rehearsal
Sure that's fine, there's only one question Benny.
- Yeah
How we gonna eat?
People always tell me how much musicians drink
But you boys, all you do is eat
I'll bet you'll be glad to get rid of us
- Not at all.
It seems like old times. A whole lot of children around the house to feed.
Do you always feed them this well?
- No, not always.
And they didn't help out like you boys
Some of them were only babies.
Thanks. Will you will be glad to get back to work?
Back to work?
You don't know Benny, he's been rehearsing us four or five hours a day.
Are you a hard taskmaster, Benny?
Well, if you want to be good, you gotta work at it
I'll say this for him, he's hardest on himself
Hi !
Good to see you.
- How are you?
Good evening. Good evening
- Nice to see you.
Thank you.
You know everybody, no?
Yes, yes. hello Teddy. oh come on, boys.
I've got some your favorite pudding.
Wonderful.
- Hello.
Hello. What are you doing here?
I asked John to bring me.
- You did?
Yes, I wanted to see what one of your musical evenings was like
Also, I wanted to see you.
Would you like to sit down?
You know we're leaving?
Yes, I do know.
How long will you be gone?
Well, we're set for some one night stands that'll take us to Denver.
We're gonna be at Elitch's Gardens there for four weeks.
Then in August, we're going to the Palomar in Los Angeles. ah, it'll be four or five months.
Five months?
I'm going to miss you Benny.
Do you mean that?
Yes, I do.
I was hoping you'd call me.
I wanted to. Only...
- Only what?
Well, you don't go around with jazz musicians...
No, I don't go around with doctors or lawyers either
I go around with people, people I like.
I never know how to take you
You don't?
Well, we have a terrible time understanding each other, don't we?
Well, I don't know. In some ways, we... and yet, we can't help being attracted to each other.
Why?
Maybe it's because we're so different.
We couldn't be more different could we.
- I don't know how.
Music, family, personality.
It's funny, isn't it?
No. No, it's not funny.
It's strange and confusing ...
I wish I could tell you how I ...
Do me a favor will you Alice?
Will you just sit right here and listen?
E flat Ted. Okay, Gene?
She's nice, isn't she Mom?
- Nice? Who is nice?
Alice !
Oh yes, she's fine for a high society girl
No frills, no nonsense, just like anybody else
But Harry, I have a terrible sinking feeling in my stomach.
What's the matter Mom?
- It's Alice.
I'm afraid she's falling in love with Benny.
But Mom, I thought you liked her?
I might like the Queen Of England too if I met her
But God forbid she should marry my Benny.
Benny, that was wonderful.
I loved it
It was beautiful. It was like - like, spontaneous Mozart
That wasn't Mozart. That was me.
'Ohio Pavilion - Columbus' Finest
Dining and Dancing'
What's this?
Oh, this is something new we're introducing on the tour
The Benny Goodman Trio.
What kind of a deal is that?
Look my friend, I'm paying for a full band and I intend to get it.
You've got the whole band Mr McCatchie, this is something extra
Extra nothing. Eleven fellas sitting there not making a sound.
'Benny Goodman and his Orchestra.'
Hey, is this the Goodman Orchestra?
- That's right
Great, great, I'm Joe Goldcrown, the manager.  Proud to have you here.
I heard you on the Let's Dance program You were great..
Thanks
- Let me tell you something
You boys play the best waltzes
I ever heard.
This is going to be a great night too
I just have a feeling.
'Elitch's Garden
Benny Goodman and his Orchestra.'
What do you call that song?
Has it got a name?
Yeah
'Down South Camp Meeting'
Don't you boys play any tangos?
No we don't Mr. Clark.
How about some comedy numbers?
Don't you have funny hats?
No, we do not.
- There's a fella down at the casino
He;s got gold derbys, trick hats, musical saws, real good stuff.
And he's grabbing all the business
I'm sorry Mr.Clark, you're not looking for a band
You're looking for a three ring circus
'Palomar Ballroom.'
'Tonight Only
B. Goodman and his Orchestra.'
Now look here, this the the rawest deal I ever heard of Mr. Stewart
You cant expect a band to play for one night
One night's better than nothing isn't it?
No it's worse.  If we're not good enough to play, we ..
Look Mr. Goodman, you signed a contract with me and I'm gonna hold you to it
We get a nice crowd in here on Saturday night no matter what band we have
I can't get Dennis until Monday night and, I need a band
Suppose we refuse?
We're hooked Benny, and he knows it
He's got us over a barrel
Don't make a heavy out of me boys
I don't decide which band is a draw and which one isn't
The public does
They either like you, or they dont
- You've decided they don't
Oh, who are we kidding
I talked to Clark in Denver.
He wouldn't let us play our own numbers
- Yeah so he told me
He's no fool and neither am I
I'm not going to either
What time do we start?
- The doors open at 8
Hello, Alice.
- Hello, Willard.
Well, this is our last night fellas
We got together so we can play our kind of music and so far nobody's let us
Well, we're going to play it tonight whether they like it or not.
We're gonna do all our big numbers right on down the line
We'll start with
'One O'Clock Jump'
Why are they just standing there?
What's happened?
It's got me.  I've never seen this happen before on a dance floor.
But they're just standing,
They're not dancing
What happened?
Happened? The kids is going crazy over this band.
You've hit the jackpot, boss.
Well, I'll be !
I can't do this all night
I'm getting writer's cramp.  okay
Thank you.
- Just one more Mr. Goodman?
Okay.
Oh I guess they're closing up kids
I'm sorry
Gee Benny we waited all this time
- I have all your records Mr. Goodman
I'll catch you outside.
- Come on, kids. It's getting late.
I'll be out in a minute.
- Come on, kids. Let's go.
Hi    - I tried to get over to you after the first set
I know.  That's alright
You must be exhausted.
- Yeah pretty much
Wow, what a night.
It couldn't have been more wonderful.
How do you explain that?
I mean what happened?
I guess the kids must have heard the 'Let's Dance' program
It's three hours earlier out here.
Lot of them said they had our records too
They were waiting for us only we didn't know it
But what are you doing here in L.A.anyway?
Well, I heard what happened on your tour.
Willard said he was afraid that the band might break up
Well I thought that tonight might be another humiliation.
I knew how you would feel.
I just wanted to be here.
That was wonderful of you, Alice.
You brought us luck.
- Benny Goodman, you're an idiot.
How can you say a thing like that?
- huh?
You've worked for years to get a band together
You rehearsed, and struggled, and you practically starved to make it work and then when you finally click
You call it luck. Nothing could be more absurd.
I suppose that's true in a way
- You earned that ovation tonight.
I never heard such play the drive, the beat
The kids could not help but get excited.
You know you never played
'One O'Clock Jump' like that.
It was twice as good as the record
The record?
You've heard the record?
Oh don't be silly, I have them all
You do?
- I listen to them all the time.
You mean you like them.
I am a Benny Goodman fan
Wow, you've have changed, Alice.
- I certainly have
This is great, but I can't understand it
You, Alice Hammond, a swing fan
What's happened to you?
That's rather obvious, isn't it?
I'm in love with you, Benny.
Ohh ...
I guess you know how I feel Alice?
I haven't the vaguest idea.
You, you mean that?
I just assumed you knew that I...
I mean I don't see how you could help ...
Are you trying to say that you love me, Benny?
Well, I couldn't be more surprised.
I figured you knew why I didn't say anything Alice
It took all my money to keep the band together, and then my family...
Oh please Benny, don't try to explain.
I didn't say that I wanted to marry you or run off to a deserted island with you
I just said that I was in love you.
- Alice ...
I may get over it.
We both may
Guess it would be much simpler if we did.
Wouldn't it?
I wouldn't bet on it
- Well I don't
That's why I told you.
I may be able to keep it from my family my  friends, but I knew I could never keep it from you
Alice, you're wonderful.
- You're the wonderful one Benny
Unbelievably, hopelessly, wonderful
I'm afraid I will never get over you
Never as long as I live.
I guess we're both in the same boat.
Alice, I...
I know, I know, my poor Benny.
So many things he wants to say and no clarinet to say them
'Benny Goodman Orchestra'
'6 more weeks at Palomar.'
'Goodman Trio Play Avalon Benefit'
Goodbye Mr. Goodman I really enjoyed your music.
- Thank you.
I'm hungry Benny
- Me too.
There's a little place across the street.
Paradise Cafe.
Good.
You know what a fella over on the island told me?
On a clear day you can see North America.
I'm kinda cold. How about a drink?
- yes - good  - What'll you have?
Scotch and soda?
- fine
Make it two
- Make it six.
Yes, sir.
Six scotch and sodas, coming right up
Can we get something to eat?
- Sure thing
Just have a seat at the table and the waiter will take care of you right away
Okay.
- Got time?
Oh yeah a lot of time.
- So this is paradise huh?
Yeah it's a great life. we were a big success and here we are playing for nothing again
Here we go
- Now what'll you have to eat folks?
What is there?
- Well chili is the quickest
I've got it cooking now
Are you the cook too?
- That's me.
Chilli's fine and coffee, please.
Same all round?
Hey, aren't you that Benny Goodman, the fella who's playing the Palomar?
Man what you doing in San Pedro?
- We just played a benefit at Avalon.
Catalina, huh?
- Yes
The chili will be right up
He must be a pretty busy fella bartender, waiter, cook.
Talking about busy fellas
You're going to be one Benny
The deal is closed for  the Congress Hotel, and looks like ... your booked solid with one night stands all the way from here to Chicago.
How about New York?
- Well there's some interest there too
Oh, wonderful.
Not New York. Hot bands are cold turkey in that town
We' stay on the road
At least that way we'll eat.
Yes, sir. coming right up
And the coffee's coming later.
You really have entertainment here?
Sure thing.
Our next show goes on in two minutes.
Well ladies and gentlemen. Our regular
24 piece orchestra hasn't arrived yet
But instead, it give me great pleasure to present our feature performer and that high-class vibraharp player
Mr Lionel Hampton.
My first number will be in honor of our special guest... and that famous little town over there in Catalina they just been visiting
You've really fallen for him haven't you?
You didn't think you could fool me?
You oughtta see your face when he plays.
How long have you known?
When you wanted me to come back out here with you again
I didn't think you had fallen in love with the California climate
Of all the incredible romances...
You and Benny Goodman.
I know.
I think we're going to leave here with something new.
Like the Benny Goodman quartet?
You gassed  me, man.
'Benny Goodman comes home.'
'Chicago Pays Homage to the King of Swing.'
There's someone here who want to see you Benny.
Kid, Kid Ory.
Congratulations, Benny. You've made it.
- Thank you.
You have the best band
I ever heard,  anyplace.
Well man, that's the best compliment
I ever heard anyplace
Thank you.
Fletcher, Would you hold this for me please?
Kid I'll see you later
Hello, Benny.
- Hello, Alice.
I was hoping you would show up
I had a hunch
It's been two months Benny
I couldn't stand it any longer
I know.
It seems more like  two years.
I've been hoping  you come to New York.
- New York?
I can't keep chasing you around the country like this ...
I'm running out of excuses
What's your excuse this time?
- I'm visiting my aunt.
She live in a museum too?
No, her house is more like a car barn.
What about New York, Benny?
Too many unpleasant memories.
Thank you.
- Oh, I don't mean you, Alice.
Flops and bad dates
It's our jinx town
I don't want to go near it
Suppose I stop trailing you around.
Then what?
Then I'd have to come to
New York I guess
'Goodman Band Will  Open at New York Paramount.'
Hi
- I'm sorry, the traffic was terrible.
I was beginning to think you weren't coming
Benny, it's wonderful to see you.
I can hardly believe it
When did you get in?
Ah, Last week.
Last week?
Why didn't you call me?
I'm terribly busy, Alice.
- Too busy to make a phone call?
No, there were a lot of other things.
I know I should have called you, but...
What's wrong Benny?
This opening here in New York.
We've been to bat here three times and we've struck out three times
When we left, a band like ours couldn't even fill the little Trombone Club
Now they got us booked into the Paramount Theater.
I just don't like the idea of playing thousands of empty seats.
So that's why you wanted to see me.
You think tomorrow's opening is going to be another humiliation
Well - yes.
Were you planning to be at the Paramount, Alice?
No, I wasn't
Oh, I was hoping you'd be there to bring us luck.
I have a dinner date
We go on at 10 in the morning.
10 in the morning?
No wonder you're worried about empty seats.
Alright Benny. I'll be there.
I'll be that little black speck in the 20th row
We get along fine don't we Alice?
When we're together,
I feel so relaxed and easy
Well, my Goodness
Coming from you Benny, that, that's a real outburst
You know something, Benny Goodman?
I've never been alone with you, even in a sitting room
It's always in nightclubs, or parties, or places like this
I wonder what it would be like to spend an evening with you in front of the fire
Well I don't suppose I'll ever find that out
Alice, I've been doing a lot of thinking.
And...
- Really?
There's something I want to say to you
- Yes
Will you come around to the stagedoor after the first show tomorrow?
We'll have  breakfast, just the two of us and talk.
I'd love to, but...
Couldn't you try to say it now?
There's a rehearsal in about ten minutes.
I have to get over there
I'll see you in the morning.
The picture's just about over
Is everbody here?   -  uh huh
Okay, up we go
- Thanks
One, two, three, four.
Good afternoon, Fred.
Good afternoon, Miss Alice.
Alice, what happened to you?
- Nothing, Father.
Where have you been?
At Paramount Theater.
Paramount Theater?
What's going on there?
Oh, Father. You have no idea.
I certainly haven't
Now why did you go to a movie theater on a Thursday morning?
Because Benny asked me to
-  Benny?
Benny Goodman. He opened there this morning with his band
Father, you never saw such a mob in your life with such excitement
It couldn't have been more filling they were dancing in the aisles
And is that what you've been doing?
Well, not intentionally.
Benny Goodman.
That young man could be a fine musician.
What a waste
Oh, no. There were thousands of people there
They were shouting and cheering
Oh, no. I don't call that a waste
There was such a mob,
I couldn't get near him
I've got to send him a telegram.
Western Union, please.
Is it that urgent?
This is Butterfield 81098
I'd like to send a straight wire to Mr. Benny Goodman care of the Paramount Theater, New York city
Am black and blue from attending your humiliation
Couldn't get near you am thrilled, and exhausted.
Love, Alice.
Yes, thank you.
Love?
Yes Father, Love.
'Thrilled and exhausted.
Love, Alice.'
Love already ?
That's an expression Mom
- From jazz and from swing, I don't know.
From love I know Benny.
- What are you talking about?
I'm talking about you and Alice.
- Some other time huh?
Seven sons I got, but you're not like the others.
With them, I can talk.
But I will still say what's on my mind
Mom, we go on in five minutes.
But a long time already I've seen what happens with you and Alice.
It's wrong Benny.
It's like a knife in my heart
You shouldn't feel that way
- How can I help it?
I have to go on now.
I guess it's better that we don't talk about it anyway
'Benny Goodman to Star in Film.'
Flight 214 for Chicago and Los Angeles now boarding at gate 8.
Benny, what happened? I thought you weren't going away for a month.
The studio called.
They want us right away
The rest of the boys are coming out Wednesday
How long will you be gone?
- Two or three months.
What about us Benny?
Alice, you know how I feel
I've been thinking about it.
What kind of life would it be for you a girl like you?
I'd be travelling all the time, working every night.
Those are excuses Benny, not reasons.
Final call, flight 214.
All aboard, please
- I guess I have to go..
Goodbye Alice.
Thanks for coming down
Benny, Benny, come on.
We'll miss the plane.
Come on Benny,  Let's go.
Never understand that guy.
You're his brother, Harry.
Don't you understand him?
I don't know.
Sometimes I think I do
About you, Alice.
It's just that...
Just that Benny doesn't need anybody or anything.
Except his music.
Everybody needs somebody even Benny.
He'll find that out
I just have a feeling that there's something more to it than that
What do you mean, Harry?
I mean, Mom.
I love him Mrs. Goodman.
He knows it
I think he loves me.
That's why I'm not sleeping nights
You've known about it?
Has Benny talked to you?
With Benny, you don't talk such things
This well you ought to know him
I do.
That's why I came here Mrs. Goodman
I hoped you could help me.
Benny wants to marry me.
He's been on the verge of asking me
If he wants to ask you, why doesn't he?
I thought you might be able to  tell me.
You're a nice girl Alice.
You'll make some man a good wife
But not my Benny.
Why not, Mrs. Goodman?
Because you don't mix caviar with bagels, that's why.
Always I was hoping
Benny settles down
Finds the right girl, but
How do you know he hasn't?
I love him Mrs. Goodman.
What possible motive could I have except to make him happy?
Don't you think I could do that?
You're young yet, Alice, so is Benny
Happiness is easy to talk
It's not so easy to live.
You'll find this out some day.
Only when you do it's too late.
I'm sorry you feel this way Mrs. Goodman.
And your family, they don't feel the same way?
No, strangely enough they don't
They admire Benny.
They know I love him.
I think they'ld be very happy.
This I can't understand.
But I understand a lot of things now
I had no idea you felt this way
I am very glad to know it
Just one more thing Mrs. Goodman.
You've no need to worry,
I'll never ask Benny to marry me
If he ever does, it will be because he wants to
It will have to come from him.
Alice, don't wait around for something that maybe never happens
I don't intend to
I've been doing that too long.
Say Benny
Just ran into Wynn Nathansby.
He's come up with a great idea
How would you like to give a concert in Carnegie Hall?
Carnegie Hall?
Nah, I don't think so.
We're doing alright
Benny, it would be the high point of your career
Might be at that
Certainly be a landmark
Not just for us but for all hot music
A sign of recognition
- Exactly.
Yeah, we could use all the top guys, not just our own band
Make it a real jazz concert.
Man, it would answer all the guys who've been saying swing music is just a flash in the pan.
- Yeah
I know one person who'd think it's a great idea - Alice.
She's always said her idea of a musician is a guy who plays in Carnegie Hall.
'Carnegie Hall
Benny Goodman and his Orchestra.'
Yeah,  that'll be alright fellas ahh, saxes, at letter F
Take it down even a little more alright?
- okay fine
This could be ok
Take five
Sounds great, Benny.
- Thanks  - oh Willard
Hey, you look tired.
You get any sleep on the plane?
A little bit.
Can you get me a couple of  tickets?
Benny, but they've been sold out for three days.
We even have them sitting on the stage.
- Sold out?
Well, what am I going to do?
They're for my mother.
Don't worry, I'll ry a scalper
- Every seat in the house taken. and not by kids either, not at these prices.
A full house full of long hairs
People who've never heard our kind of music before
You're taking an awful chance
You that, don't you Benny? - yup
We should have had more time.
We need more than one rehearsal
I know, but everyone is busy.
Where is Lionel by the way, and HarryJames?
No, don't worry.
They'll be there.
I never should have gotten into this
Well listen Benny, If you're that worried
We can call it off, we still have time
No, we'll go through with it
Your whole reputation is at stake, Benny.
Don't take a chance like this, don't be that way
Say Benny, about the program we got to get it  to the printers.
We got to finish laying it out
For instance, what are you going to open with?
Now let's see ah, maybe that new tune we just did, the Edgar Sampson thing
That might be alright
- What are you going to call it?
How about 'Don't Be That Way'
That's what I've heard all my life
Every time I wanted to try something new, somebody always said, 'Don't be that way.'
Well, this concert's something new. so maybe that would be a good idea for the opening tune
Oh, John
Where's Alice?
I didn't have a chance to call her
I don't know Benny.
I haven't seen her for the last 10 days
I kinda thought she'd be here.
She was always the one who wanted me to play in Carnegie Hall.
Yes?
Yes, hello?
Oh Mr Hammond. I'm sorry, I didn't mean to wake you,I wanted to speak to Alice.
Who is this?
- Benny, Benny Goodman
Alice is out of town, Benny.
She's at my sisters in Vermont.
Oh, oh I see.
Is something wrong?
No, not exactly.
I was just hoping...
Are you going to be at the concert
 tomorrow night?
Yes, John got me tickets.
Mr Hammond, do you know when Alice will be back?
Not for a couple of weeks, I'm sure.
She just left a few days ago
Did she know about the concert?
Yes, Benny I'm quite sure she did
Thanks
Benny, tell me.
What's the trouble?
Mom, it's too cold for you out here
Is it the concert?
Is that what's worrying you?
The last time you played like this, it was your father.
What is it?
Can't you tell me?
It's Alice, isn't it?
It's because she went away.
Mom...
- You do not need to talk.
I understand.
I didn't, but I do now
I want you should be happy.
It wasn't just you, Mom.
It was me.
I guess I was too busy.
I didn't realize...
She's a fine girl, Benny and she loves you.
Girls like Alice does not grow on trees.
Sure don't
It's too late now, I guess
Maybe. I don't know.
But this I do know
If you want her, you'll have to ask her
She's never going to ask you.
Long distance?
Yes please,
I want to speak please to a lady named...
Miss Alice Hammond, up there in Vermont.
Oh, her number? Yes, I've got it
Her father gave it to me.
'Soloist HarryJames.'
The next part seems to be historical
It's called 'Twenty Years of Jazz'.
'Smile, and the angels sing'
'and though it's just a gentle murmur'
'at the start'
'We kiss'
'And the angels sing'
'and leave their music'
'ringing in my heart'
Carnegie Hall, please.
This is something called 'Sing, Sing, Sing.'
'Palomar Ballroom'
Fourth row?
- On the aisle
Don't worry Alice.
He's going to ask you.
He's asking me now.
Repair and Synchronization by
Easy Subtitles Synchronizer 1.0.0.0
# It's...a...wonderful day So be happy and gay
# And you'll be too busy for sorrow
# And to keep it this way Make the most of today
# And worry about tomorrow tomorrow
# Do you mind if I quote Something some fella wrote?
# Common sense says Life will be greater
# If you just learn how To live for now
# Then worry about later later
# Comes that urge That impulse to frown
# Just turn it down, don't obey it
# Say, with a smile "It can wait for a while!"
# Sorry, I'll have to delay it and say
# It's a wonderful day Let's not fuss it away
# And all of this adds up To this resume
# Worry about tomorrow tomorrow
# Worry about later later
# Worry about another day Another day! #
- Good morning! 
- Hallelujah(!)
# A good, good morning to ya
# What's good about morning When you'd rather be in bed? Didn't sleep a wink, can't think
# Wish I were dead Rather be in bed
# That very dismal mood you're in
# Is very ineffective
# You need to pay heed To this terse little verse An earful of cheerful perspective
# It's a wonderful day So be happy and gay
# And you'll be too busy for sorrow
# Here's a hat on display We must close out today
# And worry about tomorrow tomorrow
# Zis tres chic chapeau It just has to go
# It's ideal for a reel-out of data
# So you must learn how To sell this now
# And worry about later later
# Comes that urge That impulse to frown
# Just turn it down, don't obey it
# Say, with a smile "It can wait for a while!"
# Sorry, I'll have to delay it and say
# It's a Lily Dache It would cost a week's pay!
# And all of this adds up To this resume
# Just worry about tomorrow tomorrow
# Then worry about later later
# And worry about another day Another day! #
BELL RINGS
SHOPPERS CHAT
- Well, Polly, another day, another dollar - to COIN a phrase! 
- Another thousand dollars, if I'm in luck!
- You've only been here two months - even old John Merlin doesn't expect you to sell this joint out! 
- Mary...
- Oh, I think Mr Hargraves is casing us. 
- Silly! Probably wondering how I sell out the place every day.
- Good morning! 
- May I remind you that John B Merlin & Son is now OPEN?!
- You don't need to! When you consider all the stuff I've unloaded... 
- We don't have STUFF at John B Merlin!
- And... 
- You don't unload. Yes, sir.
I'll be glad when the Christmas rush is over, won't you, Mr Hargraves?
- Oh, not me! If we had another week, I could sell... 
- I shall be very glad when it's over!
- Mainly on account of Miss Parish. 
- So I HAVE attracted your attention?
- You certainly have! 
- I knew you'd be impressed by my record! Excuse me, a pigeon...
Customer, I mean!
- Morning, JB. 
- Morning. In the 47th Street display window is a dummy, wearing a shirt and bow tie.
- Let's not have that. 
- But students... 
- Radicals, revolutionists! 
- Good morning, JB!
- I saw one of your floor workers, who is making his own suits at home! Correct that! 
- Yes, sir.
SANTA LAUGHS Merry Christmas!
HE CONTINUES TO LAUGH
LAUGHTER STOPS
- Too much padding. The kids like to sit on your lap and you stick out too far! 
- But, sir... 
- Yes?
- HE LAUGHS Merry Christmas! 
- Merry Christmas!
Mr Merlin is right - too much padding!
But it's all ME!
HE LAUGHS Merry Christmas, kiddies!
- Good morning. 
- Hello, Esther. Anything on YOUR minds? 
- No.
- There never is! 
- WE have a personnel matter in ladies' millinery, but it needn't concern you, JB!
- So settle it! 
- We will.
- Good morning! 
- Good morning. 
- From the weekly report, I see the new recreation periods are working out.
Efficiency is way-y up! And speaking of efficiency, Dad - you're late!
- Did you stay all night at a 52nd St jam session so you could say that?! 
- Dad, it's the East Side now!
- You can't keep going without sleep. 
- I do my work! 
- More than your share - that's what bothers me! 
- It's youth!
- Remember? 
- ..Almost!
You're not too unhappy here, son?
- Music doesn't mean more to you? 
- Mmm...no.
You know, back in the 1920s, my idea was to live in Paris and paint.
- And I did - then the store needed me, so here I am. 
- And here 
- I 
- am. Glad to be aboard.
Let's have no more sentimentality!
- Or music! 
- This is a business office!
- BUZZER Mr Merlin is wanted urgently in the employees' lounge. 
- Wait...
- This must be bad news. Let me go - I could handle it best. Sounds like top-drawer stuff! 
- Go and handle it!
Don't give the store away!
ALL: # Oh, oh, oh
# If you wanna talk about something
# You'll be making no blunder Taking no chance
# If you take a topic that comes under
# The category of romance
# That book way up on the list
# Is all about love It's all about love
# That tune you cannot resist
# Is all about love
# It's an elementary language Everybody knows
# Poetry or prose Everybody speaks it
# And you can call it happiness Call it misery
# Everybody seeks it
# In plays, the popular things
# Are all about love They're all about love
# In dreams, your craziest dreams Are all about love
# Let's face it You'll find that you're a fool
# If you look for something new How can you replace it?
# A heart is not a thing to build a wall about, a kiss is not a thing that you can stall about
# If you don't know it's a thing to have a ball about You know nothing at all about love
ALL: # You know It's all about love
# And you can take it from me, my friend, it's the common trend
# It's the end - it's love!
# Those things that Mother knows best
- # They're all about love 
- They're all about love
# Desires that can't be suppressed
# They're all about love
# Didn't Mother Nature give us Pretty greenery, pretty scenery
# As an inspiration?
# Love and marriage Are doing wonders for...
# Mom and POP-ulation!
- # That note that comes with the flowers is all about love 
- It's all about love
- # That phone that's tied up for hours is all about love... 
- Let's face it!
- # Romance is indispensable 
- Let's be sensible How can you replace it?
# A heart is not a thing to build a wall about, a kiss is not a thing that you can stall about
# If you don't know it's a thing to have a ball about You know nothing at all about love
# A heart is not a thing to build a wall about
# A kiss is not a thing that you can stall about
# If you don't know it's a thing to have a BRAWL about You know nothing at all about love
# A heart is not a thing to build a wall about, a kiss is not a thing that you can stall about
# If you don't know it's a thing to have a brawl about You know nothing...no, nothing
# You know nothing...at all about
# Love! #
JARRING NOTES
- Top-drawer stuff, eh(?) 
- Right! Don't tell JB - he doesn't like music!
- I'll be right back. 
- Good luck. 
- Thanks.
- Hey, gorgeous, what are you getting me for Christmas? 
- Freddie, you wouldn't drink it! 
- Why the hurry?
- Personnel sent for me. I think they realise what I do for the store. 
- This is business. I saw you dance.
- You were so with it! 
- Get to the business! 
- The Pink Slipper is having a dance contest tonight. 
- Mmm?
Rock'n'roll. The band leader is my friend AND a judge, so it's fixed!
- You still need a girl! 
- Second prize is 100 - we split it! 
- Freddie, I'm poor, but still proud - no, thanks!
But...!
Looking for employment, Miller? No, I... Oh, excuse me, sir!
Mr Creely, the young lady from millinery is here, Miss... Parish.
I associate ideas to remember names. "Parish" makes me think of church. Send her in.
Come in, miss.
- Sit down, Miss Church. 
- Thank you. But it's "Parish".
- Polly Parish. 
- Yes, Parish. You are apparently a conscientious worker, so I wanted to talk to you...personally.
Well, I was sure you would... sooner or later.
Oh, were you?
HE CLEARS THROAT Mr Hargraves is fascinated by your efforts, Miss Ch...Parish.
- He's such a good man, Mr Hargraves. 
- I'm glad you think so!
Unfortunately, he doesn't share the same high opinion of YOU.
- I beg your pardon? 
- In fact, he wants to fire you.
- So do I. 
- He...
- You what? 
- As of tonight. You will receive the usual severance pay.
You may come to the employees' Christmas party, of course!
- I don't understand. I sell more than anybody in my department! 
- You oversell more than anyone!
- Oh... 
- You're just not JB Merlin & Son material. Yesterday, you sold 23 hats.
Today, 25 came back!
- Two were from the day before!
We can't tolerate young salespeople with buck fever,
- who have no idea of the book-keeping expense and bad customer relations you put us to! 
- But... 
- That is all!
Yes, sir.
Oh... and a very merry Christmas to you, Miss Church.
The same to you.
What's the matter, gorgeous?
- Are, um... Are you sure we can win that money tonight? 
- Baby, it's a lead-pipe cinch!
- Then I'll go. 
- Great, I'll pick you up at 7.00 on the dot. 
- OK.
Uh...AFTER dinner.
- Oh, Freddie...! 
- Honey, this is real glamorous - it's like money in the bank! I'm glad you're so...so... happy?!
Oh, Freddie!
Are we working you too hard, Miller(?) No, I... No, sir!
Sorry, sorry. Those stupid salesmen - you can't get a hold of them!
Oh, out to lunch. Figures.
Inorganic ph... Can't even SAY that one!
Draftsman, automation expert, construc... Construction engineer?!
BABY CRIES
Oh...
Hello!
- Won't you come in? 
- Oh...
Yes! ..There we are...
Right in here, Miss, uh...?
Take your finger out of my mouth.
- Your name, please? 
- Hmm? Polly Parish.
- Are you employed? 
- Hmm? JB Merlin.
Until tonight, that is. I just lost my job. ..He's so cute...
Oh...it isn't MY baby.
It was on the doorstep outside! I...
No, really! You see, there it was, about to roll off the top step, and I just ran over, and...
We're here to help you, my dear. We're your friends!
..Look, it isn't mine!
I wish it were!
Let me tell you again, so you get this straight.
I was outside the employment agency and I turned and saw this bundle on your steps. A baby, I thought.
So I ran over and scooped it up so that I could...
Well...
Honest injun!
Many mothers tell us the babies are not their own but, from experience, we know it's wise to admit the truth.
I...
Oh, now, look here!
Well, this is ridiculous!
BABY CRIES
LOUD CRIES
HE GURGLES
Well...!
Oh!
BABY CRIES
For heaven's sake...
I...
Oh... Oh, no, you don't!
When I want a family, I'll get married and do it right! Oh, no! It's YOUR baby, not MY baby!
BABY CRIES
It's pathetic! The mothers come to us so young these days!
Ah, well, we know that she'll be at Merlin's until tonight.
And we know that the Merlins are a charitable family...don't we?
Go right in, Mr Appleby.
JAZZY MUSIC PLAYS
HE CLEARS THROAT
Yes?
- YOU'RE Mr Merlin? 
- That's right. 
- I thought you'd be older!
- I will be - it just takes time! What can I do for you, Mr...? 
- Appleby.
I'm from the Atkins Foundling Home.
- Yes? 
- An employee of yours, a young lady, left a baby with us today. 
- Yes?
I checked with your Mr Creely, and she's been discharged! I believe that's why she's abandoned her baby!
- Mr Merlin, give her back her job. 
- It's not my department! 
- Mr Merlin...
If you saw this mother, denying the parenthood of her own child... it would have touched your heart.
- It was pitiful! 
- Suppose you sit down and we discuss it calmly? 
- Thank you.
Get me Mr Hargraves, please.
Off you go, Miss Parish - to Mr Dan Merlin himself this time!
- You mean he's seen the light - he wants to apologise? 
- What he does is top secret!
At ease, Mr Hargraves!
What now - Merlin Junior says a few last words over the body?!
Here is Miss Parish, Mr Merlin.
Uh...sit down...MISS Parish?
Yes, sir. I'm Miss Parish, Mr Merlin.
- I believe you were discharged today, Miss Parish. 
- Yes, sir. Of all the ingratitude I've ever heard of...!
- After the way I've worked... 
- We want you back.
The loyalty I've...
- You... You...you want me back, you say? 
- That's what I said.
Well, that's more like it!
- Miss Parish, don't you think you ought to thank Mr Merlin? 
- Oh...thank you, Mr Merlin. 
- You're welcome.
We thought you were trying too hard, overselling. Now we know the reason.
Well...I was sure SOMEBODY would understand!
By the way, we're raising your salary 10 a week, as of a week ago.
Well, thank you!
But getting your job back and a raise is not your REAL Xmas present.
N-No?
No, your Christmas present is the greatest gift a woman could have. It's coming to you at home tonight.
Perhaps you ought to thank Mr Merlin again?
Oh...thanks again! It was enough giving me my job back, Mr Merlin.
- I want you to know I forgive the store and I never hold a grudge! 
- That's very big of you.
- Goodbye. 
- Oh, goodbye, sir. Goodbye, Mr...?
Merely think of me as your guardian angel!
Well, goodbye, Santa Claus!
- BUZZ 
- Who is it?
Something from John B Merlin & Son!
Merry Christmas!
Holiday greetings from John B Merlin & Son and the Atkins Foundling Home. Oh...
Don't thank us. We've only done our duty.
- Just keep doing your duty! You take that baby right out of here! 
- But...!
Oh...you're sick!
Shame on you!
- Do you realise what you're saying? 
- Yes, I do - that's not my baby!
- Do you realise Mr Merlin has given you your job back... 
- Yes. 
- ..so that you can raise your child in comfort?
You want it to be raised as an orphan?
Oh, now, that's not my baby - I am not its mother!
- Mrs Wilkins...come! 
- Now, you take that baby, or it'll be back at the foundling home before you get there!
I wouldn't try that, if I were you, and I wouldn't leave it elsewhere, because it'll come back to us... and...we have its footprints!
Footprints?!
I'm not going to inform Mr Merlin of your attitude.
Gee-ee!
BABY GURGLES
Now, listen, uh...baby... It's nothing personal, I...
I'd love to have you around, but...
Take your finger out of your mouth - you want crooked teeth?
I really couldn't do right by you... No...
You see...I'm alone, too!
..That's a cute nose!
- Who is it? 
- The Arthur Murray of the stock department - Frisky Freddie!
Oh, my!
Oh, uh... Just a minute, Freddie!
Uh... Wait just a second!
There. Now, no biting. Be quiet, baby! That's good.
- LOUD SCREAM 
- Oh...!
That's all I need! ..Just a minute! ..There.
That's it, baby. Now, be quiet, baby. Shh!
Please, quiet, huh, baby? Quiet!
Oh...!
- Oh, uh...hello. Freddie, I can't... 
- What's new and exciting, gorgeous - besides me, I mean?
- Well, uh, Freddie, I... 
- Hey! Nice joint you've got here!
Freddie, I can't go out tonight...
- What do you mean? 
- Well, I... I think I'm gonna have a headache!
- Are you kidding? I borrowed my brother's heap so we'd go in style! 
- Gee, I'm sorry. 
- Sorry?! 
- Well...
Something's...come up!
Ah, don't be nervous - it's in the bag! Do you hate money?! The band leader's a pal!
BABY CRIES
I just spoke to him on the phone.
BABY CRIES
- Funny, I thought I heard a baby crying! 
- H-Here?
Where was I? Oh, yeah, I checked with my pal again, and we can't lose!
BABY CRIES
- You talked to him, huh? What did he say? 
- He says it's in the bag! 
- Great!
I DO hear a baby crying!
Oh...THAT?
Next door. Keeps me awake.
- Sometimes I think I'll go out of my mind! 
- That's tough.
Polly, this is not dishonest. It's just fixed!
You don't think a guy like me would do anything crooked? I'm...
BABY LAUGHS
What did it do - crawl through the wall?!
You mean you didn't see the stork flying through(?)
Oh...!
Come on, baby. Upsy-daisy.
- Is it yours? 
- No, it isn't mine. 
- Then where did it come from?
- I got it for Christmas(!) 
- This Christmas or last?!
Freddie, question and answer period is over.
- I'm not going out tonight and that's that! 
- It sure is!
- I got my troubles. 
- You sure have!
Well, I can't win the contest without you, so I'll stay! I'm a family man!
- Goodnight, Freddie. 
- Hey, wait a minute! Wait a minute!
- I just meant a nice, quiet evening in with the kiddies! That's not so bad! 
- Goodnight, Freddie! 
- I just...
Hey, I just thought... Old Man Merlin is on TV about now!
Getting an award - for penny-pinching in the retail business, probably!
- Good evening, ladies and gentlemen. - Good evening!
ANNOUNCER: Tonight, we meet two generations of a great family - the Merlins.
- Big deal(!) - May I present Mr John B Merlin and his son Dan Merlin, in the library of their delightful home at 236 East 63rd Street, New York City.
- ANNOUNCER: Good evening, gentlemen. 
- Good evening, Bill. 
- Oh, hi, Mr Rand.
- JB, I'll bet you have some interesting... 
- Yes. 
- Oh, I'll bet(!)
- Let me first say that the magic word for success in merchandising is decentralisation. 
- Absolutely, JB(!)
- We're going out after all. 
- Yeah.
See you in the morning, JB!
You're not taking that along?!
- Only part-way - come on! 
- You can't...
You can't take the baby - it's fixed!
Our success formula is alert merchandising - to put stores where it is easy to shop.
- A merchandising man who can't accept the impact of modern living is a dinosaur! 
- Thank you.
- Suburban life and the automobile have changed... 
- Yes, we all agree, JB.
But now the younger generation. Dan, what...?
- I... 
- Dan is first and foremost a real merchandising executive! 
- I certainly agree with that, but...
- let's make it personal. 
- I go along... 
- I know you like to sing, Dan, so why not give our audience a sample? 
- OK!
- Keep your eye on the camera with the red light. 
- What? 
- The camera with the red light.
Dan, have you any special romantic interest you can tell us about? Any one girl?
Oh, I dunno...
HE STARTS PLAYING
Although the love of my life and I have never met, I guess as yet...
# It wasn't meant to be
# I'm sure Father Time Hand in hand with destiny
# Is bound to get around to me
# From what I say, you can gather
# I face the future rather
# Optimistically
# Someday soon
# On a strange and magic street
# We will meet, my love, yes
# You will come along
# All the joys That were ever denied me
# All at once Will be walking beside me
# Somehow, someday soon
# My sad heart will change its tune
# From a blue lament Into a beautiful song
# Until then, I'll keep waiting
# Waiting, waiting, waiting
# Patiently
# Deep inside, this longing grows
# So, as the old expression goes
# Someday soon
# Can't come too soon
# For me
# Deep inside, this longing grows
# So, as the old expression goes
# Someday soon
# Can't come too soon
# For me. #
That was beautiful, Dan. And someone else is waiting patiently, so we'd better get back to your father.
This won't take any time at all!
Goodbye, baby. You most certainly are cute.
- I'd like to see Mr Merlin. 
- Shh! 
- The young one.
Would you tell me, madam, in reference to what?
I can't take care of this baby - it's his responsibility!
- < But... 
- He got me into this, so he must get me out!
- My dear madam, the only way you could see Mr Merlin is on your television set. 
- Oh, no, you don't!
< Madam, you cannot leave it there!
That baby is as much Mr Merlin's as mine! Goodbye, baby!
- Madam, I cannot accept... 
- Come on, let's go!
- Yeah, let's go - here! 
- All right.
Oh...!
- Oh, the keys! 
- Freddie, in the car, the car! 
- Oh, they're in the car!
ENGINE SPLUTTERS
Oh...!
And now, Mr John B Merlin, on behalf of the National Retail Merchandisers...
THEY MOUTH
- ..to present you with... A baby! 
- Nonsense!
- Are you out of your mind, Adams? 
- No, sir. 
- Well, why...? 
- A young lady left this for you, sir. 
- For me? 
- Yes.
- I said we were not receiving guests, but... 
- Where is she? 
- She left. 
- Left?! Come on!
There she goes! We can catch them!
There they are, sir - at the corner!
- Great(!) You thought you would have a headache and I got one! 
- Where are you going? 
- To drop you off!
Oh, no, you don't. You promised me some prize money and I'll need it!
- You think I'm mad, dancing with a friend of the boss? 
- Don't be silly! I got that baby by mistake,
- and young Merlin is the only one who can straighten it out! 
- Look, I don't wanna be SEEN with anyone he knows!
Well, you can take a chance he won't be dancing at The Pink Slipper!
That's right!
Oh...
- The young lady is a perfect stranger to me, sir. 
- Not to ME, she isn't!
JAZZY DANCE MUSIC
That's their car. They're inside.
Here you are, sir.
Nobody gets in without a ticket, buster! How many?
- Three! 
- That'll be 3.
Here's your change!
DANCE MUSIC CONTINUES
- How do you find anybody? 
- What colour dress is your wife wearing? We'll help! 
- I haven't got a wife!
Well, don't try and influence us judges with that baby! You dance with a dame, no babies!
BABY LAUGHS
That's her!
- Take this. 
- Again?
- Would you like to enter this contest with me? 
- This is very sudden... Let's go, handsome!
Give it all you've got, baby, but warm up slow - I've already been sick!
He's a troublemaker - keep an eye on him!
Lyle, take the gate!
Sorry, pal - come back again soon(!)
I must be crazy - I thought I saw young Merlin!
You didn't see Old Man Merlin too?!
Sister, off the floor!
I said you were through! Come on, out!
Oh...! Gee, I'm sorry!
- This is the worst night of my life. 
- Why, you...!
- Take your hands off me! 
- I knew this guy was gonna be trouble!
Coming right up, mac!
- Your baby, sir. 
- Thanks, Adams(!)
- Hey, bud, we're going inside. If you describe your wife, we'd be happy to... 
- Oh, shut up! 
- Excuse me(!)
- Ah... You said it was in the bag! 
- How did I know we'd be so good we'd win...
- first prize? 
- Oh...
- Goodnight, Freddie. 
- Goodnight!
- Goodnight, Freddie! 
- Mm-hm...
- Well, goodnight, Freddie. 
- How about having a drink together, gorgeous?
- I haven't any liquor. 
- You got water! 
- They...turned it off!
- You're not going to stand here and let a man die of thirst? 
- Well... 
- Water!
- Water! 
- Shh!
- Shh! 
- Hello, M-M-M-M...
- Shh! 
- I'm sorry, I was dying of thirst and Polly wanted a drink! 
- I...? 
- I didn't...
No, you're right. Goodnight, boss!
Shh!
- Mr Merlin, may I ask...? 
- Shh! 
- (May I ask what you're doing in my...?)
THE... The landlady was kind enough to let me - us - in out of the cold!
We've been here for two hours - crying all the time!
- Well, I'm sorry. 
- You should be. 
- Listen... 
- YOU listen... Come here.
You are going to listen to me. Your conduct is the worst I've ever seen.
- Would it interest you to know I'm not the mother? 
- Denying your own child - that's low!
- All right - are you through? 
- No.
No, I have just one small thing to add.
You're fired! And when you look for another job, don't give us as a reference, because if you do...
I'll explain your charming character to them personally!
- Why, that's...that's persecution! 
- Call it whatever you want!
- HE CLEARS THROAT 
- Miss Parish?
Have you decided to ask for your job back?
Or will you let that baby starve?
Hmm?
BABY GURGLES
- I'd like my job back, Mr Merlin. 
- Well, that's better!
Miss Parish, I want you to know I'm only doing this for your own good.
I'm...not as bad as you think.
Isn't there some legal way to make the father support the baby?
- I don't want to have anything to do with him. 
- You don't?
He used to beat me!
- He didn't?! 
- He did.
See that?
Coffee pot!
- Why, that...! 
- Ah...
Don't you worry about a thing. The store is behind you...and the baby.
- Oh, Mr Merlin... The baby didn't do THAT to you! 
- Oh...no.
You see, uh...I went dancing, too.
- Goodnight. 
- Oh, goodnight!
- Thank you. Goodnight! 
- Goodnight.
Gee-ee!
Well, thanks for the job, anyway. Listen, we'd better get undressed.
KNOCK ON DOOR
Oh, my.
BABY GURGLES
- I wanna talk to you. 
- I was just going to bed. 
- About the baby. 
- The baby...
You see, I was fired from my job today, and... You won't believe it.
Then I got my job back, but the reason... Oh, you won't go for it!
Then I lost my job, and... The baby came, he was delivered...
Oh, it's just getting worse!
Mrs Dugan, what am I going to do?
Oh, uh...
Well...
- you got to take care of your little baby. 
- Oh, Mrs Dugan!
Oh... Oh! Mrs Dugan!
- Mrs Dugan, that's not my little baby! 
- He looks just like you!
Hey, you're a cutie! Your mother and me are going to have a lot of fun taking care of you!
- You seem kinda damp. Seems kinda damp! 
- Damp?
- Oh... 
- What's its name?
Joan!
JOHN? That's a nice name!
Polly. Psst!
- Oh... 
- How about putting in a good word for me - to you-know-who?
- Don't talk so loud - you'll wake me. 
- Polly, the assistant floor-walker's job is open in this section!
A word from you to you-know-who and I could stop pushing this stupid truck.
Miller? Get that truck out of the aisle. Yes, sir!
That's it, Miss Parish. Don't try too hard. Don't oversell.
Oh...
- Crowded today, Dan. 
- Oh, pardon me for a moment.
How are you?
Mmm...I...
I can hear you all right, but I can't see you.
Haven't been asleep for two nights.
Other people have babies. They manage.
- But I got mine so suddenly! 
- The world is full of surprises.
- Oh, Dan? 
- Yes? 
- Mother and child doing well, I take it? 
- As well as can be expected.
- Good morning, Mr Dan! 
- Good morning. 
- How is our little mother?
Beat, Mr Hargraves. Very beat.
Hargraves. Yes?
Aren't you short an assistant floor-walker here? Yes.
On a seniority basis, Fred Miller is entitled to the promotion.
He's an idiot, but he's been here a long time! Inform the idiot of his good luck.
But...
Miller! Yes, sir? I've been watching your work.
It's...adequate. Thank you, sir.
Tomorrow, report to me in a blue suit and take a carnation. You follow? Yes, sir! Thank you, sir!
A SMALL carnation. Yes, sir!
Go-o-orgeous! That's what I call service!
What...?
KNOCK ON DOOR
One more bite. Hup, hup, here we go. ..In!
R-R-R-Rup!
Isn't that the most disgusting stuff you've ever tasted? Nobody can cook it like me!
- KNOCK ON DOOR 
- Come in!
- Good evening! 
- Hi!
Come on in.
I was walking through the book department and saw this.
"How To Bring Up Your Baby Scientifically" by Dr Ernest Egelman. I couldn't put it down!
I'll probably be too busy taking care of the baby to read it!
W-Want to sit down?
OK, let's have a big one.
- Come on, a big one. 
- How do you know you're doing that right?
Uh...
Well, baby opens his mouth, I put the food in and he swallows it!
From there on, he's on his own.
- Come on, now. 
- Here we are - "Feeding", with a capital F!
That figures!
There you go.
"Now, after the food is prepared,
"the mother will - A - get a spoon..."
Could THIS be one(?) Hmm!
"B - take a spoonful of food and...
"..place on a piece of gauze."
- What? 
- Place on a piece of gauze!
What for?
Miss Parish... will you please do as the book says?
- A doctor with 20 years' experience should know what he's talking about - believe me! 
- Oh...
Well...
Oh...
Next?
"And gently rub into the navel."
"And gently rub into the...
"navel"!
Oh, this is ridiculous!
Miss Parish, you see, it's probably to adjust the temperature of the baby's stomach to the food!
I think it's very logical!
Well...
Well, I'll see...
Oh, I never heard of such a thing!
- This book... 
- Let me see that book! 
- I read very well - I've done it for years! 
- I read too, Mr Merlin!
"Take a spoonful of food and...place on a piece of gauze and gently rub into the navel"!
THAT is exactly what I said!
Well, I am not rubbing any food into this baby's navel!
SHE CLEARS THROAT
"To relieve gas on a child's stomach,
"take a spoonful of warm oil and...
"place on a piece of gauze and gently rub into the navel"!
- A few Christmas presents from John B Merlin & Son. 
- Thank you, John B Merlin & Son!
- I'll put them under the tree. 
- Come on, I'll put you to sleep. Come on.
- Oh! 
- Excuse me. 
- Pardon me.
# Hush-a-bye
# Rock-a-bye
# Listen to my lullaby in blue
# Blue-lue-lue-lue Lue-lue-lue-lue-lue-lue-lue. #
- Psst! Psst! 
- # How I love my pretty baby
# Sweet and precious pretty baby
# How I love my pretty baby
# Honest to goodness, I do
# See, here
# Sandman's a-coming And he'll be here... #
- BUZZING 
- # Mighty, mighty soon
# And if you don't cry... #
- BUZZING 
- # He'll be dropping by With the great big lollipop moon
- # Dream, dream, dream 
- How I love my pretty baby
- # Be an angel 
- Sweet and precious pretty baby... #
- BUZZING 
- # Be a darling, I love my baby 
- How I love my pretty baby
BOTH: # Honest to goodness, I do
# Honest to goodness, I do
# Blue-lue-lue-lue-lue-lue-lue-lue Lue-lue-lue. #
# How I love my pretty baby
# Sweet and precious pretty baby
# How I love my pretty baby
# Honest to goodness, I do
# See, here
# Sandman's a-coming and he'll...
# Be here mighty, mighty soon
- # And if you don't CRY... # 
- Shh!
# He'll be dropping by With the great big lollipop moon
- # Dream, dream, dream, be an angel 
- How I love my pretty baby
- # Dream, dream, dream, be a darling 
- Sweet and precious pretty baby
- # I love my pretty baby 
- How I love my pretty baby
BOTH: # Honest to goodness, I do
# Honest to goodness, I do
# Blue-lue-lue-lue-lue-lue-lue-lue Lue-lue-lue. #
- Can I fix you a coffee? 
- No, thanks. I have some unfinished business - a board of directors' meeting. 
- Oh.
Oh, I forgot... Give this to the baby.
- BUZZING 
- OH! Goodnight! 
- Oh!
- BABY CRIES 
- Shh!
# Oh, he wouldn't stay for coffee
# And I'm just a little bit upset
# I wonder if "the board of directors"
# Is a blonde, a redhead or brunette! #
Looking for employment, Breckenridge? No, sir.
No, SIR! It's not going to pull you - you have to push it! Go, boy! Go!
Yes, sir!
Break it up, Mary. Sure, JB(!)
Polly, can I talk to you alone? No.
I'm talking to Polly!
Listen, I'm going to a costume party. You come as what you OUGHT to be.
- Will you take a rock and crawl out from under it? - Keep out of this!
Do you want to come and kick up your heels? Speaking of heels...
I told you to keep out of this!
- How about it, baby? You'd be going first-class, it's all free! 
- Talk to my lawyer! ..Lawyer?
Have you thought of dropping dead? We would step over you.
- I ought to report you. 
- Report us both! 
- Oh...!
Uh-uh... Think I'm crazy?
- I 
- think he's crazy! And you, Miss Hawkins?
I never give any thoughts to the peasants, Miss Parish.
- Louise King, please. This is Mr Merlin. 
- 'Hello?' 
- Hi, Louise?
- 'I'm sorry, but...' 
- What have I done now?
Nothing, dear. Absolutely nothing. But are you under the impression that we have a date tonight?!
Yes, uh...I'm afraid I am!
Well, the last thing you said to me, ten days ago, was that you'd call!
- I should apologise...the usual rush at the store... 
- I'm very sorry(!)
You'll just have to go stag tonight!
- Well, thanks anyway, Louise. I'll find someone. 
- Oh, of course, darling(!)
It's New Year's Eve. And it's after 8.00!
Happy New Year(!)
PHONE SLAMS DOWN
- Oh, Polly, I hate to leave you alone like this. 
- I'm not alone... No...
- I sort of hoped, uh... 
- What?
- That Dan might give you a buzz. 
- On New Year's Eve?
Imagine where he's going - and all the girls who'd like to go with him.
- Polly, why not tell him the truth about Johnny? 
- Much too complicated!
Besides, he'd never believe me.
- You know, it's funny... 
- Hmm? 
- Well, at first I was afraid they wouldn't take Johnny back.
Now I'm afraid they might!
- You're really serious about keeping Johnny, aren't you? 
- He looks like me.
Come on, you'll be late for the party.
- You're wasting valuable time. 
- Oh, they'll wait!
Well...
Happy New Year...to the Parishes.
The same to you...from us!
- Aw-w... Bye. 
- Bye.
Now, then. It'll soon be New Year's and we'll open a warm bottle of milk! ..Champagne, I mean!
Come on! You got to get in the mood! Come on, now.
Here's a hat for baby! And a hat for Polly!
There!
That's the spirit!
Come on... Ready?
TOOT
Ooh!
Whee-ee!
That's my fella! That's my boy.
# How I love my pretty baby
# I love every little thing you do
# And every time that you make patty cake
# My heart makes a patty cake too. #
- KNOCK ON DOOR 
- Oh...
Mary must have forgotten something. Yeah! She did.
- Cinderella? 
- Oh, Mr Merlin! 
- I'm in a great hurry, and so are you!
- We're going to a party! Miss Parish, you're not dressed yet! 
- Stood up?
- What? 
- You were stood up!
- I told her I'd phone and I forgot to. Get your coat! 
- Oh, I can't go! Johnny! 
- Don't worry. Mrs Dugan?
- Mrs Dugan will baby-sit. 
- I can take my "date" downstairs. 
- Get your coat! 
- All right!
- Oh, no... 
- No?!
- I haven't any clothes! 
- I thought of that too! Get your coat! 
- All right!
HE WHISTLES "Lullaby In Blue"
- All right. Goodnight, Johnny! 
- Happy New Year! 
- Happy New Year! 
- Yeah...
Happy New Year! Come on, boy.
Wait right here.
Mr Merlin?
Dan? M-Merlin?
ROMANTIC MUSIC
HE WHISTLES
HE WOLF-WHISTLES
DANCE-BAND MUSIC
Oh, you can sure hear those wolves howling on these cold winter nights!
Sit down, gentlemen! No point to my introducing this young lady.
Her father is a Swedish manufacturer and she doesn't speak any English!
HE SPEAKS MOCK-SWEDISH
SHE SPEAKS MOCK-SWEDISH
Dan, where did YOU learn Swedish?
I spent two weeks in Sweden...last year. It's a very simple language.
HE SPEAKS MOCK-SWEDISH
Sven!
She just said the funniest thing!
She's a very witty girl!
Dan, how do you say "dance" in Swedish?
- Uh..."rovo". 
- Ja? 
- Rovo, mademoiselle?
Smorgas! Sven!
TANGO MUSIC
RUMBA MUSIC
MUSIC STOPS
Can you say "thanks" in Swedish, Dan?
BOTH SPEAK MOCK-SWEDISH
Oh...
How do you say "I'm hungry" in Swedish?
Uh..."Samsa DANCING!"
- Let's get out of here and I'll get you something to eat! 
- Let's go!
- You're not going, are you? 
- Sorry, we have another stop to make.
Uh...Jor-na "Happy New Year"!
Oh...
Oppy New Ye-e-ear!
Oppy New Ye-e-ear!
ALL: Oppy New Year!
Ah, ja!
I don't blame him for wanting to go, the way you fellas monopolised her!
- Leaving so soon? 
- We promised to drop in on some other people.
- Tell me, Louise, how did I do? 
- Not bad for a fill-in!
Personally, I'd rather go stag!
You could, with that short haircut!
DAN GIGGLES
Oppy New Ye-e-ear!
JAZZY MUSIC
- Little ahead of time, aren't they? 
- Doesn't matter what year it is - that goes on all the time!
CLOCK CHIMES
ALL: # Should auld acquaintance be forgot
# And never brought to mind?
# Should auld acquaintance be forgot
# And days of auld lang syne?
# For auld lang syne, my dear
# For auld lang syne
# We'll take a cup o' kindness yet
# For auld lang syne
# Should auld acquaintance be forgot And never brought to mind...? #
HOOTERS DROWN OUT SPEECH
# ..For the sake of auld lang syne
# For auld lang syne, my dear For auld lang syne
# We'll take a cup o' kindness yet
# For auld lang syne. #
Oh...
- Oh, all I want to do is sit down! 
- Where were you? I tried to find you.
- I tried to find you too, and I took the subway home. 
- It doesn't take that long to come downtown!
It does when you forget to put money in your 90 purse!
Oh...!
Oh, my feet will need retreading, and I'm hoarse from saying "Happy New Year" to all the drunks!
- I'm sorry. 
- Oh... but I had a wonderful time, Dan.
The best night of my life.
So did I, Polly.
Except I didn't dance one dance or get a single New Year's kiss!
Special rule No 4 - "Any employee fraternising with an executive is subject to instant dismissal.
"Signed, John B Merlin."
Miss Parish... you're fired.
Mr Merlin!
You're...rehired.
On second thought...you're fired!
I think I'd better have my...job back...right away!
You're hired!
I...I feel kind of strange!
You know something?
I feel the same way!
# I never felt
# This way before
# I never dreamed
# That this would happen
# A warm caress
# From more or less a stranger
# And oh, so suddenly
# You mean oh, so much to me
# I never felt
# I could melt this way before
# Or that a kiss
# Could take my heart for granted
# Night after night
# I've waited and I've wondered Darling, where you are
# And there you are
# What a breathless love affair you are
# I may not know how real Or how unreal
# This may be
# I only know I never felt this way
# Before. #
Goodnight.
- Goodnight. 
- And "Smorgas", for the start of a perfect new year.
Smorgas to you!
Well... goodnight!
Goodnight.
HE SIGHS
# I never felt
# I could melt this way before
# Or that a kiss
# Could take my heart for granted
# Night after night
# I've waited and I've wondered Darling, where you are
# And there you are
# What a breathless love affair you are
# I may not know how real Or how unreal
# This may be
# I only know
# I never felt this way... #
Oh, I'm...
Happy New Year! No...
Smorgas?
Watch our property!
This head is worth more than yours is!
Don't just stand here - back to...
You lost your head! Right, stupid, clean it up!
Hold your breath!
I've said it before and I'll say it again - he is an idiot!
Remember, he is YOUR idiot!
Hiya, gorgeous, did you miss a ball on New Year's Eve!
- A miss is as good as a mile, they say! 
- Agh!
- That's OK, honey - no hard feelings! I still go for the domestic type! I thought this weekend... 
- Freddie...
You have the lowest mind and the highest hopes. And if you don't stop bothering me, I'll report you.
- Hey, now, wait a minute! 
- Uh-oh, Dan Merlin! 
- The number one boy, eh?
We don't want to lose our connections!
- How's the baby? 
- Fine, thank you! He sleeps on his stomach all the time. 
- And you?
- Well, not on my stomach...but all the time! 
- In that case, would you like to go for a drive on Sunday?
I'd love to, but your car may be a little cool for the baby.
Yes, I...I suppose it would.
- I'll be in the park Sunday - with all the other mothers. 
- Oh...
I'll try to get over.
Well... Oh...
- Creely, do you have a personnel problem? 
- Yes, young Miller.
His carnation has gone to his head!
- If it's OK, I'll put him back in stock. 
- That's up to Mr Hargraves. He's head of the flower brigade!
Take the controls, Hargraves. Yes, sir!
Good morning, Mr Hargraves! I trust young Dan didn't have anything troublesome on his mind?
Do you follow me?
Miller, we've decided you're an idio...you're inadequate. Report back to the stockroom!
But...
I see you got your flower picked. Put this away until summer, BOY! They can't do this!
I know where the body's buried! So crawl in with it! Grr-r!
I'll talk to Mr Creely.
"Mr John...B..."
HUSKY VOICE: This is for JB Merlin, personally.
Very good, sir. Will you wait for a reply? Wait? Reply? No! No!
- Letter for you, sir. 
- Where's Mr Dan? 
- He went for a walk in the park, sir.
"This is to let you know that you're a grandfather."
"This is to let you know that you're a grandfather." Grandfather?! No-o!
"If you don't believe me, ask your son and a girl whose name I shan't mention! Yours truly, a friend."
Grandfather!
GRANDfather!
Oh... ADAMS!
- ADAMS! 
- Sir? 
- What park? 
- I'm sorry? 
- What park did Mr Dan go to?
- One downtown, sir. 
- Downtown is full of parks! 
- Yes, sir. 
- Get my hat! 
- Yes.
Coat! Tie! Vest! Shirt! Overcoat! Scarf!
- There we go! 
- Hi! 
- Oh, hello, Dan! 
- Morning, Johnny!
- HE GURGLES 
- What does that mean? 
- Good morning!
Oh...I beg your pardon, John.
Well, thank you!
Oh...the news of my raise came through yesterday. Do I deserve two in a row? How can I ever thank you?
Answer number one - yes.
- Answer number two - you needn't try. I had selfish reasons for giving you more pay. 
- Nothing personal, I hope?
- Well, sort of. Old John Parish here is involved. 
- I don't understand.
Now you can afford a part-time nurse. Hire Mrs Dugan.
- Johnny won't be on your hands so much. 
- But I want him on my hands!
- You seem to have come a long way for a girl who wouldn't admit he was yours. 
- Well, I...
He looks like me!
Doesn't he look like the coffee pot thrower?!
Yes, I... I suppose he looks like him.
- Maybe that'll bring him back. He may want... 
- No, he won't.
- That baby's mine, Dan, and he'll stay mine. 
- Yours and the coffee pot thrower's!
We'd better stop this discussion. I'm not experienced enough to take care of TWO babies!
- Well... Nice, bright day! Perfect day for the park! 
- Mr Merlin! 
- Dad!
- Polly, this is my father. 
- How do you do? 
- How do you do? And who is this?
This is Miss Parish's little boy.
A boy!
Would you mind - if I were careful - would you let me hold him, just a minute?
Of course, Mr Merlin.
MR MERLIN CHUCKLES
BABY GURGLES
I know that chin!
- What's his name? 
- Uh...
John!
Thanks for that, anyway.
Is there something I can do for you, sir?
Oh, you've done it!
- I wouldn't keep John out much longer. It's chilly. 
- Dad? You're acting strangely.
- What's the matter? 
- I will discuss this with you at home.
Good day, uh...MISS Parish.
Oh, no! Excuse me!
Dad!
Dad! Wait a minute! Wait! Wait!
Oh-h-h!
Oh, Johnny!
You trap everybody!
- Look here...! 
- Now...!
- Morning, sir. 
- Good morning, Adams.
BOTH TOGETHER: Now...!
- I 
- do the talking. 20 years I've been waiting. What for? A grandson!
But, Dad...
Oh, excuse me, sir.
- Dad... 
- My grandson needs a decent home! Respectable married parents! 
- Listen... 
- Not until you're honest!
Just listen...
Oh...excuse me, sir.
- Now... 
- Dan, you're going to marry that girl and bring my grandson into this house! 
- You haven't any grandson!
- Can't you understand? 
- Do you think I'm in my dotage?! I saw the baby, the girl and you!
And I have other information - a letter! I'd know that baby anywhere. He looks exactly like me!
I don't know if you need a psychiatrist - you may - but you certainly need glasses!
Oh, do I? Let me tell you what I'm going to do, with or without glasses.
I'm going to have my grandchild, in spite of you or his mother! Even if I have to go to the Supreme Court!
- You are the stubbornest man I ever saw! 
- Don't you dare leave without my permission!
Haven't we any spoons in this house?!
Oh... Excuse me, sir.
KNOCK ON DOOR
- Hi! 
- Hi.
Oh...
Don't laugh - the joke may be on you!
- What? 
- My father wants the baby. He's probably sending for lawyers. 
- He can't! Johnny belongs to me!
- Then dig up that coffee pot thrower to testify... 
- I... I can't.
You must take me to see your father!
You don't understand. He's gone off the reservation and he's doing war whoops! ..He wanted me to marry you.
He wanted to set up a ready-made family just so he'd have a grandson.
He's gone crazy!
Well... he must be... if he thought I'D marry you!
- Oh, Polly...I didn't mean it that way! 
- Please go!
- I didn't realise how that sounded! 
- The baby's taking... Please go!
- Polly... 
- Please!
Mrs Dugan, I'm in terrible trouble!
- I think I'll have to leave town. He's getting lawyers. He's going to take Johnny! 
- Who, young Mr Merlin?
No, old Mr Merlin. He thinks Johnny's his grandson!
- Ain't he? 
- No!
You see, that day on my lunch hour, I just happened to be going...
Oh, I wish I could explain, Mrs Dugan, but I...
- Oh... 
- That's Mike, my sister's son, down from Harvard for the weekend.
Miss Parish is the one with Johnny. ..Harvard - they all look that way!
- Hi. 
- Hi! 
- He'll send someone to ask me questions and I won't be able to answer them!
Miss Parish, this situation suggests that if your infant had a father, there would be no need for concern!
- They generally do, you know. 
- I kn...
Yes...that's right!
Yeah... we just need an old man for Johnny!
No, I'm too young and innocent! Hey, Daddy, where's the cigars? What cigars?!
HE WHISTLES
- Miller! I want to talk to you. 
- Yes, sir?
- You know Miss Parish well, don't you? 
- Polly? I hardly know her name! 
- Who's the father of her baby?
- Not me! 
- Did you ever meet the father? 
- No, sir. I don't think there is one!
- What?! 
- I think she got it like... winning a raffle!
- Miller? 
- Yes, sir? 
- Would you like your carnation back? 
- Would I?! 
- All right, come with me. 
- Yes, sir.
- We have Mr Wharton on the phone, sir. 
- Wharton? Hold this. Don't drop it.
- Hello. 
- Mr and Mrs Clancy are here. 
- Never heard of them. Throw them out! ..Wharton, where are you? Skiing?!
- A lawyer, your age? 
- It's about the baby. 
- I need you here. Something...
MY baby? Well, show them in! ..No, Wharton, I wasn't talking to you. I haven't had a baby!
Please be seated.
Mrs Clancy? I thought you were Miss Parish.
Oh, that's the name I go by at the store. Mr Clancy - Mike - and I have been married for two years.
Y-Yes, sir. Two years. Give or take a few weeks.
- Your son told us there seems to be some misunderstanding about...our baby. 
- YOUR baby?
Yes, sir. Mrs Clancy is the mother and I, of course...
I hope that clears up any wrong ideas you may have had.
It's as though there had been a death in the family.
Now, then, Dad, here is the father!
Uh, Mr Merlin, my wife - Miss Parish - is a...is...is... is a very nervous woman, and...and your son told me... that you...you want to take our son away from us.
Uh...
You scared Miss Parish!
Mr Merlin, just how much, I ask you, are we supposed to give up for the store?
- Hmm? 
- See him?
That's the father SHE brought round! You two have slipped up - you've got one too many!
- So...you finally showed up? 
- I was unable to arrive more promptly - I am at university!
- That was charming, running out on her, so you could go to school(!) 
- Dan, it's all over. The jig is up!
Come here.
You know what this is?
- As an assumption, I'd say a coffee pot! 
- That's a good assumption from you!
- Ow! 
- You can't do that! 
- Who's going to stop me? 
- You're not impressing me!
- As for you, I'm going to prosecute you for...something! 
- Mr Merlin, your son made me do it - HE'S the father!
- HE'S the father! 
- I'm not, I'm a Harvard man!
Wait...I don't care who the father is - I'M the grandfather!
Sir, "Mother" just left.
- Left?! 
- She'll take the baby!
THEY ALL SHOUT
You're a Harvard man?!
- Which tenant do you want? 
- You know! 
- She's gone! 
- Where's my grandson? 
- Gone too! 
- She hasn't had time to go!
- Hasn't had time! 
- Go ahead - I've got the key!
- Mr Dugan, I must see her. 
- I'm not going to bandy words with you - where's that child?
- Where is my grandchild? Answer me, woman! I am John B Merlin, chairman of the company! 
- Mrs Dugan...
I have money, lawyers and a vindictive personality!
- Mrs... 
- Now I've explained to a woman of limited brains, what do you say?
Where did you get that hat, John?!
BABY GURGLES
Polly? Mrs Dugan, please, she must be...
Hello, darling, coochy-coochy-coochy!
- You're old enough for a grandfather, anyway! 
- Thank you! ..Coochy-coochy!
Why don't you leave me alone?
- I can't. 
- Well, you'll have to from now on! Go away! 
- I can't.
You're not going to get Johnny - you, your father or anybody! I love him! He looks like me!
- My father says Johnny looks like HIM. 
- Let me tell you something...
- I'm listening. 
- I found Johnny, and finders are keepers! You just try to get him!
- That's the other Merlin. I'm the young one! 
- Mr Merlin, you can believe it or not.
I was looking for a job - and Johnny was on the steps of the home... You wouldn't believe it. Nobody does.
- I do. 
- Oh, sure you...
- You do? 
- Now, I have something to tell YOU. 
- What?
I'M the father of that baby.
You are?
Dan?
That's the first true thing you've said all day!
# Into my life
# Came a bundle of joy
# Now the joy of my life Is to share it all with you
# And what will we find
# In a bundle of joy?
# We will find peace of mind
# And most of our dreams come true
# There will be smiles
# Intermingled with tears
# And those promising years We can both look forward to
# And so, aren't we
# A fortunate girl, a fortunate boy?
# To share a bundle of joy
# That's wrapped with blessings from above
# And tied with a ribbon
# Of everlasting
# Love! #
Here's a coffee, Bernie.
Coffee, Mr Cook?
Let's discuss it. Don't pout as if
I'd just taken away your tricycle.
I'm not pouting. I just disagree.
But Frank Elgin?
Let the doorman read for the part!
Phil, we've been in rehearsal for five days.
Our leading man was dreadful. Maybe
I was the wrong director for him.
We let him go yesterday.
We do not have a replacement.
We open in Boston on the 28th.
We are in trouble.
- I can do without the sarcasm.
- Let me audition him for you.
Phil, there's no harm in giving the man a reading.
I agree with you, but when
I wanted to read Ray Watson, that was a waste of time, and he's a better actor than Elgin.
A lot of guys can act or sing better, but nobody can do both as well.
- What about Billy Hertz?
- He's pompous.
This isn't Student Prince or Blossom Time.
The guy has to act while he's singing and sing while he's acting.
In Lonesome Town, Elgin played a part like this. He was magnificent.
- Ask Henry. He played the piano.
- When?
- Eight years ago.
- He didn't fall off bar stools then.
- He hasn't had a drink in ages.
- To a drunk, ten minutes is ages.
- I just want you to listen to him!
- All right, go ahead!
Larry?
- As soon as Elgin comes in...
- He's here.
I didn't want to interrupt.
Send him in.
Now, Cookie, no cracks, please.
- What are you auditioning, owls?
- Hello, Frank. Bernie Dodd.
- How do you do?
- Our producer, Mr Cook.
- Hello. How are you?
- Paul Unger and Henry Johnson.
- Hey, Henry!
- It's been a long time.
I told him to write his own music.
You took my advice, huh?
- How's the family?
- Fine.
- Is your boy in high school?
- The Air Force.
- No!
- Yes, he is.
Let's get started.
I've got a luncheon date.
This is an offbeat show, a dramatisation of The Land Around Us.
- You remember the book?
- Sure.
The boys have done an exciting musical adaptation.
The music is part of the fabric, woven in and out.
Keep the seats from getting dusty, give them something different.
Yeah. Would you read a couple of scenes for Mr Cook?
- There's one in the first act...
- Excuse me.
You were speaking of Lonesome Town.
Frank could do the Pitchman number.
That'd show Phil everything.
- All right.
- If I remember it. You sure you do?
I should. Eight performances a week for a year and a half.
- Describe the number to Mr Cook.
- OK.
It wasn't much, really.
I played one of those pitchmen, sort of a fanciful character.
Instead of selling a patent medicine,
I was selling a philosophy, a sunshine salesman.
The scene was a New York street corner, under a lamppost.
I had a... Is it OK if I use this for a minute?
- Use anything you like.
- Thanks.
- When I made my entrance...
- OK, I get it. Get on with it.
I was carrying an imaginary valise, one of those pitchman's outfits.
OK, Henry.
And then a crowd of sourpusses began to gather round.
A left-handed Indian, this kid.
Friends, I have here in this valise nostrums, cure-alls, panaceas, unguents, oils and healing waters.
What did you say, son?
You say the valise is empty?
Son, this valise is loaded.
You're just looking at it, and your windows are foggy.
What did you say?
You can't see nothing?
There's no trick in believing in what you see.
The trick is believing in what you can't see.
You've got to visualise the indiscernible.
Every item in this valise belongs to you as well as it does to me.
What's that you say, Officer?
Have I got a licence?
Just the greatest licence in the world, poetic licence.
You been listening to my pitch?
We're going to the station house?
You got a desk sergeant who's a little cantankerous?
Here's how we'll handle his case.
Share it among you, friends.
Tell them where you got it.
- You have a good beat for a writer.
- Fine, Frank.
You ought to hear it with an orchestra. It's good and lousy.
- Wait outside for a second.
- I'm a little in the dark.
Is it a musical spot, a small part or what?
It's the lead, Frank. The whole show is built around this character.
Well, didn't it speak for itself?
He's probably been doing that at dinner parties for ten years.
Did it prove he's worth risking $200,000 on?
Did it prove he can carry a show?
Be sensible. That guy's been in the pickle since you were a kid.
Someone took a chance with Laurette
Taylor in The Glass Menagerie.
Bernie, what are you trying to prove?
We've got a good book, good music.
Why can't you be satisfied with a reliable, sober actor?
He'll give you a reliable, sober performance.
That's not what people pay to see.
- You fought me over Danelli.
- I think you were wrong.
Instead of teaching an actor to box, you teach a punch-drunk fighter to act.
- He gave you a great performance.
- He gave us trouble, too.
If there was a fight at the Garden, he wouldn't show up.
With Elgin, you'll get something that happens once in 20 years.
I'll get it out of him.
- You're good, but not that good.
- People have always said that to me.
So now you're going to show them, every one of them.
Directing doesn't satisfy you.
You want to take a corpse and breathe life into it.
Maybe I'm crazy.
Doesn't this worry you guys?
- Not if it doesn't worry Bernie.
- He's too old for the part.
Hairpieces will make him look ten years younger.
All right. Could we look for someone else while he's rehearsing?
No, we don't let him go without real cause, a binge, or if he can't retain lines.
Give him a run-of-the-play contract.
- Wait a minute!
- I need his complete confidence.
No! I'll take a $40,000 loss before I give him a run-of-the-play contract.
- OK, two weeks. Agreed, Paul? Henry?
- OK with me.
Frank? Frank Elgin?
- Elgin left.
- What do you mean?
- He left.
- Where? Coffee? What?
He just walked out. He didn't say.
Try the nearest bar.
- Mr Elgin in?
- No, he's not.
Mrs Elgin? I'd like to talk to Frank. I'm Bernie Dodd.
I don't know when Frank will be back.
Mind if I wait?
- Would you like some coffee?
- No, thanks.
- Did Frank say when he'd be back?
- He didn't say where he was going.
- Didn't he say he had an audition?
- No.
I looked around after it was over, but he'd gone.
- Will he do?
- That all depends.
If you're wondering if you can get
Frank for very little money, you can.
It doesn't depend on that.
Does he still drink?
Just what did you think
I would answer to that?
- Touch.
- What?
- Touch. In French, that means...
- Everybody knows what it means.
You're even younger than I thought.
You try to look like an old lady.
You shouldn't do your hair like that.
Some women pay too much attention to themselves and some don't pay enough.
That's quite a pearl of wisdom.
May I quote you?
- How long have you been married?
- Ten years.
- Did you meet in a show?
- Look, Mr Dodd...
- Were you ever an actress?
- Not me, thank you.
I'm just a girl from the country.
The theatre and its people have always been a complete mystery to me.
They still are.
Dreiser, Balzac, Montaigne.
Who reads these books?
I do.
I'm afraid to ask if you enjoy them.
Montaigne's too polite for me.
- That doesn't surprise me.
- Frank's old recordings?
Some new. There's one on the machine he did last week.
A man with his talent.
It's degrading.
So is not eating.
Why didn't you wait?
I figured the boat had sailed.
The producer didn't like me.
Since when does a producer have to love an actor?
I can't go to battle unless everybody is rooting for me.
- Cook thinks you're a drinker.
- Not on a show.
Not according to Maxwell.
You worked for him in '46.
After a couple of months, he had to replace you.
While I was playing in that show, our son died.
What about this show? I need an actor who can stay sober and learn lines.
Are you that actor or not?
Make up your mind.
Give me time. Cook wasn't the only reason I left the theatre.
I wouldn't take a part like this without talking it over with Georgie.
- I'll be back in ten minutes.
- He's afraid of the responsibility.
But the gamble's all on my side!
It's not a question of being afraid of the responsibility.
The part's the whole show.
You said so yourself.
You're opening in Boston the 28th.
I don't think I could learn the lines. You need Walter Huston.
It's bad enough to go to Hollywood to cast. You suggest I go to heaven?
- You can do it, Frank.
- Why are you so sure?
When I was a hat-check boy, you, Lunt and Jolson were my heroes.
- I know everything you've done.
- You exaggerate to make your point.
- Are you for him or against him?
- I'm his wife.
I want honesty from both of you.
Flattery is cheap.
How about a little costly truth?
I'm not blind to Frank's condition.
This room tells me what he is.
I'm not one of those nice people who buys you a drink and that's it.
I won't leave you on a limb. We'll work together and worry together.
But if you do me dirt, just once, no pity, not a drop of pity.
No pity. I like that.
Now he knows what to expect.
- What contract do you offer?
- Standard two-week contract.
- You could let Frank out any time?
- Exactly.
He won't have confidence with a two-week clause. Would you?
I have nothing in my mind except for Frank to play this part.
That's sentiment again.
I come here with the best intentions.
Suddenly I find I'm victimising you.
- Did I bring you a basket of snakes?
- It's not the two-weeks clause.
I don't want to bite off more than I can chew.
We're in Boston for two weeks.
We can stay out until you're perfect.
- Would you do that?
- I'd insist on it.
Talk it over with your agent.
Call the office by 3 p.m., no later.
Need a $20 bill?
You need it.
Why did you make that crack about responsibility?
Why didn't you tell me about that audition?
Because I wasn't sure whether I could make it.
I must have walked up and down
47th Street a dozen times.
- Don't keep things from me.
- I can't do it, can I?
Of course you can. You've got to try.
It's a perfect opportunity.
If I do take it, Georgie,
I'll need you every step of the way.
I don't have any appointments,
Frank, all winter.
- I wish it were a run-of-the-play...
- Why didn't you tell him?
I didn't want to antagonise him.
I have to work with him.
You'll never get a better deal, so take it and do your level best.
Wait a minute. The two-weeks clause.
They can give me notice any time, but I can give them notice, too.
- I can walk out any time I want.
- You mean you can quit, Frank.
Not the way you mean it.
If the show doesn't pan out, I don't want to come to New York in a turkey.
Maybe this time, it will work out.
Bernie likes me.
Henry Johnson's pulling for me.
It's Cook I got to worry about.
We've been having trouble, Joe.
Instead of fields of wheat, we got stubble rotting in the dust.
I've talked it over with Stella.
We're leaving.
What are we waiting for?
Let's push on.
- How about you, Joe?
- I'm staying.
They say when a man falls from a great height, his whole life flashes by.
In one split second, he sees himself for what he is.
You don't have to plummet like a hailstone to face that split second.
Mean it, Frank.
...plummet like a hailstone to face that split second.
It can come to you as it did to me today. As you stand...
- What is it?
- "...in a smouldering field."
As you stand in a smouldering field and see your hopes go up in smoke.
This is the most important decision in the man's life.
It sounds like he's deciding what to have for breakfast!
That goes for the rest of you, too.
I'm sorry, but I'm still fighting these words.
We've been in rehearsal ten days.
Let's take it from...
- Bernie.
- It can't be that late.
Where does it go? Knock off.
Same time tomorrow.
We'll start with this scene.
- See you tomorrow.
- Good night.
- Do you need me for anything?
- No.
- You want me to turn off the border?
- Yeah. Good night.
I'm sorry about the words.
I've had a lot of things on my mind.
I know you have.
Every time I give a direction, you're off in space somewhere.
You can be great, but it demands your concentration and energy.
I know. I keep telling myself that.
After rehearsal,
I go home to study and...
You've got headaches enough.
Good night.
- Frank? Having trouble at home?
- No, nothing like that.
- Don't you believe me?
- Everyone has trouble at home.
The ones who deny it are those that have too much of it.
I denied it for five years with the former Mrs Dodd.
I never had the impression that you were married.
Neither did my wife.
That was my trouble. What's yours?
It's nothing important.
I'll see you in the morning.
- Does she want you to play the part?
- She's all for it.
The day I met her, she seemed a little difficult about terms, rather domineering.
- She wasn't always like that.
- I know.
They start out as Juliets and wind up as Lady Macbeths.
When I first met her, she was as fine a person as you've ever seen.
She had background and breeding.
She had a nobility about her that made me feel proud to be with her.
I was a good deal older than she was, but it didn't seem to matter.
She wasn't a flighty kid.
She had a poise and dignity that was ageless.
Those first few years,
I never knew a better life.
A wife who was everything
I'd been looking for.
A son who was smart, healthy.
Then our son died.
I came home from the theatre one night a couple of months later.
This kid, I don't think she ever had a real drink in her life before.
There she is, stretched out across the bed, dead drunk, her wrists cut and bleeding.
She was jealous that I had my work, something to live for.
She felt she had nothing.
Inside of a year, she was a hopeless drunkard.
In an effort to give her some purpose in life,
I made her feel that
I needed her in my work.
I let her pick the songs I should record, the shows I ought to do.
She started taking over everything.
She became very possessive.
She wanted to make the decisions, had to be with me all the time.
Whenever I was away, she acted as if I'd run off with another woman.
She had fits of depression.
One time she set fire to a hotel suite.
That's when I hit the bottle.
- Does she still drink?
- No. She stopped when I began.
That figures. You were the weak one now. That's what she wanted.
- Do you have to bring her to Boston?
- I couldn't leave her alone.
You thought it was funny I didn't hang around after the audition.
If I'd taken this part without talking to her,
I don't know what would've happened.
I had to make believe that I was afraid.
That left it open for her to convince me, like it was her idea.
They can get awful bent out of shape, can't they?
My wife was so twisted she said to me, "I hope your next play's a flop,
"so the world can see I love you even though you're a failure."
Georgie?
Just coming from a movie, thought you might be through.
- Your timing was perfect, Mrs Elgin.
- I have a knack that way.
Good evening, Mr Dodd.
How is my husband doing?
In my less than humble opinion, he's a natural.
Don't let him kid you, honey.
I was floundering.
We'll have to rehearse those cues.
Thank her for the words I did know.
Thanks.
- Did I intrude?
- No, we're just breaking up.
I don't like to be obtrusive when Frank's working, unless he needs my help.
- You're sure I'm not in the way?
- No.
We're just closing up shop, giving it back to the theatre ghosts.
There's nothing quite so mysterious and silent as a dark theatre.
A night without a star.
- Why don't we get some coffee?
- Georgie? She makes the decisions.
Is that true, Mrs Elgin?
To the extent that Frank's brought out the mother in me, yes.
I'd like some coffee, and I'd like to get to know Mr Dodd better.
I'd like to get to know you better.
Shall we go along?
Yes, the theatre is mysterious.
It sure is.
Hi, Charlie. Excuse me a minute.
No, thanks, never use them. Are you really satisfied with Frank's work?
I'll be happy when he gets the part out of his hands.
He has his worries with those lines.
I'd appreciate it if you didn't add to them.
He seems to be more concerned about you than the audience.
You mean he's too focused on my reaction?
That's one way of putting it.
You could help by being careful of what you do and say.
I try to be careful, but being an actor's wife is not easy.
If I tell him he's magnificent, he says I'm not honest.
- If not, he says I don't love him.
- He's good but can be better.
- Is that what the critics will say?
- Are you a critic or a wife?
I try in my small way to help.
That's what my ex-wife used to keep reminding me, tearfully.
She had a theory that behind every great man was a great woman.
She was convinced that she was great and that all I needed was guidance on her part.
She worked hard at it. Too hard.
It doesn't prove her theory was completely wrong.
One could go through history and find a few good examples.
It's a pity that Leonardo da Vinci never had a wife to guide him.
He might have really got somewhere.
You know who that was? Charlie Blair.
You remember him. He was...
Here's another oldie.
It's on the hit parade again.
Let's listen to the original
recording made by Frank Elgin.
He's backed up
by Jimmy Bolton's Orchestra.
See if you remember it.
- Was that OK, Jimmy?
- Good.
Harry, you want to buy that one?
Sure will. I'll give you the playback in a second.
Take five, boys.
You pretty near broke me up with your bad beat. How'd it sound?
- It's a lovely tune.
- And the singer?
- He has a pleasant voice.
- If you were my agent, we'd starve!
I've got a hair appointment.
- You're not taking him.
- It's Sally's day off.
Oh, no. He'll grow up to be a hairdresser. I'll take him.
To the Lambs' Club to play pool?
It's better than teaching him how to set a wave. I'll take him to the zoo.
And bring him home full of peanuts, ice cream and chocolate?
Johnny, tell this lady to run along.
This is strictly stag.
- Strictly stag.
- He's your responsibility.
If he gets a stomach ache in the night, that's strictly stag, too.
Goodbye.
Isn't Mommy a doll?
Bye, hon.
- Peanuts!
- Yeah. First we'll hear this playback.
- Then Charlie wants some pictures.
- Take two of the chorus.
Can I get one shot of you looking at the trademark for the album cover?
Make it fast. I got a date with my friend here.
I think it would be better without the hat. Right.
Put your hands on the record.
Put the right one at the bottom, too.
That's perfect. Just hold it.
Hold it. Hold it.
Johnny!
The men for the trunk are downstairs...
- When did you get these, Frank?
- Last night, after you fell asleep.
I went out and got a paper and...
What's the difference?
- I got a good night's sleep.
- No more, Frank.
I'll get you some sleeping pills.
One a night can't hurt.
I'm not sure I'm going to Boston.
What's the use? I'll never go through with this show.
I'll mess it up, like everything else.
- That day was an accident.
- That's what the paper said.
- He was my responsibility that day.
- Frank, stop it! Stop!
- Have you told Dodd about this?
- No. Don't you tell him either.
I won't, but I think maybe you should. It might help.
Nobody is going to have any respect.
He'd tell Cook. He'd fire me.
Who'd risk $200,000 on a guy that irresponsible?
Let's say you were responsible.
You've got to prove to yourself...
You don't know what it's like to stand on that stage all alone.
If I'm no good, the show's no good.
I've got the future of 100 people in my hand. This hand.
- Elgin, trunk for Boston?
- Come in.
- Theatre or hotel?
- Theatre.
- No...
- Everything's packed. It's ready.
"THE LAND AROUND US"
THEATRE
Joe's nothing but a dreamer.
Let him show you
what he's been dreaming about.
That's fair enough. Come on, Phil.
How do they expect me to make these fast changes?
- Haven't I done it right?
- Yes, but I want you out front.
- Give me the dicky!
- You're doing wonderfully.
I am not! Why don't they get me a dresser? They could afford a dozen.
- Do you want me to talk to Cook?
- Yes.
Tell him to stop that understudy hovering there like a vulture.
- If you talked to Mr Dodd...
- You talk to him.
Tell him to keep that guy out front.
Get me some new tissue.
I will, right after rehearsal.
- I'm sorry I stepped on your line.
- Think nothing of it.
- I was so nervous.
- What about? It's just another show.
Where would you find a star as sweet as that?
What a wonderful guy.
I'd like to hold the orchestra for about a half-hour longer.
- Can't you do it in the morning?
- Can I take the doohickeys off?
- Yeah, go ahead.
- There we are.
- See you tomorrow.
- Paul mentioned something to me.
- Eleanor is way overboard.
- I know she is.
- I wasn't thinking about Eleanor.
- Don't you think I know?
- I have some notes.
- We'll go over them tomorrow.
Give the company a one o'clock call.
I'm going out for some fresh air.
Then we'll discuss that spot.
Larry, hold Frank and Helen.
Run the scene in front of the church.
Find out what caused the mix-up.
You talked about the scenery but not about our real problem.
Elgin was terrible.
That's why you go out of town.
Actors improve. The scenery can't.
If he spoke the script,
I never heard it.
He trips on a rug, there's no chair, the door won't open.
What do you expect of him?
Besides, his wife was backstage during the performance.
- She's enough to upset anyone.
- What are you going to do?
- Lower the boom on her.
- He's your problem. I got my own.
The union insists I take on three more stagehands.
Mr Cook, excuse me.
May I ask you something?
- Do you think Frank needs a dresser?
- No, but I suppose you do.
Well, those two fast changes.
It's a very large part, after all.
Bernie, every time you nod your head like that, it costs us $200.
You're going to nod us out of business.
Don't worry. We'll get him a dresser.
Mr Cook is almost what the bad fairy promised Frank at his cradle.
He's not too bad.
Gruff, but with a heart of stone.
You smoke too much.
That's obvious.
A whole pack since 10.30.
Careful you don't catch cold.
After every first dress rehearsal,
I always hope to catch pneumonia.
It never works. Oh, for the peaceful quiet of an oxygen tent.
Mr Dodd, who is that tall, gloomy man that hangs around backstage?
Lucas, is that the name?
Yes. General understudy.
Not much personality but competent.
Well, excuse me for saying this, but must he stay backstage?
It seems to bother Frank.
I'll watch him.
Is Frank that insecure?
He's working well, in good humour.
Don't you know what hides behind that good humour?
Certain men are very strange.
Business couldn't be better, wife and kids are fine, jokes with the boys at the club.
The next day, he's hung himself from the chandelier.
Is that supposed to be a picture of Frank?
Yes and no.
Frank doesn't like to make a remark that might lose him people's regard.
If anything has to be said that might cause antagonism, well, that's my job.
I hate to say this, but I hired a good performer.
I may want him without his sisters, cousins and aunts.
I never meant to interfere. I was just offering myself as a liaison...
I have no problems with Frank.
Don't make any.
Before this is over, you may face a couple of beauties.
- Is that a threat?
- No.
It's just a simple statement based on experience.
Whether you like it or not,
Frank's weak. He's a leaner.
I happen to be the one he leans on.
A good, strong helpmate.
You and your strength might be the very reason he is weak.
I don't like strong women.
I'm not here to audition for you.
I'm here for the same reason you are, to do everything in my power to make him a success in this.
I want to see Frank stand on his own two feet for very personal reasons.
Then don't overplay your hand. Frank can go anywhere, right to the top.
Or he may go back to that smelly room, and you with him!
I got that line straightened out.
Helen was throwing me the wrong cue.
I'm glad you got it fixed.
Frank, I noticed the understudy backstage. Does that bother you?
No, never even noticed. How else is he going to learn his business?
- Is that you, Georgie?
- Yes.
- Are you coming in?
- In a minute.
I want to get a breath of fresh air.
I can't come out. I'm still soggy.
What did they say about the dresser?
You'll get him.
It looks like they've got a little respect for the old man after all.
Yes, they have respect for you.
I'll be out in a second.
- It's a different kind of a show.
- Yes, but I'm enjoying it.
It's a beautiful production.
I bet the costumes cost $50,000.
I think it's the most exciting thing!
- Where did you get it?
- From George, for my birthday.
You've seen him before, years ago, in that show in Central Park.
- Was he the same one?
- So easy-going and likeable.
- Are you catching cold?
- That's all I need.
You're smoking too much. Go to sleep.
- I want to see the review first.
- You can see it at breakfast.
I can't sleep. What time do they deliver the paper? In the afternoon?
I don't know why they picked this place to open in.
It's like getting locked in a deep freeze.
Just came in, Mr Elgin.
I'll get you another sleeping pill.
- Hello.
- I didn't think I'd be waking you.
The only important ones are the New York notices.
Yeah, I don't worry about these out-of-town critics.
They don't bother me.
Georgie was a little upset, but I reminded her of Lonesome Town.
The Philadelphia critics murdered us, but in New York we were a smash.
We've got five weeks. Opening night in New York, it'll be great.
But let's not kid ourselves.
It'll take an awful lot of work.
You've got a big day tomorrow, a rehearsal, a performance and production stills after that, so get all the rest you can.
- OK.
- Good night.
The dame in this paper puts her finger right on it.
She says, "Elgin lacks authority in a role that cries for it."
- No authority. That's it.
- You know why he lacks authority?
Because his wife has too much of it.
She's got to go back to New York.
We ought to make it transportation for two.
If you don't like what I'm doing, make it transportation for three.
Now, we were discussing that scene in front of the town hall.
We go past the climax. Let's cut the scene here tomorrow night.
- Over a little more. That's it.
- Everybody out front, keep quiet.
Sit down and keep quiet or you'll be here all night.
Settle down.
All right, here we go.
Stay! Hold it!
- OK, go ahead.
- Hold it. Thank you.
Hold those positions.
I want to change one thing here.
While Frank is speaking,
I want you to look directly at him.
And no movement, nothing that will distract the audience from him.
He's got to be the centre of attention.
You really think it would be better that way?
I thought it would be kind of nice and natural if I was in the crowd.
No, it's all wrong.
The words lose importance.
He's asking these people to have faith in him, to trust him.
He's accepting responsibility for their future. It's got to be important.
We'll rehearse it tomorrow.
I just wanted to tell you about it.
We've got one more shot where you're here looking at the poster.
Yell when you're ready.
Turn your head towards the poster.
- Would you look at the poster?
- Yeah, sure.
WANTED FOR MURDER
- Hold it.
- Put your hands on the record.
Hold it.
- Frank, what's the matter?
- I got a cold.
I've got some stuff in the room.
I'll be right back.
- All finished?
- No.
Frank, I don't like that cough syrup.
- Why not? It's a buck a bottle.
- You can read labels.
It's 22% alcohol. I'll get you some lemon and honey in the morning.
Cook didn't come back after the show.
No, he didn't.
I'm glad I got that two-weeks clause.
I can quit any time I want.
Why should I care? They don't.
The producer doesn't come back after the show...
- Leave the bottle.
- I need it for my cough.
- Leave it here.
- But I need it.
George, I need it.
- Frank's on stage.
- I know. I want to talk to you.
Last time we talked, Mr Dodd, you reduced me to tears.
I promise you it won't happen again.
In fact, I'm glad you're here.
You ought to know he's getting a cold and shouldn't be kept up late.
- We need stills. How's his spirit?
- Low.
- Why?
- Ask the Boston critics.
I've spent between
10 and 15 hours a day with Frank.
Nothing bothers him except through your mouth.
We've been through that.
Either he laughs and makes bad jokes or sits in silence and rots inside.
Either way, for your edification, he's heading for a bender.
Why do women always think they understand men better than men do?
Maybe because they live with them.
You'll have him full of whisky before morning.
He's getting a cold. That's a reason to jump down the well.
Why work so hard? You handle him, and now you're trying to handle me!
And don't think I couldn't, after handling a cunning drunkard.
If you loved this man, you could never call him a cunning drunkard.
I have a greater love for the truth.
I'm a drunkard's wife.
That's the truth.
Stop looking at everything as if it were a musical comedy!
I find you slightly grotesque.
You came here to tell me something. What is it?
Cook's got a replacement for Frank and a lot of money to protect.
I think Frank will improve.
Cook thinks he won't.
- Well, he won't unless you leave.
- You'll be sorry. He'll be helpless.
- I'll help him.
- You wouldn't know where to begin!
I'll begin by not calling him a cunning drunkard.
I'll give him confidence by rejoicing in his talents instead of reminding him of his weaknesses.
I'll let him face a decision without fear.
I won't stifle him with bitterness.
I might bend the truth, but I'll get a performance out of him.
That's the difference. You want him to become the actor he once was.
I'm his wife. I want him once more as the man he once was, able to face responsibility, and you don't do that by bending the truth!
You don't do it by stripping him of self-respect.
I'll fight you for this man.
Not too hard. I may let you have him.
Oh, no. You want him wholly and utterly dependent.
You realised, with all your fine breeding, you were a failure.
It gave you a feeling of power to control someone else's life.
Worse, you do it in the name of love.
You're as phoney as an opera soprano.
Did I forget to tell you I'm proud?
Make up your mind. Either you go to New York alone, or you both go.
I'll go, on one condition.
Let me tell Frank in my own way, in my own time.
As long as you're on that train by tomorrow night.
- The traffic's a little heavy!
- Finished?
Got it all wrapped up.
Frank, I'd like to run through that new scene after the matine tomorrow.
- You tired?
- Me?
How can you be tired playing a part you've waited for all your life?
- Your energy was low again tonight.
- I know. It's this cold.
- Are you sure it's not nerves?
- Are you kidding?
- Tell him what's bothering you.
- What's bothering me?
- Cook and the notices, for instance.
- Oh, that.
I just wondered why he didn't come backstage.
Is he mad or something?
Those weren't exactly money notices.
Mr Dodd believes in you. I can't help you if you're worried. He can.
But I'm not worried.
Did you not tell me ten minutes ago that you wanted to hand in your notice?
I was just ribbing you, honey.
You got to be careful around here.
You can't open your mouth.
- Your wife's returning to New York.
- I said nothing of the sort.
- What do you mean, New York?
- We can talk about it later.
Would you leave us alone, Mrs Elgin?
Let's get one thing straight.
- What is that?
- It's cough syrup.
Pine, tar, cherries, a whole bush in a bottle.
- This stuff is 22% alcohol.
- Alcohol?
I told Georgie to get something to loosen my throat.
- Don't you know what these can do?
- She didn't look at the label.
Maybe she did. She's jealous of the show and of me.
This is how far she'd go.
She'd even kick you off the wagon.
- I know she's high-strung...
- I want her back in New York.
We've got hard work ahead. I haven't time for frustrated females.
Go back to the hotel and get some sleep. I want you fresh tomorrow.
Mrs Elgin, Frank knows exactly how I feel.
He appreciates what has to be done.
See you tomorrow, Frank.
He can be pretty arrogant and insulting.
He had no right to treat you like that.
Did you tell him that?
I poured it in the sink. If you don't believe me, go and smell it.
- Where's the other bottle?
- What other bottle?
I'm tired. Where's the other bottle of syrup?
I didn't buy another bottle. I wish you'd take my word for something.
Never mind. I give up.
I'm not going to look.
- I apologise. He had no right...
- Stop putting on a front.
- Who's putting on a front?
- You are! You lie, you lie, you lie!
- Are you going back to New York?
- I don't know why not.
You want to leave me, don't you?
At the moment, I want you to get dressed so we can get out of here.
Who's in New York? Who's the guy you want to get back to?
I'm going to hit you with the first thing I pick up!
- Now get dressed!
- If you're in such a hurry, go on.
I'll take a walk, get something to eat.
- It won't do your cold any good.
- Let them worry about it.
- Do you want me to go?
- Yes, if you're in such a hurry.
Have you got the key to the room?
I'll get one from the hotel.
Don't wake me up when you come in.
I may be having a happy dream!
- That's for you.
Thanks.
Do you like me?
You're one of the most likeable guys
I've ever seen.
- Jackie, sing something!
- I'll sing if you'll be quiet.
- Yeah, Love And Learn.
- All right, simmer down.
It's my turn to holler.
Go, dad, go!
What about this guy?
Take me home, dad.
Hey, aren't you Frank Elgin?
I used to be. Not a word or I'll tell them you're Harpo Marx.
- The Pump Song!
- I'm tired. Dance a while.
Order up. Buy something already.
- I'm sorry.
- It's all right. Another?
Yeah. Give me a double.
Pour, pour. Go ahead, fill it up.
Sorry about that drink.
It's all right. Could have happened to anybody. Just an accident.
Yeah. Just an accident.
That's what the papers said.
It could have happened to anybody.
It was just an accident.
- Come in.
- Morning.
- Morning.
- How's it going?
- We got out 23 minutes.
- That's fine.
If we cut that chorus in half, what will that give us?
- Another seven minutes.
- Good. That's where we need it.
Hello? Yeah.
What? When?
- Oh, no.
- I think you'd better come down.
I'll wait for you.
- Here's his keys, his belt.
- I know, I know.
Here's your five dollars.
You promised me a couple of problems.
I see you made good your threat.
I didn't threaten you. I warned you.
When he hadn't come in, why didn't you call me?
- Suppose he had been with a woman?
- You're being evasive.
Sit down, Frank.
Get me some water, Georgie.
What happened, Frank? Sit up!
Don't act as though I'm beating you.
- I'm sorry.
- What happened?
- I don't know.
- What happened after I left you?
- Georgie and I had a fight.
- I thought so.
- I don't know...
- She picked a fine time.
- It wasn't her fault.
- Stop protecting her!
- She's weak, she's so weak.
- She's driven you to drink!
You could be magnificent.
She goes back to New York.
- I don't know what she'd do.
- She goes back this morning.
- She's weak.
- I'll talk to her.
If we go on, you move in with me.
- Cook doesn't want me.
- I'm not sure I want you!
Whatever you say. You decide.
Frank...
Frank stays, you go. The management will pay your expenses.
Frank may follow you, I'm not sure.
He's moving in with me.
Crisp as lettuce, aren't you?
Do you want me to go, Frank?
I'll go and pack.
Tell Frank he has nothing to worry about. He thinks you may go drastic.
- It's happened before, I understand.
- What?
Phoney suicide attempts.
Mr Dodd, when I was a child, the town idiot insisted that elephant tusks came from piano keys, but he had nothing on you.
Suicide attempts are Frank's department.
Show me your wrists, Frank.
Show me your wrists!
- Did you set fire to a hotel suite?
- He told you that?
Was I a hopeless drunk?
Did I have fits of depression?
Was I possessive?
Did I have to have a nurse watch me when he was on stage?
Didn't you recognise any of it?
That was his big speech in one of the plays you admired him in when you were a hat-check boy.
Larry... do you think the understudy can play the matine?
Yeah, I think so.
Pay the fine. This is a receipt for his coat, wallet and the rest.
Take him back to the hotel.
Wait. If they see him in the lobby, it'll be all over the papers.
Take him to the theatre and let him sleep it off there.
- Georgie...
- Go on, Frank.
I won't leave without seeing you.
Tell Cook I'll be along in a few minutes.
- May I smoke?
- May you smoke?
What is that supposed to be?
Homage to a lady?
It'll never make me forgive you for what you've said and done.
I'm not asking for forgiveness.
I want information.
- What made Frank go to pieces?
- The responsibility became too much.
- Why the lying, why the cunning?
- He hates himself.
Consequently, he'll do or say anything to be liked by others.
People like Frank ought to have two votes.
Then they could vote
Democrat and Republican.
Everybody would love them.
- Was he always like that?
- No. No, he drank a little.
He wasn't too dependable, but it was only a pathetic hint of frailty in a wonderful, glowing man.
That appeals to a lot of us.
It did to me. I was so young.
His weaknesses seemed touching and sweet. They made me love him more.
One day, he was walking with our son.
He let go of his hand.
There was traffic. He looked the other way. The boy was killed.
Ever since then, Frank has acted like a murderer.
Guilt and repentance and all that goes with it.
But worse than that, he's shunned any responsibility like the plague.
It covered a pretty wide range.
Everything from not wanting any more children to...
It must sound ludicrous to anyone who hasn't lived through it.
It got to the point that he wouldn't pick out a coat or suit by himself.
I don't know where to begin to apologise, Mrs Elgin.
You can begin by not calling me Mrs Elgin.
- And you never left him?
- Twice left, twice returned.
He's a helpless child.
Anyone taking a cab to New York?
If he's as helpless as you say...
He's not helpless now.
He has you, Mr Dodd.
You're the only one that can handle him. I didn't know it before.
- Then you've learned something.
- The man has to be watched.
You take the job with waving banners and ten hours later hand it back!
He has to be watched? He has to be nursed and guarded, but not by me!
I'm going back to New York, to the comfort of a quiet room.
I won't have to wonder where he is.
He'll be in the strong hands of Bernie Dodd!
Can you stand him on his feet?
That's where my prayers have gone.
To see that holy hour when he can stand alone again.
I might forgive you, Mr Dodd, if you can keep him up long enough for me to get out from under.
All I want is my own name and a job to buy sugar for my coffee.
You can't believe that a woman is crazy-out-of-her-mind to live alone in one room, by herself!
- Listen to me!
- Why are you holding me?
How could you be so angry at someone you didn't even know?
Maybe I really wasn't.
Maybe I screamed at you to keep myself at an angry distance.
No one has looked at me as a woman for years and years.
I never knew there was such a woman.
Loyal, steadfast.
And when I found her...
Now I need your answer.
Do you think Frank can make it?
I don't know.
But if he doesn't go through with this show, he'll never work again.
- I'm sure of that.
- You'll be taking a big chance.
They're the only ones worth taking.
But I can't unless you stay.
Will you?
Yes.
You kissed me.
Don't let it give you any ideas, Mr Dodd.
No, Mrs Elgin.
It's more thoughtful. He's trying to figure out an approach...
- Did you see Cook?
- No.
He's talking to Watson.
I haven't got time now.
I've been with the understudy.
Do you want to listen?
Not now.
- How do you feel?
- OK. Larry got me some coffee.
I'll be out in a minute.
You don't have to get out.
All you have to do is get some sleep.
The understudy will want to get in.
I listened to him. He's no good.
You'll have to play the matine.
Oh, no. Don't stick your neck out.
I'm in no mood to cut my throat in public. The understudy stinks.
It's not just the matine.
You've got to replace me.
When you took this job,
I promised you no pity.
I don't expect any.
I'm only warning you. Get rid of me.
Let me go back to New York.
So you can tell the boys you quit because the part wasn't big enough?
Oh, no. If you leave this show, it'll only be for one reason.
Because I fire you for being an unreliable, slobbering drunk.
I know a lot of people who hire actors. That's what I'll tell them.
It's not just this performance.
I can do a show for you. I've gone on when I can hardly stand up.
It's not when I'm out there that it's bad.
This is a matine in Boston. If I do this in New York, where are you?
- Where are you?
- You talk as if I do it on purpose.
I can't help it, Bernie.
In between shows and at night, when I start thinking about it...
You mean the accident?
Georgie told me about it.
- It hasn't been easy.
- Why didn't you tell me about it?
- I don't know.
- You knew I wouldn't buy it.
I don't buy it. A crazy wife.
Yes, you knew I had one.
- It was an accident.
- It was a crutch.
You were getting older, beginning to slip. You looked for excuses.
The accident was an excuse.
Everybody expects a guy to take that pretty hard. You used it to the hilt.
- No, Bernie.
- I'm right, and you know it.
You're sure of yourself. You don't know what it means to be afraid.
You're on top of the heap.
Everything's good for you, but wait till you've had a couple of flops and people stop talking about you.
You'll get afraid and look for excuses.
I'm not blaming you. Just stop lying.
Sure, everybody thought it was because of the accident.
That's what I wanted them to think, because I was afraid.
Even when I was the biggest, I was afraid. I've always been afraid.
I don't know why. It was good to find a respectable excuse for failure.
I could drink a little more.
Nobody blamed me.
No, they blamed it on the accident.
After I'd milked every tear out of it,
I cut my wrists, not deep enough to die, just enough to bleed myself back into the centre of attention.
Everybody felt sorry for me again.
They understood. Everybody was talking about me and my tragedy.
That's the way I wanted it.
To keep it that way, I lied.
God, how I lied!
I even lied about Georgie!
You were so right, Bernie.
I keep thinking about it.
Not about the accident, but how I used it.
- Get some rest.
- I'll keep on thinking about it.
You better not take a chance on me.
You better get rid of me.
- Bernie...
- Shh.
- He's got to sleep.
- I don't care if he hears me.
I talked to Ray Watson in California.
He can be here in the morning.
I said I'd call him back.
- Frank's going to play it.
- Wait a minute.
Don't protect this guy any longer!
I'm calling Ray Watson.
If you do, tell him to bring
a director along with him.
THE LAND AROUND US
All that valley needs is a few friends to treat it kindly for once, to loan it a plough, some seeds, plenty of care.
It'll pay us back.
I know it, Joe, but the others will take a lot of convincing.
- Western Union.
- Yes, come in.
- How's it going, Ralph?
- Fine, Mr Dodd.
Mr Frank's a big man.
Positive honour to work for him.
- Have you been out front?
- Yeah.
Opening night in New York.
The world's most useless man.
- How's Frank?
- OK. How's it been back here?
He was a little uneasy with the curtain going up so late.
If the first few rows had the balcony's manners, what a wonderful world this would be.
It was sweet of you to send these wires.
- Who told you?
- I guessed. How many did you send?
- Nine or ten. You?
- Five or six.
Where did you get the names?
The Lambs' Club.
Good, good.
Why don't you go out front?
Not me. I don't sit with the critics.
I hear very well right from here.
That's the advantage of an on-stage dressing room.
Keep quiet!
That's the disadvantage.
Larry's right. From now on, it's his show. I'm just a visitor.
- Depressed, aren't you?
- Depressed and mean.
It's been a long nine weeks.
A job is home to a homeless man.
Now the job is finished.
Where do I go from here?
Georgie, five weeks ago
I kissed a woman, a married woman.
Now I know I love her.
I don't know where to turn.
- Close to you like this...
- Bernie...
I waited.
- Are you going to leave him?
- Bernie...
You told me you prayed to see him on his feet again so you could get out.
Let me show you something.
Looks to me like he's made it.
What about you?
- Are you leaving him?
- Don't you think that can wait?
No, it's been on my mind since that morning in Boston.
If I could make you understand...
Not now, Bernie. Not now.
First-act curtain. I've got to make the dressing room tour.
- I thought you were out front.
- Just came back.
You hit it tonight. It's good.
I can handle this. Go have a smoke.
You know something, that's work.
It sounded wonderful back here.
I messed up a couple of spots.
Nobody noticed.
- You'd better touch up the grey.
- Make me look two weeks younger.
- How do you feel?
- Good. How are they liking it?
I only know what I read in the papers. They came in late.
- As long as they don't leave early.
- Frank...
A lot of things are said in the heat of the day.
Accept my apologies.
Those things can happen. Naturally, you include my wife in your apology.
Of course. That includes you, too.
Then start by taking your hat off.
You're not at a smoker, Mr Cook.
This is the first kind word you've had for us. I think I know why.
You'd like me to sign a contract before the papers come out so you can get me for half what I'm worth.
You'll just have to take my word.
I have been thinking of contractual arrangements, but that's not why I came back.
I'm having some people for supper, and I just wanted to invite you.
And you, Mrs Elgin.
Thanks. I'll drop by if I'm not too tired.
- Good. Hope to see you.
- Yeah.
Excuse me, Mrs Elgin.
We'll be looking for you.
Thank you.
- Fine performance.
- Thank you. They got you trapped!
- Don't learn the piano.
- Just Chopsticks.
- Great performance.
- Thank you.
- Have you seen Georgie anywhere?
- She was here a minute ago.
There you are, dear.
I only lost about half of it.
Now is as good a time as any to say thanks to both of you.
For what?
If it hadn't been for you,
Ray Watson would be here now, looking for a coffee spoon.
Frank, there are as many reasons for drinking as there are drinkers.
There are only two reasons why a drinker stops.
He dies or decides to quit all by himself.
I'm not sure I have.
I faced a crisis up in Boston and got away with it.
Just about anybody can face a crisis.
It's everyday living that's rough.
I'm not sure I can lick it, but I think I got a chance.
The point is, Georgie, what about us?
Don't go, Bernie. You're involved.
There's only one thing more obvious than two people gazing at each other, and that's two people avoiding it.
Frank, I didn't want to bring up any of this tonight.
But you did, so let's have the whole truth.
I married you for happiness.
Yours and mine.
If necessary, I'll leave you for the same reason.
I can't guarantee you that happiness.
The rest of the whole truth is that it was as much my fault as yours.
Bernie accused me of wanting you completely dependent, of wanting to control your life.
I denied it, of course, but I think there's an element of truth there.
I don't want to run that risk again.
No, you're right.
This is something
I've got to work out for myself, with you or without you.
Whether the show is a hit or a flop is beside the point.
I've got to find myself, whether it's in one room or five.
I don't think there's any point in us torturing each other any longer.
You two talk it over. I'll go home.
But, Georgie, don't dismiss what we had together.
I gave you ten of the roughest years anybody ever spent outside of a concentration camp.
It could be more of the same.
That was quite a little speech.
I'm still giving a performance.
This time there's a difference.
At least I know it's a performance.
I know it's gratifying to be wanted and needed, but not for every minute of every day.
Remember that for years he's been a leaner. You said so yourself.
- Pretty tune, isn't it? Remember it?
- Yes. Yes, I do.
I made a record of it once.
Bernie, I...
I'm always running out of cigarettes.
- You smoke too much.
- And you're impertinent.
But you're loyal and steadfast and devoted.
I like that in a woman.
- Have you seen Frank anywhere?
- He just left, Mrs Elgin.
- Here you are.
- About time!
- How are they?
- I didn't read them.
- Here's The Times and Tribune.
- Thanks, Larry.
Subtitles: Julia Watts
  [ "Semper Fidelis" ]
- This is your best quality of kid?
- Yes, sir. Genuine mocha.
- And the price?
- Five dollars a pair.
- Very well. I'll take them.
- With you, sir, or shall I send them?
Perhaps you better send them since I'll require 100 dozen.
One hundred dozen?
On second thought, make it 110 dozen.
I never like to wear a pair of gloves more than once.
- Superstition, you know.
Dozen. You have my address.
Sands Point, Long Island.
The name's Sousa.
John Philip Sousa.
Thank you. Good day.
Yes, sir.
[ Man Narrating ]
That, of course, was a much later Sousa- the Sousa of the '20s.
Composer, leader of the most famous band in the world.
At the moment, however, we are concerned with another Sousa- the Sousa of the '90s who was a leader of the Marine Corps band in Washington.
Doubtless considered himself lucky to possess even one pair of cotton gloves.
  [ "he Washington Post" ]
Eyes... right!
- Mr. Sousa's here, sir.
- Send him in.
John Philip Sousa, principal musician, reporting, sir.
- ow long have you been bandmaster here, Sousa?
- Twelve years, sir.
Isn't that long enough to knock some sense into that bunch of German dukes... and ltalian counts you have in that band of yours?
- Begging the major's pardon, sir, what have we done now?
- Bring that man in here!
- What is your name?
- Private Little, sir. Private Willie Little.
Little, what have you got to say for yourself?
WelI, sir, it was Iike this.
he major knows how hot it was-
Never mind how hot it was. We're not running the Marine Corps for your comfort.
What I meant to say, sir, was while I was sitting there in my quarters shooting craps... when I got to thinking how nice a cold bottle of beer would-
- Stand at attention!
- Yes, sir.
So I went out to the corporal of the guard, and I said,
"I'd like to speak to the officer of the day to get permission to leave the post."
But he said, "Nothing doing."
And for me to get my tail on back to my quarters.
So I went back to my quarters again, sir.
Only by now I was getting hotter and hotter and thirstier and thirstier.
So you jumped over the wall and filled your belly full of rotgut liquor.
I wouldn't say I filled my belly exactly full, sir, if the major will excuse the expression.
At Ieast I could stilI walk when I came back.
Only I've got to admit,
I didn't feel much like climbing over the wall again.
So I decided to come in through the main gate.
- And that's where you made your big mistake?
- Yes, sir.
Because when the corporal saw me, he said something
I don't let anybody say to me.
So I said, "I beg your pardon."
And then I hit him and he hit me back.
First thing I knew, it seemed like the whole battalion was hitting somebody.
- Who won?
- They did, sir.
- Never mind that. Have him wait outside.
- Yes, sir.
Now by George, there's a real, old-time marine for you, even if he is only in the band.
But of course, we can't let him get away with it.
e'll be confined to quarters on company punishment till further notice.
Yes, sir. But begging the major's pardon, sir, there must be some mistake.
- That man's not in my band.
- How's that?
I never saw him before in my life.
Bring that man back in here!
What's this I hear about your not being in the band?
Begging the major's pardon, sir,
I didn't say I was in the band.
At least not exactly.
All I said was I only joined up so's I could be in the band.
Oh. Well, that's all.
Yes, sir.
All right, so there's been a little mistake.
But that doesn't change what I said about knocking some sense into that outfit of yours.
- Yes, sir.
- That's all, Sousa.
Uh, just a minute.
What was that new march you played at retreat last night?
- "he Washington Post" march, sir.
- You write it?
- Yes, sir.
- It's not a bad tune.
But that doesn't mean that you can waste all your time writing music.
- Remember, you've got a reaI job to do here.
- Yes, sir.
- Thank you, sir.
- That's all.
If it's not asking too much, just what instrument do you propose to play in the band?
The sousaphone, of course.
- The sousa what?
- The sousaphone.
- I named it after you.
- You don't say?
Well, that's certainly very flattering. What in heaven's name is a sousaphone?
WelI, I guess you'd say it's a kind of tuba, sir, only it goes more like this.
- Oh, yes, sounds delightful.
- Yes, sir.
Let's hope you can think up some other improvements for the band... while you're confined to your quarters for the next four days.
- Me, sir?
- Except, of course, while you're marching eight hours a day...
- in a circle under full field pack.
- But, sir-
I believe those are the major's intentions.
Yes, sir.
[ Narrator ]
Yes, that was the Sousa of the '90s.
Sergeant Major Sousa of the Marine Corps.
But there was another Sousa who, although an enlisted man, lived in his own home apart from the base.
Sousa, the husband,
Sousa, the father,
Sousa, the citizen.
Jennie?
- Jennie?
- Coming.
What in the name of all get-out's been keeping you so long?
- I was hearing the children's prayers.
- Does that take all night?
hey were praying for you.
Well, that's very thoughtful of them, but there's no need to overdo it.
Jennie, I want you to hear this.
It's a ballad- the best
I've ever written.
By George, they won't be able to change this into a march.
Now stop throwing off on your marches, dear.
I think they're wonderful.
Of course they're wonderful.
But to hear people talk, you'd think they were all I can write.
Sit down, dear.
I'll sing it for you.
- No, dear, you play and I'll sing.
- I want you to hear this right.
Uh-huh.
But please, dear, not too loudly.
- I don't want to alarm the neighborhood.
- The neighborhood be hanged!
Come on.
Just sit down and play.
Now-
  My love 
  Is a weeping willow 
  Bending 
  Beside a stream 
  She sleeps 
  On her grassy pill- 
- mph! Start at the same place, dear.
- Yes.
  She sleeps 
   [ Resumes ]
  On her grassy pillow 
  Deep 
  In a lovely dream 
Shh.
  And there 
  Like a swallow homing 
  Swift 
  o her arms I'll fly 
  And there-  
   [ Piano Stops ]
Oh, I'm sorry, dear.
I can't help it.
I'd like to remind you that when I was a boy I was considered a very good singer.
Oh, I'm sure of it, dear, but you're a big boy now.
Maybe your voice has changed.
- Very funny. Very funny, indeed. here. ake that.
- Thank you.
- You're quite weIcome. Now just do as you're told. Play.
- Yes, dear.
Yeah.
   [ Resumes ]
  And there 
  Like a swallow homing 
   [ Fast March empo ]
- Jennie.
- Sorry.
It's really a lovely tune,
Philip.
I'm not sure it isn't your best... ballad.
Not bad.
Not bad at all.
   [ Whistling Along ]
If only your public could see you now.
The very dignified and proper Mr. Sousa.
Stonewall Jackson danced by himself, and he was not only dignified and proper, but-
Oh, just put it down here,
Nora. But pious as well.
Which is more than anyone can say for you. Thank you, Nora.
No sarcasm, please.
Just keep playing.
I need exercise.
I've been cooped up in this confounded house for the past four days, and from the look of this storm it'll be four more.
   [ umming Along ]
[ Mouthing Words ]
  My love 
[ Knocking ]
  Is a weeping willow 
- ello. Mr. Sousa in?
- Who's calling?
- Oh, just a friend of his.
- Is he expecting you?
No, but he'll want to see me.
Kind of damp outside tonight, isn't it?
- Ought to be. It's raining.
- You know what this is?
- What?
- Well, I guess some people might call it a tuba, only it's really not a tuba at all, because... between you and me and the lamppost,
I never did like the tuba...
- and wouldn't play one if I had to.
- What you got against the tuba?
Well, for one thing, it's- it's too loud.
So I had this one made with a big, upright bell that lets the sound come out... evenly over the whole band.
Sort of like the frosting on a cake. Listen.
   [ Singing Continues ]
   [ Sousaphone ]
What on earth?
What the devil's going on out here?
ello, Mr. Sousa.
Remember me? Private Little.
I just dropped by to show you that sousaphone
I was telling you about.
- Listen.
- Don't do that again.
You'll wake up the children.
- I'm sorry.
- It's quite all right,
Mr. Little.
The children are accustomed to strange noises in this house.
I'm Mrs. Sousa.
How do you do?
I'm fine, ma'am. And I hope
I didn't scare anybody.
I just wanted Mr. Sousa to hear how good it'll sound in his band.
Do you mean to say you came out in all this rain just for that?
Not altogether. What I really came by for was to see if you could go to a concert with me.
- To a what?
- To a concert, dear.
- hat's right.
- On a night like this?
I always say a concert sounds better if it's raining.
WelI, there may be something to that. mm, what kind of a concert?
Oh, just a concert.
Some fellow's going to sing some of your songs.
- What fellow?
- You wouldn't know him, Mr. Sousa.
But when I told him I was gonna bring you with me, he gave me a couple of passes.
- he deuce he did.
- Yes, sir, right down in front too.
Oh, imagine that, Philip.
Right down in front.
Really, dear, you know you can't afford to miss that.
Yes, but how can I go? Didn't you say Professor Estaban was coming over to play pinochle?
Oh, I'll take care of him.
You know how absent-minded he is.
He won't know whether you're here or not.
Now tell me, did this fellow mention of what songs of mine he was going to sing?
No, sir. e just said,
"Songs by John Ph. Sousa."
- Did he? Well, well.
- I'll get your coat.
- Now, wait a minute, Jennie.
- What was that funny noise,
Daddy?
Never mind.
Now run back to bed, all of you.
- What's that thing he's got around his neck?
- A monstrosity. Now, scoot.
Nora, will you see that they get back to bed before they catch cold?
- ShouId I give them a dose of something, just in case?
- I don't think that's necessary.
- Just see that they're covered up.
- What's his name?
- Come on now, children.
- Willie Little. What's yours?
- Priscilla Jane.
- Who's the big fellow next to you?
- [ Both ] John.
- John what?
- John Philip.
- John Philip what?
- Sousa.
- Junior. She's Helen.
- I'm Helen.
- Hello, Helen.
Say good night to Mr. LittIe, darlings, and go along with Nora like good children.
[ Children ]
- Good night, Mr. Little.
- Good night.
- Sweet dreams.
- Good night.
What time does the concert start, Mr. Little?
- Regular time- 8:30.
- Oh, then you'd better hurry, Philip.
- But, Jennie, I haven't made up my mind-
- Slip into this and button up.
If you're worried about his getting wet, Mrs. Sousa, you needn't.
I've got a cab waiting outside.
- You appear to have thought of everything, young man.
- Just about, sir.
- here now. Go along and enjoy yourself.
- Very well, dear.
But I warn you, if they start playing my marches instead of my songs, I-
You just get up and walk right out, dear.
- Yes'm.
- Good night, Mr. Little.
hanks for letting us know in time. And do come again.
- Thank you, ma'am. I will.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Philip, whatever it's like, please let the singer do his own singing.
- You sure this driver knows where he's going?
- Yes, sir. We're there now. Look.
- This is a concert hall?
- Well, sir, they've got other acts too.
Young man, you lied to me.
You deliberately enticed me to this den of iniquity.
uh. However, since we're here,
I suppose we might as well go in.
[ Man Chattering ]
- You just pay the man and come along.
- Yes, sir.
Get your tickets now, and later on-
Hurry, hurry, hurry.
Come inside, folks.
See the girls, the dancers-
- ere you are, driver.
- Step right up and buy your ticket, folks.
I've got the tickets, Mr. Sousa.
There's no waiting on the inside. No confusion.
See the gigantic and enthralling entertainment.
I congratulate you on your taste, Mr. Little.
Which, I might add, is right up my avenue.
   [ Band ]
 Oh, why should the spirit of mortal be proud 
  Like a fast-flitting meteor
A fast-flying cloud 
  A flash of the lightning
A break of the wave 
  e passes from life 
  o his rest in the grave 
  'Tis but a wink of an eye 
  Or the draught of a breath 
 From the blossom of health 
  o the paleness of death 
-  From the gilded saloon 
- [ Crowd Groaning ]
Get the hook and bring on the show!
Get that undertaker out of here!
Don't pay any attention to them, Mr. Sousa. I like it.
hen you're an idiot too.
hat fellow's voice is atrocious.
e's not singing it.
He's belching it.
- Quicken the tempo, man.
Bring up the music.
- Aw, button up.
You think I'm enjoying this any more than you are?
hrow him out of here!
[ Crowd Shouting ]
Get the hook and bring on the girls!
The hook! The hook!
  Shall fade 
  Be scattered  
[ Crowd Shouting, Booing ]
The scoundrel. Nincompoop.
Let's get out of here before that ass makes an even bigger ass of himself.
But, Mr. Sousa, maybe the next number will be better.
Mutilating my songs.
He ought to be drawn and quartered.
   [ Stops ]
[ Laughter ]
   [ "Pop Goes the Weasel" ]
[ Applause ]
   [ Continues ]
Couldn't we see just a little bit of this, Mr. Sousa?
- No.
- Oh, just the beginning, Mr. Sousa.
- We could sit right here.
- Oh, very well.
I suppose there's no harm in waiting till my blood pressure goes down a bit.
   [ Continues ]
   [ Ends ]
[ Applause ]
   [ Band ]
   [ Ends ]
   [ Resumes ]
[ Crowd Cheering, Whistling ]
   [ Ends ]
   [ "Pop Goes the Weasel" ]
   [ Ends ]
   [ Orchestra ]
[ Applause ]
[ Crowd Cheering, Whistling ]
Keep your eye on this.
[ Fabric earing ]
[ Crowd Laughing ]
- What did I tell you?
- Maybe it was an accident, Joe.
That was no accident.
The same thing happens every performance. Come on!
Everybody, keep your seats.
This theater's pinched.
- Me? Pinched?
- Unless we hurry. Come on.
- Where are we going?
- Why don't we go this way?
- Come on. Quick.
[ Man ]
Come on.
Let's get out of here.
[ Showgirls Screaming ]
- Where are you taking me?
- This way, sir.
Hey, here I am.
Here, take my coat.
Come on, Mr. Sousa.
This way. Let's go.
Cab. Cab!
[ Whistles ]
- Well, Lil, looks like we made it.
- Lil?
- You know this young lady?
- Sure, this is Miss Lily Becker.
Lil, this is that friend of mine
I was telling you about-
Mr. Sousa.
- Oh, I'm glad to meet you, Mr. Sousa.
- Thank you, Miss Becker.
It's always a pIeasure to meet young ladies whom
I find sitting on my lap.
[ Chuckles ]
Oh, I'm sorry.
- Good night, Professor.
- Oh, good night.
- Philip.
- It's been very nice.
Good night, John.
It's been nice to have seen you again.
Oh, wait, Professor.
Your umbrella.
Oh, yes.
Let me help you, Professor.
Oh, thank you.
Get inside. Go on.
Philip, what are you doing home so early?
I didn't expect you for another hour.
- It was either come home or go to jail.
- Jail?
That's what I said.
But for the agility of my good friend here, we all might be in the calaboose at this moment.
- Please come in.
- But why? What happened?
I believe the police considered it an indecent performance, my dear.
- I beg your pardon.
What was indecent about it?
- In my opinion, not a thing.
I considered the exhibition as delightfully innocent as a butterfly.
But apparently the bile of the sedate was upset... when one of the young ladies' tights had the misfortune to split.
Philip, what on earth are you talking about?
- About tights, my dear. Tights.
- At a concert?
Oh, this was a very extraordinary concert, Jennie.
You should have been there.
King Solomon gave a big blowout, the like of which you never saw.
Cleopatra went sailing down the Nile to call on Caesar-
By the way, this is one of the handmaidens of the queen,
Miss Lily Becker.
- Miss Becker, my wife.
- How do you do, Miss Becker?
And don't mind my husband.
- e's just teasing.
- It's all right.
I know he thinks it's funny, but I don't happen to.
And I don't have to stay anywhere and be insulted.
Come on, Willie.
No, no, please.
Philip, tell her you're sorry.
And behave yourself.
I'm sorry, Miss Becker.
I apologize.
- You needn't bother.
- Wait a minute.
adn't you better go upstairs with my wife first and see if you can find something less, uh, shall we say, revealing to put on?
I'm not ashamed of what I'm wearing!
Here's your coat! Good night!
Lil, you can't go out like that!
You're liable to get arrested or something!
- What if I do? What business is it of yours?
- It's plenty of my business, especially after all the trouble
I went to just to introduce you to Mr. Sousa.
Look, nobody asked you to introduce me to him.
It was your big idea, not mine.
But how did I know the show was gonna be raided?
All I was gonna do was bring him backstage so's we could fix it up for him to hear you sing.
- Oh, so that's what you were up to, eh?
- Yes, sir.
I couldn't tell you because how'd I know you wouldn't get on your high horse...
- and maybe not come at all?
- True. True. It was a gamble.
Do me a favor.
Go jump in the river and don't come up!
- Lil.
- I don't blame you for being angry, Miss Becker.
If I were in your place,
I'd be perfectly furious.
But I'm sure Mr. Little didn't mean any harm.
And as to hearing you sing, my husband would be delighted.
Won't you, Philip?
- If you say so, dear.
- When?
- Well, I might say that-
- Well, whenever Miss Becker wishes.
Then how 'bout now?
Come on, Lil, while he's in the mood. I'll play for you.
- Like- Like this?
- Why, I think you look charming like this.
Do you mind if we push the furniture back a little bit, Mrs. Sousa?
- Oh, uh, not at all.
- Then how about giving me a hand, Mr. Sousa?
Certainly, young man.
Nothing would give me more pleasure.
- We can put this right over here, sir.
- How much space does she need?
- Not too much, sir.
- I'm glad of that.
- I'm not used to having exhibitions in this room.
- Wait. I'll give you a hand.
Kind of heavy.
- You ready?
- Yeah.
   [ Piano ]
 My daddy, you'll find is sweet 
 And kind and loving as he can be 
  e's gentle and shy 
  Wouldn't harm a fly 
  But he has one peculiarity 
 Years ago poor Father had sunstroke 
  And it drove him mad 
 Every now and then he'll go off his onion
Don't you know 
 Yesterday he killed our cat with a blooming cricket bat 
 But when to smother me he tried 
 Mother and the children cried 
  Father's got 'em
Father's got 'em 
 Got the hycumflukus of the brain 
 He's walking round the houses without his coat and trousers 
 Whoops! Father's got 'em coming on again 
 With a hatchet in his hand he broke up the washing stand 
 On the window ledge he squats chucking out the flowerpots 
  Ate a pound of bailing wire
hen he set the house on fire 
 Shed a tear for Sister Sue 
[ Sniffles ]
 e tried to shove her up the flue, ooh 
  Father's got 'em
Father's got 'em 
 Got the hycumflukus of the brain 
  e's underneath the table
Singing darling Mabel 
  Father's got 'em
Yes, Father's got 'em 
 Yes, Father's got 'em coming on again  
Oh, thank you, Miss Becker.
That was very nice.
- Wasn't it-- Wasn't it, Philip?
- Uh, yes, yes.
Very, very pretty indeed.
I see no reason why, if Miss
Becker devotes herself to study for the next four or five years, she shouldn't earn a very fair living in the theater.
But of course, as our young friend here probably forgot to tell her, I'm really no judge.
After all, I'm only the leader of a brass band.
Come along with me, my dear.
I think I have a dress that will look very nice on you.
- Shall we rearrange the stage for the next act, young man?
- What?
- Oh, yes, sir. Sure.
- That's right.
   [ "Hail to the Chief" ]
[ Narrator ] Since the days of John Adams, second president of the United States, the Marine Band has been known as the President's Own.
As leader of that band, it was Sousa's privilege... to serve under no fewer than five chief executives:
Rutherford B. Hayes,
James A. Garfield,
Chester Arthur,
Grover Cleveland and Benjamin Harrison.
   [ Continues ]
   [ Band: Chamber ]
- Senator and Mrs. Shaw.
- Senator.
- His ExceIlency, Lord and Lady Blair.
- Lord Blair.
- Lady Barkley.
- Good evening, Lord Blair.
- Senator and Mrs. Kipling.
- Good evening, ma'am.
Mighty fine party you're having.
Sure beats anything you see out in my neck of the woods.
Oh, say, have you had a chance to think over that postmaster business... we were talking about last week, Mr. President?
- Not yet, Senator, but l-
- You couldn't pick a better man for the job.
He votes right every time, and he's got a heap of kinfolk that votes too. Oh, and say-
- Excuse me, Mr. Sousa.
- Yes?
he president wonders if the band could play something a little more lively tonight?
- Why, of course. We'll be delighted.
- Thank you.
I was under the impression he preferred chamber music.
e does as a rule, but there's so many long-winded office seekers here tonight-
I understand.
Tell the president...
- we'll do what we can to alleviate the situation.
- Thank you, sir.
   [ Ends ]
Gentlemen, number 11.
Drums, trombones, cymbals, sousaphone.
   [ "Semper Fidelis" ]
Wonderful. Wonderful.
The president says keep it up.
- And with even more spirit.
- Certainly.
Excuse me, Mrs. Sousa.
Would you mind telling me what that tune is?
- It's Mr. Sousa's latest ballad.
- Thank you. Ballad?
Dedicated to the Marine Corps and entitled "Semper Fidelis"-
Always Faithful.
Well, it's just wonderful.
Tell him he's saved the day.
   [ Ends ]
Mr. Sousa, as secretary of the navy, it gives me great pleasure... to present to you this special award... in recognition of your new march,
"Semper Fidelis."
It may interest you to know... that yours is the only musical composition in the history of our country... which has received the official recognition of the government.
Thank you, sir.
- Splendid march, Mr. Sousa.
- Thank you, Mr. Secretary.
- At ease, Sousa.
- I hope this little medal will put a stop... to all the talk
I've been hearing about you planning to leave the corps.
ow's that?
You're not thinking of leaving the Marine Corps, Sousa?
- Yes, sir.
- But why, man? Why?
Because I have five hungry mouths to feed, sir.
I have no choice.
But great guns, the Marine Corps won't be the corps without Sousa.
I'm sure there must be some very sound arguments against that statement, sir.
But for the life of me,
I can't think of a single one at the moment.
Well, what are you planning to do, Sousa?
Go to New York, sir, and organize my own band.
But that's the most ridiculous thing I've ever heard of.
With every band in the country already driving people crazy with your marches, you ought to be able to live right here in any style you want.
I wish that were true, sir, but the melancholy fact is... that for my three best known marches- the "Washington Post,"
"igh School Cadets" and "Semper Fidelis"-
I've received the grand total of exactly $105.
- he devil you say.
- Exactly, sir.
Well, but, uh-
What about taking the marine band on tour again this year?
I'm sure the tour will be as successful as ever without me, sir.
- When do you want to leave?
My enlistment will be up in 10 days, Mr. Secretary.
- As soon after that as possible.
- Very well.
In the meantime, if there is anything we can do... to show our appreciation of what you've done here, let me know.
hank you, sir.
I can think of nothing-
   [ Sousaphone ]
What was that?
That, sir, was a peculiar instrument known as the sousaphone, which is not only unique, but in the opinion of the young man who plays it, indispensable.
I suspect he was reminding me that if he also could be discharged-
- e'd like to go with you?
- Yes, sir.
- You'd like to have him?
- With certain misgivings, yes, sir.
ow about it, Major?
Do you think we can spare this indispensable young man?
Well, if that sound he just made is an example of his ability as a musician,
I think we might very well make an exception in his case.
- Then by all means, let us do so.
- Thank you, sir.
That will be all, Sousa.
[ Clicks eels ]
Thank you, sir.
[ Chattering ]
[ Cheering ]
Good morning, gentlemen.
[ All ]
Good morning.
Before beginning our auditions, let's be sure that we understand each other thoroughly.
This is to be no ordinary brass band, bound by outmoded precedents and traditions.
Our job- our only job- will be to put on a good show, which means that if our audiences prefer "urkey in the Straw" to "Parsifal," we'll play
"Turkey in the Straw."
And let there be no mistake about this.
I shall be the leader of this band, which means that if your interpretation... of a score turns counter to mine, mine will prevail.
hank you, sir.
[ Laughing ]
While ours will be a civilian organization, we'll live and work under what may strike you as military discipline.
A great part of our time will be spent on tour, both here and abroad.
You will, therefore, accommodate your domestic arrangements... to the demands of the band.
In plain language, this means that under no circumstances... will wives be permitted to travel with husbands.
[ Chatter ]
Now then, are there any questions? Huh?
Very welI. We'll take the cornets first.
Will you kindly step on the stage, please, gentlemen?
Thank you.
- Mr. Sousa.
- Yes?
- Excuse me, sir, but what about a singer with the band?
- What singer?
- Surely, sir, you're gonna have a singer with the band.
- Am l?
Surely, sir, if you're gonna break precedents and traditions, you've got to be progressive.
And how can a band be more progressive than by using singers?
Of the fair sex, I take it, and not too unattractive to look at?
Well, naturally not, sir.
You wouldn't by any chance have some candidate in mind for this progressive role?
Come to think of it, sir,
I have. I'll be right back.
[ Laughing ]
Come on, Lil.
He's crazy about the idea.
- I know exactly how crazy he is about it.
- You do?
Yes. And I also know you lied to me again.
Why, he hadn't the faintest idea of hiring a singer for his band.
- How do you know he hadn't?
- I listened through the crack in the door, that's how.
- You mean to say you've been eavesdropping?
- To every word you said!
Here I let you talk me into giving up a perfectly good job in Washington... to come to New York, only to find out you hadn't even mentioned the subject to him.
You didn't have to kick so hard.
You haven't feIt anything yet if this turns out to be another one of your wild-goose chases.
   [ Piano ]
   [ Woman Vocalizing ]
   [ Ends ]
[ Applause ]
Thank you, madame. hank you.
That was splendid.
Ah, Mr. Little.
Good morning, Miss Becker.
How nice of you to come for our tryout.
We'll endeavor to get to you a little later on.
Meanwhile, let me introduce you to Madame Estelle Liebling of the Metropolitan Opera, whom I engaged several days ago to sing with the band.
- Several days ago?
- Yes. In one of my more progressive moments.
- How do you do?
- Thank you, madame.
Oh, yes, the cornets.
Now, uh, what is your name, please?
- erman Brautisch.
- Herman Brautisch.
- A passage of triple tonguing, please.
- It's all right, my dear.
We'll talk about it later.
   [ Cornet ]
hank you, sir.
That was very good.
But what I reaIly had in mind was something more like this.
   [ Fast, Precise ]
Would you care to try again?
[ Closing Case ]
[ Laughing ]
[ Narrator ] Whether it was triple tonguing on the trumpet, or a simple roll of the timpani,
Sousa had but one standard- the best.
From all corners of the earth they were assembled.
Such men as Arthur Smith, solo cornetist of London's elite Coldstream Guard.
enry Koch, America's great French horn player.
A youthful Arthur Pryor, trombonist, who, a few years later, would lead his own distinguished band.
Monsieur Jambon, bassoonist of the Paris Conservatory.
John S. Cox, Scotch flutist.
Richard Messenger, oboist.
err Schmidt, bass drummer and timpanist from the
Garde du Corps of Berlin.
All coming together at the opening of the great
World's Fair in Chicago... to form the most famous band the world has ever known-
Sousa's Band.
   [ Volume Softens ]
   [ March ]
   [ Ends ]
[ Applause ]
[ Applause Stops ]
   [ "urkey In he Straw" ]
[ Narrator ] This was the beginning of Sousa's first grand tour with his own band- the first of many grand tours- which would take him and his band... to almost every city and hamlet in America... and eventually to almost every country in the world, and which would win for him the title the "March King."
   [ Ends ]
   [ "he Washington Post" ]
   [ Spanish ]
   [ March ]
   [ French ]
   [ "Semper Fidelis" ]
   [ German ]
   [ "he Washington Post" ]
   [ Russian ]
   [ "Semper Fidelis" ]
   [ Ends ]
  Na, nee, na, no 
[ Lily ]
  Na, nee, na, no 
  Na, nee, na, no
Nice round notes, signorina 
  Na, nee, na, no-o-o-o 
  Na, nee, na, no 
 Na, nee, na, no no, no, no, no, no  
- Where do you think you are going?
- Home!
If you're not-a prepared to do as I tell you, why do you bother coming here at all?
- I've been wondering about that myself.
- Oh, wicked, ungrateful girl!
Wait till I tell Mr. Sousa how he's been rewarded... for all the time and money he's-a wasted on your lessons.
- You won't have to tell him.
I'll tell him myself!
- Ooh!
- Why you through so early?
- I'm not through so early.
I'm through for good.
- ow's that?
- I'm tired of trying to make myself into something I'm not.
From now on, if you or anybody else doesn't like the way l sing, you don't have to listen.
Who said anything about not liking the way-
I could take lessons from now till doomsday and never be able to sing the sort of stuff...
- that man wants me to sing.
- What sort of stuff?
Who does he think I am-
Jenny Lind?
   [ Singing In Italian ]
  La, la-la-la, la-la-la 
[ Nasally ]
  La-la-la, la-la-la 
  La, oh, la, la 
  a, ha, ha, ha, ha, ha, ha  
What the-
Ooh!
Excuse me, ma'am.
A Miss Becker's here to see you.
Miss Becker? Oh, Lily.
Show her in. And bring another cup, please.
Yes, ma'am.
Why, LiIy, what a pleasant surprise.
- ello, Mrs. Sousa.
- Mr. Sousa and I were talking about you today.
- e's very pleased with the progress you're making.
- He is?
In fact, though it's still supposed to be a secret, he's planning to take you on his next tour.
That'll be very nice.
Thank you.
But I'll let him tell you that himself.
Sit down.
You're sure I'm not intruding?
I mean, if Mr. Sousa's-
Mr. Sousa's upstairs in his study with his publisher.
They'll probably be at it for hours.
Thank you, Thelma.
I always take cream, but if you'd prefer lemon.
Oh, no, cream's fine.
You're upset about something.
What is it?
Mrs. Sousa, how do you get to be a lady?
- A what?
- A lady, like you.
Well, I- I don't know.
I'd never thought about it.
- I- I'm not always sure
I am a lady.
- Oh, yes, you are.
ow do you know?
- You never raise your voice or get mad, and you-
- And you do?
All the time.
-Well, what about Willie?
Doesn't he think you're a lady?
-Not anymore.
- Why not? What happened?
- He kissed me.
- Oh, he did.
- He did.
And what did you do?
- I slapped his face. Then I kicked him.
- Hard?
Hard as I could.
But-But that's not what's worrying me.
It's that he knows
I liked being kissed.
Oh. And you don't think a lady should like that?
Not when she knows nothing can come of it, that she can't get married.
But who says you can't get married?
You know how Mr. Sousa feels about members of the band taking their wives on tour.
And- And when I get married,
I'm not staying home for anyone.
as it ever occurred to you... that what Mr. Sousa doesn't know won't hurt him?
- As to being a lady-
- Confound it!
This is the last straw!
- Let me try to explain!
- You don't like it, you'll get no more music of any kind from me.
- All I said was-
- I heard what you said.
The best ballad
I ever wrote in my life too.
- Do you have to come through here shouting like that?
- I'm not shouting!
- Can't you see I'm busy?
- I'm busy too. Do you suppose
I'm playing tiddledywinks-
[ Shouting Continues ]
Now, what was I talking about?
Oh, yes, as to being a lady.
Isn't it really a matter of what goes on inside of you... and not whether you raise your voice occasionally, or get mad, or like to be kissed?
As a matter of fact,
I know some grand ladies who like to be kissed.
Indeed, they insist on it... regularly.
It's just being yourseIf that counts.
So if you want my advice,
I'd say the next time
Willie kisses you, you forget all about slapping his face and just kiss him back.
- ard?
- As hard as you can.
And I'd waste no time finding an opportunity to do it either.
hat's what I did when
Mr. Sousa first kissed me, and look where it got me.
Come on.
I'll sing it for you myself just to prove it.
Oh, no. No, dear. No, Philip.
That will ruin everything.
Philip! Philip!
[ Door Closes ]
[ Chorus ]
  I've a secret in my heart 
  Sweet Marie 
  A tale I would impart 
  Love to thee 
  Every daisy in the dell 
- Do you rent boats?
- Boats? What do we want with boats?
- Do you?
- What does that sign say,
"Keep off the grass"?
- Come on, Willie.
- Twenty-five cents.
- What do we want with boats?
- Please, Willie. Come on. Get in.
  Sweet Marie 
 When I hold your hand in mine 
  Sweet Marie 
[ Sniffing ]
- Well, I'll be doggoned.
- Hmm?
- I never would have believed it.
- Believed what?
That you'd deliberately go to all of this trouble- douse yourself with a whole bottle of perfume- just to get me to kiss you again.
- I didn't!
- Oh, yes, you did.
I did nothing of the sort!
You're crazy.
here was something fishy about you wanting to come to
Central Park, hiring a boat, when you know very well you've never been in a boat before in your life.
hat's not true, and I won't stay and listen to another word. Take me back.
If that's what you want, I don't mind.
I'd just as soon kiss you.
Don't you dare touch me!
I'll kick you again, right out of this boat.
- Go ahead and kick.
I'm used to it by now.
- I'm warning you-
  Come to me, sweet Marie 
  Sweet Marie, come to me 
 Not because your face is fair 
- I didn't use a whole bottle of perfume. 
- How much did you use?
- Half a bottle.
- Who cares?
It worked, didn't it?
  Makes my happiness 
  Complete 
- ey, I've got an idea.
- What?
- Why don't we get married so's we can keep on doing this?
- When?
- I don't know. he sooner, the better.
- Willie, that's wonderful.
- But we can't.
- Who says we can't?
You know Mr. Sousa's rule about wives traveling with the band.
- Oh, yeah. I forgot about that.
- No, it's all right.
Mrs. Sousa told me he's going to take me on his next tour anyway, and, well, everyone knows the rule only says husbands can't take their wives.
here's nothing about wives taking their husbands.
Anyway, what he doesn't know won't hurt him.
  Sweet Marie  
   [ Band: Waltz ]
Thank you. hank you.
With your permission, we will now play
"The Washington Post" march, the tune with which you have chosen to introduce your new dance, the two-step, a dance which,
I am reliably informed, is going to knock Mr. Strauss's waltzes into a cocked hat.
[ Laughing ]
Ladies and gentlemen,
Miss Lily Becker and Monsieur Bonnet.
   [ Band:
"The Washington Post" ]
[ Applauding ]
Now then, everybody dance the two-step.
   [ Band Resumes ]
Miss Bellis, may I have the pleasure of this dance?
Oh, thank you, Mr. Sousa.
I'd be delighted.
Confound it, Blakely!
Can't whatever's agitating you wait until I finish dancing with my wife?
This telegram- It's from John
Purvis, manager of the Cotton
States Exposition in Atlanta.
- It says we're canceled.
- Really? Does he say why?
he other two bands they've had haven't drawn 10 cents.
What are we going to do?
We're going to inform Mr. Purvis that, like Caesar,
Sousa expects him to render unto Sousa that which is Sousa's.
After which it might be advisable to get in touch with our friends in Atlanta... and wait for the fur to fly.
Right. Come, dear. We're missing the best part of the dance.
Attend to that right away,
Blakely, please.
- Mr. Little.
- Oh, Mr. Sousa.
Nice dance, isn't it?
Yes, very nice indeed, but the music sounds a little thin.
That's only because you're not conducting it, sir.
[ Mock Chuckles ]
Upon my word, ma'am, I've never danced with so charming and graceful a two-stepper.
And upon mine, sir, I've never danced with so charming and flattering a liar.
[ Whistle Blowing ]
[ Whistle Continues ]
- Oh, porter.
- Yes, sir.
Who's in that drawing room down there?
You mean the one the lady who sings in your band's in?
- hat drawing room right there.
- Yes, sir. That's the one
I mean. Miss Lily's.
- You're sure of that?
- Why, yes, sir. l just made up her berth about 10 minutes ago.
- Do you want to talk with her?
- No. No, no, thanks.
No, it's all right.
Thank you.
- Yes, sir.
- Yes, sir, Mr. Sousa.
Good night.
- Jennie. Do you know what I just saw?
- I'd say a ghost.
Worse than that.
I've never been so shocked in my life.
Why, that boy's been just like a son to me, and that girl-
- What boy, dear? What girl?
- Willie Little and Lily Becker.
Right under our very noses too.
And after all the trouble
I've gone to to prevent just this sort of thing.
What are you talking about, dear?
What sort of thing?
You'll never believe it.
I hesitate even to mention it, but something has to be done.
I just saw him slipping into her room, with my own eyes.
Really? What's the youth of this country coming to?
Tsk, tsk, tsk.
You mean you condone such conduct?
- I'm highly in favor of it.
- Jennie!
- e's been slipping into her room for weeks now.
- What?
- And why not? After all, they're married.
- Married?
- Yes, dear. Till death do them part.
- But that's impossible.
They know how I feel about husbands and wives going on tour together.
Well, that's why you mustn't let on you suspect a thing.
Next time, just look the other way.
[ Kisses ]
[ Train Whistle Blowing ]
You sure no one saw you come in here?
I didn't come in here.
I snuck in here.
That's what I don't like- all this sneaking business.
We ought to tell Mr. Sousa.
- Uh-uh. hat's part of the fun.
- Suppose he finds out?
We can always say
I was walking in my sleep.
You mean you'd lie to Mr. Sousa after he's been so wonderful to both of us?
Listen, Mr. Sousa's got other things to worry about besides us.
He doesn't notice little things like-
So you call being married to me a little thing?
- Oh! Oh!
- Where's it hurt? Honey, I'm sorry.
- My ankle.
- I'm sorry. I shouldn't have jumped.
If it'll make it feel any better, go on and kick me.
   [ Calliope ]
[ Carnival Barker Calling ]
[ Mouths Words ]
Sandoval, the Strong Man!
- Ah, good morning, Mr. Purvis.
- Morning, Colonel.
- And how are things going, huh?
- Kind of slow.
FrankIy, I'm sorry I ever got mixed up with this job.
Too bad you had to cancel Sousa's band.
Things might be different.
Now, listen, Colonel.
Brass bands don't draw flies, especially brass bands from up North.
Excuse me, CoIonel. I got a heap of things to do inside.
You go right ahead.
   [ Drumming ]
   [ "Dixie" ]
Yeow! It's Sousa!
Sousa?
[ Excited Chattering ]
[ Crowd Cheering ]
   [ Ends ]
[ Cheering ]
Ladies and gentlemen, let me introduce to you... the most famous band leader in the world today,
Mr. John Philip Sousa!
[ Cheering ]
I am authorized by Mr. Sousa to announce... that he will give two concerts daily... in the ballroom of this building-
50 cents admission.
All receipts over and above the actual expenses... will be turned over to the United Confederate Veterans... to do with as they see fit!
[ Cheering ]
- Ah, Mr. Pickering, you have a word to add?
- Yes, Colonel.
Uh, Mr. Sousa has asked me to read a sample of the sort of programs... you may expect to hear inside this building.
"Overture to William ell" by Rossini.
- Song: "Dixie."
- [ Cheering ]
Waltz: "The BIue Danube" by Strauss.
Song: "Dixie."
[ Whooping ]
"King Cotton" march by Sousa.
Song: "Dixie."
I am further authorized to state... that all encores will be "Dixie."
Yee-hoo!
Thank you, sir.
Before retiring to the ballroom for our first concert, we would like, with your permission, to play one more selection.
Col. Randolph tells me it's long been a source of satisfaction here in the South... that on the night of General Lee's visit... to General Grant at Appomattox, the Marine Band in Washington- of which I later had the honor to be leader- marched to the White ouse to serenade President Lincoln.
On this occasion, one of jubilation for the North, of defeat and despair for the South,
Mr. Lincoln asked for only one tune- that which you have just heard, "Dixie."
In return for that compliment, we will now play, assisted by the Stone Mountain
Church Choir of Atlanta, another tune which has come to be identified almost exclusively... with our late president.
 Mine eyes have seen the glory 
  Of the coming of the Lord 
 e is trampling out the vintage 
 Where the grapes of wrath are stored 
 He has loosed the fateful lightning 
 Of his terrible swift sword 
  is truth is marching on 
  Glory, glory, hallelujah 
  is truth is marching on 
   [ Brass: Fanfare ]
 e has sounded forth the trumpet that shall never call retreat 
 e is sifting out the hearts of men before his judgment seat 
 Oh, be swift, my soul to answer him
Be jubilant, my feet 
  Our God is marching on 
  allelujah 
 Glory, glory, glory hallelujah, hallelujah 
-  allelujah 
-  Hallelujah 
  Hallelujah 
  Hallelujah 
  allelujah, hallelujah
Hallelujah 
  allelujah 
  Hallelujah 
 allelujah, hallelujah lujah, lujah 
  Lord 
  Glory, glory, hallelujah 
  Our God is marching on  
[ Applauding ]
[ Narrator ]
Now the really fabulous years were beginning, and as he went up and down the country, back and forth across the seas,
  [ Band ] a seemingly endless flow of tunes- marches, ballads, overtures- gushing from his fertile brain, the whole world seemed bent on doing Sousa honor.
From England came the Victoria medal.
From France the Palm of the Academy.
From Wilhelm of Germany,
Franz Joseph of Austria, the tzar of all the Russians.
At home cigars were named for him.
   [ Band: Fanfare ]
Every vaudeville theater had its imitator.
Press and public alike vied with each other to make his name a household word-
[ onking ] every birthday a national event.
Would you mind telling us how old you are today, Mr. Sousa?
Not at all.
Like the young lady in
Mr. Oscar Wilde's new play,
I became permanently 35 as soon as I reached 40.
How did you ever decide to be a musician in the first place, Mr. Sousa?
When I was young,
I had a fondness for rolling a ball around the floor.
One day a celebrated musician suggested to my father... that music lessons would break me of this unfortunate habit.
So I became a musician.
For you.
   [ Small Band: Off-key ]
What's that?
Philip, come. Look!
Well, what is it, Jennie?
   [ Continues ]
[ Mouths Words ]
Bravo! Bravo!
Come on inside, boys, and have a piece of my cake.
[ Cheering ]
   [ Band ]
[ Narrator ]
Always new- that was Sousa.
Always progressive, as he had promised to be.
Forever seeking new and diverting ways of entertaining... his vast and worshipful audiences.
Gentlemen, it's quite possible that very shortly you'll be hissed out of the theater... if, indeed, you're not hung from the nearest lamppost.
But whatever happens, you will have the satisfaction of knowing... that you acted strictly in the line of duty.
I personally guarantee that each of your widows will receive a suitable pension.
   [ Band ]
   [ Whistle Blowing Rhythmically ]
[ Whistle Blows ]
 When it's springtime in New York 
 here's a certain way they walk 
 With a bold and jaunty swing 
 All the dandies have their fling 
  If a girlie passing by 
  Indiscretely winks her eye 
  ake a tip and turn the corner
If you slip then you're a goner 
 When it's springtime in New York 
[ Men ]
Wow!
  From the Bronx to Staten Isle 
  Love is now the latest style 
  Boys and girls exchange affections
Coppers give the right directions 
  All the trolleys make connections
Politicians hold elections 
 When it's springtime in New York 
[ Whistles ]
[ Mock Gasping, Exclaiming ]
Phew.
 On the night that I struck New York 
  I went out for a quiet walk 
  Folks who are onto the city say 
 Better by far that I took Broadway 
 But I was out to enjoy the sights 
 here was the Bowery ablaze with lights 
 I had one of the devil's own nights 
  I'll never go there anymore 
Oh!
 ake my money and take my all 
 But spare my beautiful parasol 
  If you're after a kiss or two 
 hen my answer is this for you 
  Don't you trifle
It's all in vain 
 riflers end up with a ball and chain 
  ere comes the navy
Won't somebody save me 
 Oh, Officer rescue me now 
  he Bowery, the Bowery 
 hey say such things and they do such things 
  On the Bowery, the Bowery 
  We'll never go there anymore 
   [ Whistling ]
 When it's springtime in New York 
 You should hear the way they talk 
[ Sailors ] Oh, you kid.
  When a girl says
"Twenty-three skidoo" 
  What she means is
"Baby, I love you" 
  Every dolly has her swain 
  Every street is lovers' lane 
  It's the season to be sparking
Lovers all go Central Parking 
  When it's springtime
It's springtime 
  It's ring time 
  In New York  
   [ Band Resumes ]
Bravo! Bravo!
   [ Ends ]
[ Applauding Continues ]
[ Drumroll ]
Ladies and gentlemen,
I have just been informed... that at exactly 49 minutes past 9:00 this evening, the battleship Maine was blown up in avana arbor and sunk.
Between 200 and 300 officers and men... are reported to have lost their lives in the explosion.
While President McKinley has urged the people to remain calm, well-informed sources in Washington expressed the opinion... that only a miracle can prevent war with Spain.
The army and navy have both been ordered to be ready for any emergency.
A call for volunteers is expected momentarily.
Why do you, of all people, have to be a hero?
Me? I'm shaking already.
John L. Sullivan's right.
If Spain wants to fight, why doesn't she challenge somebody her own weight... and get a reputation first?
I'll mention that if I run into any of them down in Cuba, heaven forbid.
In the meanwhile, we'll-
Governor!
Well, good morning,
Willie, Lily.
What are you doing here?
Enlisting, sir.
What are you doing?
hey still have bands in the Marine Corps.
Sure, sir, but I thought that you were too, uh-
- That I was too old?
- Oh, no, sir. I just thought that-
- Never mind.
Whatever it is, you're wrong.
- Right, sir.
Well, hello, young fellow.
You got the war fever too?
All right. Now don't hurry me.
I know what you're after.
Let me see.
Oh, sorry. Not a penny.
- Here you are, sir.
- Oh, thanks very much, Willie.
Here you are, boy.
   [ Upbeat ]
[ Laughing ]
[ Bell Chiming ]
- What's wrong?
You don't like spaghetti?
- Sure, we love it.
- Too much garlic?
- No, it's fine.
- You want some more Chianti?
- No, thanks.
If you want something else, you better order because we close 11:00.
Nothing else, thank you.
We just want to sit here a little longer.
I've onIy got a few more minutes.
ey, listen.
Why don't you get married so you have someplace to go?
We are married.
That's why we can't be seen together.
Oh.
- You'll probably never write me.
- Only every day.
- I suppose we better go.
- Not yet.
I'm going to kiss you- just once- then we're going.
- In here?
- In here.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Thank you.
Why they don't get divorced and marry each other-
[ Speaking Italian ]
[ Arguing In Italian ]
[ Narrator ]
Yes, Sousa was a volunteer, too, but he was not to serve.
A severe case of typhoid fever sent him to sea instead, there to write the music for DeWolf Hopper's new comic opera, El Capitan.
But even at sea there was a war to think about, and he-
But let him tell in his own words what happened.
[ Sousa's Voice ]
Suddenly, as I paced the deck,
I began to sense the rhythmic beat of a band playing within my head- ceaselessly playing- echoing and reechoing the most distinct melody.
Though I did not know it then, my brain band was composing my most popular march, not one note of which, once I had transferred it to paper, would ever be changed.
   [ Orchestra ]
  I'm afraid
I must be only dreaming 
 For there is no one like you 
 I'm afraid that you are far too sweet and lovely 
  o ever be true 
- Philip.
 I'm afraid that if I awake 
What is it, dear?
- As you can see, we're very busy.
- Yes. I know, dear.
 You'll be gone and my heart will break 
This just came in the morning mail.
 So I'll spend my life just a-dreaming of you 
   [ Singers Vocalizing ]
  I'm afraid that if I awake 
 You'Il be gone and my heart will break 
  So I'll spend my life 
  Just a-dreaming of you  
Thank you, ladies and gentlemen.
That was splendid.
Uh, Lily, may I speak to you a moment, please?
Ask Mr. Hopper if he'd like to run through the "El Capitan" march again, will you?
- Yes, sir.
- Hello, Lily, dear.
- ello, Mrs. Sousa.
- I have a surprise for you.
- I've just had a letter from Willie.
- From Cuba?
Yes. Let's go over there and find out what the young rascal has to say for himself, hmm?
   [ Men Singing ]
Sit down, dear.
Shall I read it, or would you rather read it yourself?
It's for you.
You read it.
"Dear Mrs. Sousa,
I'm writing to you instead of to Lily...
"because you know what a flibbertigibbet she is... and how she starts carrying on like a chicken with its head cut off at the least little thing."
Lily, a flibbertigibbet?
He's out of his mind.
"I guess you know more about the war back there than we do down here,
"but I thought I'd tell you about a little scrap we had at Cuzco Well the other day,
"in case the newspapers didn't figure out it was big enough to write home about.
"Cuzco Well was the enemy's only water supply...
"and naturally we wanted to get them out of there.
"So 'C' Company and 'D' Company-
That's me-
"started out early one morning along with about 50 Cubans.
"It was only six miles from camp, but in this heat it seemed like 60.
Boy, was it hot.
Just like Washington in July."
I don't remember that Washington was so hot in July.
Then you have a short memory, dear. Washington can be unbearable in July.
Hmm. Never mind.
Go on, Jennie.
"WeIl, anyhow, it wasn't long before the Spaniards caught on to what we were up to...
"and cut loose on us.
"Luckily, one of our gunboats,
The Dolphin,
"was just offshore, and so we signaled them to start shelling.
"But I guess they must have got mixed up,
"because instead of shelling the enemy, they began shooting at us.
"Sergeant Quirk, who is one of the real heroes of this war, if you ask me,
"stood up in clear sight of everyone...
"and wigwagged to them to cut it out, which they did.
But not quickly enough,
I guess, because that's when I got it."
He's all right, Lily.
Don't worry.
Uh, you read the rest of it, dear.
"I guess I'm the A-number-one lucky fellow of this war...
"because I only got it in the knee,
"when I might just as well have got it where it would be really bad.
"Anyhow, as I was telling the doc last night,
"if worse comes to worst and he does take it off- which he won't-
"one leg's enough for anybody who aims to sit around as much as I do from now on.
"Besides, like a fellow from West Virginia was telling me,
"'You can't tell wooden legs today from the real thing.'
"e says he's gonna get a mahogany one so's he can keep it polished up.
"But another fellow
I know from Mississippi says that's crazy...
"and he's gonna get himself a nice, soft pine one,
"so's when he gets bored, at least he can do a little whittling.
"ell Lily I said that if she starts bawling...
"or gets any crazy ideas about coming down here,
"I'm gonna head for the tall timbers.
"The thing for her to do now is to go on and be a big hit in that show...
"because from now on, she's liable to have to support me- and I mean in the style
I'm accustomed to."
- We should have told you.
We're married.
- Yes, we know.
- You know?
- Almost from the beginning.
It's been pretty difficult at times,
I can tell you, not to let on.
Shall I finish?
"I hope you and Mr. Sousa and the children are fine...
"and that El Capitan's as good as everything else the governor's written-
"or better, if that's possible.
"Well, I guess this will have to be about all now,
"as it's time for chow, and you know me and food.
[ Man ]  I'm afraid 
"Love to all, Willie.
  That if I awake 
P.S.:
Tell Lily I said howdy."
  You'll be gone 
  And my heart will break 
[ Sobbing ]
  So I'll spend my life 
Golly, that DeWolf Hopper's sure got a powerful voice, hasn't he?
  Dreaming of you  
[ Cheering ]
   [ "El Capitan" ]
[ Narrator ]
Yes, the war was over and, as from every war, men were coming home- the well and the strong, the sick and the wounded, the halt and the lame.
   [ Puffing In Rhythm o March ]
You can go right in,
Mrs. Little.
Hello.
Mr. Little, wake up.
You have company.
Lily.
Well, what a coincidence.
I was just dreaming about some of those seoritas in Cuba... when all of a sudden
I look up and-
I don't guarantee this show.
Usually just some of the fellows- kind of amateurish.
We'll soon find out.
[ Drumroll ]
[ Drumroll Continues ]
[ Cheering, Whistling ]
- Did you know about this?
- Of course.
I don't have to tell everything I know, do I?
Good evening, ladies and gentlemen.
It's a great privilege and pleasure to be here with you tonight, and with your permission,
I'd like to play a new march... which I've written especially for you men who fought this war.
Unhappily, we are missing one musician, a young man who plays not only a unique but an indispensable instrument in the band.
By a strange coincidence, however,
I understand that this young man is here tonight.
I'm hoping he'll come up here and help his old friends out on this occasion.
- How 'bout it, Willie?
- Go on, Willie.
- ello, Willie.
- Hello, Mr. Sousa.
- Can you still read music?
- I can read your music in my sleep.
All right. Come on up, young fellow. There's the old monstrosity waiting for you.
Get over and let's see.
[ Applauding Continues, Cheering ]
Hi, boy!
How's the old kid, huh?
[ Man ]
Willie, it's good to see you.
   [ "he Stars and Stripes Forever" ]
   [ Continues ]
   [ Ends ]
English - US - PSD
Subtitles: Lus Filipe Bernardes
Wait a minute, fellows.
You got this all wrong.
- l never laid a hand on her.
- We got there just in time.
That's the trouble with you nightclub entertainers. You're all alike.
You think you can own every dame in the country.
Show me a law in the country that says l can't buy a doll a friendly drink.
No law, just don't buy a drink in your hotel room for a doll that's underage.
- Let's get goin', bud.
- How'd l know she was jailbait?
She looked like she was 35.
Want I should ask for a driver's license? lf you had, you would have found out she was the mayor's daughter.
But-- Well, can't we talk this over?
Come on !
You're leaving town now!
- l can't. l'm broke.
- Here's your ticket.
One-way.
All aboard!
Thank you.
- Taxi!
- Taxicab!
Cab, lady?
Taxi, sir?
No, thanks. l got my car and chauffeur meetin' me.
Step lively for a tour of San Francisco.
Aid, young man?
Can l give you aid?
- What did you have in mind?
- l beg your pardon.
- Lovely homes and gardens.
- Get your early morning paper.
Golden Gate Park, the world-renowned Cliff House... overlooking the Pacific.
- Let your hips swing around the whirl.
- Herm, you need a singer?
Singer? l don't care if you sing like a nightingale. l'm runnin' a girls' show.
Legs, not tonsils. l see what you mean.
Thanks a lot.
This is the place you can write home about.
This is the spot.
Hurry, hurry.
The show is just about to begin.
Plenty of seats available.
Step right on in out of the rain.
Everybody happy on the inside.
We got the greatest show in town.
The greatest show.
Come on in and hear
Ned Galvin And His Galvinizers... the hottest band in town.
We got the finest food in town.
Hurry, hurry.
Everybody happy on the inside.
Go on right in, bud.
Hey, hey!
How are your fortune cookies?
Hi, maestro.
Remember your old pal Joey?
How could l forget? You still owe me
30 bucks from San Diego.
What do you think l'm doing here? l came back to pay you the loot.
- Oh, man, am l glad to see you.
- Sure.
Take it out of my first week's salary.
Tell the management l'm available.
- You're always available.
- You got to stay loose.
That's the trouble, you see, but we have an M.C.
Excuse me a minute.
Listen, can't we go someplace after the show?
Have a cup of coffee and yak up old times? Have some laughs?
That'd be good, but l got a date with a girl. lf she's a good-looking chick, bring her along.
She's good-lookin' all right.
You don't understand.
Joey's turned over a new leaf.
New Joey, huh?
Sure, how about that?
How good-lookin' is she?
Back again, huh?
I'm a red-hot mama
But I'm blue for you l get purple with anger
At the things you do
And l'm green with envy
When you meet a dame
And you burn my heart up
With an orange flame
I'm a red-hot mama
But you're white and cold
Don't you know your mama
Has a heart of gold
Hey. Who's the mouse with the built?
A terrific rainbow over you and l
You got to lay off of her, Joey.
She's a nice kid.
She has ambition too.
She wants to be a singer.
By the way, l'm helping her with some of her arrangements.
Looks like she's pretty well arranged as it is.
- Has that crummy M.C. shown up yet?
- Not yet, Mike. He must be stuck.
Yeah, in a crap game. That's twice this week this bum has been late.
What do you want me to do? Cut his number out and we'll go right to finale?
- Yeah, go right into the finale.
- Okay then.
Over you and I
Come on, ladies and gentlemen.
Let's hear it. Make the ladies know it.
You can do better than that.
Thank you. Thank you very much, ladies and gentlemen.
We bid you good evening. l'm very happy to be working in my hometown of...
San Francisco. l've never seen him before. l was born right here in this town, right top of Telegraph Hill.
Yes, sir, my mother was sending a wire at the time.
That's in Morse code. Secret Service joke. What are you gonna do?
- You know this bum?
- Yeah, l know him.
- What's his name?
- His name's Joey Evans. ls that the same Joey Evans that caused all that trouble... at the Hi-Ho Club a few years back?
You mean the same Joey Evans who-- l've had a request to do a song that's dedicated to all the saloon keepers... who are blowing their liquor license called "l Didn't Know What Time lt Was." l didn't know...
Oh, boy. C7, please. l didn't know what time it was
Till l met you
Oh, what a lovely time it was
How sublime it was too
I didn't know what day it was
You held my hand
Warm like the month of May it was
And I'll say it was grand
He's got them in a trance.
Better they stay awake. ln a trance, they won't drink. lf they won't drink,
I got to go out of business.
Grand to see your face
Feel your touch
Hear your voice say I'm yours
Alone l didn't know what time it was
And then I met you
Oh, what a lovely time it was
How sublime it was too
I didn't know what day it was
Then you held my hand
Warm like the month of May it was
And I'll say it was grand
Grand to be alive, to be young
To be mad, to be yours alone
Grand to see your face
Feel your touch
Hear your voice say
I'm all your own
He's cute!
You think anyone with pants on is cute!
That's a lie. l Iike lots of people without pants.
- What l mean is--
- Let it lay, honey. l'm wise and l know what time it is now l'm wise and
I know what time it is now
I'm so wise
And I know what time it is now
Thank you very much.
Okay, hit the finale.
- Say, when do I start?
- You already started.
- What about my billing?
- Your what?
My billing. You know, my picture out front.
- Are you kidding?
- Who's kiddin', Mike? l got a big following. Put my picture out front, they'll break the door down.
You'll have the rope up every night.
One bad night and you'Il be on the end of it.
Get this straight, lover boy. l heard a lot about you.
I don't want you sniffing around the customers' dames.
One false move and you're out on your Frances.
Yeah, you.
That's what l like, Mike.
Security in a job.
Say, nobody's brought it up yet, but l get 200 a week.
- What?
- l'll take less. l made it a point never to argue with the fellow who owns the saloon.
When the sun goes down it is wide awake
Take your ma and your pa and go to Frisco
Boston is England
New Orleans is France
New York is anyone for ten cents a dance
But this great big town by the Golden Gate ls America's first and Americans make
San Francisco
She was one of those new kids, a little nervous, you know.
So l coached her a little bit, if you excuse the expression.
She was singin' all those ballads and that draggy jazz.
One day when the fleet landed... she wanted to know from me what would please the sailors most.
So l told her.
Things were never the same between us again.
- Linda English, Joey Evans.
- Hi.
Yeah, she was quite a doll, that little redheaded girl of yours in San Diego.
Mine? lt was your redheaded girl. lf you want to get technical about the situation... she was really the manager's girl, and she was a brunette at the time.
So good to see
American food again. l've been out of the country. l've been working for six months in Honolulu.
- You don't look very tan.
- lt was the rainy season. lf you really want to know what they wore under those grass skirts--
- Easy.
- Sorry.
- Excuse me, Miss, uh--
- English.
- For you, Ned.
- Okay, baby. Excuse me. l heard about you, buster.
- Big reputation.
- Yeah.
But I'm too much of a lady to say what for.
My sister worked with you in Fresno.
She told me all about you.
Which one was she?
The one you didn't get to first base with.
Oh, she was the ugly one.
Must be twins.
Hey, fellows, good news.
We're coming up in the world.
Got a call from the agent, and he wants us to play a society party on Nob Hill.
Shorty, you call the union and get four extra guys.
Okay, Ned.
Something must have happened to the band bus. lt broke down somewhere.
- You want to go along?
- We'd love to.
Wait a minute. Maybe this could be a chance to pick up a couple of bucks.
Ned boy, l'll never forget you for this.
Oh, yes, you wiIl forget it.
Tell the drummer to get you a jacket.
- Nice to have met you, Miss, uh--
- English.
Gotta remember that.
There is a small hotel
With a wishing well l wish that we were there
Together
There is a bridal suite
One room bright and neat
Complete for us to share
Together
Looking through the window
You can see a distant steeple
Not a sign of people
Who wants people
When the steeple bell
Says, good night, sleep well
We'll thank the small hotel together l don't recognize the body, but the face is familiar.
That's Mrs. Prentiss Simpson.
She owns the place.
She didn't pick up that action at Arthur Murray's.
You're right. She used to be
Vera Vanessa. She was in show business.
Then she married a wealthy guy and retired. Don't you remember?
- lt was all in the papers.
- Yeah, now l remember.
"Vanessa, the Undresser.'' l didn't recognize her with her clothes on.
Not a bad-looking mouse. lt's too bad you can't afford her brand of cheese.
And when the steeple bell
Says, good night, sleep well
We'll thank the small hotel
Together
Sold to the highest bidder, our charming hostess, Mrs. Prentiss Simpson.
Ladies and gentlemen, l believe this ends our little auction. l know you'll be very happy to learn... that the Children's Hospital will be richer by... lt's a wee bit short of our goal of 20,000... but unfortunately we seem to have run out of articles to auction.
Just a minute, Mrs. Simpson. l believe l have something to auction.
How much would you bid to hear
Mrs. Simpson do one of her numbers?
This is her favorite charity.
She couldn't possibly say no.
How much will you pay to see the lady do the number... that made her name a byword from coast to coast?
Don't tell me you don't remember Vera Vanessa?
She used to be Vera with the vanishing veils.
You needn't start the bidding. l will open the bidding. l will get things going by bidding $1,000.
Yes, sir, a thousand bucks to see our lovely hostess... do the number exactly as she did it on the New York stage.
Well, not exactly because... she promised the police commissioner she would never do it that way again.
Do l hear 2,000? 2,000?
- That's hardly enough.
That's hardly half enough.
We've got to do a lot better than that. l'll bid $4,000.
Do I hear $5,000?
$5,000, ladies and gentlemen.
Doesn't any--
Please-- $5,000!
- l'll bid 5,000!
- $5,000 the man bids.
Sold to the man for $5,000!
Ladies and gentlemen, l give you Mrs. Prentiss Simpson.
You louse. ln Paris
I headlined the follies
Billed as doll of all the dollies
Admired by the great Stravinsky
But my greatest achievement in the height of my career
Was the time I starred for Minsky
You're looking at a former stripper
But before I unzip one zipper
I want it known
I was quite the artiste
But the intellectual kind
What was I thinking while I worked you might ask
While I worked these thoughts kept crossing my mind
Zip, Walter Lippmann wasn't brilliant today
Zip, will the Giants ever take it away
Zip, l was reading
Schopenhauer last night
Zip, and I think that Schopenhauer was right
Sigmund Freud has often stated dreams and drives are all related
Zip, I'm a firm believer
Dorothy Dix's daily column tells that love is dear and solemn
Zip, l can take or leave her
Zip, it took intellect to master my art
Zip, every movement from the heart l have read the works of Plato
Translated most of Cato
Zip, I am such a scholar
I don't care for Whistler's mother
Charley's aunt or Schubert's brother
Zip, had to make a dollar
Zip, you have asked me what l think while l work
Zip, I've an intellectual quirk
And my thoughts may skip whenever so inclined
Oh, zip
Zip, zip l'm a broad with a broad, broad mind
More! More!
Thank you very much, ladies and gentlemen.
Now if you'll all step onto the terrace, supper is being served. l think that's a dandy idea.
Nothing like a midnight snack--
Just a minute, my presumptuous friend.
The help is being fed in the kitchen.
T-R-U-- lf you ever want to make a comeback, l got some dandy material.
You can reach me at the Barbary Coast Club.
- Good night, Ned.
- Good night. See you in the morning.
Before l go, there's one thing l'd like to know.
What's that?
What would you have done if you'd been stuck for the 4,000?
Simple. l'd have killed myself.
- Good night, Miss, uh--
- Forget it.
- Good night, Linda.
- Good night, Ned. See you at rehearsal.
Of all the dirty, rotten, lowdown tricks.
- What are you talking about?
- You know what l'm talking about.
Linda. You know l'm stuck on her.
- l never even gave her a second look.
- That's just it.
This is a beautiful girl, and you act like she doesn't exist.
What are you trying to do?
Make a move with her?
- Who, me?
- No, him! l told you l turned over a new leaf.
She's not my type.
They're all your type, Joey.
Wait a minute.
Where are you going? l'm going to stay with you. l got to have a place to stay.
Not with me. I just as soon bunk with a cobra.
Just a minute.
Here's 20 bucks.
This is your share of tonight's take.
And you know what?
- What?
- Get your own room.
Ned, l'm hurt, really.
But if that's the way you want it, okay.
Sure, l know. l'm going to hate myself in the morning.
You may not have to wait that long.
- What do you want?
- l want to rent the room.
At this hour?
Come back later. l need it now. l'm tired.
Sure you're not one of those sex fiends?
Me? No, but l'm not against it.
- Where's your baggage?
- l left it at the airport. lt's coming in the morning.
By the way, when the boy comes, would you tip him? Here's $10.
All right. l'd like something quiet.
You wouldn't have a room next to someone who works nights, would you? l've got just the thing.
Second floor front... next to a young lady-- an actress-- but very refined.
You share a bath.
We do?
She's nice and clean. ls this what you want? lt's the closest thing to it. l don't allow pets, cooking in the room or guests of the opposite sex... unless related. l have several nieces.
That'll be $40 a month in advance.
You wouldn't have change of a hundred dollars, would you?
Think l want to get murdered in my bed?
No, of course. Well, here's 10, ma'am, on account.
Right. l'll get you some towels.
Thank you. l'll hurry her up.
- Who is it?
- Mrs. Casey. l want you to meet your new neighbor.
Oh, no!
- You know each other?
- Mm-hmm.
- What a coincidence.
- lsn't it though?
If you were my girl, you wouldn't need one of those.
Well, l'm filling it for Mrs. Casey.
You shouldn't really wear pajamas.
You're definitely the nightgown type.
The shorties. l'll pay you next week.
You alter that one to fit this good, l'll send around all my friends.
Never mind sending your friends.
Just send your money.
Hi there, fellow. Bet you wish you were out here, don't you?
- Well, if it isn't Ned's girl?
- l'm not his girl.
Oh? He told me you were. l don't want to complain, but you used all the hot water this morning. l thought that you could use a cold shower.
He's a cute fellow, isn't he?
Reminds me of a dog l had when l was a kid. His name was Snuffy. l was crazy about him. One day he got run over by a milk truck. l haven't been able to drink milk since.
Wish l could afford to buy him.
Gets a little lonely traveling around the country all by yourself.
Don't you have to run a song over with your boyfriend today? lf you're speaking about Ned,
I told you once and for all he's--
You're just good friends.
That's right.
So long, Snuffy.
By the way, both of us use a green toothbrush.
One of us is going to have to change.
Barbary Coast Club. Come right in and see our sensational girls... and featuring Joey Evans.
Come on.
- Come on.
- Joey, stop.
When do l get a door on this broom closet?
You don't. l couldn't trust you behind a door.
Say, lover boy, where's that big foIlowing you're supposed to have? lt takes a little while, Mike.
You got to let the word percolate. lt better percolate pretty quick.
- Evening, Mr. Megans. Hi, Joey.
- Hi, doll.
Stop over tonight? l want to show you my hi-fi.
This kid's got a fine woofer and tweeter.
Hey, Herm.
Like l was saying, Mike, you got to let the people know l'm here.
Your name's out front, isn't it? What's the matter? Your public can't read?
Sure, they can read, boss.
Blow up my picture.
You're blown up enough already.
Here are your shirts, Joey.
Just the way you like them, no starch.
What an arrangement.
You bum. ln two weeks you've moved in on every doll but Gladys and Linda.
Show time!
- Gladys doesn't appeal to me.
- And you don't appeal to Linda.
Oh, no? l got plans for this doll.
Ring-a-ding plans.
This little mouse takes a special kind of baiting, Mike.
You're wasting your time.
She'll never go for it.
They all do. lf they asked me l could write a book
About the way you walk and whisper and look
I could write a preface
On how we met
So the world would never forget
And the simple secret of the plot ls just to tell them
That l love you a lot
Then the world discovers
As my book ends
How to make two lovers of friends
Whoever heard of singing a love song like this without a girl?
Come on.
About the way you walk and whisper and look
And the simple secret of the plot ls just to tell them
That l love you a lot
Then the world discovers
Sing.
As my book ends
How to make
Two lovers
Of friends
- Fun, huh?
- lt was wonderful.
How's it feeI working with a star?
Oh, don't let it go to your head.
Just baiting the trap.
Why, you--
Hey, Linda. l'm taking a bath. l'll be out in ten minutes.
Would you like me to scrub your back?
No, and you needn't bother peeking through the keyhole.
There's a Band-Aid over it.
How about a nice Sunday dinner? l'll take you out to the Cliff House, and we'll have shrimp cocktail... and a steak and French fries and a little wine.
You know, the whole mishmash.
Thanks. l can't afford it.
What do you mean you can't afford it? l'm poppin'.
Why, that's very generous of you, Joey. l'd love to. lt's funny how we both use the same toothpaste.
Yes, mine. lt's little things like that that bring people together.
Look, there's your friend.
Why, he's glad to see you.
Look how he likes you. lt's just amazing. l come by and talk to him every day through the window. l pretend like he's mine.
You really would like to own him, wouldn't you? l'd give my right arm.
- How much is this little terrier?
- Twenty-five dollars.
- Twenty-five bucks?
- We'lI take him.
- Wait a minute. What are you doing?
- No excuses. l made up my mind. l couldn't let you throw away all that money on a date with me. l want you to buy what you really want.
A dog to replace Snuffy. l don't want the--
What l mean is...
Mrs. Casey wouId never let me have a dog.
Oh, but she will. l told her how much it meant to you.
She was touched.
She won't be so touched when he ruins the rug.
Nonsense. He'll be housebroke in no time.
- Here you are.
- Thank you.
Here. A dog to replace Snuffy. He's all yours. You'll never be lonely again.
That'll be $25, mister.
Would you like to take some worm medicine?
Not if l can help it.
What about dinner? They'll never let us in the restaurant like this.
Now don't worry about me.
You just run along home with Snuffy.
Look at that.
He's crazy over him.
Yeah, he loves me.
Well, don't Iet it go to your head.
Bye, Joey. Bye, Snuffy.
Twenty-five bucks for a mutt like you.
You're not exactly what l expected to wind up with tonight.
Terrier.
Terrier, my ankle.
Bet you don't even know who your old man is.
Don't worry about it. l don't know who mine is either.
That makes us members of the same club.
Let's see what you know.
Sit up. Roll over.
What a no-talent pooch.
Okay, get some sleep.
Tomorrow we start working.
Teach you some tricks.
No, my little fellow.
Off. O-R-F.
Off!
Here. Come on.
And remember.
The powder room is in the park.
Okay, fatten up.
Snuffy! Don't take it!
- You mustn't do that.
- Why not? The pooch is hungry.
- What? Chicken bones?
- What's wrong with that?
You mean you used to feed them to Snuffy?
There never really was a Snuffy, now was there?
There is now. l guess l played a dirty trick on you, huh?
Doesn't matter.
He's beginning to grow on me now.
So are you too.
What's with the milk bit? l says, "Doc, how long do l have to sneak in the back and drink this stuff? lt doesn't look good to the customers."'
Hey, Mike, Mrs. Simpson, the big society dame, just come in.
Mrs. Simpson? ln my place?
Table nine.
Take him for a walk.
That's her. l told you l'd bring her in.
Wait a minute.
Do me a favor, will you? Let me handle this. l'm very big with her kind.
- You're pretty big above your ears.
- l'm serious.
Some guys got a system with horses, and l got a system with dames.
- Hit me.
- lt's a snap.
You treat a dame like a lady, and treat a lady like a dame.
And underneath those furs, that is pure dame.
This place was definitely not recommended by Duncan Hines.
Wouldn't we have more fun bobbing for apples? Why bring us here? l've got a little score to settle with one of the inmates.
Watch Joey lay on the class. ln the meantime, you stock up on the caviar and the champagne... because this dump is going to cater to nothing but the carriage trade.
Good evening, Mrs. Simpson.
We're honored to have you here. l'm so pleased to see you came all the way down from the Nob Hill.
Well, the boy auctioneer.
Won't you join us? l'd be delighted. l'm Joey Evans.
- My name's Stanley.
- Mine's Livingston.
Stanley and Livingston.
That's funny.
They have a sense of humor. l like that.
Reminds me of old Dad's.
- Dad's?
- Yes, my father.
He used to tease me about one thing or another, particularly about my flying.
Your flying? ln my sports plane.
Oh, l love my life.
There's something you get out of flying that you get out of nothing else.
Really?
It used to upset him, because l started when l was quite young. l'm sure you started very young. lt was while l was studying aeronautics and conversational French at Princeton.
That is, before l resigned to go into the theater.
Pierre!
When is he going to study conversational English?
Would you bring the folks a bottle of the best champagne in the cellar?
- Oh, yes. Yes, sir.
- Thank you.
Care for something to eat? They have a piece of resistance that's great.
No, thank you.
We ate before we came.
Yes, l can't say l blame you. l must apologize for the crum-- decor.
The man who owns this place is an old buddy of mine.
We were in the same platoon.
WelI, he wired me for help when l was in New York. l quit my job at the Waldorf, and here l am. l've always admired men who were loyal to their friends.
Just between you and me l have been thinking about opening my own place.
Something very intimate, quiet.
Classy. Maybe have a quartet of violins. l'd be there every night.
- You would?
- Mm-hmm.
That's wonderful.
What are we going to call it?
Well, l thought we'd call it something romantic... and maybe foreign even.
How about...
Chez Joey?
That's very good. That's perfect. l like that. lt's even French.
Here we are.
You sure that stuff is old enough to be out on its own?
Yes, sir, 1950, a very good year.
May have been a good year for the grape, but it was a lousy year for M.C.s.
To Chez Joey.
That's what l like.
Champagne that fights back.
Show time.
That's me. Excuse me. l do a little song in this show.
It's a lovely love song, especially for some of my friends.
What is this?
Oh, we were just slumming, beauty, and we have a lot of spots to make.
What's next, boys? That place where the young lady dances with the snakes?
So that"s your system, huh?
Guess l tried it on the wrong mare.
Your system just run out of the money and so have you. You're through!
You're kiddin'! Don't you know a phony act when you see it, Mike?
She had to do that with those two guys along. She'll be back.
Get your things and get out of here before l wreck my furniture.
Wait, wait, wait. You'll be sorry.
Come here. l want to make you a deal. lf she doesn't come back by Saturday, l'll leave without pay.
- You bet you wilI.
- But if she comes back, l stay.
With a raise?
Okay, you got a deal.
Excuse me, madam.
There's a gentleman to see you.
He wouldn't give his name.
When l asked his business, he seemed to talk a vernacular l couldn't follow.
- Sounds like Superboy.
- l beg your pardon?
Same vernacular. l'lI see him.
You bet you will.
Get rid of the pallbearer.
All right, what is it?
- l dropped in to say good-bye.
- Are you going somewhere?
Yep, away. lt worked, baby. l got the old bounceroo.
- l'm through at the end of this week.
- l didn't mean that to happen.
Don't worry your head about it. l'm sick of this lousy town anyway.
What l really come up here for is to straighten you out... so you wouldn't get any wrong ideas why l made a play for you.
Wouldn't want you to get any cockeyed impressions that you appeal to me.
The only thing about you that appeals to me is your M-U-N-Y, money.
- Do l make myself clear?
- Crystal clear.
By the way... if you knew what you were throwing away, you'd cut your throat.
Oh, Mr. Evans?
Have you had lunch?
Thank you, Mrs. Simpson, but l have a luncheon date with a dog.
Okay, it's lunchtime. Come on.
There you go.
Come on, boy. l know it's not chopped liver, but you eat what l eat... for the time being, anyway.
Here. Try this bagel.
Hey, the fingers are mine. Easy.
You ought to try that with cream cheese and lox. lt's great.
You stick with me, you'll learn nothing but bad habits.
Okay, it's time for your lessons.
Let's see what you've learned.
We'll begin with the praying bit.
That always gets them.
And while you're at it, pray that
Mrs. Simpson remembers to show up.
Lover boy.
You're gonna love it on the road.
Joey, it's Linda.
May l come in?
Yeah, sure, come in.
Make yourself at home.
Gladys says you're leaving.
Yeah, that's right. l got a wire from Hollywood.
Why didn't you tell me?
Why should l?
You don't care what happens to me.
Well, of course l do.
All the girls do. l don't care about all the girls, baby. l just care about you.
Do you mean that, Joey, or is it just an act?
Of course l mean it.
We're sure gonna miss her, aren't we, Snuffy? l'm gonna miss you too. l'm very fond of Snuffy.
Why don't the three of us have supper tonight?
Show business is a funny business.
We may never run into each other again.
Tonight could be our last night.
All right, Joey. l'll change my things. l'll take you out to the Cliff House, and we'll have shrimp cocktail... and steak and French fries and a little wine.
You know, the whole mishmash.
Mind the store. l'll finish your laundry, Joey.
You can pick it up later.
Gee, l sure am gonna miss you. l'm gonna miss you too, doll.
Your flatwork is a gasser. l hear you got the old bounceroo, big shot. lf you mean that you heard l was leaving, you got it straight. l'm on my way to New York,
El Morocco.
Are you kiddin'?
The only way you could get to Morocco is to join the Foreign Legion.
Funny! Funny!
- Here's some scraps for your dog, Joey.
- Thank you, chef.
- Don't mention it.
- Dog, my foot. He eats them himself.
Why not? lt's good stuff.
Would you care to join us, sloppy?
Take it easy.
Don't get excited.
- Mrs. Simpson !
- Good evening.
- Won't you come in?
- Oh, am l too late?
You? Never! l'm in the mood for a little entertainment.
- Pete, get the boys out of the kitchen.
- Yes, sir, right away.
Champagne for the band and make mine a double brandy.
- Double brandy for Mrs. Simpson!
- Okay, Mike.
- l believe you have a singer.
- Yeah, Joey.
Joey, sing a song for the lady.
What would the lady like to hear me sing?
Tell him to surprise me.
Joey, surprise the lady. l'lI surprise the lady.
Double brandy.
Twenty-six.
She gets too hungry
For dinner at 8:00
She likes the theater
Never comes late
She'd never bother
With people she'd hate
That's why the lady is a tramp
Doesn't like crap games
With barons and earls
Won't go to Harlem
In ermine and pearls
Won't dish the dirt
With the rest of the girls
That's why the lady is a tramp
She likes the free
Free fresh wind in her hair
Life without care
She's broke, but it's oke
Hates California
It's cold and it's damp
That's why the lady is a tramp
She gets far too hungry
To wait for dinner at 8:00
She adores the theater
And she doesn't arrive late
She'd never bother
With people she'd hate
That is why the lady is a tramp
Won't have a dice game
With any barons and earls
She will never go up to Harlem
Dressed in ermine and pearls
Won't dish the dirt
With all the other girls
That is why the lady is a tramp
She loves the free
Free fresh wind in her hair
Life without care
She's broke
Hates California
'Cause it's so cold and so damp
That's why the lady
That's why the lady
That's why the lady is a tramp
Come now, beauty.
Not only will l give him a raise, l'll buy him a bicycle.
Champagne for everybody!
What do you know, a parking lot for boats.
- v-E-R-A.
- That's correct.
- See how smart l am?
- Care to come aboard?
I'd love to, Captain.
This is quite a hideout.
Providing you have something to hide.
Oh, that can be arranged.
Yeah, this is a clever kayak, isn't it?
My husband gave it to me.
He's never been aboard.
Why doesn't he try a little Dramamine?
This is the dining salon.
And just beyond is the galley. l know, it's where you keep your slaves. Slaves?
Nothing. Well--
And this is the master suite.
By the way, where is the master?
My husband died two years ago.
And no cracks. l was just gonna say that if you ever get tired of being a wealthy widow... you might like to go back into show business.
No thank you. l like being Mrs. Prentiss Simpson. l'm not knocking you being Mrs. Prentiss Simpson.
But l just thought you and me as a team, we'd make a dandy double.
Aren't you afraid you might find me a bit rusty?
Don't be ridiculous.
Why don't you get out of something uncomfortable... and l'll give you a small audition.
Oh, beauty.
You have all the subtlety of a battering ram.
But you wrong me, my dear.
What l meant was perhaps you'd like to run through one of my old routines-- one l used to do before l became an M.C.
No thank you.
That would bring back too many memories.
The sticks, split weeks, drafty dressing rooms.
Drunks tossing pennies.
That's the story of my life.
But l'm going places one of these days. l gonna have a club all my very own... my name up in lights.
No hokey waiters rattling plates when l'm on.
No tough managers beItin' me around.
Be my own boss.
Nobody owns Joey but Joey.
Chez Joey?
Chez Joey: a place with real class. l might even appear in white tie and tails.
Might even wear an opera hat.
Suave stuff.
Easygoing stuff. l might do all of the patter like that.
Maybe l'll do the whole thing in French.
Maybe you'd better not.
That's what l said.
Maybe l'd better not.
You'd give a lot for a place like that, wouldn't you?
Anything.
How about it?
You and me could be partners.
What would l get out of it?
Name something.
There"s nothing l don't have.
You want a bet?
After all, two years is a long time between drinks.
Oh, you can hit better than that, partner.
Bon jour, madame.
Yes, isn't it?
Bon jour, bon jour, bon jour.
Madame a-t-elle bien dormi?
Magnifique.
Madame dsire que je fasse quelque chose por elle?
Non, merci.
Bien, madame.
He's a fool... and don't l know it.
But a fool can have his charms. l'm in love... and don't l show it.
Like a babe... in arms.
Men are not a new sensation l've done pretty well
I think
But this half-pint imitation
Put me on the blink
I'm wild again
Beguiled again
A simpering, whimpering
Child again
Bewitched, bothered
And bewildered
Am I
Couldn't sleep
And wouldn't sleep
And what would l do
If l shouldn't sleep
Bewitched, bothered
And bewildered
Am l
Lost my heart
But what of it
My mistake
I agree
He's a laugh
But I love it
Because the love's on me
A pill he is
But still he is
All mine
And l'll keep him until he is
Bewitched, bothered
And bewildered
Like me l guess the laugh's on me
I've slipped again
I've tripped again
The way to my heart is unzipped again
Linda, you up yet? l've been up for hours.
Open the door. l want to talk to you.
What do you want?
What's the idea with all the ice? l get it. You're burned up because l took a powder last night.
What possible difference could it make to me?
Good morning, Snuffy. l've got a bone for you.
Speaking of Snuffy, l'm thinking of making you a present of him. l'm planning on blowin' this trap.
Gonna move to a place that fits my personality a little better.
- You're not gonna leave the club?
- Nope. l'm gonna take the club with me.
Come here. Let me show you something.
Look straight up the top of that hill, Nob Hill.
That's where l'll take the club.
Little old me.
- You?
- Me... and Mike and all the girls and everybody in the joint. lt's gonna be the same cast, the same booze but a new address.
How? What happened?
Did somebody die?
No. As a matter of fact, somebody came to life.
- l have a partner.
- Who?
Yes, ma'am, we're gonna have a real classy joint. K-L-A-S-Y.
- Who's we?
- Me and my partner.
Who is your partner, Joey?
Mrs. Simpson.
Now wait a minute.
Don't get the wrong idea.
This is a legitimate business-- lawyers, six-percent interest, everything.
Everything?
Now don't give me that "everything'' jazz.
After all, this could be my big chance, and it could be yours too... because l got a great idea for you in a number in the show.
Tell me. Just what do l have to do for it?
Just remember all the lyrics.
How about Snuffy?
You gonna take him or aren't you?
You bet l'll take him.
Not even a dog should live with you!
His leash.
Bye, Snuffy.
So long, old pal.
Lucky little dog, gettin' to live with Linda.
Don't let her fool you.
She's a nice girl.
She just acts like all nice girIs act: lousy.
Good morning, Mr. Boss.
How are you, Herm?
Now that you got this swell new joint, l guess there's no place for me.
Not at all.
You got a job.
Gee, Joey, thanks.
Wherever there's mice, there's always a rat. l'd like them about out to there.
Out to here.
Well, there it is, Chez Joey, just like l pictured it to be.
A dream come true.
- lt means that much to you?
- You bet it does.
Took a lot of years of scrounging and scratching to get a joint like this.
That isn't how you got it.
Oh, l'm sorry. l shouldn't have said it.
Maybe--
Maybe you're in love with her.
He looks a little thin.
Don't you feed him?
A lot better than you did.
He just doesn't eat.
Maybe he's getting lonely.
Don't look at me. l'm eating fine.
Who was that?
One of the mice in the line.
- The pretty one?
- ls she? l didn't even notice.
You were certainly knee-deep in conversation. l was asking about my dog.
Yours? What's she doing with it? l gave him to her when
I evacuated Mrs. Casey's rattrap.
- She lived there too?
- Yep.
Why didn't you bring him with you?
Because he wasn't yet yacht broken.
My funny valentine
Sweet comic valentine
You make me smile
With my heart
Your looks are laughable
Unphotographable
Yet you're my favorite
Work of art ls your figure less than Greek
Is your mouth a little weak
When you open it to speak
Are you smart
But don't change a hair for me
Not if you care for me
Stay, little valentine
Each day
Is Valentine's Day
- When did she spring from the chorus?
- Who?
The mouse in the spotlight. l'm beginning to talk like you.
You mean Linda?
Well, she's Ned's girl.
He's kind of stuck on her.
We talked it over and we figured she was ready.
Ready for what? very nice, Miss English. lt was just wonderful, beautiful.
Pretty good, huh, Ned?
Let's do the "Kick lt Around'' number.
Come on, kids. Let's go.
Don't you think she was pretty good, partner?
Not quite good enough.
She's just beginning. Give her time.
Wait till you hear this next number. l think she'd be better off someplace else.
Would you like to explain that? l'll make it simple for you.
She's out.
- You want me to fire her?
- Yes, partner. l figure it's the onIy way to protect my investment. l don't mean the club, l mean you. l think it's a stinkin' trick.
Come now, beauty.
Don't tell me you've developed a better nature.
Come on, Snuffy.
Linda, you decent?
Just about. Come in. l've been thinking that you were so good in that number... l decided to give you something better to do.
- You did?
- A real blockbuster.
That's wonderful.
Which one? l thought maybe you ought to do the strip.
But Gladys does that number.
You wind up out there with nothing on.
What do you think l am?
You're the best built mouse in the joint, so let's take advantage of it. l won't do it! l'm sticking to my song. l'm sorry, baby, but l've already given the song to Gladys.
- l just thought you'd be pleased.
- Wait a minute.
There's something more to this.
You knew l'd say no.
You wanted me to. Why?
Your girlfriend told you to get rid of me, didn't she?
- Look--
- Don't interrupt!
But you didn't have the guts, did you?
You wanted me to quit!
Chez Joey.
Well, that's a laugh.
Why don't you change it to Chez Vera?
What are you waiting for?
You've run your errand.
What happened to your head?
There's something you ought to know. l didn't have to fire her. She quit.
That's the same thing.
Don't let it bother you. l'm sure she'll have no trouble finding another job.
Sure. She can always pitch for the New York Giants. l want a bourbon, straight. lsn't it a little early in the day for a girl who doesn't drink at night?
On second thought, make it two.
- What's with the watch bit?
- lt's getting late. Finish your drink.
What for? We got all night.
Oh, no, we haven't, beauty. l'm giving a dinner party.
So?
Put another plate at the table. lt would make 13, and l'm superstitious.
Only thing l'm superstitious about is 13 in bed.
You'll have to leave. l guess you think maybe l don't know what fork to use.
Well, you're right, l don't, but l wouldn't eat with those creeps anyway. l'll see you at the boat later. l'll go down to the corner and grab a hamburger.
How should l have my hamburger... with or without onions?
Without.
You're a cinch.
What happened?
How come you didn't show? l had to hear "Tristan and lsolde.''
Hear him do what? lt's an opera.
Of course.
Afterward, they all came back here and l couldn't get out of it.
Aren't you gonna pipe me aboard?
- What was that?
- l'm listening to the late news.
Sleep tight, doll.
Talk to you tomorrow.
Man's best friend.
Or was that your mother?
I wonder what she'd say if she could see me now.
She'd say that you were stoned.
And she'd also want to know what you're doing in my bedroom. l decided to take your offer.
What offer?
Strip.
Peeled.
Take it off and let it lay.
You were right. l do have a good shape.
Confidentially... l'm stacked.
Bet you thought l wouldn't, didn't you? l'll bet you even thought that l couldn't.
But l can.
And l will.
Bewitched
Bothered lt's all right, Snuffy. lf l walk in my sleep, bite me.
Well, good morning.
Oh, what's good about it?
Oh, your first hangover, huh?
Well, there's a first time for everybody.
Why do people drink when it feels so awful the morning after?
Maybe because it feels so good the night before.
What did l do last night?
You kissed me. l wasn't myself.
Yeah, but whoever you were, you were great.
Then what?
Then you passed out.
I'm ashamed of myself.
Me too.
Why? What did you do?
Nothing.
Let's try on some breakfast.
Come on. lt'll do you good.
Nice and easy.
Snuffy, please.
Not so loud.
- There you are.
- You cook?
You can't go through your life on Wheaties alone. l couldn't, Joey. l got an idea. lt's an old family recipe.
Hangovers run in my family.
My old man wrote the book. l think this will straighten you out. Go on.
Come on, Snuff.
Come on, boy. Up.
A bagel.
Something he picked up from me.
Fine pupil.
- You really don't feel well, do you?
- It's not just the hangover.
You see, where l come from... a girl just doesn't spend the night on a yacht and then stay for breakfast.
Of course, we don't have any yachts.
By the way, where do you come from?
Albuquerque.
What's wrong with Albuquerque?
For one thing, they don't have any yachts.
Secondly, l'm surprised your mother let you come to the big town.
Well, my mother says a nice girl's a nice girl wherever she is.
Yeah, l know.
And a bum is a bum.
She didn't say that.
Besides, what about last night? l made a fool out of myself, and you didn't take advantage of it.
Don't pin any medals on me. lt just so happens in my book it takes two to tango.
Why are you ashamed of your good impulses?
Maybe it's because l don't get many.
You got a feIlow in Albuquerque? l suppose you could caIl him that.
His name's Alfred. Works in a garage.
Grease monkey. No contest. lt's a boat race.
He owns the garage.
Well, l better go.
Thanks for everything.
Maybe l ought to start rehearsing that number.
You mean, now that you're sober you still wanna do the strip number?
Was it your idea... or was it hers?
Of course it was my idea. l run the joint, don't l? lt says "Chez Joey.''
All right then, if you really want me to do it, then l'Il do it.
Good. l'm glad you decided to.
The first guy who drops a knife on the opening gets it in the back.
That's all, kids. Thank you.
Okay, next number. l never thought she'd do it. l've seen 'em come and go, but l thought this girl was different.
Hold it.
Cut.
You can all stop drooling.
Put your clothes on.
Well, what do you know.
Prince valiant. l'll hit you a shot in the head.
Get up and do the number.
A pIeasure.
Here. Try this.
Blow your nose. l'm sorry.
Forget it. lt was a nice try.
No, it wasn't. lt was awful. l just wanted to die. l know what you mean. l guess your mother was right.
A nice girl's a nice girl anywhere and a bum is a bum. l shouldn't have let you do it.
Fix your face and put on your dress.
We're gonna do the love song.
Joey, somebody wants to see you. l won't be long.
Hi, doll. What's the rush? l was rehearsing. lt may not be necessary.
What do you mean?
You lied to me.
You told me she quit.
Well, she did, but she decided to come back.
Be reasonable, baby.
The mouse means nothing to me. She needs the dough. She's got a sick mother.
Then tell her to get Blue Cross.
Get her out. ls that an order?
Yes, it is.
- But l don't like orders.
- You'll obey or the club won't open.
You mean you'd shut the whole thing over one stagestruck little broad? lt isn't just one stagestruck little broad. lt's what she stands for.
You paraded her in front of everybody.
You made a fool of yourself-- of me!
Now go out there and tell the girl she's through.
What are you waiting for? l told you something once. l'm gonna tell it to you again.
Nobody owns Joey but Joey. l'll show you who owns Joey.
Mike, pay everybody off.
Chez Joey is not going to open.
And take down the sign.
Joey, shalI l break the news?
Thanks, Mike. l'll do it.
Mr. Evans, we have the house lights on the dimmer system. lt's all checked out.
Fine.
Mr. Evans, l've arranged all the flowers like this.
They're lovely. Thank you.
- The tables will be ready for 7:30.
- Good.
Mike's okay now.
You wanna try it?
Yeah, l'll try it.
Gather around, kids. l got something to tell you. l got a short announcement to make, and this is gonna kill you.
Don't look now, but the joint's folded. l told you you'd get a big laugh out of it.
But l'm not kidding about it.
Chez Joey won't open tonight... or tomorrow night or any other night after that. l'm sorry to tell you this, kids, but the party's over.
The little lady picked up her marbles and went home.
- l'm sorry.
- Beat it, kid. l said beat it!
Leave me alone.
Someone to see you, madam.
- Show him in.
- But it's a young lady, madam.
- A Miss English.
- Ask her to come in.
This way, miss.
You wanted to see me? lt's about Joey. l know how you feel.
And you're wrong.
There's been nothing between us.
Are you sure about that,
Miss English? l am quite sure.
Let the club open, please.
You're not just punishing Joe. You're hurting a lot of other people.
You're not concerned with other people. lt's Joey. You're in love with him.
Aren't you?
Well, let's say we understand each other.
We're alike, Joey and l-- the same breed of cat.
I'm not so sure of that.
Joey's better than you think.
He's better than he thinks.
Nobody's better than he thinks. lt may come as quite a surprise,
Miss English, but... l do believe there's been nothing between you and Joey.
That makes you all the more dangerous.
You may not know it, but when Joey told you to keep your clothes on today... he played the greatest love scene of his career. l could undress in the lobby of the Fairmont Hotel and... he'd never turn a hair.
So, you see, Miss English... with you on the scene... l couldn't possibly reopen the cIub. lf l wasn't on the scene?
Well, I might give it serious consideration.
After all, I rather enjoyed owning a nightclub.
Of course, it wouldn't do to let our boy know why you're leaving town.
He dislikes being under any obligation... except financial.
Why not? l earned them.
You can unpack, Joey. l've changed my mind.
- l said l've changed my mind.
- l got ears.
But you don't understand. lt's all right.
The club will open. lt won't happen again.
Sure. One false move and l'm right out on my Frances.
That's not true. very well. l'll prove it.
We'll get married.
Don't give me that marriage bit.
Don't do me any favors. lt isn't a favor. l want it that way.
So the lady wants it that way.
"Well, jump, Joey.''
Now, darling, Joey, you've had your fun.
Can we go now? l got a big flash for you, Mrs. Simpson.
You and me ain't goin' nowhere.
Don't take it so big. l'm doing you a big favor.
Darling, l-- l want to marry you.
Take more than a gold band and a two-buck license... to make an honest man out of a bum like me.
That's a little job l'm gonna have to work out myself.
Thanks for the use of the pad. l guess that's that.
That's that. ls it the mouse?
Maybe.
Maybe you should tell her.
What for?
Why should l louse up her life?
All of this could have been yours,
Joey-- the whole joint.
And you blew it on account of two dames.
You never seem to learn, do you, Joey?
Dames
What do I care for a dame
What do I care for a dame
Every old dame is the same
Every hokey dame is the same l got a future a rosy future
You can be sure I'll be tops
I'm independent
I'm no dependent
And l'll own a nightclub that's tops
I'll be in with the cops
What do l care for the skirts l'll make 'em pay till it hurts
Let 'em put up till it hurts
I'm gonna own a nightclub
It's gonna be the right club
For the swell gentry it's elementary l'll wear a top hat and cane
In Chez Joey
They'll pay Joey
The gay Joey l can see it
Plain
So long, little bird.
Don't pick up any nails.
Where are we going?
What do you mean "we''?
We're both out of work, aren't we? l don't know about you, but l'm on my way to Sacramento.
Fine. l've always wanted to see the state capital.
Well, look, you asked me to do the love song with you.
What are you trying to do, crawl out of it?
- l thought we were good together.
- Are you out of your mind or something?
Know what you're getting into? l'll brush you off before the station.
Why don't you beat it?
Look, l have no desire to be hemmed in.
Now why don't you beat it?
Take the mutt with you.
Why don't you get out while you got the chance?
What do you think l'm made of? Don't you know l got a low boiling point?
Well, l guess we weren't so bad at that, were we?
And l can use a girl in the act-- give it a little class.
- l could always do a strip.
- Don't bring that up again.
Well, how about my billing?
- Your what?
- My name? My picture?
Well, it'lI be "Joey Evans and Linda English.''
Well, how about...
"Joey and Linda Evans''? lt"s shorter. l got a better idea.
How about "Joey Evans and Company''?
That's shorter still. Let's go.
And the simple secret of the plot ls just to tell them that I love you a lot
Then the world discovers as my book ends
How to make two lovers of friends
Subtitles: Lus Filipe Bernardes
This is a great night in
Hollywood, ladies and gentlemen.
I might even say a fabulous Hollywood night.
This is the Shrine
Auditorium's great evening...
...for the Motion Picture Relief
Fund, the benefit show called...
...Night of the Stars", for Hollywood's own. "
Motion picture stars never forget their own.
And tonight, all the proceeds will go to the Motion Picture Relief Fund.
Wait a minute, folks.
I think I see... Yes, it is, it is.
Oliver Niles' car is just driving up.
And waving to her fans is Lola Lavery.
Oliver Niles, the famous producer.
Ladies and gentlemen, may I present lovely Lola Lavery.
Thank you, George, sweetie. It's so divine being here tonight.
And I know you are looking forward to seeing your favorite star and mine.
And, of course, you know, Norman
Maine is the great attraction...
...here at the Shrine Auditorium tonight. And, of course...
...wherever Norman Maine goes, lovely little Lola is sure to be there.
Joan, doesn't she look beautiful tonight?
Darling, how are you? Isn't she adorable? You're looking divine.
What are you wearing tonight?
She's wearing a black sheath.
Isn't it divine? And a white fox. And the diamonds in the hair.
Did you ever... It's adorable!
We've just had the pleasure of having lovely Lola Lavery at our microphones.
Did you ever see anyone so sweet, so unspoiled and down-to-earth?
She's a darling girl.
- Hello, Lola.
- Libby, darling.
Norman's not here.
Didn't you call for him at his house?
He wasn't there. I've been all over town, the usual places. Not a sign of him.
Libby, Normie loves being late. He's always late with me.
You're not exactly a public performance, my dear.
- You know where I'm sitting.
- I'll check backstage again.
- He's here.
- Good.
He's drunk!
- How bad?
- Very. What do you want me to do?
Keep him off. Don't let him go on, Libby.
- Is anything wrong? Is Normie all right?
- He's all right.
Norman Maine.
Where are you going, Norman?
A horse!
A horse! My kingdom for a horse.
Get him off the stage!
What are we gonna do?
- What's the act that follows Maine?
- The Glenn Williams Orchestra.
- They're here?
- Yes.
- Are they ready?
- Yes.
On the stand, we're on next. Will you help rush them up, please?
In your places, we're on next. Snap it up.
Who didn't show?
- Regular opening, verse and chorus?
- Yeah, that's right.
Get a load of Norman Maine, will you?
Look.
Mr. Maine is feeling no pain.
How I hate benefits!
Better make it snappy, Esther.
Neil, is all the music out?
Hi, Norman.
Hello, Matt, old boy. We seem to have missed each other.
- Been searching for me?
- That's all right. I knew you'd turn up.
Touching, your faith in me, Matt. Touching.
Mr. Libby looks after me like a fond mother with a good sense of...
...double-entry bookkeeping. Mr.
Libby, I should explain, is in charge...
...of the public relations at the studio. How is the AP and the UP...
Norman, I got some of the boys...
How many lies did you tell the public today?
A couple of hundred. I need you for an interview and pictures.
I don't need any more pictures or any more interviews.
The public loves me.
Sure they do. But just a few. I promised the boys.
Take your hands off me!
And don't make any promises for me. I will break them. A horse!
My kingdom for a horse!
- I'll tell you what.
- What?
I'm thirsty. I need a drink before I go on.
Get me a drink, I'll let you take a picture.
- That's a deal.
- Two drinks, two pictures.
Three drinks, three pictures.
Three pictures. You're not a bad fellow, Libby.
Why do you disgust me? Why do I hate you so, Libby?
I wouldn't know about that, Norman.
- Let's have another one.
- That does it.
- A few more.
- I said, "That does it. "
But you've got plenty of time.
All right, no more pictures.
Get your pencils out, boys.
I'm sorry, gentlemen, no time.
- Come on.
- You've got plenty of time.
Are you trying to stop me?
Are you trying to stop me from going on? Is that it?
- What a story this will make!
- This guy is stewed.
"What a spot this
"Not so hot this
"Hey, there, shy one
"Come be my one
"Please, don't rush off
"What, no brush off?
"I can't compel you to buy what I'd sell you
"But I'd like to tell you like so
"You wanna have bells that'll ring
"You wanna have songs that'll sing
"You want your sky of baby blue
"You gotta have me go with you
"Hey, you fool, you
"Why so cool, you?
"When I'm ready to go steady
"You wanna have eyes that'll shine
"You wanna have grapes on the vine
"You want a love that's truly true
"You gotta have me go with you
"Why the hold out?
"Have you sold out?
"Time you woke up
"Time you spoke up
"This line I'm handing you
"Is not a handout
"As a team we'd be a standout Standout!
"You wanna live high on a dime
"You wanna have two hearts in rhyme
"You gotta have me...
"... go with you
"You gotta have me
"You gotta have me
"Oh, all the time
"Why the hold out?
"Have you sold out?
"Time you woke up
"Time you spoke up
"You want your sky of baby blue
"You gotta have me go with you
"Why the hold out?
"Have you sold out?
"Time you woke up
"Time you spoke up
"This line I'm handing you
"Is not a handout
"As a team we'd be a standout
"You wanna live high on a dime
"You wanna have two hearts that rhyme
"You gotta have me go with you
"All of the time"
Esther.
Yes.
Hi, girls.
- Esther, if you hurry we can have coffee.
- All right.
- Good night.
- Goodbye.
- Danny.
- Yeah?
Here, wait just a second.
I must have chewed my lips off wondering if he was coming back on.
I've never been so afraid.
My knees were shaking.
Was I on key? I couldn't hear.
- You were on pitch all the way.
- It's a wonder.
It's a wonder to me that Mr.
Norman Maine is still in pictures.
It is indeed.
In fact I ask it myself every morning when I'm shaving.
I say, "Mirror, mirror on the wall...
"... who is the greatest star of them all?"
Do you know what the mirror answers?
Norman Maine?
Absolutely correct, Miss...
Blodgett. Esther Blodgett.
You must've been born with that name. You couldn't have made it up.
- I was born with it.
- Excuse me.
You wouldn't make up a name like that, would you?
That's a brand new lipstick.
To mark the occasion when...
...Esther Blodgett...
...saved Norman Maine...
...from making even more a fool of himself than usual.
I thank you. My studio thanks you. All the legions and codes...
...that watch over our industry will be equally pleased, I'm sure.
Would you take supper with me?
And all the people with you, too.
I'm afraid we can't, Mr. Maine.
You see, we're working at the Grove.
This is Danny McGuire, our pianist.
Bring your piano along, Mr. McGuire.
Nobody can object to a good, clean, living American piano.
But I insist on your taking supper with me.
Come on.
Don't you try to stop me, Mr.
McGuire. I know myself extremely well.
I'm just near the fighting stage at the moment.
If I don't get my way, I'll begin to break up people and things at this moment.
You understand, don't you?
Yes, I understand.
Why don't we have supper sometime later?
Maybe tomorrow or the next night. I'll tell you what I'll do.
I'll lay in a whole supply of lipsticks and we'll celebrate all over the walls.
- Please, Miss Blodgett.
- Good night.
I think I see your friends,
Mr. Maine. Let's hit the road.
Darling, you were simply divine. Simply divine.
You were swell.
You know, drunk or not, he's nice.
He's awful nice.
Just darling. Come on.
When he goes off like that, he's good for the night, Mr. Libby.
He'll smile in his sleep in a minute.
Like a child.
Like a child with a blowtorch.
What, sir?
Nothing.
Mr. Maine's charm escapes me.
It always has.
Now, you understand, 6:00 sharp.
Have him dressed and ready.
Yes, sir.
Here are his car keys.
Hide them, will you?
I've had enough of Mr.
Maine for one night.
He's good for the night.
6:00 sharp.
He'll sure be surprised when he finds himself on location in the morning.
- Good evening, Mr. Maine.
- Hello, Bruno. How are you?
There's a little dark girl, sings with the Glenn Williams Orchestra.
The Glenn Williams Orchestra finishes at 1:30, Mr. Maine.
Then the rhumba band takes over.
They finished about an hour ago.
It doesn't matter, Bruno. The whole thing seems rather silly now.
I'll tell you something, Mr. Maine.
All the bands that play here, the musicians, you know...
...they go to a little place on
Sunset Boulevard after they finish.
And maybe the girl could be there.
They're crazy people, you know.
They blow their heads off here all night.
Then instead of going to bed, they go to this little place...
...and blow their heads off there for themselves, for nothing!
Would you like a table, sir?
Not unless you wish to rhumba with me, Bruno.
Is there anyone here that I know?
Well now, let's see.
There's a new little girl from Paramount.
That one there, yes.
She's very pretty, Mr. Maine.
She's with someone, isn't she?
Only her agent.
He'll be glad to leave.
Too young. I had a very young week last week.
It's not worth it.
Is there anyone else?
Miss Sheldon.
She's very beautiful tonight, Mr. Maine.
No. She hit me over the head with a bottle.
Yes, I remember it.
It happened right here.
- I thought everything was all right by now.
- Nope, they only hit me once.
The little girl in the green dress?
No, Mr. Maine.
Pasadena.
Leave it alone.
Will you excuse me?
I'll be right back.
Go ahead.
Take it, honey. Come on.
Take it from the top.
- From the top?
- Yeah.
"The night is bitter
"The stars have lost their glitter
"The winds grow colder
"Suddenly you're older
"And all because of the man that got away
"No more, his eager call
"The writing's on the wall
"The dreams you've dreamed
"Have all gone astray
"The man that won you
"Has run off and undone you
"That great beginning
"Has seen a final inning
"Don't know what happened
"It's all a crazy game!
"No more, that all-time thrill
"For you've been through the mill
"And never a new love will be the same
"Good riddance, goodbye
"Every trick of his, you're onto
"But fools will be fools
"And where's he gone to?
"The road gets rougher
"It's lonelier and tougher
"With hope, you burn up
"Tomorrow he will turn up
"There's just no letup
"The livelong night and day
"Ever since this world began
"There is nothing sadder than
"A one-man woman
"Looking for the man that got away
"The man that got away"
It's wonderful.
Pretty good, we finished together...
Oh, no! No!
What's the matter?
Your dancing partner has returned.
How do you suppose he found us?
- I'll get rid of him.
- No, I'll do it.
Hello, Mr. Maine. You turn up in the strangest places.
Don't I, though?
And you're cold sober.
Well, you'd better make the most of it. Sit down for a moment.
Do you always sing like that?
Like what?
The way you sang just now.
Why?
I've never heard anybody sing just the way you do.
What do you mean? Good or bad?
Here.
You ever go fishing?
Well, do you like prizefights?
Ever watched a great fighter?
I'm trying to tell you how you sing.
Do you mean like a prizefighter or a fish?
Look.
Here.
There are certain pleasures that you get...
There are certain pleasures you get, little jabs of pleasure...
...when a swordfish takes the hook, or when you watch a great fighter...
...getting ready for the kill, see?
You don't understand a word I'm saying, do you?
No, not yet. Why don't you try bullfights?
You're joking, but that's exactly what I mean.
You'd know a great bullfighter the moment he stepped into the ring.
From the way he stood, from the way he moved.
Or a dancer. You don't have to know about ballet.
That little bell rings inside your head...
...that little jolt of pleasure.
That's what happened to me just now.
You're a great singer.
Who, me?
Hasn't anyone ever told you that before?
No, Mr. Maine, no one's ever told me that before.
Maybe you're not quite as sober as we both thought you were.
But, thank you.
I'm as sober as a judge and I know exactly what I'm saying.
You've got that little something extra that Ellen Terry talked about.
Ellen Terry, great actress long before you were born.
She said that's what star quality was...
...that little something extra.
Well, you've got it.
Now, what are you doing wasting your time singing with this band?
Wasting my time?
I'm not wasting my time.
You don't know how many years it's taken me to get this far.
- I'm doing fine, Mr. Maine, just great.
- You're wasting your time.
Now, tell me about yourself.
Where'd you come from?
How'd you start singing?
Have you got a family?
Are you married?
No.
We're breaking it up.
Why, hello, Mr. McGuire.
Mr. Maine.
- Ready to go home?
- Yes.
Good.
I'll see that Esther gets home.
- All right, Esther?
- Yes.
I'll see you at the bus in the morning, Danny.
Yeah, at 6:00.
Okay.
- Good night.
- Yeah, good night.
Well, go on. Go ahead.
Do you know the only thing
I can think of right now?
The only thought that comes into my mind is the way I wash my hair.
You see, when anything happens to me, good or bad...
...I make straight for the shampoo bottle.
Why would I have to think of that now?
I understand that perfectly.
With me it's golf balls.
If I'm happy or if I'm miserable, I putt golf balls around the living room.
It makes perfect sense. Go ahead.
I'm afraid I'm no good at talking about myself, Mr. Maine.
Everything just runs together.
Runs together? How?
All over the place.
Washing out my gloves in crummy hotel rooms.
And winning a contest on the radio. And singing in joints.
You see how my mind works? It's all jumbled.
I can sort it out.
Can you?
I can't.
I can remember my first job singing with the band.
And then, one-night stands clear across country by bus.
Putting on nail polish in the ladies' rooms in gas stations.
Waiting on tables...
Wow, that was a low point.
I'll never forget it...
...and I'll never, never do that again.
No matter what.
But I had to sing.
I somehow feel most alive when I'm singing.
It's like...
You don't want to hear all this, do you?
Do you mind?
Mind? No, I'm having a wonderful time.
Here, we turn here.
I live on that street.
Is there anything more I should know about your fascinating life?
There must be more.
There is. A whole scrapbook full.
Come in.
Well, have you had enough, as the Republicans used to say?
You know about as much about me now as I do myself.
But you see how long it's taken me to get this far.
Now, all I need is just a little luck.
What kind of luck?
The kind of luck that every girl singer with a band dreams of.
One night a talent scout from a big record company will come in.
And he'll let me make a record.
Yes, and then?
The record'll become
No. 1 on the hit parade.
Be played on the jukeboxes all over the country and I'll be made.
End of dream.
- There's only one thing wrong with that.
- I know. It won't happen.
No, it might happen very easily.
Only the dream isn't big enough.
How long will you be playing at the Grove?
Tonight was our last night. We leave for San Francisco in the morning.
Don't go.
What?
Quit. Leave the band. Stay on here.
Let me see what I can do for you.
I'll talk to Oliver Niles right away.
It's just a chance, but take it.
A chance?
Do you realize I'd be giving up everything I ever worked for?
That's right. But it served its purpose. Listen to me, Esther...
...a career is a curious thing.
Talent isn't always enough.
You need a sense of timing, an eye for seeing the turning point...
...or recognizing the big chance when it comes along and grabbing it.
A career can rest on a trifle.
Like us sitting here tonight.
Or it can turn on somebody's saying to you:
"You're better than that.
You're better than you know. "
Don't settle for the little dream. Go on to the big one.
Scared? Scared to take the plunge?
Yes.
Say, what makes you so sure about me?
I heard you sing.
- Yeah, but that...
- I know, just my word.
But you know yourself, don't you?
You just needed somebody to tell you.
I'm certainly mixed up now. I thought I was doing just fine.
Don't look so miserable.
You don't have to decide now.
Sleep on it. I'll call you in the morning.
Sleep on it. You fixed me for sleep, all right.
Whether you do it or not, don't ever forget how good you are.
Hang onto that.
Because I'm right.
Good night, Esther.
Good night, Mr. Maine. Thank you.
I just want to take another look at you.
Hello. Who is it?
Oliver?
Who?
Norman.
Oliver, just hold on a moment.
- Are you in jail? What have you done?
- Yeah, yeah...
No, no, I'm not! This girl, it turns out, is a fabulous singer.
- You heard a girl sing.
- This girl...
- Isn't that nice?
- Don't make me mad.
Do you know the time?
This girl has a wonderful talent. Listen, please.
Yes, yes, I hear you.
Every word.
You heard a girl sing.
What do you want me to do, applaud?
Yes.
Yes, I hear you. Yep.
Anything.
Anything.
Thanks, Oliver. Now, you go on back to sleep...
...because I want you to be nice and fresh in the morning when I bring her around.
Who is it?
It's me.
You asleep, Danny?
Not anymore. What's the matter?
I'm sorry, but I had to see you.
Something wrong? Hand me a cigarette.
A cigarette. Over there.
Sure.
I'm quitting the band, Danny. I'm not going on to 'Frisco in the morning.
- You crazy or something?
- Maybe. Maybe, but I'm quitting.
Why? What happened?
Norman Maine is gonna get me a screen test.
Go on back to bed, will you, Esther?
Well, it's true.
You been drinking with him?
Of course not.
When we get to 'Frisco,
I'll take you to a doctor...
...and have your head examined.
What's the matter with you?
He was making a conventional pass, that's all.
No. No, it wasn't that, Danny.
What else is it then?
He just follows bands around and gives singers screen tests?
What's got into you?
He gave me a look at myself
I've never had before.
He saw something in me nobody else ever did.
And he made me see it, too.
He made me believe it.
Believe what? It's taken all these years for you...
...to get with a big-name outfit.
You gonna toss it all in the ashcan?
And for what?
For a chance at being something...
...something bigger than I ever dreamed of.
And I'm not gonna turn back now.
Ever.
Coffee's almost ready.
I don't want any coffee.
I'm wide awake now.
Don't be mad at me.
I'll be up in time to see you off in the morning.
I guess I'd better go.
How much money have you got, Esther?
Money?
A little.
Enough to last for a couple of weeks.
You'll be all signed up and in front of the cameras by then.
You fool.
You fool!
You think so?
Then why do I feel like this?
- Goodbye, honey.
- 'Bye.
Good luck to you.
Wait a minute, Danny.
Wish me luck.
Luck? You silly...
All right, go ahead and say it.
No, no use. You're going for the ride.
Okay. Good luck.
Don't forget who makes better vocal arrangements for you...
...better than anybody else in the world!
In his unusual wonderful shape, huh?
He'll sleep it off on the plane.
Any idea how long you'll be gone?
About five or six weeks at least. This one's being shot mostly on location.
It's a big sea epic.
He won't see anything for a long time but the stuff he hates, water!
So long.
All right, cut.
That's the one. Wrap it up.
Bring us in.
They got it.
Bring him on in here.
Bring him straight on in.
Very nice.
- Thank you. Eddie!
- Drink that coffee.
- Where's Eddie?
- You can talk to Eddie later.
There you are, Eddie.
Any luck? Did you find it?
Mr. Maine, there's about 300 bungalow courts around Sunset and Highland.
- Can't you remember the number?
- No, just the neighborhood!
Go ahead, take that telephone book and ring all 300. Go on!
Will you go down and dry off!
I need you in the cabin shot.
What's with this phone-book routine?
The usual, some dame.
Eddie! Hey, Eddie!
It has the name of a flower on the side.
A poinsettia, or zinnia, or something.
Get the studio to have someone take a car and cruise around there.
For two days if necessary!
But find that place.
Four days? But you're behind schedule now, Bob.
Is Maine drunk?
Tell me the truth. Don't cover for him. I want to know.
Okay, we'll shoot around him.
Try and make up the time as soon as he's up.
Cut some corners, Bob. You've got to bring it on time.
You know how tough things are right now.
They're on my neck from New York every day.
Okay, I understand.
What's so amusing?
Is Maine sick?
Bad case of flu. A 103 temperature.
Kept him in the water too long, I'll bet.
Water would have a bad effect on him.
Esther, somebody called you about a job.
Said to call them right back.
The number's on the phone there.
Thanks.
Mr. Blake?
Yes.
Singing?
Yes.
On the set at 9:00.
Thank you very much.
"It's very nice
"It's a bargain at double the price
"Try it and find as long as you live
"Your crowning glory will be most attractive
"If you want to be a girl that the men run to
"Use Trinidad Cocoanut Oil Shampoo
"Take my advice
"It's a bargain at double the price!"
I'm gonna talk quick.
We took a five-minute break, I've gotta get back.
I squared it with Williams.
He'll take you back. I'll wire the dough for the fare...
...and you can join us in Cleveland.
Give me that address again.
I don't get it.
Do you know what the odds are against you?
You're wasting your breath.
I don't think about him.
I forgot him weeks ago.
But he did show me the way and that's what I'm sticking to.
- I don't care if I have to scrub floors...
- Your order's ready. Pick it up.
Danny, I've gotta go. All right. Goodbye. Thank you.
Good evening.
What's good to eat today?
Cheeseburgers, nutburgers, banana burgers, chicken burgers...
...lobster burgers, chop-suey burgers and our special, the superduper super burger.
What's in that?
Everything in the place. All burgered.
You haven't the faintest idea where she might have gone from here?
I told you, sir. I told you three times.
When people can't afford the moderate rates...
Yes, yes. Thank you so very much.
Oleander Arms!
No wonder I couldn't remember the name.
Can't you call your place something sensible, like...
What?
Never mind.
I bet you've never seen an oleander in your life.
Normie! Pumpkin!
Pumpkin, now really!
You just can't lie here on a lovely day like this.
I can so just lie here on a lovely day like this.
What's the matter, Normie, have I offended you?
Well, if I have, darling,
I'm really terribly sorry.
All I did was remember what you promised me.
What did I promise you? Was it a blue mink or a white mink?
Or have they done something else to those poor minks while I was away?
Normie! Darling, it's not presents I want.
It's you, Pumpkin, just you.
Don't you remember? You said as soon as you finished...
...that nasty old picture we'd go to Honolulu.
Now what's the matter?
- That singing.
- Singing?
Yeah, on this television while you were talking.
- Singing something.
- It was just an old commercial, silly.
Normie!
For heaven's sake, Norman!
Mrs. Barker! Hey, Mrs. Barker!
Who do you think just went upstairs?
Get away from that car!
Get away from that car!
Hello.
Come on up.
All right.
I look so terrible.
Never mind how you look, listen to me. I got shanghaied away. Location.
I tried, believe me, I tried...
Get away from that car!
I'll beat your brains out when I get down.
Get away!
This is so awful.
You could stand a good dinner.
I could, and in a place with tablecloths, too.
What about a drive to the beach?
We could stop off for a hamburger on the way and then have a late supper.
What's the matter? What is it, Esther?
- What's the matter?
- Nothing.
It's the nose. The nose is the problem.
Maybe a corrective in the nostril.
No.
- Could I...
- Please, little lady, Mr. Ettinger is thinking.
It's 6:00 in the morning. Just about time for one of his miracles.
Do you think, maybe...
Do you think maybe the Dietrich eyebrows?
No. The nose is still the problem.
Suppose we try the Crawford mouth.
Take the attention away from the nose.
No. No!
Do you think maybe a hair job?
Yes, I think that would be fine.
Mr. Maine.
Sorry, I'm late for an appointment.
- Catch me in the commissary later.
- Mr. Maine.
Oh, no!
No!
What's the matter with it?
I don't think that's very nice.
Go ahead, laugh your head off.
I've been sitting in that chair since 6:00 this morning.
You sat an hour too long, honey.
Come on.
Now, sit down on that chair.
Here?
Well, first things first.
Now, what else is there?
Is that you?
Off it comes.
Now, wait, don't, don't...
My nose is very bad.
Now, take every bit of that junk off your face.
But my eyes are all wrong and my ears are too big and...
...I've got no chin.
I know. Take it off and then put on your eyebrows and lipstick...
...the way you always do and I'll do the rest.
Come on, you've gotta be made up and ready to shoot that test by 9:00.
But, Mr. Maine...
I think at this critical moment you might call me Norman.
What difference does it make how well I sing if my face is so awful?
Your face is just dandy.
Now, wipe it off.
Once more into the breach, dear friends, once more.
Hey, you're shivering. Let me get you something to...
Here, put this around you.
Norman, I've got the willies.
I'm scared stiff.
I don't think I could sing a note.
Nothing would come out.
Of course you're scared. We all are.
What makes you think you wouldn't be?
Look, forget the camera.
It's the Downbeat Club at 3:00 in the morning...
...and you're singing for yourself and for the boys in the band.
Mainly for yourself, the way I heard you.
Just keep that picture in your mind.
And if that doesn't do it, think of a man in a car eating a nutburger.
Oh, thank you.
- Miss Markham?
- Yes?
I was told to see you.
I'm Esther Blodgett.
Oh, yes? I expected a blonde.
I don't know why.
- You just signed a contract with us?
- Yes, I have.
Good. Good. Glad to have you with us.
We'll have to get what you've done so far.
- Where you came from and so forth.
- I brought my scrapbook with me.
- And I thought that maybe...
- Thanks, dear. Very nice.
I'll have to turn you over to Miss Fussolow of Fashions.
This layout has got to get out to three magazines.
- Come along, dear.
- Yes, ma'am.
- Glad to have you with us.
- Thank you.
Take care of this for me, will you?
New contract player. Norman Maine.
- Hello, honey, nice to have you with us.
- Hello.
Soon as I get some background on you, I must do a fashion stuff.
- Well, I brought a scrapbook...
- Not now, dear.
I've gotta get these dresses right down to Photo.
Come along, honey.
All right.
I'll tell you what to do, honey. Why don't you go in and see Mr. Libby?
His office is right there.
He's the head of the department.
- Glad to have you with us.
- Thank you.
Your hand a little higher.
That's good. Get out of the way.
Get out of the way.
- I'm going to go right away.
- Just get out of the way.
Leave them alone. They're all right.
That's all right. Just get out of the way.
Would you lie back?
Let's take this picture.
Mr. Libby?
I'm Esther Blodgett.
- Miss Fussolow...
- Glad to have you with us.
Well, it certainly is a thrill to be here.
I brought my scrapbook along in case...
Would you care to meet the big boss? It's the usual procedure.
- I'll take you over to him.
- Fine.
May be the only chance you'll get to meet him.
- What's the matter? You afraid of heights?
- No, no!
Mr. Niles.
Libby?
- We're running a picture.
- You should meet this lady.
She just signed her contract. The one Mr. Maine arranged the test for.
Oh, yes. Yes, of course.
Nice to see you, dear.
Glad to have you with us.
Well, it's a thrill to be here.
Show Miss... how to get out of here.
Good luck to you, dear.
Take care of yourself.
- Mr. Libby.
- What?
- What do I do next?
- Well, the gate's right down there.
- What did you say your name was again?
- Esther Blodgett.
- What?
- Esther Blodgett.
We'll have to do something about that right away. Don't worry about it.
We'll have a new name for you by the end of the week.
Paul, will you swing your arc over here, please?
That's good. Hold it.
Can you make it?
All ready, sir.
- Get the girl.
- Yes, sir.
Oh, Esther.
Pull that one down a couple of turns.
Esther. Waiting for you on the set.
Okay, boys, let's go. Everybody works.
Right up there.
Stand by, everybody.
All right, sir.
You know what I want, Esther?
Put your arm out the window like this and you wave goodbye.
It's farewell, so give it everything you've got.
Okay, get over there.
Let's take a try at it.
Here we go! Hit your lights.
Hit your wind.
Hit your snow.
Hit your steam.
Roll them.
Speed.
Action.
We're getting her face.
Cut.
- We saw her face.
- We saw your face.
- We saw her face.
- We saw your face.
I'm sorry.
Watch it, Esther.
Let's try it again.
Watch it next time.
Now, be careful this time.
Just use the arm and the hand.
I don't want to see your face.
Let's try it again.
Hit everything.
Come on.
- Speed.
- Action!
Esther Blodgett, please.
Go to L.
What?
Go to L.
Go to window marked L.
You're listed under L.
Thank you.
Esther Blodgett, please.
- You new here?
- Yes.
Just a moment. Okay.
Your name is Vicki Lester.
- What?
- Your name is Vicki Lester.
Vicki Lester. V-i-c-k-i
L-e-s-t-e-r. Get it?
Move on, please.
Yes. Thank you.
Vicki Lester?
Vicki Lester?
Vicki Lester.
Why couldn't you come over to my office to see me, Norman?
What's so hush-hush that you have to drag me down here?
Every time I lie down on this sofa, I get stabbed in the back.
What do you want?
That's what I want to talk to you about. Come here.
Sit down in that chair. The whole place gives me the creeps.
- What's the matter with you?
- Hasn't been decorated in centuries.
Isn't that the most uncomfortable chair?
Don't I deserve a dressing room that's cheerful, modern and safe?
You got me down here for this?
When I give an interview here I'm ashamed.
I have the whole studio sitting on me, and you get me down here for this?
Aren't you ashamed? Don't you realize
I have a production shut down...
...right in the middle of shooting?
That's what you got me away from.
I'm being stabbed by a singer in New York.
You had to stop shooting
'cause you didn't get her here.
What will you do?
I don't know. I don't know what I'll do except go crazy.
That woman, she swore her contract was up with the show.
Our lawyers are talking about it to New York this afternoon.
Why do they play that stuff so loud?
You better leave it open, we'll be suffocated.
What is it, anyway?
It's just somebody running some tests.
I can hardly hear myself think.
I suppose there's nobody around here?
What?
You'd think there'd be someone here you could take a chance on...
...rather than close down an entire picture.
Who, for instance? Name someone.
I don't know, Oliver.
You actors.
You think all there is to running a studio is pressing buttons.
It's not quite that easy, believe me.
Say, who is that singing, anyway?
It must be one of the contract girls.
Not bad.
No.
Not bad.
Not bad at all.
A light begins to break. Very dumb of me.
All right, I get it.
A little late, that's all.
Is she still around?
Indeed. Indeed.
Very good. That's fine,
Esther. Just right down here...
I shouldn't go that far.
Now, let's all do it again.
I've been through this a hundred times, Esther.
My own previews as well as other people's.
The thing to remember about a preview...
...is first and foremost pay absolutely no attention...
...to the sights and sounds going on around you.
If the picture before the preview is a stinker, then your picture...
...gets off to a good start. Anyway, they always go out for fresh popcorn...
...so that the first few reels always sound like the Marines landing on Iwo Jima.
And the thing to do...
Yes?
Would you stop the car, please?
Are you all right?
Fine. I wish I was dead.
Come on.
We're in luck, Esther.
- Why? Did the theater burn down?
- No.
But that picture of mine is so bad that anything they see after it will seem great.
You're starting lucky.
"Swanee, how I love ya, how I love ya
"My dear old Swanee
"The folks up North will see me no more
"When I get to that Swanee shore"
Thank you, thank you very much.
I can't express any other way.
For with this awful trembling in my heart...
...I just can't find another thing to say.
I'm happy that you like the show.
I'm grateful you liked me.
And I'm sure to you the tribute seemed quite right.
"But if you knew of all the years
"Of hopes and dreams and tears
"You'd know it didn't happen overnight"
Overnight.
"I was born in a trunk
"In the Princess Theater
"In Pocatello, Idaho
"It was during a matinee on Friday
"And they used a makeup towel for my didy
"When I first saw the light
"It was pink and amber
"Coming from the footlights on the stage
"When my dad carried me out there to say hello
"They tell me that I stopped the show
"So I grew up in a crazy world
"Of dressing rooms and hotel rooms and waiting rooms
"And rooms behind the scenes
"And I can't forget the endless rows
"Of sleepless nights and 'eatless' nights
"And nights without a nickel in my jeans
"But it's all in the game
"And the way you play it
"And you've gotta play the game you know
"When you're born in a trunk
"In the Princess Theater
"In Pocatello, Idaho
"At first I just stood and watched from the wings
"That's all my mom and dad would allow
"But as I got older,
I got a little bolder
"And snuck out for their second bow
"They kept me in the act because they needed me to milk applause
"Until one night they did a crazy thing
"They left me out there all alone and Mama said, 'You're on your own'
"And Poppa shouted,
'This is it, kid, sing'
"I'll get by
"As long as I have you
"Though there be rain
"And darkness, too
"I'll not complain
"I'll see it through"
"I learned very quickly the tricks of the trade
"I practiced after everyone was gone
"And with the tricks
I learned traditions
"And the hardest one of all
"Is no matter what
"The show must go on
"As time went by I looked for jobs
"And was kicked from pillar to post
"I haunted all the agents' offices
"And I almost ended up a ghost"
"I'm a sentimental sap, that's all
"What's the use of trying not to fall
"I have no will You made your kill
"Cause you took advantage of me"
No!
"I'm just like an apple on a bough
"And you're gonna shake me down somehow
"So what's the use?
You've cooked my goose
"'Cause you took advantage of me"
No!
"I'm so hot and bothered that I don't know my elbow from my ear
"Suffer something awful each time you go but much worse when you're near
"Here am I with all my bridges burned
"Just a babe in arms where you're concerned
"So lock the doors Call me yours
"'Cause you took advantage of me"
Yes.
No!
"So I got into a tab show
"All I did was kick my feet
"You'd hardly call it a chance to sing
"But at least it was a chance to eat"
"They call it black bottom, a new twister
"It's sure got them and, oh, sister
"They clap their hands and do a raggedy trot
"Hot!
"Old fellows with lumbago and young fellows away they go
"They jump right in and give it all that they've got"
Then one night something happened.
Dame Fortune showed her face.
The star got sick and I was told to go on in her place.
But she recovered.
Oh, well.
"Black bottom, a new rhythm
"When you spot them, you go with them
"That do that black, black, black bottom
"You won't be blue when you have got them
"If you do that black, black, black, black bottom all day
"But finally I got an offer to sing in New York
"And I wired, 'I'm on my way,'
"I had visions that this would be
"A fabulous, famous caf
"Filled with high society
"Elegant and spruce
"And I pictured me
"The epitome of a very chic chanteuse
"Peanuts
"Through every city, town and country lane
"You'll hear him sing his plaintive little strain
"And as he goes by, to you he'll say"
Sing "Melancholy Baby".
"Peanuts
"The little children like to trail along
"They like to hear the peanut vendor's song
"They all laugh with glee when he will say"
Sing "Melancholy Baby".
"Come to me, my melancholy baby
"Cuddle up and don't be blue
"All your fears are foolish fancy maybe
"You know, dear, that
I'm in love with you
"Every cloud must have a silver lining
"Wait until the sun shines through
"Smile, my honey dear
"While I kiss away each tear
"Or else I shall be melancholy, too"
My benefactor appeared with his card.
And at first I thought he was fresh.
Fresh?
"He was fresh from heaven all right
"He produced the show that gave me the chance
"To sing for you tonight"
"Swanee, how I love ya, how I love ya
"My dear old Swanee
"I'd give the world to be
"Among the folks in D-i-x-i-e
"Even know my mammy's waiting for me
"Praying for me down by the Swanee
"The folks up North will see me no more
"When I get to that Swanee shore
"Way down upon the Swanee
"I'm coming back to Swanee
"Mammy, Mammy
"I love the old folks at home
"I loves ya
"Swanee, how I loves ya, how I loves ya
"My dear old Swanee
"I'd give the world if I could only be
"Sitting on my mammy's knee!
"Among the folks
"I love the old folks
"I love the young folks
"Oh, my honey lamb
"You'll love them all in Alabamy
"Mammy, Mammy
"My dear old mammy
"Your wandering child will wander no more
"When I get to that Swanee shore"
"So I can't quite be called
"'Overnight sensation'
"For it started many years ago
"When I was born in a trunk
"In the Princess Theater
"In Pocatello, Idaho"
Oliver, what about Vicki for the Morgan script?
Where's Norman?
I want you to read this script because...
Thank you.
Nobody buying anybody a drink on the strength of all this success?
I heard a few comments about my film which makes me feel the need of one.
Vicki, we'll see you over at my house.
All right, fine.
Ray, your score was out of this world, the greatest.
Say, I've never seen preview cards like this in my life. I waited for the breakdown.
Ninety-seven percent say you got yourself a new star.
Read these and enjoy yourselves.
I'll need a lot of stuff on you. Be in my office tomorrow morning early.
That is, if you can make it.
Read this.
This is what I was telling you about. It's very interesting.
They all say her performance was excellent. Get a load of these cards.
Every one says the same thing.
It's all yours, Esther.
And I don't mean just the
Cadillacs and the swimming pools.
It's all yours.
In more ways than one.
I hope...
Yes, Norman, go ahead.
Say it, would you?
You'll be a great star. Don't let that change you too much.
Don't let it take over your life.
You're very dear.
Norman, you make this sound like, like the end of something...
...instead of the beginning.
You make it sound like goodbye.
I did all I could for you.
You've come along the road with me as far as you should.
Let's leave it that way.
Norman, don't you know how I feel about you?
Yes. Yes, I do.
Don't you know nothing about you could make any difference?
It's too late.
- No, it isn't. It is not...
- It is, I tell you!
- There's nothing you can...
- Listen to me!
I love you.
I destroy everything
I touch. I always have.
Forget me, I'm a bad lot!
You've come too late.
I don't believe that.
It's not too late. Not for you and not for me.
Don't say that, Esther.
I might begin to believe it.
Please, believe it. Believe it.
Believe it. Believe it.
- I think they're all rehearsed.
- Fine.
We're ready whenever you are.
"What am I here for?
"It's time you knew
"Here's what I'm here for
"I'm here for you
"Can you forgive me?
"Am I too late?
"All the years that I wondered
"And pondered were squandered
"My heart insisted
"I seek you out
"That you existed
"My heart had no doubt
"To share a journey
"That leads to heaven's door
"You'll find is what I'm here for
"What am I here for?
"It's time you knew
"Here's what I'm here for
"I'm here for you
"Can you forgive me?
"Am I too late?
"All the years that I wondered
"And pondered were squandered
"My heart insisted
"I seek you out
"That you existed
"My heart had no doubt"
Cut. That's it. Wonderful.
Esther, listen to this one.
Okay, let's have the playback.
Just the last half of Miss Lester.
I want the chorus arrangement.
"My heart had no doubt
"To share a journey
"That leads to heaven's door
"You'll find is what I'm here for"
How'd I sound?
Just adequate.
Best-friend-severest-critic department?
What is this?
Listen to the arrangement
Danny made for the chorus.
Turn it off.
I was thinking about another kind of arrangement.
Another kind?
Domestic. Will you marry me?
No, thank you.
"... I wondered and pondered"
Why not?
Well, you're irresponsible.
- Go ahead. Stop that. What else?
- "My heart insisted... "
"You drink too much. "
Suppose I quit drinking?
Suppose I become absolutely dependable on all occasions?
You wouldn't be Norman Maine.
I'd be marrying the wrong man.
Norman...
Yes?
...darling, would you do all that for me if I said I'd marry you?
No. I've had a chance to think it over with all that humming and singing...
...it's too much to ask.
Well, goodbye.
Now, wait a minute, my boy. That's much too public a proposal...
...for me to say no to. I accept.
- You do?
- I do.
Oliver, we're gonna get married.
I guess I didn't read that line right. I'll try again.
We're going to get married.
Both of us.
To each other. What do you think of that?
What's the matter?
He's trying to decide if it's good for the studio.
Well, is it?
It is. My blessings.
A little unsteady, but thank you.
- Congratulations.
- Thank you, Libby.
How long a honeymoon will you give us?
Now, let's see.
I'll want you back by the ninth.
No, make it the tenth.
Don't let your heart run away with your head.
I'll have to call Production and see how long I can stall off Vicki's wardrobe tests.
While you're settling the details, is it all right if I buy the lady a ring?
Sure, we want everything legal.
Thank you.
'Bye. 'Bye, Oliver.
Goodbye, Libby.
That was quite a decision you made just now, Oliver.
Decision?
Letting that girl walk into a booby trap.
Vicki's business is her own.
Is it?
She's the hottest piece of property this studio has right now.
This might make the difference to Norman.
This might be it.
Any bets?
I better start the wheels grinding.
A big front-page splash on the wedding will help his slipping box office.
Hello, this is Matt
Libby. Get me my office.
Hello. Hello, Markham?
Lester and Maine are getting married.
Yeah, yeah, yeah. Now, look,
I want all stops pulled.
Full coverage. The wedding to end all weddings. You got it?
All right. Now, see if you can get the mayor to close school that afternoon.
I'll get you the date later.
And get all newsreel and television coverage started right away.
Get all traffic routed out of Beverly Hills for two miles on each side of the church.
The big one. And tell the "Life", the "Time", the AP and the UP boys...
...that I'll set up restricted coverage with each of them personally.
Yeah. The bleachers and everything. The full treatment.
"Now, if any man can show just cause why these two...
"... may not be lawfully joined together, let him now speak or else hereafter...
"... forever hold his peace.
"Do you, Ernest Sidney Gubbins, take this woman for your wedded wife?"
I do.
"Will you love, comfort, honor and keep her in sickness and in health...
"... as long as you both shall live?"
I will.
"Do you, Esther Blodgett, take this man for your wedded husband?"
I do.
"Will you obey, serve, love, honor and keep him in sickness and in health...
"... as long as you both shall live?"
I will.
Now place the ring on her finger.
"By virtue of the powers vested in me...
"... as Justice of the Peace of San Verdo Township...
"... County of Los Angeles,
I pronounce you man and wife. "
Good luck.
I must exercise my prerogatives of office.
I wish you all the happiness, Mrs. Gubbins.
Thank you so much.
Same to you.
Now, if you'll just sign this.
Oh, yes.
You know, I'd swear I'd seen you before, Mrs. Gubbins.
Really? Well, I think this is the first time I've ever been in San Verdo.
You know your face looks familiar, too, Mr. Gubbins.
Thank you very much.
Thank you.
Here's your receipt.
Goodbye.
Goodbye.
I think you got by with it.
That J.P. was just beginning to remember where he'd seen us before.
- At least we got away from Libby.
- Libby doesn't even know we left town.
All the luck.
If you'll be kind enough to glance between my shoulder blades...
...Mr. and Mrs. Gubbins...
...you'll find there a knife, on its handle are your initials.
- Don't be angry.
- It's been delightful seeing you...
Wait! Wait a minute!
'Bye.
Well, I wish them joy.
Wait till they see the press. It won't be so funny.
- They have a right to get married quietly.
- No, they haven't. He knows better.
"Mr. Public Nuisance" could use some decent publicity for a change.
I've spent ten years covering up.
Killing bad stories, sucking up to the columnists to smooth away his insults.
Who will they blame for not letting them cover this today? Him? No! Me!
I'll look just like a fool.
Double-crossed by a cruddy actor.
He needs this, believe me, more than I do.
Okay.
Just wait your turn, I always say.
What do you always say, McGuire?
Well, the first thing to do, I think...
...is to go and wash your face. It's quite dirty.
I know my face is dirty. But you didn't want anybody to recognize us, did you?
No, that's right.
But you can unmask now.
I paid my $2, I wanna see what I got.
Nice.
And now, folks, Vicki Lester...
...singing the title song "from her new picture" It's a New World.
This is the No. 1 tune of the hit parade...
...and the No. 1 favorite on the jukeboxes all over the country:
"Vicki Lester," It's a New World.
Well, there it is, Esther.
You've got it, just the way you dreamed it.
No, I've got more.
Much more.
That's for ordinary folks who have to turn on the radio...
...and put a nickel in the jukebox.
I've got a private copyright of my own.
Including the Scandinavian.
I've got the built-in original right in the house, every time I want to hear it.
And I want it now.
No, you don't.
To kind of celebrate.
All right.
"How wonderful that I'm beholding
"A never never land unfolding
"Where we polish up the stars
"And mountains we move, in a life
"Where all the pleasures we will prove
"It's a new world I see
"A new world for me
"The tears have rolled off my cheek
"And fears fade away every time you speak
"A new world though we're in a tiny room
"What a vision of joy and blossom and bloom
"A newfound promise
"One that will last
"So I'm holding on
"And I'm holding fast
"You brought a new world to me
"And that it'll always, always be"
I've been preparing them.
You have? You want to see a picture?
I'd like very much to.
All right, fine.
- Hello.
- Hello, there.
- Would you like to see a movie?
- Wonderful!
We're going to run one.
You have to put up with this sort of thing.
Stunts and speed mark the National Air Show.
Vampire jets of the Royal
Canadian Air Force flash overhead.
Marilyn Rich, the helicopter girl, does her stuff...
...from one of the highest perches ever used by an acrobat. And no net.
Now US jets zoom overhead.
Watch them burst apart like a fountain.
Red Grant is the outdoor type. He prefers to do his flying on the wings...
Traitor.
There's a fight on I wanted to catch a bit of. I've seen the picture anyway.
Why didn't you say something?
We could've run something else.
That doesn't matter. It's a good picture. You'll all enjoy it.
Go on back, I think the newsreel is over.
Are you feeling all right? You haven't said a word all evening.
Sure, I'm all right. Just one of my silent evenings.
Go on, you'll miss the beginning.
There's no hurry. The credits will run forever.
I thought you were the one who never took the studio home with you.
This is different. I'm not at home.
Has this got anything to do with me? What you're worrying about?
Has it?
I'll tell you all about it at the studio on Monday. Have lunch with me.
How about telling me now?
This isn't the time nor the place. You have guests.
We've known each other too long to start playing games with each other.
What's sticking in your throat that you can't tell me?
The New York boys have been out here for the past week.
- They want me to take a salary cut?
- No, Norman.
I guess the only way to say it is to say it.
They've instructed me to buy up the rest of your contract.
Pay you off.
Pay me off?
Why? My last two pictures haven't grossed as big as they used to...
...but neither has anybody else's.
They know that.
What is it then?
Can you take it?
Go ahead.
They can't afford you anymore,
Norman. You're too big a risk.
Those big, fat lush days when a star could get drunk and disappear...
...and hold up production for two weeks are over.
Even if you hadn't slipped a little, they still wouldn't take the chance.
Your record's too bad.
No one can afford it anymore.
Things are too tough.
I tried, Norman.
I tried very hard.
I see.
Don't look so miserable, Oliver.
There are other studios, you know.
Only bad thing is I shan't be working for you anymore.
We had a long roll of the dice, didn't we, Oliver?
Can't complain now.
By the way...
...can you keep this under wraps for a while?
- I'd like to tell Esther in my own way.
- Of course.
Have you seen this, Oliver?
I've certainly picked a fine time to build myself a big new house, didn't I?
I sometimes think I was born with a genius...
...an absolute genius...
...for doing the wrong thing.
Since Mr. Maine feels that his career will be benefited by a change...
...we do not wish to stand in his way. Unquote.
When contacted...
...the star said that he would announce his future plans at a later date...
The wheel goes round and round...
...and if you just wait long enough...
...it's finally your turn.
Don't take that down, Miss Willer,
I was just talking to myself.
That's okay. I'm in the mood where you can make...
...more than your usual quota of mistakes.
Read that whole thing back to me, will you?
"The Oliver Niles Studio announced this morning that it has granted...
"... Norman Maine's request for a cancellation of his contract.
"'This step was taken with deep regret,' said Mr. Niles...
"'... and marks the end of a long and happy relationship...
"'... but since Mr. Maine feels his career will be benefited by a change... "'
Yes. This is Malibu 29010.
- Is Miss Lester there, please?
- No, she isn't.
- Who's this? The butler?
- No, this isn't the butler.
Is that you, Norman? This is Artie Carver. How are you?
Say, as long as I've got you on the phone, anything new with you?
Have you made a deal at any other studio yet?
No, nothing new with me at all, Artie.
Is it true that you're trying to get Vicki to leave the studio...
...because you're sore at Niles for settling your contract?
No, it isn't true. And don't you start that rumor going.
Okay, Norman, don't get sore.
I was just trying to help.
Just trying to get your name in the papers.
Anyway, what I called you for was
I've been trying to get an interview...
...with Vicki for two weeks and she's always busy.
How about you giving an old pal a break and speaking to her for me?
Sure, I'll ask her, Artie.
Fine.
I'll put a squib in the column that you're cooking up an independent deal someplace.
It won't fool anybody, but let them know you're alive. 'Bye now.
'Bye.
Hi.
I'm sorry to be so late.
It's all right.
You're here now.
Did you go fishing with
Captain Blythe today?
I haven't left the house.
- No? Then let's go out some place tonight.
- But you're tired.
- Let's stay in. You must be tired.
- I'm not a bit tired. Really I'm not.
And anyway...
What?
...I see so little of you that
I'd rather have you to myself.
I didn't even get out of my practice costume.
It's the servants' night out.
I don't think we've got...
Yes, we have. I fixed a little snack with my own lily-white hands.
What?
I'm learning to cook in my spare time.
Then I think I'll marry you.
I get it. You want to make an honest cook of me.
My goodness.
How does it look?
- It looks wonderful.
- That's what I thought.
- Sit down, sit down.
- All right.
Don't be formal, just pitch in.
I don't think my mouth is big enough.
I'll measure it. Make the sandwiches to size next time.
I think I'll take the measurements right now.
That's what I wait for all day.
That's why I rush home every night without even changing my costume.
We're forgetting we're hungry.
Milk?
Yes, thank you.
Cheers.
Well, what went on at the studio today, the old alma mater?
We started doing the big production number today.
This is the production number to end all production numbers.
"An American In Paris"?
"An American In Paris", and in Spain and...
- Brazil?
- Brazil, yes.
- Pakistan?
- Pakistan and Burma Road.
- It's got sex and schmaltz...
- And patriotism!
Patriotism without end!
You should see what comes...
...out of the ground and down from the ceiling.
You've never seen anything like it in your life.
Wait a minute. Wait, here, I'll put the practice record on and show you.
Lights!
Camera!
Action!
I'm discovered sitting on a rather simple divan.
"Somewhere there's a someone
"Who's a someone for me
"Someday there will come one
"And my lover he will be
"Somehow I shall know him
"From the moment he's in view
"And he'll know affection
"He's never known hitherto"
Now we have a stunning shot with the clock.
"I pay no mind to the waiting
"Let the clock tick-tock away
"The dream I'm contemplating
"Will be here to stay
"Somewhere in the sometime
"When the humdrum... "
You know I get pretty girlish in this number.
"With that someone
I'll be someone at last"
Now, here comes a big, fat close-up.
"With my someone I'll be someone at last"
Not a harp!
There's always a harp in a dream sequence, don't be silly.
The heavenly choir?
Yeah, 20 girls just came up out of the floor.
And there's smoke all over the room.
"Somewhere there's a someone
"Somewhere there's a someone
"Somewhere, someone
"Somewhere there's a someone"
I'm discovered on top of the Eiffel Tower.
Of course.
"This is the story of a little girl
"Searching, searching, searching
"For she knows somewhere
"Is a someone who is a someone for her
"This is a story
"Somewhere is a sometime
"Where the heart from days of past
"With my someone I'll be someone at last
"With my someone I'll be someone at last"
They discover me in China, too.
"Somewhere she will find him somewhere
"Somewhere she will find him
"Nowhere!"
Africa!
"Someone
"Somewhere
"There's a someone somewhere
"Someone
"Somewhere!"
- Brazil, I told you!
- Right! Brazil it is.
Shoot!
Boom. You're dead.
"Somewhere there's a someone
"Somewhere there's a someone
"There's a someone waiting for me!"
That's the doorbell.
Maybe they'll go away.
They never do at a time like this.
Don't answer it.
It's so good to hear you laugh again.
I know.
I'd better. Might be a cable.
I sent one to Alex Korda about a picture in England.
I've been expecting an answer.
Maybe things are looking up.
Vicki Lester live here?
I got a package for her.
I'll sign for it.
Who are you?
I'm her husband.
Sign right there, Mr. Lester.
Thank you.
Package for you.
By the way, they want you...
...for the Motion Picture Relief
Fund benefit at the Shrine Auditorium.
It's in April sometime.
I told them I'd ask you.
No, let me finish before I forget.
The Academy Award secretary called...
...and wanted to know how many there'd be in your party.
And Art Carver called and wanted me to use my influence with you...
...to get him an interview.
I told him I'd try.
That's all.
Now that the supper show is over, let's have some supper, shall we?
I think I shall mix myself a drink. I'm not very hungry.
No.
My young son asked me if these
Oscars were made of real gold.
I had to be truthful and tell him, "No, they weren't. "
He was very disappointed.
And then the pride of the household said:
"Daddy, why is it called an Oscar?"
"Shut up," I explained.
And then my dear wife entered the argument...
...with a little lecture on child psychology.
And it's rather lucky that
I'm here at all tonight.
Do you think anything's happened to him?
You know what the traffic's like.
He's been held up, that's all.
I wish I could have made him understand that...
...many of us feel that to win one of them is ample reward for an entire career.
I know I do.
Thank you.
To present this year's award for the best actress...
Stop worrying. Think how nice the statuette will look on your mantelpiece.
...last year's Academy Award winner: Mr. Nigel Peters.
Those nominated for the best performance by an actress are:
"Jane Brandon," Those Who Seek.
"Vicki Lester," A World For Two.
"Alice Tenny," The Great Chance.
"Shirley Vander," Don't Cry My Love.
The winner is Miss Vicki Lester.
I wish Norman were here.
When something like this happens to you...
...I won't lie to you and tell you I didn't keep hoping it would happen...
...all the speeches that you've made up in your bedroom or in the bathtub...
...go out of your mind completely.
And you find that out of all the words in the world...
...just two stick in your mind:
Thank you.
And all I can do is to say them to you from my heart and...
Congratulations, my dear.
Made it just in time, didn't I?
May I borrow the end of your speech to make a speech of my own?
My method for gaining your attention may seem a little unconventional, but...
...hard times call for harsh measures.
My, I had my speech all prepared, but I...
It's gone right out of my head.
Let me see.
Well, it's silly to be so formal, isn't it?
I know most of you sitting out there by your first names, don't I?
I made a lot of money for you, gentlemen...
...in my time through the years, haven't I?
Well, I need a job now.
Yeah, that's it, that's the speech. That's the...
I need a job.
That's what I wanted to say.
I need a job!
It's as simple as that.
I need a job, that's all.
My talents, I might say, they're not confined to dramatic parts.
I can play comedy, too.
Well, play something, somebody.
Norman, darling.
Darling.
Let's sit down.
Get me a drink, somebody.
Good morning, Vicki.
Hi, Frank.
- How are you?
- Fine.
- Ready to go?
- Yeah, anytime.
Hit the lights. Up high. Six and eight.
Give us a senior.
Come over to 103, will ya?
Now, drop that door down on main.
Roll them.
Speed.
Playback!
One, two.
"If, as, and when you've got a long face
"Rearrange it
"Don't be contented with the wrong face
"There's a way to change it
"Does the day look painful?
"The future glum?
"Does the sky look rainful?
"Hey, there! Say, there!
"Are you in a vacuum?
"All the stuff and nonsense
"You can overcome
"A long face gets you nowhere
"You lose that month of May
"Like Peter Pan, the sweeter pan
"Wins the day!
"Go lose that long face, that long face
"Go along and get that long face lost
"The blues black out when they can see
"A smile that says,
'Move on, no vacancy'
"This panacea idea
"I'm handing you without any cost
"There isn't any tax on it
"So just relax on it
"If you want trouble double-crossed
"Don't give in to a frown
"Turn that frown upside down
"And get yourself that long face lost!
"This panacea idea
"I'm handing you without any cost
"There isn't any tax on it
"So just relax on it
"If you want trouble double-crossed
"Don't give in to a frown
"Turn that frown upside down
"And go and get your long face
"Get your long face
"Go, go, go and get your long face lost!"
Cut!
Cut! That's it.
Very good, everybody. Very good. Fine, Vicki, fine.
You take it easy for a bit. We've got to move in for the closer angle.
All right, kids, take five.
Come in.
Oliver.
Esther.
Hello. It's good to see you again.
Three months is a long time.
- How was your trip?
- Not exactly the pleasure trip it used to be.
They want your pictures.
That's all I kept hearing way across the country.
Thanks.
Look, would you mind stopping that for just a minute?
Tough day?
No tougher than usual.
Maybe you should get away after this one. New York or Europe.
Just get completely away. What about that?
How's Norman?
Is he all right?
Yes, he's fine. Want some coffee?
Thanks.
- Sit down, Oliver.
- Tell me, is he...
He's in a sanitarium.
He really wants to stop drinking, Oliver.
He's trying very hard. I know he is.
What is it?
What is it that makes him want to destroy himself?
You've known him longer than anyone else.
Tell me what it is.
Please. I don't care but just tell me.
Don't you think I've tried through the years to know why?
To help him.
I don't know, Esther.
I don't know what the answer is.
I've got to find the answer.
You don't know what it's like to watch somebody you love...
...just crumble away bit by bit...
...and day by day in front of your eyes.
And stand there helpless.
Love isn't enough.
I thought it was.
I thought I was the answer for Norman...
...but love isn't enough for him.
And I'm afraid of what's beginning to happen...
...within me...
...because...
...sometimes I hate him.
I hate his promises to stop...
...and then the watching and waiting to see it begin again.
I hate to go home to him at night.
And listen to his lies.
My heart goes out to him because he tries.
He does try.
But I hate him for failing.
I hate me, too.
I hate me...
...'cause I've failed, too.
I have.
I don't know what's going to happen to us, Oliver.
No matter...
...how much you love somebody...
...how do you live out the days?
How?
Would it help any if he went back to work?
Could you do that?
I'll try.
Yeah, all right. I'll be there in a minute. Yes, okay.
You will be careful when you talk to him, won't you?
All he's got left is his pride.
Quiet.
Playback.
"... isn't any tax on it
"So just relax on it
"If you want trouble double-crossed
"Don't give in to a frown
"Turn that frown upside down
"And go and get your long face
"Get your long face
"Go, go, go and get your long face lost"
- I'm Mr. Niles.
- Yes, come in.
Mr. Niles, we're expecting you. My name is Harrison.
Come into the reception room and make yourself comfortable.
Mr. Maine'll be right down.
Thank you.
Hello, Oliver.
- Welcome to Liberty Hall.
- Hello, Norman.
Shall we go through there?
Sit down.
You don't think someone'll come strolling in here...
...and start telling us he's
Napoleon or Julius Caesar, do you?
No.
Nevertheless, I think we'd find it a little cozier in the sun porch.
Now, Cuddles, Mr. Niles isn't slipping me a case of scotch.
He's just gonna sit with me.
Oliver, this is Cuddles, my social secretary.
We go everywhere together.
How are you feeling?
I'm coming along splendidly, so Cuddles tells me.
He says you ought to see some of the boys.
Let's sit down.
Cuddles, we really don't need you.
Touching, isn't it? He can't bear to have me out of his sight.
You comfortable here?
Comfortable? Why, it's positively luxurious.
Why, we even have steel mesh on the windows to keep the drafts out.
How much longer do you think you'll be here?
I'm really cured now, only I'm just staying on...
...an extra week or two until
I get into really good shape.
After all, there isn't any great hurry to return to the cameras.
That's what I want to talk to you about.
I have a script here.
It has a fine part for you in it.
Why, that's great Oliver.
Who plays opposite me?
Well, it isn't exactly the lead,
Norman. Young Pemberton's doing that.
But I'll tell you frankly, I consider your part better than the lead.
I see. Better than the lead.
Of course, it isn't terribly long. It's one of those parts that make an impression.
They'll be thinking about you all through the picture.
The thing is, Oliver, that I'm pretty well set at another studio.
I'm not at liberty at the moment to tell you which one.
You know yourself how those things are, but it's big, big.
It's one of the biggest pictures of the year.
As for the part, every actor in Hollywood would give his eyeteeth to play it.
That's fine, Norman, that's fine.
Naturally, that'll tie you up for a while.
However, we're not getting to this for some time.
Perhaps you'd consider it for later on.
Don't count on me. I have several pictures lined up.
Then they're talking to me about England.
You know they're doing some interesting things...
What is it, Cuddles?
Speak right out. We all love you.
Your dinner.
Oh, yes.
We dine here at 5:30.
Makes the nights longer.
I'll be toddling along, Norman.
Supposing I just leave this.
Maybe you'll be able to come up with some ideas even if you don't play the part.
Oh, sure. Sure.
Nice to see you doing so well, Norman.
I shall be out of here in no time.
I'll have to introduce myself all over again to a lot of people.
They won't know me when I'm not drinking.
Goodbye, Oliver.
Thanks for dropping in.
All right, Cuddles.
Alone at last.
Your attention, please.
In this race, No. 5, La
Golondrina, three pounds over.
The total weight, 112 pounds.
No. 7, Royalty, two pounds over.
The total weight, 114 pounds.
Hello, Bert.
Hello, Norman.
- Marian, how are you?
- Fine, fine.
- Hi, Sammy.
- Hello, Norman. How are you?
I think this one.
Yes...
After all, he's never won before. You can give him a chance.
Well...
Your attention, please. The horses are coming on the track.
Hello. Haven't seen you around in a long time.
No, I've been resting.
Ginger ale, please.
Yes, sir. Ginger ale and what?
Ginger ale and ginger ale.
New leaf?
A whole new book.
Thanks.
Scotch.
Hello, Libby. Haven't seen you in a long time.
- What do you like in the third race?
- Well, it's Mr. America of yesteryear.
Do they let you wander around now without a keeper?
I'm a trusty now.
I suppose you'll be here all the time now that you've retired...
...from the hurly-burly of the silver screen. Another scotch.
We're staying down at Malibu now and it gets pretty lonesome...
...with Esther away working all day.
- I wouldn't squawk if I were you.
It's nice having someone in the family making a living.
Go a little slow, Libby. I don't want to forget that we're friends.
Friends, my eye! Listen, I got you out of your jams...
...because it was my job not because I was your friend.
I don't like you. I never did like you.
Nothing made me happier than to see all those cute little pranks of yours...
...catch up with you and land you on your celebrated face!
Pretty work. Always wait till they're down, then kick them.
Listen, you got yourself fixed nice and comfortable, you got no complaints.
You can live off your wife now.
Drunk again.
He's been drunk for years. Come on, we'll miss the next race.
- How does Vicki stand him?
- She must feel sorry for him.
Let's not us get involved.
Scotch.
Double.
Esther, you'll make yourself ill. Try and get a little sleep.
Four days. He's been gone for four days now and not a word.
I can't.
I can't.
Hello.
No, this is Oliver Niles speaking.
What?
Thank heaven.
He's all right, Esther. He isn't hurt.
Where?
In the night court? Thank you.
He's been arrested on a drunk charge.
I'll go right down and try and get him out.
I'm going with you.
That's no place for you. If the newspapers get it, it'll be bad...
What do I care about that now?
Were you able to do anything?
The judge says he'll get as fair treatment as anybody else.
And that's all he'd say.
Cigarettes out. Please, rise.
Face the flag of our country.
Come on, keep moving.
Line up here.
Come on, come on, line up.
All right, fellows, let's go. Come on. Right down there.
Hats off, cigarettes out. Hurry it up, come on.
Come on, hurry up. Hurry it up.
Single file line, face the judge.
Face the judge. Hurry it up.
Second line right down there.
Single file.
Hurry it up.
Take your hat off.
Hurry it up, fellows.
Take your hat off. Come on, let's go. Hat off.
Hurry it up, fellows.
I want to advise you that you're entitled to be represented by counsel...
...to be confronted by the witnesses that testify against you...
...to a public and speedy trial by the court or by a jury...
...and the right to be admitted to bail. Do you understand that?
"William Gregory. "
"Plain drunk. Picked up at Fifth and Towne asleep in the gutter.
"Fourteen similar offenses in the past six months. "
How do you plead?
I don't feel so good.
I didn't ask you how you feel.
I said, "How do you plead?"
Guilty, I guess.
When did you get out the last time?
Just before Christmas.
You'll have to miss New
Year's, but you'll be out...
...in time for Washington's birthday. Sixty days.
"Ernest Gubbins. "
Gubbins?
"Drunk and disorderly. Crashed car into tree at Sunset and Coronado.
"Evidently been drinking for days.
"Resisted arrest and injured one of the arresting officers. "
How do you plead?
Guilty.
Were you Norman Maine the actor?
Yes.
You've come pretty low, haven't you?
There isn't a man here that's had the advantages you've had.
And look what you've done with them.
You're nothing but an irresponsible drunk driving around the streets...
...with the power to inflict death and injury on innocent people.
I think we'd better deny you that power for a while. Ninety days in the city jail.
I'm his wife.
I recognize you, Miss Lester.
Please, Judge, I promise...
...this will never, never happen again.
I'll be responsible for him.
I will.
If you'll just not send him there.
Do you realize that this man, when drunk, is obviously a menace to the public safety?
Do you realize the responsibility you'll be assuming in this to the court...
...and to the people of this city?
I do.
Sentence suspended. Prisoner remanded to custody of wife.
Thank you.
I'm so tired, Esther.
All right, folks, hold it.
One more, please.
He's asleep.
Good.
- He's been sleeping most of the day.
- That's the best thing for him.
He looks so helpless lying there...
...smiling in his sleep just like a child.
Do you still love him, Esther?
Or do you feel sorry for him?
Feel sorry for him?
I don't know what you're talking about.
I love him.
We'll take care of him together.
You're very fond of him, aren't you?
I'm very fond of both of you.
Then I know you'll understand what I have to tell you.
You probably know already after what happened last night.
I can't do any more pictures, Oliver.
I'm going away for good.
With Norman.
You're at the very height of your career, Esther.
The very peak of your success.
There wouldn't be any career without Norman.
I'm just giving back the gift he gave me.
No one can give anyone a career. You've made your own.
No! No!
He gave it to me...
...by his faith and by his love.
And without him it's just nothing.
Not the way things are.
You've thought this through?
You're sure you're right?
What'll you do?
We'll go away together.
I'll be with him every moment.
Maybe if I'd had a chance to be with him more...
...some of these things wouldn't have happened.
I've got to hang onto that.
I've got to believe that.
And then when he gets better...
...we can work in England or Italy.
Somewhere where they don't know about him in the way they do here.
And he can get a chance to start again. That's all he needs.
That's what I'm willing to fight for.
To give anything for.
I have to tell you this.
I hate to but I must.
There's nothing left anymore.
It happened long before last night.
Long before we let him out of the studio.
Twenty years of steady and quiet drinking do something to a man.
Long before it showed in his face, it showed in his acting.
Little by little, more and more, with each picture.
That's why he slipped.
It wasn't just bad pictures, it was him.
And there's nothing left anymore.
He's just a shell of what he once was.
It's gone, Esther.
No, Oliver, I don't believe that. I won't and I can't.
Can you honestly tell me I'm wrong to do this?
To try? To try?
No, my dear, I can't. I can't honestly tell you that.
Then it's settled.
It's settled.
I'll arrange it.
'Bye, Vicki Lester.
Good luck, Mrs. Norman Maine.
Goodbye, Oliver. Thank you.
Darling.
You're up.
Well, if just being on my feet creates such a sensation, I shall never lie down again.
How do you feel?
Great. I'm fit as a fiddle and ready for love.
Why being as fit as a fiddle should make one ready for love, I never understood.
How did they decide a fiddle was fit?
Darling, is there anything I can do for you? Is there anything you want?
Yes. A number of things.
Anything you want.
Well, brace yourself...
...I've decided that we're dreary people.
Us?
Yes, both of us. I should like to see some changes around the house.
When did you decide all this?
Never mind about that. Just you listen.
First, I'm going in for the athletic stuff.
The swim before breakfast, the swim before dinner, the happy mind...
...and a happy body. Beginning now. Do you want to come along?
- Must I?
- No. Your part begins when I come out.
I shall want some hot soup and sandwiches.
All right.
But the thing that I should like more than anything else.
What?
I'd like some singing around the house. We used to have it all the time.
Do I still own the copyright?
Yes, including the Scandinavian.
Do you want it now?
Don't be silly. You go for your swim.
I'll open the kitchen window.
You'll be able to hear me.
I just wanted to look at you again.
"It's a new world I see
"A new world for me
"The tears have rolled off my cheek
"And fears fade away every time you speak
"A new world though we're in a tiny room
"What a vision of joy and blossom and bloom
"A newfound promise
"One that will last
"So I'm holding on
"And I'm holding fast
"You brought a new world to me
"And that it'll always, always be"
Yes, it is tragic. It's very tragic.
It was just an accident, of course. We had big plans for him.
He was all set for a comeback.
- It's for you, Mr. Libby.
- Thank you.
Have Joe take it.
Yes?
Yes, it was very sad. It was a great personal loss to everybody.
No exclusive on Miss Lester.
She can't see anybody anyhow.
Is Morris back yet? Have him come right in, will you, please?
"The Herald Express" wants a front-page spread. Get all the old stills.
London calling. They insist on talking to you personally.
Give it to Joe.
Yes, yes, I can rush you 1,500 words.
Yes, of course it was.
- You want me, Matt?
- Hold the church service until I tell you.
Here's all we have on them together.
It was right outside the house.
Leave them there.
Okay, pictures of the beach and the home? Right.
Oh, yes.
Yes, it was quite sudden.
Thank you very much.
All right, clear out all of you. I got a lot of work to do.
Miss Willer, you stay here.
This is the way the world ends.
Not with a bang, with a whimper.
There she is.
There's Vicki Lester.
That's Vicki, the one in black.
Turn around, can't you, Vicki?
Yeah. Give us just one look.
Can't I send out anything on her?
Will she start a new picture? Go away for a while?
Send out nothing.
That's an order, Libby.
Till we know.
Until we know what?
Until I can talk to her. Till she'll see me.
She hasn't answered her phone even for me this past week.
- This gonna stay here?
- As long as I'm head of the studio.
You know, Libby, you missed a lot not knowing Norman Maine.
Not knowing him? I spent my life knowing him.
I knew what he was going to do before he did it.
I knew him backwards.
You didn't know him at all.
He was quite a guy.
Is there anything I can do for you, madam, before I go to bed?
No, thank you, Charles.
Good night.
- Good evening.
- Hello. Where is she?
- She's in the library. May I have your coat?
- No, that's all right.
Hello, Danny.
You're not dressed.
Dressed?
You're due at that benefit at the Shrine. Come on, get dressed.
You told them you'd be there.
That was before.
I know it was before.
Come on and get dressed.
No!
You just gonna sit here forever?
Yes!
Tonight and tomorrow night and for as long as I like.
I don't want any of your homemade remedies.
I know what you're trying to do.
And the best thing you can do for me is to just leave me alone!
You and everybody else.
And thanks for the sympathy, I don't want it.
Not from you or anybody!
Sympathy? That's not what you're getting from me, baby.
You don't deserve it.
You're a great monument to Norman Maine, you are.
He was a drunk and he wasted his life, but he loved you.
And he took enormous pride in the one thing in his life that wasn't a waste, you.
His love for you and your success.
That was the one thing in his life that wasn't a waste. And he knew it.
Maybe he was wrong to do what he did, I don't know.
But he didn't want to destroy that, destroy the only thing he took pride in.
And now you are doing the one thing he was terrified of, you're wiping it out!
You're tossing aside the one thing he had left.
You're tossing it right back into the ocean after him!
You're the only thing that remains of him now.
And if you just kick it away, it's like he never existed...
...like there never was a Norman Maine at all.
Will you wait for me?
- Vicki! How are you?
- How are you? It's good to see you.
- It's been so long. You look wonderful.
- Thank you.
She looks great, doesn't she?
You, too. We gotta go now.
The next star listed to appear on your program is Vicki Lester.
But we're all of us aware of the tragic circumstances which prevent...
...Vicki Lester's appearance here tonight. It's with the deepest sympathy...
Will you forgive me for a moment?
Vicki Lester will appear tonight!
Here she is, ladies and gentlemen, a star that shines bright and high.
As you know this program is being broadcast all over the world.
Before you sing for us, I know that your millions of fans everywhere...
...are hoping you'll say a few words to them.
Won't you?
- Yes.
Hello, everybody.
This is Mrs. Norman Maine.
"You brought a new world to me
"And that it'll always, always be"
Bonjour, monsieur.
Bonjour, madame... and company.
Good afternoon.
As you see, this lovely city all around us is Paris.
And this lovely park is, of course, the Bois de Boulogne.
Pardon me.
Who am I?
Well, allow me to introduce myself.
I am Honor Lachaille.
Born: Paris.
Date:
Not lately.
This is 1900.
So let's just say...
...not in this century.
Circumstances:
Comfortable.
Profession:
Lover and collector of beautiful things.
Not antiques, mind you.
Younger things.
Yes, definitely younger.
Married?
What for?
Now, please don't misunderstand.
Like everywhere else, most people in Paris get married.
But not all.
There are some who will not marry and some who do not marry.
But here in Paris, those who will not are usually men...
...and those who do not are usually women.
Now, for example, here we find exhibit A:
The married kind.
These ladies stood their ground
And won
And I salute them, every one
Here are some others to behold
For whom the bells have never tolled
Oh, what a poor, defenseless pair
In those pathetic rags they wear
And there is the future.
Someday, each and every one of them...
...will either be married...
...or unmarried.
How adorable they are!
Each time I see a little girl
Of 5 or 6 or 7
I can't resist the joyous urge
To smile and say thank heaven
For little girls
For little girls
Get bigger every day
Thank heaven for little girls
They grow up
In the most delightful way
Those little eyes
So helpless and appealing
One day will flash and send you
Crashing through the ceiling
Thank heaven for little girls
Thank heaven for them all
No matter where
No matter who
Without them
What would little boys do?
Thank heaven
Thank heaven
Thank heaven
For little girls
This story is about a little girl.
It could be any one of those girls playing there. But it isn't.
It's about one in particular.
That one.
Her name is Gigi.
Gigi!
What you have to look forward to!
Those little eyes
So helpless and appealing
One day will flash and send you
Crashing through the ceiling
Thank heaven
For little girls
Thank heaven for them all
No matter where
No matter who
Without them
What would little boys do?
Thank heaven
Thank heaven
Thank heaven
For little girls!
Hello, Grandmama.
Gigi, where have you been?
Playing in the park.
I had to, Grandmama.
My foot fell asleep in class.
It wouldn't wake up.
Did you forget what day it is?
It's Tuesday.
Aunt Alicia!
Well, I'd better run.
You cannot go to your Aunt Alicia's looking like that.
Put your coat on.
Let me comb your hair.
Yes, Grandmama.
I hate this coat.
It makes my legs feel so long.
Yes, your legs are long.
You know...
...sometimes I'm sorry you never learned to dance.
But I want to, Grandmama.
Why don't you let me take lessons?
No. Not the same mistake twice.
Your mother took singing lessons, and look where she ended up.
Slaving away at the Opra-Comique in ridiculous little roles.
- She seems happy.
- Happy!
I went to see her one night.
I couldn't even find her.
In the first act...
...she was behind a tree.
In the second act...
...behind a tenor.
Mama's awake.
Isn't it early?
She's on this afternoon.
If I Were King.
That's more than she does in the whole opera.
And when I think of that delightful old gentleman...
...with all those flour mills.
Who?
Nothing.
You go to school every morning.
You see your Aunt Alicia once a week.
That's all the lessons you need.
When the time comes, you'll be ready.
Ready for what, Grandmama?
Enough. Now run.
- Goodbye, Grandmama.
- Goodbye, Gigi.
- More powerful, monsieur.
Sixty kilometers an hour!
There's nothing faster on the road, monsieur. Not here or in America.
Your uncle is here, monsieur.
Of course, the smaller is a first-rate machine, monsieur.
Naturally, the larger one is more expensive.
I'd be happy to demonstrate both.
I beg your pardon, Monsieur Gaston.
Your father wanted me to ask you...
...did you, by any chance, buy the
Paris-Lyon-Mditerrane Railroad?
The Paris-Lyon-Md...?
Yes, yes, I did.
According to this morning's opening at la Bourse...
...it's gone up 12 points.
I thought it would.
Monsieur Lachaille, about the car.
Send it over in the morning with the bill.
Yes, monsieur. Thank you.
But which one?
My dear fellow, I don't care.
Either one.
I'm sorry I kept you waiting, Uncle.
Why didn't you come upstairs?
I was afraid I'd meet my brother and sister-in-law.
- You would have.
- I have to tell you...
...your parents bore me to death.
- Me too.
- But I've known them longer...
...so they've been boring me longer.
After you.
Your father is actually quite unique.
He was a bore at the age of 5.
All he has to say is, "Hello," and I can barely keep my eyes open.
Armenonville.
I waited for you at the embassy last Sunday. What happened?
The thought of another embassy tea paralyzed me.
Instead, I had tea with an old friend
Madame Alvarez.
- Madame Alvarez?
- Yes, you know her.
Or knew her once, didn't you?
- Does she say I did?
- I think she's mentioned it.
Then I suppose I did.
It's the one place in Paris where I can go and relax.
Whose luncheon are you taking me to today?
Henri Trouvre.
We have to go.
I'm meeting a heavenly creature there.
You're still young, Uncle, aren't you?
Not compared to her.
But I must say,
I am compared to you.
Maybe it's the women you go with.
How old is Liane?
About 30.
That may be it.
Youth is the thing, Gaston.
Youth!
Stay close to the young...
...and a little rubs off.
I'm bored.
Bored?
Look at all the captivating
Fascinating things there are to do
Name two
Look at all the pleasures
All the myriad of treasures
We have got
Like what?
Look at Paris in the spring
When each solitary thing
Is more beautiful than ever before
You can hear every tree
Almost saying, "Look at me!"
- What color are the trees?
- Green!
- What color were they last year?
- Green!
- And next year?
- Green!
It's a bore
Don't you marvel at the power
Of the mighty Eiffel Tower
Knowing there it will remain evermore
Climbing up to the sky
Over 90 stories high
- How many stories?
- Ninety!
- How many yesterday?
- Ninety!
- And tomorrow?
- Ninety!
It's a bore!
The river Seine
All it can do is flow
But think of wine
It's red or white
- But think of girls
- It's either yes or no
And if it's no or if it's yes
It simply couldn't matter less
But think of a race
With your horse in seventh place
Then he suddenly begins
And he catches up and wins
With a roar!
It's a bore!
Life is thrilling as can be
Simply not my cup of tea
It's a gay, romantic fling
If you like that sort of thing
- It's intriguing
- It's fatiguing
It's a game
It's the same dull world
Wherever you go
Whatever place you are at
The Earth is round
But everything on it is flat
Don't tell me
Venice has no lure
Just a town without a sewer
The Leaning Tower I adore
Indecision is a bore
But think of the thrill
Of a bullfight in Seville
When the bull is uncontrolled
And he charges at the bold matador!
It's a bore!
Think of lunch beneath the trees
Stop the carriage, if you please
You mean you don't want to come?
The thought of lunch leaves me numb
But I implore
Oh, no, Uncle.
It's a bore!
Goodbye, Honor.
Come in.
- Mamita.
- Gaston!
What a wonderful surprise.
How do you feel today, dear Mamita?
Fine, Gaston.
And the better for seeing you.
You've gotten a trifle thinner, and it's most becoming.
- You think so?
- Oh, yes.
Come and sit down.
In your chair.
Thank you.
What beautiful material.
Very chic!
Just the sort of thing
Honor used to wear.
A bit more conservative, perhaps.
Would you like a sweet?
No, thank you. But I would love a cup of your chamomile tea.
But of course.
More than just one, I hope.
Do you have a telephone yet, Mamita?
No, not yet.
Not until Gigi is old enough to have secrets and admirers.
But there's one upstairs if it's important.
It's not important.
Gigi's not at home?
No. This is Tuesday.
The day she has luncheon with her aunt Alicia.
How is your sister?
I haven't seen her for quite a while.
I don't wonder.
She never sets foot out of her apartment or her past.
And quite a past it was...
...so she says.
According to the stories
Honor tells me...
...what she says is quite true.
Aren't you afraid of her influence on Gigi?
Not at all.
She finds Gigi a trifle backward...
...which is true...
...and she educates her.
Educates her?
Last week, she taught her to eat cold lobster...
...to perfection.
What in heaven's name for?
She says it's extremely useful.
Marvelous.
It's so good to be here.
It's always a pleasure to watch the rich...
...enjoying the comforts of the poor.
Especially you, dear Gaston.
How does your sister look?
Still as young as ever?
Yes, Alicia is always the same.
Living in the past must agree with her.
When I think...
...it was in...
...she went off with her first sultan.
Then came her Duke of Milan...
...her King of Spain, her khedive, her maharajah.
She's remarkable looking...
Good day, Charles.
Mademoiselle.
What are we having for lunch?
Ortolans.
Oh, dear!
Are they difficult?
Slowly, Gigi. Slowly.
The racing season is over.
Good day, Aunt Alicia.
Now let's go into luncheon.
Yes, Aunt Alicia.
Today you will learn to eat ortolans.
What are ortolans, Aunt?
Exquisite little birds.
Most people attack them like cannibals.
You must learn to eat them properly.
Bad table manners...
...have broken up more households than infidelity.
Did you work hard in school today?
What did you study?
History.
Napoleon's defeat at Waterloo.
How depressing.
- What else?
- English.
English?
I suppose we must.
They refuse to learn French.
Who are your friends?
Ortolans should be cut in two with a quick stroke of the knife.
There must be no grating of the blade on the plate.
Now bite up each piece.
The bones don't matter.
Go on eating while you answer my questions.
But don't talk with your mouth full.
Well, you can do it.
If I can do it, you can.
What friends have you made?
None.
I'm always on my own.
Why does Grandmama stop me from accepting invitations?
She's right for once.
You'd only be invited by ordinary people.
What about us?
Aren't we ordinary people?
Why are we different?
They have weak heads and careless bodies.
Besides, they are married.
But I don't think you would understand.
Oh, yes, Aunt, I understand.
We don't marry, is that it?
Marriage is not forbidden to us.
But instead of getting married at once...
...it sometimes happens we get married...
...at last.
Enough. We must finish lunch and get on with your lessons.
Now, go on.
Go on, go on!
Without knowledge ofjewelry, my dear Gigi...
...a woman is lost.
Do you remember Madame Dunard, who was here the other day?
Did you notice that rope of black pearls around her throat?
Yes! It was beautiful.
Dipped.
Dipped. Given to her by the man she loves...
...whose love is obviously beginning to cool...
...and she doesn't know it.
It's just a matter of time now.
Now, let us see what you remember.
What is this?
A marquise diamond.
A marquise-shaped diamond.
This?
This is...
...a topaz?
A topaz?
Among myjewels?
Are you mad?
It's a yellow diamond of the first quality.
You'll have to go a long way to see one like it.
- This?
- An emerald.
How beautiful.
Do you see that blue flame...
...darting about in the depths of the green light?
Only the most beautiful emeralds...
...contain that miracle of elusive blue.
- Who gave it to you, Aunt?
- A king.
- A great king?
- No, a little one.
Great kings do not give very large stones.
Why not?
In my opinion, it's because they don't feel they have to.
Who does give the valuable jewels?
Who?
Oh, the shy, the proud.
And the social climbers.
They think it's a sign of culture.
But it doesn't matter who gives them...
...as long as you never wear anything second-rate.
Wait for the first-class jewels, Gigi.
Hold on to your ideals.
Come over here to the light, Gigi.
Open your mouth.
With teeth like that...
...I could have devoured all Paris and most of Europe.
But I can't complain.
I had a good bite of it.
Tell your grandmama to get you some astringent lotion.
You don't use face powder, do you?
- Grandmama won't let me.
- I should hope not.
You have an impossible nose, a nondescript mouth.
Your cheekbones are too high.
But we can do something with the rest of you.
Your teeth, your eyes...
...your eyelashes, your hair.
We can...
...and we will.
You must learn to choose cigars.
Aunt, but I don't smoke cigars.
Of course you don't smoke cigars.
But a man does.
Everything I teach you...
...has a good reason.
Love, my dear Gigi...
...is a thing of beauty, like a work of art.
And like a work of art, it is created by artists.
The greater the artist, the greater the art.
And what makes an artist?
Cigars and jewelry?
You are from another planet.
Get on with your work.
A necklace is love
A ring is love
A rock from some obnoxious little king
Is love
A sapphire with a star is love
An ugly black cigar is love
Everything you are is love
You would think it would embarrass
All the people here in Paris
To be thinking every minute of love
I don't understand the Parisians
Making love every time
They get a chance
I don't understand the Parisians
Wasting every lovely night on romance
Anytime
And under every tree in town
They're in session two by two
What a crime
With all there is to see in town
They can't find something else to do
I don't understand how Parisians
Never tire of walking hand in hand
But they seem to love it
And speak highly of it
I don't understand
The Parisians!
I don't understand the Parisians!
When it's warm
They take a carriage ride at night
Close their eyes and hug and kiss
When it's cold
They simply move inside at night
There must be more to life than this
I don't understand the Parisians
Thinking love so miraculous and grand
But they rave about it
And won't live without it
I don't understand
The Parisians!
Stop.
What are you doing there?
Gaston...
...do you make love all the time?
I beg your pardon?
- Do you make love all the time?
- Heavens, no.
The only people who make love all the time are liars.
Was that the subject of your lesson today?
- How did you know I was having a lesson?
- I just came from your house.
Too bad I wasn't there. We could've played cards, and I could've beaten you.
But you cheat.
I can, but with you,
I don't have to.
You watch your tongue, my girl.
- I'm not your girl.
- Thank you for that.
If I have a little girl, I'll see to it she's more respectful than you.
- Come with me.
- Where?
- To the Ice Palace.
- I don't skate.
- I'll buy you a drink.
- I don't drink.
- A sweet one.
- Are you going to skate?
No, but I'm calling for Madame d'Exelmans.
Liane? Your lady love?
No, thank you.
I've had enough of that for today.
I'm not going to woo her on ice.
Come along before I spank you.
You wouldn't dare!
Oh, I wouldn't, eh?
Sit down.
Sit down.
Haven't you ever seen an ice rink?
Never.
Grandmama says going out distracts one from more serious matters.
A barbotage for the lady.
- What's that?
- Quiet.
Champagne for me. Well-iced.
Yes, Monsieur Lachaille.
Is that the scandalous
Madame d'Exelmans?
Yes, that's she.
Tell me, Gigi, the way you express yourself...
...does your grandmother ever hear you talk this way?
She never listens to me much.
Which reminds me, she mustn't know
I was here with you.
And why not?
What's wrong with being with me?
It isn't you. It's here.
I told you.
This isn't serious matters.
And just what are serious matters?
I don't remember it all by heart.
One mustn't read novels; they depress you.
Don't wear powder; it ruins the complexion.
Don't wear corsets; they spoil the figure.
What do you think of Liane?
She's pretty.
Yes, she is.
But...
But what?
Common.
Common?
How do you mean "common"?
Ordinary common or coarse common?
Ordinary.
And coarse. Well, I really must go.
Please come soon.
- Thank you for the drink.
- It was a pleasure.
Hello, my darling.
You waltz divinely.
Thank you, my love.
I'll let you know when I'll be in for my next lesson.
Yes, madame.
I thought we'd meet Honor at Maxim's and...
Darling.
At Maxim's?
Thank you... monsieur.
Dreadful man.
You seem to have lessons with him often enough.
He's an excellent teacher.
I made amazing progress.
But he's so conceited.
So superior in an inferior way.
I can't stand him.
Shall we go?
Gaston and Liane are joining me here at Maxim's tonight.
I'm giving a small party...
...in honor of a heavenly creature
I met this afternoon.
She's...
Pardon me.
She's the sister of the heavenly creature...
...I gave a party for last night.
What a marvelous place Maxim's is!
Not only gay and beautiful, but in one thing unique:
In Maxim's, everybody minds his own business.
No one is the slightest bit interested in whom one is with.
There's that wretched man
Louis de Latour
With his latest horrible amour
Isn't she a mess
Isn't she a sight
Let's invite them out tomorrow night
Honor Lachaille
Honor Lachaille
With another twinkle in his eye
Isn't it a shame
Isn't it a crime
Seeing him so happy all the time
There's Gaston Lachaille
With his little friend
Is that passion never going to end
Did you see her ring?
Not a bagatelle
Dear Liane is doing very well
She's a lovable one tonight, isn't she?
What is she up to?
She's so gay tonight
She's like spring tonight
She's a rollicking
Frolicking thing tonight
So disarming
Soft and charming
She is not thinking of me
No, she's not thinking of me
In her eyes tonight
There's a glow tonight
They're so bright they could light
Fontainebleau tonight
She's so gracious
So vivacious
She is not thinking of me
Bless her little heart
Crooked to the core
Acting out a part
What a rollicking, frolicking bore!
She's such fun tonight
She's a treat tonight
You could spread her on bread
She's so sweet tonight
So devoted
Sugarcoated
That it's heartwarming to see
Oh, she's simmering with love
Oh, she's shimmering with love
Oh, she's not thinking of me
She is not thinking of me
Someone has set her on fire
Is it Jacques, is it Paul or Lon?
Who's turning her furnace up higher?
Oh, she's hot
But it's not for Gaston!
Oh, she's gay tonight
Oh so gay tonight
A gigantic romantic clich tonight
How she blushes
How she gushes
How she fills me with ennui
She's so ooh la la la la
So untrue la la la la
Oh, she's not thinking of me
I knew she was up to something.
I knew it. There had to be a reason for last night.
But what was I to do?
Trail after her? Spy on her?
- Sniff around like a bloodhound?
- Of course not.
Heaven knows, I'm not jealous.
Thank you for that.
Why should I follow her?
No reason at all.
What did you do?
I hired detectives.
And the results are nauseating.
The Riverton Agencyjust telephoned me that she and her oily acrobat...
...arrived a half an hour ago in a cozy little inn at Honfleur.
Well.
Without skates.
Most disagreeable.
Come, my boy.
You're not the first.
This sort of thing has happened before.
And to some very good people.
Alfred de Musset,
Victor Hugo, Napoleon.
Even to me.
Isn't that true, Manuel?
Yes, indeed, sir.
Many, many, many times.
Well, not that many.
But a skating instructor.
A skating instructor!
It is always a skating instructor.
Or some such specimen.
- Isn't that true, Manuel?
- Absolutely, sir.
Remember dear little
Madame Dumelle...
...and Marmaluc the Terrible Turk?
There you are.
A wrestler from the Folies Bergre.
There was Madame Laura and the swimming coach.
Hurry up, Manuel.
And Madame d'A lbert and the riding master.
Mademoiselle Monique and the weight lifter...
...Madame Bocher and the plumber.
That's enough, Manuel.
You've made your point.
Here, put this in your mouth.
One can't be a Don Juan to one's valet, can one?
I only keep him to prevent him from talking to others.
Oh, come, Gaston, cheer up.
Cheer up? I couldn't be in better spirits.
Good. I'm delighted the deadly affair is over.
The woman was common.
Plainly and unmistakably common...
...from her painted toenails to the top of her bleached head.
I'm glad to be rid of her.
What do we do today?
What do we do?
We're going to Honfleur, naturally.
Are you mad?
I never want to see her again.
Of course you don't.
But you're not going to let a woman have the last word.
Where is your sense of honor?
Your male patriotism?
Nonsense.
Listen to your uncle, Monsieur Gaston.
He's an old campaigner.
How would you end it?
I'll write her a note.
There is no way of writing it without it reeking of wounded pride.
Victor Hugo couldn't pull it off.
Then I'll telephone her.
And what would you say?
"Liane, you deceived me with a skating instructor.
I never want to see you again."
You'll sound like ajealous schoolboy.
That's impossible.
That's true.
That's true.
What do I do?
You go to Honfleur and throw her out like a man.
That's a bore.
A bore? Not at all.
It's pride.
Just imagine your chagrin
When she sees you wander in
And you find her
With that slippery seor
What a moment supreme
When she totters with a scream
- What will she do?
- Scream.
- What did yours do?
- Scream.
- What do they all do?
- Scream.
It's a bore
But think of the bliss
Of the pleasure you would miss
When she topples in a heap
And you leave her there to weep
On the floor
It's a bore
You must catch her if you can
For the dignity of man
Take advantage of the chance
You owe it, sir, to France
This is war!
All right
But it's a bore
Turn it around and leave it there.
They are there.
Terrible-looking rodent, isn't he?
Terrible, but typical.
Those chaps all look alike.
She looks older in the daylight.
Much older.
I don't envy him.
Neither do I.
She never kissed me like that.
- How is she kissing him?
- Wholeheartedly.
What do you expect?
You're legitimate.
He's forbidden fruit.
When do we make our move?
Wait, wait.
Come on.
Monsieur Lachaille, what a surprise.
I am honored.
Don't be.
Come on, get up!
Wait, wait!
You are making a mistake.
It was just a coincidence, my meeting madame here.
It was a coincidence,
I suppose...
...that your lips just happened to meet...
...in a long, ardent, passionate...
You keep out of this.
I don't want any discussions.
For 1000 francs, this never happened.
You leave the Ice Palace and disappear. Forever.
- But...
- No "buts."
You're coming with us now.
We'll take you to the nearest railroad station.
1000 francs?
There is nothing more to be said.
Goodbye, madame.
From the bottom of my heart, goodbye.
Gaston, my love.
What happened?
Liane d'Exelmans has committed suicide.
Again!
I'm sorry, girl.
What did you say?
I didn't know he left her.
My word!
Of course.
Call me as soon as you hear anything.
Anything at all.
How marvelous!
Paris agog.
Why didn't you tell me that Gaston and Liane had broken up?
I didn't know it.
It must've happened over the weekend.
When was the suicide?
- Last night.
- How did she do it?
The usual way, insufficient poison.
Say, how many times has she done it now?
Good evening, Manuel.
Good evening, Honor.
Gaston, my boy.
Congratulations.
Your first suicide.
What an achievement.
And at your age.
Like everyone in Paris, we were just talking about you.
Thank you, Honor.
I came over to...
May I add mine, sir?
Thank you, Manuel.
I came over to get a...
It was a stunning victory.
- Where is the champagne?
- It's ready, sir.
I came over to get away from the telephone.
I can imagine.
Any news from the corpse?
Fully recovered, according to late morning editions.
And how do you feel?
Oddly enough, I'm not quite sure.
Make a guess.
Well, I'd say edgy.
Edgy?
Almost depressed. I don't know why.
There must be a reason.
I suppose it's to be expected.
I'm told Verdi felt that way after the first performance of Aida.
- Get a glass for yourself.
- I have one, sir.
To you, Gaston.
May this be the first of many.
What about tonight?
Where do we go? What do we do?
I don't know. I should consider what I do next very carefully.
I've been weighing the idea of going to the country for a while.
You mean, leave Paris?
Yes. Why not?
Why not?
That's the one thing you mustn't do.
Do you want people to think you're despondent? Disturbed?
If you leave, they will, you know.
No, no. That would be snatching defeat from the jaws of victory.
No, no, no. For the next few weeks, you should be out every night.
Maxim's, Moulin Rouge,
Pre Catalan.
The Pre Catalan is closed.
Open it!
You must be carefree.
Devil-may-care.
A different girl every night.
Keep them guessing who's next.
Play the game.
Be gay...
...extravagant, outrageous.
Grandmama!
Lmagine. Gaston bought out the opera last night...
...and brought the entire company to his house for a performance.
I'll go.
Gaston, how are you?
You look all in.
- Is your grandmother home?
- Yes, she is.
Is that gold?
The handle, yes.
You must be very rich to have a gold handle on your cane.
Gaston, what a nice surprise.
Don't let me disturb you, Mamita.
I was just preparing dinner.
Smells awfully good.
It's just a pork cassoulet.
It was impossible to get any goose this week.
I'll have them send you a brace from the country.
I brought you some caramels.
Thank you, Gaston.
Gaston, you spoil her so.
The champagne is for you.
You spoil me too.
Be careful.
You'll ruin your hands.
I have a manicure every morning.
What a nuisance.
- Not like that.
- No?
Like this.
All right.
- Where are you going with that tie?
- Let's not talk about it.
I'm having a small party for 200 at the Eiffel Tower.
- Are you going away?
- Yes, for the weekend. Trouville.
A little sea air before the next round of parties.
- Is Trouville by the sea?
- Yes, you little idiot.
You expect to find sea air in the mountains?
Don't make fun of me.
I've never been to the ocean.
What will you eat for dinner tonight?
Filet of sole with mussels, for a change.
And a lamb filet with truffles.
It's always the same.
It can't compare...
...with your grandmother's cassoulet.
Why don't you stay and have some with us?
- I wish I could.
- Why not?
All right, I will.
But people are waiting for you.
My car's downstairs. I'll send the chauffeur with my apologies.
My uncle will be the host.
Honor? He'll do it very well.
I'm dying to take a ride in your beautiful automobile.
Let me deliver it.
If you want to.
Tell the chauffeur to take this to my uncle's house.
- Go quickly.
- Thank you.
I can't wait to see the face of the janitress.
And after dinner, we'll have a serious game of cards.
And I'll beat you, as usual.
And you'll cheat, as usual.
Gaston, Gigi takes advantage of you.
Let her, let her, Mamita.
It amuses me.
How is Honor these days?
The same.
A life devoted to the chase.
We've missed you, Gaston.
We haven't seen you since the suicide.
Yes, I've had quite a full schedule lately.
So I've read.
You always do things in the grand manner.
Your parties have filled the newspapers.
Sometimes the cure is more painful than the illness.
But I have to do it.
It's expected of me.
Poor Gaston.
You're in a difficult position, aren't you?
Yes, Mamita, yes.
Very difficult.
See, the whole of Paris is watching me.
What are you talking of?
The whole world is watching you.
Yes, it's quite a responsibility.
Quite a responsibility.
Discard two.
Ten pounds of sugar.
Those aren't very high stakes.
Your sugar isn't that good.
I'd rather play you for candy.
It's the same thing, only sugar is healthier.
You just say that because you make it.
Gigi, I heard that.
Where are your manners?
It's all right, Mamita.
It's all right.
If I lose, what would you really like?
Silk stockings?
No. Silk stockings make my legs itch.
I discard one.
What I would really like is a Nile green corset...
...with rococo roses embroidered on the garters.
Or a new role for the player piano.
Or...
Or what?
A look at the ocean.
All right.
If I lose, I'll take you and Mamita to Trouville.
I heard that too.
Don't worry, Gaston.
Win or lose, Gigi, you will not impose us on poor Gaston for the weekend.
May I have a glass of champagne?
Are you losing your mind?
Of course you may not.
Discard three.
Discard one.
Now, let's see.
Cards are a matter of logic.
I know what I have...
...and I know how many you've drawn.
According to the percentages, you undoubtedly have an ace.
You discarded a 10 and a five...
...and a queen...
...and a three.
You, therefore, must have two aces.
Two aces and something smaller.
That's very interesting.
Therefore...
...I win.
And therefore, you lose.
But you cheated.
Where did you get that fourth king?
I won, I won, I won!
Why, you gypsy!
You thief!
You're a muttonhead.
Do we go to Trouville?
Yes, yes. You go to Trouville.
Grandmama, we go to Trouville.
It's out of the question.
Not at all. I'd love it.
Believe it or not...
...I have a better time with this outrageous brat...
...than anybody in Paris.
It'll be marvelous fun.
What time tomorrow will we get there?
Can I watch you play roulette?
May I stay up late for supper?
Is it awfully, awfully upper?
Gigi, you'll drive us wild
Stop, you silly child
Is everybody celebrated
Full of sin and dissipated?
Is it hot enough to blister?
Will I be your little sister?
Gigi, you are absurd
Now, not another word
Let her gush and jabber
Let her be enthused
I cannot remember
When I have been more amused
- Stop it!
- The night they invented champagne
It's plain as it can be
They thought of you and me
The night they invented champagne
They absolutely knew
That all we'd want to do
Is fly to the sky on champagne
And shout to everyone in sight
That since the world began
No woman or a man
Has ever been as happy
As we are tonight
The night they invented champagne
It's plain as it can be
They thought of you and me
The night they invented champagne
They absolutely knew that
All we'd want to do
Is fly to the sky on champagne
And shout to everyone in sight
That since the world began
No woman or a man
Has ever been as happy
As we are tonight
Why, there's Gaston.
I didn't know he would be at Trouville.
Who's that child he's with?
Me, I'm here on very important business.
There she is.
Riding is important.
Go.
Chrie...
...I must tell you that you upset all my plans for the weekend.
- May I?
- Please.
How did I do that?
I came prepared for battle...
...and an old wound prevented me from charging.
I don't think she was your type anyhow, Honor.
- You were watching me?
- Force of habit.
When a pretty woman came by,
I always had to watch you.
What good fortune brings you to Trouville?
I came with Gaston and Gigi.
You did?
Gigi is my granddaughter.
No, not your granddaughter.
Oh, yes. Time does not stand still for all of us, Honor.
Don't be nervous!
Gaston is such a dear man.
So sweet of him to bring little Gigi and show her Trouville.
She's having a glorious time.
And so is Gaston.
I haven't seen him this chipper in years.
We had good times too...
...didn't we?
Come to think of it, those last days we spent together...
...were by the sea, weren't they?
Were they?
Of course they were.
On the Riviera.
The pink villa.
- I only remember the blue villa.
- Which was that?
The one belonging to the soprano.
You knew.
But of course.
But I thought you left me because of that Austrian count.
But of course.
But you didn't.
I'll tell you about that blue villa, Mamita.
I was so much in love,
I wanted to marry you.
Yes, it's true.
I was beginning to think of marriage.
Imagine!
Marriage, me.
No. I was really desperate.
I had to do something.
And what I did was the soprano.
Thank you, Honor.
That is the most charming and endearing excuse for infidelity...
...that I've ever heard.
But I've never forgotten you.
Not the last evening we spent together.
I can remember everything as if it were yesterday.
We met at 9
We met at 8
I was on time
No, you were late
Ah, yes
I remember it well
We dined with friends
We dined alone
A tenor sang
A baritone
Ah, yes
I remember it well
That dazzling April moon
There was none that night
And the month was June
That's right
That's right
It warms my heart
To know that you
Remember still
The way you do
Ah, yes
I remember it well
- How often I've thought of that Friday...
- Monday
- night, when we had
Our last rendezvous
And somehow I foolishly
Wondered if you might
By some chance
Be thinking of it too
That carriage ride
You walked me home
You lost a glove
I lost a comb
Ah, yes
I remember it well
That brilliant sky
We had some rain
Those Russian songs
From sunny Spain?
Ah, yes
I remember it well
You wore a gown of gold
I was all in blue
Am I getting old?
Oh, no
Not you
How strong you were
How young and gay
A prince of love
In every way
Ah, yes
I remember it well
- Where is she?
- In the salon, madame.
What's happened?
What's so important you couldn't tell me on the telephone?
We have serious matters to discuss.
Collect yourself.
I doubt if I'll ever be able to.
Serious matters about what?
About Gigi.
You were at Trouville over the weekend with Gaston Lachaille.
It was a dreadful mistake.
Dreadful mistake?
What are you talking about, Alicia?
My dear sister...
...has it ever occurred to you that Gigi...?
Well?
Gigi?
Yes, Gigi.
It isn't possible.
Not if it's ruined at the beginning through lack of tact.
And when did I display any lack of tact?
It was a most congenial weekend.
So congenial that Gaston returned, canceled all engagements...
...and left Paris that same evening for Monte Carlo.
He did?
For how long?
For what they describe as an extended stay.
But why?
It doesn't matter why.
It may be a blessing in disguise.
It gives us time.
Time for what?
For Gigi's lessons, of course.
See to it that she's here every day.
Do you really think...?
It's a chance.
But a chance that we must take.
From now on, dear sister...
...it's work, work, work...
...lessons, lessons, lessons.
Pick up the coffeepot with one hand and the cup and saucer with the other.
Always both.
Never the coffeepot alone.
Like this, Aunt?
Your grip on the saucer must be firm...
...but not obviously so.
The saucer must seem so much a part of your fingers...
...that one would think it could only be removed by surgery.
Now pour...
...and be sure the coffeepot is upright before you take the cup away.
There must be no drops.
Now give it to me.
I don't take any, but be sure and always ask about cream and sugar.
Now serve yourself.
And remember the firm grip.
No, the coffeepot first!
Now, you will try it once more.
Remember, you will go to the door properly...
...turn, walk in properly and sit down properly.
Now, go on.
And not like a marionette.
Keep your shoulders level.
Now turn...
...walk back and sit down.
And don't flop into the chair.
Insinuate yourself.
That's better.
Now rise and exit the same way.
Don't jump up!
Ascend!
Now, you hold the glass like this.
Charles, some more wine for mademoiselle.
Watch me.
Try it.
Don't gulp it!
Sip it. A little at a time.
Fill mademoiselle's glass, Charles.
That's better.
You have to fully enjoy the aroma.
Hold your first sip on the roof of your mouth for a moment...
...and breathe through your nose.
Then you will feel the flavor.
Did you feel the perfume?
- No.
- Try it again.
A bad year will be sharp.
A good year, which this is, of course, will waft.
Marvelous!
That will be all, Charles.
Hello, Grandma...
Hello, Gigi.
Come in.
How good to see you.
I have a present for...
What's the matter with her?
Everything.
Don't you look well!
Did you have a nice trip?
How was Monte Carlo this year?
Well, the sea is blue.
The palm trees are green.
The sun is yellow.
It all makes a lovely post card.
Just as it should be.
Actually, it's a bore.
One has to be as rich as you to be bored at Monte Carlo.
I brought Gigi some caramels.
Really, Gaston, you spoil her too much.
Would you like a cup of chamomile tea?
Please. Please, Mamita.
Look, Gaston.
Four yards of material in the skirt.
Well, don't I look great ladyish?
You look like an organ-grinder's monkey!
An organ-grinder's monkey?
What happened to your little Scotch dress?
And that ridiculous collar!
And what's wrong with that collar?
It makes you look like a giraffe with a goiter.
With all the talk there is about you, Gaston...
...l've never heard it said you had any taste in clothes.
Have you gone mad? How dare you speak to Gaston like that?
Apologize.
Apologize at once!
I certainly will not.
This is a beautiful dress.
Gaston, please.
I beg of you, wait.
She'll apologize.
Is this the education she gets from you and your sister?
My congratulations to you both.
What have you done?
Why did he fly off the handle?
He knew I'd answer him back.
You ungrateful little thing.
How can you be rude to Gaston when he's been so good to us?
And just when we were trying so hard...
...to make an elegant young lady out of you.
To show you off to your best advantage.
You must admit, one doesn't have to turn oneself inside out...
...for an old friend like Gaston.
It's silly.
It's absolutely silly.
I've decided your new dress may not be as bad as all that.
I didn't see it properly, and perhaps I was a bit cruel.
To prove it,
I'll take you for a drive...
...for tea at the Reservoirs in Versailles.
- Would you like that?
- I'd love it!
Gaston wants to take me to tea at the Reservoirs.
You've come back, Gaston.
How tolerant you are.
I hadn't really gone.
We're going to tea at the Reservoirs.
No, you're not.
I'm sorry, Gaston.
What do you mean?
Grandmama, please.
Gigi, go to your room for a moment.
I have to talk to Gaston about something.
No, Grandmama.
Gigi, do as you're told.
Mamita, what does this mean?
Something has changed here lately.
I can feel it.
Sit down, Gaston.
Please.
Gaston, you know my friendship for you.
My friendship and my gratitude.
But I must not forget my duty.
Gigi's mother has neither the time nor the mind to take care of her.
And Gigi isn't just another girl.
She's special.
Of course.
For years, you've been giving her candies and trinkets...
...and she adores you.
Now you want to take her in your automobile to the Reservoirs for tea.
If it were just you and I,
I would say:
"Take Gigi wherever you want."
I would trust her with you anywhere.
But there are others, Gaston.
You are known everywhere.
For a woman to go out with you alone now...
...with the eyes of Paris on you...
Are you trying to make me believe...
...that if Gigi goes out with me, she'll be compromised?
Let us say she would be labeled.
A young girl who goes out with you is no longer an ordinary young girl.
Not even a respectable young girl.
Mamita, this is absurd.
As far as you are concerned, it would be just another news item.
But in this case, I would not have the heart to laugh...
...when I read it in the newspapers.
This is too ridiculous to discuss any further.
I don't want to contradict you, and I don't want to argue about it.
If you feel you're protecting Gigi from some cruel fate...
...that's your affair.
I understand responsibility to Gigi better than you.
I'll do all I can to entrust her only to a man who'll be able to say:
"I'll take care of her.
I'll answer for her future."
Now, can I get you your chamomile tea, Gaston?
No, thank you.
I have an appointment...
...and I'm late already.
But forgive me if I wonder, madame...
...whom you are keeping her for?
Some underpaid bank clerk...
...who'll marry her and give her four children in three years?
You're upset.
Please...
To see her married in white in a dingy little church to a plumber...
...who'll only give her a worthless name...
...and the squalor of good intentions?
Very well, madame.
Very well!
If that's your ambition...
...inflict your misery in the name of respectability.
I pity you!
I pity you all!
Upset!
What utter rubbish!
Pierre...
...do I look upset?
Yes, monsieur, you do.
Upset!
Upset indeed!
She's a babe
Just a babe
Still cavorting in her crib
Eating breakfast with a bib
With her baby teeth
And all her baby curls
She's a tot
Just a tot
Good for bouncing on your knee
I am positive that she
Doesn't even know
That boys aren't girls
She's a snip
Just a snip
Making dreadful baby noise
Having fun with all her toys
Just a chickadee
Who needs a mother hen
She's a cub, a papoose
You could never turn her loose
She's too infantile
To take her from her pen
Of course, that weekend in Trouville
In spite of all her youthful zeal
She was exceedingly polite
And on the whole, a sheer delight
And if it wasn't joy galore
At least not once was she a bore
That I recall
No, not at all
She's a child
A silly child
Adolescent to her toes
And good heaven, how it shows
Sticky thumbs are all the fingers
She has got
She's a child
A clumsy child
She's as swollen as a grape
And she doesn't have a shape
Where her figure ought to be
It is not!
Just a child
A growing child
But so backward for her years
If a boy her age appears
I am certain
He will never call again
She's a scamp and a brat
Doesn't know where she is at
Unequipped and undesirable to men
Of course, I must in truth confess
That in her brand-new little dress
She looked surprisingly mature
And had a definite allure
It was a shock, in fact, to me
A most amazing shock to see
The way it clung
On one so young
She's a girl
A little girl
Getting older, it is true
Which is what they always do
Till that unexpected hour
When they blossom like a flower
Oh, no.
Oh, no.
But...
There's sweeter music
When she speaks
Isn't there?
A different bloom
About her cheeks
Isn't there?
Could I be wrong?
Could it be so?
Oh, where
Oh, where did Gigi go?
Gigi
Am I a fool without a mind?
Or have I merely been too blind
To realize?
Oh, Gigi
Why, you've been growing up
Before my eyes
Gigi!
You're not at all
That funny, awkward little girl
I knew
Oh, no
Overnight
There's been
A breathless change
In you
Oh, Gigi
While you were trembling
On the brink
Was I out yonder somewhere
Blinking at a star?
Oh, Gigi
Have I been standing up too close
Or back too far?
When did your sparkle
Turn to fire?
And your warmth
Become desire?
Oh, what miracle
Has made you the way you are?
Gigi!
Gigi!
Gigi!
Oh, no
I was mad not to have seen
The change in you
Oh, Gigi!
While you were trembling
On the brink
Was I out yonder somewhere
Blinking at a star?
Oh, Gigi
Have I been standing up too close
Or back to far?
When did your sparkle
Turn to fire?
And your warmth
Become desire?
Oh, what miracle
Has made you the way
You are?
Mamita, are you alone?
Good. I have an important business matter to discuss with you.
Now, let us recapitulate.
To begin with, he said she would be spoiled as no other...
He said she would be spoiled as no other woman has been before.
It's all right, but it's vague.
I like everything spelled out.
Did he say precisely where she would live?
He said a suitable house on the Avenue du Bois.
- You're sure?
- Of course.
Well, very good.
Servants?
Yes, he mentioned servants.
What about an automobile?
I think so. I'm not quite sure.
She must have an automobile and a chauffeur.
I'm sure he didn't mean to be evasive or ungenerous.
He suggested that you and I and our lawyer...
...meet at his lawyer tomorrow and draw it up in detail.
You call him and tell him to bring his lawyer to our lawyer.
We'll draw it up in detail.
You mustn't be suspicious, Alicia.
- Gigi doesn't know yet?
- How could she?
He just left. But he wants to have dinner with her this evening.
When you speak to Gigi, be sure and stress...
...the difficulties of the situation, not the delights.
The role she will have to play.
She's a naive, thoughtless girl.
You must warn her not to ask for the moon.
Not only will he not give it...
Don't worry about her.
You think she's like you.
Actually, you don't know her.
There's no meanness in her at all.
Thank you very much.
I mean, she has no material ambition.
I understand. He should send a present before tonight.
Let me know what it is.
Yes, I will.
Won't you sit down?
You know why I'm here?
Yes, I know.
Do you want to...
...or don't you?
I don't want to.
I don't know what you want.
You told Grandmama...
I know what I told your grandmother.
We don't have to repeat it.
Just tell me simply what you don't want...
...and tell me what you do want.
Do you mean that?
Of course.
You told Grandmama that you wanted to take care of me.
To take care of you beautifully.
Beautifully.
That is, if I like it.
They've pounded into my head
I'm backward for my age...
...but I know what all this means.
To take care of me beautifully means I shall go away with you...
...and that I shall sleep in your bed.
Please, Gigi.
I beg of you, you embarrass me.
You weren't embarrassed to talk to Grandmama about it.
And Grandmama wasn't embarrassed to talk to me about it.
But I know more than she told me.
To take care of me...
...means that I shall have my photograph in the papers.
That I shall go to the Riviera.
To the races at Deauville.
And when we fight, it will be in all the columns the next day.
And when you'd give me up, as you did with Ins des Cvennes.
Who's been filling your head with all these old stories?
How do you know about that?
Why shouldn't I know?
You're world famous.
I know about the woman who stole from you.
The contessa who wanted to shoot you.
The American who wanted to marry you.
I know what everybody knows.
These aren't the things we have to talk about together.
That's all in the past, over and done with.
Yes, Gaston.
Until it begins again.
It's not your fault you're world famous.
It's just that I haven't got a world famous sort of nature.
When it's over, Gaston Lachaille goes off with another lady.
And I have only to go into another gentleman's bed.
That won't do for me.
I'm not changeable.
That won't do for me.
Grandmama and Aunt Alicia are on your side, but this concerns me too.
And I think I should have something to say about it.
And what I say is, it won't work.
It won't work!
Are you trying to find a way to tell me that I don't please you?
That you don't like me?
Oh, no, Gaston!
Oh, no. I do like you.
I'm so happy when I'm with you.
Gaston, couldn't we go on just as we are?
Maybe seeing each other a little more often?
You're a friend of the family.
Nobody would think anything of it.
You could go on bringing me licorice and caramels...
...and champagne on my birthday.
And on Sundays, we can have an extra special game of cards.
Wouldn't that be a lovely little life?
A wonderful little life.
Except that you forget one thing:
I'm in love with you.
You never told me.
I haven't known it very long.
I discovered it when I was away from you.
In Monte Carlo.
You are a wicked man.
You're in love with me...
...and you want to drag me into a life that will make me suffer!
You think nothing of exposing me to all sorts of terrible adventures...
...ending in quarrels, separations...
...pistol shots,
Sandomirs and poison!
Please listen to me!
I should never have believed this of you. Never!
What's the matter?
What's happened?
She doesn't seem to want to.
What do you mean?
I mean she doesn't want to!
Are you going out of your mind?
As God is my witness,
I explained it to her. Believe me.
You explained too much!
You've trained her to know nothing but the sordid and the vulgar.
But what about kindness, sweetness, benevolence?
What of the tender heart bulging with generosity?
These things exist too, madame.
Or have you never heard of them?
Uncle! I'll tell you...
...Europe is breeding a generation of vandals and ingrates.
Children are coming into the world...
...with ice-covered souls and hatchets in their hands!
And before they have finished, they'll smash everything beautiful and decent.
Have a piece of cheese.
No, thank you.
I envy you, Uncle.
I envy you, your age.
For you, it was different.
You've been clean and good, and it's been appreciated.
But not anymore.
It's over. All over.
I'm sorry to hear it.
A little salad?
No, thank you.
Imagine this if you can:
Here is a girl, living in a moldy apartment, decaying walls...
...worm-ridden furniture, surrounded by filth.
You're ruining my lunch.
Nothing to look forward to but abject poverty.
My heart was touched.
I wanted to help her.
I offered her everything:
House, car, servants, clothes...
...and me.
And?
She turned me down.
- Turned you down?
- Turned me down.
It's impossible.
It's not impossible.
It just happened.
Obviously, that disgusting apartment she lives in has driven her mad.
Her grandmother was delighted.
- Grandmother?
- Yes, Mamita.
But Gigi...
No, no, no. Not Gigi.
She refused me.
She turned me down.
I was refused, rejected, rebuffed...
...and repudiated.
They're a very peculiar family with peculiar ideas.
I negotiated with them myself once.
With me, one casual bit of grazing in another pasture...
...and the gate was slammed behind me.
What did you do?
- I left immediately.
- Bravo!
The absolutely right thing to do.
Of course.
And when she sends for you, which you realize she will...
Of course.
I know she will.
This is plainly a maneuver for better terms.
Don't you go back!
I wouldn't go back for anything in the world.
After all, you behaved like a perfect gentleman.
No question about it.
You made your offer in good faith...
...before any emotional advance.
An act of the purest chivalry.
I don't know any other way.
And if she doesn't appreciate the nobility of your conduct...
...if she uses the beauty of your nature...
...as a weapon for bargaining...
...then she's obviously not worth the chivalry or the nobility.
It's no one's fault.
You're too good for her.
Do you know how long it will take you to forget her?
By tomorrow noon at the latest.
Why not consult your little book and meet me at Maxim's tonight?
Splendid idea.
I would suggest a redhead.
Try Michle. I saw her last night.
She looked heavenly.
I'll call her at once.
You should. She doesn't have many good years left.
- See you at 9?
- Nine sharp.
Goodbye, Honor.
Poor boy
Poor boy
Downhearted and depressed
And in a spin
Poor boy
Poor boy
Oh, youth can really
Do a fellow in
How lovely to sit here
In the shade
With none of the woes
Of man and maid
I'm glad I'm not young anymore
The rivals that don't exist at all
The feeling you're only 2 feet tall
I'm glad that I'm not young anymore
No more confusion
No morning-after surprise
No self-delusion
That when you're telling those lies
She isn't wise
And even if love
Comes through the door
The kind that goes on forevermore
Forevermore is shorter than before
Oh, I'm so glad
That I'm not young anymore
The tiny remark that tortures you
The fear that your friends
Won't like her too
I'm glad I'm not young anymore
The longing to end a stale affair
Until you find out she doesn't care
I'm glad that I'm not young anymore
No more frustration
No star-crossed lover am I
No aggravation
Just one reluctant reply
Lady, goodbye
The fountain of youth
Is dull as paint
Methuselah is my patron saint
I've never been so comfortable before
Oh, I'm so glad
That I'm not young anymore
Yes, madame?
Charles, I'm going out.
Order me a carriage immediately.
Yes, madame.
Right away, madame.
Would you repeat that again, please?
She doesn't want to.
She doesn't want to?
She doesn't want to.
Such stupidity is without equal...
...in the entire history of human relations.
It must be your fault.
It must be.
You must've emphasized the difficulties instead of the delights.
What did you say to the little monster?
Gigi is perhaps a little slow about certain things...
...but just because she's not attracted to Gaston...
...doesn't make her a monster.
It doesn't make her a princess.
What did you say to her?
Did you tell her about love, travel, moonlight, Italy?
About hummingbirds in all the flowers...
...and making love in a gardenia-scented garden?
I couldn't tell her that.
I've never been further than the Riviera.
Couldn't you have invented it?
No, Alicia, I could not.
It's incredible.
Incredible!
Where is she?
Perhaps I should talk to her and tell her what she's missing.
It's the glory of romance...
...forgetting everything in the arms of the man who adores you...
...listening to the music of love in an eternal spring.
- And when eternal spring is over?
- What difference does that make?
It makes a difference to Gigi.
And I'll tell you something:
I'm not sure I don't agree with her.
You're a fool! And your granddaughter takes after you.
When I think of the time and effort
I've lavished on that idiotic child!
I received a note from Gigi.
She said she wanted to see me.
Of course.
Won't you come in?
Thank you.
You know my sister?
My dear Mr. Lachaille.
What a pleasant surprise.
And how is your enchanting father?
He has diabetes.
If one is in the sugar business...
And your attractive mother?
Well, I hope.
Gaston, I have been thinking.
I'd rather be miserable with you than without you.
Say a prayer
For me tonight
I'll need every prayer
That you can spare
To get me by
Say a prayer
And while you're praying
Keep on saying
She's much too young to die
On to your Waterloo
Whispers my heart
Pray I'll be Wellington
Not Bonaparte
Say a prayer
For me this evening
Bow your head and please
Stay on your knees
Tonight
I thought perhaps we might go to Siena in July...
...beginning of the season.
And when do we go to Deauville?
At the end of August.
It isn't absolutely necessary, if you'd rather not.
Don't say it. I'd love to go.
Especially to the casino.
You know how much I love to gamble.
Would you like more coffee?
I'll do it.
Of course, the roulette wheel won't be as easy to beat as you are.
Nor as easy to cheat.
You always knew that I cheated, didn't you?
Look.
What?
Madame Dunard.
How do you know Madame Dunard?
I know all about Madame Dunard.
Do you see her pearls?
Dipped.
Dipped. Not worth a sou.
The poor thing doesn't know it.
It's just a matter of time now.
Would you like to dance?
I'd love to.
What an evening.
Don't you think so, darling?
Gaston, my boy, I waited for you.
- Good evening, Honor.
- Good evening, Monsieur Lachaille.
Do you know what we are going to do?
We are going to...
What's that in your breast pocket?
- I'm sorry.
- What is it?
It's a present for you.
Wouldn't you like to see it?
Oh, no. Not now.
Later. I'd rather dance with you.
May I see it now?
The present.
Gaston, that's beautiful.
They're simply beautiful.
Oh, what a color!
Only the most beautiful emeralds contain that miracle...
...of elusive blue.
What taste you have.
If I may say so, much better than your taste in clothes.
- May I put it on?
- The clasp is a bit tricky.
Why not ask the lady in the powder room to help?
Yes, of course.
Thank you.
My dear, dear, dear boy.
How did it happen?
She changed her mind?
Obviously.
How delicious!
Did you have to improve the arrangement?
Please don't be vulgar.
She looks adorable.
So fresh, so eager...
...so young.
It's the sophisticated women who get boring so quickly.
What can they give you?
Everything but surprise.
But with someone like Gigi...
She can amuse you for months.
I'm so happy for you.
I can't wait to tell Manuel.
Good night. Good night.
I don't understand.
What's wrong?
It's too early to go home yet.
I thought I was doing so well.
What's the matter?
I don't want to go home yet!
Please, Gaston.
Gaston, won't you tell me what I've done wrong?
Gaston, do tell me. Please!
What's happened?
Gigi, what's happened?
May I come in?
Gaston, please.
No newspapers. No scandal.
Madame, will you do me the honor...
...the favor...
...give me the infinite joy of bestowing on me...
...Gigi's hand in marriage?
Thank heaven.
For little girls
For little girls
Get bigger every day
Thank heaven
For little girls
They grow up
In the most delightful way
Those little eyes
So helpless and appealing
One day will flash and send you
Crashing through the ceiling
Thank heaven for little girls
Thank heaven for them all
No matter where, no matter who
Without them
What would little boys do?
Thank heaven
Thank heaven
Thank heaven
For little girls
English Subtitles by
Gelula/SDI
Good morning, Boston
Morning Express. Extension 52?
Boston, Massachusetts calling Paris, France.
We want the International
Refugee Organization,
Children's Center Number 46 calling
Mr. Peter Garvey, G-A-R-V-E-Y,
Person to person. Mr. George Degnan calling from Boston...
"Wanted: a mother".
That's not sob stuff!
- That's good human interest!
- Your Paris call is coming.
Do you realize over 300 war orphans have been adopted here in Boston?
Fire him? Fire Pete Garvey? Me?
Why, I wouldn't fire him if...
All right, you can get yourself another editor, Mr. F.C.
He's perfectly right,
I should fire him.
- Where is that woman? Esther!
- Yes, sir!
- Get me Pete Garvey.
- He's coming on.
- Who?
- Pete Garvey, in Paris.
- Operator, put him on.
- "Robert Dulac, Number 401.
"Robert is only 10 years old, but he's never had a childhood.
"His parents were both killed in the late war."
- Hello, Pete! Hiya, toots!
- Give me that phone!
Don't snap your twig, Mr. Degnan.
He's doing a wonderful job.
At least smile.
Yelling won't bring him back.
Peter, dear. I miss you, Peter.
I've told you by letter, by cable, by carrier pigeon that I miss you.
Now it's costing me an overseas call to tell you I miss you, Peter.
Get your... Get yourself back here immediately or you're fired.
Why didn't you answer my cables, you...?
George, there's children in the room. Nix.
I'm taking you off salary, so help me, Pete!
You get back here on the first plane or you can stay in Paris forever.
Now, are you coming back or not?
Hello?
Hello?
You peanut-brained son of a peanut-brained kangaroo, you still on?
Hello! Hello?
Pete, you hear what I said?
George, I'm sorry, you're just not getting through to me.
- I'll call you back later.
- You stay on this phone!
I can't. I gotta go practice baseball with my team, the Notre Dame Tigers.
We lost a thriller last week, 48 to 47.
We gotta go practice.
We're playing the United Nations
Cubs. We'll win, because I'm pitching.
Oh, it's the mailman!
Yeah.
That's always a big event here,
George, the mailman.
- Hello, Pierre!
- Hello, Pierre!
Bonjour, Monsieur Garvey!
They don't get any letters, these kids, but the mailman's wife bakes them cookies every day.
You know why they don't get any letters?
I'll tell you why, because they don't belong to anybody.
I'm touched, there's a lump in my throat, my heart is bleeding.
Oh, but you'll rally, George.
You'll rally. Fight, pitch.
Your article on Robert Dulac touched me...
Oh, Bobby!
Say, he's some kid.
He speaks English. Yeah, and he's a natural second baseman.
Goes to his right or his left, throws underhand, switch hitter.
Do you think the Express pays you a salary to teach punks to play baseball and shoot marbles?
- It keeps him out of the pool halls.
- Who cares?
Besides, he just sort of took to me.
You remember, like I took to you?
AH I remember is,
Fm stopping your articles.
- What?
- Yes!
Bobby, go get the mail, will you?
Look, you can't do this to me.
There's still 26 children here!
I've got to, Pete.
The war orphan racket's milked dry.
It isn't news anymore.
Not news? What are you saying?
A good idea is always news.
This is the best idea since the invention of the wheel!
There's 60 nations taking care of these waifs, providing homes for them, and there's five million hot meals every day in Europe, the Near East, in Asia, and in the Iron Curtain...
Why, UNESCO'S building children's homes everywhere!
We need a hypo, something sensational.
I got just the idea for you.
The Far East.
- Far East?
- Yeah. That's the hot spot.
Burma, Indochina, Hong Kong, just the place for the old Pete Garvey
and his sizzling typewriter.
- Far East, huh?
- Yeah!
Now you're beginning to reach me.
You're getting through to me.
- This is for Mr. Garvey.
- Oh, a letter for Mr. Garvey.
Who wants to take it to him?
Mr. Garvey told me to bring his mail today!
Pete Garvey is my friend! Anybody don't like it, gets a sock in the nose!
Sock in the nose!
Robert!
- That's he, that's Bobby.
- That's Bobby.
Come here a moment. I want to introduce you to Mr. and Mrs. Godfrey.
- Come on let's go!
- Bobby! Bobby, come here!
- Come on let's go!
- Bobby! Bobby, come here!
Now, Bobby!
- That was Bobby.
- He's just a little shy.
We might as well adopt a rabbit.
Mr. Garvey. A very nice couple are here from America,
- they want to adopt Bobby!
- Good!
- But he...
- I know, you can't catch him, huh?
- Every time, he runs!
- He's a shifty little sprout, all right.
- You are leaving us?
- Yep, paper called me back.
It will break Bobby's heart.
He adores you.
What are we gonna do with him?
Please, we must place him before you go. Come!
Oh, this is a wonderful little guy.
I can vouch for his honesty, his intelligence, and his sunny disposition.
He's practically a combination of
Joe DiMaggio and Monsieur Beaucaire.
Make with the manners, Bobby.
Oh, Bobby!
He just does this every once in a while.
It's a nervous habit from the bomb shock. A little care, attention...
Personally, I do not care for children, it is just that my wife...
Quiet, Walter. We'll come some other time, Mr. Garvey.
Mr. Walter Godfrey... Aren't you with the Boston Philharmonic Orchestra?
The Boston Philharmonic Orchestra is with me.
Oh, you'll excuse my unfortunate phrasing. I got a kid here...
You do recognize talent when you see it.
- Go get Theresa.
- Theresa!
Don't you think we'd better tell them that...?
- Theresa!
- Listen to amateurs?
Now, here, this is wonderful!
- Oh, dear.
- Oh, the poor hat.
Mr. Garvey, I am not interested.
I hate children!
Aren't they a pain?
Good thing you didn't take Bobby, he has absolutely no ear for music.
He'd have driven a great musician like yourself out of your mind!
But this is something.
Theresa, I want you to meet
Mr. and Mrs. Walter Godfrey, from America.
They're in the market for a child.
- She's a bit older than we planned.
- They're all too old!
Mr. Godfrey is a great musician from America. Understand?
Si, signore.
Her mother was a great musician, but she wouldn't entertain the enemy.
All she left Theresa was just her glorious voice.
You're going to hear a thing, you'll be grateful to me for the rest of your life.
"Caro Nome"?
Why can't she sing some little song?
Beautiful.
Beautiful!
Come here, my child.
I want to kiss you.
Yes,
Theresa's blind.
But she has a heart and a throat and that's what you use to sing songs with, isn't it?
Oh, my dear. My dear.
Walter, let's take her home!
Home?
She will be in the Metropolitan and Carnegie Hall.
The contracts, the papers...
The papers!
I want the papers!
Get the papers!
Sign up the papers immediately.
Isn't that wonderful?
We finally got a home for Theresa!
- What?
- Will I ever get a house?
Why, you can't miss, Marcel.
You've already got about the best house in the world.
Close in here a minute, kids, and I'll see if I can get through to you.
In your heart you have a playroom
To enjoy every toy, every game
Sonny, you've got a house
Your own little house
And it's registered in your name
Now, take your eyes
Why, they're the windows
Showing you every view in the sun
Honey, you've got a house
Well, your own little house
And it's better than anyone
So just keep the outside shined up
And the inside free from gloom
Take care of your house
And you'll wind up
This is a duplex.
Having fun in every room
And your head, now that's the attic
Full of memories and keepsakes
To choose
Sonny, you've got a house
Man, that's a pre-war house
And it costs just a smile to use.
And as long as you
Can meet that payment
Why, you can't lose
Now, take your hands
The tools you work with
You'll be thrilled
When you build something nice
Umbriago, what a house!
Why, it's colossal!
Let me hear that note again.
What a note! What a note!
Here, keep this,
I got a million of them.
Now, take your skin
Say, that's the paint job
More of a spray job.
Lots of sleep helps to keep it aglow.
- Pete, en franais!
- En franais.
- English!
- Thank you.
You don't have to run
From the landlords
Though you haven't got a sou
Here you can live
Like the princes and lords
And your address is
Rue de la you, you...
- Me?
- Oui.
Take your ears
Now, they're the doorway
I got gates.
Where the songs of the birds
Come to call
Now, you've heard about your house
Your own little house
But here comes the best part of all
You can hang the dreams you want
As pictures on the wall
Lunch! Well, there they go!
Andre broke in front, Pierre in second, here comes Marcel way in third!
Whoa, Marcel!
Let her go, boy! Go, boys!
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Tell 'em I'll be there
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Better save a chair
There you are, huh?
You know, that's the fifth set of parents you've turned down.
What's the matter?
Don't you want any folks?
I have got folks. You are my folks.
Aren't you, Pete?
Oh, boy.
Aren't you, Pete?
I warned you about this.
I told you time after time,
I couldn't stay here forever.
You are leaving, Pete?
A man's got a job, he's got a job, hasn't he?
Don't you have any idea of what's going on in the Far East?
My boss needs me, George Degnan.
Raised me from a pup.
Everything I know, good, bad, or indifferent, old George taught me.
The first time I saw him,
I wasn't bigger than you.
I didn't have any father, so I just sort of latched onto George.
Can't throw a guy like that out the window when he needs you.
And he needs me, see?
Besides, you and me, we're better than folks, we're friends.
Just like I got friends in Brazil and Alaska. You're my Paris friend.
Goodbye, Mr. Garvey.
Goodbye, Mr. Dulac...
- Goodbye, Suzi.
- Tais-toi! Shake hands.
Hey.
Don't we always leave them singing?
Sure, Pete, sure.
We always leave them singing.
- In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
- In the cool, cool, coo! of the evening
- Tell 'em I'll be there
- Tell 'em I'll be there
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Better save a chair
When the party's getting a glow on
And singing fills the air
In the shank of the night when the...
What've we got...?
Oh, Miss Emmadel Jones.
Nice timing.
A record?
Hello, Mr. Garvey.
Remember me?
- Is the voice familiar?
- Let me seem...
- No?
- Don't tell me now...
Why don't you relax and light your pipe?
Maybe it'll come back to you.
- I can almost see you now.
- My name is Jones. Emmadel Jones.
- The girl you left behind you.
- Hello, Emmy.
Way behind you.
You'll forgive this unmaidenly intrusion
into the male privacy of your bachelor room,
but I think you're old enough now to be told about
those interesting things called
"the facts of life".
- Well, tell me all.
- I read a book last night called
What Every Young Girl
Should Know.
And I was amazed at the things that apparently go on with normal people.
So I intend to try them on my piano, every one of them.
In other words, I intend to get married...to get married...
- Steady. Steady, girl.
- ...to get married...to get married...
But not to you, darling.
So stop trembling and call the blood back into your ashen little cheeks.
I wouldn't frighten you for the world.
I remember too well how sick you looked three years ago
when we went down to the City Hall to get our marriage license.
I also remember how quickly you recovered
when our mutual friend, your boss and fellow conspirator,
Mr. George Degnan, came through with that
miraculous Paris assignment that permitted you to escape
- at the very last second.
- Good old George.
You told me tenderly to get a job and wait for you. I did.
- Good.
- I've been waiting three years now.
Waiting and running.
Yes, running around desks, staying true to you.
- Good girl!
- I'm tired of running,
so I'm gonna slow down.
In fact, I'm gonna stand stiff
and the first egghead who catches me can have me!
I was born to be a mother, not a poised pencil!
And do you realize that if you were half the man you think you are,
I'd be the mother of a brood by now?
There'd be one in the fifth grade...
In the fifth grade...in the fifth grade...
In the fifth grade...in the fifth grade...
- Look out, wait a minute.
- In the fifth grade...
...and another in the second grade and maybe even et cetera, et cetera.
- Such are the fortunes of love
- Oh, they're twins?
In the newspaper business.
I cannot, however, permit myself to stare childless
at the prospect of old age in a home for spinsters!
So I have been walking around windy corners lately.
Emmy.
In other words, Peter Garvey, we're through!
- Finished! Kaput!
- Kaput, yet.
So good day, good evening, goodbye and...
- Bon voyage.
- Drop dead, my dear stinker!
And may you stew in your ink-stained bachelorhood
the rest of your selfish, carefree days!
She still loves me.
P.S. Knowing how conceited you are,
I know what you're thinking now,
and this is to inform you that I do not stiff Jove you... Stiff Jove you...
- Encore.
- Still love you...still love you...
- Once more. Kid's mad for me.
- Still love you...
Still love you. . . still love you...
Hey, Bobby?
You want me, Pete?
- What grade are you in?
- Fifth.
Well, what do you know!
The fifth?
Attention, please.
Attention, please.
Announcing the arrival of
Flight Number Seven,
the Star of Paris, at Gate Number Four...
I beg your pardon.
- Emmadel Jones!
- George Degnan!
- It's been years!
- I'm even happy to see you.
Well, if you don't look like a Christmas tree waiting for Santa...
- I didn't know it showed.
- Showed?
They won't need landing lights.
What's the big idea?
I have a very special oil in my lamp tonight.
Could it be burning for someone on this plane?
Could.
"Oil your lamp.
The bridegroom cometh
"on Flight Seven,
Tuesday night.
"Meet me and expect surprise.
Pete."
Why, that unpredictable...
He didn't say anything to me about marriage!
He's learning.
And no more assignments to those faraway places, because I'm gonna housebreak him.
Well, turn up your wick.
He cometh.
Just stick around. You're gonna see the greatest love scene since somebody met somebody.
He cometh not.
Miss, wasn't there a Peter Garvey on that plane?
Peter Garvey?
No, sir. Sorry.
Well, he said to expect a surprise.
Yes, he did.
I should have known better!
Here. You're the one he's married to, anyway.
No appetite, huh?
For two weeks, he's eaten less than a bird.
Acute melancholia.
The best medicine is complete change.
I'll recommend him tomorrow to the Director General.
- Thank you.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- You must eat something.
Do you want to starve yourself to death?
You will have to forget
Monsieur Garvey.
Starving yourself isn't gonna bring him back. He's gone to America.
He wouldn't forget his typewriter and his clothes.
Newspapermen are not like other people. They're crazy! They're...
Plenty crazy, and you're not kidding.
- Hi, Bobby, Suzi.
- Where have you been?
Where? I've been all over France like a tent.
Afoot, on horseback and by scooter.
And I got an hour and a half to catch my plane.
What a deal! What a hassle I got into.
I gotta have a birth certificate!
I go to the Consul, the Bureau of Immigration.
Can I get it? No. Why?
Because I'm a bachelor.
And can I get it in Paris?
C'est impossible.
I must go to Saint-Nazaire.
I'm famished!
Well, I hightail it to Saint-Nazaire.
I look all over town, I talk to everybody.
Nobody knows about it.
One old fellow with a mustache out here, says, "Try Alenon."
Off I go to Alenon.
Empty. A complete blank. Nothing.
One guy gave me a lead. He said,
"Try the priest." "Where's the priest?"
"Removed. He's now at Orlans."
I go to Orlans, can't find him.
He's not in town.
He's out picking grapes.
So I joined the grape-picking outfit.
No food, no money, have to wash my shirt in the river.
Eat with horses, sleep with chickens, wake up with an omelet on my chest.
- But you got your birth certificate?
- Not my birth...
- Bobby's birth certificate!
- Bobby?
Emmadel. She must think I joined the Foreign Legion or something.
Bobby, do me a favor. Next time you're born, don't be so sneaky about it.
Arrange to be born somewhere they know you.
Another thing: Don't be a bachelor, even if you have to get married.
You build yourself up into a respectable citizen, then try to adopt, and they think you're a cheat,
- you're a thief, a crook, a liar.
- You are adopting somebody, Pete?
Why do you think I've been all over France?
We're taking the plane for America today.
Home and mother await you!
Pete's going to be my father!
I have to write Emmadel and tell her all about it.
Marie, we must get Bobby's clothes.
Hey, whoa!
All right, all right.
We're going to America to Boston to see the Red Sox!
Pete's gonna be our father!
Wonderful! Wonderful!
We're going to get our clothes.
- How's Suzi taking it, Bob?
- She is as glad as I am, Pete.
Good. I was a little worried about Suzi, you know.
Good. I was a little worried about Suzi, you know.
Suzi does not care where she goes as long as she is with me.
Wait, wait, wait.
Bobby, I...
I didn't mean Suzi too.
Not Suzi?
Why, no. I thought you understood.
I couldn't take a little girl to America.
There's certain things about little girls, certain things you have to do.
I know, I know!
I'll do all the things.
I do them now, don't I?
- Everything?
- Everything.
Ever since I found her under a bush where the Germans left her,
- I've taken care of her.
- You found her under a bush?
Yes. She was this little.
She depends on me, Pete.
I can't leave her. I own her.
- You own her?
- Sure.
But holy Toledo, do you realize what
I did to get you a birth certificate?
I broke rules, regulations... I practically had the Atlantic Charter rewritten.
I thought you wanted to be with me and Emmadel.
- I do, I do, but...
- But what? You'd rather be with Suzi?
No, no! I prefer you to her.
She is nothing.
But I can't leave her.
She needs me.
Shut up!
She is so silly, she doesn't know anything.
She's not only silly, but she hasn't got any teeth.
All right, Suzi, where were you born?
- She wouldn't know.
- She wouldn't know.
Here we go again!
Aloha, another month.
Pete, I see it! I see America!
I've discovered America, Pete.
Wait till America discovers you. Ouch.
Just like Mr. Christopher Columbus, huh, Pete?
- I'm discovering America, eh, Pete?
- Yeah, you and old Chris.
Here's Cristofo Columbo
Meet Cristofo Columbo
Well, how-dee-doody, Chris.
He proved to all the squares
That the world was round
Then circled round
And found the USA
Misto Cristo
Cristofo Columbo
Went for a boat ride one fine day
On his day off
Traveled such a way off
He found the USA
There they go again!
Don't these actors ever stop making noises?
They're USO people.
They sing for soldiers.
Soldiers can shoot back.
They've got guns.
Well, it took him ages
Cost a lot of wages
Then from the sea
There rose a hill
Though we fly now
Landing from the sky now
We get the same old thrill
Oh, Misto Cristo
Cristofo Columbo
Thought the world was round
Oh, presto, westo
Sailed the man Columbo
He found the USA
The mighty Louis.
Isabella
Really liked this fella
Pawned her best fur coat
To buy the cat a boat
Oh, Misto Cristo
Cristofo Columbo
Thought the world was round
Oh, presto, westo
Sailed the man Columbo
He found the USA
Oh, Misto Cristo,
Cristofo Columbo
Thought the world was round
Oh, presto, westo,
Sailed the man Columbo
Who found the USA, huh?
When he docked here
Almost no one flocked here
Now, it's more alive
Just try a Sunday drive
Oh, Misto Cristo
Cristofo Columbo
He really puffed his oar
Oh, glad he got here
Now we have a spot here
Known as Freedom Shore
Where the helpless, homeless
Open up Freedom's door
Folks he met here
Were a healthy set here
Wore nothing much
Except a smile
With me along here
In a new sarong here
- I'd have been right in style
- Tell it, Phil.
Here comes Curlie
You better hold your girlie
Ain't I the one
Well, shut my mouth
Who's this Chris kid?
Take a look at this kid
I discovered the South, boy
Ain't no baloney
It's John I.T. Savonie
I was just sitting around
I wasn't doing anything
Everybody started singing
Made me so nervous
Oh, Misto Cristo
Cristofo Columbo
Really puffed his oar
Oh, glad he got here
Now we have a spot here
Known as Freedom Shore
Where the helpless, homeless
Open up Freedom's door
Where the helpless, homeless
Open up Freedom's door
Where the helpless, homeless
Open up Freedom's door
Fasten your safety belts
We're coming in for landing
We're coming in for landing now
Well, the permit is for five days only.
If you're not married by then, the children have to go back to France.
- You understand that?
- Oh, sure.
We'll be married in the morning, pal.
Well, good luck, Mr. Garvey.
Report your address immediately.
The Department's fussy about that.
We sure will.
We're not fussy at all.
Come on, kids.
Here we go. Come on, Suzi.
- Is this home, Pete?
- This is Emmadel's home.
Come on, kids.
Please let Emmadel like us. Please.
- Who are you talking to?
- God.
Put in a word for me, will you, pal?
Bye, Em, see you later!
Thank you for coming.
Goodbye, now. Goodbye, girls.
Hi, Em. Let the merry bells ring out.
- The bridegroom finally cameth.
- Pete!
This one's in the fifth grade and this one is et cetera.
Used to be orphans, you know.
- Oh, Pete.
- Bobby, Suzi, meet Emmadel.
Hello, Bobby. Hello, Suzi.
- We're so glad you're here.
- Thank you, Emmadel.
She's sleepy and doesn't speak English.
I bet they're hungry too.
- This guy's too excited to eat.
- Suzi ate, but in the plane...
Oh, the poor darling!
Are you gonna stand out here all day?
Come on in the house. Come on, Suzi.
Oh, wait a minute, the baggage.
The baggage. Wait a minute.
Here, catch.
How's Pa and Ma?
- Mother and Father are fine.
- Mother and Father?
- It was Pa and Ma around Gloucester.
- Were they?
Are they all choked up over the wedding?
Well, Pa's choked up but Ma's very happy.
That's surprising.
I didn't think Ma approved of me as a son-in-law permanently.
What's this, a birthday party?
Have I forgotten it again, honey?
No, the girls at the office gave me a shower.
That was that covey of quail
I flushed at the door.
Look at this beautiful bunch of loot!
Potholders. Now, there's something a fellow shouldn't go without.
- Pete.
- Come here and don't "Pete" me.
- Have you seen the papers?
- I wanna see you. You look beautiful.
- I wanna catch up on you.
- Catch up on current events.
I've been away for three years.
Here's the paper.
I'll go get the kids ready for dinner.
I'll tell Ma you're here.
Pa's out trying to get drunk.
If he's half trying, he'll make it too.
Hey, Bobby, trs jolie, huh?
Please, may I call you "Mother"?
I practiced all the way over on the plane. Suzi too.
Mother.
- If you don't want us to...
- Oh, it's fine, Bobby. It's wonderful.
It's just, nobody's ever called me
Mother before.
We never called anybody that before either.
Orphans very seldom have mothers.
Jonesy's in the money
Here, here, shove off!
- You'll wake the neighbors!
- ...with a drunken sailor
What shall we do
With a drunken sailor?
What shall we do
With a drunken sailor?
Jonesy's in the money
Jonesy's in the money
Captain Jones calling.
The father of Cinderella.
- Hey, Pa.
- Begone me man, begone.
Me, the best mackerel man in the Atlantic trying to be a gentleman.
- Hey, Pa!
- Begone, me man.
- Pa!
- Be...
- Pete, boy!
- Jonesy's in the money, huh?
- Good to see you!
- Nice to...
- Look out, there. You all right?
- Petey, Petey! You're back, son.
You'll have to work fast, boy.
They're hauling her in this Saturday.
Yeah, with a $40-million net?
You've got something more than money, you mackerel-head.
You've got a lifetime of her being in love with you. Don't you remember?
You're the one that taught my Em how to wrestle and to box, didn't you?
And to bait a hook! I can see the two of you when you were hardly this high, scampering over the Gloucester rocks.
How did she happen to meet this guy, Stanley?
He's her boss for the past two years.
Nice fellow?
He's not even a man!
He's a tradition!
Out of Lexington by the Minutemen.
He's a mummy, that's what he is.
The Stanleys are one of the finest families in Boston, Pa.
Yeah, fine family of fossils.
I don't know whatever got into my Em.
See, Pete, that's why I went out and I took a couple.
Took several.
It's easy to explain. Every girl wants to be Cinderella. There's her chance.
- That's what I was trying to...
- You all right?
Oh, yes, yes.
That's what I wanted to say.
- Come over here.
- That's what I wanted to tell you.
The newspaper photographers, the reporters, it's the biggest hullabaloo you ever seen!
- That's why we're gonna move.
- Move? Where are you moving?
The Stanleys are kind enough to take us in.
They're giving Ma and me a wing in that Grant's Tomb they call a home.
They have a little gatehouse there, but can we live in it?
Oh, no, no. What would the newspapers say if they ever found out the bride's parents were bunking in the servants' quarters?
You've got to save me, Pete.
Look, son...
...they're going to make me live there.
And I'll die there, Pete!
They're going to bury me!
Can you picture me, can you see me, molding in the ground with a bunch of landlubbers, the likes of them?
Yeah, well, you'll mold and like it.
Pa, come out of there. Look at him.
The best mackerel man!
He ain't seen a mackerel in ten years.
The drunken old faker.
Look at the cut of you.
And us all ready to go to the Stanley home!
Hello, Pete.
We don't want any trouble from you.
No, I know Pa and I know you.
I know he's been blowing off like a spume whale.
Go in there and drink some coffee.
The whole pot of it!
Take a bath and put that suit on
Emmy bought you.
And if you're not sober in a half an hour,
I'll leave you here to rot in your own bilge water!
Ma, don't roust Jonesy.
He's entitled to celebrate. He's rich.
Like I told you,
I don't want any trouble with you.
Emmy's tired of supporting him.
Her mind's made up.
You both know what that means.
And I'm very happy about it, see?
Thank you, Ma Kettle.
I'm gonna fix the children something to eat.
- Children?
- Yeah.
Pete came home with two orphans.
He adopted them. Poor little things.
- You adopted some orphans?
- I sure did, Pa.
- Poor little things!
- There you are, Pete!
There's your bait! Hook her with the kids. Em's a pushover for kids.
You just drink your coffee!
I wouldn't do anything like that, Pa.
I'm not that big a heel.
This is no time for ethics.
You have less than a week.
Less than a week for what?
Why, to get ready for your wedding, of course.
- Say, Em, I was just...
- Ix-nay in front of the ids-Kay.
I just wanted to tell you how happy I am.
- You are?
- Yes.
- So am I.
- You like her?
- I love her.
- Pa, this is Bobby. This is Suzi.
Kids, this is Emmadel's father here.
Congratulations, Grandpa.
You have a very beautiful daughter.
Well, blow me down!
Emmy, he called me "Grandpa".
You know, I think I'm gonna like him, Pete. And you too.
Don't breathe in their faces!
Poor little things.
The movers! We're not even ready!
No. llbur-way sent the car for me.
I have to take care of the move from the other end.
Well, Emmy, thanks a lot for everything.
Don't let her go, Pete.
- I'll see you around sometime.
- Sure, I'll be around somewhere.
- Pete!
- See you later, Bobby.
Say, you don't suppose you could arrange to drop me off somewhere?
- Ilbur-way wouldn't mind, would he?
- Where?
I've gotta find somewhere to bed these kids down.
- They haven't even had dinner!
- I don't mean them.
I don't wanna drag them all over too.
They're tired.
- That old heel!
- Pete just wants to get you alone!
- Don't fall for it!
- Don't be ridiculous.
I'd be very happy to drop you off downtown.
See to it they nap before he gets back.
Yeah. Watch yourself. Rattlesnakes can look pretty harmless sometimes.
You're so sweet, Mother.
Oh, no.
Watch yourself, Emmy!
What is an llbur-way?
An llbur-way is an ain-pay in the...
- Pa!
- I'm drinking my coffee.
This is beautiful. Cinderella.
Imagine you trying to get your foot in a glass slipper.
What a time we used to have just getting plain old shoes on you.
I know this is a lot of junk to you, but I love it.
And the fellow that goes with it.
Get that straight.
- I got it straight. You explained it...
- I haven't said a word to you, you...
Cindy.
I couldn't in front of those poor little kids.
What in heaven's name are you gonna do with them?
- We'll get along, I guess.
- You guess?
- I hate to break a promise to a kid.
- What promise?
Well, about having a home of their own.
Did you see the look on Bobby's face back there?
- Emmy, you haven't any idea...
- Oh, haven't I?
Would you like for me to find a home for you?
The Stanley Investment Company owns over half the houses in Boston.
Don't worry about me, Emmy, I'll...
Oh, I'm not worried about you.
The Stanley Building, please, Morse.
Get her! Wow!
Thanks, Emmy.
Words will do.
Don't make with the hands, or the feet, or the eyes, or the soft soap.
I see.
Thank you, Morse.
Wow.
Just a little place where Wilbur gets his mail.
It's simple, but we like it.
Hello, Mary.
Certainly a vast kingdom.
You've got the keys to it too, I see.
Well, these are just the keys to where we keep the keys.
The guy's not only gonna marry you, he trusts you too?
Do you like the kids, Em?
Yes, they're sweet.
You know something?
I had our honeymoon all planned.
Just you and me and the kids down at that old shack of Pa's at Gloucester.
- Still there, isn't it?
- Yup.
You remember the fun we used to have, Em?
Yup.
Of course, that was BW.
- What's BW?
- Before Wilbur.
WOW!
WOW!
Is this that desk you ran around for two years?
- Yup.
- Quite a course, about 1.8 miles.
- Every day?
- Twice a day.
Did you go counterclockwise or clockwise?
Woman-wise.
The small-house listings are in the file room.
Oh, look at...
What's this, Buckingham Palace?
Oh, that's the townhouse.
- That's right.
- Isn't it cute?
Well, it's got walls, battlements, turrets and everything, but no moat.
You gotta have a moat, Emmy.
This little lean-to, that's the gatehouse, I guess?
- Yup.
- That's very cozy.
If you're through with your sightseeing tour, Mr. Garvey...
Pardon me, Miss Jones.
He's a golfer, I see.
Well, that's a nice old man's game.
Hope old Wilbur isn't too old, Emmy.
- Look who's talking.
- Why, I'm just a little bitty boy.
What kind of a place do you want?
Just a little place, big enough for me and the kids. Unfurnished.
You'll have to put your furniture in storage.
Give it to me, I'll have some memories while you're living with someone else.
- Oh, brother.
- Emmy!
I've changed.
You don't realize it, but I have.
You never saw me with a couple kids before?
No, I never did.
You and Pa weren't fooling me a bit with that "heel" business.
I mean, don't think these kids will make me do a last-minute switch to Garvey.
I'm not. So stop trying!
- You're so bitter.
- There are perfect loves of children all over the world. I want my own. ls there anything wrong with that?
Why, no, it's fine with me. We've got two ready-made babysitters.
We'd be free as the breeze, Em.
You're free as the breeze now, like you always wanted to be.
- Oh, Em.
- Don't give me the wounded doe eyes.
I met five planes, and you weren't on any of them.
- I was on the sixth.
- By that time, my lamp burned out!
- And enter Wilbur, huh?
- And enter Wilbur.
I guess it was my fault, but gee whiz, when you've wandered around homeless for years and you finally come back beaten...
If I knew you was coming,
I would have brought my violin.
You're a hard woman,
Emmadel Jones.
That I am.
A hard, hard woman.
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Tell 'em I'll be there
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Better save a chair
Hey, Em? Come here a minute,
I wanna show you something.
- Look.
- What am I supposed to look at?
Gloucester.
Crazy, you can't see Gloucester from here.
Yes, I can, Em. I can see the rocks lashed by the green-white waves and a boy and a girl.
Dopey sort of a boy, but the girl's all fire and water.
And a lovely, lovely will-o'-the-wisp.
You got the boy right, finally.
Yes, Gloucester, an Indian summer, the raging surf and a challenge.
And into the water she goes, her dark hair flying...
Look, Heathcliff...
...Little Em doing cartwheels on the beach in the moonlight was delightful, I'm sure.
But Big Em, already searching in the mirror for her first wrinkles,
Big Em wants security.
Now, can you still see Gloucester?
Well, it's getting a little foggy.
No, as a matter of fact, I could still see Gloucester and I always will.
That's why I took up with those two kids, Bobby and Suzi.
They were just like little ghosts of you and me, Em.
Over there, you know, for three years, with those kids, living around that constant hunger they have, that idea of home.
And I never felt anything like it before.
It never occurred to me, but I sure feel it now.
I'm just like those kids, Em.
I want a home. I want you.
I need you, Emmy.
More than your boss,
George Degnan, needs you?
Well, I haven't spoken to George yet.
I'm gonna call him the first of the week.
Thanks, Pete. You really had me sailing there for a minute.
But I'm all right now,
I've just dropped me anchor.
It's a boom.
Where you off to next, Pete?
Alaska? Yugoslavia?
No, I'm not gonna live
Ma's life all over again, waiting on shore for a sailor who comes to land every three years.
It's like being married to a salmon.
No, Pete, our boat has sailed.
Here's a place. Oh, no.
And these people don't permit children, the monsters.
Here's a nice little item.
You seen this?
- Where'd you find it?
- I picked it up here somewhere.
Well, that's available.
Would you like to see it?
I don't have to.
I already like it.
The doorknob just seems to reach out and wanna shake hands with you.
Reminds me of the Gloucester place a lot, doesn't it you?
All right. I've got some form leases in my office.
All right, Pa.
Oh, and how are the children?
Pa will load the furniture on his truck for you.
- Thanks, Em.
- Sorry I can't help you.
You got a man of your own to look after now.
Here's your lease and there's the receipt for the first month's rent.
- OK.
- All square and even, Pete.
All square and even.
- It's late.
- Em?
A lot of luck, now.
Thanks, Pete. I'll...
I'll see you sometime.
I believe that when you make a break, make a clean break, no hangovers.
That's right, no hangovers.
Well, you ready?
Say, don't we always leave them singing?
Yeah, we always leave them singing.
Yeah.
- Wanna play?
- Sure.
Can you give me a little pickup there on your typewriter?
Very pretty, but a little high for me.
You know my limited range.
You kill at 50 inches.
Just hang on around the curbs, don't get lost.
I brought my scooter.
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Tell 'em we'll be there
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Better save a chair
When the party's getting a glow on
Singing fills the air
in the shank of the night
When the doin's are right
Well, you can tell 'em we'll be there
Oh, you remembered!
You know any more games?
She still loves me.
Gentlemen, this little meeting will come to order here.
Take a letter, Miss Jones.
Sue wants a barbecue
Sam wants to boil a ham
- Grace wants a bouillabaisse stew
- Clean the kitchen!
Jake wants a weenie bake
Steak or a layer cake
He'll get a tummy ache too
- What's yours?
- Ulcers.
We'll build a tent or a teepee
Let the town crier cry
And if it's RSVP
This will be our reply
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Tell 'em we'll be there
If you want a couple of deadheads
To fracture your affair
I may even sing Pagliacci
Spread out and give him air!
Everyone relax
And we'll have a few yaks
And you can tell 'em we'll be there
Gentlemen, be seated.
"Zee", went the bumblebee
Let's have a jubilee
When? said the prairie hen, Soon?
- "Sure", said the dinosaur
- "Where?" said the grizzly bear
- Under the light of the moon
- Yes
How about you, Brother Jackass?
Everyone gaily cried
Say, are you coming to the fracas?
- And over his specs he sighed
- "Well, carry on!"
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Tell 'em we'll be there
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
- Put slickum on my hair
- Coming up.
Now, perhaps I may seem
Unconscious
But remember, C'est la...
If we're still on our feet
And there's something to eat
Well, you can tell 'em we'll be there
- He'll be there too.
- He better be.
- The natives are restless tonight.
- In Boston?
No, down in the Caribbees
Some Aborigines
Rode out to pay me a ca}!
You likey singo jingo
Me likey too, they cried
I didn't get their lingo
So this is what I replied
In the cool, cool...
Remember when we won the cup at Gloucester?
- And you lost it in a crap game?
- Well, they switched dice on me!
Oogaty-boogaty-boogaty-boogaty
Book-book
Which means we like 'em rare
When the tribe is getting a glow on
And tom-toms fill the air
if the dinner is free
And the dinner ain't me
Well, you can tell 'em we'll be there
Be sure and tell 'em we'll be there
Tell 'em we'll be there
If I can get out of bed
And put a head on my head
Well, you can tell 'em we'll be there
If you need a new face
Or a broken-down bass
Well, you can tell 'em we'll be there
Well, we had such a ball
Thanks for the use of the hall
And you can tell 'em we'll be there
- There.
- There?
There, there, there.
That's the silliest song anybody ever did sing.
But the dance was lovely, wasn't it?
So smooth, elegant, well-contrived.
Well...
Well...
- See you next time we live, Pete.
- That's a date, honey.
Yes. Yes, George.
I'm all right, I'm fine.
Yeah. I'm gonna marry
Emmadel Jones Saturday.
Yeah. I know. I know all about Wilbur
Stanley and that Cinderella stuff.
But let me tell you something, don't believe a thing you read in your paper, unless it's got the old Pete Garvey byline on it, you hear me?
Now, here's what I want you to do.
Come out to 312 Harbor Village Road.
Yeah, 9:00. Got the address? 312.
And bring some photographers with you.
- Look for 312, you guys.
- There's 302.
- There's 303.
- 12 is an even number.
- No!
There's Pete!
With that mob on the lawn.
- Arrest him. He's an imposter!
- How can I? He has a lease too.
Excellent! Spoken like a true guardian of the public security.
With such servants as you, our nation is in no peril.
Let me straighten you on something,
Mr. McGonigle. We are victims.
Innocent victims of a gigantic hoax to defraud and deceive.
I'm the victim.
You know what you are? I'll tell you!
- What?
- You're a scoundrel! You are, sir.
You come here without a by-your-leave or a word of warning and start littering up my beautiful lawn with all that junk of yours.
- Officer, kindly turn your back...
- Take it easy!
- Just a minute! What's going on here?
- None of your business!
Right. I'm having a private discussion with Mr. McGonigle. Who are you?
Why, I'm George Degnan of the Morning Express.
- A newspaper man!
- My name is O'Neil.
You've arrived in the nick of time.
I have a lease here.
A lease entitling me to occupy this bungalow, me and my two orphans arrived from Europe.
But can I occupy it? No! Why?
Because of an octopus!
What? Who's an octopus?
No, you're a father and a fine gentleman.
- That's a different tune.
- We were issued duplicate leases.
Issued with intent of avarice and deceit by a real-estate octopus,
- whose tentacles are strangling...
- Oh, a real-estate octopus.
Yes, and there should be an expose.
If I were a newspaperman,
I would spread this across the nation in letters of fire!
I would spread this across the nation in letters of fire!
I'd put him in prison for life!
That's what I'd do!
I'll do the arresting around here!
Can I see your lease, Mister...
What was your name?
Garvey, just a plain, simple name like Garvey.
Garvey, and a fine name it is too.
From the County Cork, I take it?
- No, County Kerry, I think.
- Then stop thinking.
If you're not from County Cork, it doesn't matter where you're from.
The Stanley Real Estate Company.
Wilbur Stanley.
You're right, Mr...?
What was your name?
- Garvey.
- You're absolutely right, Garvey.
This calls for an expos! And never let it be said that the Morning Express failed the downtrodden!
Where's your phone?
- It's inside the door, on the left.
- OK, boys, shoot everything.
We'll have justice here soon.
The bridegroom cometh, Pete.
And to think that this could happen in the glorious city of Boston, practically the citadel of human liberty, home of the Boston Tea Party.
Why, they're not asking much, these little orphans from a devastated world, just a roof over their heads, a little kindness, a little affection.
Gentlemen, Mr. Stanley is here.
Boo!
So that's the fellow, is it?
I'll arrest him for disturbing the peace.
No, officer.
This is still a democratic country.
He's entitled to have his say.
Mr. Stanley? George Degnan of the
Morning Express. I telephoned you.
- Oh, yes.
- Come on, boys. Get busy.
Isn't this quite a fuss to make about a simple matter?
It's not simple to me or to these little waifs. Why, it's an outrage. It's pract...
You're...
- You're Mr. Stanley?
- That's right.
- Not Wilbur Stanley?
- Wilbur.
It's hardly a name I'd have chosen for myself.
Gentlemen, do you have your leases?
I have mine, sir. Here it is.
McGonigle is the name.
And yours?
Oh, I'm Garvey.
That was quite a stirring speech you greeted me with. What's the gimmick?
- Gimmick, Mr. Stanley?
- Gimmick, Mr. Garvey.
Because this is obviously a simple clerical error.
A simple clerical error? With these two poor little children out in the night air in this South Boston monsoon?
I don't think the courts will take that view of it, sir.
- Now we're coming to it.
- Right!
I don't think Boston will be very proud when it reads the Morning Express.
Boston is never proud of itself when it reads the Express, Mr. Degnan.
- Pictures and everything, right?
- Yeah, sure.
- Newsworthy pictures too.
- I see.
Well, what is it you want, Mr. Garvey?
A bigger house?
No, no. My fiancee picked out this house. She loves it here.
- Your fiance?
- Yes.
- Getting married, Mr. Garvey?
- Saturday, Mr. Stanley.
Well, what do you know.
Why, Mr. Stanley's getting married on Saturday too, Mr. Garvey.
Well, how about that?
I thought everybody knew I was getting married on Saturday.
You and the Express and your Cinderella story.
Hey, that's the prince. He's the one that's gonna marry the Cinderella.
He's younger than you thought he was, isn't he, Peter?
And he's better-looking than you thought he was. Isn't he, Peter?
All that and 40 million dollars besides.
I'd love to stay with you, but we ought to get
- these little children in out of the rain.
- Oh, yes.
- Where's Mr. Garvey?
- I'm over here in the balcony.
Well, if you will come down to the office with me,
Mr. Garvey,
I'll try to find something for you.
I'd like to find something really nice.
- Goodbye, everybody.
- Goodbye!
See you at the wedding!
The office, Dino.
May I congratulate you on the vigor and enterprise with which you get things done,
Mr. Garvey?
Hey, you're no easy man to shave yourself, Mr. Stanley.
Well, now that we're alone,
Mr. Garvey, give.
What was that big mishmash all about?
That was a light case of blackmail.
Well, that's plain enough.
What is it you want, Mr. Garvey?
I'd like to spend the next few days in your gatehouse, Mr. Stanley.
Why?
Seems you and I have duplicate leases too.
I don't understand.
- Know that girl you'll marry Saturday?
- Yes.
That's the girl
I'm gonna marry Saturday.
You're the newspaperman, the one that was in Paris.
- Right. She told you about me, huh?
- You have no idea what she told me.
I can imagine.
Well, I guess you know by now that she loves me, Mr. Stanley.
- She's in love with me, Mr. Garvey.
- Oh, no, that's a rebound job.
- I was away three years.
- Two of those she worked for me.
No, it wasn't rebound.
I'm sorry.
It was a gradual, careful, wonderful falling-in-love-with-each-other.
Then you're not afraid to have me try to win her back?
Afraid? No, Mr. Garvey.
But I'm not interested in taking the long end of a thousand-to-one shot.
If I thought you were any competition...
Even money in my book, Mr. Stanley.
- Really?
- Sure.
How does my gatehouse figure in your plans?
Well, I pictured you as a doddering old fossil, stumbling about your vast estate with a shawl over your shoulders, and warming your cold, old hands over a bonfire of dollar bills.
Then I pictured me stalking about in my manly vigor, and I figured Emmy can't resist, that's all.
And now?
I'm revising my plans.
You're perfectly welcome to move into the gatehouse.
You're welcome to try to beat my time with Emmadel, because I'm perfectly sure of myself and of her, Mr. Garvey.
Me too. I'm sure of myself,
I'm sure of Emmy.
- I just have to remind her of things.
- What things?
Well, I'd like to know what ammunition you have, I might want to shoot back.
Emmy likes sailing. I'm a good sailor.
We get her on a sailboat, you know...
Well, I won the Bar Harbor Regatta two years in a row.
Well, I can handle myself around professional wrestlers. There's...
I taught judo during the war.
- I'm a low-handicap golfer.
- I'm the state amateur champion.
- Cigarette?
- Thanks.
How's your canasta?
Pretty good.
I'm secretary of the whist club.
Like Irving Berlin says, "Anything you can do, I can do better", huh?
Well, I'm taller than you and probably a little younger and possibly a little richer.
Trifles. Nothing.
What have you got that'll offset
40 million dollars, Mr. Garvey?
Forty million dollars.
You know, I can't quite handle it?
I got a couple of kids though, and Emmy loves kids.
I know.
And we hope to have triplets before the year's out.
Now, you still want to live in the gatehouse, Mr. Garvey?
I guess I am giving away a lot of weight, but I'll chance it.
You may slip on a banana peel.
I won't allow a banana around the place.
- Any particular rules?
- No rules. No holds barred.
No hollering "foul" or anything like that.
Best man wins. Deal?
- A deal.
- Emmadel will be the referee.
The referee and the purse.
Done.
I'm certainly glad you showed up.
I probably always would've wondered about that newspaperman in Paris.
Emmadel hates you so much,
I was beginning to be uneasy.
Now, I can see I had nothing to worry about.
Home, Dino.
I've just invited Mr. Garvey to my wedding.
- One thing.
- What?
Don't tell Emmadel about this contest.
If she knew, she'd probably marry me out of sheer stubbornness.
I'd never know which one of us she really wanted.
You know Emmadel.
I know her better than you do,
Mr. Stanley.
That's my little secret weapon.
- On your marks?
- Get set.
- Ready.
- Go.
Lydia, I want you to stop every darn clock in the house.
Well, when the clock struck 12,
Cinderella turned back into a pumpkin.
Of course.
Now, look at yourself.
- Can that be Emmadel Jones?
- Only for four more days, darling.
- Wilbur!
- Hold it! Hold it.
- Here, take this. Don't drink it.
- Do you like it?
- Perfect. Perfect just the way you are.
- For breakfast?
No, for presentation to the court,
Cinderella.
If we're to live a fairy tale, let's live it.
- This is my best party dress.
- There's more where that came from.
Oh, Wilbur. If somebody pinches me and wakes me up,
I'll kill them, so help me.
When I think of my skirts and sweaters and my one good black dress,
I'm gonna have to be such a good wife to deserve all of this.
Oh! And I've been sampling all the perfume. Do I smell awful?
You smell like a flower garden in a spring rain.
Oh, you mustn't be nice to me, I bawl.
I always bawl.
- Will the whole family be there?
- Whole family.
- Will my family be there?
- They're having breakfast in bed.
Breakfast in bed? Pa too?
I suggested it. I thought I'd spare our respective families from running head-on into each other the very first morning.
It could be quite a shock for both of them.
I hope your family's well insulated.
Your knees, sir.
- Shall I break your egg, sir?
- No, thank you.
- I have me own teeth.
- Yes, sir.
This is the life, huh?
Only birds eat in the same nest they sleep in.
Or pigs.
What does that son of a Revolution think we are?
- Pigs?
- William, please.
Oh, I'm William now, am I?
I suppose if we stay in these twin beds much longer, I'll be Mr. Jones.
Then we'll be communicating by wigwag and semaphore.
A man and wife should never sail separate courses.
No wonder they haven't produced anything around here in 30 years.
What about breakfast? I'm starved.
Yes, Abby.
Well! Bless my cinches! Look!
- Well, really.
- Family, meet Emmadel Jones.
- Hello, family.
- Oh, she's lovely.
This is Aunt Amy.
She's the oldest.
Welcome to our bed and board.
And you will be, plenty.
It's only the men who count here, my dear.
- Emmadel's going to change all that.
- I hope so.
And this is Aunt Abby. She can't hear very well, but she's a real good egg.
- This is Uncle Adam. He builds ships.
- How do you do?
- And Uncle Elihu. He breeds horses.
- How do you do?
Bless my cinches, what a sharp little filly.
- Thank you.
- And here's Uncle Prentiss.
- Once upon a time he had a past.
- How do you do?
One thing you can say about the Stanleys, Miss Jones, they have no family skeletons in the closet.
We all come down to breakfast.
Oh, I almost forgot.
This is Cousin Winifred.
My maid of honor. I'm very happy to meet you, Winifred.
- Thank you.
- Lights up the old place like a lamp.
Well, that's because I'm burning a special kind of oil in my...
- I beg your pardon.
- What's wrong with that?
Well, nothing. Nothing.
You got the family wedding gift ready,
Uncle Elihu?
- To Emmadel with love.
- Thank you so much.
Five thousand dollars!
Oh, fif...
- Five hundred thousand, for what?
- It's an old Stanley custom, darling,
- since you'll be an old Stanley.
- But that's half a million.
- You'll earn it.
- And a bonus beside for every colt.
You're the great white hope,
Miss Jones.
Well, darling. You're not too disappointed, I hope.
Oh. Wilbur, I love you all so much
I could cry.
The fairy tale goes that Cinderella and the prince lived happily ever after.
And I hereby swear that I'm not a girl to let an old fairy tale down.
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
- What's that?
- What's happened, Adam?
Someone's singing over the loudspeaker out on the lawn.
I guess that's the character that moved into the gatehouse last night.
You've still got your hand up, darling.
Excuse me, everybody.
Tell 'em I'll be here
That's Petey-boy singing.
Coming, Pete.
What's the matter with you?
Where you going?
What are you doing, going out that window? You crazy?
Pa, come back here!
That vine won't hold you!
Scum-washed old barnacle, come back here! Hey, Pa! Pa!
I haven't heard that kind of noise since my first wife died.
You hear me? You're like an old mackerel out there!
Pa, come back here!
I'm gonna kill you!
Come back here. You'll catch your death of cold out there!
Pete, why don't you stop kidding yourself?
How do you expect to stop a wedding the whole country's waiting for?
You're fiddling, Pete, while the
Far East burns, and while I burn.
- When are you going back to work?
- Pete, boy. Petey.
Hello, Pa! Come in. How are you?
How are you? Look at them.
- Look at my little barnacles.
- Aren't they great?
- Look, Pa. Your old ship. The Whale.
- Oh, Peter, you brought it.
- I love it. You know that's...
- Hey. The bell.
- You're about to have company.
- Company? Who?
- Emmy!
- Emmy!
What's the matter, your tooth?
Take her outside and pull her tooth.
Use that string.
You better duck.
Get in here, fellas. Inside.
Everything's square and even, no hangovers, leave them singing, check when you ought to check.
You no-good... What are you doing?
- If you wear that thing for breakfast...
- You didn't answer my question.
- What are you doing here?
- Well, I can tell you it's...
- Suzi, Bobby! Well, what on earth?
- Mother!
She got a loose tooth. I didn't have the nerve, so Bobby said he'd hack it out.
Poor little thing. And with strings yet, you monster.
Why, I used to tie a string to your tooth, remember?
- No.
- I tied the string to a door, remember?
- No!
- She don't remember.
Now, Suzi, you close your eyes and make a wish.
Tell her, Bobby.
There. Now, let me have it.
Good. You see, children need a mother's attention.
Now, Suzi, open your eyes.
Tell her, Bobby.
There, you see?
You didn't feel a thing. Look.
Oh, well, you mustn't cry now.
There's nothing left to cry about.
She's just hysterical because she's hungry.
Hungry? Why?
Bobby and I ran into a bit of a problem.
You see, Suzi can't cook.
- They haven't had breakfast?
- They had a wonderful one.
I took them to the drugstore, got them coffee, doughnuts.
- No, sinkers!
- Sinkers.
- Pete Garvey.
- Children need a mother's care.
- Look, I told you once before, don't...
- Don't argue here, in front of the kids.
Look, Suzi. Take this to the garden, bury it and your wish will come true.
Go tell her about it, will you, Bobby?
- Of all the low sneaks.
- I'm not a sneak.
- Mr. Stanley asked me to come here.
- Wilbur?
Yes. I don't see why you resent the fact we finally found a little shelter.
Out of the city of Boston, did it have to be this shelter? How did you get here?
- It's your fault, Em.
- My fault?
The place you sent us to was rented.
Stanley, being a fine gentleman, he said, "By all means, come and occupy my gatehouse."
- You blackmailed your way in.
- No blackmail.
If you plan to squat and hatch out schemes to ruin my wedding, you better get off the nest.
It won't work.
I'm in. And I have something else
I'd like for you to see.
Don't touch it, just count the zeros.
- A wedding present from the family.
- Let me see that. Holy tam...
Well, thanks for the tip, Em.
Now I know how much to ask for.
- How much to ask for what?
- I didn't know how to break this to you, but I've been preparing to be featured in my own little Cinderella story.
I've been trying on glass slippers.
Very attractive on my 8 1/2 C's.
- What are you talking about?
- Winifred Stanley.
Winifred Stanley?
Well, what about her?
I met her last night. She likes me.
Oh, you idiot! Winifred Stanley... ls OK. She's $20 million worth of OK.
And she's beautiful too, baby.
I might wind up with a million. When a woman starts out to find a husband...
Winifred Stanley wouldn't even look at a tramp like you.
No? You used to love me, honey.
Is she any better than you are?
- I never loved you! I hate you!
- You see, you're getting jealous.
Jealous? Of you? That's wonderful.
That's really wonderful.
Good. You won't mind putting in a pitch for me.
- Don't step on my dress!
- I can't stay off. I'd have to leave town.
Will you put in a little pitch for me?
Tell her some of my lovable features.
Don't hang around too close, don't cramp my style.
I don't believe a word you're saying, and when you get that milk-lapping expression on your face, you just scare me to death.
Now, there you go.
You see, Emmy? You barge.
- Help me up!
- You mustn't barge.
If you're gonna be a Stanley, learn to walk like one.
You ever seen Winifred Stanley?
She just floats along.
- Help me up!
- And do something about that temper.
You must curb it. You and I got a pretty good thing here.
If you explode, you'll kick it in the chops.
- Help me up!
- If we play our cards right, we could wind up being sister-in-laws.
It's a little too much to expect from the daughter of a mackerel man.
UP We go.
My pipe from Paris.
- You're out.
- What's the matter? I was safe.
- What're you trying? I was safe.
- You're out.
Now, get up to the house before Ma catches you!
- And as for you, you collaborator.
- Now, Emmy, I'm on your side.
I've got a million reasons to marry Wilbur Stanley.
- Half a million that I know of.
- Well, the biggest reason is you!
Would you like to cover the Stanley wedding, or should I give the assignment to somebody else?
There's not gonna be any
Stanley wedding. I know my Em.
Right now, she's like a little bucking bronco, fixing to rear, tear, kick and plunge all over the place.
If I can just find the right burr, slip it under her saddle, oh, man, she'd kick down every fence in this $40 million corral.
Well, I'm watching this blond,
Winifred, last night, casing her real close, her and her cousin, Wilbur.
And all of a sudden, I get that "poing".
The "poing" I get when I sense a story.
- You haven't had a "poing" for years.
- Never you mind, it's infallible.
Anyhow, I see there's something between her and Wilbur, or there has been, or there could be.
Now, if I could just make her acquaintance.
I beg your pardon.
Why, Miss Stanley!
Well, "Walk into my parlor", said the spider.
- What happened to you?
- No idea, I think it was a tidal wave.
Well, here. Come over by the fire.
Let me get the gas turned up a little.
George, this is Cousin Wilbur's cousin, Winifred.
- With your luck, it would have to be.
- Get out of that wet coat.
We'll get you into some dry clothes, get this stuff wrung out.
There you are. Wait till I get some towels. Get over by the fire there.
- Wilbur, you do love me, don't you?
- Oh, darling.
Then let's get married tonight, right away.
But it's four days until Saturday. I don't wanna wait, anything can happen.
I don't want to wait either. But after all, a Stanley just can't get married,
- like other people, at the drop of a hat.
- Why not? ls there a law against it?
Certainly, for people like us.
Laws of tradition.
Laws of what's expected of you.
The wedding invitations have gone out to 500 people.
There's more relatives on the way, newsreels, television.
- I know. I just...
- Just what, Emmadel?
Wilbur. Remember my telling you about an idiot I grew up with?
- I was ten and thought I was in love?
- The newspaperman.
He's here. But you don't know he's the thing you dragged out of the rain.
Sure, I know.
- You do?
- I do.
Why did you bring him if you knew?
I had to be absolutely sure you wanted me.
- But you don't think I want him?
- Well, I hope not.
I should say not.
He makes me absolutely ill.
And I want you to go down there and throw him out on his ear.
Oh, darling. Thanks.
- But I can't.
- Why not?
A little thing called a gentleman's agreement.
Wilbur, you don't understand.
Pete Garvey is no gentleman, and I don't want him around here.
Why not, darling? You scared?
Scared? Of him?
Well, I say!
He thinks if he hangs around he can bust up our wedding. Can he?
- Did he say that?
- He said that.
Don't you dare throw him out of here.
Don't you dare throw him out of here!
Wilbur, do me a favor. Ask him to sing at our wedding. He thinks he can sing.
Nothing would give greater pleasure than to marry you if he has to sing to it.
Ooh, am I gonna make it!
I'll quit barging. I won't lose my temper no matter what.
And I'm going to learn how to be a lady, come...
...well, come high water.
And I'm gonna marry you.
I beg your pardon, Mr. Stanley, but did you ask to see a Mr. Cusick...
Oh, yes, Baines. Thank you.
Mr. Cusick. Ask him...
- Ask him to wait outside.
- Yes, sir.
I'm gonna marry you if it's the last thing I do on this earth.
And I'm gonna get out of this because I look like Halloween.
- Please, Mr. Garvey.
- Pete.
Pete, they called me, when I was towel boy at the Turkish bath.
- This is embarrassing.
- Embarrassing?
You mean with George?
We've shared everything since we were this high, haven't we?
That we have. We never shared anything like this, however.
- Well, I can imagine how I look...
- You look beautiful.
You look better wet than you do the other way. It brings out your...
Your personality. Cousin Wilbur ever see you soaking wet?
- Cousin Wilbur? No, why?
- Yeah.
You see, that's too bad.
Little things might change the course of history.
And you shouldn't call him Cousin
Wilbur. It reminds him of things.
- Reminds him of what things?
- That you're both Stanleys.
I'll bet that's been a problem through your entire life. Being a Stanley?
- How did you know that?
- George.
"Poing!" Are you listening?
Cousin Wilbur ever tell you how beautiful you are?
- Me?
- Yeah.
I see he hasn't.
It's all your own fault too, because you are beautiful, a perfect knockout.
It would take the eye of an artiste to detect it through that camouflage you're wrapped in.
And Wilbur's no artiste,
I'll tell you that.
Definitely not a... He's...
He's...
- Say, let me see you up on your toes.
- My toes?
Up, up. Come on.
Up, up, up-
Wow.
- George.
- Hold the phone, Esther.
- What's the matter?
- Doesn't it make a difference?
- That changes legs into gams.
- There you are, you see?
- Gams?
- Why do you wear track shoes?
- Running the anchor lap in the relay?
- I'm too tall, if you must know.
- Too tall? Did you hear that, George?
- Too tall for what?
Too tall. How ridiculous can you be?
You ever hear of a squatty goddess?
Was Cleopatra a shorty?
Was Mata Hari a shrimp?
Was Venus de Milo a midget?
No, of course not.
Why, they were all first basemen like you.
Tell McCarthy I want a feature story on tall women.
Low heels indeed.
And Helen of Troy. Was it her face that launched those thousand ships?
No, of course not.
High heels. Gams.
Slip out of those things, we'll launch
Cousin Wilbur in the morning.
You know, Miss Stanley, men seldom make passes at flat-heeled lasses.
- George, that's beautifully put.
- What?
Yes, I thought so. Did you get that,
Esther? Put that down.
What he means is, dear, that you're just not whistle-bait.
- Whistle-bait?
- Yeah. Don't you know from whistles?
Well, I...
- Nobody ever do that to you?
- Why, of course not. How common!
George.
This is a complete overhaul job.
I can see that right now.
Look, there's a pair of pajamas in the bedroom there. Will you put them on?
- Mr. Garvey!
- Go, hurry up. I've only got four days.
- Four days to do what?
- To make you into a Jones.
I'm Pygmalion Pete, they call me.
But I can't Pygmalion if you stand around in those soaking clothes.
I'm gonna sculpt you into a little production, a little one that's gonna knock Cousin Wilbur right on his ear.
- Why?
- Why what?
Why do you want me to knock
Cousin Wilbur...?
I mean, why are you so anxious for me to be attractive to Cousin Wilbur?
Can I level with you?
I wish you would.
I've never been so confused in my life.
I want to marry
Emmadel Jones myself.
Will you help me?
Can I level with you?
You've been in love with Cousin Wilbur all your life.
Yes, and I'll do anything short of murder.
Winnie, I love you.
I love you, love you!
That's the first time a man ever said that to me.
- You're kidding.
- I like it.
It's nice.
- I should've taken this up long ago.
- Sure.
- Pajamas, you say? In there?
- Pajamas. Go ahead.
Oh, that walk.
The walk's a brute, you walk like you're taking a sobriety test, like a Stanley.
Walk like a Jones, barge around, like a live bait boat, like Emmy does, like this.
Makes you a colorful tomato. Now, go get the pajamas. Come on, hurry up.
You'll still be here too, won't you?
Sure, sure. Running a newspaper is just a hobby with me.
- I'll be right down, Esther.
- Where you going?
- Going to work. I eat, remember?
- Are you kidding?
- This is great. I just found my burr.
- Her?
Yes, a great big blond beautiful burr.
I'll slip her right under Emmy's saddle.
I won't be down today, Esther.
I'm going to a rodeo.
Now you're thinking, George.
- Mr. Cusick?
- Yes.
- How do you spell that name?
- C-U...
Pardon, stand over here.
You're right in the sun.
- Oh, that's quite all right.
- We spell it C-U-S-I-C-K.
You're one of the few people who say it correctly.
- Polish?
- Pol...?
Oh, no, no, sir.
American for generations.
- How long in the Immigration Service?
- Twenty-five years next January.
- It's a long and honorable career.
- Yes, sir.
Now about Mr. Garvey.
If he isn't married by Saturday,
- he loses the children, right?
- Yes, they go back to France.
Cusick, I know the children, and I like them very much.
My bride-to-be is sort of hipped on the subject of children. Any children.
And I am getting married Saturday.
How about a bid for the little Frenchies if he should miss connections?
To adopt them yourselves,
Mr. Stanley?
To adopt them ourselves.
First, the basic fundamental principle in Pygmalion Pete's School of Charm is that you gotta laugh, be happy, be gay, be insouciant.
Bubble, live, enjoy life.
- With Uncle Elihu?
- Uncle Whola-who?
- Uncle Elihu.
- Who's he?
Oh, he considers himself head of the family and he breeds horses and mentally breeds Stanleys and thinks my blood's too blue.
- Too blue for what?
- There aren't any Stanleys under 30.
He thinks there should be more red blood.
- Ah, like the Jones blood.
- Yes. Yeah.
He thinks I'm as barren as a weed patch. How does he know?
Yes, how does he know? It's just that he's afraid, like all the Stanley clan.
Afraid of themselves, of you.
You're afraid of you.
- I'm not afraid!
- Of course not.
Barren, indeed. A great big beautiful girl like you might have 20 children.
You'll have a football team, platoon system, offense and defense.
It's because he's afraid. He's never relaxed, never learned to enjoy life.
No fun, no bubble, no laughs, no chuckles.
Have you ever had a real big laugh in your life?
Well, yes. I guess so.
Well, let me hear you laugh once. Let's hear a right nice, big, raucous laugh.
- That's a raucous laugh, huh?
- Pretty sick.
That's nothing, nothing at all.
Can't you laugh?
How do you expect me to laugh when there's nothing to laugh at?
You don't need anything. You laugh at life because it's fun, good, enjoyable.
- Well, all right. Go ahead, you laugh.
- Why, sure.
Remember we were coming home from Wellesley on the old bus, and the tailgate fell off, and you fell out in the snow?
Do you remember that...?
You remember when we were in Worcester?
- The time when the...
- Cop came up and fell off his cycle...
And we got off at the...
- What's so funny?
- Oh, I don't know.
But it's the best laugh
I've had in years.
I'm afraid we're rushing her too fast.
We're bringing her along too rapidly.
She's not ready to laugh yet.
We'll get back to something else.
Now, the walking, the promenade, the way you walk. It's very important.
We gotta work. It's like you're stepping over a bonfire.
Now, go up and down here a couple of times.
Now, watch this, George.
This is very important. This is basic.
Men notice how girls walk.
It's the first thing they...
That's nothing. That's too prissy.
Just like a Stanley, too much Stanley.
You gotta get a little Jones in it.
- You're afraid.
- I'm not afraid.
You're scared to death.
Now, let's see you go again.
Oh, no. No, no, no.
- That's Ma Jones!
- That's pretty good.
That's too much.
We gotta cut that in half.
Dilute that, cut it down 50 percent and we might be getting somewhere.
Now, let's see about
50 percent of that.
Pete! He whistled! At me!
Thank you!
- Of course he did. Why wouldn't he?
- You see?
Another thing, don't look down at men.
It gives them an inferiority complex, makes them feel like they're in the morning lineup. Here, sit down.
Look up at men like Emmy does.
Tilt your head a little.
- Like this?
- Give it a little like that.
Now, give them those limpid blues.
Bat those lashes. Fan and flip them.
- Oh, now we're moving!
- I think you're getting to me.
- I feel so silly.
- What's wrong with feeling silly?
Men love silly girls. Emmadel Jones is the silliest girl you've ever seen.
Why, Emmadel breaks up at funerals, she's so silly.
There's nothing wrong, men love it.
They adore a silly girl, makes them feel protective.
Isn't she silly? She's cute, but she's silly. They like them.
- Right, George?
- Yeah.
And another thing, you must learn to wrestle.
- Wrestle?
- Wrestle.
- Here's where I came in.
- Wait a minute, George!
Wrestling's important. It breaks them down, loosens up their joints.
Makes you supple. Besides, you may have to fight Emmy for Wilbur.
- Fight her for him.
- I'll fight anything.
What do you weigh and who's your manager? We'll book you Friday.
- Ever seen a headlock?
- No.
How do you think Emmy got Wilbur to propose?
She hit him with a walkover headlock just like this. There we go.
Get the headlock on him, and you put on the pressure and you pull.
Thattagirl! Give it to him.
Give it to him! Twist it. Twist it!
- Uncle!
- Twist it off and beat his head with it!
- Where's the ref? Where's the ref?
- Twist it. Ah, there's no referee.
- This is for keeps. Twist it! Twist it!
- Hey, now. No!
Give it to him!
I beg your pardon.
- Cousin Winifred.
- Cousin Wilbur.
We were working out a few holds.
We open Friday.
Winnie, wait a minute.
Where you going?
She's a potential killer.
She could wrestle in the big time.
- Killer?
- Sure. Show him.
Now, you're not afraid of anything anymore, nothing in the whole world.
Show how relaxed and loose and you are.
- Shake him up a little.
- Well, first,
- you shake him up a little, loosen him.
- Make the joints...
Because, you see, all us Stanleys are afraid.
Loosen up, relax and have laughs, don't you understand?
- Cousin Winifred, what...?
- Don't call me Cousin Winifred!
I'm only your fourth cousin, twice removed.
Why, we're hardly even related.
In the deep South, you'd be kissing cousins.
Yeah, kissing cousins.
- Go ahead, put the headlock on.
- All right.
- Look at that. That's wonderful.
- That's beautiful.
George. "Poing"!
Wilbur.
Oh, Mr. Cusick!
Are you hurt any?
I'm not hurt, but I could've broken my glasses!
- I'm glad you didn't.
- Who is she?
Oh, that's a sleepwalker.
She just woke up.
Say, Mr. Stanley is here. Ix-nay in front of Anley-stay, you know?
What? Oh, hello,
Mr. Stan...
Ix-nay in front of Arvey-gay.
- What'd he mean by that?
- I don't know.
- I just dropped in...
- Wanna come in and rest?
No, I don't! I just dropped by to check the address and remind you Saturday is the deadline.
- I know, we're fine.
- Yeah, I'm glad to hear that it is.
- We'll be by here Saturday morning,
- Yes.
With a matron, to leave the children if you're married, or pick them up.
- Understood.
- I don't have to warn you not to remove the children from the premises.
You do, it's a federal offense.
The FBI takes over.
- I understand.
- I could have broken...
- Let me see.
- I think I did, I broke my upper plate!
- I broke the upper plate!
- Let me see.
- No, I don't want...
- That old snag.
That old snag wasn't doing you any good. Have it pulled today.
Novocaine's on me. OK.
- So you lose the kids unless...
- Stick them up!
Quiet. Here they come.
Here they are. Hi, Bobby.
- When do we eat?
- When do we eat?
That's all I hear.
What do you want to eat?
- What? Quel manger?
- Em and heggs.
- What?
- Em and heggs.
Em and heggs?
Oh, it's a good thing you said that.
Go on out and get it ready.
I'll be right out, huh? Go ahead.
Hey, come back.
Merci beaucoup.
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Nobody's gonna take those kids from me, George. Nobody.
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Tell 'em I'll be there
When the party's getting a glow on
And singing fills the air
- What're you doing?
- Three orphans in search of a mother.
I gotta get back to the office, Pete.
Those wisenheimers will wonder what I've been doing all day.
In the shank of the night
When the doings are right
Well, you can tell 'em I'll be there
Well, you can tell 'em we'll be there
- Good afternoon, Cousin Winifred.
- Hi, Em.
- What do you hear from the mob?
- Well, really, Winifred, your language.
Well, Lady La-di-da.
Your language, not my language.
I think we'd better go down for rehearsal.
What'd you do?
Shed your skin or something?
Yeah. I'm growing a new one.
Jones skin.
You'll make it.
You've got a snake teaching you.
A very nice snake too.
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Tell him I'll be there
In the cool, cool, cool of the evening
Be a Jones and you'll get somewhere
When the party's getting a glow on
And whistles fill the air
If there are plenty of men
And they need a new yen
You can tell 'em I'll be there
Cousin Emmy.
Cousin Winnie.
Oh, promise me that someday
You and I
Pardon me, but your promise is a little flat.
To think of it, your promises were always flat.
I don't care if they're flat or sharp, as long as you sing at my wedding.
- It was my idea, you know.
- What's this guy got, anyway?
- What guy?
- It's not money,
Winifred's got as much money as he has.
Pretty rough jolt, the only girls in the world I wanted to marry and they're both, both of them, in love with Wilbur Stanley.
Oh, and you used to be such a good reporter.
- Now you sound like a journalist.
- You know?
- You won't cloud my sky.
- You should see the way he looks at her when you're not watching.
- Everyone's talking.
- Really? Oh, really.
- Everyone's talking.
- Really? Oh, really.
I understand that she'll live with you after the wedding.
- Yes, she is. What about it?
- Oh, that should be real, real jolly.
I just can't picture my Emmy the member of a harem, that's all.
It's not my business.
You're leaving my life.
- I certainly am!
- I feel obligated to tell you you're being made a chump of.
- Well, that's decent of you.
- You know something else?
- They are kissing cousins.
- Bride!
- Who?
- Four times removed.
Very delicate situation, huh?
- Bride, please!
- Watch it. Keep a sharp eye.
All right, friends.
The rehearsal is about to begin.
Let us organize ourselves.
This is it.
All right, Stanleys, if you'll take your places down front, on the right, please.
Thank you.
Now the bride's father, please.
- Friends, where is the bride's father?
- Here, here.
- This is your father?
- Yes, any objections?
Let's get on with this, Mr. Lilley.
- Now, you come down the aisle left.
- Now?
- Now. How do you feel?
- I'm fine, but...
- Suppose I can't make her wrestle?
- She'll wrestle. Do what I told you.
- To us.
- Don't forget the headlock, the hammerlock and then the crusher with the toehold.
- Good luck to you, kid.
- OK.
No tears at rehearsal.
If you will stand right on the left.
- Don't shove!
- Oh, this is bad luck.
- Didn't you know that?
- What's bad luck?
For the bride to take part in a rehearsal.
That's just an old wives' tale, a superstition.
- Come on, Pa.
- But if that's the way you want it.
Now, that doesn't mean you can relax.
I want you to observe everything we do and do it exactly as she does it.
I'll take you to your place. Down here with your mother, please. On the left.
I'm about to show Wilbur the other half of Emmy.
- If it works, I'm a duck-billed platypus.
- You'll be at the zoo.
And I'll be here to catch her when he throws her out.
You won't be needing this thing.
This is a wedding, not a grunion run.
And bride, modest, please!
All right,
"The Wedding March", please.
- Watch this, George.
- Now.
One and two and...
Bride! Bride!
You're doing it...
Stop it! Stop that music!
Walk it, Winnie! Yeah!
Please, don't whistle! Don't whistle!
I can't do another thing if you whistle!
For goodness' sake, stop!
We have to do it over!
Why is Winifred shaking, Adam?
- Adam has forgotten.
- Adam never knew.
- Rock it, baby!
- Stop it! Stop it!
We have to do it over again.
Please! You're carrying the bride, not a football!
For goodness' sakes, stop that!
Now! Now!
Why couldn't you have done that before? For goodness' sakes.
One and two and...
That's it. Now you look wonderful.
Stop!
What's happened to Winifred?
She's completely lost her dignity.
She's completely lost her girdle.
Minister, please.
After the address, I ask you,
"Wilbur, wilt thou have this...?"
- I will.
- Not so fast, please.
A wedding should never be eager.
- Please.
- I'm sorry.
- And then I ask you...
- I certainly will.
Wilbur, I love you.
I've always loved you.
Bride, please!
Oh, I'm sorry. For a moment it seemed so real, I... I thought I was Cinderella.
This is just the rehearsal. Brother...
And then I say, "Who giveth this woman to be married to this man?"
- I do.
- That's all we need from you, thank goodness.
- And then I ask for the ring.
- What's going on up there?
Most obvious thing I've ever seen.
Place the ring on the bride's finger and say,
"With this ring, I thee wed."
With this ring, I thee wed.
- With this ring, I thee wed.
- Say it again, darling.
- With this ring...
- Mr. Stanley, it sounds like you're marrying triplets!
They're kissing cousins, you know, Pop.
Then I pronounce you man and wife, and you kiss the bride.
All right.
All right!
All right! For goodness' sakes.
And now you take your new husband's hand, but don't run.
Float joyfully.
- I hope I'm not interrupting...
- Shoo! Shoo!
She has to take his hand and float.
I'm the bride, and I will take my new husband's hand
- and I will float joyfully.
- Emmadel.
I don't care! Somebody take your new husband's hand and float joyfully!
- You get out of my wedding!
- Stay out of my wedding, gold digger!
- Winifred! Hey, you!
- If you don't get out, I'll throw you out.
You don't think a Jones can throw a Stanley out, do you?
- Are you kidding?
- No! No, no, no!
No, no, no...
Emmy, get up out of there and give it to her!
Get out and give it to her!
That's the way to go in there, Winnie.
That's the way to go.
Give her the Irish whip!
Give her the Irish whip!
Say "uncle".
I said, "Say uncle".
- Uncle.
- Louder!
Uncle!
Coming, Winifred.
- You wrestle with a Jones, will you?
- Emmadel!
And I'm not a lady and I'm tired of pretending I am a lady!
I'm a mackerel man's daughter and I'll always be one and I'm proud of it!
And that goes for you too, you kissing cousin!
I didn't know you had it in you, Winifred.
Why didn't you tell us you were a secret peasant?
Nobody asked me.
And what's more, I can have a dozen kids, you old goats!
This is better than television.
- Emmy, I'm proud.
- Leave me alone!
I'm really proud.
I never saw you go so good.
I'm proud of you too, darling.
You had me worried with that Lady Stanley routine.
I fell in love with a Jones and I'm glad somebody made you realize that.
Now, you come back and go through with this rehearsal.
Nice try, Mr. Garvey.
A little on the crude side.
Mr. Lilley, let's go on with the rehearsal.
Yes, Mr. Stanley. All right, friends.
All the wakes I ever attended had a drop for a man to drink.
- Have you anything around?
- I gave it up on account of the kids.
This, I gotta tell Big Joe.
- Say, where are the kids, anyway?
- They're at the mausoleum with Ma.
She's feeding them.
What went haywire, Pete?
Yes, Emmy did everything you said she'd do.
I underestimated my man, that's all, fellows.
This Wilbur's a pretty sharp cookie,
I'll tell you that.
I think he smelled a rat.
With the wind from the right direction, he could have.
Come.
Stick them up!
What's this, a heist?
Uncle Wilbur gave us these.
Oh, he did, huh?
You like them, Pete?
They're very flashy, yeah, but it's past your bedtime, you know.
- Oh, no.
-Yes, allez hop, tout de suite.
Take a bath.
Brush those choppers too, Suzi.
I came here at Emmadel's request,
Mr. Garvey, to throw you out on your ear.
My house is your house, Mr. Stanley.
Good evening, Father, and Mr. Degnan.
I hope you haven't changed your mind about singing at my wedding.
It's at high noon.
You don't have to get out till after that.
That's hardly enough time for Pete to find a house for the kids.
Kids won't need a house, they're on their way back.
Don't worry about the kids, I've found a house for them. My house.
- What's this?
- Since you're not getting married,
Emmadel and I are going to adopt them ourselves.
It's arranged with the immigration people.
They'll be out in the morning for the formalities.
- Emmy knows about this?
- She'll be very happy when I tell her.
They'll make a wonderful wedding present for you to give her.
After all, she and I can do many things for them you can't.
- Yeah, that's true.
- And they already call her "Mother"...
Makes everything real handy, doesn't it?
- Well, you're OK.
- So are you.
- It's been fun, Mr. Garvey.
- Loads of fun.
- See you at the wedding.
- Yeah, sure.
You got any ideas?
Well, nothing that I can't be hanged for.
God bless Pete. God bless Mother.
God bless America.
God bless everybody.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Daddy?
- Good night, son.
- You got troubles, Pete?
Troubles? Me?
- Comme oi comme a.
- I shoot them!
No. Well, not tonight.
Shoot them in the morning, huh?
Upsy-daisy we go.
- Bonne nuit, Papa.
- Bonne nuit, Suzi.
No, chant "Bonne Nuit".
Sing, tonight?
Oh, I don't feel like singing, Suzi.
- Not tonight.
- Hey, Pete.
- What?
- We always leave them singing, right?
OK. Yeah, all right.
Bonne nuit
Bonne nuit
Just dream away
And soon we'll see
A bright new day
Be cheerful
In your sleepy-time prayer
The tearful
Never get anywhere
So don't despair
Bonne nuit
My love, dream of a land
Where stars above
Fall in your hand
And someday
We'll find this where and when
Bonne nuit
Bonne nuit
Till then
Ladies and gentlemen, this is Cinderella's wedding day.
The curtain's about to go up on the culmination of one of the most widely publicized romances in a decade.
The stage is set, the cast has been chosen.
The guest list reads like the Blue Book and Who's Who rolled into one.
Practically all the state and city officials are present, and the judiciary is represented.
I see many prominent judges.
In fact, anyone who is anyone at all is present at this function.
And now, we are waiting for the bride.
All right, bridesmaids, this is it.
This is it.
Remember everything I taught you.
Let me look at you, please, bride.
Wonderful. Wonderful.
Nothing must go wrong. Let me check each and every one of you.
We could at least speak on my wedding day.
- Why?
- We're gonna be relatives, we could be friends.
If I were you, I wouldn't use the word "friend".
I beg your pardon, but I'm covering this wedding for the Express.
Do you have anything to say to your waiting, panting public, Cinderella?
You may say that I am very happy.
"Emmadel Jones is very happy."
Anything else?
You may also say that George Degnan is very happy.
You are, right?
I gave you back your star reporter.
- Are you kidding?
- Any news?
An all-points broadcast two hours ago.
The FBI is on it.
- Oh, the poor guy.
- Who's a poor guy?
- Will you wait for me now?
- I'll keep my motor running.
- What are you talking about?
- Places, everybody!
Here, come on, let's get this Cinderella thing married.
- You can have her.
- I don't want her.
Here, George, wait for me too, will you? I'll deliver her and scram.
- Any news, Winnie?
- The FBIs after him.
Oh, poor Pete. Poor kids too.
Pa, what's happening?
Why is "poor Pete" poor Pete?
He kidnapped his kids.
The FBIs after him.
How could he kidnap his own children?
They weren't his, unless he got married by today.
Suppose they catch him, Pa?
He goes to jail, and the kids go back to France.
Did you know Pete's going to prison and the children back to France?
Don't worry about the children.
We're going to adopt them.
I've made all the arrangements.
Dearly beloved, we are gathered together here to join together this man and this woman in holy matrimony.
If any man can show just cause why they may not lawfully be joined together, let him now speak or else hereafter forever hold his peace.
Now, all right, all right, Mr. Burchard, you've made your pinch.
- Now, isn't that enough?
- I'm sorry, Mr. Garvey, but Immigration told me to deliver the children to Mr. Stanley.
But there's a lovely wedding ceremony going on.
- Haven't you any decency?
- They've got him.
Where's Mother?
Mother, Pete's got troubles!
- Les gendarmes!
- Back. Get back here.
Wilbur, I mustn't let the children see me marrying another man.
Another man? Me?
Well, Pete's their father, not you.
And they think I'm their mother and...
Well... Couldn't you just send them away or something?
OK. I beg your pardon.
Would you mind waiting a moment?
I'll be right back.
Throw him out!
Mr. Garvey.
Mr. Stanley, Ralph Burchard of the FBI.
I'm sorry about this.
It's not my idea at all.
He insisted on bringing me here and dumping me in your front yard.
- I have to deliver these children...
- I'll accept delivery.
Go ahead. Go with your father.
Go along.
Go with your father. Go ahead.
Go with your father, go ahead.
He's your father, he is.
- He's not our father!
- Yes, he is.
- You're our father!
- He will be...
- Daddy, don't leave!
- No, please don't...
Please! Do you realize you're being watched on television?
They won't come with me.
Oh... Well, Wilbur,
I don't want to take the children away from Pete and I don't want to have them sent back.
I... Well...
Please, couldn't you do something?
Well, that's pretty clear.
OK, Emmadel, there's only one thing to do.
- I'll tell Mr. Garvey you'll marry him.
- Marry Pete Garvey? Are you crazy?
Yes, darling, I am.
- Now, you wait right here.
- Oh, Wilbur...
Watch yourself, Emmy!
- Will you come with me?
- Where we going?
To have a wedding, we need a groom.
- Why do you want me?
- All right with you?
- Well I don't know...
- Oh, no! No!
Oh, no, you don't!
You don't do that to me!
I never heard of such a thing.
Why, I'd rather go to prison for the rest of my life.
Go on, think about yourself.
What about them? Shame on you.
You have to get a license, and there's all the details that have to be taken...
- Who's marrying who?
- "Whom", my dear.
Yes, Wilbur, in a case of extreme urgency, I can.
It's a matter of utmost urgency,
Your Honor.
This is Miss Jones, Mr. Garvey.
- Good morning, judge. How are you?
- How do you do?
I'm sorry, Reverend.
I've been asked to take over.
No, Emmy, don't do it!
Will you, Peter Garvey, take this woman, whom you are now holding by your right hand...
Whom you are now holding by your right hand, to be your lawful wedded wife?
Do you promise to love, honor and cherish her, and, forsaking all others, keep yourself for her alone
- as long as you both do live?
- I do.
Do you, Emmadel Jones, take this man, whom you are now holding by your right hand, to be your lawful wedded husband?
Do you promise to love, honor and keep yourself to him alone, as long as you both do live?
Well...
I do.
Place the ring on her finger and repeat after me.
- With this ring, I thee wed.
- With this ring, I thee wed.
Oh, well. Can't win.
Now, in the presence of God and these witnesses, and by virtue of authority vested in me by the laws of this state,
I pronounce you man and wife.
- Congratulations.
- Thanks. You've been neighborly.
- I'm sorry, Emmy...
- I'm sorry, Wilbur.
Aw, phooey! Nobody's sorry.
Wow! Wow!
Can't you take those things off now,
Mr. Burchard?
If you say so, Mr. Stanley.
Come on, Mother.
Thank you, Bobby.
Emmy, Emmy. It'll be an awful life.
You'll have laughs, though.
Oh, thank heavens,
I can take this corset off!
Yeah, I told you someday you'd slip on a banana peel.
Meet the banana peel.
Burchard of the FBI is actually a fellow reporter of mine on the Express.
- Glad to know you.
- Danny, you were sensational.
- Wasn't he dynamite?
- That was a great performance.
- It's a pleasure to pay you.
- Pete, I love you, you're wonderful!
- Don't I get a byline?
- Well, we'll see about that.
You're amazing, Mr. Garvey.
On the floor for a count of nine and still got up to win by a knockout.
You're pretty amazing yourself.
It's been fun.
Loads of fun, Mr. Garvey.
Take good care of the kissing cousin, now, won't you?
Want to wrestle?
When the party's getting a glow on
And singing fills the air
- Now, if a wedding is nigh
- Bring your own FBI
- Emmy?
- You didn't think you were kidding me.
That's my Em.
- You can tell 'em I'll be there
- You can tell 'em we'll be there
Subtitles by
SDI Media Group
Bigelow.
- Well, what did I do now?
- Nothing.
I, uh, just thought you'd want to know. There's trouble.
I thought you said
I didn't do nothing.
Oh, no, not you. I, uh...
I can't tell you where I heard it, but I heard things ain't going so good for your kinfolk...
Down on Earth.
There's trouble?
- Is it Julie?
- Well, I don't know exactly.
- Well, is it my boy?
- I told you I don't know.
Well, now, ain't that just dandy?
Here you take the trouble to tell me there's trouble down there, but you don't know what kind of trouble it is.
Do me a favor, will you?
Go... Bother somebody else while I finish these...
- ...stars.
- All right.
I just thought you might want to go down there, maybe help.
Who, me?
You gone loony or something?
How?
Well, everybody's got a right to go back for one day.
- They have?
- Sure.
That's the only reason I told you.
Hey, come here. Come here. Hey.
Not that I'm interested in going back there, but, uh, just in case I should be, who, uh...
Who gives out this permission?
The star keeper.
Him, huh?
Well, I'll think about it.
Was you wanted to see me?
Yes, I was.
I heard my family's in trouble down there.
Somebody tried to tell me if I came up here and see you, why...
You'd give me permission to go back for one day.
- Is that a fact?
- Yes.
But as I recall, Bigelow, when you first got here, you waived that right.
- I did?
- Yep, pretty sure, but let's look at the record.
Ah, here we are.
"Bigelow. Question,
"'Is there anything on Earth you left unfinished, Mr. Bigelow?
"The reason I ask is you're entitled to go back there for one day if you want to.'
"Answer, 'As long as I'm here,
I might as well stay."'
I said that?
Why, you don't think this book's incorrect, do you?
No.
Well, if that's the way it is, that's the way it is.
Wait a minute, now. Wait a minute.
You know, sometimes we make exceptions in special cases.
Special cases?
Oh, you mean, if a guy led a good life, he'd deserve a break?
- That kind of thing, huh?
- Mm-hmm.
- I know the answer already.
- Do you, now?
Now, how do you know how we judge things up here?
Eh, it'd just be wasting your time and mine.
Simmer down now,
Billy. You're forgetting.
Here there is no time. This is the beginning and the end.
Why don't you tell me about yourself?
What did you do down there?
What did I do down there?
Oh, you mean, "What did
I do for a living?"
Well, you can start there, if you want.
Well, uh...
- I owned this carousel.
- You what?
Look. If you know this story, what do you want to hear it again for?
Oh, I don't know the story, but I can see through you like a pane of window glass.
Now, why don't you start over?
Well, I worked for this lady who owned the carousel.
Ah.
But I was the main attraction.
I was, wasn't I?
Every night, girls would gather around, music would be playing, the carousel would be going round and round, the whole midway would be packed with people, and I'd be standing up there.
All right, everybody. Hurry, hurry.
Come ride on the carousel.
One more glorious spin.
Hurry, hurry, hurry.
Step right this way, and come ride the...
The ride starts in a few minutes, ladies and gentlemen.
Just a very few minutes. Hurry, hurry over this way and...
Do you mind?
Come on, everybody.
Hurry, hurry, hurry.
Ride on the carousel, the most beautiful carousel you've ever seen.
And this year it's faster and faster.
The ride of a lifetime. Fifteen minutes for five cents is all, five little cents.
Get in line.
Young lady, where's your ticket?
- I don't have any.
- You can buy one.
Up.
Julie.
Julie, come on. Hurry. Come on.
She's coming after us again. Let's run.
No, I ain't scared of her.
Listen, you little... I've got one more thing to tell you.
If you ever so much as poke your nose in my carousel again,
I'm gonna have you thrown out, right on your little pink bustle.
You've got no call to talk to her like that. She ain't doing you no harm.
Oh, ain't she? I suppose you think I wanna get in trouble with the police
- and maybe lose my license?
- What is the woman talking about?
Letting my barker fool with you.
Ain't you ashamed?
- I don't let no man fool...
- He leaned against her all through the ride.
He leaned against the horse, but he didn't lay a hand on me.
Oh, no, Miss Innocence.
And I suppose he didn't put his arm around your waist neither.
And suppose he did. Is that a reason to go and have a "capuleptic" fit?
You mind your own business, you hussy.
Go on back to your old carousel and leave us alone.
- Yeah, leave us alone, you old...
- I don't run my business for a lot of sluts.
Who you calling a slut?
Slut yourself.
- Yeah, slut yourself.
- Shut up!
Jabber, jabber, jabber, jabber, jabber.
What's going on anyway?
Spitting and sputtering like three lumps of corn a-poppin' on a shovel.
- Mr. Bigelow, please...
- Don't yell.
- I didn't yell.
- Well, don't.
What's the matter?
I want you to take a good look at that girl, Billy.
She ain't never to be allowed on my carousel again.
Next time she tries to get in, if she dares,
I want you to throw her out, you understand?
- Throw her out!
- All right, all right.
Well, you heard what the lady said.
Go on. Go on home.
- Shoo, get.
- Come on, Julie.
- No, I won't.
- Would you like a nice, cool drink, Billy?
- Sure.
- Mr. Bigelow.
Tell me, please, honest and truly.
If I come back to the carousel again, would you throw me out?
What did she do anyway?
She said you put your arm around my waist.
Aha, well. There's something new.
Can't put my arm around a girl without first asking permission, is that how it is?
No, I just don't want that one around no more.
You come around all you like, see.
You ain't got the price, Billy
Bigelow will treat you to a ride.
Big talker, ain't you, Mr. Bigelow?
I suppose you think I can't throw you out too if I want to?
You're such a good barker,
I can't run my business without you, is that it?
Well, just for that, you're discharged.
Your services are no longer required.
You're bounced. See?
Very well, Mrs. Mullin. Very well.
Well, now, you know, I could bounce you if I felt like it.
Well, you felt like it just now.
So I'm bounced, bounced.
Well, now, you don't have to pick up every word I say. I only said that I...
Said that my services were no longer required.
Very good, Mrs. Mullin.
We'll let it go at that.
All right, you devil.
We'll let it go at that.
- Mr. Bigelow, if she said she's...
- You keep out of this.
But I don't want this to happen on account of me.
- Apologize to her.
- Aha!
Me apologize to her? For what?
For giving my carousel a bad name?
A ba...
The day you bought the carousel,
Mrs. Mullin, it got a bad name.
After all I've done for you, that's what...
- Now I am through with you.
- Go on.
- And it's for good, do you hear?
- Go on.
Get!
Through for good.
And I won't take you back like I done before.
What will you do now, Mr. Bigelow?
Well, first of all, I'll go get myself a glass of beer.
Whenever anything bothers me,
I always drink a glass of beer.
Then you are bothered about losing your job.
No, only about how
I'm gonna pay for the beer.
Will you pay for it?
You?
- How much money you got?
- Forty-three cents.
And you?
I asked you how much money you got?
Oh.
You don't need to cry about it.
If you ain't got it, you ain't got it.
Tell her to stop crying.
Carrie.
Well, that's better.
I'm going over to the carousel and get my things.
Hey, you know that bench down the road?
The one by the... By the water, the last one, by the tree.
I'll meet you there.
And then we'll go see about having that drink.
It's all right. Keep your money.
This time, I'll pay.
Julie.
Huh?
I've been bustin' to tell you something lately.
You have?
The reason I didn't care to tell you before was...
Well, 'cause you didn't have a fella of your own.
But now that you got one,
I can tell you about mine.
I'm glad you've got a fella,
Carrie. What's his name?
 His name is Mister Snow 
 And an upstanding man is he 
 He comes home ev'ry night in his round bottomed boat 
 With a net full of herring from the sea 
 An almost perfect beau 
 As refined as a girl could wish 
 But he spends so much time in his round bottomed boat 
 That he can't seem to lose the smell of fish! 
 The fust time he kissed me the whiff of his clothes 
 Knocked me fiat on the floor of the room 
 But now that I love him my heart's in my nose 
 And fish is my fav'rite perfume! 
 Last night he spoke quite low 
 And a fair spoken man is he 
 And he said "Miss Pipperidge,
I'd like it fine 
 "If I could be wed with a wife 
 "And indeed, Miss Pipperidge
If you'll be mine 
 "I'll be yours fer the rest of my life!" 
 Next moment we were promised 
 And now my mind's in a maze 
 Fer all it ken do is look forward to 
 That wonderful day of days 
 When I marry Mister Snow 
 The flowers'll be buzzin' with the hum of bees 
 The birds'll make a racket in the church yard trees 
 When I marry Mister Snow 
 Then it's off to home we'll go 
 And both of us'll look little dreamy-eyed 
 A drivin' to a cottage by the oceanside 
 Where the salty breezes blow 
 He'll carry me
'cross the threshold 
 And I'll be as meek as a lamb 
 Then he'll set me on my feet
And I'll say, kinda sweet 
 Well, Mister Snow here I am! 
 Then I'll kiss him so he'll know 
 That ev'rythin'll be as right as right ken be 
 A livin' in a cottage by the sea with me 
 For I love that Mister Snow 
 That young, seafarin' bold and darin' 
 Big, be-whiskered over-bearin 
 Darlin' 
 Mister Snow  
- Carrie, I'm so happy for you.
- Yeah.
Come on. I don't wanna be late.
Carrie, this is where he meant us to wait.
- You sure?
- Yes.
- It's awful quiet here, Julie.
- Yes, it is.
Hardly anyone ever goes past here.
Do you think the stories about him are true?
Probably.
Well...
What are you girls doing here?
You told us to wait for you.
I meant she was to wait.
You can go home.
Why, Mr. Bigelow.
If you think either one of us would stay here with you alo...
Oh, Mr. Bigelow, it's late.
If Julie stays, she'll lose her job.
Lose your job 'cause you stay out late? Where do you work?
At Bascombe's Cotton Mill.
All Bascombe's girls have to be respectable.
We all have to live in the mill boarding house and if we're late, they lock us out and we can't go back to work there anymore.
Is that right? They bounce you if you ain't home on time?
- That's right.
- It's late, Julie.
We ought to go.
Are you coming?
Should I go, Julie?
I can't tell you what to do, Carrie.
All right.
- Good-bye.
- Good-bye.
Good-bye, Julie.
Good-bye, Carrie.
Well, now we're both out of jobs.
- You had your supper?
- No.
You want to eat out on the pier?
No.
You don't come around the carousel very much, do you?
I only seen you two or three times before today.
I've been there much more than that.
Is that right?
- Did you see me?
- Yes.
Did you know I was Billy Bigelow?
The girls told me.
- You got a sweetheart?
- No.
- Now, don't lie to me.
- I haven't any.
Why, you stayed here the first time I asked you to.
You wouldn't have stayed so quick if you hadn't done it before.
What did you stay for anyway?
So you wouldn't be left alone.
Holy smokes, you're dumb.
I don't need to be alone. I can have all the girls I want.
Don't you know that?
I know, Mr. Bigelow.
All the girls are crazy for you.
Well, that's more like it.
You know what you remind me of?
A girl I knew at Coney Island.
Tell you how I met her.
We was just putting out the lights one night when...
Is that you, Miss Jordan?
Yes, Mr. Bascombe.
- Whatever are you doing out at this hour?
- Well, I...
You couldn't be home in time now if you ran all the way.
No, sir.
And what's it your business?
Mr. Bigelow, this is Mr. Bascombe.
He owns the mill.
I don't care what he owns.
If you ask me, he owns a lot of nerve.
What right's he got coming here...
What's going on here?
- Oh, good evening, Timmany.
- Evening, Mr. Bascombe.
- Are you having trouble?
- Well...
Him having trouble? Ask me.
I was just setting here with my lady friend not bothering nobody.
And old sideburns here...
Hear now, Bigelow. Don't be calling Mr. Bascombe names unless you're fixing to get yourself in trouble.
- You know this fellow, Timmany?
- Yes, Mr. Bascombe.
We have a report on him from the chief of police of Bangor.
He's a pretty fly gazabo.
Works on carousels.
Makes a specialty out of pretty young ones like this.
Gets 'em all moony eyed, promises to marry 'em then takes their money.
I haven't got any money.
- That's right. She ain't.
- Oh, you found that out already.
Julie, you are a young and inexperienced child.
And I've decided to give you one more chance.
I'll take you back to the house myself and explain everything to the matron.
Come, my child.
Well, don't stand there like you didn't have good sense.
Do I have to go with you?
Well, no, you don't have to.
- Then I'll stay.
- After I warned you.
You see, Timmany? There are some you just can't help.
- Good night.
- Good night, Mr. Bascombe.
You. I ought to throw you in jail.
- What for?
- Don't know. Wish I did.
Well, and then what?
Huh?
You were telling me a story. You were just putting out the lights when...
Oh, yeah.
Well, just as the lights went out, someone come along.
It was this little girl, the one with the...
Tell me something. Ain't you scared of me?
I mean, after what that cop said about me taking money from girls.
I ain't scared.
You're a funny kid.
Well, you wanna go into town and dance?
Oh, no. I have to be careful.
- Of what?
- My character.
See, I'm never gonna marry.
Huh?
Well, a girl who don't marry has gotta be much more particular.
About what? Who she's seen with?
Oh, no. No.
About not letting other people get the wrong impression.
See, if... if I was gonna marry, it wouldn't make so much difference.
Oh.
Suppose I was to say to you that I'd marry you.
You?
That scares you, don't it? You're thinking about what that cop said.
No. Why, I never paid no mind to what he said.
Well, you wouldn't marry a fella like me anyway, would you?
Yes, I would...
If I loved you.
Why, it wouldn't make any difference what you...
Even if I died for it.
Nah.
How do you know what you'd do if you loved me, how you'd feel or anything?
I don't know how I'd know.
But I know how it would be...
If I loved you.
But you don't.
No, I don't.
 But somehow I ken see 
 Jest exactly how I'd be 
 If I loved you 
 Time and again I would try to say 
 All I'd want you to know 
 If I loved you 
 Words wouldn't come in an easy way 
 Round in circles I go! 
 Longin' to tell you 
 But afraid and shy 
 I let my golden chances 
 Pass me by! 
 Soon you'd leave me 
 Off you would go in the mist of day 
 Never, never 
 To know 
 How I loved you 
 If 
 I loved you! 
Well, anyway, you don't love me.
That's what you said, wasn't it?
Yes.
I can smell them. Can you?
The blossoms.
The wind brings them down.
There ain't much wind tonight.
Hardly any.
 You can't hear a sound
Not the turn of a leaf 
 Nor the fall of a wave hittin' the sand 
 The tide's creepin' up on the beach like a thief 
 Afraid to be caught stealin' the land 
 On a night like this 
 I start to wonder 
 What life 
 ls all about 
 And I always say two heads are better than one 
 To figger it out 
I don't need you or anyone to help me.
I've got it figured out for myself.
What are we?
Just a couple of specks of nothing.
Look up there.
 Why you can't even count the stars in the sky 
 And the sky's so big the sea looks small 
 And two little people you and I 
 We don't count at all 
You're a funny kid.
I don't remember ever meeting a girl like you.
Hey. You trying to get me to marry you?
- No.
- Well, then what's putting it into my head?
- I wonder what it would be like.
- If you loved me?
But you don't.
No, I don't.
 But somehow I can see 
 Just exactly how I'd be 
 If I loved you 
 Time and again I would try to say 
 All I'd want you 
 To know 
 If I loved you 
 Words wouldn't come in an easy way 
 Round in circles 
 I'd go! 
 Longin' to tell you 
 But afraid and shy 
 I'd let my golden chances 
 Pass me by! 
 Soon you'd leave me 
 Off you would go in the mist of day 
 Never, never 
 To know 
 How I loved you 
 If 
 I loved you! 
Well, anyway, I...
I ain't the kind of a fella to marry anybody.
Even if a girl was foolish enough to want me to, I wouldn't.
Don't worry about it, Billy.
Who's worried?
You're right about there being no wind.
The blossoms are just coming down by theirselves.
It's just their time to, I reckon.
Well, you being Julie's only kinfolk,
I thought you'd want to know.
Ain't seen that barker from the carousel neither.
He got bounced too.
- If you ain't got any better than them...
- Oh, I got better. I got better.
It could be accidental, them both disappearing at the same time.
All the same, it does look a might peculiar.
Nobody in our family ever did anything to be ashamed of, Clem Hoops.
Now, you just find me a couple of good, big lobsters or get!
Cousin Nettie!
Julie, Julie.
Julie. Oh, I'm so glad to see you.
- I was wondering where you been.
- I been getting married, Cousin Nettie.
This is my husband, Billy Bigelow.
- Your husband?
- It's a fact, Nettie.
Look.
- It's pretty.
- Solid gold plated.
I'm pleased to know you, Mr. Bigelow.
And I wish you both all the happiness in the world.
I'd have said it sooner, but it's kind of a surprise.
It takes a little getting used to.
Me, I never got used to it.
I just couldn't get the hang of being married.
Was that Julie's fault?
I didn't say that.
But maybe it wasn't my fault either.
There was only one carousel in town.
I couldn't go back there.
- I didn't have a job.
- What did you live on?
Her cousin Nettie.
- To be perfectly honest with you, I tried...
- I would be if I were you.
Me, I never got used to it.
I didn't mind living off her cousin Nettie.
It was... It was just having nothing to do that drove me crazy.
Well, a couple of months went by.
Then it was June.
Everybody was getting ready for the first clambake of the season.
Excepting Julie and me, everybody was having themselves a whale of a time.
 June is bustin' out all over! 
 All over the meadow and the hill! 
 Buds're bustin' outa bushes
And the rompin' river pushes 
 Ev'ry little wheel that wheels beside a mill 
 June is bustin' out all over 
 The ocean is full of Jacks and Jills! 
 With her little tail a-swishin'
Ev'ry lady fish is wishin' 
 That a male would come and grab her by the gills! 
 Because it's June! 
 June, June, June 
 Jest because it's
June June June 
 Fresh and alive and gay and young 
 June is a love song sweetly sung 
 June is bustin' out all over! 
 The sapplin's are
Dustin' out with sap! 
 Love has found my brother, Junior 
 And my sister's even lunier! 
 And my Ma is gettin' kittenish with Pap! 
 June is bustin' out all over! 
 The sheep aren't sleepin' any more 
 All the rams that chase the ewe sheep 
 Are determined there'll be new sheep 
 And the ewe sheep aren't even keepin' score! 
 Because it's June 
 June, June, June 
 Just because it's
June, June June 
 It's June, June, June 
 Just because it's June, June 
 March went out like a lion 
 A whippin' up the water in the bay 
 Then April cried and stepped aside 
 And along come pretty little May! 
 May was full of promises 
 But she didn't keep 'em quick enough fer some 
 And a crowd of
Doubtin' Thomases 
 Was predictin' that the summer'd never come! 
 But it's comin', by gum!
Y'ken feel it come! 
 Y'ken feel it in yer heart
Y'ken see it in the ground! 
 Y'ken hear it in the trees
Y'ken smell it in the breeze 
 Look around, look around Look around! 
 June is bustin' out all over 
 To ladies the men are payin' court 
 Lotsa ships are kept at anchor 
 Jest because the Captains hanker fer the comforts they can only get in port! 
-  You can feel it comin' 
-  June is bustin' out all over 
 The moonlight is shinin' on the shore 
 And the girls who were contrary with the boys in January 
 Aren't nearly so contrary anymore! 
-  Because it's June 
-  June, June, June 
 Just because it's
June, June, June 
 Because it's June 
 June, June, June 
 Just because it's
June, June, June 
 It's June! 
Hello there on the Nancy B.
Hello there on the Nancy B.
- Lookin' for somebody, miss?
- My husband.
They told me he was with one of your hands, Jigger Craigin.
Could be, ma'am, but I ain't seen him.
The whole crew's gone ashore.
They was, uh, figurin' on goin' on that clambake.
Maybe you can catch up with them there.
Thank you, sir.
- She gone?
- Yeah.
Billy, is that true? ls there a clambake today?
- Yeah. First one of the year.
- Yeah.
Why don't we go?
- What for?
- We'd come back rich. That's what for.
Rich? From a clambake?
You'd be the first one.
Jigger's been the first one lots of times.
What you need is a glass of beer.
Come on, I'm buying.
That clambake's just what I've been waitin' for.
You couldn't find him, could you?
- No.
- Hello, Julie.
Hello, Carrie.
Julie, is Billy working yet?
No.
Mr. Snow says a man that can't find work these days is just bone lazy.
Billy don't know any trade. He's only good at what he used to do.
So now he just don't do anything.
You know something else, Carrie?
- Last Monday, he hit her.
- Nettie.
- Did you hit him back?
- Oh, no.
Well, I would have. I'd leave him.
You don't understand, Carrie.
You see, he's unhappy
'cause he ain't working.
That's why he hit me Monday.
Fine reason for hitting you. Beats his wife 'cause he ain't working.
Is this before the clambake, after or what?
It's while the clambake's going on.
Now, once we're out there, suppose me and you get in a boat and come back in and did whatever we had to do.
Then we got back.
There's your alibi.
We could just say, "We were on the island all the time. We got lost."
All right. What do we have to do?
I mean me, what do I gotta do?
Well, first, you go up to old sideburns and you say,
"Excuse me, sir.
Could you tell me the time?"
I say, "Excuse me, sir.
Could you tell me the time?"
Then what?
Then by that time, I got my knife in his ribs.
- Then you take your knife...
- Me?
I ain't got a knife.
Well, you can get one, can't you?
- Does he have to be killed?
- No, he don't have to be.
But these New Englanders are funny. They'd rather be killed.
Well? Hmm?
I ain't gonna do it. It's dirty.
- What's dirty about it?
- Killing.
What's the matter with you?
We ain't gonna kill him.
We're just gonna scare him.
That's what the knives are for, to scare him.
I ain't gonna do it, Jigger.
Of course, if you've got all the money you want...
I ain't got a cent.
Money thinks I'm dead.
Julie?
I got some good news to tell you.
'Bout you and Mr. Snow?
Carrie and me are bein' cried in church on Sunday.
Mr. Snow, you startled me!
Well, this is him.
- Carrie told me a lot about you.
- Oh.
I told you a lot about
Julie, didn't I?
Enoch's nice-lookin', ain't he?
Oh, come, Carrie.
Steady and reliable too.
Well, ain't you gonna wish us good luck?
Course I wish you luck, Carrie.
You can kiss Enoch too, us bein' such good friends and me bein' right here lookin' on at you.
Why are you cryin', Mrs. Bigelow?
It's because she has such a good heart.
We thank you for your heartfelt sympathy.
We thank you, Mrs. Bigelow.
Billy! Billy.
You know Carrie, and...
This is her intended, Mr. Snow.
- Mr. Snow?
- Mr. Bigelow?
I feel like I know you.
Oh, yes. The man who owns the herring boat.
You smell it over there, Jigger?
Nope. Wind's in the wrong direction.
- It's a good, honest smell!
- It's a powerful, honest smell.
Carrie. You still want me to offer him a job?
What job?
Mr. Snow here is thinkin' of puttin' on another boat and I was gonna ask him to offer you a job on it, but now I...
Me? Work on a herring boat?
No, thanks.
Enoch, come along before you lose your temper and do something violent.
Well? Go ahead. Say it.
I insulted your friends, stayed out all night.
I ain't workin'. I'm livin' off your cousin Nettie.
- I didn't say anything.
- No, but it was on the tip of your tongue.
I was only gonna ask if... If you wanted to go to the clambake.
It's a good idea, Billy. You've been actin' kind of nervous and edgy.
Who knows? Maybe you might find the treasure.
No! Ain't goin' to no clambake.
Well, you got anything else to say?
Like what, Billy?
Well, like whether
I'm hungry or not.
I didn't have to ask that, Billy.
I knowed you was hungry.
You go and sit down, and I'll bring you your dinner.
Do you wanna see somebody?
Yeah, Billy.
- That is, if he's home yet.
- He's home.
Would it be asking too much to know where he is?
My husband is around the other side, waitin' for his dinner.
Thanks.
Hello, Billy.
Well, what'd you come for?
Well, I see you're still hangin' around your jailbird friend.
What's it to you who
I hang around with?
One thing I can't abide is a common type woman.
Everybody that gets mixed up with him finishes up in the jailhouse or the grave.
Common woman.
Put on a new coat of paint. You're startin' to peel, old pleasure boat.
Well. What are you doin' here?
You got a new barker, ain't you?
Why don't you stay home and sleep at night?
- You look awful.
- Ah.
Here, come on. Put your hair back off your forehead.
Oh, leave my hair be.
I, uh, hear you been beatin' her.
Now if you're sick of her, why don't you leave her?
- There's no use beatin' the poor thing.
- Who beat her?
What's all this darn fool talk about a beatin'? I hit her once.
Oh.
Now the whole town is talkin'...
Next one I hear say "beat,"
I'm gonna smash...
All right. All right, all right, all right.
All right. I take it back.
Look, I don't wanna get mixed up in this.
"Beat her." As if I'd beat her.
What's the odds one way or the other?
Why don't you look at the thing straight?
You're sick of bein' married.
Carousel ain't crowded without me, is it?
Oh, Billy. You see? You belong out there and you know it.
You wasn't cut out for a respectable, married man.
You're the... You're...
You're the artist type.
You belong among artists.
Tell you what, Billy.
You come back...
And I'll give you that ruby ring my husband left me.
I don't know. I...
Yeah.
I might go back.
Yeah. Yeah, I could still live here with Julie, and...
- Holy Moses!
- Well, what's wrong?
Well, can you imagine?
The girls would love that, a barker who runs home to his wife every night.
Why, people would laugh theirselves sick.
Well, I... I know I would.
Yeah. I can hear you laughin'.
Don't be so stuck on yourself.
- You want anything?
- Brought you your dinner.
Billy? I...
I got somethin' to tell you.
All right.
I've... Been wantin' to tell you.
- In fact, I was goin' to yesterday...
- Go ahead.
I can't. We gotta be alone.
Can't you see I'm busy here?
I'm talkin' business.
- It'll only take a minute.
- Get out of here.
- I tell you. It'll only take a minute.
- Will you get out of here?
- No!
- What did you say?
Ah, let her alone. She's got somethin' to tell you.
And you... You've got somethin' to tell her.
I'll be back in a minute.
- Well?
- Don't look at me like that.
I ain't afraid of you.
I ain't afraid of anyone.
Go ahead and tell me what it is. Make it quick.
Well, I... I can't tell you so quick.
Why don't you drink your coffee?
Is that what you come to tell me?
No, but... But by the time you drink it, I'll have told you.
Well?
Well...
Yesterday my head ached, and you asked me if...
Yes?
Well, you see, that's what it is.
I'm gonna have a baby.
Julie. Julie!
You ain't mad, Billy, are you?
Should you be walkin' up them stairs?
- Sure, Billy.
- Here. Let me help you.
I'm all right. I'm fine, just as long as you ain't mad.
 Dee-dah-dah-dah
Dah-dah-dah-dah-dee 
 Round in circles 
Here. You'll be wantin' an advance on your salary.
That's only fair. Now, you been out of work a long time.
Go home, Mrs. Mullin.
Well, what's the matter with you?
Go on back to your carousel.
Go on. Go on!
- You mean you ain't comin' back with me?
- Good-bye, Mrs. Mullin.
What did she tell you?
Some lies about me, I'll bet.
- No.
- I...
Nothin' about you.
It was about me and Julie and...
As a matter of fact, Mrs. Mullin...
I'm gonna be a father.
You? You, a father?
Good-bye, Mrs. Mullin.
- Hey, Jigger.
- Ah.
Jigger! Julie's gonna have a baby.
Well, what about it?
Nothin'.
My mother had a baby once.
 I wonder what he'll think of me! 
 I guess he'll call me "The Old Man!" 
 I guess he'll think I can lick
Ev'ry other feller's father 
 Well, I can! 
 I'll bet that he'll turn out to be 
 The spitan' image of his Dad 
 But he'll have more common sense 
 Than his puddin' headed father ever had 
 I'll teach him to wrassle and dive through a wave 
 When we go in the mornin's for our swim 
 His mother can teach him the way to behave 
 But she won't make a sissy out o' him 
 Not him! Not my boy! 
 Not Bill! 
 Bill! My boy, Bill! 
 I will see that he's named after me 
 I will 
 My boy, Bill! He'll be tall and as tough as a tree 
 Will Bill! 
 Like a tree he'll grow with his head held high 
 And his feet planted firm on the ground 
 And you won't see nobody dare to try 
 To boss him or toss him around! 
 No pot bellied, baggy eyed bully'll boss him around! 
 I don't give a hang what he does 
 As long as he does what he likes! 
 He can sit on his tail or work on a rail 
 With a hammer, a hammerin' spikes 
 He can ferry a boat on a river 
 Or peddle a pack on his back 
 Or work up and down the streets of a town 
 With a whip and a horse and a hack 
 He can haul a scow along a canal 
 Run a cow around a corral 
 Or maybe bark for a carousel 
 Of course it takes talent to do that well 
 He might be a champ of the heavyweights 
 Or a feller that sells you glue 
 Or President of the United States 
 That'd be alright too 
His mother would like that.
But he wouldn't be president unless he wanted to be.
 Not Bill! 
 My boy, Bill! He'll be tall and as tough as a tree 
 Will Bill! 
 Like a tree he'll grow with his head held high 
 And his feet planted firm on the ground 
 And you won't see nobody dare to try 
 To boss him or toss him around! 
 No fat bottomed, flabby faced, potbellied 
 Baggy eyed bully'll boss him around 
 And I'm hanged if he'll many his boss's daughter 
 A skinny lipped lady with blood like water 
 Who'll give him a peck and call it a kiss 
 And look in his eyes through a lorgnette 
Say, why am I takin' on like this?
 My kid ain't even been born yet 
 I can see him when he's seventeen or so 
 And startin' in to go with a girl! 
 I can give him lots of pointers very sound 
 On the way to get
'round any girl 
 I can tell him 
Wait a minute.
Could it be?
What the...
What if he...
Is a girl?
Aw, Bill.
Bill.
What would I do with her?
What could I do for her?
A bum with... With no money.
 You can have fun with a son 
 But you got to be a father 
 To a girl! 
 She mightn't be so bad as that 
 A kid with ribbons in her hair! 
 A kind of sweet and petite 
 Little tin-type of her mother! 
 What a pair! 
 My little girl 
 Pink and white as peaches and cream 
 Is she 
 My little girl 
 ls half again as bright 
 As girls are meant to be! 
 Dozens of boys pursue her 
 Many a likely lad 
 Does what he can to woo her 
 From her faithful Dad! 
 She has a few 
 Pink and white 
 Young fellers of two or three 
 But my little girl 
 Gets hungry ev'ry night 
 And she comes homer
 To me! 
 I got to get ready before she comes! 
 I got to make certain that she 
 Won't be dragged up in slums with a lot o' bums like me 
 She's got to be sheltered and fed and dressed 
 In the best that money can buy! 
 I never knew how to get money 
 But I'll try! I'll try!
I'll try! 
 I'll go out and make it or steal it 
 Or take it 
 Or die!  
Wish you could come, Julie.
I'd rather stay home, really.
You go and have yourself a good time.
Julie! Julie?
Julie?
Thought you'd gone.
I ain't goin' on the clambake, Billy.
What do you mean, you ain't goin'?
Course you're goin'.
We're both goin'.
- But you said...
- Forget it.
I mean, that was before.
Gotta have a celebration, ain't we?
Oh, Billy, I'm so glad.
I'll see if Carrie and Mr. Snow have room for us.
Oh, but... But you wouldn't wanna go with them, would you?
Why, sure I would.
You're puttin' the craziest ideas into my head.
First I don't wanna go on a clambake and now I don't wanna go with Carrie and Mr. Snow.
- Go on. Ask him. Go on.
- All right, Billy.
Change your mind, huh?
- Yeah.
- Good. Get the knife?
No, I haven't got it. No.
Don't worry about it, mate.
Here's your coat.
Billy! Billy! It's all right.
- Come on!
- Comin', Julie.
See you later, mate.
- Mr. Snow.
- Hello, Bigelow.
Cast off the stern line.
Julie...
After the baby's born, maybe we could go to San Francisco.
- We'll take the kid with us, of course.
- Sure, Billy. Sure.
You think I'm just talkin', huh?
You'll see.
Carrie, can you imagine how it'll be when all the kids are asleep upstairs?
You and me sit alone in the firelight.
Me in my armchair, you on my knee maybe?
Maybe.
Maybe.
 When the children are asleep we'll sit and dream 
 The things that ev'ry other dad and mother dream 
 When the children are asleep and lights are low 
 If I still love you the way I love you today 
 You'll pardon my saying 
 "I told you so!" 
 When the children are asleep I'll dream with you 
 We'll think what fun we hev had 
 And be glad that it all came true! 
 When the children are asleep we'll sit and dream 
-  Dream all alone 
-  The things that ev'ry other 
 Dad and mother dream 
 Dreams that won't be interrupted 
 When the children are asleep and lights are low 
 Lo! And behold 
 If I still love your
 The way I love you today 
 You'll pardon my saying 
 "I told you so!" 
 When the children are asleep
I'll dream with you 
 You'll dream with me 
 We'll think what fun we hev had 
 And be glad that it all came true! 
 When today is a long time ago 
 You'll still hear me say 
 That the best dream I know 
 Is home 
 When the children are asleep I'll dream with you 
Butter's melted.
Thanks, Carrie.
 This was a real nice clambake 
 We're mighty glad we came 
 The vittles we et were good, you bet! 
 The company was the same 
 Our hearts are warm
Our bellies are full 
 And we are feelin' prime 
 This was a real nice clambake 
 And we all hed a real good time! 
 Remember when we raked them red-hot lobsters 
 Out of the driftwood fire? 
 They sizzled and crackled and sputtered a song 
 Fittin fer an Angels' choir 
 Fitten fer an angels'
Fitten fer an angels' 
 Fitten fer an angels' choir 
 We slit 'em down the back and peppered 'em good 
 And doused 'em in melted butter 
 Then we tore away the claws and cracked 'em with our teeth 
 'Cause we weren't in the mood to putter! 
 Fitten fer an angels'
Fitten fer an angels' 
 Fitten fer an angels' choir 
 Then at last 
-  Come the clams 
-  The clams 
 Steamed under rockweed 
 And poppin' from their shells 
 Jest how many of 'em
Galloped down our gullets 
 We couldn't say oursel's! 
 Oh... Oh... Oh... 
 This was a real nice clambake 
 We're mighty glad we came 
 The vittles we et were good, you bet! 
 The company was the same 
 Our hearts are warm
Our bellies are full 
 And we are feelin' prime 
 This was a real nice clambake 
 And we all had a real good time! 
 We said it afore and we'll say agen 
 We all had a real 
 Good time! 
- Enoch?
- Aye?
You found the treasure last year, so it's your turn to hide it now.
Enoch.
And while Enoch's hidin' the treasure, all the rest of you get to work and clean up this island.
Can't leave it like this for the next picnickers that come.
Here it is, Enoch.
Fall in and get to work, the whole kit and caboodle of you. Burn all that rubbish.
That's a well-set-up little piece, that Carrie.
Look. Ain't it near time for us to start?
No. We'll wait till they start the treasure hunt, then we'll go together like a team.
We'll get lost together like I said.
Did you get the knife?
- No.
- Well, go ahead and take one.
- Somebody might see me.
- Take it so they don't see you.
I got some sweet business to transact.
- Miss Pipperidge!
- Mr. Craigin!
No fair peekin'.
Oh, I didn't come here to find no treasure.
- You didn't?
- No. I come hereto protect you.
You did?
What are you doin' out here alone?
Don't you know it's dangerous?
Suppose I was a different type of fella.
You know, unprincipled?
A fella who'd use physical strength to have his will.
- There are such men, you know.
- I know, but...
Every girl oughta know how to defend herself against brutes like that.
Now there are certain holds in wrestlin' I could teach you.
Trick's that'd land a masher flat on his face in two minutes.
- I ain't strong enough.
- Oh, it don't take strength.
It's just a matter of balance.
A twist of the wrist, a dig with the elbow.
Here, let me show you a simple one.
This might save your life someday.
Now, suppose a fella... gets a hold of you like this!
Now you put your two hands on my neck.
Now pull me towards you.
That's it. Now pull my head down.
Good. Now put your left arm all the way around my neck.
Ah.
Now squeeze... Hard!
Tighter!
Good girl.
- Does it hurt?
- Oh, you got me helpless.
Show me another one.
Uh, right... Uh...
Here's how you can pick a fella up and send him sprawlin'.
Now, I'll just stand here and you get a hold of...
Uh, no. No. Wait a minute.
I'll do it to you first, and then you can do it to me.
- All right.
- And you just stand still and relax.
This is... This is the way firemen carry people.
It is?
You see how helpless you can make a fella if he gets fresh with you?
Aye.
Ah, Miss Pipperidge.
- I'm just crazy for you.
- Mr. Craigin...
Why, just to see your lovely smile,
I'd swim through beer with my mouth closed.
Oh!
Oh. Hello, Enoch.
This is the way firemen carry people.
Where's the fire?
He... He was just showin' me how to defend myself.
It didn't look like you'd learned very much by the time I came.
That's 'cause you came too early.
In my opinion, sir, you are as scurvy a hunk of scum as I ever seen near the water's edge at low tide.
What's all the fussin' and fuzzlin' and wuzzlin' about?
I never thought I'd see the woman I'm engaged to bein' carried out of the woods like a fallen deer.
Oh, no, Enoch. He wasn't carryin' me out of the woods.
He was carryin' me into the woods.
Oh, no. I don't mean that.
I think we have said all we have to say.
I can't abide women who are free, loose and lollygaggin'.
And I certainly would never marry one.
Enoch!
Aw, let him go, Carrie.
- You don't know when you're lucky.
- You keep out of this!
- Ooh!
- Enoch!
Oh, Carrie.
You could never be happy with a man like that.
I'm only tellin' you for your own good. Believe me.
 I never see it yet to fail 
 I never see it fail! 
 A girl who's in love with a virtuous man 
 Is doomed to weep and wail! 
 Stonecutters cut it on stone 
 Woodpeckers peck it on wood 
 There's nothin' so bad fer a woman 
 As a man who thinks he's good! 
Nice talk.
 My mother used to say to me 
 "When you grow up, my son 
 "I hope you're a bum like your father was 
 "'Cause a good man ain't no fun!" 
 Stonecutters cut it on stone 
 Woodpeckers peck it on wood 
 There's nothin' so bad fer a woman 
 As a man who thinks he's good! 
-  'Tain't so! 
-  'Tis too! 
-  'Tain't so! 
-  'Tis too! 
Oh, Enoch. Say you'll forgive me.
Please say you'll forgive me.
Leave me alone.
Leave me alone with my...
Shattered dreams.
They're all I have left.
- I got it.
- What?
- The knife.
- Oh.
Look, ain't it about time?
Sure. Hey, Nettie. Nettie!
- When do we start that treasure hunt?
- Right now.
Get your partners. Two men to each team.
You got half an hour to find the treasure and the winners can kiss any girls they like.
Billy? Billy!
Billy? Are you goin' with Jigger?
Don't you think that's foolish?
- Why?
- Well, neither one of you knows the island good.
- You oughta split up and each of you...
- Now look.
We're partners, see?
Let's go, Jigger.
 Stonecutters cut it on stone 
 Woodpeckers peck it on wood 
 There's nothin' so bad fer a woman 
 As a man who's bad or good! 
Julie!
Oh, Julie. It kinda makes you wonder, don't it?
Yes, it does, Carrie, and yet...
 What's the use of wond'rin' 
 If he's good or if he's bad 
 Or if you like the way he wears his hat? 
 Oh! What's the use of wond'rin' '
 If he's good or if he's bad? 
 He's your feller and you love him 
 That's all there is to that 
 Common sense may tell you 
 That the endin' will be sad 
 And now's the time to break and run away 
 But what's the use of wond'rin' 
 If the endin' will be sad? 
 He's your feller and you love him 
 There's nothing more to say 
 Somethin' made him the way that he is 
 Whether he's false or true 
 And somethin' gave him
The things that are his 
 One of those things is you 
 So when he wants your kisses 
 You will give them to the lad 
 And anywhere he leads you, you will walk 
 And anytime he needs you 
 You'll go runnin' there like mad! 
 You're his girl and he's your feller 
 And all the rest 
 Is "talk!" 
 Common sense may tell you 
- Billy? Billy!
-  That the endin' will be sad 
 And now's the time to break and run away 
 But what's the use of wond'rin' 
 If the endin' will be sad? 
 He's your feller and you love him 
 There's nothin' more to say 
You ain't gonna use the knife?
Nah. I told you it was just to scare him.
- What if somethin' happens?
- Uh?
- Something goes wrong.
- Ah.
Look.
Supposin' we die.
We'll have to come up before... Before...
Before who?
Before God.
- You and me? Not a chance.
- And why not?
What's the highest court they ever dragged you into?
Just police magistrates, I guess.
Sure. You never been up before a
Supreme Court judge, have you?
- No.
- It's the same thing in the next world.
For the rich folks, the heavenly court and the high judge.
For you and me, police magistrates.
For the rich, fine music and chubby little angels.
- Won't we have any music?
- Not one blasted note.
All we'll get is justice, and there'll be plenty of that for you and me.
Say. Come on. Let's play some cards.
It'll pass the time.
We'll play twenty-one. I'll bank.
What'll you bank?
I ain't got any money.
You can play on credit.
I'll deduct it.
- From what?
- From your share of the money.
If you win, you can deduct it from my share.
Bascombe'll have 3,000 on him.
That's what he usually brings to the captain, only tonight the captain don't get it.
We get it. 1,500 to you, 1,500 to me.
Go ahead and deal. I'll bet 50.
Make it 100.
Nothin'.
Twenty-one.
- This time, double or nothin'.
- Double or nothin' 'tis.
I got enough.
- Twenty-one.
- Are you cheatin'?
Do I look like a cheat?
- Say, you're a plunger, ain't you?
Yes, sir.
I'll take another.
Ah, too much.
- Uh, that makes 700 you owe me.
Double or nothin'.
- I'll stand.
- Twenty-one.
A natural.
Why you... You stinkin' crook.
You are cheatin' me.
- I oughta...
- Billy! Billy! Bascombe!
Go, go! The time! The time!
Excuse me?
Say, excuse me, sir.
Could you, uh, tell me the time?
Gimme that money and be quick!
- Look out. He's got a gun.
- Don't move, either one of you.
Drop that knife.
Ahoy there, on the Nancy B!
Captain Watson! Captain Watson!
Stop, you! There's another bullet in here for you.
Look behind you.
What do you see comin'?
- Two policemen.
- You wanted to know what time it was?
I'll tell you.
For you, it'll be 10 or 20 years in prison.
They ain't gonna put me in no prison.
Where do you think you're escaping to? The sky?
That's one of them.
The other one escaped up Maple Street.
Hey, you! Come on. Get up.
You all right, Mr. Bascombe?
Yes, Captain Watson.
- Yes, I'm all right.
- Come on. Come on. Get up.
Why, those fools.
Those silly fools.
They tried to rob me.
They didn't notice that I was comin' from the ship, not to it.
Say, this man's hurt bad.
He must have fell on his knife.
The money they tried to kill me for is locked up in your safe.
- Fools.
- You. Get a doctor.
Get somethin' to put under his head.
What's that?
Folks comin' back from the clambake.
 June is bustin' out all over 
- Stay back, please.
-  All over 
- I wish you'd go the other way.
- What happened?
We had an accident.
A man was hurt.
- Who is it?
- Billy Bigelow. Please go back.
- Billy Bigelow? Billy Bigelow was hurt.
- Billy?
Billy!
- Where is he?
- Please. Please stay back.
He's my husband!
Billy!
Billy.
Julie.
Little Julie?
- Yes.
- There's somethin' I wanna tell you.
I couldn't see anything ahead, and Jigger...
Jigger told me how we could get a hold of a lot of money, see?
And maybe... Maybe go to San Francisco.
Yes.
Tell the baby, if you want...
That I had this idea about San Francisco.
Yes.
Hold my hand, tight.
I am holding it, all the time.
Tighter. Still tighter.
Oh, Julie. Julie.
- Sorry, lady.
- Where is he? I must see him.
Oh, please. Please.
Sleep, Billy.
Sleep.
Sleep peaceful, like a good boy.
There's something I...
I never told you.
Scared you'd laugh at me.
I'll tell you now.
I love you.
I love you.
I love you.
Nettie.
What am I gonna do, Nettie?
What am I gonna do?
Do?
Why, you gotta stay here with me so I can be with you when you have the baby.
The main thing is to keep on living.
To keep on caring what's gonna happen.
Do you remember that sampler you gave me?
Do you remember what it says?
 When you walk through a storm 
 Hold your head up high 
 And don't be afraid 
 Of the 
 When you walk through a storm 
 Hold your head up high 
 And don't be afraid of the dark 
 At the end of the storm 
 Is a golden sky 
 And the sweet silver song 
 Of a lark 
 Walk on through the wind 
 Walk on through the rain 
 Though your dreams 
 Be tossed and blown 
 Walk on, walk on 
 With hope in your heart 
 And you'll never 
 Walk alone 
 You'll never 
 Walk 
 Alone! 
Mm-hmm, mm-hmm.
So, that's the way it was.
Yeah.
When you first got here, you had the right to go back for one day, and you didn't.
Wasn't there anything you wanted to do down there?
Yeah.
Yeah, I wanted to break Jigger's head.
As a matter of fact, it's still a good idea.
You won't find Jigger down there anymore.
- You mean he's here?
- No, no.
He didn't even get this far.
Hey, tell me. What do you got him doing?
That's not your concern.
Bigelow, you left your wife havin' a baby comin' with nothing to support 'em.
Why'd you do that?
I... I couldn't get work.
And I... I couldn't bear to see her... To see her...
You couldn't bear to see her cry.
Why don't you come right out and say it?
Why are you afraid to use the right words?
Why are you ashamed you love Julie?
- I ain't ashamed of anything.
- Then why did you beat her?
I didn't beat her.
- I hit her.
- Why?
Well, we'd argue.
She'd say this. I'd say that.
And she'd be right.
So I hit her.
Are you sorry you hit her?
I ain't sorry for anything.
Look, I told you before.
I ain't no special case.
If I can't go back, just say so.
I didn't say you can't go back.
No, but you didn't say I could either.
You're... You're just trying to make me sweat.
No, I...
I'm just trying to figure out what good you could do if I let you go back.
You know, your daughter's down there.
She's unhappy. She needs help.
My daughter?
My baby... Is a girl?
My baby's a girl?
No, she isn't a baby anymore.
She's 15 years old.
And she ain't happy, huh?
No, she ain't, Billy. She's...
You know, she's a lot like you.
That's why I think maybe you could help her.
Do you... Do you wanna take a look at her?
Could I... Could I see her from here?
Sure, you can, if you want to.
Nah. If she ain't happy,
I don't wanna look.
Well, right now, she appears to be having a fine time.
Yes, sir. There she is running along the beach there, got her shoes and stockings off.
- Like I used to do, huh?
- Yeah.
Don't you think you better take a look?
Well, what do I have to do to see her?
Just look and wait.
And the power to see her will come to you.
Is that her?
Pretty, ain't she?
My little girl, huh?
Let's go, Billy.
All right, Billy.
- Look, can she see me?
- Only if you want her to.
My father bought me my pretty dress.
My father would've bought me a pretty dress, too.
He was a barker on a carousel.
Your father was a thief.
Shame on you. Shame on you.
Shame on you. Shame on you.
- Shame on you. Shame on you.
- Oh, no.
- No!
- Shame on you. Shame on you.
Shame, shame, shame, shame!
Shame, shame, shame, shame!
I hate you.
I hate all of you.
Why did I have to look?
Poor kid. I know what she's going through.
Something like what happened to you when you was a kid, ain't it?
- What did I come down here for?
- To help her, ain't that so?
Come on.
Julie managed all right, I guess.
Yep, she had to.
She's got a lot of grit, Billy.
Come along, children.
Mr. Snow. Children.
- Morning, Mrs. Bigelow.
- Morning, Mrs. Bigelow.
Well, it's so nice to see you.
Won't you come in?
Thank you, no, Mrs. Bigelow.
Afraid we haven't time.
Just came by for my wife.
We have to stop at the minister's house on our way to the graduation.
I tell ya.
- Carrie, Carrie, we're waiting.
- Coming. I heard you.
You'll be to the graduation, won't you?
Well, of course I will. Louise is graduating too, you know.
- Carrie.
- Oh, I'm coming, Enoch. What's the rush?
I was telling Julie about that musical extravaganza we saw in New York.
 I'm a tomboy
Just a tomboy 
 I'm a madcap maiden from Broadway 
We also saw Julius Caesar. Ain't that a better show to tell her about?
Not for me. Why, I took one look at them men in nightgowns and went right to sleep.
Good-bye, Mrs. Bigelow.
Come along, children.
- Good-bye, Julie.
- Pa, can I stay and talk to Louise?
- No.
- Just five minutes.
- Let him.
- Very well. Five minutes, no more.
Still lollygagging.
You'd think a woman with nine children would have more sense.
If I had more sense,
I wouldn't have nine children.
Oh, Louise, your graduation dress is finished.
You won't forget to come in and have it fitted.
I won't forget, Mother.
Did you have a good time in New York, Enoch?
Oh, yes. We went to the top of the Statue of Liberty.
We went to the aquarium.
We went to all the theaters.
- Enoch. Come here.
- Huh?
- Can you keep a secret?
- Sure.
What's the secret?
I'm gonna be an actress.
There's a troupe coming through here next week.
I met a fella. He says he's the advance man or something.
- And he says he'll help me.
- You mean run away?
Shh.
I won't let you do it.
Well, how will you stop me?
I'll marry you. That's how.
- Will you, Enoch?
- Sure.
Of course it'll be a little hard persuading
Papa to let me marry beneath my station.
- But I'll do it.
- Beneath your station?
Don't bother persuading your papa about anything.
I wouldn't have that stuck-up buzzard for a father-in-law if you give me a million dollars.
You're a fine one to talk about my father. What about your own?
A cheap barker on a carousel.
He even beat your mother.
You get out of here, you sneaky little la-di-da. I'll kill you!
If I want her to see me, she will?
Little girl.
Louise.
Who are you? How would you know my name?
Somebody... Somebody told me you lived here.
I, uh...
- I knew your father.
- My father?
And I heard what that little pumpkin head said, and it ain't true, none of it.
It is true, all of it.
Did your mother tell you that?
No, but every kid in town knows it.
They've been throwing it up at me ever since I can remember.
I wish I was dead.
What did your mother tell you about him?
Well, she's told me a lot of fairy stories, about how he died in San Francisco.
She's always saying what a handsome fella he was.
Well, he was.
Was he really?
Well, he was the handsomest fella around here.
You really knew him, did you?
And he was handsome?
What else about him?
Do you know anything else good about him?
He used to tell funny jokes at the carousel. And he made people laugh.
Oh, did he? What else?
Look, I wanna give you a present.
I can't take presents from strangers.
My mother wouldn't like it.
I don't mean you any harm, child.
- I just wanna give you something.
- Don't you come any closer.
You go away. You scare me.
Don't send me away, dear, I... I just wanna give you a present.
Something pretty.
Something wonderful.
Psst.
What's that?
A star.
- Go away.
- Please, darling. I just want to help you.
Don't call me darling.
Let go of my hand.
Please, dear.
I just want to make you happy.
- Take it.
- No.
- Please.
- No.
- Please, dear.
- No!
Mother! Mother!
Failure. You struck out blind again.
All you ever do to get out of a difficulty is hit someone you love.
- Failure.
- Where is he?
- I don't want her to see me.
- Then she don't.
She looked like she saw me before I said that.
Oh, he's gone.
I didn't make it up,
Mother. Honest.
There was a strange man here, and he hit me hard.
I heard the sound of it, Mother.
But it didn't hurt. It didn't hurt at all.
It was just as if he kissed my hand.
Go into the house, Louise.
What's happened, Mother?
Don't you believe me?
I believe you.
Then why don't you tell me why you're acting so funny?
Oh, it's nothing, darling.
But is it possible, Mother? For someone to hit you hard like that, real loud and hard, and not hurt you at all?
It is possible, dear, for someone to hit you, hit you hard, and it not hurt at all.
Julie.
Julie.
 Longin' to tell you 
 But afraid and shy 
 I let my golden chances 
 Pass me by 
 Now I've lost you 
 Soon I will grow in the mist of day 
 And you never 
 Will know 
 How I loved you 
 How I loved you 
She took it, took the star.
Seems like she knew I was here.
Julie would always know.
- She never changes.
- Nope, Julie never changes.
But my little girl, my Louise...
- I gotta do something for her.
- So far, you ain't done much.
- I know, I know.
- Time's running out.
But it ain't over yet.
Look. I want an extension.
- I gotta see the graduation.
- All right, Billy.
Enoch Snow Jr.
Miss Louise Bigelow.
Our speaker this year is the most popular, best beloved man in our town,
Dr. Seldon.
He reminds me of that fella up there, that star keeper.
Yep. A lot of these country doctors and preachers remind you of him.
It's the custom at these graduations to pick out some old duck like me to preach at the kids.
Well, I can't preach at you.
I know you all too well.
I brought most of you into the world, rubbed liniment on your backs, poured castor oil down your throats.
I only hope that now
I got you this far, you'll turn out to be worth all the trouble I took with you.
I...
I can't tell you any sure way to happiness.
I only know that you've gotta go out and find it for yourselves.
You can't lean on the success of your parents.
That's their success.
- And don't be held back by their failures.
- Listen to him. Believe him.
It makes no difference what they did or didn't do.
You just stand on your own two feet.
The world belongs to you as much as to the next fella.
So don't give it up.
And try not to be scared of people not liking you.
Just you try liking them.
And just keep your faith and your courage and you'll turn out all right.
It's like what we used to sing every morning when I was a boy at school.
Maybe you still sing it.
"When you walk through a storm
"hold your head up high."
You know that one?
 And don't be afraid of the dark 
Believe him, darling. Believe.
 At the end of the storm 
 ls a golden sky 
 And the sweet silver song 
 Of a lark 
- I loved you, Julie.
-  Walk on through the wind 
Know that I loved you.
 Walk on through the rain 
 Though your dreams 
 Be tossed and blown 
 Walk on, walk on 
 With hope in your heart 
 And you'll never walk 
 Alone 
 You'll never walk 
 Alone! 
I will spend my whole life through
Loving you,
Just loving you
Winter, summer, springtime, too
You know I'm loving you
Loving you...
Glenda!
We're running out of beer, honey.
You better order some more from that Highway Beverage.
Oh, and where's the money coming from, Jim?
I haven't had a check from you in three weeks.
Tend to my publicity, Miss Markle.
I'll fret about the money.
Then you better start fretting and start getting.
When I say we'll get it, we'll get it. It takes time.
When you're mad, you're beautiful.
- I ain't mad.
- You're not beautiful, either.
Thank you, thank you, my cotton-chopping chums.
We're going to have more music for you in a bit, but now it's a pleasure for me to introduce the generous gent that's providing all this fuss and fancy for you and me, your good friend and mine, the next governor of this bountiful state, good old Jim Tallman.
Thank you, Tex, thank you.
Well, friends, I see that the county still hasn't paved your streets.
Now, you elect me your next governor and Delville will get paving faster than a frog on a hot rock.
Well, friends, we're not strangers, you and me.
I've been coming through here for years, telling you all about my fine reJuvenating elixir--
Tallman's Terrific Tonic.
And I'm here today, my friends, to tell you that I got a fine batch of that pepper-upper tonic for the state administration.
They're crying for it.
That's what they're doing.
With all the millions being poured into our great southland...
Hey, partner.
Fasten your seat belt.
I've got a bulletin for you.
You won't get paid this week.
I won't either.
Our loyal campaign contributors
Just ain't contributing.
Can you blame them?
Dig that clown.
His politics don't taste any better than his tonic.
Well, you're taking the blow rather placidly.
I'm practicing to be a philosopher.
If I had a rusty knife
I'd open a vein.
- Whose?
- Art Hawkins'.
He's breaking records at the State Lake in Chicago with my band, my arrangements.
Well, I made that band.
I created that sound.
Both: If I didn't get some tough breaks I'd still be on top...
...bigger than any man in the music business today.
Have I said it that often?
You're a fool, darling.
You always were.
Takes a fool to wear these clothes and play the tunes that clod wants.
Don't knock country music.
It's the voice of our nation.
Our nation should see a doctor.
Folk music's big and it's getting bigger.
If you ever get to the top again-- if, I say-- this is your route.
All you need is the right gimmick.
Gimmick? What gimmick?
I play a quarter-tone sharp and stomp my foot.
What else do I have to do?
If you were a girl,
I could tell you.
If I were a girl, maybe I'd get paid.
Oh, Tex, I didn't know this would happen.
I thought Tallman was a real crook-- that he'd get somewhere.
- A girl's entitled one mistake.
- Yes, but only one.
- I made mine years ago.
- Come on, honey.
Let's shake that medicine man and head for the big wheel.
We're big time, you and me.
You could find a gimmick for me-- a girl with your mind.
In case you forget, Mr. Warner, my mind is up here and you better get back up there.
The natives are getting restless.
I wish I were twins.
I'd have somebody to blame for this.
Fellas, will you take one of those cases and please put it in Mr. Tallman's car?
That black Job over there?
Over yonder?
Yes, ma'am.
Man, if I had me a car like this,
I'd get in it, take off and I wouldn't stop till I was someplace else.
Yeah,
I know what you mean.
Pretty good beat, huh?
Yeah.
Yeah, kinda.
- Wanna get up and dance for us?
- Me?
We could use a hometown touch to liven things up.
- Oh, I don't dance, ma'am.
- Then how about singing?
You want singing, he's your man.
He sings up a storm.
We could use a good storm about now.
He's Just kidding, lady.
I don't sing.
Just give this cat a guitar and stand back.
- Come on, don't be bashful.
- He's Just kidding you.
Come on over and listen to this.
Got some hometown talent here.
- Come on over and listen.
- ( music ends )
- You've got to hear this.
- He's gonna sing.
Hey, Tex, give this boy a guitar and let's hear him sing.
Up you go, Hopalong.
- So you sing, eh?
- I Just fool with it.
Hey, Skeeter, give Kadiddlehop here your ax.
Handle it easy.
I owe money on it.
They're all yours, buddy.
Teddy:
Come on, Deke, let's hear it.
Give him a little boogie-woogie.
That'll get him started.
Yeah, now go on, Deke.
Go on.
There's moon that's big and bright in the Milky Way tonight
But the way you act, you never would know it's there
Now baby, time's a-wasting
A lot of kisses
I ain't been tasting
I don't know about you but I'm gonna get my share
I've got a lot of living to do
A whole lot of loving to do
Come on, baby, to make it fun it takes two
Oh yes, I've got a lot of living to do
A whole lot of loving to do
And there's no one who I'd rather do it with-a than-a you
You're the prettiest thing
I've seen
But you treat me so doggone mean
Ain't you got no heart
I'm dying to hold you near
Why do you keep me waiting?
Why don't you start cooperating?
And the things I say are the things you want to hear
Oh, I got a lot of living to do
Got a lot of loving to do
Come on baby, to make it fun it takes two
Oh yes, I've got a lot of living to do
Well I've got a lot of loving to do
And there's no one who I'd rather do it with-a than you
And there's no one who I'd rather do it with
Than you.
Well, y'all got some right lively local talent in these parts.
Deke, that was great.
- You was the most.
- You and your big mouth.
Only thing it's good for is to keep your teeth in.
Tex: Once again I want you to meet our own singing sweetheart.
Sweet Susie Jessup.
All right, Susie.
Go to work.
Tex: Hey!
- What was the big idea?
- I liked him.
He's got something for the girls.
- You notice that crowd?
- Only the women.
Another chorus and they would have started throwing things.
Yeah, their door keys.
Hey-- where you going, cowboy?
- Lady, I'm not a cowboy.
- You're a whirlwind.
- How long have you been singing?
- Oh, I--
What's your hurry?
Look-- come on, Teddy.
We've got to get back to work.
Yeah, work. I told you he sings up a storm, didn't I, lady?
Get in, Teddy.
You're not going to run over me, are you?
Excuse me, ma'am.
I'm in kind of a hurry.
I can see that.
Dual carbs, electrical fuel pump, nice do-it-yourself Job.
What's your cam?
- Three-quarter race.
- What's she peak at?
- She does all right.
- You ought to install a tach.
- Tach costs money.
- Yeah, money.
I'm Glenda Markle.
You sure know your way around a car, lady.
You have to in my line of work.
I'm a girl.
How about a little demonstration?
Go on, cat. Show the lady what the car can do.
Yeah-- I already know what you can do.
Takes it a little while to warm up.
Doesn't everyone?
Glenda:
Crazy! Head back to earth!
Let's coast so we can talk.
- What's your name?
- Deke.
- Deke?
- Deke Rivers.
- Short for Deacon?
- I guess.
I like the way you sing, Deke.
You've got... something.
I don't know what it is.
Ever think of doing it for a living?
- Everybody thinks.
- Ever try?
Thinking and doing is two different things.
How much do you make delivering beer?
How much do you make doing what you do?
I'm a public relations counsel.
A press agent.
And I don't make enough to suit me. Do you?
Does anybody?
You're a hard one to talk to.
We better stop coasting.
Now, how'd you like to come with me--
- sing with Tex Warner's band?
- You'd pay me for that?
More than you're making now, and that would be Just to start.
I don't know. There was a guy in St. Joe, Missouri one time told me he'd pay me to sing in his show.
After I sung he run out on me and took my guitar with him.
- Then what more can you lose?
- A steady Job.
It's the first one I've had in a year and I'd like to keep it.
$1 8 a week in tips.
Made 26 bucks last week.
- What would your mother say--
- My mother's dead.
- Oh, I'm sorry.
- Both of them, a long time ago.
Then you're on your own?
Yeah, that's why I got to hang onto something steady.
Someday I'm gonna have a place of my own, like a farm.
This could be steady.
50 a week to start.
So why not start?
Have we got a deal?
I think I'll stay here, Miss Markle, but thanks anyway.
Why don't you think it over?
You've got till 8:00 tomorrow.
We'll be leaving from the hotel.
Operator, may I have the number of Highway Beverage?
I appreciate your vote and thank you for coming.
The pleasure is mine, madam.
Remember, a vote for me is a vote for-- Glenda!
Well, where have you been?
- So long, Jim.
- You going on ahead?
Way ahead.
This is goodbye and good luck.
Tex going with you?
You don't need him, Jim.
I do.
The only thing you need, young lady, is a little old-fashioned loyalty.
I'm loaded with loyalty,
Mr. Tallman.
But for the last couple of years it's been misplaced.
Line up whatever you can, Carl.
Anything.
You get the bookings and she'll get the publicity.
Call me tonight.
I'll talk to you later, Carl.
There's a court date in Longhorn he can book for tomorrow night.
Boy, did he flip when I told him you were coming with us.
- What's that?
- An agreement.
Between the party of the first part and the party of the second part.
Cut yourself in for a pretty big chunk.
I cut you in for a big chunk.
I've got the gimmick.
- Already? What is it?
- Sign the paper.
Huh-uh. I'm not going to sign that paper.
Look, let's get one thing straight at the start.
You want me, you can have me-- but strictly on a business basis.
And this time, I call the shots.
I handle the money.
Oh, honey, I wouldn't want to fight with you.
- You still haven't got it.
- Got what?
A gimmick.
And sign your right name--
Walter.
- Band member: Watch this one.
- Band member #2: Okay.
What a beautiful morning this is-- if we were in New York.
Skeeter, get that bus into Longhorn by 4:00.
Could make it by 3:00.
There's a road all the way.
- Hey, Susie? Button trouble.
- Sure, Barney.
This gives me something to do on the bus ride. I don't play cards.
- Anybody else? Socks--?
- All right, little mother.
Get your chicks in the car.
We're on our way.
You ride in the wagon with me.
We're not leaving without our gimmick.
Gimmick?
That's what you've been looking for, isn't it?
Right now I'm looking for it even harder than you.
I said 8:00. You're late.
That's no way to start a career.
I wasn't gonna come but I got fired this morning.
Somebody complained I was late making a delivery.
That's too bad, Deke.
Maybe it's all for the best.
- Y'all still want me to come?
- Us all sure do, honey.
Tex, you remember Deke Rivers.
- Hi.
- Hi. So this is your gimmick?
Meet Tex officially, Deke.
When you get to know him you'll love him.
But there's no hurry.
You're not putting that kid on the stage with my outfit.
You're right.
I'm not.
Come on, boys.
Let's get this show on the road.
It's 250 miles to Longhorn.
So long, Tex.
Hey, dawg, come here.
You want to go to Longhorn with me?
Susie:
...should have read
That detour sign
Should have read
That detour sign.
Thank you, Susie.
Thank you.
Now folks, we have an extra surprise for you all tonight.
They tell us one of Longhorn County's own has got a different way with the song.
And if we persuade the boy he'll come up here and do a little number for us.
So how about giving a big hand for Longhorn County's own Deke Rivers?
All right, let's have your little song.
Thank you, Mr. Warner.
Can I borrow your guitar?
Why sure.
Here you are.
I've never seen him before but he's cute.
Isn't he?
He works over in Little River.
I feel it in my leg
I feel it in my shoe
Tell me, pretty baby, if you think you feel it, too
Let's have a party
Ooh, let's have a party
Send to the store and let's buy some more
Let's have a party tonight
So, baby, paint your lips
And regulate your wig
And bring along a shovel if you really want to dig
Let's have a party
Ooh, let's have a party
Send to the store and let's buy some more
Let's have a party tonight
I've never kissed a bear,
I've never kissed a goon
But I can shake a chicken in the middle of the room
And have a party
Let's have a party
Send to the store, let's buy some more
Let's have a party tonight
Here we go, have a party
Tonight
Let's hear it for Claypool
County's own Deke Rivers.
Thank you, Mr. Warner.
Could I borrow a guitar?
Why certainly.
Skeeter, let him have your box.
Strings are on the outside, huh?
- You know Let's Have A Party?
- Band: Sure.
Okay, key of C.
Let's go.
Some people like to rock
Some people like to roll
But moving and a-grooving gonna satisfy my soul
Let's have a party
Ooh, let's have a party
Let's have a party
Send to the store and let's buy some more
Let's have a party tonight
I've never kissed a bear,
I've never kissed a goon
But I can shake a chicken in the middle of the room
Let's have a party
Ooh, Let's have a party
Let's have a party
Send to the store
And let's buy some more
Let's have a party tonight
The meat is on the stove, the bread is getting hot
Everybody come and taste the possum Papa shot
Let's have a party
Let's have a party
Send to the store
And let's buy some more
Let's have a party tonight.
We're gonna have...
A party tonight.
I don't want to be a tiger
'Cause tigers play too rough
I don't want to be a lion
'Cause lions ain't the kind you love enough...
I got a lot of living to do
Whole lot of loving to do
And there's no one who I'd rather do it with-a than you
Hot dog, my heart is gonna go insane
Hot dog, when you come walking off the train
Oh how lonely
I have been
But when that Santa Fe pulls in
Hot dog.
It's only 8 7 miles to Rodeo City so I'm making the Jump tonight.
- You keep up the good work.
- Hey, Deke.
- Yes, sir?
- Come here, will you, kid?
Now, Deke, the boys in the outfit,
Glenda, Susan-- we all think it's about time you stopped getting up out of the audience.
Beginning tomorrow you're starting right out on the stage with the rest of us.
And from now on, kid, you're not borrowing my ax.
Hey, Susie.
That's for you from Tex.
What--
From here on in, you're busting your own strings.
Okay, Ramblers, let's get to rambling.
- Hey!
- Hey.
- Where did you get that?
- Here, Monkey Ward's.
I bet you had to get there early before they were all gone.
- Susan helped me pick it out.
- Oh.
I thought you'd like it,
Miss Markle.
Sure I like it-- for streetwear.
But on stage,
I want them to see that face.
I am Just a lonesome cowboy
And I'm traveling all alone
I ain't even got a nickel
To call my baby on the phone
Band:
Ride, ride, ride
Just beyond the mountain lies a city
And I hear it calling me
Me...
Saddle up and ride, you lonesome cowboy
Here is where you'll find your destiny
Destiny...
In my dreams the lights shine bright and pretty
Near to me and yet so far
Will I always be a lonesome cowboy?
Glenda: Look at the women.
What's he doing to them?
If I were a girl,
I could tell you.
Ride, ride, ride
Ride along, cowboy
Cowboy, cowboy
Sing-a, sing-a, sing
Will I ever leave this lonesome valley?
Really see the lights that shine?
Gotta find what lies beyond the mountain...
- Singing too soft.
- No one's coughing.
Maybe they ran out of cigarettes.
I am Just a lonesome cowboy
And I'm traveling all alone
If you don't call me, baby
Then I'm never coming home...
What's your number, hon'?
I'll call you.
Then I ain't coming...
Home.
Congratulations.
Do you hear them?
Hear them? I liked to died, little girl yelled out like she did.
That's nothing to be scared of.
She Just got carried away.
I don't hear them yelling when Susan's out there.
That's the difference between us.
They really go for you.
Me they Just tolerate.
Oh, I'm on.
- Hey!
- Did it again, huh?
You dirty bird.
Man, I sure wish somebody would invent a birdcage that cleans itself.
I wish somebody would invent a guitar string I can't break, too.
- Glenda: Decent?
- No, come on in.
- Hi.
- Hi.
- Excuse us, Skeeter?
- Oh yeah, sure.
We were Just going to do a little housecleaning anyway.
Weren't we, Matilda?
If you really want a new shirt, Deke, try this one on for size.
- Did you buy this?
- Well, I don't sew.
I mean, you went out and--
That's real nice of you,
Miss Markle.
Can't you call me Glenda?
The sleeves are kind of long, huh?
Oh, not too.
Maybe Susan can take them in a couple inches.
Maybe she could.
Aren't you spending a lot of time with her lately?
Well...
Susan...
- well, I can talk to her.
- You can talk to me.
In school I got an A in conversation.
I know, but with you, ma'am, it's a little different.
- It's more business with you.
- Business?
Finding you was part of my Job for Tex.
Of course that doesn't mean
I'll always be here.
If he wanted to fire me tomorrow, that would be the end of it.
Well, that ain't likely to happen, is it?
It could.
Perhaps it's good we had this little chat.
I'm a a big one for a quick goodbye, I wouldn't have time.
Well, I'm not much on business deals, but I figure... that you and I should have some kind of an agreement.
So if Tex lets you go then I go, too.
Deke, I wasn't going to bring it up, but as long as you did...
I had this contract prepared.
Just in case.
Yeah, I know.
Mike Harris is the lawyer that typed it up back in Delville.
He told me.
Got a pencil?
It's not legal unless it's in ink.
I always feel so...
- safe when you're driving.
- Me, too.
The line that girl threw him tonight didn't hurt any.
No, it didn't hurt a bit.
I really think the kid's going to make it.
Put me right back in the money.
He's gonna get there fast.
- Don't lose him.
- Don't worry.
Hot dog, you say you're really coming back
Hot dog, I'm waiting at the railroad track
Hot dog, you say you're coming home for good
Hot dog, I'm going to keep on knocking wood
And baby,
I can hardly wait
I'm gonna meet you at the gate, hot dog
I fell in love with you and then you went away
But now you're coming home to stay
Hot dog, soon everything will be all right
Hot dog, we're gonna have a ball tonight
I've got a pocketful of dimes
It's gonna be
Just like old times, hot dog
You went away and every day was misery
But now you're coming back to me
Hot dog, my heart is gonna go insane
Hot dog, when you come walking off the train
Oh how lonely
I have been
But when that Santa Fe pulls in, hot dog...
Hot dog, I'm waiting at the railroad track
Hot dog, you say you're coming home for good
Hot dog, I'm gonna keep on knocking wood
And baby,
I can hardly wait...
Just stand over there and say you don't like him.
- That's all?
- That's all you want?
That's all. I'm testing a theory.
Ad-lib anything.
Just give them about two minutes.
- I think he's simply awful.
- What?
Dreadful. Just dreadful.
- Aw, what do you know?
- You squares.
Ladies, if you don't watch out,
I'll bust all your
Lawrence Welk records!
Here we go again.
Toss them in and win.
There's a winner.
How's about trying again, buddy?
- It's your turn.
- No, honestly Deke, I can't.
Go ahead, lady.
Your husband will show you how.
Husband?
Oh no, really Deke, you do it.
I don't know how.
It's easy. Just take it like this, back like this and throw it.
Try anything.
- See what I mean?
- Here, I'll show you.
Another winner.
How about trying again?
- Want to try some more?
- We got enough for one of those?
You got enough for a teddy bear and a baby doll, too.
What do you know?
Deke, Jr.
- All right, let's play.
- I bet two.
- I'm out.
- I raise five blue.
What do you think, Matilda?
We got enough to call him?
If that bird says anything
I'm going to have a midnight lunch of parakeet pie.
- Hi, fellas.
- All: Hi.
Deke, see the picture in the paper of the gals fighting over you?
Yeah, pretty wild, huh?
Skeet, Susan's got something for you.
It's for Matilda.
Deke won it at the fairgrounds knocking over milk bottles.
How about that?
A roommate.
Matilda's been lonely long enough.
What do you mean, lonely?
She's got me.
There ain't no feathers on you, Skeet.
He's right. Put the bird in the cage with Matilda.
He's a male.
Every female wants one.
From what it says in here,
Deke's Just about--
Come on, don't believe everything you read.
He's a tiger, that one.
Deke:
Knock it off.
Tex:
Hi, fellas.
- I'll stay.
- You're a thrill seeker.
Well, fellas, beat it.
You call me?
- Close the door.
- Gladly.
I Just spoke to Carl long distance.
These pictures paid off like a daily double.
We're opening Tuesday at The Grand in Amarillo.
- Amarillo, Texas?
- Uh-huh.
Oh, bless you, baby.
We've hit the city.
It's not Chicago or New York, but it's a city.
They have sidewalks.
Cops who wear shoes.
A city.
Oh, baby,
I knew you could do it for me.
You can be more grateful than that.
You know how grateful I can be.
Amarillo's a pretty big town.
We're sure to get good enough notices to hop to Fort Worth, then Dallas and it's only a step to St. Louis-- the Ambassador Hotel.
The Ambassador Hotel.
New York, Chicago. I'll be back on records, television.
Out of this riding habit into some stylish threads.
No more Tex.
I'll be Walter Warner again.
You're giving me too much credit.
I didn't do this for you.
It was Deke, kiss him.
Sure.
I appreciate the kid.
I love him.
He's going to be our featured vocalist.
Huh-uh-- the manager of The Grand is booking
Tex Warner and Deke Rivers.
I've got to split the billing with the kid?
- That's the way it's got to be.
- You mean--
- I, Walter Warner?
You, Tex Warner.
Oh.
Do at least get out of these clothes into some civvies?
You're going to go a lot further in cowboy boots than you ever went in patent leather shoes.
What's the matter with patent leather shoes?
I'm comfortable in patent leather shoes.
I like patent leather shoes.
Patent leather shoes make me feel... like anywhere I go
I've got a reservation.
I will not wear that Hopalong Cassidy suit.
- Tex, it--
- No.
Oh, it's for Deke.
If he's getting equal billing he's going to dress the part.
Whose idea is this split billing, theater manager's or yours?
Oh, stop.
Deke-- see you a minute?
Great news, we're opening at
The Grand Theater in Amarillo.
- Hey!
- Hey, I raise.
Deke, we've got a lovely flash for you.
The Grand, huh?
That's great.
Greater than you think.
Tell him, Tex.
Big things for you, kid.
You've going to have equal billing with me.
- Equal? You really mean that?
- Yeah.
Oh, gee thanks,
Mr. Warner.
- I hope I don't let you down.
- You're gonna be a smash.
May I have your undivided attention for a moment?
- Observe.
- What is it?
Your new outfit.
Think they'll be able to see my face?
Pretty stylish, huh?
Got that made up special.
I even had these boots embroidered special.
Yeah, we certainly did, didn't we?
Boy, this sure is fancy stuff.
- It's almost too special.
- You're special, Deke.
We were thinking about giving you a special name like Tab, or Rock or something like that.
What for?
I don't know, seems to me kids like these newfangled names.
What's wrong with Deke Rivers?
I like it, it's a good name.
- It's my name.
- Whoa, back off.
- Simmer down.
- Come on, he was Just Joking.
- Just don't Joke about my name.
- No, Rivers is a a fine name.
I used to know some Rivers in Minneapolis.
- Your family from Minnesota?
- No, sir.
Where are your folks, Deke?
Thanks for the billing.
Hope I deserve it.
What about your new outfit,
Deke?
You haven't told us if you like it.
I guess it's okay.
If it's what you want.
It's what you want that counts, Deke.
Let me go tell the rest of the boys we're all getting new outfits.
I don't think Susie will have to touch these at all.
Yes, ma'am.
Whatever you think.
You're about the only one that had faith in me, Miss Glenda.
And I'll do whatever you say.
All right then, take off your clothes.
- My clothes?
- And put these on.
Oh what's the matter?
Did I scare you, buddy boy?
Hey, Daisy.
Looky yonder.
Youth: Hey, is that the guy you were telling us about?
Daisy: That's him.
We got to get here tomorrow, kids.
Wait'll you see this guy, Wayne.
Why, he had them rocking and rolling in Jordan Crossing.
What do they know in the country, Daise? Come on.
- Hi, Frank. How are you?
- Sit down over there, Wayne.
- Hi, Daisy.
- Hi.
- Man, what a crazy ride.
- Well, I'm glad you stopped.
I'm gonna get some more ribs.
That rehearsing made me hungry.
Who ever heard of a cowboy band rehearsing five hours?
We're liable to start putting out a good sound.
- Hey, that's him.
- Him who?
Over yonder, Candy.
That's that Deke
Who-cha-ma-callit.
- You mean the one--
- Yeah, the one with the Jumping beans in his Jeans.
- Isn't he adorable?
- Adorable?
Somebody ought to cut a firebreak in his sideburns.
You ain't no Yul Brynner yourself, you know.
- Cut it out, Daisy.
- I'm gonna ask him to sing.
- No, you stay here.
- Get you.
Hey you guys, there's that rock and roll cowboy I told you about.
You want him to sing?
I'll get him to do it.
I hope we do as well in the city as we did in the small towns.
City's Just like a small town, only taller.
Hey you-- sideburns.
I got a chick down there who wants to hear you sing.
- I'm sorry, I can't--
- That's right neighborly, pops.
You tell the young lady that Mr. Rivers will do four shows a day right across the street starting tomorrow.
Prices don't change till 6:00.
She don't want to wait.
She wants to hear you sing right now. Don't you honey?
- Sure do.
- Come on.
I'm sorry, folks, I--
Why don't you come around the theater tomorrow afternoon?
We'll be on the stage.
You ain't gonna give me any static, are you?
Now I told my girl
I'd get you to sing.
Man can't go back on his word, can he, fella?
Look, maybe you didn't understand me, fella.
But Mr. Rivers doesn't sing in Juke Joints.
Why don't you run on back and drink your malted, huh?
Say, what's the trouble-- these show people starting something?
There's no trouble, sir. Do you mind if I sing a song for these folks?
He don't mind.
Do you, Frank?
No, no...
I don't mind.
- Go ahead, sideburns. Sing.
- Crowd: Yeah, sing.
Okay...
I'll sing.
I got a woman mean as she can be
I got a woman mean as she can be
Sometimes I think she's almost mean as me
A black cat up and died of fright
'Cause she crossed his path last night
I got a woman mean as she can be
Sometimes I think she's almost mean as me
Kissed so hard she bruised my lips
Hurt so good my heart Just flipped
I got a woman mean as she can be
Sometimes I think she's almost mean as me
Strangest gal I ever had
Never happy unless she's mad
I got a woman mean as she can be
Sometimes I think she's almost mean as me
Yeah
Yeah
She makes love without a smile
And ooh-- hot dog, it drives me wild
I got a woman mean as she can be
Sometimes I think she's almost mean as me
Sometimes I think she's almost mean as me.
- Well, you ain't bad, sideburns.
- And what do you do for a living?
I'm with my old man in auto accessories, why?
I usually get paid for singing as a rule.
I figured you ought to do whatever you do for me.
How about stepping outside and putting a new set of seat covers on my car, huh?
Why sure, sideburns.
What color you want?
I figure his color's yellow, don't you?
Get out of here.
I'm gonna kill this guy.
Get the police, quickly.
It's great.
It's simply great.
Well, seeing is believing all right.
I can't figure people out.
When I read about that fight
I thought we'd blown the whole booking.
Oh no, Deke was exonerated and the other kid was fined for starting the fight.
I couldn't have planned a better break.
Well, you've certainly capitalized on it, Glenda.
Oh, it was easy.
The fight headlines brought in the first packed house.
Excuse me.
Excuse me.
After that, Deke hung up the S.R.O. signs
- strictly on performance.
- I see what you mean.
Stage manager:
Step back, step back.
He's with me.
Mr. Warner's booking agent.
He'll be out to sign your programs and you'll all be very happy.
Those kids, they're giving us all fits back here.
Youth, it's not being wasted on the young.
Listen, I'm expecting a reporter from The Dallas Chronicle.
They're here now.
Why don't you go back?
Tex will be off soon.
I'm Glenda Markle.
You're early.
- I'm O'Shea, this is Ed Grew.
- How do you do?
How do you do? We got shots of the mouse pack outside.
Aren't they lovely little creatures?
It's hard to believe some day they'll all be grandmothers.
Except the boys.
Baby, let me be
Your loving teddy bear
Put a chain around my neck
And lead me anywhere
Oh let me be
Your teddy bear
I don't want to be a tiger
'Cause tigers play too rough
I don't want to be a lion
'Cause lions ain't the kind you love enough
I Just want to be
Your teddy bear
Put a chain around my neck
And lead me anywhere
Oh let me be
Your teddy bear
Baby, let me be
Around you every night
Run your fingers through my hair
And cuddle me real tight
Oh let me be
Your teddy bear
I don't want to be a tiger
'Cause tigers play too rough
I don't want to be a lion
'Cause lions ain't the kind you love enough
I Just want to be
Your teddy bear
Put a chain around my neck
And lead me anywhere
Oh let me be
Your teddy bear
Oh let me be
Your teddy bear
I Just want to be your teddy bear.
- Nice going, son.
- Hi, Mr. Meade.
Matilda's done something you've never done.
- She laid an egg.
- Well, how about that?
Wait till we tell Skeeter he's gonna be a grandpa.
Hi.
- Remember me?
- How'd you get in here?
I've been trying to make it for four days now.
Ever since the night you had that fight with Wayne.
- Remember, my boy friend?
- Look, miss--
Daisy. I'm Daisy Bricker.
You remember Wayne, my ex?
After what you did to him, ooh, what you've been doing to me.
- Three or four shows a day.
- I'm sorry.
- For four days.
- I have to ask you to leave.
My friends dared me to sneak in here and wait.
Oh...?
They said I wouldn't have the nerve to steal a kiss.
But I'm not afraid of anything.
And that's what I like about you.
You're not afraid of anything either. I can tell.
I'm gonna have to ask you to get out, Daisy.
You are afraid.
You don't sing scared, but you are.
You're a phony.
When you first met the boy, did you--
Before you ask any more questions, let's go back and meet Deke.
Fine.
Hey!
Who are you and what are you doing here? Get out.
What's the matter, lady?
You want to keep him for yourself?
Get out.
I would like to have one of those pictures.
And you're not a phony.
Her friends dared her to sneak in here.
Miss Markle was Just telling us how terrific you are.
Will you wait outside a minute, boys?
Sure. I think we got enough for a story.
I didn't know Daisy was in here.
Her friends dared her to sneak in.
That's how you're selling me, isn't it?
A monkey in the zoo, ain't that what you want?
If that's what I want, okay.
But if it's what you want--
Oh, forget it.
This kind of thing happens to performers all the time.
I came by to tell to you how great you were.
But I guess I didn't realize it myself... until now.
Hey, a one-man concert.
It's a good idea, Carl.
We'll sell out the Joint.
Freegate Civic Hall-- a tremendous place-- six, seven miles outside Dallas.
And be sure to have a cop on his dressing room door.
Okay--
Carl, fly to Dallas and sew it up.
We close here tomorrow.
I'm going with you. The boys can lay off four or five days, give me a chance to work.
This is important stuff--
- it's got to be handled that way.
- Anything in mind?
I've been brewing a thunderclap for a week now.
It'll take money, a lot of it.
But it'll be worth it.
If it's worth it, we'll get it.
What's the idea?
Okay...
I've got a rich oil widow dreamed up in Oklahoma City.
She's always wanted a son like Deke Rivers, someone to take care of, buy him things.
She knows he flips for cars, so she gives him one.
- A car?
- A custom built white convertible with red leather upholstery to match his red and white getup.
In spades.
Honey, this is no idea, it's a spectacular.
- Where do we get dough for that?
- We borrow on your life insurance.
He did hang on to that.
Tex: She made me pay it up
1 0 years in advance.
It's the only thing I've hung on to-- and my ulcer scars.
Deke's better than insurance.
That boy's an annuity.
It's a gamble.
A $6-8,000 dice roll.
Oh no, it isn't.
This is Just the kind of thing that will make front-page publicity.
And in a city as big as Dallas, they've got a front page as big as your feature,
Okay, you sold me.
I'll get in touch with Joe... the insurance agent.
Are you sure you can get the car ready in time?
We're in Texas, Tex.
This is the country they dreamed up those gorgeous go-devils for.
I'll see you at the hotel, Carl.
We'll take the 7:1 0.
See you, Tex, at the other end of the rainbow.
Tex, is... well, there's one more thing.
I don't think we're gonna need the trio behind Deke.
Better drop them-- and Susan.
Carl,
I can't let them go.
They're good kids, all of them.
Deke's a good kid, too, and he's selling the tickets.
Well, I can't fire Susie.
All right, I'll fire her.
I've been practicing for years to be a heavy.
I'm an agent.
Sit. I Just want to say goodbye.
Don't get scared.
I'm only going to Dallas for a couple of days.
I thought it was that quick goodbye you warned me about.
Not yet. We're setting up something truly big.
You Just watch yourself while I'm away.
You'll have a few days off so take it easy.
- I'll keep an eye on him.
- He doesn't need a governess.
He can't take care of himself.
Can't you, Deke?
- I'm learning fast.
- See you in a couple of days.
That Daisy character must have known something.
I got your message,
Miss Glenda. I'll take care.
- ( girls squealing )
- Now, girls, come on!
- When's Deke coming out, Mack?
- Deke is gone.
Yeah! Real gone.
When's he coming out?
He went out front about half an hour ago.
Come on!
All right, boys, you can come out.
- What a week we had.
- Three-day vacation.
I kind of hate to leave.
It's the whole week we've spent in a real theater.
- Yeah.
- Thanks to you.
What are you going to do over the lay-off?
See my folks.
I haven't been home in so long.
- Your dad's a farmer?
- One of the best.
You're not leaving tonight,
I hope?
Not till morning.
Why?
Deke, I'd like to talk, maybe have a bite together.
- It's kind of important.
- Sure.
I'll see you in the morning before I leave.
See you at the hotel, fellas.
Take it easy, Skeeter.
Girl: There he is!
Oh my gosh!
Girl #2:
Can I get your autograph?
Tex: Come on, girls.
Take it easy.
What does it say?
A one-man concert?
I'm kind of sorry you told me about it.
I won't sleep a wink.
I'm that scared.
Scared? Relax.
Learn to live with success.
Lady Luck is a lovely roommate.
Yeah, but it all seems to be happening so fast.
It's a funny business.
When it starts coming your way, it comes-- voom-- theaters, clubs, concerts, records, TV.
Maybe even movies.
I sure hope so-- at least,
I think I hope so.
Deke... got some doubts, haven't you?
Something you'd like to kick around with somebody?
- Well, Miss Glenda has been--
- I know. Glenda's a fine person, but there's some things a man has to talk over with another man.
You know, I like you,
Deke.
You're not like these punks you see around-- wise guys full of their own future, ready to spit in the first eye that doesn't light up to them.
You're a boy any man would be proud to have as a son.
More than that, we're real pals-- partners.
- Somebody to go places with.
- Thank you.
It gets rugged in a rattle like ours, with everybody dying to take a crack at you.
You know, it's easy to get to the top, but staying there-- ooh!
You're gonna need plenty of advice-- plenty of help.
Kinda figured that's what
I've been getting.
From Glenda?
She said about the same thing you're saying.
That's why we made an agreement with each other-- weeks ago.
Oh... that was smart.
I think so.
You know, Tex,
I signed a paper that she gets half of everything I make.
And she hasn't taken a dime from me yet.
Yeah, Glenda's a mighty fine person.
Waitress!
Brink me an empty glass, will you, honey?
Are you gonna drink that straight or on the rocks?
Straight. I've got the rocks in my head.
Good morning, boys. Don't you want to see the little lady off?
- Come in. Have some coffee.
- We'll have to hurry.
My bus leaves in 20 minutes, and there's only one to Farmingdale today.
If you miss it,
Deke will drive you home.
- Sure.
- 200 miles?
I'm not doing anything for three days.
- What will you and Skeeter do?
- See The Ten Commandments twice?
Why don't you drive her home? Seriously.
Saves Susie her bus fare.
Do you good to see some folks, see a farm.
- Farm, huh?
- You could stay a couple of days.
My folks would love to have you.
- What do you think, Skeet?
- I'm not your governess.
Susie:
There it is.
Deke:
Looks pretty from here.
I'm glad Tex had this idea.
So am I.
Follow the road around the hill.
Whose idea was it to send him to Farmingdale?
It was my idea. Up there they're not going to be taking pictures of him like that.
That's good publicity.
Tex:
I don't think so.
Where did you pick up that moral tone?
When did you start worrying about the kid's publicity?
I like him, I don't want to see you hurt him.
I bring him back from Susan's in that red and white custom Job--
- he'll forget all about this.
- I doubt it.
Can't fight sex with horsepower.
Who's fighting sex?
It's a healthy American commodity.
It sells Coke, cream, steam engines, shampoo, real estate and toothpaste.
It can sell singers, too.
And press agents.
I beg your pardon.
Now who's developed a high moral tone?
I'll tell you why I sent
Deke with Susan, that boy needs to be with a sweet kid
- that's nuts about him.
- What are you?
- A marriage broker?
- A realist, honey.
Deke's nuts about you.
Just mentioning your name
- and his eyes pop like bubble gum.
- Well...
Sir Galahad.
The fair Susan has been elected to save him from the wicked witch.
Go ahead, be flip.
Avoid the issue.
I won't avoid it.
You brought it up.
Let's get to the real point,
Mr. Galahad.
When did you find out
I signed the kid?
That hurts.
That really hurts.
When you stop bleeding, call for the car.
I'm gonna get Deke back here.
Just for the record... it's not the kid I want, it's you.
My head maybe full of tapioca, but I'm still in love with you.
I'll buy half of that.
Walter.
I'll get the car... first thing in the morning.
Oh?
- You want to buy the other half?
- Talk me into it.
Get out of here,
Joseph.
Deke: Jab with the left, that's it.
- More coffee, everyone?
- Hey, take it easy.
- Deke?
- No thanks.
- Where's Susan?
- She's by the corral.
Fetch her back, Deke.
- Deke: Hey, Susie!
- Hi!
Hi.
Did daddy teach you about contour plowing?
Yeah. Sure knows a lot about farming.
That's all he's done all of his life.
I guess if I had been a boy, that's what I would be doing instead of gallivanting about the country
- with a hillbilly band.
- I'm glad you're not a boy.
You think there are enough farmers?
No, not enough girls.
Come on, Deke.
Why, you've got more girls than you can handle.
If I didn't get out of the theater once in a while
I'd think the population of
America was female and under 20.
Ah...
They're customers.
Glenda isn't a customer.
Glenda's... well, Glenda.
Think a lot of her, don't you?
Don't you?
Tex and the band have started going places since she took over and brought you into the deal.
You'll make it for all of them.
- Ah!
- Like the concert in Freegate.
Deke Rivers in a one-man concert.
Not exactly.
There's Tex, the guys and you.
We're all doing it.
I'm not going. They let me and the trio go.
When they tell you that?
Before we closed in Amarillo.
I thought you knew.
I thought that's why you wanted to drive me home.
They never told me anything.
Look...
Susan...
I drove you home because well, I wanted to be with you.
Not only here, but I want you with us
- on the road wherever we go.
- They don't need me.
And you don't need me.
You're going to the top, and you're going alone.
I've been alone all my life.
I need somebody.
Hey!
When will we get that song
Deke promised us?
I will spend my whole life through
Loving you,
Just loving you
Winter, summer
Springtime, too
Loving you
Loving you
Makes no difference where I go
Or what I do
You know that I'll always be
Loving you
Just you and...
If I'm seen with someone new
Don't be blue, don't you be blue
I'll be faithful
I'll be true
Always true
True to you
There is only one for me
And you know who
You know that
I'll always be
Loving
You.
That was Just lovely, son.
Thank you.
I've never heard you sing that way before.
I never felt this way before.
Wow! The flying saucers have landed at last!
Hi!
- Hi.
- Hi.
Hello.
Hi, Susan.
- Hi.
- Hi, Deke.
- Where did this come from?
- Off the drawing board, and into your life.
It's all yours.
Mine?!
I hope you don't mind my barging in.
- I had to show Deke his present.
- We're glad to have you.
Ma, Pa, Miss Margo.
- How do you do?
- Nice to meet you.
- Sis and Buzzy.
- Hi, Sis and Buzzy.
You must be kidding,
Miss Glenda.
Why?
I don't understand.
Why?
Isn't it crazy?
When we were in Amarillo the widow of some oil man-- she wouldn't even give us her name, said that you gave her such pleasure, and sang like the son she and her husband wanted-- she gave you the car.
Here.
She wrote you this note.
I never heard of such a thing.
Either did anybody else, but they will.
We better get started for Dallas and get ready for Freegate.
- You Just got here.
- Surely not tonight?
I'm afraid we have to leave right away, Mrs. Jessup.
Better get your things,
Deke.
- Wanna give me a hand?
- Sure.
Kind of tough saying goodbye.
Never had much practice.
I'm Just as happy to stay home for a while.
Yeah?
I got something for you.
A key to the ride.
Just kind of... drive it once in a while, keep the battery built up.
Sure.
It's the first home the old car's ever had.
Sure makes it tougher to leave.
As long as you were coming along-- you know what I mean.
I'll be here.
I'll always be here.
Oh yeah?
See you.
You haven't said a thing in two hours.
What are you thinking about?
Well...
- it's funny.
- What's funny?
How can a person who's got no home be homesick?
Sometimes, Deke... sometimes it's better not to have a home... than to have the kind that I had.
Sometimes, Deke, it's better to have had nothing.
You never had nothing.
You don't know what it's like.
What were your parents like?
I don't know, ma'am.
I Just remember somebody soft and warm holding me a long time ago.
And the next thing I remember is that crack in the ceiling above my cot at the home,
Jagged like a cut of lightning in a summer electric storm.
Even after the lights were out
I could still see it.
Sometimes I'd lay there crying and then Miss Whipshaw would come in and say,
Be still, Tompkins.
Tompkins?
Want to know who Deke Rivers really is?
You want to see?
Let's go back about 40 miles to Ellen City.
Would you turn on your bright lights, please?
He was alone but for his friends who miss him.
I don't know any more about him than I do me.
Except he didn't have anybody either... except friends.
1 1 years ago, the night the home burned and everybody was milling around and yelling,
I ran away.
I ran all night and the next morning
I found myself in here.
I was all alone.
And the one thing
I needed was friends.
I knew I never wanted to go back to that home.
So I buried Jimmy Tompkins and took on Deke's name.
And I figured on taking on his friends, too.
And ever since,
I've been running.
Running and stumbling and crawling, looking for a friend... trying to deserve this man's name.
Deke.
It's nothing to cry about.
I Just brought you here so you'd know.
I finally feel that I've found friends.
I'm liable to deserve the name Deke Rivers.
Deke, I...
Let's go.
- Thank you...
- You wanted me?
Yes.
Deke Rivers.
I understand.
Well, we'll-- thank you, ma'am, for calling.
That's the fifth call
I've had from Freegate.
Your piece on Deke Rivers has started something.
You'd better get down there.
Sounds like the irate ladies of the town
- are stirring up a story.
- I'll get right on it.
Mrs. Gunderson, why don't you act as spokesman--
I've already been to the press, and now I'm telling you,
Mr. Mayor, we mothers here in Freegate refuse to allow our daughters to be corrupted by this--
Ladies, please.
Ladies! Ladies!
Please!
Let's act like gentlemen.
This is fine.
I'll meet you backstage.
I don't want your fans seeing you with any female under 60.
They'll think you're cheating on them.
You want me to pull up to the theater dressed in these?
That's part of the build up.
The Civic Hall is around the corner.
Good luck.
What kind of a town is this?!
- You can't do this!
- I'm sorry.
I've got my orders.
There's nothing I can do.
We had a complete sellout.
I want to know who's at the bottom of this.
Oh, go see the Mayor.
Stand back!
You all will get your money back.
Deke!
- What's going on?
- Come on and sing.
- Don't let them do it.
- What happened?
We're coming, kid.
Somebody blew something.
Let's get out of here.
Hey, wait for me.
Let's go.
Come on.
Deke! Deke!
This would make a great follow-up
- to my pieces on the kid.
- Thanks, O'Shea.
You want publicity, don't you?
Well, you're getting it.
Yeah, I'm getting it.
This is so good
I'm ashamed for not having planted it.
By the time I get through with this demonstration, your front page won't be big enough to handle it.
I tell you, it's a natural,
Harry.
And you've got the ground floor on the kid if you act fast.
Otherwise, I'll take it to another network.
But setting up a telecast from Freegate, Texas--
I can't greenlight a thing like that now.
Let me-- let me get back to you tomorrow.
That's too late.
This is a legitimate four-star event.
A real issue-- freedom of speech.
All right, call me back tonight. Bye.
Who is it?
Just ole Tex.
You're Just in time to buy me a drink.
- We're celebrating.
- Not so fast.
I had a long talk with Mr. Rivers.
What's the matter with him?
Well, ma'am, he Just ain't happy.
Ain't happy at all.
This ruckus down at the Civic Hall, the kind of pictures they've been putting in the papers, this talk that's going around.
Deke figures he'd be happier
Jockeying a tractor at the Jessup place.
He's about to quit,
Glenda.
- He can't--
- We've already done that bit.
Blew my top all over the place.
Gave him all the lyrics-- loyalty, gratitude... money.
I was sailing when all of a sudden...
All of a sudden, what?
That kid's eyes snapped on-- lit up a deep, dark cellar in a place we call my soul.
Huddled down, way down there in a corner,
Just barely alive, was an old conscience of mine.
Family heirloom.
You packed his bag for him,
I suppose.
A fine time for you to hit the glory road.
I Just lined up a television shot to tell Deke's story coast-to-coast.
- You better cancel it.
- You realize the work
I've put in, you've put in, that's about to pay off?
No, sir,
Mr. Warner.
Mr. Rivers isn't going anywhere.
And... if you need me
I'll be in the bar rehearsing my drinking.
Aren't you gonna pack your guitar?
It's yours now.
Tex told you, huh?
I'm not the only one that goes in for the quick goodbye.
But I didn't know how to tell you.
I know how you feel about everything.
Do you?
How do I feel?
- About everything?
- What do you mean?
How do I feel when you go to Tex and tell him you're walking out, not to me?
I guess I couldn't face you... not after all the hard work.
I couldn't.
Thanks for that much anyway.
What's been happening to me?
I've been changing every minute.
All this fake and phony... the clothes I've been wearing, the car I've been driving.
What's phony about that?!
You've made something of yourself.
I don't like what I've made.
That's where I'm going.
Going where?
Back to Woodbine Cemetery to start over?
I never meant for anybody to say I'm--
It sounds like folks ought to be ashamed
Just listening to me sing.
What you're really saying is...
- it's all my fault.
- Oh no.
You've been wonderful to me.
That's why I feel so bad.
- I've let you down.
- No, Deke.
No, you haven't.
You tried to help me.
You knew how it was with me, crawling all my life because
I never knew my folks.
You made me think
I don't have to run anymore.
But tonight showed me it ain't so.
I'm scared again.
Real scared.
Running and crawling scared.
You have no reason to be scared.
Not anymore.
I'll help you.
You'll be all right.
You cannot blame the behavior of young people or old people on music.
You were the same people doing the Charleston and the Black Bottom
20 years ago.
30 years ago, people were alarmed at what they thought Jazz was doing to the country.
Some of our leading magazines were printing articles like,
Is the Jazz the plot of disaster?
Unspeakable Jazz must go.
Does Jazz put the sin in syncopation?
You're adopting the same attitude toward rock and roll because your kids use it to let off steam.
And it goes back beyond Jazz.
When Debussy's
Afternoon of a Fawn and Stravinsky's Rites of Spring were first performed, there were riots in the streets of France.
That don't prove anything.
There are always riots for one reason or another.
The point is, this is nothing new.
Let me do a little flag waving, gentlemen.
One of the things that makes America great is the right to a fair hearing, yet you've condemned
Deke Rivers without it.
You have no idea how many phone calls we've received here at the City Hall.
Just look at all these wires.
Still condemned without a hearing.
The name of your city is Freegate.
How about living up to its name?
We've got a coast-to-coast telecast set up to go tonight from your Civic Hall.
You've got a chance to make Freegate an important community in that half-hour.
Are you going to miss that chance?
Mr. Shelton wants to know if he'll have to wear makeup.
I'll put it on personally.
Thank you, Mr. Mayor.
Thank you, gentlemen.
Do you realize something?
I Just fought City Hall.
City Hall isn't so tough.
I found our fearless leader.
Well... you really did rehearse your drinking.
Yeah. Funny, too... after the first five shots, it all came back to me.
You better struggle down to the barbershop across the street and have yourself restored.
I wouldn't want Harry Taylor seeing you like this.
- What's he doing here?
- Flying in for the telecast.
- We're on at 8:00.
- What about Deke?
What about him?
He's the star of our show.
You better get yourself cleaned up.
You've got a long rehearsal.
How did you change his mind?
We took a nice long drive in that nice long car, and had a nice long talk.
I've got a million things to do.
See you later.
She's quite a gal.
Yeah. Always was.
I don't understand.
Last night when I left Deke, he was packed.
Couple hours later, he comes back after that ride and he's nine feet tall.
I don't know how she does it.
I have a pretty good idea, though.
Well, let's get down to that barbershop.
Maybe I'll get lucky and he'll cut my throat.
Phil, can we get this dish set up first?
Are you expecting a car from Transplains Airlines?
Yeah, sure am.
- Pull up back here.
- Right.
Bob, the kid's hot rod is here.
- Deke?
- Yeah?
Hit it harder all the way through.
You have 1 4 men in the band and the Jordanaires working up a storm behind you, so come on like a truck of turkeys.
Sure. Okay.
Hey.
Are you sore at me about something?
I got a lot on my mind, that's all.
Glad to see you decided to stay.
You know, Susan'll be on the show.
Is that why you stayed?
Not exactly. It will be nice seeing her.
How come you did change your mind?
It was on account of Miss Glenda.
You know what, Tex.
I never realized how much
I meant to her last night.
Take a tip from somebody who's been there-- watch your self in the clinches.
Hey!
I'm afraid
I don't get you.
It's simple.
You're on the hook.
- I'm off it.
- Wait a minute.
Sit down.
Was there something between you and Glenda?
A little.
We were engaged once.
Didn't work out.
We got married.
That didn't work out either.
We got divorced.
- You and Glenda married?
- It didn't work out.
We got divorced.
Funny...
Divorce hasn't worked out either.
After last night, maybe it will.
Hey, wait a minute.
I don't know what to say.
Last night she acted like... like I meant a lot to her, like I was the only one that did mean anything.
You do, kid.
You mean her whole future.
Blew my chance.
Maybe you'll have better luck.
This show comes off the way she planned it, and you're on your way to New York.
That'll be all right.
I'll run over
Mr. Warner's lines with him.
Check the cue cards on the Jessup girl, the mayor and the others.
- What about Rivers?
- He'll be all right.
He's only got one line before his song.
I want to run over your lines.
- Say, Tex--
- Excuse a moment, gentlemen.
I have a few lines I want to run over with you.
But, baby, the show's about to go on.
There's always a minute for old friends and lovers.
You'll have all the minutes you want after the show.
Harry's so pleased with the way you look.
Of course I'm pleased with you myself.
What's the matter?
I was trying to figure out something
- I could say to your face.
- What?
- What does that mean?
- I never really thought of myself as your ex-husband until now.
I'm starting to enJoy the thought.
You're playing a score
I never heard.
All right, I'll give you the lyrics.
Deke Rivers is on cloud nine because of you.
I always knew you'd go far to get what you want.
Last night you really went.
What did I do last night?
He must have misinterpreted something--
There are some things not open to misinterpreting.
I want to get back on top, but not this way, baby.
- I've had it with you.
- Listen, Tex!
All right, I'll play your show for you.
- Then I'm going tonight.
- No!
Do you realize what you're accusing me of?
I didn't. I swear to you.
You would have if you had to.
I let him kiss me.
Was that so wrong?
He needed reassurance he's not alone in the world.
Reassurance? Is that what they're calling it now?
Why do you make it so difficult for me to love you?
Love?
If I didn't love you, why would I knock myself out on these whistle stops, when I could be writing my own ticket on Michigan Boulevard or Madison Avenue?
I don't buy that.
You could have helped me months ago if you wanted to-- without Deke, before Tallman.
You know I'd have straightened myself out.
People would have believed you if you'd have told them.
All right... you asked for it.
I did tell them.
I told everyone from New York to
San Francisco who could have helped.
But they didn't want you.
Nobody wanted you.
I'm sorry.
You've got to believe me about Deke.
Why?
Where's Miss Markle?
Her star's gone.
Deke? Well, now...
Mr. Taylor, Rivers Just took off in that hot rod.
I might have known it. Anything you're mixed up in, Warner.
I'm Just looking for a nose to hang one on.
- Don't volunteer yours.
- Stop it, you've got a show to do.
What show?
Where's your star?
Ad-lib around the other people.
I'll get Deke back here.
What happened here?
What went wrong?
Don't you know, Taylor?
It's the Warner curse.
- Miss Markle, he headed north.
- Thanks.
This is Freegate, Texas, a town that dedicates itself to the American ideal of freedom.
A town that tonight is asking America to help it Judge its own Judgment.
It was here that a young, hitherto unknown entertainer made local headlines only two days ago.
I think that Deke Rivers should be allowed to sing anywhere that he pleases.
I think it's pretty silly to say that his performance has any kind of influence on kids or anybody.
You know, what grown-ups mean is that they don't like the same things we like, so we have no business liking them.
Gosh, I've listened to some of the singers my folks are crazy about, and--
I sure wish their folks would have a little talk with them.
From the day he come to town, we all took a liking to him.
He was a good worker, too.
My boss was sorry to have let him go, but Mr. Warner needed him so bad that he knew he'd be better off singing than working in a store.
All of us back in Delville are proud of the success he's made.
Those stories in the paper aren't all true.
I sneaked into Deke's dressing room on a dare, that's all.
He had nothing to do with it.
I really didn't want to start anything.
It was Just a show-off kind of thing.
- Deke, are you all right?
- Yeah, I'm all right.
You're a regular bloodhound, aren't ya?
Deke, please, I've had enough for one night.
Just tell me one thing-- where did you think you were going?
If I can lie like you, maybe I can answer.
Okay.
I guess it's time I straightened out the books with you, too.
You can have the truth.
You see that car?
Tex hocked his life insurance to buy it. There is no oil widow.
The pictures in the paper, the kids fighting over you--
I started it all.
I even had you fired in the first place so you'd come with us-- that's my Job.
Why didn't you tell me this last night?
Last night I still had Tex.
And whatever I let you believe was part of my Job, to make it worth something to us and to yourself.
You been telling me one lie after another from the beginning.
One thing I didn't lie about,
Deke, is your future.
It's waiting for you on that stage in Freegate.
You don't need my help anymore.
You're about to make it on your own.
It's not my future you're interested in, it's yours.
It's what I can do to help you.
You don't care about me or about Tex,
- or about anybody but yourself.
- You've got to go back, Deke.
Stop running. All your life, you've been looking for somebody.
For Mama.
It's time you realized that Mama's never going to come.
Grow up, Deke. You've got a Job to do, to do alone.
Here's your contract.
I don't even want half of it.
The only one you owe anything to now is yourself... and Susan, or somebody like her.
You've got 1 5 minutes to get on that stage and find out if you've even got a future.
I guess he was always kind of scared and shy-- except for when he was singing.
He sort of covered up his feelings with his songs.
What are we gonna do now? Her spot's supposed to lead into his.
A whole 30 minutes around a guy who doesn't show.
I'm gonna tell you the truth about something.
And this isn't written in the script.
Deke Rivers isn't here tonight.
He ran away.
They're out looking for him now, but they'll never find him.
And I shouldn't wonder what-- some of the stupid things they've been saying and printing about him.
- He's here!
- Announce! Announce!
Announce! Announce!
America, Judge for yourself.
Ladies and gentlemen...
I don't even know if I'm worth listening to or not, but, well, I'm certainly grateful for the chance...
'cause there's someone here tonight that I've got something very important to say to.
I Just want to say that--
I think she'll know.
I will spend my whole life through
Loving you
Just loving you
Winter, summer, springtime, too
Loving you
Loving you
Makes no difference where I go or what I do
You know that I'll always be loving you
Just you
And if I'm seen with someone new
Don't be blue
Don't you be blue
I'll be faithful,
I'll be true
Always true
True to you
There is only one for me
And you know who
You know that I'll always be
Loving
You.
Here, Skeet-- now you're a bandleader.
Oh, Deke--
Deke, I do know.
You've shown me, now show them.
Okay.
- Tex--
- They made you all head-- no heart, Just head.
Congratulations.
- What are you doing?
- The kid's a hit.
I kept my promise--
I played your show, now I'm gonna keep my promise to me.
- I need to tell you something.
- Drop me a postcard.
Listen to me for a minute.
Oh, yes, I've got a lot of living to do
I've got a lot of loving to do
Come on, baby, to make a party takes two
Oh, yes, I've got a lot of living to do
I got a lot of loving to do
And there's no one who I'd rather do it to than-a you
So I got a lot of living to do
Well, I got a lot of loving to do
Come on, baby, to make a party takes two
Oh yes, I've got a lot of living to do
Well, I got a lot of loving to do
And there's no one who I'd rather do it to than-a you
There's a moon that's big and bright
In the milky way tonight
But the way you act you never would know it's there
Now baby, time's a-wasting
A lot of kisses
I ain't been tasting
I don't know about you but I'm gonna get my share
Oh, I got a lot of living to do
I got a lot of loving to do
Come on, baby, to make a party takes two
Oh yes, I've got a lot of living to do
Well, I got a lot of loving to do
And there's no one who I'd rather do it to than-a you
And no one
I'd rather do it with
Than-a you.
As soon as the kid comes off, we've got business to settle.
Settle it with Deke, Harry.
I tore up our contract.
There's a heart there, after all.
Thanks a lot, everybody!
Miss Glenda...
Miss Glenda...
I would like you and Tex to take over and handle things for me.
If it wasn't for you,
I wouldn't even be here, and I'd like for us to stick together.
Even after--
All I know, ma'am, is that you and Tex and... and Susan are all what I've been looking for.
Friends.
You proved that tonight.
Well, all right, friends, shall we go inside and get on with the contracts?
I'm in a position, my boy, to offer you a deal that I think...
Glenda, before we start, this is the way I see it.
We don't do guest shots-- we start with our own show.
Whoa, boy.
You're getting that old feeling.
I am, huh?
Please, don't let anything spoil it this time.
Promise me, Walter?
Lady-ma'am, Just call me Tex.
I think we'll have to wait a little while.
My managers are negotiating a deal of their own.
If you'll excuse us,
Mr. Taylor,
I think this is one deal
I can handle by myself.
Once in the Highlands
The Highlands of Scotland
Deep in the night on a murky brae
There in the Highlands
The Highlands of Scotland
Two weary hunters
Lost their way
And this is what happened
The strange thing that happened
To two weary hunters
Who lost their way
Brigadoon
Brigadoon
Blooming under
Sable skies
Brigadoon
Brigadoon
There my heart
Forever
Lies
Let the world grow cold
Around us
Let the heavens
Cry above
Brigadoon
Brigadoon ln my valley
There'll be
Love
Come all to the square
Come all to the square
The market square
The market square
Salted meat l'm sellin' there
'' At the square, laddie''
Come ye to the fair
Ale for sale or barter there
'' At the square, laddie''
Ale for sale or barter there
'' At the square, laddie''
Come all ye down
Ye in the town
Come ye from the hills
'' Woolen cloth l'm sellin' there at the square, laddie''
Come ye from the mills
Come all ye there
Come all ye there
Come ye to the fair
'' Come ye, all ye''
Everywhere to the fair
Come ye from the hills
Come ye from the mills
Come ye in the glen
Come ye bairn
Come ye men
Come ye from the loom
Come from pail and broom
Hear ye everywhere
Don't ye ken
There's a fair
Down on MacConnachy Square l'm sellin' a bit of milk and cream
Come sip it and ye will vow
That this is the finest milk and cream
That ever came out a cow
Though fine as it is the price is small
With milk an' the cream alack
There's nothin' to do but sell it all
The cow will not take it back
Come all ye there
Come all ye there
Come ye to the fair
Now all of ye come to Sandy here
Come over to Sandy's booth l'm sellin' the sweetest candy here
That ever shook loose a tooth l eat it myself and there's no doubt
'Tis creamy and good and thick
'' So, laddies, l hope you'll buy me out''
'Tis makin' me kind o' sick
Come ye to the fair
Come ye to the fair
Come ye in the glen
Come ye bairn
Come ye men
Come ye from the loom
Come from pail and broom
Hear ye everywhere
Don't ye ken
There's a fair
Down on MacConnachy Square
Let me see that map again.
Let's see.
Here's Auchindale.
''As l remember, that should be on the left, and l don't remember.'' lt is.
Here's Braekirk.
Should be on the right.
-Then where the devil are we?
-What's in the middle?
-Nothing.
-That's where we are.
-Nothing?
-Yep.
For a fellow of my potentialities... this is an ideal location.
We'll find our way out when the mist clears.
Must be depressing to be a bird... and know the hunting season is on.
''The way you aim, the birds have nothing to worry about.''
Yeah? Watch.
Wait a second.
That isn't a grouse.
Fine couple of game hunters we are.
''We come here from New York, and the first night out, we get lost.''
Maybe we took the high road instead of the low road.
''-Like a drink?
-No, thanks.''
Good. That leaves more for me.
You told me you were gonna cut down.
''Yes, l did, but l'm a terrible liar.''
''Besides, it doesn't pay.'' l remember l was going with a wonderful girl once... and she used to plead with me to give it up.
''So, one day l did.''
''We discovered we had nothing more to talk about, so we broke up.''
There's something about this forest... that gives me the feeling of being in a cathedral.
''lf we were, l'd know where the exit is.''
''-You don't believe in anything, do you?
-Of course l do.''
Really? What?
Practically anything l can understand.
Anything that's real to me.
''Things l can touch, taste, hear, see, smell and swallow.''
What about the things you don't understand? l dismiss 'em.
''Makes it very easy, doesn't it?''
''Comfortable, anyhow.''
-l envy you.
-Why?
You seem so satisfied. l am. Aren't you?
''No, l'm not.''
That's the silliest thing l ever heard.
You've got a fine job and you're engaged to a fine girl.
You're lost in a fine forest.
What more do you want? l don't know.
Something seems wrong.
Especially about Jane and me.
That makes everything seem wrong.
Look how l postponed getting married. l can't get myself to that altar.
Don't you love her?
You did when we left New York.
Sometimes l think l'm really not capable of loving.
Sometimes l think nobody is anymore.
That's nonsense.
Don't start talking yourself into an inferiority complex.
-You don't deserve it.
-What do you mean?
Most of my friends who have an inferiority complex are right.
They're not as good as everybody else.
''But you-- young, dashing, loaded.''
Hey. Look at that.
-lt looks like a village.
-lt is. l thought you said there were no towns on the map around here.
''-l did. You wanna see the map?
-No, l believe you.''
Let's go down.
There must be people down there.
They must eat food.
That's what we're interested in.
Funny it isn't on the map.
Maybe they don't like publicity.
Jean. Jean!
-Come away from the window.
-l'm tryin' to see Charlie.
''l know you are, and you're not supposed to.''
'Tis bad luck to see the groom before the weddin'.
Put the clothes in the chest.
Do you think he's glad he's marryin' me... or do you think he's beginnin' to regret it?
''Well, if l see him...'' l'll ask him.
''Now, hurry up.''
''Father, how did ye feel when Mother agreed to marry ye?'' l didn't propose to her.
She proposed to me.
Didn't it make you happy?
''Aye, her good judgment pleased me highly.''
''Fiona, you'll be sure to see Charlie and tell him...'' to come over to sign the family Bible.
''-Aye, Father.
-l'm off to see Mr. Lundie.''
Attend to the marketing.
Buy everything that's needed for the weddin' supper.
''-Aye.
-But remember, just what's needed.''
My aim for this occasion is to be hospitable... not philanthropic.
When you gonna think about marriage for yourself?
When l find someone who makes me think of it.
You've never met anyone up 'til now that made you think of it?
''No, not as yet.''
Doesn't that worry you?
''Aye, a little...'' but l'm not gonna let it worry me into marryin' the wrong one.
Many a lassie as everyone knows'll
Try to be married before 25
So she'll agree to most any proposal
All he must be is a man and alive l hold a dream and there's no compromisin' l know there's one certain laddie for me
One day he'll come walkin' o'er the horizon
But should he not
Then an old maid l'll be
Foolish ye may say
Foolish l will stay
Waitin' for my dearie
And happy am l
To hold my heart
'til he comes
Strollin' by
'' When he comes, my dearie''
One look and l'll know
That he's the dearie l've been wantin' so
Though l'll live 40 lives
'Til the day he arrives
'' l'll not ever, ever grieve''
For my hope will be high
That he'll come strollin' by
For you see l believe
That
There's a laddie weary
And wanderin' free
Who's waitin'
For his dearie
Me
What do you do while you're waitin' around
For your lad to come your way
'' Well, when no one is lookin'''
You kneel on the ground
And you pray and pray
And pray
But when lassies sit and have no men
'' Oh, how long becomes the night''
But l fear the night is longer when
The lad's not right
Waitin' for my dearie ls sweeter to me
Than wooin' any laddie
On the lea
Dreamin' of your dearie
And idlin' the day
That's how l am
And how l'll always stay
Though l'll live 40 lives
'til the day he arrives
'' l'll not ever, ever grieve''
For my hopes will be high
That he'll come strollin' by
For you see l believe
That
There's a laddie weary
And wanderin' free
Who's waitin'
For his dearie
Me
''Good mornin', Fiona!''
Thanks.
''-Good mornin', Miss Fiona.
-Good mornin', Mr. Beaton.''
-Good day.
-What would you be lookin' for?
A waistcoat for my father for the weddin'.
''Of course. Jean and young Dalrymple are gettin' married today, aren't they?''
''lf she had to choose someone other than my son, Harry...'' l'm glad 'twas a lad as fine as Charlie.
Would you have a waistcoat of this that would fit him? l think so. l'll have Harry run over to the house and see.
''Friends, your attention, please!''
This is the second day of our blessing... and so to remind ye...
Mr. Lundie has drawn up a map of our town... and asked me to hang it in the public square here... where ye all can see it and be reminded.
''Now, the boundaries of our village are:''
''To the east, the bridge.
To the west, the old kirk road.''
''To the north, the stone fence at the edge of the forest...''
''and to the south, Loch Harold.''
Let no one cross... or we shall be ungrateful before God... and night shall fall upon us forever.
The second day of whose blessin'?
'Tis for certain not mine.
-l'm truly sorry.
-Do not be.
''lf anyone's goin' to pity me, let it be me.''
'Tis not fair for Charlie Dalrymple to be weddin' her.
He's got everything-- school in Edinburgh and now Jean-- and l've got nothing.
Nothing but to be trapped in this peasant village all my life.
Look at it.
The boundaries of a town?
Not to me.
'Tis more the dimensions of my jail.
''Hey, sonny, could you tell us where we could get some breakfast?''
That kid's gonna have problems when he grows up.
Pardon me. Could you tell us where we could find a local inn?
What is this? ls there a place around here where we could get some breakfast?
''-l do not know, sir.
-What do you know? lt talks.''
What's the name of this town? l do not know.
You'll have to excuse me.
You're in Brigadoon.
-Good morning.
-Good morning.
You must forgive him. l imagine he was a wee bit taken back.
People do not come here very often.
What did you say the name of this town is?
Brigadoon.
That's funny. lt isn't on the map. l should not be surprised.
You know it isn't on the map?
Aye.
''That's a little snobbish of you, don't you think?''
-Why isn't it on the map?
-For good reason.
''Well, look, Miss, uh--''
-Campbell.
-Thank you.
We're trying to get some breakfast. ls there an inn around here?
An inn? l do not think so.
''But if you follow the road, you'll come to MacConnachy Square.''
You can find all the food you want for sale there.
Thank you very much.
You're more than welcome.
Good day.
Good day.
Good day.
Good day.
Good day.
Look!
Funny clothes they wear around here.
Maybe this is the day they take pictures for postcards.
Hello. lt couldn't be me. There must be something peculiar about you.
''This milk is for sale, isn't it?''
-Aye.
-Do you mind if l help myself?
''One moment, sir. l'll have to see your money first.''
-My money?
-Show 'im the money.
-Look at the date!
-Funny-lookin' thing.
What did you give 'em?
A hunk of uranium?
''No, just a shilling.
What a loony layout this is.''
''Aye, 'tis very interesting, sir...'' but it does me no good.
You mean you won't sell me anything?
''l'm sorry, sir. l cannot.''
Why not?
''l cannot explain further, sir.''
They just happened in a wee while ago.
''Well, welcome to Brigadoon.
How did you gentlemen get here?''
''We came from Graymore, six miles yonder.''
Six miles.
That's quite a distance.
''You must be hungry. Angus, how about some breakfast for our visitors?''
''Charlie, their money--'' l do not want their money.
''This is my weddin' day, laddie.
You're my invited guests.''
''Help yourselves.
Bread, scones, ginger cakes.''
''Oh, but first, a bit o' heather ale.''
Sandy!
-Here l am.
-Some ale for our guests.
Ale for everybody!
So you're getting married today.
That's wonderful.
''Aye, it is.''
''This afternoon, to Miss Jean Campbell.''
-Campbell?
-Aye. l think l met your bride a few minutes ago. She's very charming.
''Aye, that she is.''
Her health.
Her health!
-To our visitors!
-Here!
And to Mr. Forsythe. l hope he knows how grateful l am to him... to postponin' the miracle for me.
''-That what?
-'Tis a toast we have here, sir.''
And may God bless me this evenin' as much as l would bless him... if l were he and he were Charles Dalrymple. l guess we'll not be seein' you at the tavern anymore.
''Aye, lads.
My tavern days are over.'' l used to be a rovin' lad
A rovin' and wanderin' life l had
On any lass l'd frown
Who would try to tie me down
But then one day l saw a maid
Who held out her hand and l stayed and stayed
And now across the green l'll go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home''
Go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home'' l'll go home with bonnie Jean ln Aberdeen l used to know
A lass with an air an' her name was Jo
And every night at 10:00 l would meet her in the glen
But now you'll not see her again
Especially not in the glen at 10:00
For now across the green
You'll--
Go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home''
Go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home'' l'll go home with bonnie Jean
Hello to married men l've known l'll soon have a wife and leave yours alone
A bonnie wife indeed
And she's all l'll ever need
You wanted her at any cost
But how do you know if you've won or lost
And still across the green
You'll go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home''
Go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home''
You'll
Go home with bonnie Jean
''-Oh, you can't stop now!
-Go on!''
'' Go home, go home''
Go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home'' l'll go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home''
Go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home'' l'll go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home''
Go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home'' l'll go home
With bonnie
'' - Jean
- Go home, go home''
'' Go home, go home go home, go home''
'' Go home with bonnie Jean, aye''
Meg Brockie just told me at the back window... there are two strangers in town.
-Aye.
-Ya mean ya know it?
Why didn't ya tell me?
Did ya see them?
-Aye.
-Tell me about them.
What are they like?
How do they look?
''He has brownish hair, a wee bit taller than father.''
-Very nice face.
-What about the other one?
''The other? He's about the same, l imagine.'' l really cannot remember. l only saw them for a moment.
Where are they?
Where did they go?
To the square for some food.
They've probably left by now.
Maybe they haven't. l'm goin' to see. l'll pick up the bread for ya.
Jean! Are you daft?
How can you even think of goin' out today?
Supposin' you run into Charlie.
Do you want to start out your marriage under a cloud of bad luck?
''-l'll get the bread.
-Oh, but, Fiona--''
Who ever heard of a bride bein' seen on the day of her weddin'? l'm surprised at you for even thinkin' of it.
Lovely.
''Oh, you're a winnin' lad.
A right winnin' lad!''
''You've noticed that, have you?''
Do you have a wife? l never touch the stuff. l don't believe in marriage. l've seen too many happy love affairs broken up by it.
''Oh, you're a braw and handsome lad,
Mr. Douglas.''
You should see me when l'm rested. l'm almost robust.
We do not have enough lads in Brigadoon.
''Enough for everybody else, or enough for you?''
There are so few single lads in town. lt's hard for a lass to catch a husband. lt would be so nice if ya could stay a while. Could ya? l'll have to ask my pop.
We came over here to hunt grouse.
And coming from this hill--
''-Oh.
-Good mornin', dearie.''
Father asked me to remind ya... to be sure and come sign the family Bible this afternoon. l'll be over.
''-How was breakfast, sir?
-Wonderful. Thanks.''
Where's my bride?
She's home... palpitatin'. lsn't that your bride?
''No, lad.
That's her older sister, Fiona.''
-Do you mind if l have more ale?
-Help yourself.
''Here, old tank.
Amuse yourself.'' l thought we were going hunting. l am.
See you at the weddin'.
Can l carry that for you?
''No, thank you. l do not have far to go with it.''
''You're very busy today, aren't you?''
''-Aye, my sister--
-They told me she's getting married.''
-l was overjoyed.
-That's very kind of ya.
''Not at all. ln this case, her happiness is mine.''
''Besides, Charlie's a nice kid.''
''Aye, he is that.'' lt's wonderfully refreshing these days... to see someone so enthusiastic about getting married.
-ls it so unusual?
-l think so. l was thinking of facing the minister once... and l certainly wasn't bubbling over like Charlie.
Oh?
''Oh, what?'' l'm very surprised.
You do not look like the sort of lad who'd be thinkin' of settlin' down. l didn't say that. l just said l was thinking of getting married.
''Well, if ya felt that way...''
'tis a very good thing ya didn't.
''Yes, l suppose it was a very good thing l didn't.''
''-Good mornin', Fiona.
-Good day, Mrs. Maclntosh.''
-This is--
-Albright. Tommy Albright.
-Likewise.
-He's just passin' through.
Where do ya come from?
From America.
You're an American? lsn't that all right?
''Aye, of course.''
''-The bread, Mrs. Maclntosh.
-Aye.''
Andrew! Come to the window and look at the stranger!
He's an American.
She gives us bread for our potatoes.
-That's nice.
-She's a very nice lady.
'Tis just that--
People don't come here very often.
Aye. You're very understandin'.
''No, l'm not.'' l don't understand one thing about this place.
The bread will be ready in an hour. l'll bring it to your cottage.
''-Thank you, Mrs. Maclntosh.
-Good day.''
Good day. l've been wanting to do that all day.
Now where? l must gather some heather for the weddin' decorations.
Where do you do that?
''On the far hill, where the heather is.''
Do you mind if l come along?
-Why did ya want to?
-Why?
''Oh, l don't know exactly.''
Maybe it's because l've nothing much else to do.
Or maybe it's because l'm so full of wonder about this place... and want to stay a little longer.
Or maybe it's because l remember how relieved l was... when l found out it was your sister's wedding day and not yours.
Can't we two go walkin' together
Out beyond the valley of trees
Out where there's a hillside of heather
Curtsyin' gently in the breeze
That's what l'd like to do
See the heather
But with you
The mist of May is in the gloamin'
And all the clouds are holdin' still
So take my hand and let's go roamin'
Through the heather on the hill
The mornin' dew is blinkin' yonder
There's lazy music in the rill
And all l wanna do is wander
Through the heather on the hill
There may be other days as rich and rare
There may be other springs as full and fair
But they won't be the same
They'll come and go
For this l know
That when the mist is in the gloamin'
And all the clouds are holdin' still lf you're not there l won't go roamin'
Through the heather on the hill
The heather
On the hill
''-Here's your waistcoat, Mr. Campbell.
-Thank you, Harry.''
'Tis good to see ya.
''-Wait a minute, lad.
-What for?''
Why don't ya take my hand? l'm not your enemy.
''Ye may not mean to be, but ye are, and so is everybody in this town.''
Why do ya hate everybody? l couldn't get through seein' her marry someone else if l didn't.
What else can ya do when ya realize your life means less than nothin'? l cannot leave here. l cannot go to the university and make something o' myself... and l cannot have Jean.
So there's nothin' left to do but to hate everything and everybody... in this cursed town.
''You'll never find peace by hatin', lad.'' lt only shuts ya off more from the world... and this is only a cursed town if ya make it so.
''To the rest of us,
'tis a blessed place.''
Who was that?
My waistcoat came.
You should be gettin' ready. l was waitin' for Fiona.
Where is she?
She's been gone for hours.
Go to your room.
Close the door.
''Charlie, go 'round to the window.''
Here's the Bible.
There's the quill and ink.
Now sit ye down there and sign right under the name... of my dear departed wife.
''And when you've done that, take your leave!''
''Aye, sir.''
This is where l come all day and tend my flock.
''When l say it sounds fascinating, l want you to believe me.''
-lt's a very picturesque view.
-Thank ya.
-What for?
-For likin' where l've brought ya. lt makes me very happy.
''-You get happy very easily, don't you?
-Aye.'' l haven't been in a shed like this since l was in college...
''which at this point seems a good 2,000 years ago.''
''-Ya mean you're tired?
-Aye, lassie, l'm tired.''
''That's what you brought me here for, wasn't it, so l could take a nap?'' l should not think a long walk would fatigue a young lad like ye.
''-A young lad?
-Aye, you're very young.''
That's either a deliberate lie or wishful thinking.
''l am ancient, decrepit and disintegrating rapidly.''
My mother and father met in this shed.
We all make mistakes.
My mother was a gypsy... and one day she was walkin' past this shed... and she saw my father lyin' down asleep.
''She liked his looks, and she was achin' for a husband.''
''So, she took off her shoes, sat in the rocking chair there...'' and waited for him to wake up.
And it was not long after that that l was born.
That's one of the sweetest bedtime stories l've ever heard.
''What's under here, your father?''
Thank you very much.
You've been more than kind.
''Now, if you want to round out your generosity, buzz off.'' l just hate to leave ya.
''You better. When l sleep, l make all sorts of odd noises.''
Who told ya?
Ya do not have a wife. l was engaged once.
You're a right winnin' lad.
You should have someone to take care of ya. l don't know what you're after. l just wanna go to sleep.
Now go!
Go?
But do ya not see? l'm highly attracted to ya.
''Why, when l look at ya, l feel wee tadpoles jumpin' in my spine.''
That's about as repulsive an idea as l've heard in years.
''lf love were a hobby, you'd be a collector's item.''
All you men are all alike.
-l should certainly hope so.
-You're all brutes!
Ya get what ya want from a lass an' then 'tis farewell!
Get what l want? l can't even get you to go away!
That's what l'm referrin' to. l thought ya wanted to propose to me.
That's why ya brought me here.
You misled me.
You sure have one lulu of an imagination.
''Can you think of one good reason why l, a strange man...''
''should be interested in proposing to you, a mighty strange woman...'' and at this hour of the day?
''Because you're a lad, and l'm a lass.''
''With that philosophy, you must have had a provocative career.''
Now go. Be off.
Away with ya.
-But--
-Go tend your flock.
''Fiona! There's some white heather, lots of it.''
''Tommy, stop!''
There isn't any white heather over there.
Of course there is.
There's plenty--
What is it?
What frightened you?
'Tis nothin'. ls it the bridge? Why do you have such a look of fear on your face? l cannot say.
Why can't you?
''Fiona, what's the matter?
What's going on around here?''
What was all that business about Charlie and a miracle?
''Hey, look out! Tommy!''
What happened? Tommy!
Are you all right?
''lf there's anything l hate, it's you.''
Any civilized person would be dead by now.
Maybe the sun gave me the power
For l could swim Loch Lomond and be home in half an hour
Maybe the air gave me the drive
For l'm all aglow
And alive
What a day this has been
What a rare mood l'm in
Why it's almost like bein' in love
There's a smile on my face
For the whole human race
'' Why, it's almost like bein' in love''
All the music of life seems to be
Like a bell that is ringin' for me
And from the way that l feel
When that bell starts to peal l could swear l was fallin' l would swear l was fallin' lt's almost like bein' ln love
When we walked up the brae
Not a word did we say lt was
And her arm linked in mine
Made the world kind of fine lt was
'' Why, it's''
Almost like bein' in love
'' Why, it's almost like bein' in love''
Life seems to be
Like a bell that keeps ringin'
For me
And from the way that l feel
When that bell starts to peal l would swear l was fallin' l could swear l was fallin' lt's almost like bein' ln love
-Aren't we headin' back?
-There's no hurry.
Let's stick around a while.
There's gonna be a wedding.
''-Yours?
-Oh, very funny.'' l thought we came to Scotland to go grouse shooting. l'd like to get one little bird before the day is over.
-What's the matter?
-Hey. l must be a little touched.
Listen to this.
''''''Married: Elizabeth Lang to Andrew Campbell...''
''''''July 2nd, 1719.''''''
What about it?
People used to get married then.
''No, wait a minute.
''''Children: Fiona.''
''''''Born October 10th, 1732.''
''''''Jean. Born April 8th, 1736.''''''
Well?
Fiona told me Jean's four years younger.
-Well?
-They're the sisters in this Bible!
That's ridiculous.
They're probably just named after them.
''-You know Charlie's last name, right?
-Dalrymple, isn't it?''
''Dalrymple, yes.
Get this.''
''''''Married: Jean Campbell to
Charles Chisholm Dalrymple...''
''''''May 24th, 1754.''''''
Now what do you say?
Congratulations. l don't understand.
No Brigadoon on the map.
All those odd things that happened when l was out with Fiona this afternoon... all that stuff about a miracle... and now this.
Why are you getting so worked up?
''lf it makes 'em happy to disregard
200 years of human bing-bang, let 'em.''
''There must be a logical explanation for this, logical enough even for you.''
You don't have to explain anything to me. l don't care.
What's the matter? ls that your name in this Bible?
Aye.
Someone seems to have messed up your book.
What does it mean?
You must tell me.
''There is an explanation for it, isn't there?''
''Aye, there is, but l cannot tell ya.'' ls there anybody who can? l've got to know.
-You must talk with the dominie.
-Who?
''Our schoolmaster, Mr. Lundie.''
''-Where does he live?
-Down the road in a tree, maybe.''
''He does not live in a tree, Mr. Douglas.
Mr. Lundie's a great man.''
''All right, Tommy, l'll take you to him.'' l hadn't wanted to... because it'll be so hard for you to believe what you'll hear.
And l wanted-- l wanted you to stay with me...
'til the end of our day.
Take us to see Mr. Lundie.
Aye.
''ls it informal, or should l wear my Napoleon hat?''
''Good day, Mr. Lundie.''
''Why, hello, Fiona.
What a pleasant surprise.''
''Mr. Lundie, l'd like you to meet Mr. Tommy Albright...'' and Mr. Jeff Douglas.
''-Good afternoon, gentlemen.
-How do you do, sir?''
Good afternoon.
Where do you gentlemen come from?
-We're from New York.
-New York?
We changed it from New Amsterdam.
-So l understand.
-The British changed it.
''Confidentially, though, as soon as
Washington organizes himself...''
''we're gonna chase them out, but keep it under your hat.''
''Put a cork in it, will you, Jeff?''
''Mr. Lundie, l was wonderin' if you'd be good enough...'' to tell these gentlemen about Brigadoon.
They've heard and they've seen a great deal... and they're very perplexed indeed.
-Perplexed is right.
-l would very much like him-- l mean them--to know. l see.
''-Will you not be seated, gentlemen?
-Thank you.''
''From what l gather, nobody can talk about the place around here but you.''
''-ls that right?
-No, that's wrong.''
Mr. Forsythe could've told ya.
''Forsythe? l've heard about him, but l didn't meet him.''
Likely not. l think he's dead.
''That would stand in the way, l suppose.''
''Let me warn you that what l'm goin' to tell ya, ya will not believe.''
That's all right.
We've already been warned.
Why won't we believe it?
Because what happened in Brigadoon was a miracle... and most folks do not believe in miracles.
''Miracles require faith, and faith seems to be as dead as--''
Mr. Forsythe?
Aye.
Now this miracle happened--
Let me see.
-What day is it?
-Friday.
Friday. That means it happened exactly 200 years ago.
Two hundred years ago the Highlands of Scotland were plagued with witches-- wicked sorcerers who were takin' the Scottish people... away from the teachings of God and puttin' the devil into their souls.
''They were indeed horrible, destructive women.''
-l do not suppose you have such women.
-Witches?
''Oh, we have 'em.
We pronounce it differently.'' lt did not matter that they were not real sorcerers... because you and l know there's no such thing... but their influence was very real indeed.
Now we had at that time in Brigadoon... an old minister of the kirk... named Mr. Forsythe... and a good man he was.
-The kindest man in Scotland.
-l believe he was.
No man loved his parish as did Mr. Forsythe...
''but he was gettin' old, and it grieved him that one day soon...'' he'd have to leave those he loved so well.
But most of all he worried about the witches.
''Now mind you, they hadn't visited us as yet in Brigadoon...'' but he knew that there was a band of them coming our way.
So he began to wonder whether there was not something he could do...
''to protect the folk of his parish, not only against them...'' but against all the evils that might come to Brigadoon... from the outside world after he died.
Then one day he came to me and told me... that he had decided to ask God for a miracle.
''And on an early Wednesday mornin', right after midnight...'' he went out to a hill beyond Brigadoon... and made his prayer to God.
''And there, in the hush of the sleeping world...'' he asked God that night to make Brigadoon... and all the people in it... vanish into the highland mist.
Vanish... but not for always.
They would return just as they were for one day... every hundred years.
The people would lead their customary lives... but every day when they awoke... it would be a hundred years later.
And when we awoke next day... it was a hundred years later.
''ln this way,
Mr. Forsythe figured that...'' there'd be no change in the lives of the people.
They just wouldn't be in any century long enough to be touched by it.
You mean that--
You mean that you go to bed at night...
''and when you wake up the next day, it's a hundred years later?''
Aye.
And every day is a hundred years later?
Aye.
What happened to the minister?
We ne'er saw him again.
''You see, he realized to ask for such a miracle...''
''some sacrifice would have to be made, and he wanted to be the one to make it.''
''Well, what was the greatest sacrifice that he could offer?'' lt was to be separated from those he loved before his time.
And that was why he went out to a hill beyond Brigadoon...
''where, his miracle granted...'' he'd ne'er see Brigadoon again.
All this happened
200 years ago?
''Aye, lad.''
''Which of course to us, you see, is only two days ago.''
Let me ask you something.
Suppose somebody around here got fed up and wanted to leave?
''-Then what?
-Well, he cannot leave.''
''-You mean, l've gotta stay here now?
-No, lad.''
But according to Mr. Forsythe's contract with God... if anyone belonging to Brigadoon leaves... the enchantment will be broken for all.
''And that night, when all the people go to sleep...''
Brigadoon will disappear forever.
''Look, l'm not saying l believe all this...'' butjust for argument's sake... suppose a stranger like--
''well, like me--'' came to Brigadoon and wanted to stay.
Could he?
''Aye, he could.
Mr. Forsythe provided for that.''
''He didn't miss a trick, did he?''
''No, lad, he did not.''
A stranger can stay if he loves someone here.
''Not Brigadoon itself, mind you, but someone in Brigadoon...'' enough to be willing to give up everything... to stay near that person.
''Which is only right, because after all, lad...'' if you love someone deeply enough... anything is possible.
Aye. Anything is possible.
''Oh, Fiona, shouldn't you be thinkin' of changin' for the weddin'?'' l had.
''Tommy, will l see ya later?'' l'll be there. l'd like to stick around... and see if this place evaporates like you say. l must hurry now.
''Good-bye, Mr. Lundie...'' and thank you.
She's a dear lassie.
''Yes, l'm finding that out.''
''Mr. Lundie, are you all perfectly happy living here in this little town?''
''Why, of course, lad.''
''After all, sunshine can peep through a wee hole.''
But what's it like at night when you go to sleep?
For me it's like being carried on shadowy arms... up to a distant cloud... and there l float 'til mornin'.
And yet... sometimes l think l hear strange voices.
-Voices?
-Aye.
They say no words that l can remember... and yet... they're voices filled with a fearful longin'.
And often they seem to call me back. l've pondered over it when l was awake... and l think... l have a feelin' l'm hearin' the outside world.
''Oh, there must be an awful lot of folk out there...'' searchin'... for a Brigadoon.
Buchanan!
Douglas!
Lindsey!
There's goin' to be a weddin'.
We have no minister in Brigadoon now.
''ln most villages, this would be a calamitous thing...'' but when there is no minister present...
''it is perfectly proper, according to the laws of Scotland...'' for two people to wed each other by sincere mutual consent.
There need be nothin' in writin'.
All that is necessary... is that ye promise to love each other... while ye both are on Earth.
''Go ahead, lad.'' l shall love ya 'til l die... and l'll make all effort to be a good husband to ya.
And so much will l try... to be a fine and lovin' wife.
''-Are we married now, Mr. Lundie?
-Aye, lad, you're married.''
''Go on, kiss her, lad.''
''Mr. Forsythe would have liked to have been here, l know...'' but as long as you're both good and true to one another... ya cannot fail but live in the grace of God... and Mr. Forsythe could've wished no more than that.
All l've done was to want ya too much. l'm leavin' Brigadoon!
'Tis the end of all of us!
The miracle is over!
''We must stop 'im! Cover the woods!
Sandy and Angus, guard the bridge!''
''Robert, take a group and spread out along the old kirk!''
''Fiona, is it true?
Could he make Brigadoon disappear?''
''Aye, if he gets away.''
Harry Beaton!
Harry Beaton!
Harry Beaton
Harry Beaton
Run and get him
Get him
Run and get him
Get him
Run ye men or ye will never see another mornin'
Go and stop him
Stop him
Go and stop him
Stop him
Run ye Highland men or ye won't get another day
Harry Beaton!
Harry Beaton!
Beaton sure came this way
'' And we cannot be too far behind him, laddie''
'' Ye there, head for the brae''
'' Keep your eye open or ye will not find him, laddie'' l'll go down to the creek
'' And by God, if l see him l'll throw him in it''
Search the hill to the peak
'' Find him, lads or tomorrow will never, never come''
Run and get him
Get him
Run and get him
Get him
Run and get him now
Or ye won't plow another meadow
Go and stop him
Stop him
Go and stop him
Stop him
Run ye Highland men
Or ye won't get another day
Harry Beaton!
Harry Beaton! lf he comes into sight
Hold him fast
Many lives are depending on it
This must not end tonight
They must know that tomorrow is really going to come
Run and get him
Get him
Run and get him
Get him
Spread your human net
But don't forget that time's against ya
Go and stop him
Stop him
Go and stop him
Stop him
Run ye Highland men
Or ye won't get another day
-How did it happen?
-He must've hit his head on a rock.
''Ah, the poor lad!''
''Oh, Harry, my son, my son.''
How could ya be so ungrateful?
''Oh, l'm so ashamed for ye.'' l'm so ashamed for ye.
''Look here, all of ya. There's been enough sorrow for one weddin' night.''
Don't tell anyone he's dead.
Just say he was stopped.
They can find out in the mornin'. l'll take him to my cottage.
No one will see him.
''-Father, what happened?
-lt's all right. The alarm is over.''
''-Was he hurt bad?
-No, just scratched a wee bit.''
He'll be fine and fit in the mornin'.
Now let's all come back to the weddin' supper.
''-Aren't ya comin', Fiona?
-Aye, Father.''
''Angus, did ya see
Tommy, the American?''
''Aye, dearie. l saw him cross the bridge.''
''Angus, did he come back?'' l did not see him.
They stopped him just in time.
He wasn't far from the brook.
''Yes, they told me.''
''Oh, Fiona, when l think what could have happened--''
''Your whole world, gone forever.'' l thought my world was gone. l thought you'd left.
Without saying good-bye to you?
You know l wouldn't do that. l know ya wouldn't have.
''Tommy, darlin'.'' l can't leave you. l can't.
Lundie said you could stay if you love someone enough... and l do. l love you. l'd better hurry and find him.
There's not much time.
-Are they after you now?
-l'm looking for Lundie. l've got something very important to tell you. l'm not going back with you. l'm gonna stay here.
''Oh, that's nice.''
''Please, Jeff, be serious, just for once.'' l am. l'm being serious all over the place.
''l tell ya, l feel more a part of her and all this...'' than l ever felt about Jane or anybody or anything back home.
-Great.
-l can't give it up. l belong here.
''Yeah, you belong here, all right.
No doubt about it.''
''Milking cows in the morning, planting little things...''
''weaving, butter churning.''
''That's for you, boy.
You'll have a ball.''
''And just think, you can do it for always, always...''
''in a town that's got one of the longest ''''always'''' on record.'' lt's got nothing to do with all these things you're talking about.
Don't you see? l believe in her.
''And what's more, l believe in this place, and l can't leave.''
''Well, kiddies, that's what happened to Tommy today.''
''But what about his friend, Jeff?
Well, he had fun too.''
Tonight he went running off through the woods after some Highland hothead... who was gonna make all the people disappear... by crossing the wrong street.
''Well, after a while
Jeff thought he saw a bird...''
''perched low in a tree, and he shot at it.''
Something fell to the ground.
''He rushed over to it, and what do you think it was?'' lt was Hothead Harry.
''Yes, sir, the boy dervish himself, lying there looking all dead.''
You mean you--
To kill somebody somewhere else in the world would have been an awful thing.
But Harry was a citizen of the little town that wasn't there... and he probably never lived in the first place.
''Chances are, there weren't even any woods.''
''ln fact, the whole day probably never even happened...''
''because, you see, this is a fairy tale.''
''Oh, Jeff, you poor guy.
You must feel horrible.''
''What do you mean, l must feel?''
What am l supposed to feel in a voodoo joint like this?
''Dream stuff, boy, all made up out of broomsticks and wishing wells.'' lt's that or a boot camp for lunatics. l don't know what goes on around here.
''All l know is that whatever it is, it's got nothing to do with me or you...'' and anything that happens to either of us just doesn't count!
How can it when you don't understand it?
''And you want to give up your family, your friends, your whole life for this?'' lt's not even worth arguing about.
Now go say good-bye to the little people and thank them for the picnic.
''You're confused, aren't you, boy?''
''You know, if you believed as much as you think you do, you wouldn't be.''
''Tommy, Fiona tells me you want to stay.'' l'll wait for you by the bridge.
''Tommy, what did he mean by that?''
What is it?
''Fiona, it's me. l thought--''
''Do not be ashamed of yourself, lad.'' lt's the hardest thing in the world to give everything... though it's usually the only way to get everything.
''You'd better hurry, Fiona.
There's not much time left.''
''Fiona, do you understand at all?''
-l think so.
-Then you're not sorry l came?
''No, l'm glad. l'll be less lonely now.''
Real loneliness is not bein' in love in vain... but not bein' in love at all.
-lf l only had more time.
-lt's not your fault.
'Tis the end of our day!
''-lt isn't because l don't love you.
-l know, l know.''
''But to stay, l had to have no fears and no doubts.''
''Aye, Tommy, aye.''
''Good-bye, Tommy...''
''and do not forget any day, any night...'' that always and always... l love you. l love you. l love you. l love you. l love you.
''Peter, Peter, l left the dogs in the car.''
Will you be a dear and ask the driver to take them home and feed them?
''l can't afford to get a divorce, what with community property and taxes.''
-But alimony is deductible.
-But she'll want capital. l can't give her that. lt isn't fair to the children.
''Darling, l'm so sorry l'm late, but l had the most agonizing afternoon.''
My new analyst is divine.
He has the most marvelous new theory.
He believes that childhood hasn't got anything to do with anything.
-Sounds dreamy.
-l've got my standards.
''l'll lie, cheat, steal for this company...'' but l will not give up my integrity. l feel that a man is of value to the organization as long as he--
''-Yes, it arrived this afternoon.
-Have Andre fix it for a party at 6:00.''
Tell him for me that if he messes up the sauce this time--
''Great little car.
Hiya, Jeff.''
Once you get into one of those foreign cars--
''But, honey, why don't you try and see my side of it?''
''Frank, bring me another brandy.''
''-lt's bourbon, sir.
-lt is?''
''That's all you've had for four months, ever since you got back from Scotland.'' ls that right? l just decided l don't like it. lt's not near as good as the whiskey
Mother used to make. l'll have brandy.
''-Yes, sir.
-Honey, l can't get home tonight.''
''l know, but l can't let the boss down.''
He's got this girl that he wants to take out... and he needs another man along so it won't look like she's with him.
''Yes, dear.''
''You'd better bring me two glasses of water, Frank.''
''l know, baby, but we can celebrate your birthday tomorrow night.''
''Honey, l can't take any longer. l've gotta get back. Talk to you later.''
Frank? Sorry.
''-Sorry.
-Would you like dinner, Mr. Douglas?''
-No. Bring me my lunch check.
-Certainly. l think l'll eat out tonight.
''-Frank, bring me another.
-So soon? Where's the last one?'' lt vanished... like Brigadoon.
''Like who, sir?''
That was the name of my brother who ran away.
''Good evening, Mr. Albright.
Your table will be ready in a moment.''
''-Thank you, Peter.
-Tommy, Tommy.''
What's your opinion about the Parker deal?
-l'll let you know tomorrow.
-l've got a real slant on it-- l'll tell you tomorrow. l'll give you a call.
''Albright, how about that meeting this morning? Was that great?''
-Great.
-Things were brought out in the open.
-Let in a lot of fresh air.
-Great.
-Do you like how l handled the old man?
-Great.
''Thanks, Albright.''
-Hi.
-Hi.
-lt's hot in here.
-lt's not the heat. lt's the humanity.
''-Good evening, Mr. Albright.
-Oh, thank you, Frank.''
-Have you seen Jane?
-She meeting you here?
-Yeah.
-l'll drink up and get outta here.
There's nothing a woman hates more than her fianc's best friend.
He knows the secrets she's gonna spend the rest of her life tryin' to find out.
-l've been dodging her for a month now.
-Don't worry about it.
''l always say, scratch the surface of any woman and she'll enjoy it.''
-When are you getting married?
-l don't know.
-l don't know if l want to get married.
-Why?
''Because, old tank, l'm in love with someone else...''
''and l ''''canna'''' get over it.''
''And the trouble is, because l can't be with her, l can't be with anyone.''
So many things remind me of her.
''l'll be talking with people, and they might say one little word...''
''that opens the door to a memory for me, and then...''
''l'm a few thousand miles away with-- well, you know.''
''But slowly l come back to the conversation, they ask me a question...'' and l don't know what in the world they've been talking about.
-l haven't heard a word.
-You must be fascinating company. lt ain't easy.
''-Hello, Jane!
-Hello, Jane!''
''-You've certainly been elusive.
-Hello, Jeff.'' l've been up to my neck at the office.
Would you like a drink?
''Love one. An old-fashioned, please, and would you bring it to the table?''
''-How are you, Jeff?
-Darling, it's been weeks.''
''-Fine, Jane. How are you?
-l'm sorry.''
''Oh, l've had a little cold, but other than that--''
-But you could've called more often.
-l hate to eat and run.
''-Your table is ready, Mr. Albright.
-Thank you.''
-l'll call you later.
-Hello!
''Good-bye!
Frank, put it on the bill.''
''-Your bill, sir, is very high.
-So am l!''
''-Jane, you look fine.
-So do you.''
''-Would you care to order dinner now?
-No, we'll finish our drinks first.''
''Darling, l wish you'd been with me over the weekend.''
''l went up to Connecticut, house hunting.
Saw the most wonderful place.''
''Rather interesting. Colonial, and right on top of a beautiful hill.''
Through the heather
On the hill
The mornin' dew ls blinkin' yonder
There's lazy music
On the rill
And all l want to do is wander
Through the heather--
''And l didn't think you'd want to do that, would you?''
''Hmm? Uh, maybe.''
''You mean, you'd even consider it?''
What?
Commuting from
60 miles out of New York.
''-No, l wouldn't wanna do that.
-l didn't think so.''
And l told Mr. Bradville.
-Who?
-Herbert Bradville.
''-Who's he?
-Darling, he's the real estate man...'' l just told you l've been working with.
''l told him you'd call, so please do. l'm trying hard to arrange everything.''
''By the way, do you still want
Jeff to stand up for you?''
''Yes, if he can.''
Why?
Nothing. lt's just he's so impossible these days.
Everybody's bored to death with him.
''Maybe l'm not interested in everybody, Jane.''
''Well, you certainly have been antisocial since you got back from Scotland.'' l thought for a while there was something really bothering you.
You certainly wouldn't keep me waiting and--
Waitin' for my dearie
And happy am l
To hold my heart
'Til he comes strollin' by
''-Give me a ring, won't you?
-Oh, of course.''
'' When he comes, my dearie''
One look and l'll know
That he's the dearie l've been wantin' so
''-When l see you wander around like--
-No, Jane. No.''
-No what?
-There won't be a wedding next month.
''-Do you mean you're postponing it again?
-No, Jane, l'm not postponing it.''
-l'm calling it off for good.
-Calling it off?
''Jane, l'm sorry.
You've been wonderful, darling.''
''lt's not your fault, but something strange happened to me a few months ago.''
''l can't explain it, but l just don't fit here anymore.''
You've gone clean out of your mind.
We can't stand here and talk about it.
Let's go home and--
''Go home, go home
Go home with bonnie Jean''
'' Go home, go home''
''lf you want to stay and make a fool of yourself, you can.'' l'll go home with bonnie Jean
'' Go home, go home
Go home with bonnie Jean''
Until l'm old enough for Social Security... l've got my expense account.
''But most important of all, l'm building.''
Building every day. That's about the only security a man can have.
''Hello. Room 732, please.''
''Jeff, are you sober?
Listen to me.'' l wanna go back to Scotland.
You wanna come along?
Never mind what for!
Do you wanna come with me?
''Okay, get plane reservations right away.''
''l know it isn't there, but l wanna see where it was!''
''Who cares if it doesn't make sense?
Jeff, l wanna go!'' l've got to! lt's unbelievable.
-Awful and unbelievable.
-What is?
''To think that down there, somewhere between the mist and the stars...''
''there's someone l want so terribly, and l know she's not dead.''
''She's only asleep, and yet l'll never see her again.''
''Well, you didn't have to come all the way over here just to say that.''
You could've told me on the phone back in New York for a dime.
''No, l'll tell you why.''
She became so alive to me that l had to come back and see for myself... if the place really wasn't here. lt didn't work that way for me. lt's so much like a dream now that l have to work hard... to convince myself it happened at all.
''There's the big difference between us, Jeff.''
''Oh, tell me about it.'' l found that... sometimes the things you believe in become more real to you... than all the things you can explain away or understand.
''Oh, why do people have to lose things...'' to find out what they really mean?
''Well, let's start walkin'.'' l got lost around here once.
Brigadoon
Brigadoon
Blooming under
Sable skies
Brigadoon
Brigadoon
There my heart forever
Lies
Let the world grow cold
Around us
Let the heavens
Cry above
Tommy!
''Tommy, lad, you!''
''My, my, you must really love her.
You woke me up.''
''Come, lad.''
You shouldn't be too surprised.
''l told ya, if ya loved someone deeply enough...'' anything is possible.
Even miracles.
Brigadoon
Brigadoon ln my valley
There'll be
Love
There'll be love
''Subtitles By
Captions, lnc. Los Angeles''
 Will lead you to my blue heaven 
 You'll see a smiling face, a fireplace 
 A cozy room 
 A little nest that's nestled where 
 The roses bloom 
 Just Molly and me 
 And my baby makes three 
 We're happy in my 
 Blue heaven 
Yes, a little lousy.
Maybe it'll sound better tonight with colored lights.
We got a visitor from the outside world where they shave.
- Who let you in?
- I let myself in.
I'm Red Nichols from Ogden, Utah.
I'm your new cornet player, remember?
You're late.
Well, I'm sorry about that but
I've never been in New York before... and I got a little mixed up with the subways. The...
Did you know the BMT comes up here, and the IRT doesn't?
And neither does the Chesapeake & Ohio.
You're the first to complain about it.
Get your chair.
You a sight man?
I can read anything that's written.
Ok, you crooks, go ahead and laugh.
I found this kid in the desert... been blowing rings around any of you and he works at half the price.
Sweetest music you ever heard.
I got a guy in a boiler factory in Joplin, warming up for your job, Dorsey.
Don't buy anything on time.
Ok, let's try it again.
Can I just play a few notes here so I won't hit a clam?
Help yourself.
Are you ready, maestro? From the top.
That means from here. Don't take the IRT.
You...
- where's that town you're from?
- Ogden, Utah. Why?
Well, don't play that horn so the folks back home can hear you.
You got a mute?
- Yeah.
- Well, use it. Use it all the time.
Alright, the only thing is Mr.Paradise,
I play New Orleans style.
You know, it's the newest thing.
As a matter of fact...
I've got an arrangement in here of the very number you're doing...
Put that thing away. Sit down.
Can't you take a little friendly advice?
Put that horn in your big mouth and blow.
Welcome to paradise.
That's all right.
Pretty soon, you'll all be working for me.
Come on. Look, will you make up your mind?
The girls are waiting.
Look, I appreciate it Tony.
Don't get me wrong.
- Who is this guy?
- He works in a band.
There's a new trumpet player up in Harlem.
He just came from New Orleans.
The boys told me he was just great.
They're going up to listen to him tonight. I thought...
They go up every night.
You can catch him anytime.
Well Frankly Tony,
I'd like to steer clear of chorus girls.
My mother gave me a note to a lady in Brooklyn...
- and this lady's got a daughter.
- Naturally.
- What?
- Naturally.
Brooklyn is solid mothers and daughters.
Every auto horn plays Mendelssohn's Wedding March... and Mendelssohn's driving the car.
You're quite a character. I haven't even met the girl in Brooklyn yet.
- You've got me married to her.
- Well, you see how easy it is?
Now, these Broadway frails, it's a different league.
There's no home games.
Tony, why are you doing all this for me?
You're an awfully nice fellow, but you hardly know me, really.
I take in strays.
I don't like anybody should be lonely.
- I'm not lonely...
- I got a heart as big as all outdoors.
How much money you say you got on you?
$20 Tony but that's room rent.
Red, will you forget about the room?
We may never have to get out of the car.
Look, I'll tell you what we'll do. We'll drive up to Harlem, catch the bugle... and from then on in, we play by ear, all right?
Alright.
- You ready, girls? Come on. Lets go.
- Tony, I don't think so.
- Let's go.
- Honestly, where's this guy come from?
What difference does it make?
He's from Ogden, Utah.
Utah? Is that in the Union?
Well, you wanted me to get you a date, didn't you?
- Must be Aaron Slick from Punkin.
- You be quiet.
- It's her date, not yours.
- Well, she's a friend of mine.
Oh Tony, why should I go out with some farm boy from Utah?
He's a nice guy.
- I guess I'm stuck.
- Alright, wait here. I'll be right back.
It's all set. She's dying to go out with you.
Yeah.
I don't know how you do it boy.
From this distance too.
Must be the smell of the silo.
What did you say his name is?
Huckleberry Finn?
You can't leave him standing there now.
You've got a date with him.
Red, this is my girl Tommye Eden.
She's a dancer.
- And this is Bobbie Meredith. She sings.
- How doody ma'am.
How do you do? I've got to be home early.
That's all right ma'am.
Just don't pay it no never mind.
You'll get home just as early as you please.
Oh, brother, I bet the cows back in Ogden just loved you.
Well ma'am, I didn't shake their hands.
That were a zinger, weren't it ma'am?
Now, we better get in the car. Come on.
Boy, before the night's over
I may poison him.
I'll toss you for it.
Say, plowboy, are you sure you ever danced before?
Oh, yes ma'am, lots of times.
With girls?
Well, when I couldn't get nothing better.
Oh, now, look. Look.
I know this may seem like some weird tribal rite or something... but this is how the dance is usually done.
One, two, three. One, two, three.
One, two, three. One, two, three.
I think I've got it now.
- Why, you...
- Yes ma'am.
- Set it right here baby.
- Thank you Tony.
I should've warned you, Bobbie.
This kid is hip.
Thanks.
We didn't order any tea. Did you order...
- Oh, maybe the girls ordered some tea.
- Red. Red.
This is tea like my mother used to make... for Sunday afternoon with the Mafia.
Ninety proof.
It's in teacups in case of a raid.
Don't you think I know that?
No. You ever been in a speakeasy before?
Oh, come on. I've been in dozens of them.
Here's mud in your eye.
Yeah.
We got a real live one here.
Have some more tea, plowboy.
It just Plowboy?
I'll show you plowboy.
Well, here's some more mud.
Wood alcohol. I've gone blind.
Oh, Red. They just turned out the lights.
That's all.
I was only kidding.
Don't you think I know that?
No.
- Red, how about that bugle?
- Like the music?
Next to my father, that's the greatest trumpet I ever heard in my whole life.
We'll let you drink to that.
 Won't you come home Bill Bailey 
 Won't you come home? 
 I'm feeling all alone 
 I'll do the cooking darling 
 I'll pay the rent 
 I know I've done you wrong 
 Remember that rainy eve 
 That I drove you out 
 With nothing but a fine-tooth comb? 
 I know I'm to blame 
 Well, ain't that a shame 
 Bill Bailey, 
 won't you please come home 
 Yes, won't you come home Bill Bailey 
 Won't you come home 
 I'm feeling all alone 
Here you go, Red.
 Won't you come home Bill Bailey 
 Won't you come home 
 I'm going to love you long 
It's all right Mac.
 Won't you come home Bill Bailey 
 Won't you come home Bill Bailey 
 With nothing but a fine-tooth comb 
 I know I'm to blame 
 Ain't that a shame 
 Bill Bailey, 
 won't you please come home 
Oh, he's changing weapons. Where's my horn?
Red. Red, don't start that.
They'll blow you right out of the room.
One, One more chorus boys, eh?
One, One, One...
Would you play one more chorus please?
What can I do for you?
Well, I, I'd like to show you how to really play this thing.
You look a little shaky there son.
You better sit this one out.
We'll get to the volunteers later.
Yeah, well, I, you don't believe I can play this, eh?
Well, I'd like to inform you about one information of piece of fact... that I happen to be the second-greatest cornet player...
- in Ogden, Utah.
- North Ogden or South Ogden?
You don't think that's much, do you?
Well, my father happens to live there... and he's the greatest cornet player in the whole world. Ask anybody.
If he ain't Gabriel, you're in trouble. Play it.
- Where's the arrangement?
- Arrangement?
Man, nobody write down Dixieland.
You just let it happen.
Well, suppose it happens great one, suppose it happens great one time... and you'd like it to happen exactly the same way. What do you do then?
Just like tapping a nightingale on the shoulder, saying...
How's that again, Dicky-bird?
Well, I write it down.
I've been writing it down since I was 13 years old.
Here, I've got it right here.
Here's the drum part right there.
Would you just hold this here right there? Thank you very much.
The, that's right there. The, right there.
The Battle Hymn of the Republic.
Maybe you better come back Sunday.
This prayer meeting ain't ready for that kind of music.
Just try to stay with me, eh boys?
Don't look back, or you'll be trampled to death.
I'm going to be very sick.
Excuse it, folks.
Somebody must've put alcohol in our liquor.
- Feel better?
- Where's my horn?
You feel better.
I wouldn't want anything to happen to this horn.
There's not another one like it in the entire world... and my father gave this to me.
You know that tea we had before... that's the first drink of liquor
I ever had... in my whole entire life ever since I was born.
I wish I hadn't been...
I'd never have guessed it, Red.
While we're on the subject of confession, I may as well tell you... that nobody in Ogden calls me Red, except me.
My name is Loring.
I couldn't help it.
Actually, it's Ernest Loring Nichols.
Now, you're ashamed of all the wrong things.
You know what my real name is?
- Willa.
- What?
Willa. Willa Steutesman.
- Willa what?
- Steutesman.
Willa Steutesman? Oh, you're kidding.
Willa?
- Hi, Willa.
- Hi Loring.
Now you just take it easy, and I'll get your hat and then...
And you can take me home.
Let's not wait for Tony.
You mean you want just me alone... to take you home all by myself with nobody else but just me?
And remember... it doesn't really matter that... you'll never be the greatest cornet player in the world.
Doesn't really matter?
- You don't believe me, either.
- Oh please. Now just wait here Loring.
Just call me Red.
 Glory, glory 
 Hallelujah 
 Oh, yes 
 Gloried man 
 Oh, yes, oh, yes, oh, yes 
 Oh, yes, oh, yes 
Yeah.
Yeah, get that boy's license number.
He caught the nightingale.
- More. More.
- More. More.
And when I was 5 years old,
I was playing Carnival in Venice... at church festivals.
Have you ever been at a church festival in Ogden, Utah?
I don't think so.
Well, you don't know what you've missed.
And now, Professor E. W. Nichols... and the entire Nichols family orchestra... featuring Master Loring Nichols, aged five... will play
The Carnival in Venice on the silver...
You know, it was real silver too.
My father's still got it, as a matter of fact.
Let me finish honey.
How much longer is the cab ride?
- Oh, it's a long way to Brooklyn.
- Good.
You live in Brooklyn?
And it's so late. I know
I'm going to catch it from my mother.
You have a mother?
Well, sure. It happens, even to showgirls.
Brooklyn and mother.
- Did you just hear what I heard?
- What?
Never mind. You will.
You had to go to Brooklyn, eh?
You went to Brooklyn.
I told you...
What's going on here?
Meet the blushing bride, my friend.
- Willa and I just got married.
- Who's Willa?
- Me, Bobbie.
- Good luck.
Thanks. Say, I want to know if we could... have a little time off for the honeymoon?
- Just, you know...
- You get five-minute breaks, don't you?
That's two choruses and a reprise.
- Get out 43, 56 and 42.
- Real sweet fellow, isn't he?
- Keep your mind on the music, will you?
- Yeah, I'll do that. Don't worry about it.
By the way, you didn't get a chance to look over... those arrangements I did for you, did you?
- If you want them, they're in the ashcan.
- What?
You trying to put me out of business with that broken-down Dixieland?
- What are you talking about? It's...
- I gave your tone-deaf canary a job.
What else do you want?
- Now wait a minute...
- Now sit down, shut up and blow.
High-ho, one and all... and a very fond welcome to the sweetest music ever played.
We're a little misty-eyed tonight.
For our own Loring Red Nichols... the finest cornet in the country, has taken to himself a bride... none other than the new addition to our happy family... our society chanteuse, the lovely Miss Bobbie Meredith.
For our loving couple, we dedicate our theme with all of our blessings.
If you will hold my hand.
Misty-eyed, eh? I'll show him misty-eyed.
Loring, don't do anything crazy.
We need him more than he needs us.
 With eyes a fire 
 I'll know your desire 
 Then a heavenly kiss 
 I won't resist 
 For you will dim the lights 
 Then I will hold you tight 
 I'll take you 
 To paradise 
Hello.
Did you apologize to him like I asked you to?
Well, I had a little talk with him after the show.
- Well?
- Well... you wouldn't want me to stay in the band if I weren't happy, would you?
I mean, can you imagine another couple of months... of, Good evening, one and all.
I'm a little misty-eyed tonight, oh, misty-eyed...
- Oh Loring, you didn't even try.
- Yes, I did try baby. I tried my best... but he wouldn't listen to reason, so I hit him in the eye and quit.
- Oh but Loring, we just got married.
- I know.
Oh, well. At least I still have a job.
I better tell you now honey.
I hit him for both of us.
You what?
- Oh Loring.
- I couldn't have my wife... working for a guy like that. Now look.
Honey, will you stop worrying.
Pretty soon he'll be working for me.
I don't even know you. You're a stranger.
No, I'm not.
My mother was right.
She said you were unstable.
- You do crazy things all the time.
- No. No. Please, no.
No, I don't honey.
Why don't we talk about that tomorrow?
- After all, this is our wedding night.
- It was all a mistake, a horrible mistake.
Bobbie, will you...
Bobbie, listen. What kind of a bridal suite is this anyway?
- The doors lock.
- You can sleep in there on the couch.
We'll both get a night's rest.
I don't want a night's rest.
Hello.
Now, here are your pajamas and your toothbrush.
Bobbie, listen. I'll do anything you say.
I'll go back and beg Will for the job.
I'll play so softly nobody will know I'm there. Please.
No. No, you won't Loring.
Do you know why you quit Will's band?
He didn't like your arrangements.
- Now, isn't that true?
- Hello. Well, what if it is?
Bobbie, listen. I...
If you don't even think of me on our wedding night... what chance have I got on our anniversary?
- Hello?
- I forgot to give you the toothpaste.
Well, squeeze it under the door.
Bobbie Willa.
- Oh Loring.
- I'm sorry.
I'll apologize to the toothpaste.
I'll apologize to anybody.
Go on.
- Loring?
- What?
- Good night.
- Good night.
Sleep tight.
Loring,
I've never slept in a bridal suite before.
Well, let me know what it's like.
How much did this suite cost you for the night?
- Will you stop that?
- Yes but I want to know.
$50 but it's all right.
We're using both rooms.
$50? What a crazy thing to do.
Well, I wanted you to have the best.
After all, a wedding night is something... you want to remember for the rest of your life.
I'll remember this one after I'm dead.
- Well, where did you get the money?
- What difference does it make?
But the money...
I hocked my horn after I got fired.
You what?
There's an all-night hock shop open on Sixth Avenue.
It's a public necessity, like the fire department.
Oh Loring.
That's not so terrible.
All the fellows do it when they run short.
But you once told me that there wasn't another horn like it in the whole world...
- and you wouldn't let it go for anything.
- Well, I'm crazy. Ask your mother.
It's a lovely suite.
Here. Have an apple.
The manager sent it up. Free.
Thanks.
You know, you're going to make a terrible husband.
I'll never know from one minute to the next what you're going to do.
That's all right. Neither will I.
Isn't it wonderful to be rich?
The Clicquot Club Eskimos are on the air... with a dogsled full of beverages for your local grocer.
And to start the show off tonight... here's that sensational hit...
Back home in Indiana.
 Back home again 
 In Indiana 
 In the fields I used to roam 
 When I dream 
 About the moonlight on the Wabash 
 Then I long for my Indiana home 
 The Sunflow pineapple company 
 presents... 
 The authentic Hawaiian music... 
 Of Sam Weiskopf 
 and his romantic islanders. 
 Indiana Home 
 Presenting to you... 
 The Samovar Tea Cossacks. 
 The Canada Dry Mounties 
 are on the air. 
 Back home again 
 In Indiana 
 In the fields of new mown hay 
Help.
They warned me against this guy,
Nichols. He'll never work again.
What about the horse?
Murray, bring me a cup of coffee and some cheesecake.
Remember, no more credit.
Your husband promised to pay the bill when he got another job.
Salami could be out of style by then.
- Hey, Bobbie, come on over and join us.
- Alright.
You know all the boys?
Jimmy Dorsey, Glenn Miller,
Artie Shaw and Dave Tough.
- Hello.
- Hi. Please sit down.
Oh, I'm beat. I've been job hunting all day.
Nobody seems to be hiring society chanteuses.
You picked a great day for it.
You know, I tried calling Red at the hotel the other day.
You're not registered.
Well, we've been living with my mother.
She loves him.
Incidentally, Bobbie, would you give these arrangements back to Red?
He wanted us to cut some sides with him.
But he was a little vague about the salary.
He didn't even mention it.
- I think he's going to float a bond issue.
- Or toss us for it.
Me, I can't stand cheesecake.
Lays on my stomach like a lump. Enjoy.
Red hasn't decided where he was going to record, either.
Well, I think it was a tossup between the Yankee Stadium and Carnegie Hall.
Any of you bother to look at his arrangements?
Honey, come on. It's that Dixieland.
You can't see the notes...
- through the tall cotton.
- The tall corn.
Let me tell you stupid idiots something.
If Loring says that he's going to play in Carnegie Hall, don't bet against it.
And if he has a new idea about music, he'll bring it off... while the rest of you sit around in your rented tuxedos...
- blowing syrup out of your horns.
- Bobbie, we were just...
- Oh, be quiet. My name is Willa.
- I thought it was Bobbie.
You ought to be flattered he asked you to play, because he only wants the best.
And so do I. That's why I married him instead of you or you or you.
- I'm married.
- Keep quiet.
- Where's my check?
- I'll take it.
No, you won't.
- Put it on the bill.
- Let him take it.
- You didn't eat your cheesecake.
- No, I can't. I don't feel well.
I told you, it lays on your stomach.
I'm a little dizzy.
Where can I get some cold water?
Back here. Ladies' lounge.
You feel all right, Bobbie?
Listen please, don't say anything to Loring, eh?
I wouldn't want to worry him.
Sure, let him be the only one who ain't worried.
- Glenn, what's with her?
- You've been living on the moon?
- I'll bet you she's in her second month.
- No, it's her first.
- I didn't know that.
- You guys are all wrong.
$5 says it's the third.
- I'll take the fourth.
- This is becoming interesting now.
- Covered.
- Want to get in?
No, not me.
There aren't any good months left.
- I got change.
- That poor kid.
Living with her mother too.
Living with Red. That's worse.
Fellows, here. Take a look at this.
Hi, Murray.
Could you get me a half corned beef sandwich on a seeded roll?
And trim all the fat off this time, will you?
Why don't you eat your wife's cheesecake?
Why don't you get some new pickles?
That's not bad. It's kind of like...
No, it's not bad. It's fine. It's, the notes are all great boys...
- but the tempo is just deadly.
- It's the first time.
I know it's the first time but it's still too beat, you know?
You got to move it.
Sure, here. Do it.
Let me do it with you once.
Next week, Carnegie Hall.
 Everybody, grab a partner 
 And just let yourself go 
 Follow that leader 
 Just follow that Joe 
 He can teach you   He can reach you 
 Like nobody else can 
 Follow that leader 
 Just follow that man 
 If you do what he do 
 What he do, what he do, what he does 
 You'll be really dancing 
 Come on and take a chance in 
 Razzmatazz   Jazz 
 Butcher, baker, candlestick maker 
 Are all joining the clan 
 So, pleedge, colleege or flappa 
 Or Phi Beta Kappa 
 Just follow that, follow that 
 Follow that leader 
 Follow that, follow that 
 Follow that leader 
 Man 
He better take it easy with her, or you'll lose the pool.
- I don't think she's told him yet.
- She hasn't told him yet?
 Everybody, follow the leader 
 Everybody, follow the leader 
 Everybody, follow the leader man 
Easy. She's out of her mind.
Everybody, Peabody.
Change partners and Charleston.
Everybody, change partners.
You know something?
You know you're the prettiest girl at this prom?
- Me?
- Yeah.
I'm an old married lady.
Never. Never happened.
We've got it beat honey.
What do they call it?
Companionate marriage, eh?
Carefree, gay, legal.
- It's been wonderful.
- And you know something?
If the band keeps going the way it has been... in a couple of years, we can settle down... stop traveling and we can have a real corny, old-fashioned family.
- You mean it?
- Absolutely.
We'll have a little golden-haired corny girl.
And a corny little redheaded boy.
- Loring.
- What?
- I went to the doctor the other day.
- Yeah?
And he has a rabbit that says I'm three months corny.
Oh, that's sweet because, what?
Well, do you mind? I mean...
I mean, a rabbit knowing all about us and everything?
No, I don't mind. Honey, I...
No, if it's got to be, it's great... but should you be dancing like this baby?
Oh, I feel fine.
I know but maybe you ought to lie down. Slow down honey.
No, I feel fine.
Maybe you ought to take some mineral oil...
- or something, eh?
- No.
- How do we get you off the floor.
- Everybody, change partners.
I feel fine.
How can you feel fine when I'm nauseous?
Look, I'll get you off the floor.
- We'll find a place for you to sit.
- No Loring. Honestly, no.
Hey, look...
Play a waltz. Minuet. Stop the music.
Bobbie. Bobbie, tell him about the rabbit.
Put her down.
Stop it.
Oh Loring.
Oh Loring, don't be silly.
I'm all right. Put me down.
- I've got to sing the next number.
- Well, you're fired, both of you.
Does she really look like me?
What are you crying about?
I'm the one who has to go back... to the Canada Dry Mounties.
We've been waiting for you Mr.Nichols.
How's my little baby?
- How are you?
- Did you see the baby?
Yes but I still love you.
Everything is going to be fine honey.
I'm going to find us a little apartment in Brooklyn and...
- In Brooklyn?
- Yeah.
- What for?
- To raise our daughter.
That's the best climate for daughters.
Yeah but what about fathers?
You're supposed to open...
- in Pittsburgh on Friday.
- I know. I know.
Will you stop being concerned about it?
It's time I settled down.
I'm going to open right here.
Red Nichols and his One Penny.
I got you something. It's kind of cute.
I caught him and had him stuffed.
That'll teach him to shoot his big mouth off.
- No Loring.
- What?
No, I'm not going to let the baby change our lives.
- The baby's not going to change anything.
- You've wanted this for so long...
- and worked so hard for it.
- I know, sweetheart...
As soon as the baby's strong enough, we'll join you on that bus.
You can't afford to give up the band now.
You've got another mouth to feed.
- I thought you were going to feed it.
- I am and I'll be very happy doing it.
And I want you to do what you'll be happy doing.
I'm happy doing what I'm doing.
Not barking for the Clicquot Club Eskimos.
I know but that isn't too bad honey. I was...
- Loring.
- What?
Deep down, what do you really want to do?
Have I told you how wonderful you are?
Not lately.
Loring. Loring, stop it.
How do you expect Dorothy to sleep with that?
How do you expect us to sleep with that?
Well honey, it's a lullaby. I wrote it.
It's a lullaby called Lullaby in Ragtime.
I wrote it for the baby too, didn't I?
I know it's a lullaby. You know it's a lullaby. But the baby doesn't.
Stop making it sound like The Anvil Chorus.
Fellows, you heard what the lady said, didn't you?
Let's play it pianininimissimo and andanterini.
In case any of you have had any musical training... you know what that means.
What does it mean?
Softly.
 Won't you play the music 
 so the cradle can rock 
 To a lullaby in ragtime 
 Sleepy hands are creeping 
 to the end of the clock 
 Play a lullaby in ragtime 
 You can tell the sandman is on his way 
 By the way   that they play 
 As still as the trill of a thrush 
 In a twilight hush 
 So you can hear 
 the rhythm of the ripples 
 On the side of the boat 
 As you sail away to dreamland 
 High above the moon 
 you hear a silvery note 
 As the sandman takes your hand 
 So rock-a-by, my baby 
 don't you cry, my baby 
 Sleepy-time is nigh 
 Won't you rock me 
 To a ragtime lullaby 
 Won't you play the music 
 So the cradle can rock   Goodnight 
 To a lullaby in ragtime 
 time to call it a day 
 Sleepy hands are creeping 
 To the end of the clock   Sleep tight 
 Play a lullaby in ragtime 
 dream your troubles away 
 You can tell the sandman is on his way 
 Goodnight 
 By the way that they play 
 in spite of any sorrow 
 As still as the trill of a thrush 
 There's a brand-new day 
 In a twilight hush 
 on its way tomorrow 
 So you can hear 
 the rhythm of the ripples 
 On the side of the boat   Someday 
 As you sail away to dreamland 
 all your dreams will come true 
 High above the moon 
 You hear a silvery note   Some way 
 As the sandman takes your hand 
 for me and you 
 So rock-a-by, my baby   So close 
 Don't you cry, my baby   your eyes 
 Sleepy time is nigh 
 and dream of it, my darling 
 Won't you rock me 
 Till then, goodnight 
 To a ragtime lullaby 
 goodnight, sleep tight 
How do you like this?
With all this racket, now she's asleep.
Keep her that way honey.
Good night boys.
 I blow it through here 
 And the music goes down and around 
 And it comes out here 
- Here?
- No, there.
- Oh, there.
- Yes dear.
 I push the first valve down 
- Up?
- No, down.
 The music goes down and around 
 And it comes out here 
Here?
Now, let's not go through that again honey.
 I push the middle valve down 
 The music goes down and around 
 Below, below, below, didlio 
 Listen to the jazz come out 
 I push the other valve down 
 The music goes round and round 
 And it comes out here 
- Where?
- Here.
- There?
- No...
- There?
- No, there.
- Oh, there.
- Yes dear. That's it.
Very good. Let's take it from where the kid comes in again. She was wonderful.
- Oh hello honey.
- Hi.
Hi.
What's this supposed to be, a rehearsal?
Well, kind of a, well, yes.
It is a rehearsal because...
I got a great idea honey, a great idea.
You know the early show?
Well, Dorothy and I, it's a terrible idea. What do you think?
I think it'd be a great idea if we got her off the road. Don't you?
Yeah, I, it'd be a great idea.
Why didn't I think of that?
Well, you weren't in show business very long, were you?
That's all right honey.
You can be a bandleader.
Here. Have an all-girls band, all right?
Ok, new leader boys. Here we go.
One, two.
Let's go home.
You fellows smoking old socks or something?
There's so much smoke in here, it looks like the San Francisco fire all over again.
Hey Tony, did you get that contract set already?
- Of course.
- Did you?
- Another solid 10 months on the road.
- 10 months?
- That's a lot of loot.
- Yeah, for him.
You know, I should've made you my road manager a long time ago.
- You never could play the sax anyway.
- What do you mean?
He handles those bookers like they were blondes.
One of them is.
We'll have to take on a couple of side men. Make them feel...
- like they're getting their money's worth.
- That's easily done.
- Artie Shaw's available. So is Goodman.
- I'm out.
- I don't think I'm in, either boys.
- Four aces.
- Are you kidding?
- Glenn Miller boy card-genius.
If he makes any more money playing cards... he's going to start a band of his own.
- Yeah, he's just the type too.
- Let's fold up.
- Why don't we go down, catch Louis?
- Yeah, Louis.
- Spoken like a loser.
- Daddy, I can't sleep.
Dorothy, what are you doing up at 2 o'clock in the morning?
Where's Mommy?
I told you. She's in Las Vegas watching her friend get married.
Now go to bed honey. If she knows you're up at this hour, she'll shoot me.
- Come on, Red. Let's go.
- Louis's playing right down the block.
- Can't you break away?
- Mother would shoot him.
Dorothy, will you go to bed?
You're beginning to get on my nerves.
And put those cards down. Now go on to bed.
Go on honey.
- What do you say, a couple of hands?
- You murderer.
I'm sorry baby.
Really, I'm sorry.
I know you're lonesome for your mommy.
Come on. Aren't we pals?
Blood brothers?
Blood brothers of the Mohawk,
Blackfoot, Iroquois, Hiawatha tribe?
Alakazam kazam?
Whither thou goest, I goest.
Till death do us part.
I don't know.
Come on honey, why don't you go to bed?
I don't want to go to sleep.
I didn't say anything about going to sleep.
Why don't you just get into bed?
And then maybe you'll fall asleep better.
- I don't want to go to bed.
- Honey, it's the middle of the night.
What do you want to do, go dancing all night or something?
Oh, fine.
Madam, may I have this dance please?
No, I'm going to lead, Ok?
- You fooled me.
- No, I didn't. Come on. Come on.
Wait. Hold it. No wrestling dear.
Come on. Now that we've got you here, let's discuss this like grown-up...
- mature people, shall we?
- No.
Hey, remember me?
I'm the fellow who wrote a whole song for you.
Which is more than Mozart ever did for his kids.
 This little penny is to wish on 
 And make your wishes come true 
 This little penny is to dream on 
 And dream of all you can do 
 This little penny is a dancing penny 
 See how it glitters and it glows 
 As bright as a whistle 
 Light as a thistle 
 Quick quick as a wink 
 Up on its twinkling toes 
 This little penny is to laugh on 
 To see that tears never fall 
 This little penny 
 Is the last little penny 
 And most important of all 
 For this penny is to love on 
 And where love is, heaven is there 
 So with just five pennies 
 If they're these five pennies 
 You'll be a millionaire 
Going to go to sleep now?
Alright, into bed. Come on.
- Attagirl. Night-night.
- Night-night.
I can play poker.
- I thought you were fast asleep.
- You hum too loud.
Dorothy, will you do me a favor please, blood brother and go to bed?
- Mr. Miller taught me. Can't I play?
- No.
- Please.
- No.
Now, Dorothy, you go to bed this minute. Do you hear?
- Please?
- No. Now go on to bed.
- Dorothy, are you crying again?
- No. Murderer.
One hand but if I beat you, will you go to sleep?
Oh, yes. If you win, I'll go right to bed.
Take a chair.
Draw poker, open on anything, Ok?
- How much are we playing for?
- What?
Mr. Miller said you should always find out first.
I see. Well, what are your usual stakes?
Peanuts.
- Ok?
- I won't even count them.
That's real big of you.
Thanks.
One, two, three, four, five.
How many?
- I'm out.
- Does that mean I win?
- Yeah.
- Oh, good. I didn't have anything.
That's called bluffing.
- Another hand?
- No.
- I'll let you win.
- No.
- Aren't you sleepy yet?
- No.
Look, Pittsburgh Phil, it's a very nice night out... and the moon is very bright.
What do you say we get dressed and go out for a walk?
Oh, I'd love it.
Yeah, I'm sure you would.
Well, let's go put some clothes on.
- Will they let me in?
- Where?
Where Louis's playing.
- I won't tell mother.
- Are you sure?
Oh, good. Neither will I.
Here, let's get some...
- Daddy?
- What?
Are we blood brothers?
Whither thou goest.
Till death do us part.
It wouldn't dare.
Alakazam kazam kazam.
Let's get your clothes on.
Daddy.
 Goodnight 
 Time to call it a day 
 Sleep tight 
 Dream your troubles away 
 Goodnight 
 In spite of any sorrow 
 There's a brand-new day 
 On its way tomorrow 
 Someday 
 All your dreams will come true 
 Some way 
 For me and you 
 So close your eyes 
 And dream of it, my darling 
 Till then, goodnight 
 Goodnight 
 Sleep tight 
Now comes the hard part baby.
Do you suppose you could sing Five Pennies... while Pops and I sing something else?
Sure, I can sing as good as he can.
Well, who can't?
 Won't you play the music 
 So the cradle can rock   Goodnight 
 To a lullaby in ragtime 
 time to call it a day 
 Sleepy hands are creeping   Sleep tight 
 To the end of the clock 
 Play a lullaby in ragtime 
 dream your troubles away 
 This little penny is a dancing penny 
 See how it glitters and it glows 
 As bright as a whistle 
 Light as a thistle 
 Quick quick as a wink 
 Up on its twinkling toes 
 This little penny is to laugh on 
 To see that tears never fall 
 This little penny 
 Is the last little penny 
 And most important of all 
 For this penny is to love on 
 And where love is, heaven is there 
 So with just five pennies 
 If they're these five pennies 
 You'll be a millionaire 
That was wonderful.
Come on, kitten. I better get you home, or your mother will skin me alive.
I want to hear Mr. Armstrong sing some more.
- No, we got to go.
- I don't know about you honey... but I got to get my beauty sleep... or I'm just a mess in the morning.
Please. Do The Saints Go Marching In...
- the way you and Daddy do it.
- Come on baby. We got to go home.
What do you put in that cat's milk?
- I didn't put nothing in her milk...
- Please. Just one chorus together.
- No.
- Maybe two?
- No. No. No.
- Then I'll go home, I'll go right to bed.
- No.
- I'll even go to sleep.
- No.
- I promise.
No.
- She looks like an honest cat to me.
- You on her side or something Pops?
- Let's lay it on her, man.
- Well, all right. Just one chorus Miss.
Then we'll go home.
Don't tell your mother, eh?
Benny, you want to give me a key or something? Put me to work.
 Oh, when the saints   When the saints 
 Go marching in   go marching in 
 When the saints go marching in 
 Oh, yes 
 I want to be in that number 
 Oh, in that number 
 When the saints go marching in 
 And when the saints 
 Oh, when the saints 
 Go marching in   go marching in 
 Who's going to play on the day 
 When the saints go marching in 
 Well, Louis, I'll explain that. 
 Now, the mostest and the greatest 
 From the oldest to the latest 
 Going to play in the band 
 In the great grandstand 
 When the saints go marching in 
 - Louis, what about Brahms 
 - He laid no bombs 
 - And Chopin   - Solid man 
 And Bach, that great old massa 
 Yeah, that great old massa 
 was a Gasser 
 Yes but Mozart the most with all he has 
 With the symphonies and operas 
 and all that jazz 
 When the saints go marching in 
 - Do you dig Rachmaninoff? 
 - On and off. 
 - Rimsky?   - Of course-ikoff. 
 - Ravel and Gustav Mahler. 
 - Yeah but don't forget Fats Waller. 
 I wouldn't do that. 
 Liszt has a twist that you can't resist 
 Yeah. Yeah. Put Liszt on that list. 
 When the saints go marching in 
Here we go, Louis.
 When the saints   Oh, when the saints 
 Go marching in 
Look at this cat digging me.
 When the saints go marching in 
Face and all.
 I want to be in that number 
 When the saints go marching in 
 There's Saint-Saens 
 Saint-Saens c'est bon 
 And Georges Bizet   Trs, trs Bizet 
 Vieuxtemps, Suppe Massenet 
 And Offenbach 
- Do you dig him, Jacques?
- Very often.
 Well, Frre Jacques, Frre Jacques 
 I dig you, Jacques, I dig you, Jacques 
 Frre Jacques, Frre Jacques 
 Massenet and Bizet   Massenet and Bizet 
 I dig you, Jacques, I dig you, Jacques 
 Offenbach, Offenbach 
 Massanet and Bizet   Massenet and Bizet 
 Often, Offenbach 
 How about Wagner? 
 - Devout.   - And Haydn? 
 - Who?   - Joseph Haydn. 
 - Who?   - Haydn. 
 Well, let him come out. 
 - Paganini.   - Rossini. 
 - Toscanini.   - Puccini. 
 - Khachaturian.   - Gesundheit. 
 Thank you. 
 - And what's his name? 
 - Mr. Veedle-de-zop 
 - And you know that cat   - Yes 
 Up too high 
 Or too low 
 - Way up there   - Oh, yeah 
- Come on. Now we've got to go.
- Don't leave, folks.
A little exit music from the greatest horn in the country...
- I can't do it. Come on.
- Loring Red Nichols.
- Blow, Red, blow.
- Louis, I'd like to stay...
- Brand-new horn. Brand-new one Pops.
- Alright, here.
- Your chops is percolating.
- Yes, it's percolating, all right.
Come on, man.
 Oh, when the saints go marching in 
 Oh, when the saints go marching in 
 I want to be in that number 
 When the saints go marching in 
 And when the saints go marching in 
 When the saints go marching in 
Home, sweet home.
You know this little monster beat me out of 40 peanuts?
She cheats.
We've only got two choices... either get Dorothy off the road or teach her how to play the horn.
What did I do that was so terrible?
She had a ball.
I'll get her pajamas.
Then, after that, I'll get your pajamas.
Loring, what about what you said to me the other day?
What did I say?
Some malarkey about taking the band to New York... and settling down.
You know me like a book, don't you?
Right to the card stamped, overdue.
I heard about the new contract you signed, extending the tour.
It's a real fat deal honey.
We're going to be eating high off the hog.
Mammy won't have to go barefoot no mo'.
What about Dorothy?
I know I may seem unreasonable... but until she's at least 8 years old...
I don't want my daughter singing in nightclubs.
She'd sure knock them dead.
Not with her spelling. What about school?
We can get her a tutor.
No Loring. No, I don't want her with the band anymore.
Next week, they're liable to teach her how to smoke.
Now, look honey, she loves being around the fellows... and she's crazy about music.
What's wrong with that?
Who says she's got to go to bed when other kids go to bed... and get up when they get up?
I say. I want her to get up when other kids get up, at 7:30 in the morning... have oatmeal and orange juice and Shredded Wheat.
Honestly, she thinks breakfast is black coffee and an aspirin.
Now, listen, Bobbie.
We're all on our way, all of us.
Tonight I sat up in the club... and Louis Armstrong said
I was the greatest horn in the country.
Louis Armstrong, that's the mahatma of jazz, the supreme court of cats.
Well, I'll tell you a little secret. I'm not the greatest horn in the country. He is.
But in a little while, maybe I could be.
Then, we can pick our spot. We can get the greatest hotel job in New York... buy a house out on the Island... and I'll stack it with oatmeal and fruit juice... and I'll even get you a padded cell for PTA meetings.
When?
Soon.
Why not now?
Honey, I've got a contract.
I couldn't get out of it if I wanted to.
Do you want to?
No.
Well, then... maybe Dorothy and I should get that house and the oatmeal and wait for you.
What and leave me alone on the road for 10 months?
Bobbie, what's happened to you?
What happened to the girl who said the baby... wasn't going to change anything?
What happened to the girl... who wanted me to be doing what I'd be happy doing?
You sure scared me for a minute.
For a minute there, you looked exactly like your mother.
I'm sorry.
I guess I never really left Brooklyn.
- Loring, what's the answer?
- I don't know.
Look, couldn't we put Dorothy in a boarding school for just a little while?
Boarding school?
Don't make it sound like a jail sentence.
It's not like when David Copperfield went to school.
There are a lot of wonderful schools around here... right around here in San Francisco.
They've got playgrounds and tennis courts... and swimming pools and swings... and a couple of teachers thrown in, if you insist.
- I don't know.
- It'd only be for a term.
Two terms.
We could visit her every chance we got.
- Bring her a cake with a file in it?
- She'll love it. You'll see.
Alright Loring, on one condition.
- What?
- You tell her.
Yeah, all right.
I'll tell her first thing in the morning.
She'll understand. We're blood brothers.
Alakazam kazam.
There's been a terrible storm here in St. Louis... and all the planes are grounded.
I'd like to fly out by myself, but I can't flap my arms fast enough.
No baby. No, there's absolutely no way... we could get out in time for your birthday.
I'm sorry honey. You understand, don't you?
Hello? Hello?
Blackhawk in the heart of Chicago's Loop.
A merry Christmas from the nation's number one band...
Red Nichols and the Five Pennies.
- A little more white meat?
- Yes please.
You see, my parents always have to work on Christmas.
That's why they can't come for me.
- May I have a piece of skin please?
- We understand, Dorothy.
You don't have to explain.
They always call me on the telephone though.
Are there any more potatoes, Miss Wilson?
Oh dear. I'll have to go back to the kitchen and get some...
- and the plum pudding.
- I'll help you.
- Dorothy.
- Mommy.
Oh baby.
- Don't worry.
- Yeah. Don't worry.
Barber shop. Who?
Just a minute. Mr. Nichols, it's for you.
Hey, what...
- Don't shake your head.
- Long distance, California.
- Ok. Hello?
- What's the matter? You crazy...
Don't worry. Just lie down.
- Yeah hello, Bobbie. How are you?
- You don't worry. I finish it.
- How do you like school?
- Don't worry. I'll take care of it.
Was Dorothy surprised? Yeah.
What?
When? What happened?
Listen, yeah, I'll take the first plane out.
- Red, what's the matter?
- Your coat. Your coat.
You're about to enter a contagious disease ward.
Please be as quiet as possible.
Keep your arms at your side.
Keep your distance from the patients at all times.
Do not touch anything. Now, follow me.
If you drop anything, do not pick it up, and do not touch the wall.
Please do not touch the patients... or anything the patients have been in contact with.
How is she?
How is she Doc?
I'd like to be more encouraging,
Mr. Nichols but it's polio... complicated by encephalitis.
The child's been in a coma for 48 hours.
I'm afraid the chances are very slim.
That's your opinion.
Not only mine. All the doctors on the staff.
Well, then get another staff...
- or another hospital.
- Loring.
Listen, you, that's my daughter you're talking about... and you're not going to make a statistic out of her... and give up before you even get started.
If you don't know anything, get somebody who does.
Do something for her, will you Doc?
Hi.
I finally found an all-night hamburger joint right on the corner.
Any word?
Isn't it funny? You live with a man seven or eight years... and you forget whether he takes mustard or ketchup on his hamburgers.
I'm not hungry.
Now I remember. Ketchup.
- I couldn't eat it anyway...
- Come on please. Go on. Eat it Loring.
You know, I started out blaming you too.
The first few hours, I hated you, and then I got to thinking.
This could have happened no matter where Dorothy was.
Even people that never let their kids out of their sight... this happens to them.
Who can you blame? The whole world?
I can narrow it down a little better than that.
When I threw a couple of things together to come out here... the first thing
I threw in my bag was my cornet.
That'll give you a rough idea.
Oh, go on Loring. You got to eat something.
If, by any miracle, that kid comes through this...
I'm going to give up this whole rat race.
I didn't think you believed in miracles.
Right now, there's very little else to believe in.
Loring... you remember the lyric to The Battle Hymn of the Republic?
What brought that up?
Well, it's been so long since either of us were at a church festival.
I thought we might be able to remember that one.
I can't remember it at all and I must've played it 1,000 times.
Mine eyes have seen the glory... of the coming of the Lord.
He is trampling down the, something... where the grapes of wrath are stored.
Doesn't seem to fit the situation here, does it?
It's the only one we know. What's the rest?
He has loosed the awful lightning... of His terrible swift sword.
- His truth is marching on.
- Mrs. Nichols... your daughter's calling you.
She's...
Come on honey. Dorothy's calling.
Put down the sandwich. You're always eating.
- Hello baby.
- Darling, hi.
Hello, sweetheart.
Alakazam kazam.
Sorry but you'd better go now.
We don't want to overdo it, you know?
- Oh Doctor please.
- Please.
I'd like my mother to stay.
Just have to cancel the tour.
That's all. Taxi.
What do you mean, cancel the tour?
Red, they'll sue you for every dime you should've saved in the past five years.
- We got a contract.
- We'll pay them off.
Pay them off? With what?
Look, tell the boys in the band that...
Well, I don't know how you're going to tell them.
It's still the same as being fired.
But tell them I'm sorry, and pay them off too.
Where am I going to get it? You've been living like there's no income tax.
And now, you got doctor bills like crazy.
- You ever see anything like this?
- Yeah.
That waitress I took out last night.
Red, would you listen to me?
Taxi.
You know what those doctors had the nerve to tell me?
I had a big consultation.
They said that Dorothy would never ever walk again.
Never ever.
You think I'm going to take that lying down?
Sure, Red. Fire the hospital.
- So long Tony.
- What do you mean? I'm going with you.
It's been great knowing you.
So you finally got around to firing me, eh?
- Who else is left?
- Ok.
Do me a favor, will you Tony?
Don't tell the boys what happened. I mean...
- you just don't know where I am, Ok?
- Sure.
I never saw you before in my whole life.
So long, stranger. About those doctors... pretty soon they'll be working for you.
- Over here.
- Look at me, Red.
Well, take it easy.
You're going to pull the whole roof down.
I can do it three times.
You can? I can only do it twice.
How you getting along with your neighbor?
Boy, you got a strange one.
Only exercise she's done since she's been here...
- was when she tried to spit in my eye.
- Shut up.
- There she goes again.
- Well, that's how it goes.
Honey, I got a nice assortment for you today.
First, we have what we call a little raggaplumian doll right here.
And then, we have...
Oh, this is the great one. Look.
All you got to do is push it down like that, and it'll play the cymbals for you.
You know I can't reach.
The doctor says you could if you wanted to.
Oh, sure. Easy as pie.
- Hey, Red.
- Yeah?
What about our glee club?
Not today Billy. I don't feel up to it.
Oh, brother. Must run in the family.
How about it kids?
Have you all done your practicing?
- Yeah.
- Mi, mi, mi, mi, mi.
Well, don't call me. I'll call you.
- Let's do Schnitzelbank again.
- Yeah.
Hold. Hold on. Hold the phone.
We can't do Schnitzelbank.
The last time we did Schnitzelbank...
I beat you by two choruses and a half a Schnitz.
- Alright, here we go.
- Why does he come down here... and make a regular spectacle out of himself?
Well, I don't know.
Maybe for some strange reason he likes to be around you.
Oh, sure. As soon as I'm better,
I'll never see him again.
We now have a solo with the big soprano here, right? Alright.
Yes, you are ready to sing now?
Ja. Well, this is nice. Alright.
Ja. Well, you will be the soprano in the first part.
And then, after, we will come back to the tenors and the baronodes. Ja?
- Dorothy.
- What's that?
That's my present... from that fellow that's making a regular spectacle out of himself.
- It's a house.
- I believe it is.
We're going to live in it as soon as you get out of here.
- All of us?
- All of us. All the time.
Down in Los Angeles, where the doctors say the sunshine's better for you.
Our own whole house that's ours?
Ours and the First National Bank.
- Our own towels?
- It's a thought.
Hold it up again.
This is the most delicious thing your mother has cooked... since we've been in this house.
Blanket a la mode, it's delicious.
Don't let him put any more of those hot things on me. They burn. They burn.
We have to, Dorothy. You've got to understand that we have to.
Alright, nothing is going to make her cry, is it? Is anything making you cry?
- No, nothing.
- That's a good girl.
But those hot things won't do any good.
Nothing will.
You think that's real crying?
No, it's nothing but a fake.
When I was Dorothy's age... we had some kids on our block who could really cry.
We had a kid called Fat Tommy.
Now, there was a crier. When he cried, you could hear him for miles around.
He'd go...
Everybody heard him.
Then, there was Meyer the crier.
Now, he was a fine crier.
Meyer the crier was a crier fine.
Meyer, crier, was a fine crier.
Did you know that?
He would hiccup when he cried. He would go...
Now, you know, did I ever tell you about Silent Sam?
- There was a fine crier.
- No.
He never made a sound. He was what we'd call a back-draft crier.
Did you ever hear one of those?
He didn't make any sound at all on the way out, only on the way back.
He would go...
But you know who was the champ of all? Joe Whiffenbeck.
He used to cry like he was laughing and laugh like he was crying.
He used to go...
You cry when you laugh too, don't you?
Well Joe Whiffenbeck... where have you been all this time?
Come on baby. We better give Daddy a hug.
Just roll over very easily. That's a girl.
How about putting me down for some extra overtime? I'll take all I can get.
You trying to stop the war in Europe all by yourself?
I got a couple of wars. So long.
Brown John A.
- Dorothy? Look what I got.
- Give it to me.
Yeah, well, I will in just a minute.
Come on. You want it?
Come on baby. Come on. Come on.
Come on. Come and get it.
Come and get it. Come and get it.
There you go.
That's a good girl. Come on.
- That's good.
- Come on. That's wonderful.
Hold it. Hold it.
Drawbridge.
Here we go. Here.
Oh, no, that's a railroad.
It's a steamship honey.
Now, come on. Try it again.
There she blows men. Man the lifeboats. Steady the rudder boys.
Look to the harpoons. Ahoy.
If you put some whiskey with that soda,
I'll do it all afternoon with you, Ok?
 Stand up, stand up 
 Stand up and tell us your name 
 your name 
 Stand up, stand up 
 Stand up and tell us your name 
My name is Dorothy Nichols, and I'm 14 years old... and I'm having a very happy birthday.
And Richard Wilson, you've had four sandwiches... and you're only getting half a piece of cake.
Human vacuum cleaner.
- Make a wish and blow out the candles.
- Ok.
It's too bad you kids were so hungry you couldn't wait... for Dorothy's father to get home from work.
We can wait. Just bake another cake.
Hey, let's put on some records.
- That's a good idea.
- Then we can all dance.
I'm sorry.
That's all right.
You kids go ahead and dance.
I'll put on the records.
Daddy's very fussy about them.
Oh, one of those.
He probably blows his top... if you play anything but Jeanie With the Light Brown Hair.
You'd be surprised.
You know Mr.Nichols started the original Five Pennies.
What's Five Pennies?
Am I getting that old?
Is he hip enough to have some Benny
Goodman or Jimmy Dorsey here?
All of them. Jimmy and Benny used to work in his band.
Mama, don't put it on too thick.
Benny Goodman and Jimmy Dorsey?
Well, don't you remember?
Jimmy Dorsey used to bring you candy and peanuts.
Was that the same Jimmy Dorsey?
Well, how did he get so famous?
Stopped working for peanuts.
You know who else worked for your father?
Tommy Dorsey and Charlie Teagarden... and Glenn Miller and Gene Krupa...
And Ludwig Von Beethoven.
Their names are on the labels.
I'll go find some records and show them to you.
Really? How about some punch or cookies or anything?
Dorothy, honestly, don't you really remember?
Well, I remember he had a band, and he was pretty good but...
Well, if he was that good, why did he quit?
Well, I guess you wouldn't believe that, either.
- Come on. Let's get a little jive, eh?
- Yeah, man.
That sounds like Artie Shaw's band, and he used to play for Mr. Nichols too.
If your father was such a hotshot bandleader... how come he's working with my old man down at the shipyard?
Oh, I don't know.
You know, my mother's 34 years old.
I think she's getting senile.
Don't worry.
They'll find a drug or something.
They better hurry.
How about a big hand for Glenn Miller and the boys... for coming down to give us this show?
And here's Glenn himself.
Thank you. Thanks, fellows.
Now we'd like to do a real oldie... one of the jazz classics from the good old days... that I used to play when I was first trombone... with Red Nichols and the famous Five Pennies, Indiana.
Hey, Ernie. Where you going?
I got to get home.
It's my daughter's birthday.
- Ain't you going to stay for the music?
- I've heard it.
- Hello.
- Hi Daddy.
- Happy birthday.
- Thank you.
- Where did you find those old records?
- In the closet.
I thought I asked you to throw all of these out.
I'm glad you didn't.
Some of them are pretty funny.
Yeah, hilarious.
Say Mr.Nichols, was that really you playing that old trumpet?
The instrument you're referring to is known as a cornet.
Cornet.
They still got a few of them left at the Smithsonian Institute... right next to the dinosaurs.
Saving a place for me too.
I'm sure that was Dad playing.
I can remember. And he was good.
He played just like Harry James.
Harry James plays something like me, only not enough.
- Alright.
- We believe you.
There was Bix and there was Louis, and there was me... and that was it.
- You and Bix and Louis.
- That's right.
- I'll remember.
- Just do that, will you son?
Mr. Nichols, my father used to listen to you all the time... and he told me all about you.
- Yeah, well, that's something.
- He said that you were smart... to get out of the business before the parade passed you by.
I have got a message for your father... except you're not old enough to deliver it.
Dad, would you like to lie down and take a rest?
No, I'm fine.
I wouldn't like anything of the sort.
Wish I had a horn here.
I'd show you kids something.
Will this do?
This is one of my old horns.
Where did you find it?
Tony sent it a long time ago.
He thought some member of the family ought to start playing.
He did, eh?
I've got some homework to do.
See you tomorrow, Dorothy.
Nice party.
Don't you want to stay just a little while?
Well, you don't have to go now, do you?
Is he always like this?
Idiotville, USA, and The Brown Derby is the capital.
You promised for our anniversary you'd take me anywhere I wanted to go.
Yeah, I know.
- It's a long time since we ever went out.
- Right.
- Look. Isn't that Bob Hope?
- No, he can't afford to eat here, either.
- Let's sit where all the movie stars are.
- What about under the table?
If you knew how I hated to go to these places...
- Got a table for three please?
- What's the name please?
Nichols.
- Loring Nobody Nichols.
- I'm sorry. There's a half-an-hour wait.
Could I try another name?
I'm sorry. You have to wait just like everybody else. I'm sorry.
Hey, Red. Paisan, can it be you?
It's like out of the blue.
- Hello Tony.
- What is this?
You don't see a guy for six or seven years... and that's the best you can do? Hello Tony.
- Not even a handshake?
- Hello Tony.
- Now that's what I call a handshake.
- Hello Mr.Valani.
Dorothy. Listen, come on and sit at my table.
- Wonderful.
- It's all right, Lou.
You know I'm handling bands now for the Morris office?
They pick up all the checks, and I spend all my time eating.
- That's fine.
- You know, it's just like a miracle.
I don't hear from you for years... and then, just today, I was talking to a couple of the big boys about you.
What this music business needs right now is another Red Nichols.
If they can't find a hole in the head.
Tony, how come the table is set for four?
Are you expecting the Andrews Sisters?
As for you, you don't even like movie stars.
I do.
Alright Loring. It's a plot.
I read that Tony was in town, so I called him.
Of course, I can't start you right off at Carnegie Hall, you know?
But listen, there's a little club on Ventura Boulevard. It's a beginning.
Not for me. Let's get out of here baby.
Red, what's the matter?
It's another guy you're talking about Tony. Just forget it.
- Red?
- Red.
Hey, Red. Hey, man, where have you been?
- Hi Jimmy. Hello, Glenn. How are you?
- It's good to see you.
- And Bobbie. Is that Dorothy?
- It is.
What're you doing with Tony?
I thought you were out of the music business for good.
Oh, no, we're just passing through on my way to Hawaii.
- That's great. Retired, eh?
- Yeah. Yeah, I'm retired... just sit at home, clipping coupons all the time.
I never knew any member of the Union ever made it.
- Well, you're looking at one Jimmy.
- Oh, yeah.
Well, I'd like to hang around boys, but I've got to go and see my broker.
How about some food?
- No, thanks.
- No, we're not hungry.
- Mr. Dorsey.
- Yeah.
- Well, I got it.
- Well, let me have it.
No, I can handle it, fellows.
Jimmy, the next time... some lush asks you to play
Melancholy Baby just one more time... and you're out there breaking your backs... on those one-nighters out in the sticks... just remember the one fellow who made it, eh?
The old redhead, remember him?
- Sure enough.
- So long, slaves.
- Good to see you. Take care.
- Good luck, Red.
It's a great future you and Tony figured out for me.
Hotlips Nichols, at my age.
How may I help you fix this sandwich?
You've got everything in it but the dog.
Blowing my brains out in some nightclub.
You build any good ships lately?
No. Well, now honey, you know the music business.
It's a lot different now.
People don't want my kind of music anymore.
That wouldn't have stopped you before.
I've been sitting around here for years... waiting for you to punish yourself enough... so you could go back to the only thing that makes you happy... but you've been punishing yourself so long...
- you're beginning to like it.
- Bobbie.
Well, what happened to the wonderful lunatic I married?
- That was ages ago.
- I don't know if it'll be good, bad... or terrible, and I don't think that really matters.
I just want to get you out of that shipyard before we lose the war.
I'm beginning to think I've lost mine.
You can sleep in that sandwich Tonight.
Pull the rye bread over you.
I'm not going to start all over again like I was 18.
That's not for me.
None of us are as young as we used to be, you know.
Except your mother, of course.
She's about four and a half.
Dad, why did you quit the music business?
I forget.
I guess I never even said thank you.
I can remember so many things now.
So can I baby.
The ice age and the big flood... and Noah waving me aboard.
Daddy?
Would it be too tough for you... to try and pick up where you left off?
You want to know the truth?
Yes, it would be too tough.
My lip's gone honey.
I've laid off too long... and when that happens to a horn player... it just never comes back. It...
Well, in my case anyway, it would be... just impossible. That's all.
I remember, when I talked like that... and you threw a hot blanket on me, right on this table.
There's a lot of your mother in you, isn't there?
You don't seem to understand any better than she does.
All these fellows I started in the band business... are all big-time bandleaders now.
Benny, Glenn Jimmy...
They'd be laughing up their sleeves at me.
There was one kid on our block,
Meyer the crier.
Good night, Meyer.
Some of the kids still laugh at me.
- Good night.
- Good night dear.
Hey Tony, feast your eyes on this mammoth opening.
My name outside certainly pulled them in, didn't it?
- Could shoot a cannon out there.
- It's still pretty early yet.
It's awful late.
At least, I thought a couple of fellow dinosaurs would show up... only to see how long it took me to crack my lip.
I guess fans forget pretty good, don't they?
Hey, paisan... you got two fans out there... that I'd give all the willing waitresses in Hoboken for.
What do you care if nobody shows up?
Go out there and play for them.
Yeah. I would ask them if they got some cotton with witch hazel on it...
Now, wait a minute. Listen to me, will you? I never told you this before... but all the time on the road, you know?
I was having all that fun... and you were tied down with your companion and baby?
Well, I thought you were the luckiest guy in the world... and I still think so.
Look at me. $150 suits, shoes from England... closets full of everything, including dames.
I mean, what am I trying to prove? Tell me.
Next time I go east, maybe I'll stop off in Brooklyn, eh?
Who knows?
I guess I'll go out and keep the kids company.
Yeah.
He's been practicing two solid months.
 Won't you come home Bill Bailey 
 Won't you come home? 
 I'm feeling all alone 
 Now, I know I'm to blame 
 Ain't that a shame 
 Bill Bailey, 
 won't you please come home 
Joseph Haydn, why didn't you come out sooner?
Bobbie, why don't you come up here?
I'd like to have the whole band.
Go on, Bobbie. Go on.
You come too.
Ladies and gentlemen, our society chanteuse Miss Bobbie Meredith.
- Aren't they wonderful?
- Yeah.
- Someday, they'll all be working for me.
- Come on, Bobbie. Belt it out.
I don't think I can.
I'm a little misty-eyed tonight.
I've got a surprise for you too.
You, you couldn't be.
- Show me the rabbit.
- Now, you turn around.
Alright.
May I have this dance?
 This little penny is to wish on 
 And make your wishes come true 
 This little penny is to dream on 
 Dream of all you can do 
 This little penny is a dancing penny 
 See how it glitters and it glows 
 As bright as a whistle 
 Light as a thistle 
 Quick 
 This little penny is to laugh on 
 To see that tears never fall 
 This little penny 
 Is the last little penny 
 And most important of all 
 For this penny is to love on 
 And where love is, heaven is there 
 So with just five pennies 
 If they're these five pennies 
That's enough baby.
 You'll be a millionaire 
Put me down.
I can stand on my own two feet now.
So can I, my darling.
- Alakazam kazam kazam.
- Alakazam kazam kazam.
Give me my horn Tony.
[Melodic instrumental music]
[Upbeat instrumental music playing]
[Upbeat instrumental music continues playing]
Now, Marty, don't get sore.
Who's sore? When Georgie tells me a customer don't want to pay up his bill... naturally I want to hear why.
Because I'm tired of being milked like a cow every week.
Why can't I pay you off once and for all?
Cut that out, Orry.
I run a legitimate laundry.
ORRY: What laundry says how many tablecloths and napkins you gotta take?
My laundry. It's our policy.
We want our customers should be clean.
ORRY: Who needs so many tablecloth?
Who comes into a place like this to eat?
Every customer has a quota.
Otherwise it wouldn't pay me.
Mr. Orry.
ORRY: That's all right.
I saw the whole thing.
It's you again.
She broke my leg. I'm gonna sue this joint.
My dear man, so a girl steps on your toe.
It was an accident.
Accident nothing.
She kicked me on purpose.
- Impossible.
- I can explain everything.
Did you deliberately kick this customer?
- Yes, I did. But I warned him three times.
- You're fired. Now you...
That's not fair.
He's wrong. It wasn't my fault.
He's got 10 cents for a dance.
He can't be wrong.
Cash in your tickets and get out of here.
The next dance is on the house.
Enjoy yourself.
But be careful the way you dance.
Get him a girl.
[People chattering]
Marty, you gotta understand my angle.
Now, business hasn't been so...
Not bad, huh? I could fix it up for you.
She's one of those stage-struck ones.
You know the type.
Too bad, kid.
You gonna pay up, Orry, or you want we should suspend our service?
What did you have to go and make a fuss for?
Why should I let that big ape paw me?
- It's natural. They all do it.
- Not to me, they don't.
Yeah, I forgot.
You're different. You're going places.
That's right.
Get wise to yourself, duchess.
You're not going anyplace.
Not till you stop hollering, "Hands off."
I'll stop hollering when I want to.
Not because the customer's always right.
RUTH: Have you had a good look?
I understand you wanna go on the stage.
Maybe I can help you.
You get out of here, or I'll call the manager.
This happens to be a private dressing room.
Private for employees, which you're not no longer.
You want me to help you go on the stage?
Why don't you buy a ticket and try your line on one of the employees?
- That is, if you have 10 cents.
- If he has 10 cents?
He's the owner of the biggest night club laundry in Chicago...
- eight trucks, a payroll of 43.
- I know everybody in the business.
- They're my customers.
- He can introduce you...
- to a dozen guys...
- Shut up.
What're you butting in for? I can't talk?
I'll give you one of my own personal cards.
Why should you?
Why not? I like to help a girl when I can.
And you've got a very excellent personality, I can see that.
I only need to write something on my card and they'll put you to work.
I must have left them out in my car.
MARTY: Meet me outside, and I'll...
Now what's the matter?
I'm not getting into any car with you.
MARTY: Who said you should?
Who invited you?
I said, "Meet me at the car."
You dope, he's trying to give you a break. Take advantage.
MARTY: Or don't. If you want it, okay.
If not, not.
MARTY: Come on, Claire. Get out.
CLAIRE: What?
Here, buy yourself a horse and buggy.
Only beat it.
What's the matter?
You invite me out for a pleasant evening.
- I wait who knows how long...
- So I changed my mind. Go on, blow.
Getting awful beat up, that Claire.
Been around too long.
Hi, baby.
MAN: Honey, I'd like to...
MARTY: Up an alley.
What's your name?
Ruth Etting.
Take this over to the Circle.
You know where it is?
It's on the North Side.
They'll fix you up. Go on, take it.
Can I give you a lift someplace?
I'm just trying to be agreeable.
Don't do me no favors.
- Do you want the card back?
- Keep it.
Use it in good health.
You wanna know what's your trouble, girlie?
You ain't got no faith in human nature.
GEORGIE: That's all?
She's obligated, ain't she?
So, what're you sitting?
Maybe we can catch up with Claire.
So she's got a lot of mileage on her.
[SIow instrumental music playing]
[SIow instrumental music continues playing]
[Dancers exclaiming]
[Audience applauding]
[Singing upbeat song]
Eddie Fulton.
[Audience applauding]
[Singing lively song]
JINGLE GIRL: Thanks, kid.
Only one chorus in the next number, girls.
We're running late.
Hurray for Johnny Alderman, the people's friend.
Taking in laundry? I got a sackful of socks.
I wish I had. These have to last till payday.
The point is, can you last till payday?
I get tired just watching you out there.
I must be something to watch.
I'm just not a dancer, that's all.
It seems odd you'd want a job dancing then.
I didn't. They made a mistake. I'm a singer.
Oh?
- You had much experience?
- None so far. I'm just starting.
You going about it the right way?
What do you mean? Somebody gives me a chance to sing, I'll sing.
I've seen a lot of singers fail because they get off to a bad start.
Right now is when you need coaching, before you have time to form bad habits.
You need special material, arrangements to show off what you've got.
That is, if you're serious about it.
I'm serious, all right. I'm also broke.
That'd take a lot of money.
Tell you what.
I might work with you a little, if you like.
Odd hours after the show.
Would you? That would be wonderful.
It would be a pleasure.
One artist to another.
I have a piano at my place.
JOHNNY: It isn't far from here.
We could squeeze in quite a bit of time.
Wouldn't that be an awful lot of trouble for you?
There's some trouble a man doesn't mind getting into.
FROBISHER: Get ready, girls. Five minutes.
GIRL: Saved by the gong.
Better get back to your piano.
Will you kindly use your head?
That one belongs to the Gimp, bought and paid for.
- The Gimp?
- So don't make trouble for yourself, or me.
I got a big investment in this place.
It's funny. I would have sworn she hasn't been around much.
Maybe she hasn't.
What she knows, they learn in the cradle.
MARTY: Wait a minute, Frobisher.
MARTY: Etling, I'm here.
RUTH: Hello, Mr. Snyder.
I got my own laundry, eight trucks, and she does her own washing. Cute, huh?
- They treating you right, kid?
- They're wonderful to me.
Okay, Frobisher, thanks. Blow.
I delivered, didn't I? Tell the truth.
You thought
I was giving you the business, right?
I've got to go.
Frobisher, the kid is staying out of this one.
FROBISHER: Sure, why not?
RUTH: No, I better go.
RUTH: No...
MARTY: He won't mind.
There is something I want to ask you.
You see, I'm dancing.
That's great.
Tell me, have you ever been to Florida?
No, I haven't. I hate to bother you...
You'll be crazy about it. Take it from me.
All the girls are nuts about Miami.
Mr. Frobisher put me in the chorus...
He won't fire you, don't worry.
He wouldn't dare.
It's the worst weather here, freezing cold.
In Miami, you go swimming in the ocean every day.
I don't want to dance, I want to sing.
Singing, dancing, what's the difference?
You're on the stage, ain't you?
MARTY: In here, Georgie.
GEORGIE: All set. Got the train tickets.
How do you like that?
We're leaving Friday night.
- Leaving for where?
- For where? For Florida.
Little girl, you gotta start listening to me.
But I don't want to go to Florida.
MARTY: Why not?
How do you know you won't like it?
MARTY: You've never been there.
You said so yourself. You'll love it.
What's not to like?
[Marty exclaims]
She thinks it's a line.
She thinks I say Miami,
I mean Atlantic City.
- Georgie, show her the tickets.
- Here are the tickets.
MARTY: Frobisher will keep your job for you. Don't worry.
Mr. Snyder, I'm not going.
MARTY: Georgie, get out of here.
Beat it.
- Look here, you stupid little broad...
- Don't you talk to me like that.
I'll talk to you any way I like.
You know who I am?
You think I let dames get away with anything?
I'm not trying to get away with anything.
I didn't ask you for one thing.
You didn't ask but you wanted.
I did my share, what about you?
Who do you think you are? You're nothing.
MARTY: Get funny with me, and I'll throw you back to that crummy dance joint.
You won't have to. I'll walk back.
What are you doing?
RUTH: I'm leaving.
All I wanted was a chance to sing.
And I'll get it.
You don't have to do a thing.
I'll get it for myself.
Hey, Etling.
What's her name?
Ruth. Ruthie, come on out.
What did I say that was so terrible?
What crime did I commit?
- Come on like a good girl.
- Want me to drag her out, Marty?
Get out of here.
GIRL 1: Deal me in.
GIRL 2: Hurry up.
That's all we wait for Etting.
All right, kids, rehearsal. Let's go.
- Gay, you take Etting's place.
- I'm a specialty.
[Lively piano music playing]
- Mr. Snyder wants to see you right away.
- I'm working. Sorry.
Listen, I asked you nice, didn't I?
You want me to ask you not nice?
Sure. Might as well have both versions.
Johnny.
You think the Gimp found out you talked to the girl?
Maybe. If he has, you think I should crawl into the laundry and apologize?
Well, I would.
But I'm an old man and I want to live.
What else have I got? You better go.
MANAGER: But, Mr. Frobisher, we can't rehearse without music.
FROBISHER: So hum to them.
GIRL 3: Hum?
MANAGER: All right, girls, line up.
Come on, line up.
MANAGER: One, two, three, four.
[Manager and girls singing]
You notice how the help all wear gloves?
Once the wash is washed, it ain't touched by a human hand.
Maybe I'm crazy, but I like things clean.
Sit down, make yourself comfortable.
- Marty, the piano player.
- Oh, yeah.
MARTY: How much you get an hour to coach?
JOHNNY: Coach?
MARTY: Miss Etling.
MARTY: She wants to sing.
She thinks she shouldn't make bad habits at the beginning.
She should have arrangements, you know what I mean?
MARTY: What do you get by the hour?
JOHNNY: $5.
I'll give you $10.
Anybody hangs around me, they make.
Well, can she sing?
What is she, a dummy? Anybody can sing.
Put them on a stage, tell the public they're singers. They're singers.
What does the public know?
You want the job?
- At $10 an hour? Sure.
- Right. You got yourself a deal.
- Georgie will take you back.
- When would you like to start?
You can fix it up between you later.
Don't take it too serious, the lessons.
A couple, to make her feel good.
I'll be taking her to Florida any day now.
You know what I mean.
[Johnny playing slow piece on piano]
RUTH: Sorry I took so long changing.
I'm getting paid by the hour.
By the way, thanks for cutting me in.
I got the idea from you.
But I would've done it for nothing.
I thought it was better if you got paid.
JOHNNY: Let's get started and see what we got.
All right.
You know this?
[Ruth vocalizing]
Yes.
[Singing slow song]
[SIow piano music playing]
[Continues singing slow song]
Yes, ma'am.
Am I any good?
Am I good enough to get somewhere?
JOHNNY: Yeah.
Will you tell that to Mr. Snyder, Johnny?
I need someone like him.
RUTH: You know, sort of a manager.
- You expect him to be your manager?
- Why not? He has a lot of connections.
JOHNNY: You're kidding, aren't you?
RUTH: No.
You were quick enough to spot a routine friendly pass when I made it.
You must have a vague idea of what he wants.
JOHNNY: Do you know what his exact plans for you are?
JOHNNY: He's taking you to Florida with him. He told me so himself.
He told me that, too.
But I'm not packing.
[Knocking on door]
- I had a date. I forgot.
- I wouldn't tell him that. Think fast, kid.
Just out of plain, simple curiosity...
I'd like to know why you gave me a standup. You got my message.
I told her myself, Marty.
Let me hear the fancy story you're gonna give me. Go on, I dare you.
No story, Mr. Snyder. I just forgot.
You forgot?
I don't know how I could have, but I did. And I'm very sorry.
- Will you forgive me?
- Naturally, I thought...
I didn't know what to think.
You certainly didn't think
I'd do a thing like that to you?
That's all right, dear.
Everybody can make a mistake.
- How's she doing?
- Not bad, not bad at all.
In fact, she's quite a performer.
Did you hear that, Mr. Snyder?
Now will you talk to Mr. Frobisher and ask if I can have a little song?
I'll talk to him when I get good and ready.
How do you like that?
You had one lesson.
Who says it's time for a swelled head?
You think you can fool the public?
You want to get up before people and embarrass me?
I'm sorry.
It's just been on my mind, you know.
I guess this is my night
for making mistakes, isn't it?
It's because you're tired.
You're not thinking good.
You got no business keeping her up so late.
Come on, I'll take you home.
You go right to bed.
Thank you.
[Upbeat instrumental music playing]
[Audience applauding]
[Singing upbeat song]
Eddie Fulton.
FROBISHER: Where's Fulton?
MAN: I don't know.
- Fulton, you're on.
- Great.
- What'd I tell you? A knockout.
- Yeah, you told me.
GIRL: Fulton, hurry up.
FROBISHER: You're on.
FULTON: Sorry.
FROBISHER: If it's hard to get here... why not quit and spend all your time at the crap table?
And don't forget, smile.
You got what you wanted, huh?
What's the matter? You don't look happy.
You wanted a chance to sing, and I got you that.
But I'm on and off in a second.
- What did you expect?
- Well, it's not a real number.
I was just thinking of something.
Suppose Fulton missed a performance.
If I could substitute...
Fulton? He's a headliner, you're a newcomer. You just started.
Well, somebody would have to take his place.
How do you like that.
Here I'm suspecting she wants me... to work Frobisher for an extra routine, but no.
All the time, she wants the whole business.
What do you want me to do?
Knock him off?
Of course not, Mr. Snyder.
But if he missed a show...
Why should he?
Answer me that, Miss Smart.
It could happen, couldn't it?
It almost happened tonight, didn't it?
The nerve you've got. The gall.
Look, would you consider coming into the laundry business with me?
We'll be millionaires in no time.
[Both chuckling]
Marty, I tell you, no. You've got a laundry.
I'm a customer, fine.
You asked me to give her a job.
I give her a job, fine. But there's a limit.
I'm not putting her on tonight or any other night.
But you're stuck. You ain't got Fulton.
Why should he walk out on me?
He got deep in gambling.
They told him to get it up quick... and the poor slob didn't have it.
How come the poor slob has it to go to Florida?
What're you asking me?
Frobisher, she'll be a sensation.
To who? Whoever heard of her?
Who'll come to see her?
You want to close my club?
Are you kidding?
You know the contacts I got.
Personalities, people who'll be a credit to the finest nightclubs.
They'll spend, they'll clap, you'll make a fortune.
On the other hand, Frobisher, maybe I got you all wrong.
Maybe you don't wanna oblige a close personal pal.
[Knocking on door]
Come in.
RUTH: How do I look?
JOHNNY: Top of the world.
Here it is, Johnny, the chance I've been waiting for.
But you made sure it wasn't too long a wait.
You bet I did. I'm in a hurry.
And I was right, wasn't I?
Told you he'd help me.
Ruth, get rid of him now.
It's not going to be worth it.
I don't know what you're talking about.
Why shouldn't I have a manager?
A manager? Don't lie to yourself.
If you're going ahead with this... at least don't lie to yourself.
But don't go ahead with it.
You don't have to.
Yes, I do. I've tried it without help.
I didn't mind it being hard, Johnny.
I just minded that it didn't work.
Then let me help you.
I'll get you to the right people.
I'll work with you and they'll want you.
They won't have to be strong-armed, blackmailed, or shoved around.
They'll want you because you're good.
Try it, Ruth. Try it that way.
Johnny, so many guys have wanted to help me.
And they've all been on the make, just like him.
- I suppose you're the one who's different?
- That's right.
And I mean it. But get yourself free, Ruth.
But I am free. I've made no promises.
RUTH: I'm as free as you.
JOHNNY: Are you?
RUTH: Yes.
JOHNNY: Prove it.
Let's meet tonight after the show.
Have a cup of coffee together.
Just two free people getting together over a cup of coffee.
Why not?
All right.
[Stage bell buzzing]
That's us. It will be great.
- I'm ready.
- Come on, it's time.
Get out there, do your stuff.
Don't make me out a horse's neck.
I got the place packed with biggies.
Get a load of that.
I thought it up myself.
Come on, I'm a nervous wreck.
RUTH: Excuse me.
[Upbeat instrumental music playing]
[Audience applauding]
[Romantic instrumental music playing]
[Audience applauding]
[Singing romantic song]
[Continues singing romantic song]
[Audience applauding]
[Whistling]
[Singing lively song]
[Continues singing lively song]
[Audience whistling and applauding]
- Look at the flowers.
- Just a little token of the way I feel.
Oh, Marty. Thank you. They're lovely.
Don't thank me, hug me, and throw me out so quick.
- I have to get dressed.
- Make it fast. We gotta celebrate.
- Marty.
- What?
I'm so tired and excited,
I don't think I can go out tonight.
Sure you can. It's all set up.
A big fancy blowout over at Al Gaxley's place.
That's way out in Bay Cliff, in the country.
Sort of a house party for the weekend.
Hurry up. We gotta leave right away.
Look, why don't you go ahead without me?
No.
It's just that I'm so tired.
No. Not this time, Ruthie.
That's all over.
What're you talking about?
About the way you brush me off.
The way you stall me.
And don't think
I didn't feel ridiculous at times.
In front of Georgie, even.
- Just because...
- I didn't get sore.
Tell the truth. Did I ever get sore?
Even about not going to Florida?
You wanted to see how far you could get.
Fine. I don't blame you, I give you credit.
But that's all.
I understand.
You got me a break and now...
All right.
I'll go with you.
Now you're talking, baby.
And then you'll never see me again.
MARTY: Why?
Because that makes me a tramp... and I'm not a tramp, no matter what you think.
Ruthie, you're wrong.
Listen, I'll be honest with you.
When we first started up together,
I figured, you know... a pickup, why not? Didn't mean nothing.
But lately a change come over me, and I wanna do things for you. I'm anxious.
That's what I was hoping for.
That you would get to care about what happened to me. But you don't.
What do you mean, I don't?
I'll show you you're out of your head.
You know that big fancy joint where Helen Terral is singing?
The Oval Room?
Who do you think I had here tonight taking a gander at you?
MARTY: Just the owner, that's all.
Yeah, a close personal pal.
MARTY: We're getting together to chew it over.
Now, does that sound like
I think you're a... What you said?
You got no idea the plans I've got.
If I go to Al Gaxley's for the weekend.
Well, what do you want of me? I'm human.
I'm stuck on you.
Thank you, Marty.
Now let me be honest with you, too.
In the time I've known you, you've become more important to me... than anyone else. And I like you.
But I'm not stuck on you.
Maybe it's because getting someplace is such a big thing to me.
It seems as if I don't have room for anything else. Not yet, anyway.
Can you understand that?
Yeah, sure, Ruthie... but when?
I don't know.
If you still want me to go with you, give me a minute and I'll get dressed.
Take yourself the minute.
We'll go out and get a bite to eat.
You'll never be sorry.
What do you mean? I'm sorry already.
I'll wait for you out in the car.
Only hurry up.
MARTY: What a day I've had.
My feet are killing me.
GEORGIE: Hey, Marty.
We're going downtown to get a bite to eat.
Call the restaurant and tell them to get the champagne ready.
She don't wanna go away with you?
I don't want her to go!
How do you like that?
Bay Cliff ain't the right kind of a place for a girl like her.
- She was great tonight, huh? A knockout.
- Great.
Here. A little extra.
You backed her up good. Go on, take it.
Get yourself a dame.
Have a big time on me.
Table for three for Mr. Snyder.
And champagne.
Yeah, that's right, the works. Right.
[Door opening]
MARTY: Come on, Ruthie.
Good night, Johnny.
[Audience applauding]
[Upbeat instrumental music playing]
[Ruth singing upbeat song]
[Continues singing upbeat song]
[Audience applauding]
This is on the level. This is legit.
I don't have to stack the joint no more.
[Bluesy instrumental music playing]
[Singing bluesy song]
[Continues singing bluesy song]
[Audience applauding]
[Whispering] Marty, sit for five minutes.
I gotta talk to you about things, but I don't get a chance.
You're so busy running all the time.
The laundry.
You take care of it, Georgie.
I got confidence in you.
I got to get back.
She'll wonder I'm not there.
[Lively instrumental music playing]
Hi. I want you to meet Mr. Loomis of the Roger Black Agency in New York.
RUTH: This is Mr. Snyder.
LOOMIS: How do you do?
Mr. Loomis caught the show and liked it.
In fact, he has a booking for me in New York.
A club called The Black Hat.
- I hear it stinks.
- It's a beginning, Mr. Snyder.
We're not starting at the beginning.
Maybe I'm out of line and you're handling your own bookings now?
You got it straight?
You want to talk business, talk to me.
- All right.
- Here's my card.
Call me up, make an appointment.
If I have time, I'll see you.
Thank you very much, Mr. Snyder.
It was nice seeing you, Miss Etting.
RUTH: Thank you for coming back.
LOOMIS: It was a pleasure.
Why do you have to act like that?
All that man wanted...
Shut up.
Who got you this far? You?
Look at me when I'm talking to you.
I knock myself out for you, show me a little respect.
At least do that much.
You know that Black Hat he's booking you in so fast?
It's a dump.
You even know where it's located?
So far uptown, it's practically in the Bronx.
You know who goes in there? Dogs.
If you want to sing for dogs, go ahead.
But not with me.
How was I to know that?
All I heard was New York, and naturally I was excited.
New York's crawling with dames who can sing.
You know when you're going to New York?
After I make their tongues hang out for you.
I've got plans so big, a hick like you wouldn't even understand them.
What plans?
[Exclaims]
Look whose tongue is hanging out now.
Never you mind what plans.
All you gotta do is sing.
The real work, I'll do.
Come on, hurry up, get dressed.
Who was the guy who came out?
Chiselers. Leeches.
You got something good, everybody wants a piece.
Listen, Georgie,
I wanna put her on the radio.
Find out who the top man is at every station.
Then ask around, which one we can put the squeeze on.
Wouldn't it be easier just to ask them to come and listen to her?
Bet you anything they'd give her a job.
- Think so?
- Why not? She sings real good.
At that you might be right.
But if you ain't, and it don't work,
I'll guarantee you one thing:
I'll brain you.
[Soft instrumental music playing]
Hey, you. You know anything about radio?
- Yes, a little.
- Good. We're branching out.
[Knocking on door]
RUTH: Hi, Johnny. Come in.
JOHNNY: Hello.
He can't make it. I think he had something to do about his laundry.
Anyway, he said for us to go ahead and rehearse.
- Pretty fancy, isn't it?
- Yeah.
Marty had it decorated for me as a birthday present.
It's the first real apartment
I've ever had. I just love it.
Can I get you a drink or something?
Cup of coffee, maybe?
Not now, thank you.
Did you go to the radio station today?
Yes. I spent the morning with Brelston outlining the first program.
Johnny, I still can't believe it.
My own radio program.
The best possible time on the air.
And how about you, maestro?
Conducting your own orchestra.
Very impressive, both of us.
Ruth.
What happened when that agent came to see you?
He had a booking for me in New York.
That's what I thought.
Why didn't you take it?
Because I'm not ready for it yet.
And Marty'll tell you when you're ready?
- He's made no mistakes yet.
- Loomis doesn't make mistakes, either.
He's the best agent in the business.
He works for you, you pay him a commission... and you don't owe him anything.
- Why don't you let him in?
- Because I don't need him.
- Did Marty tell you, you don't need him?
- I don't need him because I have Marty.
You'll have Marty for a long time, honey.
- He'll be with you every step of the way.
- Let me tell you something.
When it's right for me to be on my own,
I'll be on my own.
Use him and ditch him at the strategic moment?
That's a charming plan.
What are you talking about?
I don't have any plans.
You make it sound as if...
Why do you always start something?
I don't. I seem to have a strange effect on you.
When you're with me, you let yourself realize what you're doing.
Don't blame me if it shocks even you.
Let's go to work.
I'm sick of having you around.
Why don't you quit?
JOHNNY: Why don't you tell the Gimp to fire me?
You think I can't?
JOHNNY: I know you can. Why don't you?
I don't know.
JOHNNY: Suppose I tell you.
Let's find him, Ruth. Now. Let's tell him.
No, there's nothing to tell him.
- Nothing's changed. Nothing.
- Ruth, darling.
[Orchestra playing upbeat music]
[Singing upbeat song]
[Continues singing upbeat song]
[Upbeat instrumental music continues playing]
[Violin music playing]
[Resumes singing upbeat song]
Ladies and gentlemen...
Marty, I been asking you the same thing for the past five weeks.
Is she gonna sign with us again?
How long can I stall the sponsor?
- What does she want?
- Just half of Chicago.
GEORGIE: Marty, got it.
Relax, Brelston. In a couple of minutes, you'll know as much as I do.
Loomis? Go ahead, what?
Yeah.
They agreed to everything?
All right, we'll make it. I'll contact you.
Marty, what she wanted? New York?
That's swell. When we gonna go?
Couple of days.
I don't know how smart it is.
Well, anyway, it's done.
You gotta stay here, Georgie.
- You gotta mind the laundry.
- Sure.
How far away is New York?
You'll make visits lots of times.
Well?
- No dice, Brelston.
- What do you mean?
What's the sense of half of Chicago?
She's gonna have all of New York.
Ladies and gentlemen...
I want to invite you all to a party
I'm throwing at the Plaza for Ruthie.
Quiet. I ain't through.
It was gonna be on account of the winding up of the program.
Now it's for something more important.
Something Ruthie doesn't know yet.
MARTY: She's going to New York.
MAN: New York?
She's gonna be in the Ziegfeld Follies.
[People cheering excitedly]
Congratulations!
MARTY: All right, boys,
I'll see you over at the party.
I'm so excited.
MARTY: Told you
I'd get the best for you, didn't I?
MARTY: Now maybe you'll have a little confidence.
I do have. I always have had.
- You're coming to the party?
- I'm sorry, I can't. Thank you.
MARTY: Pretty good, huh? Ziegfeld?
MARTY: Will you be ready to leave in a few days?
No, I'm not going to New York.
MARTY: What do you mean, you're not going?
RUTH: See you at the Plaza.
MARTY: Wait, Ruthie.
All right, Georgie, take her to the car.
MARTY: What's the big idea?
I've had another offer in California.
It seems pretty interesting.
There's gratitude for you.
There's nothing I can do for Ruth anymore.
- She's made it. Are you going?
- Yeah, I'm going.
You bet your sweet life I'm going.
She's gonna need me the longest day she lives... no matter what you think.
JOHNNY: No matter what I think?
MARTY: I know what you think... her having anything to do with me.
I know what you think about me, too.
MARTY: A jerk, a dumb mug, strictly for laughs.
No. A cheap crook, pushing people around.
MARTY: I ever push Ruthie around?
JOHNNY: You will, pal.
Wise guy, you know everything.
You don't know nothing.
In a million years, you wouldn't know about Ruthie, how I feel about her.
A girl like that. You don't know nothing.
What I come from, the kind of a life, the kind of a place.
Same place I did, Snyder.
Same place, same street, same everything.
Me and a thousand other guys, and they don't all turn out like you.
Who's she going with?
MARTY: Answer me that, smart guy.
Who is she going with?
There's only one thing
I got against you, you poor slob.
I'm sorry you quit.
I would have liked to fire you.
TRENT: Come down the steps. That's it.
Good. Boys, come down behind her.
TRENT: That's it. Cross over. Arms, boys.
TRENT: Keep coming forward.
Get some bounce into it.
RUTH: I stay here?
TRENT: That's okay. A bit more forward.
TRENT: That's it. Fine.
Cross over here. Cross over there.
Stay there, Ruth. We'll fix it later.
Now move over a little.
That's it. Right there. Now go back.
That's right. All the way back.
TRENT: Now you do the same thing.
Clear the way, so she can get through.
TRENT: Come on, that's it. That's good.
TRENT: That's fine. Good.
Little bit more. All right.
TRENT: That's all.
MAN: Lunch, everybody. Back at 2:00.
MAN: Same number, same people.
RUTH: Same mistakes.
I seem to do everything wrong.
No, it's me.
I haven't turned on the magic yet.
Take off the worried face and get some lunch.
It's in your dressing room, Miss Etting.
Mr. Ziegfeld ordered it.
Thank you. Doesn't everyone get spoiled rotten around here?
- No, we just choose a select few.
- Goodbye.
Trent, don't go. I wanna talk to you.
Mr. Snyder, I didn't know you were honoring us today.
Today and every day.
And I still say it's lousy.
All week, I've been trying to tell you.
Why don't you listen?
Look how you've been handling her.
Guys prancing around, hiding her.
It's crummy.
Sorry you don't like my work.
Tell Mr. Ziegfeld.
I'm telling you, big shot.
Don't give me that fish-eye of yours.
I know what's good for her.
I ought to. I'm her manager.
She never made a move I didn't tell her.
I'm sure Miss Etting has found your advice invaluable.
- Perhaps you're more talented than I.
- You ain't kidding. You stink.
TRENT: Fred! This is beginning to lose its amusement value.
FRED: I'll take care of it.
Beat it, errand boy.
I told you 10 times already!
I don't do business with assistants.
I'm talking to him.
TRENT: No, you're not.
FRED: Just a minute.
- Take your hands off me.
- Fred, let me.
Are you out of your mind?
You can't act like a hoodlum in here.
You think like Ruthie, it's some kind of church?
Mention the name Ziegfeld and everybody must kneel?
I'm thinking of her, what you're doing and been doing to her.
I gotta look out for her interests.
They're doing that.
They're the best in the business.
They'll make a big star out of her if you'll just give them a chance.
But you can't shove them around.
You don't have to worry about me.
I don't wanna do nothing to hurt Ruthie.
I'm just used to taking care.
- I just can't sit and do nothing for her.
- I know, Marty. I understand.
You wanna have a cup of coffee with me, Barney?
Sure, I'd like it. As a matter of fact,
I'll buy your lunch.
You'll buy? I'll buy. Come on.
[Dramatic instrumental music playing]
[Singing upbeat song]
[Continues singing upbeat song]
[Tense instrumental music playing]
[Jazzy instrumental music playing]
[Jazzy instrumental music continues playing]
[Resumes singing upbeat song]
[Audience applauding and cheering]
I think I'll go backstage and see her.
No, wait, Marty. Wait till after the show.
TRENT: Very good, Ruth, take another bow.
FRED: You've got them.
TRENT: She's gotta make a change.
TRENT: Keep with it, Ruth, keep belting.
MAID: Miss Etting, you were wonderful.
RUTH: Thank you. We have to hurry.
I'm sorry, Mr. Snyder.
- I just wanna see Miss Etting.
- Sorry, I got my orders.
You won't get in any trouble.
I give you my guarantee.
Wait a minute. Taylor, come here.
I wanna see Ruth a minute.
Tell him it's okay.
FRED: Please, she only has a couple of minutes between numbers.
- Out of my way, punk.
- Marty, what is it? What's the matter?
I wanna see you and this big shot thinks he can stop me.
If they don't want people backstage...
What're you trying to give me?
I've seen people come in.
You make exceptions to everybody but me?
You asked for it, you got it. Satisfied?
You been riding me from the beginning.
One more crack out of you and I'll take you apart.
Why don't you go play cops and robbers where they're scared of you?
This isn't Chicago.
[Performers exclaiming]
Marty, stop it!
MAN 1: Take it easy.
TRENT: Throw him out.
TRENT: Ruth, come on. It's your cue.
MAN 2: Call a doctor.
[Marty grunting and exclaiming]
MAN 3: Outside, buster, come on.
TRENT: Go on.
I don't care how you do it, Georgie.
Find a buyer and get rid of it.
Get all you can. I'm depending on you.
MARTY: I'm pulling Ruth off the show.
She's leaving Ziegfeld.
RUTH: I am what?
MARTY: I'm fed up!
I've had enough. It's up to here with me.
From now on, I'm number one.
You won't be the loser.
I've been on the phone, I got bookings.
You'll rise on top.
Barney, we gotta get out of that contract.
I'll pay off. I'll have the dough,
I'm selling the laundry.
But there might just be an angle.
LOOMIS: Marty, we signed that contract in good faith...
- and there's only one thing...
- There is a good angle.
You made us a nice little scandal tonight.
Fred Taylor's in the hospital with a broken jaw.
He's lucky he's alive. So what?
So Ziegfeld doesn't want me in the show with you around.
That don't hurt my feelings.
He's a jerk if he lets you go for free.
Only I'm not going.
I was a big hit tonight.
It's a chance to be somebody, it's the Follies, it's Broadway.
It's a chance to meet decent people and to make friends.
It's what I've wanted and worked for.
Why should I leave it?
- What sense does it make?
- It's what I want, the way it's gonna be!
- You can't tell me what to do!
- In a pig's eye, I can!
- Do you think you own me?
- I do own you. That's exactly right!
Barney.
LOOMIS: Good night, Marty.
I'm sorry I got angry.
We have a lot to talk about... but let's not do it this way, shout at each other.
Don't use your ritzy Ziegfeld voice on me.
Make like you're back in the 10 cents-a-dance joint!
But I'm not, Marty. That's the whole point.
RUTH: I'm where I wanna be.
MARTY: And I ain't good enough.
RUTH: I didn't say that!
MARTY: Then say it!
MARTY: Have some guts, say it!
All right! You don't belong here!
I can't help it, it's your fault.
It's the way you act.
MARTY: It's the way I've always acted!
I never heard you holler!
It's rotten, dirty, and I hate it!
MARTY: You hate it?
You're talking to me, baby.
Me, not Ziegfeld. I know you!
You were right there with me.
Working me, begging for more, never mind how rotten and dirty.
Maybe I did, but I don't want to go on that way.
- I knew tonight when...
- Tonight?
The minute we got here, this started.
The minute we got in that stinking theater.
You saw the way they treated me... those fancy New York jokers, like I was nothing.
Small potatoes, like I had no right.
I didn't say nothing. I waited.
I waited to see you butt in and tell them:
"He's with me. We're together."
RUTH: I couldn't have.
MARTY: You could!
I'd have done it for you.
But you never opened your trap.
Like you never owed me nothing.
You walked away!
Since the first day that I seen you...
I knocked my brains out for you.
But that's all right.
I'm a poor slob, I can pack a bag, go back to the laundry... lay down and die. You don't care.
No skin off your back.
You got what you wanted.
I brought you this far. Nobody else. I did.
But that don't count, not with a high-class dame like you.
Marty, I know what I owe you. I know it.
RUTH: But there's no way to pay it.
Don't you see? There's no way to pay it.
Ain't there?
[Ruth breathing heavily]
[Ruth exclaiming]
[Ruth crying]
MARTY: You can go.
Let me do the lugging. You got me around, at least take advantage.
It's all right.
Why don't you sit down and relax?
Want me to get you a cup of coffee?
That's what you need.
RUTH: No, I don't want any. I'm fine.
I bet you can't guess where we're going this afternoon.
You know that jewelry store on Fifth Avenue?
The one with nothing in the window except the pearls?
To show they ain't boasting?
We're going there to pick up a little something for you.
Retail. How do you like that?
RUTH: You don't have to buy me anything.
Who says I have to? I want to.
A little token of how I feel.
RUTH: Don't worry about it so much.
Who's worrying?
Everything's gonna be great.
The minute we get on that train, and out of this phony town... everything will be great. You'll see.
I'll do more for you than a dozen Ziegfelds.
The tours I got worked out for you, coast to coast.
Hotspots everyplace.
What's so terrible about it?
The day will come when you'll thank me.
You'll laugh when you remember.
Are you listening to me?
I'm not complaining.
I'm just trying to tell you that you don't have to work so hard.
You don't have to sell me.
I'm sold.
[Dramatic instrumental music]
[SIow melodic music]
[Upbeat music]
[Singing bluesy song]
[Drums beating]
[Saxophone playing]
[Trumpets playing]
[Continues singing bluesy song]
Just listen to this!
[Audience applauding]
How was that?
You can't top it anywhere.
[Soft instrumental music playing]
- Thanks.
- How did it go?
Same as always.
Did Marty tell you where we're going after we close here?
Since when is it any of my business where I work?
- He just wants to surprise you is all.
- He couldn't.
MARTY: Ruthie, are you there?
RUTH: No, I'm playing a benefit in Duluth.
[Vase shattering]
Leave it!
Everybody's so nervous around here all the time.
I come in. I got great news, a surprise.
But you gotta make cracks.
It's enough to take the heart out of a person.
Never mind the dramatics.
What's the big news this time?
You're merely going to make a picture in Hollywood. That's all.
I merely kill myself for the past two weeks setting a deal up for you. That's all.
And what a deal!
Between you and me, the things I told Loomis to ask for...
I didn't dream we had a chance.
You should've heard Paul Hunter on the phone just now.
Long distance.
The head of the whole studio.
He acted like you was the Queen of Sheba, or something.
Well, how about it?
It's going to be a change, anyway.
- You glad at least?
- Sure, why not?
Mrs. Snyder, could you just once... show some plain, common enthusiasm?
What do you want? A thank-you note?
You know something, Ruthie?
You ought to lay off that stuff.
You're getting to look like an old bag.
Ha, ha.
[Phone ringing]
Hello.
OPERATOR: Miss Ruth Etting, please.
Hollywood calling.
This is Miss Etting. Hollywood?
Operator, are you sure this call isn't for Mr. Snyder?
OPERATOR: No, ma 'am. Miss Ruth Etting.
Well, this is she speaking.
JOHNNY: Hello, Ruth?
RUTH: Hello?
JOHNNY: This is Johnny.
JOHNNY: Johnny Alderman.
Johnny Alderman!
You can hang up, Ruth. I don't know how you feel about talking to me.
I feel fine about it, Johnny.
But I can't believe it.
What made you call after all this time?
I've wanted to call you often enough, only I didn't think I should.
Not after I heard you were married.
JOHNNY: I heard you're coming out
to do a picture for Paul Hunter.
RUTH: Yes.
JOHNNY: I work here, too, Ruth.
JOHNNY: And what's more,
I'm going to be working with you.
JOHNNY: How do you like that?
RUTH: Johnny, you're making it up.
Ruth, I just came in to tell you...
Who are you talking to?
No, I'm sorry.
I don't know what my future plans are.
I see. I gather you don't want to talk anymore.
Thank you. Thank you for calling.
It was one of the newspapers.
Why didn't they call me?
I handle the publicity.
Ruthie, we're leaving for the Coast on Sunday.
And I picked a late train, so that you wouldn't have to rush getting up.
You know what I mean?
It'll do you good, Hollywood.
You'll enjoy it.
It's good for a person to change.
You and me have been getting pretty jumpy lately, anyway.
- I don't want to go.
- What?
RUTH: It's just that I'm so tired.
I need a rest.
MARTY: But I asked you before I started on the deal.
MARTY: "Take a little vacation," I said.
"Lay off awhile," I said. But, no.
MARTY: You wait until I get the deal all sewed up hook, line and sinker.
MARTY: Answer why. Explain me why!
RUTH: It's just a feeling that I have.
Forget it.
I'm taking Mr. Snyder in to see Mr. Hunter.
Yes. Second corner to the right.
LOOMIS: Hello, Paul.
PAUL: Hello.
This is Mr. Snyder.
Mr. Hunter, Mr. Snyder.
Very nice to meet you, Mr. Snyder.
But hasn't Miss Etting come with you?
No, Mrs. Snyder just sings.
I'm the one who does the talking.
I see. Well, let's start with the story.
I'm sure you'll like it. I don't mind saying we're all very proud of it.
Where's the music? I don't see no music.
It comes separately, Marty. I have it here.
What's he doing here?
Mr. Alderman is the music director on this picture.
I used to work for Mr. Snyder and Miss Etting.
That makes everything nice and friendly.
These are the numbers.
I think she'll like them. I've chosen...
You've chosen?
Nobody else got nothing to say?
They're all subject to Ruth's approval.
She ain't a kid in the chorus no more.
She knows what she's doing.
And when she don't, believe you me, I do.
Of course, Mr. Snyder.
PAUL: That's why we're happy to have you both with us.
PAUL: Why don't we all sit down and talk things over?
- Look who's gone Hollywood.
- Yeah.
Come on, Marty.
Come on, Georgie.
Everybody comes to California to lay around in the sun... and she gotta sit in the house.
- Hello, Ruth.
- Hello, Barney.
- Can I get you a drink?
- Thanks.
- Everything go all right?
- Fine.
Of course, Mr. Hunter was disappointed that you weren't with us.
You have a lot of meetings tomorrow.
There's wardrobe, make-up, and publicity.
Marty has the list.
Yeah, you start with the music director.
And wait till you hear who that is.
Johnny Alderman,
the piano player from Chicago.
Is that a laugh!
It's a small world, isn't it?
What's with you and this fellow, Marty?
He seemed to bother you at the conference.
He don't bother me one bit.
He ain't important enough to bother me.
I just don't like him.
There's something about his personality.
He always gave me a swift pain, that guy.
Why should he be on a picture?
A piano player like that.
We ought to have somebody good.
A name.
LOOMIS: He's making one for himself.
Let him make it on his own time.
How do you feel about it, Ruth?
I don't care one way or the other.
Whatever you say.
We'll leave it lay for the time being, anyway.
Hunter's a nice fellow, don't you think?
A four-flusher, just like the rest of them.
You know how long it took me to get his number?
Just about one minute.
And I let him know it, too.
Did you see the expression on his face... when I told him his last three pictures were stinkeroos?
I really let him have it, didn't I, Barney?
It's the only way with those phonies.
You gotta let them know who you are.
Who are you, Marty?
- What do you mean?
- What have you accomplished?
Can you produce a picture?
Have you done one successful thing on your own?
Just who do you think you are?
[Marty chuckles]
Pretty sharp, the little lady.
Whoever I am, kiddo...
I'm what makes you tick.
Don't you ever forget that.
LOOMIS: Is it always like this, Ruth?
I'll make a deal with you, Barney.
You don't tell me your sad stories, and I won't tell you mine.
How do you like it?
Have I ever done one successful thing on my own?
Listen, Marty.
I figure I get what she means.
Back in Chicago, you were a big man, see?
But since then, the people we do business with... your name don't mean nothing.
After all, it ain't like it's up anywhere.
"Marty Snyder presents."
Sure, you're married to her.
But for all they know, you could be a guy that's hanging on to a good thing.
A meal ticket.
You follow what I mean, Marty?
I'll show them.
She'll see.
Well, get up!
What are you laying there for?
Barney, come in here. I wanna talk to you.
Barney, get free tomorrow, all day.
We got business.
And, Georgie, you take Ruth to the studio instead of me.
And stick with her.
If she wants to know where I am, just tell her I'm too busy.
That's right, tell her I'm just too busy.
- Hello, Johnny.
- Hello, Ruth.
- It's good to see you again.
- Good to see you.
- I'm sorry I'm late.
- It doesn't matter.
- You know Georgie?
- Sure.
- How are you, Georgie?
- Fine.
Why don't you sit down over here and make yourself comfortable?
We'll be in there by the piano.
This way, Ruth.
Let's have a good look at you.
- A good look?
- A good look.
- Have I changed?
- Yes.
A lot's happened to you. And it shows.
You're beautiful.
It's good to see you, Johnny.
I'm awfully glad we're going to make a picture together. Really I am.
We always got along fine when we worked.
And that's what we're here for, isn't it?
To work.
JOHNNY: By all means. Let's get to work.
Have you looked over the songs?
Here are some choices.
Doesn't make any difference.
Whatever you think.
Shall we get started?
All right.
I think you know this.
It's an old one of mine.
I'll Never Stop Loving You. Yes, I know it.
[Playing soft song on piano]
[Singing slow love song]
[Continues singing slow love song]
JOHNNY: Yes, you still care about it.
Are you always this unhappy?
Or is it just today?
Will this be a long session, Johnny?
Because I have other appointments.
No, all I'd planned for today was to run through the songs.
Of course, I had thought you'd have lunch with me afterwards, or a drink.
- Or a cup of coffee?
- Or a cup of coffee.
The last time you asked me that,
I didn't because I didn't want to.
But now I'll tell you so that you'll never ask me again:
I can't.
[Upbeat instrumental music playing]
RUTH: Hello, Barney.
LOOMIS: Hello.
I'm very tired, Marty.
I didn't want to go out tonight.
Relax. Don't be so sour.
You got to eat someplace.
- I ordered your steak medium, okay?
- Yes.
How was it today?
How'd you get along with that piano player?
I suppose he feels he's a pretty big shot now, huh?
Why shouldn't he? He's doing pretty well.
Working for somebody else, ain't he?
Still punching a time clock.
- Who doesn't?
- Not everyone.
Go ahead and tell her. Get it over with.
Garbage! Take it back!
Tell the chef, Mr. Snyder said "steak."
WAITER: I'm sorry, sir.
There was nothing wrong with that steak.
You can't go on acting this way.
Yes, I can. Here I can.
I can act any way I want.
This is my place. I own it.
- How do you like that?
- You what?
It's his, all right.
It's changed hands 10 times.
LOOMIS: It's jinxed everybody who's ever had it. But it's his.
What do you want with it?
I'll turn it into the hottest nightspot on the Coast.
Don't you get worried. None of your money's in it. Not one red cent.
In two or three weeks, when we open... you can beg to buy in, you and old lady Loomis.
In two or three weeks?
I'll be on this picture for months.
- I can't play any outside dates.
- Did I ask you?
This joint, I make a success.
Don't blame me.
I told him it was no cinch, this business.
I know it like the back of my hand.
Been around clubs for 14 years.
What do you think I was doing when I ran that laundry? Washing socks?
What, you want everybody to think
I'm a dumb ox with no brains?
You want they should think
I'm getting handouts from you?
So busy making them think you're something, they think I'm nothing.
GEORGIE: You put it all in, Marty?
The dough from the laundry?
You getting scared, too?
Here's what I wanna do.
First, I close down the whole place.
Then I throw out everything.
Everything. Every stick.
I'm starting from scratch.
When I get through, it's own mother won't know this joint.
MARTY: And it's gonna look rich, like it costs. Only in good taste.
Like you're always screaming, nothing loud.
And the entertainment, only headliners, personalities.
Am I bending your ear too much, Ruthie?
If I am, I'll shut up.
But I'm all steamed up about this thing, you know?
- What did you do that for?
- I'm sorry.
RUTH: I'm just so nervous.
RUTH: The rehearsals and everything starting tomorrow...
Yeah, that's what it is.
Sure, you're bound to be...
I need a good night's rest.
Yeah, you're right.
I'll hit the hay in the other room.
You go on and go to bed.
Good night.
RUTH: Good luck with the club, Marty.
Don't say it like you're a stranger.
[Door closing]
Here's the layout, Mr. Snyder.
Here. Yeah, look.
In the middle,
MS with a wreath, you know?
- And green and gold.
- Yes, sir.
How do you like that for a name, Barney?
MS Club. Marty Snyder. Get it?
Yeah, I got it. Look, Marty,
I still think you're making a mistake... about Frankie Desirio and his orchestra.
- They're gonna cost you a fortune.
- Book them. Don't give me no headaches.
- You the waiters?
- Yes, sir.
Okay, don't get excited. Wait.
MARTY: All right, come on, girls.
MARTY: Come on.
MARTY: Come on, get them up.
MARTY: All right, you, you, and you.
The rest of you can blow.
MARTY: You three, I want you to remember something.
MARTY: This is strictly legit.
You're selling nothing but cigarettes.
MARTY: Back tomorrow morning at 10:00 for a fitting.
Barney, you get over to the studio?
- Sure.
- See Ruth?
- Yeah.
- She's coming over. We're having dinner.
You know, we've been so busy lately, we've hardly seen each other.
How was she? In a good mood?
Sure. This picture's been a real shot in the arm for her.
Never saw such a change in a girl.
She listens to me, she don't go wrong.
GEORGIE: Hi, Marty.
MARTY: Where's Ruth?
GEORGIE: She had to work again.
She didn't have no call for tonight.
What are they trying to pull?
Marty, this happens all the time.
They find out a recording stage is free or something. It's just routine.
Yeah, sure, Barney.
I know you're anxious to get home.
I won't need you no more.
- Okay. Good night.
- Good night, Barney.
How do they act together, them two?
Ruthie and the piano player?
I watched, just like you told me.
There's nothing to watch.
She's more friendly with lots of them than him:
The wardrobe girl, the make-up man... an old geezer, "a grip," they call him.
Him, she's always talking to.
But Johnny, nothing.
[Beeping]
TECHNICIAN: 24-04, Take 3.
[Dramatic instrumental music playing]
[Singing slow song]
[Ruth continues singing slow song]
TECHNICIAN: 24-04, Take 3.
Okay?
JOHNNY: All right.
You dumb jerk!
I could've sung all night, Johnny.
It was a good session, wasn't it?
- You were great and you know it.
- Thank you.
I am getting some help from the score and conductor.
- Thank you.
- You're doing a wonderful job.
I know. I can't understand it.
I'm usually not this good.
Good night, Johnny.
PAUL: Hello, Ruth.
RUTH: Hello, Mr. Hunter.
- All through for the night?
- Just finished.
I've heard all the recordings so far.
They're beautiful.
- Thank you.
- Just beautiful.
I'm delighted.
Mr. Snyder just dropped in on me.
He tells me that you're dissatisfied with Johnny Alderman.
I'm not.
That you want me to take him off the picture.
That's not true.
He said that either Johnny goes, or you go.
I can't fire a man for no reason, Ruth.
I'll be here in the morning, Mr. Hunter.
Don't worry.
- There won't be any problems.
- Good.
- Good night.
- Good night, Ruth.
MARTY: You said you would finish tonight, and that's how it's gonna be!
MARTY: I don't care if it is double time!
Get it done!
Why did you lie to Hunter?
MARTY: All in an uproar?
RUTH: He's staying on the picture, Marty.
MARTY: Fine, then they're pulling you off.
Hey, buster...
Have you gone crazy?
Are you out of your mind?
What have you got against him?
What has he done to you? Why?
You're going off, and that's that.
Marty, listen to me, please.
This is important.
Don't do this. Don't spoil this picture.
It's the first thing I've cared about since New York and I don't want to lose it.
I have to work, do you understand?
I've got to. It's all I've got.
Shut up! You're gonna work.
Who said different?
Only where I can keep an eye on you, so you don't get so many ideas, get so big.
You're gonna work here.
You're gonna open this joint.
And there's gonna be a sign:
"Martin Snyder presents Ruth Etting."
That way, everybody'll know who's boss.
Like you know. Like you better know... no matter how much you scream and holler and carry on.
What's the matter, Marty?
Are you afraid you're losing your grip?
You come back here!
MARTY: What are you gaping at?
Get to work!
Ruthie! Get the car!
Ruthie!
[Doorbell buzzing]
No, she's not here.
What's the matter, Marty?
Did she run away?
Keep away from her. If I catch you hanging around her, I'll kill you.
She has to walk out on you herself.
If she ever gets the guts to do it,
I will be hanging around.
I'm just telling you so you'll know where to find me.
GEORGIE: Where now, Marty?
MARTY: Home.
MARTY: I'm gonna get my rest.
She's the one putting on a big act, let her be the one that don't sleep.
MARTY: You say there's nobody registered there that looks like that?
Are you sure?
What time did you come on duty?
All right, keep your shirt on.
Marty, why don't you lay down awhile?
She's gotta be someplace.
What's she doing this for?
[Phone ringing]
Hello? Hello, Ruthie? What...
What did you say, miss?
All right, I'll be there.
Barney's office.
She wants to meet me there in an hour.
Marty, why don't you take a shower?
I guarantee you'll feel better.
You know, you always feel better after a shower.
You got a lot of time.
Where you been?
Why a meeting all of a sudden? Why here?
If we got something to straighten out, it's between us.
Why drag Barney into it?
- Because he's a good friend of both of us.
- So?
You can have anything you want, any kind of settlement.
What're you talking about?
- I want a divorce.
- What?
- We've got to put an end to this!
- What do you mean, put an end to it?
How can you put an end to a thing like this?
RUTH: We have to. It isn't worth living this way. It hasn't been.
You think you can stand there and tell me...
RUTH: I can't anymore.
Look, Marty, she can't help the way she feels.
What a way to wind it up.
A girl, a secretary calls you on the phone and tells you you've got an appointment.
RUTH: I've tried. You know I've tried, but I can't go on any longer.
RUTH: What's the use if we're both miserable?
It's that guy, ain't it?
RUTH: No!
MARTY: Yeah!
I was on the stage last night.
I ain't Georgie.
I've seen your face when you look at him.
Right from Chicago you been two-timing me, the both of you.
RUTH: That's not true!
MARTY: It is true!
It's been him all the time, ain't it?
No, it's you! It's because of you!
[Ruth sobbing uncontrollably]
All right.
You want to call it a day? Fine.
Get a lawyer. Get it started.
Anything you say.
Anything to make you happy.
I did an awful lot for that girl.
She don't realize.
- Isn't that right, Barney?
- That's right.
You can tell the truth.
You can level with both of us.
Didn't I do wonders for her?
The contracts I got her.
All right, so I couldn't handle everyone with kid gloves.
But it's push or get pushed.
You see what I mean, Barney?
Sure, I understand.
Now go home and get some rest.
We'll talk later. You're all keyed up.
Maybe this is the best thing that could happen.
I mean that serious. Let her see how she gets along without me.
If she does, fine.
You won't hear one squawk out of me.
But she'll come running back so fast, believe me, it won't even be funny.
Well, I gotta go.
I got things to do.
Thanks, Barney.
What happened? What did she want?
Nothing. You know how they are.
They get notions.
- Splitting up?
- Splitting up? That's crazy.
- She'd be lost without me.
- Sure. It figures.
- Where are we going now?
- To the club, where else?
You think I'm going to let things fall apart just 'cause she gets a notion?
You're funny, no kidding.
Look at you. The puss on you.
You're tired, Georgie.
I've been taking advantage, running your feet off.
No, I ain't tired.
You know, what most people don't appreciate... it's a tough business, show business.
You gotta have somebody tough on your side.
She'll come running back.
It's a foregone thing, that's what it is.
A foregone thing.
DIRECTOR: A little faster. Roll them.
TECHNICIAN: Speed.
ASSISTANT: Playback.
[SIow instrumental music playing]
[Singing peppy song]
All right, cut! Hold the playback.
DIRECTOR: You'll have to step down.
We have some mechanical difficulty.
DIRECTOR: Help her down, Tony.
- Thank you.
- Very nice, darling.
Joe!
Are you all right? He came to my place last night looking for you.
- What happened?
- It has nothing to do with you.
- Have you left him? Have you?
- Please, it isn't any of your business.
That's a lie. He knows it, if you don't.
Have you left him, Ruth? I've got to know.
Yes, I've left him.
It doesn't make any difference.
You've got to stay away from me, please.
- Did you see her?
- They wouldn't let me in.
I know she's there.
They been shooting two days already.
What's the matter with you?
Why didn't you barge in through the gate?
I did, Marty. They threw me out.
GEORGIE: You know what?
I ran into Barney Loomis at the studio.
He says the musicians' union, unless you get some dough up... they won't let the band open.
He's gotta talk to you.
He'll talk to me when I talk to him later.
Everybody telling me all the time what to do.
Marty, listen, we've been pals a long time.
Since we were kids, practically.
It ain't Ruth's fault.
It's him, that piano player.
He's got an influence on her.
If it's him, or if it ain't him, what's the difference? It's all done.
Can't you forget about her?
We got a club to open here in three days.
All the dough you got in the world is tied up in this joint.
- Marty, I tell you the truth, I worry.
- That's the bunk.
- I'll take care of you. Didn't I always?
- Yeah, only...
MARTY: Only what?
MAN: Mr. Snyder...
you want to look at the initials
on the drapes before I hang them?
You're paid to put them up! Put them up!
Don't ask me so much!
He's in his office, if you want to...
Later, I said! Let me alone, will you?
Go away! Like flies. Like leeches!
My own place, they can't let me alone.
Sure, I can forget.
People die. People go away.
Once it's finished... you don't go around knocking yourself against a stone wall.
Once it's finished.
Johnny.
JOHNNY: Hello.
Where have you been the last few days?
JOHNNY: You didn't wanna see me.
RUTH: I know I did... but I didn't think you'd stop coming to the set.
With so many people around and everything... there's no harm in that, is there?
There's not much point, either.
I'm sorry.
- Is this car for you?
- Yes.
Cancel it. Let me drive you home.
Look, darling,
I just talked with Barney Loomis.
He says Marty's taking this thing a lot better than you are.
Wait a minute. Let me finish.
I'm not asking you to change your mind about anything.
All I'm asking is let me drive you home.
But I can't. I can't take the chance.
JOHNNY: Good night.
RUTH: Please, Johnny.
For what it's worth, I love you.
- Good night, Miss Etting.
- Good night.
[Car approaching]
RUTH: Johnny, what are you doing here?
Darling, after what you said back there...
Good night.
Good night, darling.
[Gun firing]
[Johnny groans]
Johnny!
MARTY: He had it coming to him.
I told him I was gonna let him have it.
I couldn't back down.
You know what I mean, Ruthie?
JOHNNY: You've been up all night?
And you're all right.
No matter how you feel.
JOHNNY: I feel tired.
Exactly as if I was shot.
But if you tell me you love me,
I'll go to sleep.
I love you.
RUTH: I'll be telling you for the rest of my life.
RUTH: You'll get awfully tired of hearing it.
You wanna bet?
LOOMIS: How is he?
Ruth, there are still some photographers downstairs.
- Can you take it?
- Yes.
Barney, what's going to happen with Marty?
He'll probably get out on bail, then he'll have to stand trial.
- But what about his club?
- It won't open, it can't.
It was touch-and-go about the money, anyway.
After this, there's not a chance he can get it.
Don't you start feeling sorry for him.
- Aren't you?
- Yes, I am.
I'd help him if I could, but I can't.
Nobody can.
And you're the one person in the world who mustn't even try.
Why not?
LOOMIS: There are a thousand...
RUTH: He gave me a chunk of his life.
It doesn't matter that I didn't want it.
But the point is he gave it, and I took it.
I can't walk away when he's in trouble as if it weren't any of my business.
LOOMIS: Wait a minute.
RUTH: Too much of it is my fault.
LOOMIS: That's ridiculous.
RUTH: I mean it.
Barney, I didn't leave him with anything.
With any pride, self-respect, nothing.
I've got to see him.
Barney, you have to fix it for me. Please.
LOOMIS: You're making a big mistake.
I've made so many, one more won't make any difference.
- Sit down, please.
- Thank you.
POLICEMAN: Martin Snyder.
Something on your mind?
RUTH: I don't know if they've told you or not, but he's going to be all right.
RUTH: That should make it easier for you.
I ain't worried.
Had to learn him a lesson, and I did.
I guess he thought I was bluffing.
A whole lot of people had me all wrong.
But I guess they're all wised up now.
I've never been the kind of guy that lets nobody double-cross him.
RUTH: No one double-crossed you, Marty.
I've never said one word to Johnny that you couldn't have heard.
Just good pals?
RUTH: No, not anymore.
RUTH: I love him.
RUTH: And I'm going to marry him.
Is that what you come to tell me?
Okay, you told me.
RUTH: Please, Marty.
There is something else.
RUTH: That day in Barney's office, we were both so upset... that I couldn't really say what I wanted to.
You did just fine. You said plenty.
But I didn't get to say thank you for all the nice things... for all the good things that you've done for me.
Who're you kidding, Ruthie?
Who're you trying to butter up?
What's the matter, kiddo? Scared?
You afraid I'll get out of here and take another shot at your boyfriend?
RUTH: Please, listen to me.
MARTY: No, you listen to me.
I'll be sprung, I'll get out of here, and I'll beat this rap.
You think I'm through?
You don't know me.
There's one thing I am through with: You.
You ain't got a thing to worry about.
I don't want no part of you.
What are you sitting there like a wooden Indian? Go on, beat it.
Go on back to your piano player.
He can have you.
Tell him you seen me in the pokey and I look great.
Tell him I like it.
Makes me feel like I'm a kid again.
You ain't told me yet who put up the bail?
What's the matter?
All of a sudden you're such a clam.
I didn't have a chance with all those reporters.
Barney Loomis, he put it up for you.
If he's such a pal, why didn't he come with you?
I don't know. Maybe he was busy.
Word goes out a guy's broke, everybody gets busy.
- He put the dough up, didn't he?
- He'll get it back.
Yeah, but he put it up.
Yeah. He ain't such a bad guy.
This ain't the way home.
I thought maybe we'd drop by the club for a minute.
Why do I want to give myself the blues for?
Couple of things you ought to look at.
Forget it. I wanna get a shower.
They don't keep things so dainty in that clink.
- Go on home.
- Yeah, Marty. Just a minute.
Georgie.
MARTY: I'll throw her out.
GEORGIE: Marty, stop. Please!
- Let go!
- Wait a minute.
There are reporters and photographers in there.
I don't care who's in there.
I'll pull her off the bandstand.
- I don't need a bag of peanuts or handouts.
- Listen to me!
This is not a handout!
You did a lot for Ruth in the old days.
She knows it, she's grateful, and she's got a right to pay it back.
And you've got to be big enough to take it.
That's the guy that shot the guy!
MAN 1: Over here!
MAN 2: Give me your autograph, will you?
[Crowd chattering]
MAN 3: Break it up. Go home, come on.
REPORTER 1: You got a good thing going.
MARTY: Yeah, sure.
- You mean the club?
- Yeah.
Take a look. It's packed.
REPORTER 1: Never been more than four people in here before.
I guess you're right.
Mr. Snyder, can I get some backstage shots?
Mr. Loomis said that you're the only one that can okay it.
Yeah. Sure, why not?
Only not during the floor show.
That's one of my rules.
- Thanks a lot.
- Think nothing of it.
- What'd you do to the place? Looks great.
- Pretty nifty.
REPORTER 2: Who'd you get in?
Some decorators?
- I got myself in, that's who.
- You think you've broken the jinx?
There was never no jinx on this spot.
Just a lot of jerks running it, that's all.
REPORTER 1: You got big plans for it?
When I get through, you'll need a reservation a month in advance.
REPORTER 2: Then you're counting on keeping it running?
Through thick and thin, no matter what happens at my trial.
That's just in case you're being too polite to ask.
[Reporters laughing]
REPORTER 2: Does Miss Etting's appearance here tonight... mean you two are getting back together?
No. Miss Etting is just fulfilling a contractual obligation.
You got that? A contractual obligation.
She'll be paid just like any other artist.
REPORTER 2: Surprising, in view of what's happened.
What's surprising about it?
Business is business.
You can put it down... that I got the greatest respect for Miss Etting as an artist.
Boys, step up to the bar and have a drink on the house.
Georgie, see to it my pals get everything they want.
GIRL: Check your hats, please.
Good evening, Mr. Snyder.
[Ruth singing romantic song]
[Ruth continues singing romantic song]
You gotta give her credit.
The girl can sing.
About that, I never was wrong.
[Lively instrumental music]
English - SDH
- Send it over.
- You're coming in loud and clear.
- Roger. Out.
- Send it to me when you have time.
The Orduna's in.
Pick up this gear in the mail.
- Any word on my discharge?
- No.
- How she look today, O'Hara?
- Better than yesterday.
When she looks good, you've had it.
That's the day they take you off this rock.
Never seen it to miss.
Won't be long.
- Come on!
- What's the rush?
You're disturbing the peace.
Okay, teacher.
Wait a minute!
Where you going?
- Good to see you, Mrs. Davidson.
- Hello, Mr. Harris.
- Dr. And Mrs. McPhail.
- How do you do?
- Your first trip to the islands?
- Since the war.
A sentimental journey?
- How are you, Mr. Davidson?
- Fine, fine.
- It's been a year.
- Everything's in order this time.
The governor is expecting you.
Sorry, we don't have much time.
- Would you take us to the mission?
- Certainly.
My father built his mission there.
- This island looks volcanic.
- In more ways than one. They all are.
- It takes vigilance to keep control.
- To be friendly with the natives?
- To put it bluntly, yes.
- Any success?
Well, we do our best.
I'll have the luggage transferred.
All right, you guys, off it.
Here it comes.
I'll turn it around.
- Sarge? What kind of gear's coming in?
- Refrigeration unit.
- Bear a hand.
- How could that freeze anything?
I can't see her face.
Two years on this rock, and you wanna see her face?
On a raft once, off Guadalcanal...
...something like that came straight at me. Went right past me too.
- That's some piece of equipment.
- I'll unpack it.
- You need help?
- I'll handle it.
- Who spotted it?
- Stand off. It's an order.
- You pulling rank on us?
- Yeah! Get on the gear!
She'll hit this rock like an A-bomb!
- Hey, yo-yos!
- Knock it off!
Share and share alike!
All right, come on!
We gotta shove fast!
- Easy does it, miss.
- Thanks.
What do you know? Marines.
I'm right at home.
Got me a couple hours.
What's to do around here?
Grass skirts, hulas?
That island stuff?
You picked the right island.
I'm in charge of the tours.
- Leaving when?
- Now.
- Sergeant, you twisted my arm.
- Get the gear.
Yes, sir, sarge.
- Oh, my luggage!
- Get it up here! Hurry!
- My record player!
- This all?
Yeah.
- You can see better back here.
- Thanks.
- Get the wheel.
- You heard him.
Both of you, on the double!
Griggs, hurry up with that mail.
Wait for the mail!
- My back!
- That's pretty!
- How about I sit up front?
- No, you're classified.
- Classified what?
- Top secret.
- Says who?
- Sgt. O'Hara.
- And Private Griggs.
- Sadie Thompson.
Hi, Sadie.
Mail call!
What's wrong with you?
Hurry it up!
Back her up!
Watch yourself.
You're not driving a tank.
Safe and sound, Sadie.
Where we at?
- Bill's place.
- Don't you have any doors around here?
Take her away!
- That was fast.
- The island's mostly restricted.
All these islands look alike.
Anything cold to drink?
- Go away. It's Sunday. Me no open.
- Sure, except for us.
Hi, Bill.
Something cold and tall.
Me no Bill, me Chung!
Bill long time dead.
Hurry, or you'll join him!
- Me no want trouble.
- Hey, Sadie!
- You want pineapple juice?
- Hey, no take. No take.
Anything, just so it's cold.
- It's hot as a hot water bottle.
- It'll ease up when it rains.
- It's all secure.
- Where's the truck?
- Down the street.
- Get it back to the base!
I just got here!
I ain't been introduced yet!
- Shove off.
- Where you going?
- Where do you think?
- Sadie's gear is in the truck, right?
- That's right.
- You heard the lady. Oblige her!
Glad to.
Excuse me, Sadie.
- Get on the door.
- What for?
You wanna keep this private, right?
- For who? You?
- We'll rotate every 15 minutes. Fair?
You have till 1100 exact.
Then I take over.
All right.
The more you drink, the more you gotta drink.
It's the heat. There's enough sweat in the South Pacific to float a ship.
- Sorry, guess that hit you rough.
- I don't mind.
We forget how to talk to girls.
You're doing okay.
- Where you heading?
- New Caledonia.
Got a job waiting for me.
- What's it like down there?
- The exhaust pipe of the world.
This rock's a deep freeze, compared.
Anything goes.
You won't like it.
As the Japanese say, I should worry.
It's not the first time
I've been away from home.
Open up.
Open the door!
Two meatheads coming.
- They see her gear?
- I tried to dodge them.
- By leading them here?
- I was in the street!
What could I do?
Lock the doors.
Get the place secure.
Secured!
I'll have the board send an x-ray machine.
- Anything else?
- We need more penicillin and bibles.
I'm happy to say the old ones are worn from use.
You'll get what you need.
That's the point of an inspection.
- Good morning.
- This hospital is so well-equipped.
It never was until Mr. Davidson took over.
I have certain persuasive powers with our trustees in Boston.
- You do well with tropical diseases.
- They're simple to fight.
- Simple?
- Compared to immorality.
- Though things seem to have improved.
- Yes, indeed.
I presume it's time for services.
This is great!
- These men don't respect the Sabbath.
- They mean no disrespect.
See the effect of that music on the natives? Excuse me.
How about some beer?
- It's my treat, O'Hara.
- Not when I'm around.
Live it up!
You'll be dead a long time!
No, missy.
No beer on Sunday!
If Sadie wants beer, she gets it.
No, I don't want to get him into trouble.
Sorry, fellas.
No beer today.
Sing it up!
- Mr. Davidson! Come in.
- That won't be necessary, Mr. Chung.
Look see. No drinks on Sunday.
No beer. Only pineapple juice.
In the future, I wouldn't open this place on Sunday.
- For any reason.
- Yes, sir.
Hey, fellas! My boat!
Come on, it's been fun!
I'll be seeing you!
Hey, my baggage!
It's just my heel.
- Are you a passenger for the boat?
- Yes.
Your boat's been quarantined.
A sailor came down with typhus.
- Sadie's marooned?
- For a week.
Great! Beachhead secured!
Like the Chinese say,
I should care.
- Any hotels here?
- You got the suite next to mine.
Don't pay any attention.
You come to my quarters...
There's only one place to stay.
Let's go before it rains.
Drive us over to Horn's.
- Mama, Papa! Mr. Davidson!
- Go on, play!
Joe! Business!
Joe, wake up!
Say hello to customer!
- Tell them to go away.
- You no hear. Mr. Davidson!
Davidson? What the heck is he doing?
Joe, wait. Your pants.
- Tell him we're all filled up.
- You want me lie?
Joe get into trouble!
Ameena, you're a washout.
- You didn't win the war this way.
- You heard her!
Hi! What's your name?
- Mary Horn!
- Betty Horn!
- Tommy Horn!
- Debbie Horn!
- Quite a woman.
- Who?
Mrs. Horn!
Come on, Horn!
Get up!
Let's go, you old sack!
Chop-chop!
So this is where I park?
Make the best of things today.
- It's bound to be worse tomorrow.
- Count on me, Sadie!
- Me too!
- Relax, fellas!
You'll burn out your bearings!
I've got an important guest for you, come on.
Gentlemen, I hope I don't have to toss you out.
Sadie Thompson, Joe Horn.
- Hi, Mr. Horn.
- Hi, Sadie.
- Worst ex-non-com in the division.
- Nice kids.
I wish they were on another island.
Come on, kids, help your mom.
Give her the best room you got.
- I got nothing left.
- I'll end up in the barracks yet.
- Put her with Mrs. Horn.
- And me?
- It's only for a week.
- Only?
I won't get in the middle of a happy marriage.
- Anything with a roof'll do.
- Follow me.
- It's my job to look after her.
- Says who?
Son of a...
Throwing a lady in a monkey cage!
- It's the kids' pet.
- Take it out!
Sorry to put you out.
- We'll get this place squared away.
- It'll take a year.
We've cleaned up islands in minutes.
Take it away!
Careful of my record player!
It means a lot to me.
Glad it's not a radio.
Haven't heard a commercial...
...any news, nothing since I left the States.
- Get her out of here!
- Don't rush! I'm here for a week.
- Hey, Kilroy!
- What's cooking, Pop?
Tell everyone to get home before they get caught in the rain.
Debbie! Tommy!
- Hi!
- Hi!
Get in before you get soaked!
Got any candy? Any gum?
Hey, you people!
Come sit down!
Chow. Maybe not so good, but not so bad.
- I'll be eating out.
- You are so wise.
Come on, kids.
It's time to hit the sack!
Come on! Go on to bed!
- I hardly feel like eating.
- The rain doesn't help much.
- How long will it last?
- Two months, off and on.
Mostly on, if I remember the rainy season right.
My dear?
Dear Lord, we thank thee for this gathering...
- and for the food which thou hast provided for us this day.
- Amen.
- Amen.
I didn't know Mr. Horn allowed radios here.
What do you say?
Hi, folks, you done eating?
That's a good-looking layout.
- Hi, frogmen.
- Here's your shoe.
- Come on in and get wrung out.
- Yeah!
It's that cheap girl who kept playing her phonograph to attract sailors.
It wasn't only sailors.
She caught our eye too.
Everyone was aware of her.
She made certain of that when she came onboard.
Behaving outrageously.
Having those parties in her cabin.
- What's she doing here?
- Waiting for the same boat as us.
I detest being under the same roof.
She has as much right to be here as we have.
I'm going to the hospital tomorrow.
- Feel free to come.
- I'd like to.
- You've done well for the natives.
- That's the least of it.
- What more is there?
- Raise their morals.
- They're happy with how high they are.
- Standards are never too high.
Especially here, where nature works against us.
Things grow with savage violence.
You see flowers where there were only roots.
Ice, Mr. Davidson?
The old box gave 18 cubes.
Not bad for war surplus
I got off the beach.
Works if you treat it like a dame.
If you keep it in shape.
Have them lower the music.
I have a headache.
Sure, Mrs. Davidson.
- Hi, your climate's lousy.
- It's the best we got.
Don't I know you? Don't stand.
You'd only have to sit.
We were shipmates on the Orduna.
- Too bad, that sailor getting typhus.
- You haven't met.
- We haven't.
- Mrs. McPhail, Mrs. Davidson.
- Mr. Davidson.
- Nice to know you.
- Miss Thompson.
- Meet Dr. McPhail.
- Glad to know there's a doctor.
- Hope you won't need me.
I'm so healthy it hurts.
- We gotta go.
- I'll be right there.
I've held up the parade long enough.
- Where are you going?
- A brawl at the Chinaman's.
Maybe you'd like to come.
You might have a few laughs.
- Shouldn't you stay?
- Because of the rain?
- No, not the rain.
- You're not reaching me.
You'll be the only white woman.
That's real decent. Don't worry.
A girl gets just what she asks for.
I'm just asking for company tonight.
If you get lonely, come on down.
- That jeep will be floating.
- It's raining cats and dogs!
- You think this is rain, just wait.
- This won't do anything for my figure!
- Don't need nothing!
- Why, private, I'm surprised.
Hold on!
To paraphrase an old saying:
"The situation has landed and has the Marines well in hand."
Go away!
When I want you,
I'll rattle your cage.
Knock it off!
I told you to fall back!
That goes for the rest of you guys.
Sadie's only got two legs.
No, I like to dance while I can.
How about it?
We haven't danced.
- You're not my speed, honey.
- Just follow me!
Miss Thompson.
I've been trying to place her.
- Has she been here before?
- Not that I know of.
- How are things in the States? Better?
- In what way?
- People still knock themselves out?
- Faster.
Same old rat race. That's why
I never went back after the war.
Everything gone slam, bang, hurry up, time is money, get it while you can.
Don't let up. For what? Money.
And what's it get them?
Taxes and gadgets that don't bring nobody peace.
- You're quite a philosopher.
- No, lucky.
Fell for a native and learned a lot.
I remember where I saw her.
I'm sure of it now.
- There's no doubt.
- No doubt of what?
She worked at the Emerald Club.
- What?
- The plague spot of Honolulu.
The girl worked there.
She's a prostitute.
You shouldn't assume without proof.
- I was at the raid. I saw her.
- She might have come with a friend.
Men didn't bring women there.
They went looking.
It was an infamous trap for servicemen.
I saw them coming in.
All with one purpose.
- Never smiling.
- Desire is sad when it must be bought.
I saw girls from all nations there.
"Entertainers." Harlots!
I finally forced the police to close it.
The women were to be deported.
Somehow she managed to escape.
You could be mistaking her.
- Obviously, she continues her trade.
- I see nothing obvious.
Doctor, I've devoted my life to fighting corruption.
- I know immorality when I see it.
- I know intolerance.
- Passing judgment without proof.
- Robert, please.
Excuse me.
With gangrene, what proof do you need to operate?
Gangrene is fact. It's tangible.
- So is evil.
- It's a matter of definition.
Evil is a fact! Like right and wrong.
You think that immorality doesn't exist.
Everything's relative.
I know what men of science believe.
Freud, Adler and Jung have destroyed moral values.
- Now just a minute.
- Destroying moral values!
Letting people think they're not responsible.
We are responsible.
Each of us must choose good or evil.
We must stamp evil out.
The way you fight a disease.
- There's no need to get upset.
- I'm not.
I know where I stand.
On the side of right.
- Good night, doctor.
- Good night.
Mrs. McPhail.
We'll see you in the morning.
The invitation to visit the hospital stands.
I appreciate that, Mr. Davidson.
What right has he got to figure she's out of some joint?
- He can't help it.
- How do you mean?
Fanatics are too obsessed by what they fight to know why they fight.
Like a guy who's against drinking, but wants the bottle?
Yes. All of us have hidden desires, which we disguise one way or another.
Why must you always be diagnosing everybody?
That ends it.
Not quite. I have one more diagnosis. It's of you.
It's been a long day, and it's late.
And so to bed.
- Good night, Mr. Horn.
- Good night.
Come on, come on, come on!
Geronimo!
Come on in!
It's too early to break up the party!
Who wants to break it up?
Hang on, Sadie, we won't drop you.
Home sweet home!
It's hot. Help me out of this.
I bet my room's boiling.
Let's sit here.
- Get something cold to drink.
- Hey, Horn!
- Shh! There are people upstairs.
- Who cares about them?
- Hey, Horn!
- Shut up!
Where is the sack hound?
- What do you think? He's married.
- What's this?
How about some beer on ice for Sadie?
Make it five. It's my treat.
No arguments.
Why don't you call it a night?
I've got fancy guests upstairs.
Complaint noted.
Let's go to my suite.
If it's okay with you.
- Lf you keep it quiet.
- Promise!
Take a load off.
Anybody scared of the dark?
Me. How about holding my hand?
No cracks.
That's enough light. It's hot.
Help yourself to the bottle on the dresser.
- It's still there. Who wants a drink?
- Just pass it.
- Don't anybody mention the heat.
- What a night!
- My feet are killing me.
- Want anything, Sadie?
If she does, she'll ask me.
That goes for everyone.
No volunteers. You, you and you.
- Anybody got a cigarette?
- Anything for you, honey.
I haven't had me a time like this since we left Honolulu.
- You remember Honolulu?
- What a time.
No place like it. Remember those clip joints we went to?
And those dames in all of them.
What dames!
- I'll never forget one...
- Come off it.
I don't go for that dreamy stuff.
Mr. Horn?
- Tell the men to leave that room.
- I can't.
- It's your hotel.
- She paid.
- She can have company.
- I won't let this become a brothel.
Hi, Mr. Davidson!
Nice to see you!
Come and join the party!
Know everyone?
Men, leave this room.
- What?
- You've no business here.
- I invited them.
- What's the complaint?
Leave or I'll report you.
- Nobody invited you in!
- It's a disgrace being here with her.
What did you say? What did you say?
I'll fight you right...
Stop it, O'Hara! Stop it!
Will you cut it out? O'Hara, stop!
That's enough. Stop it!
Did you hear what he said?
You need to apologize instead of yelling at me.
Take it easy.
You wanna get hurt?
- You crazy? Trying to hit a civilian?
- The party's over.
You bet it is.
- I don't wanna be put off-limits.
- Lf anybody was off-limits, he was.
I'd be careful. He's an important person on this island.
He's busted a lot of people who tried to stand up against him.
He can buy and sell anything or anybody.
I'd try not to get his attention.
He'd better not attract mine!
- I never want to know anyone like him.
- Break it up before he shuts me down.
We were just warming up.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Come on, hurry up.
What a gal, huh?
- See you.
- What a gal.
- Where you going?
- To see her.
- You just saw her.
- Again.
- Hurry up. You guys wait outside.
- Sadie? Sadie?
- Forget something?
- Yeah. To say good night personally.
I was kind of loaded when I roughed him up.
Kind of?
Did I say something I shouldn't?
- Perfect gentleman.
- Okay, that's all I wanna know.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Come on, will you?
- Sadie?
What did you forget?
Tomorrow I'm off duty at 10.
Wanna go swimming if it don't rain?
- Supposing it does?
- I'd still pick you up.
That's what I figured.
- Get out before you get me in trouble.
- Did I say something I shouldn't have?
Mr. Horn?
Mr. Horn?
Did the rain cool you off, mister?
Why did you bust in?
He really could have let you have it.
I had no other choice.
What are you talking about?
Who was bothering you?
I can't let you carry on as you wish.
Just what do you mean by that?
- You lived in Honolulu, didn't you?
- Yeah, what about it?
What did you do there?
- I had a job!
- What kind of a job?
Part of the time, I sang.
- My voice is all right.
- Where did you work?
- Where did I sing?
- Where did you work in Honolulu?
Lots of places.
What places?
Nightclubs, mostly.
- What nightclubs?
- All kinds.
- Why all these questions?
- Why did you leave Honolulu?
For a change. I've got a job waiting in New Caledonia.
For a change? I'll tell you why.
Why all the attention?
- You're going to continue your trade.
- What are you saying?
It's why you left Honolulu.
You're a prostitute!
What?! Who do you think you are?
You're a dirty rotten liar!
- I'll give you a chance.
- Where do you get off?
A chance to find salvation.
- A priest's collar wouldn't fit you!
- Insults won't help.
I've listened. Now, you listen!
Lay off, or I'll show you what it means when I get mad!
How do you like that no-good louse?
If he starts that stuff again,
I'll really tell him off!
I'll spit in his eye!
- Mr. Davidson, sir.
- Governor.
- I'm glad you came by.
- This isn't a social call.
You're here about last night.
Major Kinner told me the
Chinaman's will be off-limits.
At my insistence.
This is something else.
A shady girl from Honolulu escaped deportation on the Orduna.
She's waiting for a boat to New
Caledonia. I suggest you do something.
I don't see what I can do.
She must have a passport to come this far.
Revoke it.
I can't interpret the law as you see it.
You must protect the men stationed here.
She's a menace to their welfare.
Why is she an issue?
The island's regulated.
I don't understand your concern for her.
Visit the native village as I did.
Ask what effect she had on the young people watching her.
Do you realize where this leads?
Aren't we more concerned with immorality than the natives?
My father devoted his life to the islands. His work won't be destroyed.
- I'm destroying nothing.
- Your position's clear.
I respect men like your father.
Kind, just, tolerant religious men.
- Help me protect his work!
- I'm trying to, within my authority.
I must protect the rights of every American.
I'm not a politician. I wasn't appointed to my job, I created it.
I envy you.
This isn't a marketplace, and we're not haggling.
As far as I'm concerned, the issue is closed. The decision is yours.
Okay, kids. Gum and candy.
- Hi, Horn. Sadie in?
- She sure is.
- Sadie, you decent?
- Decent enough. Come on in, O'Hara.
Compliments of the quartermaster.
Moving day?
You guessed it.
- Horn say you can't stay?
- Horn's okay.
- Davidson's taking it out on you too?
- He get you in trouble?
Talked to my C.O.
That's why I wasn't here earlier.
Forget Davidson.
Let's go for that swim.
- I said I was moving!
- He's shoving you out.
- I invited myself to leave.
- Why?
I don't like the company.
Meaning Davidson.
- We had a run-in last night.
- What about?
You should have heard him.
- He can't do nothing to you. Why run?
- I don't want any trouble.
- You sound scared of him.
- He don't bother me.
I don't wanna get you in trouble every time you come by.
You're moving out because of me?
- Let me finish packing.
- I asked you something.
I'm doing it for you and Horn.
I don't want you to get in trouble.
- Where you gonna go?
- They'll put me up in the village.
Yeah, I guess they would.
- What about a lift?
- What about it?
You got one.
- How much do I owe?
- Forget it.
- Not me. I pay my way.
- A couple of bucks.
- Meals and everything?
- This ain't the Ritz.
- Look me up if you come to town.
- Sure will. Best of luck.
Give my love to Mrs. Horn.
Bye. Sorry to leave.
I'm going to stay with friends.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
Thank heavens.
She disturbed Mr. Davidson last night.
He despises women like her.
- The founder of our religion didn't.
- Don't joke.
- He wasn't joking.
- No matter.
- You do it.
That's good. Can you?
- Where do I check in?
- It's no go.
- What?
- I talked to the head of the natives.
There was a brawl after some natives had...
What's that to do with me?
Davidson came here and blamed me?
- Yes, he did.
- I don't take no for an answer.
They won't put you up, and there's nothing anyone can do.
- Have I got the measles or something?
- You're taboo.
- Taboo?
- Meaning hands-off.
Meaning they're scared of Davidson.
I'm not.
Nobody said you were. We gotta get back to Horn's. Don't worry.
You won't be out in the rain.
- Sure, I should worry.
- Thattagirl! Now you're talking!
Please don't get up, anybody.
It's too hot.
- Hi, Sadie.
- Hi.
Did you see the look
Mrs. Davidson gave me?
- Forget it.
- With pleasure. Who turned up the heat?
- It'll rain soon.
- How do you know?
Caught some shrapnel in my leg.
Always tells me when rain's coming.
- You see much of the war?
- Enough to not want to see anymore.
- Care for a drink?
- Not in this heat.
Help yourself to the bottle.
No, thanks. I don't touch it alone.
- You mind if I relax?
- No, I don't mind.
When I joined the Marines, they said there'd be days like this.
- It's raining.
- Rain, shine. It's all the same here.
You gotta learn to relax.
Like me.
I've been here three years.
- I can show you how to go native.
- Some other time, huh?
I can take a hint.
But people come here for vacation.
You need to enjoy yourself.
Let's keep it friendly.
Friendship lasts longer than love.
- Yeah, but it ain't as much fun.
- I think you'd better go, Phil.
- Can't I interest you at all?
- I lost my curiosity years ago.
- You know, Sadie, I like you.
- Thanks.
It's hard to tell somebody that, you know?
I'm not asking for a medal.
I just wanted you to know.
- I don't feel like kidding just now.
- Who's kidding?
- Let's keep it friendly.
- Lf you don't like me, say it.
- No, I like you fine. Honest.
- Then what's the matter?
Can Davidson stop me from going to New Caledonia?
I don't see how.
You got some guy waiting for you?
- No, I got nobody anywhere.
- Same here.
If you wanna leave, a boat to Sydney leaves in two days.
- Australia, with the kangaroos?
- They got people too.
I'll be there when I finish my hitch.
I'm going into business with a buddy.
Needs a partner.
He don't need me.
- You can stay with him and his wife.
- I couldn't do that.
Just till you're set. Then I'll be there and you won't have a worry.
I pay my own way.
That's what I like about you.
All I meant was if you need help,
I'll be right there.
What do you say?
- You'll be out of here in two days.
- Sure. Why not?
What's the difference where I go?
- Then it's a deal?
- It sure is.
Australia for me.
- What?
- I bring letter for Miss Thompson.
Sadie, it's for you.
- Who'd be sending me a letter?
- The governor's office.
Sadie, what is it?
An order for my deportation to San Francisco in three days.
The governor's deporting you? Why?
- For the public good? What?
- I don't know.
But I know who made him do it.
Getting me deported?
I've got rights!
I'll show that creep!
Not letting me alone!
- I'll make Davidson change that order!
- Listen to me!
One thing I learned in the war...
...when then enemy's dug, flank him.
We'll get around him.
I don't want to go back to Frisco!
You won't!
With "deport" on your passport, you won't get out of the States.
There'd be no chance for us.
I was counting on us in Australia.
I mapped it out.
Mapped out? You don't even know me.
A guy could know a girl all his life and never want her.
I know you enough not to want to lose you.
I'll talk to the governor myself.
We'll go in together.
- No, I don't want you to.
- Why?
Lt'll be worse if you get into trouble. Please, get back to camp.
I don't want to get thrown in the brig. Tell him...
I know how to handle it.
Good luck, honey.
That goes for both of us.
Yeah, for both of us.
- I'll see you soon as I get a pass.
- Yeah, okay.
I'd like to see the governor.
Miss Thompson.
Just a moment, please.
Come in.
- The governor will see you now.
- Thanks. Thanks a lot.
Miss Thompson.
- Sorry to break in on you.
- Quite all right.
You know why I'm here.
Now, look.
No need to become upset.
You're being asked to leave.
Go home is all it means.
I don't want to go back to the States.
I've got to get to Sydney. I'm going to marry a fellow down there.
As soon as he gets out of the service.
You gotta believe me!
If you send me back, it'll never work out with us so far apart.
All I'm asking is for a few days so I can catch the boat to Sydney.
That's impossible.
Why? What have I done to be sent back for?
I can't change the order.
Because of Davidson?
Because you're scared of him?
I heard how everybody runs for cover from him, including you!
I admire your spirit, but not your tact.
It's not polite, but it's true.
He told you lies about me.
It's useless to discuss it.
Don't even give me a chance for defence!
What did he say? I'm allowed to know.
Yes, you are.
You're disreputable and escaped deportation from Honolulu.
It's a lousy lie!
Just because I sang in a nightclub that was closed by the police?
It takes a low mind to think low.
And his mind's in the gutter!
He's doing his duty as he sees it.
I'll show you what I came here for.
I got nothing to hide.
A letter from my friend in New Caledonia.
It's about a cashier job
I was going to...
...before I decided to go to Australia.
- Read it for yourself.
- I believe you.
Then you'll let me catch the boat to Sydney?
Yes, if Mr. Davidson agrees.
But you know he won't!
I'm sure if you explained the situation.
I've always found him to be fair.
Forgive me, but as you see,
I have a job to do.
- Have you had dinner?
- No, I'm not hungry.
That was very lovely.
Now, here we are.
Thank you!
- Say good night!
- Good night!
I hate to interrupt, but could we talk?
Certainly.
I'm sorry for what I said, sorry for everything.
I'm happy you feel that way.
The governor said I don't have to go back. If it's okay with you.
I'm afraid you can't stay.
Just until the boat to Sydney.
You don't know what it means.
Just what does it mean?
I'll do anything you want.
Stay in my room, not see anybody, if that'll suit you.
May I see you alone?
Just what are you saying?
I'll go anywhere you want.
Please don't send me back.
Why not?
There's somebody who will get me into trouble.
What kind of trouble?
You know, when a girl can't shake a man...
...who's important and wants things his way.
You're being evasive.
What's the real reason?
- I told you.
- No, you haven't.
Yes, I have.
If you send me back to Frisco, this man's bound to find me.
I worked for him in a nightclub.
We got friendly, but I broke it off.
He won't let me alone.
You're not deceiving me.
Isn't this man a policeman?
That's not true!
I can verify it by cabling the authorities in San Francisco.
The truth is...
...I didn't do anything. I was with my friend when he stabbed a man.
They were gambling, drinking.
A fight started.
The police thought I was in on it.
I escaped before they arrested me.
Mr. Davidson...
...you were right.
I've done things I'm not proud of.
I'm trying to forget them.
- I want to start over. You could help.
- I want to.
- I'll give you a chance to start anew.
- You mean I don't have to go back?
You must accept punishment for the life you've led.
Your past caught up with you in Honolulu and here.
You won't escape in Sydney.
You can't hide from justice.
But I shouldn't go to jail!
Pay for your immorality.
Then will God forgive you.
That's not the kind of God
I learned about in Sunday school.
- Yours is only a cop!
- You're caught in a life you've made.
You cannot escape yourself.
No one can.
You'll find peace when you accept punishment.
You tell me, "Be punished, suffer."
How do you know what I've suffered?!
You won't even ask me!
You don't want to know!
You won't change me!
I'd sooner die than let you make me over your way.
Nobody home.
It's me. O'Hara.
Yeah, just a minute.
Hi. I was about to hit the hay.
Didn't think you'd be by so soon.
Not soon enough.
What'd the governor say?
Just what I thought.
I gotta go back to Frisco.
He wouldn't let you stay?
Couldn't convince him. Want a drink?
If I could find that bottle.
- What right's he got to ship you out?
- He's governor, isn't he?
- Here it is. Have one.
- I don't care if he's a governor...
- No use getting all worked up.
- Nobody's pushing you around.
- Where you going?
- They got laws here, same as home.
He's gotta bring formal charges against you to ship you out.
It won't do any good to see him.
Besides, you'll get in trouble.
What am I in now, you going to the States?
- It's not up to the governor.
- What do you mean it's not up to him?
- It just isn't.
- Who then?
Davidson, is that it?
It's no use going to him.
I've tried. He won't let me stay.
Why didn't you say so?
I'll talk to him.
Yeah, I gotta go to jail.
It's not that.
Anybody can be fouled up.
Put in time and it's over.
But that other stuff. Working in that Emerald Club in Honolulu.
That can never wash off.
What about it?
Did you work there?
Did you?
I sang there. Leave me alone.
Sang? I know the Emerald!
I had a straight job.
Straight job.
How come you picked that joint?
- It paid the best.
- Paid best for what?
You know all the answers!
Why ask me?
A lot of stuff adds up now.
Scared to let me see the governor.
Scared what Davidson would tell me.
And perfume. Look at it!
You want to know the truth?
I worked there.
Took the men for all they had!
Millions filled the place!
And they came just to see me!
Does that make you happy?
And when you asked to marry me...
...it was like God sent somebody to take me by the hand.
Marry you? How could I marry you?
You're dirty!
When I think of the guys' hands on you...
Get out of here! Out of here!
Out of here! Get out!
I'm sorry, Miss Thompson.
Terribly sorry.
The Lord is my shepard,
I shall not want.
He maketh me to lie down in green pastures.
He leadeth me beside the still waters.
He restoreth my soul.
He leadeth me in the paths of righteousness for his namesake.
Yea, though I walk through the valley of the shadow of death...
...I will fear no evil for thou art with me.
Thy rod and thy staff, they comfort me.
Thou preparest a table before me, in the presence of mine enemies.
Thou anointest my head with oil.
My cup runneth over.
Surely goodness and mercy shall follow me all the days of my life.
And I will dwell in the house of the Lord forever.
- Yes?
- It's Dr. McPhail. May I come in?
- Sure.
- Thanks.
Glad to see you.
You've become a mystery, shutting yourself up in here.
Remember, if you're not well, there's a doctor in the house.
Thanks, I'm okay.
That Marine friend of yours,
Sgt. O'Hara, came to see me.
He still wants you to go to Australia.
Well, he wouldn't understand.
I'm going back to San Francisco to face it.
Are you sure you're doing what you want to do?
Yes, I'm sure.
I understand why O'Hara's worried about you.
Frankly, so am I.
You needn't worry about me.
I'm through running scared.
Letting myself get hurt.
I'm past all that.
- Davidson's been talking to you...
- He made me see things.
Davidson puzzles me, going from one extreme to another.
But you've got him all wrong, like I did.
When O'Hara walked out and I had nobody to turn to, he helped me.
He showed me where I was heading.
At first I didn't listen.
All I heard was the rain...
...falling harder, and harder.
I thought I was going to scream.
Then I began to listen and things started to clear up.
Everything he said made sense.
I didn't feel lost anymore.
I'm back to myself again...
...like I was...
...long ago.
I think I understand. Goodbye.
Goodbye.
- That's the boat to San Francisco.
- Yes.
I'm not afraid to go back.
Not anymore.
I've searched myself to make certain this is the right thing.
I know there is no other way.
Yeah, I know it too.
When you're with me,
I know it's right.
I'm not scared.
But when I'm alone and don't have you...
Try to remember me and all I've said.
Try to remember the peace you've found.
Think of this place of communion where
I helped you find yourself.
- I'd like to go now, Mr. Davidson.
- Yes, Miss Thompson.
I was scared you'd gone.
That I'd be too late.
I made a deal with a freighter skipper to take you to New Caledonia.
It's a short hop to Australia.
Get your gear.
I'm going to the States.
What's between us has nothing to do with you getting away.
I don't want to get away.
I'm through running.
The last few nights, I've been up figuring, counting all I've done.
It added up to one way.
I had no right to sound off.
Maybe knowing the worst about each other isn't a bad way to begin.
It's got nothing to do with that.
Davidson gave me the courage to finally face the truth.
What are you talking about?
I don't get it.
He said the truth's the truth.
You can't run away from it.
That's what I've been trying to do.
Run away from the truth about myself.
I never wanted to face what I became.
Nothing but a tramp.
It don't matter to me!
It matters to me! Understand?
He says I gotta go back.
Accept my punishment.
That's the only way
I'll feel free inside.
I feel better knowing
I'll get it over with.
- Don't make things tougher.
- You're getting on that freighter.
No! I'm going to Frisco!
- I want to do what's right.
- I'm telling you what's right.
That's enough.
She's made her choice.
You got her all mixed up, filling her with a lot of bilge!
Well, I'm getting her out of here.
Are you?
Sadie, think of yourself.
That's all that matters.
No, that isn't all.
I know you mean it for my good but you don't understand.
You just don't.
Now, go. Please go.
You've made me very happy.
You're strong enough to withstand temptation.
You were offered an escape, and you refused to take it.
I'd better get ready to leave.
- Your boat doesn't sail for an hour.
- I can't stay here anymore.
I'm out of cigarettes.
I better get some to last the trip.
Mr. Horn?
They're at the festival.
It's funny how I always run out of cigarettes.
Sometimes I don't even know
I'm smoking.
I guess when something becomes habit, you don't think.
I'll never forget what you've done for me.
You've justified my existence by letting me save you.
You've given me great happiness.
That's nice of you, especially after the trouble I gave you.
- This time tomorrow, you'll be at sea.
- Yeah.
- I don't suppose we'll meet again.
- I suppose not.
Does it matter?
I mean...
...you're sure of yourself now.
Yeah, I think so.
You won't be alone.
I'll be with you wherever you are.
- I don't understand.
- Why move away?
Well, I just want to get my things.
I'm ready to go now.
You're not afraid of me, are you?
After the last three days, I mean.
No, I'm not scared of you.
Not anymore.
- Then why do you want to leave me?
- It's got nothing to do with you.
I just want to get started, that's all.
I never wanted you to leave.
I know that now.
Don't touch me.
Don't come near me.
- You're still the same.
- I'm not!
- I'm not!
- You're nothing but a...
Joe?
Go get Dr. McPhail.
Make it snappy, sarge.
- You hear Davidson killed himself?
- Yeah.
- What about Sadie?
- What?
- She get on that boat?
- I suppose.
Maybe he killed her too.
Sadie's on her way to Frisco!
Where's Davidson?
The bottom of the cliff.
You can't help him now.
- Did you tell his wife?
- My wife's trying to.
Why would Davidson knock himself off?
I don't care about him.
What about Sadie?
I'll get the C.O. To radio that boat.
Sadie!
Hi.
Hi. What brings you around so early?
How come you're not on the boat to Frisco?
My, don't the world look fresh and clean today?
That sky! Like a thing wasn't going on under it.
What happened?
One guess.
Better turn that music off.
Mrs. Davidson's upstairs.
Why should I turn it off? What do
I care about her or Mr. Davidson?
- Something's happened.
- You bet. I've come back to my senses!
You men, you're all alike. Pigs.
Sadie, Mr. Davidson killed himself.
What did you say?
He killed himself?
What are you talking about?
Sadie, listen.
Let me alone! Let me alone!
All of you!
It doesn't matter why he killed himself.
It's of great importance to you.
I don't care. If he hadn't done it, maybe I would have killed him myself.
- All that gab about God and faith.
- I know how you feel.
Look, will you do me a favour and leave me alone?
Now listen. Don't confuse what he did with what he believed.
- He couldn't practice what he preached.
- What does that prove?
The opposite of what you're trying to believe.
I don't believe anything.
Don't let what happened last night destroy you.
It's already destroyed Davidson.
One thing he proved by his death, nobody can run away from himself.
You talk like him.
Do I? I didn't realize.
We run as far as we can but in the end...
...we come face-to-face with ourselves.
I'll see you, sergeant.
You're going to Australia.
There's nobody to stop you.
- Except myself.
- You don't have to go back!
That's what you say.
That's what I mean. You're okay now.
Now on, it's you and me. You'll head for Sydney and forget all this.
Sure, maybe I will, but will you forget?
Give me a chance to, will you?
Give me a chance.
Keep the record player to remember me.
We'll remember you.
- Bye, Phil.
- Bye.
I'll grab a plane soon as I get my discharge. See you in a month!
Good luck, Sadie!
- So long, Sadie!
- Goodbye!
Goodbye!
Bon voyage, Sadie!
Subtitles by
SDI Media Group
When you see a guy
reach for stars in the sky
You can bet that he's doing it
for some doll
When you spot a John
waiting out in the rain
Chances are he's insane
as only a John can be for a Jane
When you meet a gent
paying all kinds of rent
For a flat that could flatten
the Taj Mahal
Call it sad
Call it funny
But it's better than even money
That the guy's only doin' it
for some doll
Your eyes are the eyes
Of a woman in love
And, oh
How they give you away
Why try to deny
You're a woman in love
When I know very well
What I say
I got the horse right here
The name is Paul Revere
And here's a guy that says
if the weather's clear
Can do, can do
This guy says the horse can do
If he says the horse can do
I'm pickin' Valentine
'cause on the mornin' line
The guy has got him figured
at five to nine
But look at Epitaph
He wins it by a half
According to this here
in the Telegraph
For Paul Revere I'll bite
I hear his foot's all right
Of course it all depends
if it rained last night
I know it's Valentine
The morning works look fine
You know, the jockeys brother's
a friend of mine
Just a minute, boys
I got the feed box noise
It says the great grandfather
was Equipois
I tell you Paul Revere
Now this is no bum steer
It's from a handicapper
that's real sincere
I give you Valentine
'cause on the mornin' line
The guy has got him figured
at five to nine
So make it Epitaph
He wins it by a half
According to this here
in the Telegraph
- Epitaph
- Valentine
Paul Revere
I got the horse
Right here
Follow the fold
and stray no more
Stray no more
Put down the bottle
and we'll say no more
Follow, follow
Before you take another swallow
Follow the fold
and stray no more
Tear up your poker deck
And play no more
Follow, follow the fold
Friends, my name is Sarah Brown.
This is no place to make a speech, and I'm not going to try.
You don't want to be told how unhappy you are.
You don't want to be told about the emptiness of your lives.
You who drink too much... you who gamble at cards, dice and horse racing... let us help you not to lose your hard-earned money... in gambling dens and bookie joints.
This doll has captured my attention.
Let us give you the strength to stop your drinking and gambling.
She has lost me.
Let us welcome you to the Save-A-Soul Mission.
- Just around the corner.
- Come to me!
- Open all day and night.
- You'll call me a liar.
- A special meeting this Thursday.
- You'll think I ain't telling the truth.
Today I'm giving away solid gold watches for one dollar each.
That's right, my friends.
A solid gold watch for one buck.
Remember, all that glitters is not gold.
More to be desired are the judgments of Heaven. Gold is not enough.
You say it's not enough?
Today only, I include a nail brush with a solid ivory top.
Then, my friends, a built-in, genuine magnetic compass.
How often, when you're brushing your nails, do you wonder where you're going?
Which way is north, east, south or west?
Which way are you going?
Down, down, down, or up to salvation?
Come to the mission and find out absolutely free!
Absolutely free!
The nail brush is absolutely free!
Now, don't crowd. Don't push.
There's plenty of room for everybody.
There's room for everybody in the kingdom of Heaven too.
Let's pack up.
Did you notice a lot of them stayed till you were halfway through your talk?
If we could only sell them salvation for a buck... solid gold with an ivory top and a built-in compass.
You don't suppose by any chance those watches could really be solid gold?
Uncle Arvide, don't you dare!
That's right, my friends, a solid gold watch for one buck!
Harry the Horse!
Benny Southstreet!
Since when do you yell out a person's name... in the open air which is full of police?
It was a friendly impulse.
I lost my head.
If I do not like you so much, this would now be a fact.
You know Nicely-Nicely Johnson, of course.
- Of course. How goes everything?
- Nicely-nicely, thank you.
I have been waiting to hear from Nathan Detroit.
What will be the location of his crap game?
We don't know yet. Nathan's been lookin' around, but he's hard to please.
The heat is on very hot around here, and it is making Nathan sweat.
That's too bad, because I would dislike to take my trade elsewhere... but I am loaded and lookin' for action.
I've just acquired 5,000 fish.
Five thousand?
If it can be told, where did you take on this fine bundle of lettuce?
I have nothin' to hide.
I collected the reward on my father.
It is an advantage to have a successful father.
Nobody ever wanted my old man for as much as 500.
I've worried about Nathan.
Harry the Horse is not the only one.
There's a lot of loose money around, and everybody's lookin' for some action.
If Nathan doesn't find a place-
Why, Lieutenant Brannigan.
Mr. Southstreet, it is Lieutenant Brannigan... of the New York City
Police Department.
Have either of you seen
Nathan Detroit?
- Which Nathan Detroit is that?
- Your boss, Nathan Detroit!
The Nathan Detroit who runs a floating crap game.
- Floating crap game?
- On a boat?
A crap game that moves to a different spot every night... so the police can't find it and break it up.
Sounds like a very difficult thing to do.
You should know, since it's your job... to rustle up the customers and tell them where it is.
Especially with a famous detective like you putting on the heat.
You can give just that message to Detroit.
Tell him Brannigan says he's not gonna find a spot for his crap game... because everybody knows
Brannigan's put on the heat... and Brannigan's breathing down everybody's neck.
Nathan, you're lucky.
You just missed Brannigan.
I'm lucky.
I just missed Brannigan.
He left a message for you.
He said-
I am not going to find a place for my crap game... because everybody in town knows that Brannigan has turned on the heat... and that Brannigan is breathing down everybody's neck.
That's what he said.
Have you tried all the regular places?
Won't any of them take a chance, seeing it's you?
Seeing it's me, no... except one-
Joey Biltmore's garage.
Joey said he might take a chance for 1,000 bucks.
- A thousand?
- In advance, and in cash.
He would not even take my marker.
This I do not believe- that Joey will not take your marker.
You got no idea what a breath this Brannigan has got.
After all, a marker's not just a piece of paper saying...
"I owe you 1,000.
Signed, Nathan Detroit."
A marker is the one pledge which a guy cannot welch on.
Never. It's like not saluting the flag.
It does not seem possible- me without a livelihood.
Why, I've been running the crap game since I was a juvenile delinquent.
But the situation is desperate.
You have got to think of something.
My only thought costs 1,000 bucks.
I cannot even afford to think.
I'm broke.
I'm so broke, I couldn't even buy a present for Adelaide today.
Is it her birthday?
It is mine and Adelaide's
14th anniversary.
We are engaged 14 years today.
Nathan, you must concentrate on a game.
The town is up to here with high players. The Greek's in town.
- Brandy Bottle Bates.
- Scranton Slim.
I know, I know!
I could make a fortune... but to make a fortune I need a fortune- a thousand bucks!
Where do I get it?
The Biltmore garage wants a grand
But we ain't got a grand on hand
And they now have
a lock on the door
To the gym at Public School 84
There's the stock room
behind McCloskey's Bar
But Mrs. McCloskey
ain't a good scout
And things being how they are
The back of
the police station is out
So the Biltmore garage
is the spot
But the 1,000 bucks
we ain't got
Why, it's good
old reliable Nathan
Nathan, Nathan, Nathan Detroit
If you're lookin' for action
he'll furnish the spot
Even when the heat is on
it's never too hot
Not for good old reliable Nathan
For it's always just a short walk
To the oldest established
Permanent floating crap game
In New York
There are well-heeled shooters
everywhere, everywhere
And an awful lot of lettuce
For the fella
who can get us there
If we only had
a lousy little grand
We could be a millionaire
If the size of your bundle
you want to increase
I'll arrange that you go broke
in quiet and peace
In a hideout provided by Nathan
Where there are
no neighbors to squawk
It's the oldest established
permanent, floating
Crap game in New York
Where's the action
Where's the game
Gotta have the game
or we'll die from shame
Gentlemen, I am deeply touched by your faith and loyalty.
Gentlemen, do not worry.
Nathan Detroit's crap game will float again.
Guess who's sittin' in Mindy's right now eatin' a steak breakfast.
- Hitler.
- Wrong! Sky Masterson.
Sky Masterson's in town.
This should be the greatest crap game of your career.
Where's it gonna be?
City Hall, the Mayor's office.
- What time?
- We will leave you know, Angie.
Sky Masterson, the highest player of'em all.
- What a spot I'm in.
- Does he bet higher than the Greek?
Why do you think they call him Sky?
Once with my own eyes
I saw him bet 5,000 bucks... that one raindrop would beat another raindrop down the window.
Another time, he was sick and would not take penicillin... because he bet his fever would go to 104.
- Always makes crazy bets like that.
- Did he win?
Him and his crazy bets.
He got lucky. It went to 106.
So? So why don't I bet him?
Why don't I bet him
1,000 bucks on something?
Max, what's the matter?
No Danish today?
It's a holiday in Denmark.
How do I know?
All these years you've been bringing me Danish.
So we ain't got Danish today.
Today I'm bringing you cheesecake.
You want strudel instead,
I'll bring you strudel.
- I don't like strudel.
- So eat the cheesecake.
Live it up a little.
I do not understand you.
Everybody's crazy about Mindy's cheesecake and strudel.
They must sell thousands of portions every day.
That's just it.
Everybody's on cheesecake and strudel.
It makes me feel like
I'm playing the favorite.
Playing the favorite.
Nicely, Benny, I want you to go into the kitchen... and find out exactly how many pieces of cheesecake they sold yesterday.
Also, how many pieces of strudel.
How much cheesecake?
How much strudel?
What do you want to know for?
I'm investigatin' for the FBI. Go!
Barrigan!
Stop breathin' down my neck!
- Why, Nathan!
- Adelaide! Doll!
Now, how could you think
I was Lieutenant Brannigan?
We don't even use the same perfume.
I was kinda daydreamin', I guess.
I don't dream about detectives, even in the daytime.
Do you know what I dream about?
You, and your career as a businessman in a normal business.
And our career together as a normal husband and wife.
- Gesundheit.
- Thank you.
Your cold's not getting any better.
It comes and goes, comes and goes.
It's just a chronic condition.
Even if it is, it sure hangs on.
Nathan, speaking of chronic conditions... happy anniversary.
Guess what's inside.
- A thousand bucks?
- I only wish it was.
Go on. Open it up.
"Mr. Nathan Detroit,
General Manager."
- General manager of what?
- Whatever you set your mind on.
I have faith.
Adelaide, I do not have a present for you.
I don't mind if you don't give me a present.
It makes me feel like we were married.
Nathan, darling, there isn't anything
I couldn't do without... just as long as you don't start running that crap game again.
Crap game?
Adelaide, didn't I promise you?
- 1,200 cheesecake and 1,500 strudel.
- What?
Yesterday Mindy sold
1,200 cheesecake and 1,500 strudel.
More strudel than cheesecake.
Are you sure of this?
- Straight from the baker's mouth.
- What is this all about?
Statistics- things a businessman has to have at his fingertips.
- Any news yet?
- Not yet. I will leave you know.
I'm gettin' impatient, Detroit.
- And what was that about?
- His wife's having a baby.
But why is he asking you?
He's nervous.
It's his first wife.
Look, I'm expecting a fellow on an important business conference.
Suddenly I get a suspicion you are trying to get rid of me.
No, doll. It's just that this fellow does big business.
- Supermarket.
- Super, super.
With him business is business, and dolls make him nervous.
Besides, you're late for your rehearsal.
Nicely, you and Benny take Adelaide to the Hot Box in a cab.
But it's only a couple of blocks.
The streets are covered with tourists, and I do not want you molested.
Nathan, darling, you are the most thoughtful man that ever lived.
- But who's gonna pay for the cab?
- I am, of course.
- Sky Masterson!
- Detroit!
Can I believe my eyes?
Is it really you?
- How goes your percentage of life?
- Not bad.
- And you?
- Healthy at the moment.
Sit for a minute. Relax. Talk.
Or maybe you're in a hurry.
My daddy always said there's only one time a man should be in a hurry- when the cops are comin' up the stairs.
How about a cup of coffee?
Maybe a piece of cheesecake?
Thanks. I'm pleased to hear things go well with you.
From communiqus received in Las Vegas... we understood that Lieutenant Brannigan was corking up the town.
Who worries about Brannigan?
How was Vegas?
Paradise for two weeks.
For two weeks, I gambled in green pastures, the dice were my cousins... and the dolls were agreeable, with nice teeth and no last names.
You are sure I cannot offer you a piece of cheesecake or strudel?
No, thanks. I just ate.
How long are you in town?
Only for tonight.
Tomorrow I fly to Havana.
Sky, don't think I am a pest, but do yourself a favor.
Eat this last little bite of cheesecake.
You will thank me.
Honestly, I couldn't swallow a mouthful.
How is Adelaide?
Fine, fine.
I suppose one of these days you'll be getting married.
- We all gotta go sometime.
- But we can fight it.
The companionship of a doll is a pleasant thing... even for a period of time running into months... but for a relationship that can last through all the years of our life... no doll can take the place of aces back to back.
Still, you will admit that Mindy's is the greatest cheesecake alive.
Gladly.
Furthermore, I am quite partial to Mindy's cheesecake.
And yet, although you might disagree... many people prefer
Mindy's strudel to cheesecake.
Do you disagree?
It is my understanding that the Constitution of the United States... allows everybody the free choice between cheesecake and strudel.
I would be interested to hear.
Offhand, would you say that Mindy sells more cheesecake... or more strudel?
Going strictly by my own personal preference...
I'd say more cheesecake than strudel.
For how much?
- What?
- For how much?
Why, Nathan, I never knew you to lay money on the line.
You always take your bite off the top.
A thousand bucks says that yesterday
Mindy sold more strudel than cheesecake.
- Let me tell you a story.
- Have we got a bet?
On the day I left home to make my way in the world... my daddy took me to one side.
"Son," my daddy says to me...
"I am sorry I'm not able to bankroll you to a very large start... but not having the necessary letters to get you rolling... instead I'm going to stake you to some very valuable advice.
One of these days in your travels... a guy is going to show you a brand-new deck of cards... on which the seal is not yet broken.
Then this guy is going to offer to bet you... that he can make the jack of spades jump out of this new deck of cards... and squirt cider in your ear.
But, son, you do not accept this bet... because as sure as you stand there... you're going to wind up with an ear full of cider."
Now, I do not suggest that you have been clocking Mindy's cheesecake.
Would I do such a thing?
However, if you are really looking for some action...
I will bet you the same 1,000 that you cannot name the color tie you have on.
Have we got a bet?
No bet.
Polka dots!
In the whole world, nobody but Nathan Detroit... could blow 1,000 bucks on polka dots!
- Hi, Sky.
- Nice to see you, Benny.
- How goes it, Sky?
- Healthy at the moment.
- With you, Nicely?
- Nicely-nicely, thanks.
What's the matter?
You look sick.
A temporary disorder.
The cheesecake backed up on him.
Maybe that's why they told us they sell more strudel than cheesecake.
Adelaide gave us a message for you.
Pick her up at the Hot Box after the show, and don't be late.
Yes, dear. I mean, okay.
"Yes, dear"? This is husband talk if I ever heard it.
You are trapped, because Adelaide is the kind of a doll... that is most difficult to unload.
I don't want to unload her.
I love her.
Well, if a guy does not have a doll, who would holler on him?
A doll is a necessity.
I am not putting the knock on dolls.
They are just something to have around only when they come in handy.
The proof that I am right is that dolls are available all over the place... as far as the eye can see.
Not dolls like Adelaide.
Nothing personal, and no offense... but figuring weight for age all dolls are the same.
- All dolls are the same, huh?
- As far as the eye can see.
Then it seems the one place a doll would come in handy... would be on a trip to Havana.
This being the case, how come you ain't got one?
- How come you are going alone?
- A matter of choice.
I choose to travel alone, but if I wish to take a doll to Havana... the supply is more than Woolworth has got beads.
- Not high-class dolls.
- There's only one class.
Indivisible and interchangeable.
A doll is a doll- all dolls, any doll, you name her.
Any doll?
Will you bet on that?
Would you bet a thousand bucks that if I name a doll... you can take the same doll to Havana with you tomorrow?
You've got yourself a bet.
I name her.
- Her?
- Sergeant Sarah Brown.
Daddy, I got cider in my ear.
It is my fault, you know.
It's not the mission.
It's me.
I can't do the job that has to be done.
I'm a failure.
I'd be doing the right thing if I resigned and went back to Boston.
Sarah, should you be able to bend a solid gold watch?
- Of course not.
- That's what I thought.
Why do you want to go home? Because there aren't any sinners in Boston?
What have I accomplished here?
Surrounded by thousands of depraved characters... and after months of hard work, an empty mission.
I'm ashamed of you.
Just because the riffraff of Broadway didn't break down that door... the minute they heard you were in charge of this mission.
These aren't small-town delinquents who drink too much on Saturday night.
You're up against the devil's first-string troops... a whole army of devil's disciples!
Do you take sinners here?
At any time of the day or night, son.
Come right in and sit down.
- Cup of coffee and a donut?
- Just coffee, thanks.
I am not here because I am poor and hungry.
Not for food, that is.
"Blessed are they which do hunger after righteousness." Is that it?
"Hunger and thirst after righteousness."
Yes, sir, that's it.
My name's Arvide Abernathy.
The young lady at the desk is Sergeant Sarah Brown.
To you, we're Brother Arvide and Sister Sarah.
- Sit down, son.
- How do you do?
Brother Sky.
Hello, Sister Sarah.
Is that your name? Sky?
Sky Masterson.
What is it that troubles you,
Mr. Masterson?
- Brother Sky.
- Brother Sky.
I gather you are not in need of money.
I'm healthy at the moment.
It can change.
Are only the unhappy poor welcome here?
What are you unhappy about, son?
Gambling.
Apparently, you're a successful gambler.
Is it wrong to gamble or only to lose?
I better come back for help when I'm broke.
Please don't misunderstand.
It's just so unusual for a successful sinner to be unhappy about sin.
My unhappiness came up very suddenly.
Maybe it'll go away again.
We can keep you unhappy, son.
Give us a chance.
You don't look like a gambler at heart.
What made you take it up?
Evil companions.
Evil companions who are always offering me sucker bets.
Just what is a sucker bet?
A bet that is reserved for suckers.
For a gambler to get sucked in on such a bet is most humiliating.
But to lose it means you are marked for a very long time as a chump.
So you must go all out to win such a bet.
Is that so terrible, to be marked as a chump?
Among my people, being a chump is like losing your citizenship... because a chump is an outsider... a yokel who will buy anything with varnish on it.
- Like a solid gold watch for a dollar?
- This is a real chump.
I think I'll get some rest before we go out again.
Brother Sky,
I'm glad you found us.
Just stay and talk to Sister Sarah.
Whatever your problems are, she'll have the answers.
- I hope so.
- I know so.
If there's one thing
Sister Sarah never fails in... it's solving other people's problems.
What did he mean by that?
The way he said it- how you never fail in solving other people's problems.
Haven't we changed places,
Mr. Masterson-
- Brother Sky.
- Brother Sky, aren't we-
Why do you have trouble calling me Brother Sky?
Aren't we supposed to be discussing your problems?
It just struck me that maybe non-sinners also have problems.
If you are sincerely interested in giving up gambling...
Mister- Brother Sky... reading these pamphlets will help you.
My daddy always said reading pamphlets never made anybody give up anything.
Now, I had a more personal help in mind.
We're having a midnight prayer meeting on Thursday-
Thursday's the day after tomorrow.
Who's going to help me till then?
Well, our doors are always open.
Come in anytime.
You know what I think,
Sister Sarah?
You not only don't want to help me, but for some reason you're against me.
I'm afraid that is true.
I don't trust you, Mr. Masterson.
- Brother Sky.
- Mr. Masterson.
You don't believe
I'm a sinner, do you?
I'm prepared to believe that you're the biggest sinner I've ever met.
But you don't believe
I want to repent.
Is that it?
All of a sudden you want a cup of coffee.
Did it ever occur to you some people could be all repentance and no sin?
I may start a chain of missions to help your kind.
Come, all ye repenters, and let us bring a little sin into your life.
"There is no peace under the wicked.
Proverbs." This is wrong.
Let's say it's a matter of opinion.
I made a statement of fact.
It's wrong.
How dare you!
Even if this is not a church, it is a mission! How dare you blaspheme!
How dare you misquote the Bible!
"No peace under the wicked" is not Proverbs. It's Isaiah.
- Of course it's Proverbs.
- Isaiah.
Chapter 57, verse 20 or 21.
Would you like to bet on it?
Not money. Just a nice sociable bet.
Isaiah?
There's only one thing that's been in as many hotel rooms as I have- the Gideon Bible.
Never tangle with me on the Good Book.
I must've read it a dozen times.
- If all that was no help to you-
- Who says it wasn't?
Once, in one of my blackest moments,
I came up with a three-horse parlay-
Shadrach, Meshach and Abednego.
Mr. Masterson, why did you come in here?
- I told you I'm an unhappy sinner.
- Excuse me, but you're a liar.
Excuse me, but lying's not one of my sins.
I am not in the market for a one-dollar solid gold watch.
All right. We'll lay it on the line.
From now on, we'll deal the hand open.
Could you say that in English?
I'm sure you've earned your stripes courageously, combatting the devil-
There's no need to be sarcastic!
But not on this battlefield against the devil's first-line troops... because you can't get at the enemy.
- This mission is laying an egg.
- You have no way of knowing.
I've got lots of ways of knowing.
You are stuck with a store full of repentance and no customers.
Without sinners to repent, what is repentance? It doesn't exist.
So you're stuck with a store full of nothing.
- Now do I give you a fair rundown?
- I wouldn't know.
I've never had a rundown.
Would you be open to a proposition?
I've had those. No.
Don't flatter yourself.
I'm talking business.
I am in a position to supply you... with the raw material you need for your work- namely, sinners.
- How?
- That's my work.
When is this big midnight meeting?
Thursday, day after tomorrow.
I guarantee to supply that meeting with at least one dozen genuine sinners.
Whether they repent or not is up to you.
Thank you very much.
That seems to be a fair rundown.
Now, if you will excuse me.
Just a minute, Sister Sarah.
This is not a charity contribution.
This is a business transaction.
Something you want for something I want.
And what is that?
Have dinner with me tomorrow night.
Why should that be something you want?
Well, maybe because I think
I'll be hungry tomorrow night.
- Keep this. It's my marker.
- Your what?
My marker, my IOU for at least one dozen sinners delivered as described.
I will pick you up here tomorrow at noon.
- At noon to go to dinner?
- It takes time to get there.
We're going to eat at my favorite restaurant, El Cafe Cubano.
El Cafe Cubano?
Where's that?
- Havana.
- Havana, Cuba?
- What other Havanas are there?
- You want to take me to dinner in Cuba?
They eat in Cuba, same as we do.
What do you take me for,
Mr. Masterson? A chump?
- Isaiah's on the other side.
- You get out of here!
What are they worth to you?
One dozen sinners ready for salvation.
What are they worth to you?
A chicken salad in the tea room?
One last word, Sergeant.
I don't want you to walk out of this room thinking the reason you're upset... is because some blackhearted sinner made improper advances-
It's none of your business what I think.
To a virtuous young lady with a shining white soul.
Any sinful thoughts that may be present in this room at this time... come out of you, doll, not me.
You're quite right. I'm nothing but a repressed, neurotic girl.
I've read two books on the subject- who is abnormally attracted to sin and therefore abnormally afraid of it.
You're not the first man to try that approach, Mr. Masterson.
I am happy to know I'm not the first man who tried to approach in any way at all.
You're not even close.
I imagine by now you've succeeded in blocking all possible approaches.
Except for a few that you wouldn't know about, I'm afraid.
Well, of course, I only know the ones on the outskirts of society.
What are the approaches like on the inskirts?
All paved with honorable intentions?
- I wonder what he'll be like?
- Who?
That upright, downright, forthright square... with his close-shaved chin up... who right now somewhere is marching along the proper approach to proper you.
- What'll he be like?
- He will not be a gambler for one thing.
I can name better than you can the things he won't be, but what will he be?
- How will you know when he gets to you?
- Don't worry. I'll know.
For I've imagined
every bit of him
From his strong moral fiber
To the wisdom in his head
To the homey aroma
Of his pipe
You have wished yourself
a small town Galahad
The breakfast-eating
four-button type
And I shall meet him
When the time is right
I'll know
When my love comes along
I won't
Take a chance
For, oh
He'll be just what I need
Not some fly-by-night
Broadway romance
And you'll know at a glance
By the two pair of pants
I'll know
By his calm, steady voice
Those feet on the ground
I'll know
As I run to his arms
That at last
I've come home
Safe and sound
And till then
I shall wait
And till then
I'll be strong
For I'll know
When my love
Comes along
Mine will come
As a surprise to me
Mine, I'll leave to chance
And chemistry
- Chemistry?
- Yeah, chemistry.
Suddenly I'll
Know
When my love comes along
I'll know then and there
I'll know
At the sight of her face
How I care, how I care
And I'll stop
And I'll stare
And I'll know
Long before we can speak
I'll know
In my heart
I'll know
And I won't ever ask
Am I right
Am I wise
Am I smart
But I'll stop
And I'll stare
At that face
In the throng
Yes, I'll know
When my love
Comes
Along
Mm-hmm.
Well, that makes it necessary for me to drop back again.
Matthew 5:39.
Don't bother looking it up.
It's the bit about the other cheek.
I know, Joey.
But the thousand bucks is guaranteed.
What? It's a bet I cannot lose.
I bet Sky Masterson he could not take a certain doll to Havana with him.
Not this doll.
Not this doll!
And now for the grand finale of our "Round the World" revue... the Hot Box takes you out to the alley... with Miss Adelaide and her Alley Kittens.
Hello!
One meow, two meow,
three meow, scat.
What's the initial
of my pet tomcat?
Is it A, B, C, D, E, F, G?
Is it H or J or L, M, N, O, P?
Is it L, M, N, O, P,
Q, R, S, T?
No, it's you!
You're the cat for me!
You know you've been mean to me
And you know
when you're mean to me
How it always makes me want to
Roam
And you know there's a danger
That some gentle stranger
Might pick me up
And make me feel
At home
So pet me, Papa
Papa, pet me nice
Pet me, Papa
Papa, melt the ice
And you know how
If you don't want me
out roaming the city
Talk to me pretty
Here, kitty, kitty
And pet me, Papa
Papa, pet me nice
Papa, pet me good
Pet me, Papa, proper
like you should
And you know how
If you care to keep me home
by the fire
Especially when
it's time to retire
Then pet me, Papa
Papa, pet me good
Warm up my saucer of milk
And maybe I'll purr
Lay out my cushion of silk
Don't rumple my fur
Just reach over
and pet me, Papa
- Papa, melt the ice
- Tasty as a mouse
If you don't want me
out roaming the city
Talk to me pretty
Here, kitty, kitty
Pet me, Papa
That's my good advice
Yeah, pet me, Papa
That'll get me
Pet me, Papa
Papa, pet me nice
Look, Joey, I gotta hang up.
Can I at least tell the guys that the game will be at your garage tomorrow?
I would gladly pay you in advance, but
I won't get the money until tomorrow.
I've got to have time to spread the word around.
Joey, listen to me.
Yes, Joey.
Drop dead, Joey.
Nathan, darling!
You got here early.
It's so thrilling to find you waiting for me... just like we were married and I was coming home from work.
You wouldn't make me stop working, would you?
That would be cruel.
A doll like you could earn good money for another ten years easy.
Sweet. And you were reading my book too.
See? I told you reading don't make people go blind.
It's very interesting, isn't it?
What is? Oh, the book. Yeah.
The doctor gave it to me.
He said he thought it might help me get rid of my cold.
With a book?
The doctor thinks my cold might possibly be caused by psychology.
How does he know you got psychology?
Nathan, everybody has got it.
And female psychology explains why... certain girls do certain kinds of things.
It's all in the book.
Must be some book.
Would it, for instance, tell you what kind of a doll... would go for a certain kind of guy which you wouldn't think would do so?
No matter how terrible a fella seems... you can never be sure that some girl won't go for him.
Take us.
Get dressed.
We'll go eat.
Starting with next week...
I will be getting a raise in salary.
Where does it say what different kinds of dolls will do?
You're not even listening to me!
I will be making enough so that we can finally get married.
What do you think?
Of course we'll get married sooner or later.
After 14 years, it is already too late to be sooner.
If it gets much later, sooner will be too late even to be later.
Besides, I don't know what to do anymore about Mother.
Mother?
What about your mother?
Well, this is something that I haven't told you before... but my mother back in Rhode Island... well, she thinks that we are already married.
How could she think such a thing?
Maybe because I wrote her that we were already married.
That would make her think so.
In Rhode Island, people do not remain engaged for 14 years.
They get married!
So how come it's such a small state?
Furthermore, after about two years-
After about two years, we-
We got a divorce?
We had a baby.
- You wrote your mother we had a baby?
- I had to.
Mother kept after me, and finally
I just ran out of excuses.
And what type baby was it?
It was a boy.
I named it after you, Nathan.
- Thank you.
- You're welcome.
Tell me, what has Nathan, Jr.
Been doing all these years?
Well, right now he's in boarding school.
As a matter of fact,
I wrote Mother... that he won the football game last Saturday.
I wish I had a bet on it.
But, Nathan, I-
That isn't all.
You're not going to tell me we also have got an Adelaide, Jr?
All these years, Nathan!
Mother believes in big families... and we had such an early start.
Just give me the grand total.
Five.
How could you do such a thing to a nice, old broad like your mother?
Nathan, darling... let's just us get married, and I'll handle everything else.
Okay, doll, when we're ready.
Nathan, we are ready now.
We have been ready for 14 years.
All we need now is a license and a blood test.
- Blood test?
- Don't worry. You've got blood.
What a city.
First I close my crap game, and then they open my veins.
Nathan, you gave up the crap game.
Of course I did, doll.
And you know why? For you.
Because I love you.
Can I borrow some earrings?
It is customary, Laverne, to knock... when entering the private dressing room of an engaged person.
As far as I'm concerned, you are in here by yourself.
May I borrow some earrings?
- Diamonds or pearls?
- Diamonds.
In the top drawer of the trunk.
The big box.
Aren't they a little long, dear?
Remember, you've got a short neck.
He's a tall man.
You! I'm all dated up with Society Max tomorrow night... and he breaks it on account of your silly crap game!
Adelaide, look at me.
I'm on my knees.
Oh, get up!
It reminds me of your crap game.
Adelaide, doll!
You're getting yourself upset about nothin'.
It's a game I set up a long time ago.
I couldn't get out of it.
Understand?
Look, we love each other.
We're gonna get married.
We'll be happy.
Get out of my life,
Nathan Detroit!
I knew you'd understand.
It says here:
The average unmarried female
Basically insecure
Due to some long frustration
May react
With psychosomatic symptoms
Difficult to endure
Affecting the upper
Respiratory tract
In other words
Just from waitin' around
For that plain
little band of gold
A person
Could develop a cold
You could spray her
wherever you figure
The streptococci lurk
You can give her a shot
for whatever she's got
But it just won't work
If she's tired
of gettin' that fish eye
From the hotel clerk
A person
Can develop a cold
It says here:
The female remaining single
Constantly in suspense
Shows a neurotic tendency
See note
"See note"? "Note."
Chronic, organic syndromes
Toxic or hypertense
Involving the eye, the ear
the nose and throat
In other words
Just from wondering
Whether the wedding is on or off
A person
Can develop a cough
You can feed her all day
with a vitamin A
And the bromo fizz
But the medicine
never gets anywhere near
Where the trouble is
If she's getting
a kind of a name for herself
And the name ain't his
A person
Can develop a cough
And furthermore
Just from stalling and stalling
and stalling the wedding trip
A person
Can develop la grippe
When they get on the train
For Niagara
And she can hear
church bells chime
The compartment
is air-conditioned
And the mood
Sublime
Then they get off
at Yonkers racetrack
For the 14th time
A person
Can develop la grippe
La grippe
La postnasal drip
With the wheezes
and the sneezes
And a sinus
that's really a pip
From a lack of community property
And a feeling
she's getting too old
A person
Can develop a bad, bad
Cold
Follow the fold
and stray no more
Stray no more
Put down the bottle
and we'll say no more
Follow
Nathan, if you had arrived one minute earlier... you would have witnessed Miss Sarah give Sky Masterson a 100% brush-off.
So the thousand for Joey Biltmore is practically in your pocket.
- You should be jumping for joy.
- I'm jumping.
You got work to do, arrangements to make.
A shave and a hot towel will fix you up.
For who should I have a shave?
For who should I have a hot towel?
Do you know what is at stake here?
Nathan Detroit's crap game.
Because of a doll.
I cannot believe that a number-one businessman like you... could let himself go and fall in love with his own fiance.
All right!
So Adelaide is my weakness.
Can you not be tolerant that I have got a weakness?
Especially since this weakness is a sad condition that guys are in everywhere?
Look-
What's playing at the Roxy
I'll tell you
what's playing at the Roxy
It's a picture about a Minnesota man
so in love with a Mississippi girl
That he sacrifices everything
and moves all the way to Biloxi
That's what's playing at the Roxy
What's in the Daily News
I'll tell you what's in the Daily News
Story about a guy
who bought his wife a small ruby
With what otherwise
would have been his union dues
That's what's in the Daily News
What's happenin' all over
I'll tell you what's happenin' all over
Guy sitting home by a television set
who used to be something of a rover
That's what's happening all over
Love is the thing
that has licked them
And it looks like
I'm just another victim
Yes, sir.
When you see a guy
reach for stars in the sky
You can bet that he's doing it
for some doll
When you spot a John
waiting out in the rain
Chances are he's insane
as only a John can be for a Jane
When you meet a gent
Payin' all kinds of rent
For a flat
that could flatten the Taj Mahal
Call it sad
Call it funny
But it's better than even money
That the guy's only doin' it
for some doll
When you see a Joe
savin' half of his dough
You can bet there'll be mink in it
for some doll
When a bum buys wine
like a bum can't afford
It's a cinch that the bum
is under the thumb
Of some little broad
When you meet a mug
lately out of the jug
And he's still lifting
platinum folderol
Call it hell
Call it heaven
It's a probable 12 to 7
That the guy's only doin' it
for some doll
When you see a sport
and his cash has run short
You can bet he's been blowin' it
on some doll
When a guy wears tails
with the front gleaming white
Who the heck do you think
he's tickling pink
On Saturday night
When some lazy slob
gets a good, steady job
And he smells
from Vitalis and Barbasol
Call it dumb
Call it clever
Ah, but you can give odds forever
That the guy's only doin' it
for some doll
Some doll, some doll
That guy's only doin' it
for some doll
Well, I think we finally managed to shake off the Prince of Darkness.
You certainly did your best to discourage him.
I certainly did.
Arvide.
General Cartwright, what a pleasant surprise.
- We didn't even know you were in town.
- A flying visit.
Flew in from Boston early this morning.
Important luncheon meeting.
While waiting, thought I'd check a few of our outposts informally.
I must say, Sarah, I was surprised to find the mission unattended... in a neighborhood as unsavory as this.
Why should you be surprised, General?
You've seen our records.
We don't seem to get anyone in here, even to rob the place.
Yes.
Well, now that you've brought it up...
I must confess
I have come for a purpose.
An unhappy one.
I know it doesn't look as if we're accomplishing anything, but in time-
Time, I'm afraid, is what we can no longer afford.
My good friends... after careful deliberation,
National Headquarters has decided... to close this branch of the mission.
- Close the mission?
- Oh, no, General, please.
Even if I haven't made a success of it, there must be someone who will.
Sarah Brown, if you can't attract sinners, nobody can.
There are so many calls on us... so many other places where our work is needed.
How do you do?
I don't believe we've met,
Brother-
Brother Sky Masterson, former sinner.
I am General Cartwright,
Regional Director of Save-A-Soul.
- Why isn't his name on the report?
- What were you doing in there?
I was resting, Sister Sarah.
I was going to ask Brother Arvide if he might let me carry the drum... when we go out again this afternoon.
On behalf of the former sinners of the future...
I protest the closing of this mission.
- I think I should explain to you-
- This man has a right to be heard.
Continue, Brother Sky.
General, would you be open to a proposition?
The general is flying back to Boston this afternoon.
She will not be available for dinner tonight.
Sarah, what are you talking about?
- What have you got in mind, young man?
- Faith in Sister Sarah.
I ask you to give her 36 hours to show you that she... can make this mission pay off.
Saving souls should not be referred to as "paying off."
Why 36 hours?
Because he knows that our big meeting
36 hours from now...
- will be a great success.
- Uncle Arvide!
How can you guarantee that,
Brother Sky?
Well, let's just say
I have a feeling about it.
"If sinners entice thee, consent thou not."
That's the wrong thought.
Where is yesterday's Thought for Today?
Top right-hand drawer.
Excuse me, General.
Before going to the expense of a big meeting...
I should think it'd require more than just a feeling that it'll be successful.
Oh, it's a very strong feeling,
General.
"There is no peace to the wicked."
Isaiah 57:21.
That is correct.
General, my proposition is this:
Why don't you come to the midnight meeting tomorrow night... and find out for yourself?
Well, if I thought there was a chance of finding definite progress... any sizable turnout.
What do you think, Sister Sarah?
Don't you honestly believe that this mission could be saved... within the next 36 hours?
General Cartwright...
I'm in a position to guarantee you personally... at least one dozen genuine sinners.
Hallelujah!
Hallelujah.
Be sure you're wearing your carnation.
Remember, nobody gets in a crap game... without they got a red carnation.
It's like a password.
Nathan's orders.
We got the flowers.
Where is the action?
The minute Nathan arrives, we're gonna-
He has arrived.
Is it all set?
Can I tell the customers it's Joey Biltmore's-
Not till I put the thousand in Joey's hands, and I haven't got it yet.
I sent Nicely to wait for Sky at his hotel.
The minute Sky gives him the money,
Nicely's gonna bring it to me.
But they won't stick around much longer.
They're gettin' nervous.
I'm not nervous?
Well, Harry the Horse.
How is everything in Brooklyn? The same?
I hope, Detroit, you will not spoil our evening... inasmuch as I happen to be entertaining a very prominent guest tonight.
I would like you to meet
Big Jule from Chicago.
I would like you to meet
Big Jule from Chicago.
Big Jule, welcome to our fair city... in which, as you know, the heat is on.
However, if you will be patient, you will be provided with action.
What do you say? Should we stick around, or should we blow?
I come here to shoot crap.
Let's shoot crap.
Order another milkshake and relax.
Do not let the fact that Big Jule drinks milk give you any wrong ideas.
Big Jule does not like to be displeased.
Why, Harry, did I give the impression that I was being rude to a guest... who has such a well-deserved reputation as Big Jule?
I'm sure that you did not misunderstand my kidding remarks.
It's just that one look at your kindly face... which is so full of fun... good fellowship-
Could I have a swallow of your milk?
Well, well, well.
What have we here?
The jails must be empty tonight.
Can anybody be missing?
Harry the Horse...
Liver Lips Louie...
Angie the Ox, Society Max.
And here is a face for which
I cannot supply a name.
May I ask where you come from?
East Cicero, Illinois.
And what is your occupation there?
I'm a scout master.
Don't ever help my mother across the street.
Such lovely red carnations.
Is it a funeral?
Did somebody die suddenly that I don't know about... yet?
What's on, Nathan? What brings all these senior delinquents together?
They got lonely.
How do I know?
And why are they all wearing red carnations?
They are also all wearing pants.
You are up to no good, Detroit!
Is it now a crime to wear flowers?
Is Mindy's a hideout for gangsters?
Lieutenant, I'll confess.
We're smuggling hot cheesecake into Canada.
This is all I need.
It's complete.
Everybody in the whole world who hates me... is now here.
What's the use, Nathan?
Why try to keep it a secret?
- Bite your tongue, Benny!
- All right, Southstreet.
- Let's have it. What's this all about?
- It's a party.
- What kind of a party?
- A dinner.
A bachelor dinner for Nathan Detroit.
He's gettin' married.
For he's a jolly good fellow
Which nobody cannot deny
Oh, Nathan, darling.
I'm so thrilled.
- Why didn't you tell me?
- It was gonna be a surprise wedding.
You certainly had me fooled,
Detroit.
When is the happy occasion?
It's gonna take a little time to get the blood tests, the license.
Gee, wouldn't it be wonderful if we could get married tomorrow night?
I mean, right after the opening of the new show at the Hot Box.
According to the laws under which we live, it's gonna take a little time.
You could elope.
You are telling me to violate the law?
It's legal to elope at your age.
And the great state of Maryland will marry you right away, no blood test.
Ain't that unhealthy?
The lieutenant has come up with a romantic suggestion of which I approve.
Elope, and for the trip,
I will loan you my getaway car... that is, my station wagon.
Oh, Nathan, darling.
Let's do it. Please?
 April in paris 
 Chestnuts in blossom 
 Holiday tables under the trees 
 April in paris 
 This is a feeling 
 No one can ever reprise 
 April in paris 
 Whom can I run to? 
 What have you done to my heart? 
Good afternoon, mr. Putnam.
Good afternoon.
Good afternoon, mr. Putnam.
Good afternoon, mr. Putnam.
Good afternoon.
Good afternoon, mr. Putnam.
Good afternoon.
Oh. Good afternoon, mr. Putnam.
You weren't paying attention.
Good afternoon, mr. Putnam.
Good afternoon, tracy.
Everything in apple-pie order?
Apple-pie order, mr. Putnam.
Fine, fine.
The mail, sir.
Oh, by the way, that frenchman still insists upon seeing you.
Didn't you send him to immigration?
Yes, but they sent him to the justice department.
Justice sent him to treasury.
Treasury sent him back to us.
Those are the usual channels.
What's his complaint?
This is his third time around.
Oh, I'm so busy setting up the festival, but send him in.
Did you send for me?
Find room...
If you can.
Mr. Fouquet, my secretary's already told you there's nothing further we can do.
But I must be in paris next week.
Your passport is in order.
You can leave whenever you wish.
But I have no money to buy my ticket, and I cannot fly by myself, no?
I have spent all winter here earning the yankee dollar, but I do not have one yankee penny.
Treasury informs us they've had to freeze the money you've earned until they determine your back taxes.
How long will that be?
A week, two weeks, a month.
A month?
No money? No wine?
No women?
How could a man live, unless he's an american?
I'm sorry.
Those are regulations.
There's nothing I can do.
Look, in france,
I am a famous entertainer.
I own my own nightclub.
In the bank
I have francs up to here.
I--i will call paris, have my friends cable me money.
Can I do that?
Oh, yes.
Fine.
But we'll have to impound it as soon as it arrives.
Charming.
Monsieur, soon it will be springtime in paris.
The children will be dancing in the bois de boulogne.
Men with tiny carts will be selling
marrons chauds in the streets-- um... Chestnuts.
And everywhere, young couples will be in each other's arms kissing.
Have pity on a man who only breathes, lives, and loves when he's in paris.
You'll loan me enough to go, no?
It's against regulations.
Second class?
Impossible.
Steerage?
That's against regulations, too.
Would you mind greasing me?
I'll try to swim it.
That's--
I know, I know.
That's against regulations, too.
All right. I will wait to see a higher assistant.
Ladies and gentlemen,
I do not like to criticize your government, but...
Everything is regulations, forms, red tape, efficiency.
No room for mistakes.
Now, what would happen to this giant machine if one little human error should sneak in, hmm?
Things wouldn't be so apple pie, believe me.
This whole delicately balanced mechanism would go poof.
Tracy, tracy, something terrible has happened.
W-w-w-what's the matter?
I'm flying to new york.
Phone the harvard club.
Tell them I won't be home to dinner.
Tell them anything.
Make up something.
I know why he's so excited.
You do?
He got the paris festival letters mixed and sent ethel barrymore's invitation to a chorus girl.
A chorus girl? I better start moving him out.
Poof!
Hold it, mr. Putnam.
Mr. Putnam, why the rush trip from washington?
Is the paris festival off?
Any statement on the festival will have to come from the assistant to the undersecretary.
But it's your baby-- international festival of arts.
We hear you're taking a representative of the american theater.
Who is it, ethel barrymore or bugs bunny?
Very droll.
I assure you, the representatives of the various arts will be chosen from the best america has to offer.
I'm sorry to disappoint you, but everything is running smoothly.
Why did you snatch the first hat you saw and grab a plane?
I did not snatch the first hat I saw.
It's a routine visit planned weeks ago.
I bid you good day.
Knickerbocker theatre.
And see that we're not followed.
O.K., Dick tracy.
It'll be our little secret.
That'll be 5 bucks even.
There you are.
Hey, mac, what's with the tip?
Your rates are set by the interstate commerce commission.
I'm sure they provide a living wage.
Like to marry me for my money?
Tipping is undignified and un-american.
I believe it should be abolished by law.
Mac, I got a word of advice for you-- don't cross any streets.
We got a big organization.
Hey, mac, close that door.
Where's your stub?
My what?
You got a ticket, or you just come in to get warm?
I'm here on official business for the united states government.
I would like to see, uh...
Miss ethel s. Jackson.
Where can I find her?
Dynamite Jackson?
Come here.
 It must be good, it must be good 
 They fall in love in every neighborhood 
There she is, third from the left.
 Get that itch you like 
 That's why it must be good 
What a built, huh?
 It must be nice 
 This one-way ticket up to paradise 
 Makes those rural folks turn to plural folks 
 I guess it must be nice 
 It's been written, don't rewrite it 
 Once you're smitten 
 You can't fight it 
 Whoever said a man ain't made of wood 
 Sure understood 
 It must be good, it's very good 
 This only cure for chronic bachelorhood 
 Go start pricin' things 
 Shoes and rice and things 
 labeled hers and his 
 And you'll find love 
 Is everything that they say it is 
 Cole porter asked 
 What is this thing called love? 
 If no one has answered you yet 
 My dear mr. Porter 
 We may not know just what love is 
 But we can tell you what it must be like 
 At least we think we ought'er 
 Are you listening 
 Mr. Porter? 
Hmm?
Hmm?
Hmm?
 It must be good, it's very good 
 This only cure for chronic bachelorhood 
 Go start pricin' things 
 Shoes and rice and things 
 labeled hers and his 
 And you'll find love 
 Is everything that they say it is 
 Love is everything that they say it is 
 Love is everything that they say it is 
 Love is everything that they say it is 
What a built, huh?
Sit down.
Thank you.
Surprise!
Surprise!
Surprise!
These are all for me?
Take your thumb out of your mouth and open the presents.
We have to get going.
Oh, a nightgown.
How do I look?
Beautiful.
Wonderful.
Wear that on the boat.
When they say, "women and children first," they'll know which you are.
Oh, slippers and perfume.
Oh, kids, I love it.
And a dictionary.
Just what I need.
And the bill.
How did that get in there?
Oh, kids.
Where did you get the money?
We refuse to answer on the grounds it may incriminate us.
Don't look. I think
I'm going to cry.
Here. Use this.
Where can I find miss Jackson?
You'll have to wait outside, buddy, with the rest of them.
You don't understand.
I represent the government.
Our government?
Yes.
Say, we're in worse shape than I thought.
On stage.
Charlie, do you want some cake?
Big piece.
I--i beg your pardon.
Uh, miss Jackson-- miss Jackson-- let's have a speech.
Speech! Speech!
Oh, no. No. Oh, no.
We want Jackson!
We want Jackson!
We want Jackson!
I don't know what to say.
Can you imagine the government picking me to represent the american theater at the festival in paris, france?
Sure.
Why not?
I couldn't believe it when I got the letter.
I must be a cross section or something.
Or it might be because I'm the equity representative, huh?
I'll probably wake up tomorrow and find it's a big mistake.
Miss Jackson, I-- shh!
Shh!
Of course, I--i guess everybody has a right once in their life to have something really big happen to them.
Well, this is my big moment, and it's something
I'm going to remember as long as I live.
And if anybody tells anybody else
I was crying,
I'll knock them silly-- if they aren't already.
Have a good trip.
I will.
Don't do anything
I wouldn't do.
If you can help it.
Bye.
Bye.
Bye.
Thanks again, kids.
Uh, miss Jackson.
Miss Jackson.
Look. Zippers.
I would like to introduce myself.
Sure. Be my guest.
I'm s. Winthrop Putnam of the department of state.
Oh, I'm sorry.
How do you do?
I thought you'd be an old bird with a beard down to here.
My apologies if I've disappointed you.
Oh, no, no.
You'll do.
Thank you.
Do you mind if I put the cake down?
I've had a sufficiency.
Did you bring the passport and the ticket?
Boat leaves friday, you know.
That's why I want to speak to you.
I guess you go all the time.
Europe, I mean.
I've never been one place you couldn't get to by subway.
Now I'm going all the way to paris, thanks to you.
Oh,
I could kiss you.
I think I will.
Oh, no, no, no.
Miss Jackson, when you were speaking before, you mentioned a mistake.
So?
Well, that's exactly what happened.
See, there was a letter to ethel Jackson about a work permit so you could perform in a nightclub in montreal.
Oh, don't worry about that.
I'll cancel montreal for paris anytime.
Nothing but eskimos up there anyway.
Then there was a letter to miss ethel barrymore asking her to represent the united states at the international festival of arts.
No.
Oh, I am sorry.
I hope you understand.
You mean it's all off?
That's correct.
I'm sorry I got the letters mixed up.
Sure.
Can you picture ethel barrymore playing that flea trap in montreal?
The state department would appreciate it if you wouldn't mention this to anyone.
We'd be investigated by the justice department, which would be a little embarrassing because we're investigating them.
Wait till
I tell the kids.
They knocked themselves out with all these presents and everything.
The nicest thing that's ever happened to me.
Now I-- look, miss Jackson,
I know exactly how you feel.
How could you know?
Well, when I was a child in boston, my father bought me a rifle.
It was a .22.
I was 12 years old.
That was the most beautiful thing
I'd ever seen.
We were going up to maine, hunting, and then I came down with the measles.
Why didn't you shoot yourself?
Well, it's all your fault.
You got the letters mixed up.
If you hadn't,
I wouldn't have been so excited about it.
Anything I can do-- you can do something.
Go back to washington.
Give this to your girlfriend.
I won't be needing it.
Listen to my side.
Get out of here.
Go grow yourself a beard.
And next year
I'm voting for anthony eden!
 April in paris 
 Chestnuts in blossom 
 Holiday tables under the trees 
 April in paris 
 This is a feeling 
 No one can ever reprise 
 I never knew the charm of spring 
 Never met it face to face 
 I never knew my heart could sing 
 Never missed a warm embrace 
 Till april in paris 
 Whom can I run to? 
 What have you done to 
 My heart? 
Good morning, mr. Putnam.
Good morning, mr. Putnam.
Good morning, mr. Putnam.
Good morning, mr. Putnam.
Good morning, mr. Putnam.
Mr. Sherman is waiting for you, mr. Putnam.
He's heard the good news.
He has?
Yes. Go right in.
Lend-lease.
I know what you're going to say, sir, and I--i deserve it.
I want to compliment you, my boy.
It was a job well done.
I've been in the department for 10 years, and this was the most difficult diplomatic mission since an explorer got lost in the pentagon.
Imagine appointing a chorus girl to represent the american theater.
I assume full responsibility.
It was a stroke of genius.
It was?
Now, I don't know how the news services got wind of this, but I'm glad they did.
Just look at these telegrams.
My boy, you've captured the popular imagination.
I saw the young lady and told her-- a representative from the rank and file.
She threw my hat at me and her nightgown.
And labor says,
"this will mean a quarter million votes at the next election."
A quarter million votes for our party.
One vote for anthony eden.
Oh, uh, Winthrop, here are the passports for our group-- joshua stevens, america's finest artist, sinclair wilson, our foremost man of letters, josef weimar, one of our leading composers, and, uh, miss ethel s. Jackson.
How shall I describe her?
Just say,
"what a built."
Is this top-secret, or can anyone's daughter come in?
Marcia.
Hello, dear.
That's for nothing.
That's for something.
Congratulations, darling.
I heard of your latest achievement.
How did you ever think of it?
It came to me while
I was mailing a letter.
I was talking to senator owen about you.
There will be a vacancy on the labor relations board.
One of the labor members is going back to work.
We won't settle for anything small.
We want the senate seat from the state of massachusetts.
We do?
Is it big enough for both of us?
Right now you're the white-haired boy of capitol hill.
What you've done today may be a steppingstone on your way to the white house.
Really, aren't we presuming a little too much?
I don't think I have the qualifications.
No, no. This is too farfetched.
Never doubt the power of a woman who wants to be first lady.
Good-bye, dear.
Keep up the good work.
I'll see you to your car.
You have more important things to do.
Father will see me down.
Father, will you do something about getting Winthrop a larger office?
Well, I could demote myself and give him mine.
Well... Perhaps...
For a wedding present.
Yes, sir?
Tracy, take a telegram to miss ethel s. Jackson--
128 west 48th street, new york.
Plans changed. Be packed and be prepared to be picked up-- uh, 4 p.M. Tomorrow en route to ship.
Signed, the president.
Who?
Ooh, uh...
S. Winthrop Putnam, of course. ladies and gentlemen, the president of the united states.
Mr. Chairman...
Mr. Speaker...
Members of the congress,
 I have the honor to report 
 On the state of the union 
 It's an honor and a privilege 
 It's a privilege and an honor 
 To appear this date to reiterate 
 That the state of each state in the 48 
 Is, as I soon will indicate 
 In positively, absolutely 
 And I say this resolutely 
 So you'll get it straight 
 The state of each state is great 
 When I last met with the cabinet 
 We found that we didn't have a debt 
 The budget was balanced and in the black 
 Did I say balanced?
I take that back 
 We were overbalanced 
 And you'll be glad to learn 
 We found some money 
 That we're going to return 
Bravo! Bravo!
Encore!
So I reaffirm on this, my...
Sixth term...
 that the state of each state in the 48 
 Is, as I soon will indicate 
 In positively, absolutely 
 And I say this resolutely 
 So you'll get it straight 
 The state of each state is great 
 Bluebirds serenade me 
 Life is such a pleasure 
 Don't think you can trade me 
 Treasure for this 
 Sunbeams dance around me 
 Life is such a pleasure 
 Seems like luck has found me 
 Measure my bliss 
 Down the street I walk with a springy air 
 Singing a singy air gaily 
 I repeat that life can be charmin' 
 And more fun than barnum & bailey daily 
 Happy as a clown is 
 Life is such a pleasure 
 Don't know what a frown is 
 I'm on my way 
 Life is such a pleasure today 
 Life will be barnum & bailey daily 
 Life is such a pleasure today 
Ah,
cher monsieur diron, who would have thought a frenchman would have to borrow money in america from another frenchman?
No, really, you've saved my life.
Here are your accommodations-- the royal suite on the main deck.
Thank you very much.
<I>Mon cheri,
I am here.
Simone, my little pigeon.
Philippe.
Are you sailing, too?
Remember our last boat trip?
That last night?
You remember this?
And this? And this?
Shall we go on?
For a first minute, she's always like this.
You know the type.
I should.
She's my wife.
Ahem.
Exactly.
Here I am, gentlemen.
Professor weimar, you know sinclair wilson, joshua stevens.
Very well.
They walked out on my last concert.
Well, gentlemen, our government is about to launch another noble experiment: three of the finest minds in this country traveling to paris with a chorus girl.
Everything happens to me
20 years too late.
Well...
Father!
Bon voyage.
Forgot your pills.
I knew you would.
I knew I would, too.
Father, don't you think
I need an ocean voyage, too?
Everyone seems to be going this year, even chorus girls.
That's a short leash you have Winthrop on.
Don't let him know you're worried.
Does it show?
Like an old petticoat.
Let him go on alone.
Then when he's in paris, let him start worrying about you in washington.
You're a pretty shrewd operator.
I take after my daughter.
Wonder what's keeping him.
Why? Where is he?
He's picking up miss Jackson at her apartment.
Miss Jackson, unlock this door.
Didn't you receive my telegram?
Yes, I did, but western union wouldn't send my answer.
Now go away!
How'd you get in here?
I have a friend in the fbi.
How about the red cross?
Miss Jackson, I know
I've treated you shabbily, but you owe it to our government to cooperate.
Cooperate?
Yes.
That's a hot one.
Uncle sam's been gouging my paycheck for 10 years, so now I owe him?
What did you do with the 200 bucks
I paid last year?
The 200 bucks were well spent.
Mailing letters to the wrong people.
Just checking.
Just leave me alone.
I have a duty to perform.
It took me three years of hard work to set up this festival.
Try that again...
To a violin.
Don't be facetious.
Do you know what my title is?
No.
Assistant secretary to the assistant to the undersecretary of state.
It's taken me 10 years to get this far.
If this falls through,
I'll be back where I started-- assistant assistant secretary to the assistant to the undersecretary of state.
That's a federal case if I ever heard one.
Miss Jackson, have you ever been to paris in the spring?
Are you kidding?
Me and the prince always stop by on our way to monte carlo.
It's something that no beautiful young lady should miss-- sidewalk cafes, champagne, singing.
Who's singing?
In paris, everyone sings...
All the time.
It comes with the country.
Mademoiselle, soon it will be springtime in paris.
Children will be dancing in the bois de boulogne.
Baloney?
Boulogne.
Men with tiny carts will be selling
marrons chauds-- chestnuts-- and everywhere young couples will be in each other's arms, kissing.
Don't throw away the whole trip just because you hate me.
But I don't hate you.
You're trying so hard,
I'm starting to root for you.
How about coming along and getting your 200 bucks' worth?
Who knows, you might meet a nice young man and break even.
You know something?
I might at that.
I'll help you pack your bags.
Why, these bags are already packed.
No sense wasting time, is there?
 When I'm aflame as I am 
 I implore you, madame 
 Give me your lips 
 Don't whisper,
"please give me time" 
 Keep your reasons, your rhyme 
 Give me your lips 
 lady, somewhere a phantom island 
 Can be reached in phantom ships 
 We can reach it 
 If you 
 Give me hope you'll be mine 
 Give me all that's divine 
 Give me your lips 
 Give me your lips 
 lady, somewhere a phantom island 
 Can be reached 
 In phantom ships 
 We can reach it 
 If you 
 Give me hope 
 You'll be mine 
 Give me all that's divine 
 Give me your lips 
Philippe!
Very heavy tipper.
Philippe, you come into the kitchen and cool off.
See you later, mademoiselle.
Monsieur Fouquet, you realize what an example you are setting for the other waiters?
Yes, but the question is, can they follow it?
You should be grateful for this opportunity
I've given you, to work your way back to france.
Instead, you are causing me nothing but trouble.
I didn't ask to be made a waiter.
I could've explained to the captain that I would pay for my passage-- first class-- as soon as we arrived in france.
The captain has been sick.
He's seeing no one.
Besides, I'm sure that he wouldn't be impressed by the fact you are
Philippe Fouquet.
I seem to be the only one who is.
If I have to complain once more about you, when the captain gets up, he will ship you right back to america where you will spend the rest of your life.
Oh, no. Please, not while I'm eating.
Yesterday...
Yesterday...
You brought a young lady breakfast in bed, and you remained in the cabin until after lunch.
Tomorrow I go back for the dishes.
Oh, Philippe!
Philippe! Philippe!
You are so-- so french!
You go take care of your table.
I promise I will not tell the captain.
Oh, monsieur le chef,
I love you.
Ah, if only you could cook.
I'm sorry.
I lost my head.
Miss Jackson, you are using your dessert spoon instead of your bouillon spoon.
Try to remember.
A dessert spoon has a truncated ellipse.
A bouillon spoon, a section of a sphere.
I'll work on it nights.
Didn't think
I'd make it, did you?
Gentlemen, what is it you ordered?
The new england boiled dinner.
With a poached egg.
Fortunately for you gentlemen,
I am a man of taste.
I brought you instead le coq au vin a la bourguignon, delicately flavored chicken surrounded by naughty little mushrooms swimming naked in a pool of burgundy.
In boston, you couldn't serve that in public.
I should have kept you in immigration and given you enough grease to swim back.
Take it back.
One taste of that rich food will probably kill me.
<I>Oh, monsieur, non.</I>
excusez moi one minute.
Better to die with this in your mouth than to live with a new england boiled dinner.
Amen!
Mademoiselle ordered the caneton flamb.
I shall prepare it right before your eyes.
Make it good.
This is my first time.
Mine, too.
I will give it my personal touch.
What a wonderful way to drown a duck.
You don't mind, do you?
After all, this is our last night.
Which reminds me, are you packed?
Yeah. For all the fun I've had,
I could have stayed in the bag myself.
If that's all taken care of, then you won't be busy after dinner?
No. What'd you have in mind?
I think mr. Weimar and mr. Stevens should help you with your speech for the festival.
How about frying up more brandy?
After that, mr. Wilson will spend some time with you conjugating french verbs, the irregular ones which are giving you so much difficulty.
Then I thought we might get together.
Oh, I'd love to.
Ah-ah-ahem!
On matters of protocol.
You'll find them quite interesting.
Gentlemen,
I've heard enough.
For four days,
I've been serving this table, and in that time, no one's said one romantic word to this charming lady.
Is that against regulations, too?
Waiter!
What is wrong with her?
From what I can see above the tablecloth, she is a very attractive young lady.
Thank you, waiter.
I can be wrong, but I must be at least half right.
Why don't you get our dessert or something?
Monsieur, your dessert is right here.
Tonight there is a dance in the main ballroom.
I have noticed how the young lady looks at you when she picks up the wrong spoon.
Believe me, sir, if you take her to the dance tonight, you will thank me for the rest of your days.
I will?
This is outrageous!
I'll report you to the captain.
Not so fast.
24 Complaints are ahead of you.
He is right about one thing.
I'd love to go to the dance tonight.
Well-- out of the question.
There's too much for you to do.
Out of the question.
There's too much for you to do.
Miss Jackson,
I am no longer a young man, and I don't dance very well.
My feet are tired from long hours of serving breakfast in bed, but if you will do me the honor to accompany me to the dance,
I will be a young boy again.
That's the nicest invitation
I've ever had.
If you plan to disgrace this delegation by attending the dance with a waiter...
In that case, perhaps I could take her.
You'll do no such thing.
As for you, young lady, finish your dinner.
Forget all this foolishness, then retire to your cabin.
I didn't ask to come.
I was invited.
I was almost shanghaied.
Well, I'm sorry if I'm lowering the tone of this pallbearers convention, but I'm sick and tired of taking orders.
And I'm not going to finish my dinner.
I'm not going to my room either.
Take my advice, gentlemen.
Hang on to your life preservers.
Miss Jackson!
Sit down, Winthrop.
You eat this duck, you goose.
And I hope you like it well done.
Waiter! Waiter!
Do something here!
Goodness, help.
Oh, this is wonderful,
Philippe.
The whole trip should have been just like this.
It will be.
Just wait.
In a few minutes, mr. Putnam will get tired of playing chess.
He will come looking for you, tap me on the shoulder-- you see?
Philippe.
Peek-a-boo.
Mademoiselle,
I'm most embarrassed, but do you realize this man is a steward?
He's an angel.
<I>Sacre bleu.</I>
Fouquet has done it again.
Now if you'll allow us...
That is impossible.
We were very lenient with you, but you've gone too far.
Sorry, mademoiselle.
You may remain, but your gay companion may not.
Well, in that case,
I don't stay either.
Come, ma cherie.</I> we'll take our business to another boat.
I'm sorry you got dressed up and everything.
It was very sweet of you to ask me tonight, but I better go back to my cabin.
Look, do you wish to live a life of new england boiled dinners and poached eggs?
No.
Do you wish to spend your evenings studying somebody's agenda?
No.
Do you wish instead to place yourself completely in the hands of a frenchman with imagination,
joie de vivre, and years and years of experience?
Lafayette,
I am here.
Cinderella shall go to the ball, even if it's through the back entrance.
<I>Silence! Silence!</I> clear everything out of the way.
The dance is about to begin.
Philippe, Philippe, have you gone mad?
Where have you been?
There's work to do.
Yes, there's work to be done.
This charming young lady has been on our boat four lovely moonlit nights, and nothing has happened.
Nothin'!
And on a french boat.
You know what this poor little child has been doing with her evenings?
Conjugating verbs.
<I>Je vais, tu vas,
il va.</I>
silence!</I> the honor of france is at stake.
<I>Oui!</I>
absolument!</I> shall we allow her to return to america unconjugated?
<I>Mais non!</I>
mais non!</I> no! No, gentlemen! Never!
Please sit down.
Even though they won't allow us to the main salon, we'll have our dance here.
Well, well, well, well, my friends, are you mice or frenchmen?
Frenchmen!
Frenchmen!
<I>Oui!</I>
 je vais, tu vas,
il va 
 nous allons,
vous allez, ils vont 
 je vais, tu vas,
il va 
 nous allons,
vous allez, ils vont...  messieurs, I am sorry to make you wait for your carbonated soda, but the kitchen was awful crowded.
A toast to french cooking.
My stomach will never be the same.
There's never been such a night.
The waiters are dancing in the kitchen.
Even the chef joined them.
And miss Jackson danced with all of them.
The true spirit of democracy.
<I>Vive I'amrique!</I> and now, gentlemen,
I must leave you.
I have the next dance.
Gentlemen, it was a noble experiment, but it hasn't worked out.
We've been inconsiderate of miss Jackson.
She's young-- she must be told at once...
And beautiful and full of spirit-- that we're returning her to the united states.
Sir, I'm not in complete accord, but if that is your desire, please don't be harsh with her.
I shan't be harsh at all.
That is your job.
Very well, sir.
I shall tell her...
But her reaction is apt to be violent.
Mr. Weimar, if I don't return, finish the game.
Pardon me.
Oh, monsieur Putnam.
The representative of that great country for which we have such great respect-- what is it again?
United states.
<I>the united states.
The united states.
Let's drink a toast to the united states.
United states.
I'm sorry, gentlemen.
I never drink.
The gentleman refuses to toast his own country?
Of which he is the official representative?
This will make big news in moscow.
Of course it will.
I wouldn't want the committee investigating the committees to investigate me.
That's better.
To the united states.
To the united states.
To the united states.
<I>Excusez moi.</I> and not to france?
It's very important to toast france.
To france.
<I>Vive la france!</I>
vive la france!</I> miss Jackson,
I promise you, in paris, every night it will be the same thing.
I will unfreeze my money.
You will unfreeze me.
Don't stop me now.
I'm tickin'!
Yeah!
Yeah!
Bravo!
 For three nights straight 
 I've been forced to act sedate 
 And may I say
I didn't like the role? 
 Thanks to you 
 My friends 
 My pretense now ends 
 And you'll forgive me 
 If I kinda lose control 
 I don't care what I did last night 
 And the night before that 
 And the night before that, too 
 I'm gonna ring the bell tonight 
 I'm gonna ring the bell tonight 
 That's what
I'm gonna do 
 I'm aglow and I'm feelin' 
 So happy, new year's evey 
 Hang the captain and the crew 
 We're gonna pop the cork tonight 
 We're gonna pop the cork tonight 
 That's what we're gonna do 
 And when the band takes five minutes' intermission 
 You'll be wishin' 
 The intermission's through 
 Here's to you, here's to me 
 And here's to a life that's merry 
 I've just gotta whoop-dee-doo 
 We're gonna rock the boat tonight 
 We're gonna rock the boat tonight 
 That's what we're gonna do 
 When there's a fiddler fiddlin' fancy 
 It makes me feel so doggone dancey 
 But it could be the bubbly brew 
 What makes the saxophone so waily? 
 Just get yourself a ukulele 
 And you can wicky a-wacky a-whoo 
 Here's to you and to me 
 And here's to a life that's merry 
 If they wanna, they can sue 
 We're gonna rock the boat tonight 
 We're gonna rock the boat tonight 
 That's what we're gonna do 
 I'm gonna ring the bell 
 I'm gonna pop the cork 
 And if the boat sinks, it serves them right 
 'Cause I'm gonna, quote 
 Rock 
 rock 
 I'm gonna rock the boat tonight 
Hey!
Yay!
To ethiopia.
Ethiopia!
And afghanistan.
Afghanistan.
And if you can think of any more countries, you let me know.
Oh...
Uh-oh.
The ball is now over.
Cinderella goes back to the ash heap.
I shall go quietly.
Well, you heard me.
As if I didn't know what you and that brain trust have been planning-- send me home on the first plane and hope it runs out of gas.
Go on. Tell me
I'm a disgrace to my country.
Say something.
I've only got one thing to say to you.
What's that?
What a built.
Well, that doesn't sound like s. Winthrop Putnam.
Oh, call me sam.
Mr. Putnam, you mustn't blame miss Jackson.
The fault is mine.
I made her come here.
I made her have a little champagne.
I made her dance.
The medal will come later.
Shall we dance?
I think you better go to your room and have a poached egg.
Don't fight it.
I'm masterful tonight.
 I don't care what you did last night 
 And the night before that 
 And the night before that, too 
 We're gonna ring the bell tonight 
 We're gonna ring the bell tonight 
 That's what we're gonna do 
I didn't know they danced like that in the state department.
It depends on what kind of a state you're in.
You know something?
You turned out to be pretty human.
I'll show you exactly how human I've become.
 He's the king 
 He's so free 
 Voil! Now he's something different 
 We can do the same for you 
 We're gonna ring the bell tonight 
 They're gonna ring the bell tonight 
 That's what we're gonna 
Poof!
Mr. Putnam...
Mm-hmm?
You don't have to apologize for kissing me, even if you are engaged.
I understand.
You didn't mind?
Oh, no.
In that case, pardon me.
Night, sam.
Night.
Wrong cabin.
Me, too.
Pardon me.
Night, sam.
Night.
You know, it must be wonderful to go to vassar and have the state department for a father.
Not if you talk about it all the time.
My father was a janitor.
Equitable building.
48Th and 8th avenue.
I like janitors.
So do I...
My father anyway.
If we didn't have them, the pentagon would be knee-deep in memorandums.
Good night.
Good night.
He wasn't an ordinary janitor, you know.
They gave him a watch, gold-filled.
I'm sure it was.
Well... Good night, sam.
Good night.
Night.
Good night.
Are you going to marry her?
Her father's a very important man.
Are you going to marry him?
I'm not marrying either one if I can help it, but I don't know if I can help it.
Our engagement's been announced...
In the congressional record.</I> well...
Well...
Good night.
Good night.
You're in the wrong cabin again.
No. This one's mine.
Oh. I'm sorry.
Wait a minute.
This one's yours.
I have a larger hot water bottle.
Are you sure?
Listen...
There's a man aboard who can settle the whole thing.
Who?
The captain.
You mean because he marries people?
Then we can spend the night in your cabin...
Or my cabin...
Or both.
Oh, that sounds fair.
Let's do it.
Incidentally,
I love you very much...
Ethel.
Me, too, sam.
Uh-uh.
First, the captain.
Do you, mademoiselle, take this man for your lawful wedded husband?
I do.
And you, monsieur, do you take this woman for your lawful wedded wife?
I do.
Ha ha!
Not you.
You're the witness.
I do.
I now pronounce you man and wife by the authority vested in me as the captain of this ship.
Ah, congratulations!
Thank you very much.
Congratulations!
Thank you.
Congratulations!
Thank you very much.
Thank you--oh!
Well, I guess we better go now-- well, nothing else to do around here.
Good-bye, and thanks so much.
Good-bye.
Good-bye.
Where are you going?
I am the witness.
Not anymore you aren't.
Thanks for everything,
Philippe.
You better have some black coffee right now.
Yes. Thank you.
Ha ha ha!
Oh, uh, uh, thank you.
 I know 
 A place 
 A very special place 
 A place where we alone 
 Can go 
 No one sails 
 To its shore 
 There's no shore at all 
 No house, no door at all 
 Still, it's there 
 Bright and fair 
 The day you guess 
 The place and its address 
 That day our happiness will start 
 Is it far? 
 Is it near? 
 When we kiss 
 You'll see it clearly 
 It's the place 
 You hold in my heart 
Oh, mon capitaine,
I always thought you were a stiff-necked idiot, but tonight you've shown me that you're a romantic stiff-necked idiot.
I salute you.
Francois...
Of course!
Help me to open this up.
But what's a busboy doing in a captain's cabin?
Stealing his liquor, what else?
It doesn't make sense.
A ship this size with a combination captain and busboy?
Oh, sober up, Philippe.
I am not the captain.
Then why were you wearing his jacket?
Because when you and your friends knock on the door,
I have to improvise.
Stop all this talking.
They're running out of liquor in the kitchen.
Francois, you have married my american friends.
I am sorry.
Tomorrow
I will divorce them.
But we must stop them!
That's no way to repay them for the marshall plan.
I must tell them they weren't married-- that you were impersonating the captain.
This is a serious crime on the high seas.
I'll be put in irons.
You'll be sent back to america.
What can we do?
Keep them apart while on the ship.
Once they hit shore, you can tell them they're not married, because what happened here tonight the captain must never find out.
What must I never find out, gentlemen?
What are you doing here?
Just stealing your liquor, that's all.
I'm sick in bed a few days, and the whole ship goes crazy!
Dancing in the kitchen, stealing my champagne!
You realize you are both discharged?
Thank you very much and good night.
Where are you going?
To the kitchen.
Sit down, monsieur Fouquet.
You, too.
I wish to have a long talk with you.
Couldn't you boil it down for the reader's digest?</I> sure.
Monsieur Fouquet...
 dum dum da da dum dum 
 Da dum da da da 
 Dee dee dee dee dee dee 
 Da da da dum da-- 
Toothbrush.
I always read myself to sleep.
 Dee dee da da da dum 
 Do dum dum do-do dee dee dee 
You take care of one.
I'll handle the other.
I hate myself already.
 Do do-do do-do do do 
 Da da da dum 
 De-dum dum-dum 
 Da da da da de-dum dum-dum 
 Da da da dum 
 Da da da rum de-dum bum-bum 
 Da da da rum de-dum bum-bum 
 Da da mm-mmm mm-mmm 
Monsieur...
Compliments of the chef.
Your wedding breakfast.
Breakfast?
It's the middle of the night!
The night's even scarcely begun!
Good.
Philippe, you're drunk.
I could not do what I am about to do if I were sober.
Philippe!
I've heard of breakfast in bed, but this is ridiculous!
Forgive me.
I'll take this to be cleaned immediately.
No!
No.
Excuse me.
It may be some time before I get back.
Talk to each other, huh?
What about?
Listen, I--
I have taken care of that cabin also.
We're giving this boat a bad name.
You'll like my folks.
Will I?
Father is a professor...
At massachusetts institute of tech-- nology.
No wonder you're so smart.
Smart enough to marry you before you could back out.
You know, somehow I don't really feel married.
Neither do I.
I guess you don't feel like it till about the second year.
Oh-- sooner than that!
Mrs. S. Winthrop Putnam.
Mrs.<I> sam Putnam.
Excuse me, darling.
Toothbrush.
Ha ha ha ha!
Oh...
I'm so sleepy.
Sam, what happened?
Are you all right?
Now who's that?
Probably your drunken friend Philippe with another breakfast.
I'm sure he thinks this is amusing.
Go away!
Grab an anchor and jump overboard!
What was that, young man?
Just a minute.
It's secretary Sherman!
What do we do?
Tell him we're married.
We can maybe use his cabin.
Shh!
No. We can't do that.
Why not?
I'll have to break it to him gently.
After all, I'm going to marry his daughter.
Or am I?
You'd better go in there.
What a place to spend my honeymoon.
Well, young man,
I hope you're satisfied with what you've done tonight.
No. I can't say that I am.
That scene in the kitchen was carrying things a little too far.
Close that door.
I'll do my best.
Had a bad dream.
Really?
Indians.
You don't seem to understand the seriousness of this situation.
I've got something very important that I want to talk to you about.
Winthrop, you must realize that the american people-- expect their officials to be appointed from the people but not to act like the people.
And carousing with chorus girls in the kitchen is not the way to win friends and influence voters.
Any further gossip about you and miss Jackson, and I wouldn't blame my daughter if she postponed her marriage to you.
She'd have a point there.
And you'd be jeopardizing your career, too.
I wouldn't have any choice but to dismiss you.
Let me read you a few paragraphs from the state department's manual of conduct.
Oh. Booby-trapped.
I'm awfully sorry, sir!
Never mind being sorry!
Get me out of here!
This has been a nightmare from beginning to end.
I'm fed up with the whole thing!
Oh, no! This has been used before.
Never mind!
Never mind!
Just pay attention!
Section b, paragraph 32.
"All employees of this department
"must at all times maintain the dignity and decorum
"expected of employees of the department of state.
"It is reiterated
"that any breach of conduct
"will reflect unfavorably upon the government of the united states." hey... What?
Who turned on these sprinklers?
Sam!
Keep reading!
The evening's shot anyhow!
Ah-choo!
Ah-choo!
Ah-choo!
Ah-choo!
Ah-choo!
Hello, darling.
And don't say it's a small world.
Marcia!
Well, at least you remember my name.
Hello, father.
How did you get here?
My allowance piled up, so I took a plane.
I'm a big girl now.
Are we going to get going or stand here and play post office?
Oh. Is this our little chorus girl?
Not yours, darling.
Marcia,
I'd--i'd like you to meet mrs., Uh, uh, miss, uh...
Dynamite Jackson.
There they are.
I must tell miss Jackson that they are not married.
You're becoming a new england boiled frenchman.
Besides, they're getting in their car.
Don't they have to go through customs?
They have diplomatic immunity.
Yes, but not from everything.
<I>Les dlgus
des etats-unis.</I>
I'll tell her we're married right after the festival.
What'll I do in the meantime-- sleep in bathtubs?
This meeting's important to me.
I don't want to be dismissed until it's over.
If miss vassar of 1922 makes one more pass at you,
I may slug her.
Hello, sam.
<I>Cher ren!</I>
monsieur Putnam,
je suis enchant!</I> everybody gets to kiss you but your own wife.
After all, this is france.
Whose idea was it to bring that
Jackson girl?
We're sending her back soon.
Winthrop thought she should make an appearance at the first session as a democratic gesture.
His gestures get more democratic every day.
Temper, temper.
Have some respect for the thousands I spent to make you a lady.
Lady or no, if miss 10th avenue keeps whispering to him,
I may blow my cork.
It is my pleasure to present the assistant to the undersecretary of state of the united states of america.
Isn't this marvelous, darling?
Gentlemen, ladies, delegates to the international festival of the arts, it is indeed a privilege to address a gathering whose sole purpose is the promotion of peace, friendship, and harmony.
Winthrop, do you know why I followed you to france?
I think we should be married right away.
Mm-hmm.
It's going to be awful crowded in that bathtub...
Sam.
Put on the earphones.
You can hear much better.
"Sam"? Well...
That's all right, dear.
I'm broad-minded.
And in this case
I use the word advisedly.
That here we have complete unanimity of form.
That here there is nothing but harmony, friendship, and peace.
Before we go any further, mr. Putnam should tell you what happened on that boat.
You really should listen.
This will make history.
I can imagine.
They told me in new york you did a specialty.
I'm trying to be nice, darling, so stop needling me.
I'd hate doing something
I'd be ashamed of.
You mean in the daytime, of course.
Peace, friendship... and harmony.
Please!
Miss--miss Sherman-- no, don't do that, please.
Now listen, ladies...
Marcia!
Marcia, stop that now!
Miss Jackson, don't do that!
Winthrop! Winthrop!
Can't you stop this?
Mr. Wilson, do something!
Well, she started it!
Marcia, behave yourself!
Please, ladies!
You must realize that this is the united festival!
I trust this exhibition has proven the necessity for returning miss Jackson to the united states!
The sooner, the better, darling!
Darling has something to tell you, haven't you, darling?
Oh, ethel-- i mean miss Jackson, it'll take weeks of hard work to bring harmony to this meeting again.
I wouldn't want to do anything to disturb it any further-- not right now.
You must realize how important this is to me.
Yes,
I'm beginning to.
Give me a little time, and we can straighten out-- ethel, wait!
Let her go!
Uh...
Miss Jackson.
Welcome to gay paree.
So I'm not even married to that lug.
I would have told you sooner, but I didn't dare until we were off the boat.
Does sam know?
I left a message at the hotel.
Married by a busboy and divorced by a waiter.
There's a career for you.
Ho ho ho!
My little camille, don't be so tragic.
Tragic?
Me?
Why, I'm bubbling all over.
I'm so happy to get rid of that stuffed shirt.
In fact, I'm celebrating.
Waiter!
Hit me again.
Thanks.
Why don't we all go inside?
Because it's april in paris.
When it's april in paris, everybody sits outside.
Does monsieur mind if I leave the bottle?
You'll be back?
In july.
I'll tell you this much, sam Putnam means nothing to me.
I came to paris to have a good time, and, brother,
I'm going to have it.
Ah-choo!
Gesundheit.
Don't be sarcastic.
Philippe, sing something.
Sing?
I don't feel like singing.
But in paris everybody feels like singing...
All the time.
What a horrible idea.
Oh, come on, Philippe.
Be gay and carefree...
And champs elysees.</I> all right.
I will try.
 April in paris 
 Chestnuts in blossom 
 Holiday tables under a tree 
 April in paris 
 This is a feeling 
 No one can ever 
 Reprise 
 I never knew the charm of spring 
 Never met it face to face 
 I never knew my heart could sing 
 Never missed a warm embrace 
 Till 
 April in paris 
 Whom can I run to? 
 What have you done to 
Ah-choo!
 My heart? 
It's no use, Philippe.
I'm in love with the man I married, and he's not even my husband.
Even in paris, that's an unusual situation.
But what am I going to do?
I just can't crawl back to him.
It's a cinch he's not going to come crawling to me.
Look, you will not leave paris without him.
This I promise you.
With what I have here...
And what you have...
There...
We'll find a way.
Hello, darling.
Aren't you ready yet?
I think you'd better go to that nightclub without me.
I've got a headache.
Our three wise men say it's the best show in paris.
They've reserved a ringside table.
There's a new american performer they say is wonderful.
What's the matter?
Oh, I don't want you to catch my headache.
I wouldn't go if you feel like this.
You lie down, and I'll massage your temples.
I could stand up and take an aspirin.
But that wouldn't be the same thing.
Uh, let's go out.
I think
I feel better.
Then there's no reason to go out.
I'll be dressed before you know it.
Giselle!
Janine!
Oh, charlotte!
Giselle.
<I>Bonjour, ma petite.</I>
bonjour, ma grande.</I> ethel!
I thought she went back to new york.
They must have refused her.
 You can keep the empire state 
 It's very tall 
 But that is all 
 You can have your old new york 
 It's not for me 
 Give me paree 
 My new york may have its faults 
 Just as you say 
 But your paris has some, too 
 Please step this way 
 From your hotel 
 The view is swell 
 But here's the rub 
 There is no tub 
 The plumbing's 1883 
 I know 
 But that's what makes paris paree 
 The clothes are chic 
 The hats unique 
 It's such a thrill 
 Then comes the bill 
 And you're undressed financially 
 That's what makes paris paree 
 The peddler's cart 
 The eiffel tower 
 The flowers mart 
 The eiffel tower 
 Priceless art 
 The eiffel tower 
 The eiffel, eiffel... 
 Awful, awful eiffel tower 
 You can't endure 
 Without I'amour 
 I like I'amour 
 but not toujours 
 I guess it's just heredity 
 It's what we call
c'est la vie 
Well!
 That's what makes paris paree 
 Yes, but new york is home to me 
 Garon regrets 
 No crepe suzettes? 
 The lady pales 
 He's serving snails! 
 We'll both get heartburn, wait and see 
 That's what makes paris paree 
 You try to grab 
 A taxicab 
 The light is red 
 He goes ahead 
 And knocks you down quite cheerfully 
 That's what makes paris paree 
 The gay cafes 
 The eiffel tower 
 The mayonnaise 
 The eiffel tower 
 Ia marseillaise 
 the eiffel tower 
 The oh-so-tiring 
 But inspiring eiffel tower 
 I've seen it all 
 The beaux arts ball? 
 The rue de la paix? 
 Well, it's ok 
 Just twist my arm, and I'll agree 
 Paris is getting to me 
 The priceless art 
 The peddler's cart 
 The clothes so chic 
 The pipes that leak 
 That's what makes paris 
 That's what makes paris 
 That's what makes paris 
 Paree 
Well, that was quite a show for one person's benefit.
I wonder what's going on between her and that frenchman.
I've got to go back and find out.
Oh, no. Come back to the hotel and forget all about her.
I can't forget all about her.
Every time I try,
I remember all about her.
Maybe it would be easier to forget all about you.
Winthrop, just remember, if you leave me, your career's over.
We'll see to it that you're not even elected dogcatcher.
That suits me fine.
I've caught one too many already.
You never loved me.
You only wanted to marry me to get to the white house to remodel that, too.
I'm going to tell ethel
I love her.
Father, why didn't you say something?
I thought he covered the subject pretty thoroughly.
Oh!
But he's all yours.
I could hear him panting from the stage.
Do you think he'll come back here?
On all fours, like a french poodle.
He's scratching at the door.
I don't want to see him.
But he's come back.
Look, you love him, he loves you.
What else is left?
But he hasn't suffered enough yet.
Come in.
Ethel...
I love you.
You see?
He loves you.
Shut up, you wall-eyed wife stealer!
Bravo!
He's jealous, too!
Would you care to strike me?
I'm a cad.
I'll get to you later.
I know you're not really my wife, but I'd like you to be.
I wouldn't dream of holding you to any rash promises.
It might hurt your broken-down career.
I don't want my broken-down career.
Shall we go?
Where are we going?
Where we go every night.
He's always so embarrassed in front of men whose intentions are honorable.
We'll paint the town rouge.</I> we'll dance until dawn, laughing and singing and drinking champagne by the kilometer.
Oh, mr. Putnam.
Inform the state department
I'm getting my 200 bucks' worth tonight.
What do you want with me?
Sam's come back to you.
Reach up and pluck him like a ripe peach.
He's not ripe enough.
I want him to suffer.
Ethel! Ethel!
Suffer.
Don't lose sight of that cab.
The girl I married is in there.
Fouquet has done it again.
Good night, cherie.</I> good night,
Philippe.
Take the young lady to her hotel.
It's 94 rue fauberge.
<I>Oui, monsieur Fouquet.</I> thank you.
Guess who.
Oh, no!
Oh, yes.
Please go home.
The game is over.
Last half of the ninth.
Philippe, he followed us.
He saw you coming in?
That's what I wanted.
Has there been any insanity in your family?
No.
There is now.
They will never believe this.
Me, Philippe Fouquet, fighting for my honor.
You home wrecker, you!
In america, we'd hang you.
Whatever I did
I did in self-defense.
You... Gigolo!
Sam!
You really care.
We're going back to the hotel.
Stand up so I can knock you down again.
Explain to him--
I'll lie down here while she's explaining.
Philippe?
Philippe, what's happened?
What is it?
What have they done to you?
Who are you?
Oh, miss Jackson, my wife mrs. Fouquet.
Oh, married, too.
In america, we'd string you up after we'd hung you for the other thing.
For what? For trying to make a foolish girl go back to her man?
For trying to throw her out of my apartment?
Almost every night another silly woman follows him home.
It's becoming monotonous.
Nobody told me that he had a wife.
To everyone,
I am his housekeeper.
It must not be known all over france that Philippe Fouquet is an old married man with five children.
Huh! Five children.
Oh, I am a very good housekeeper.
If it were known, it'd be bad for my business.
How could he support his family?
That's what
I want to know.
Philippe Fouquet must play the gay dog, singing, dancing, a different woman every night.
And then I always come home to my wife.
Tired, but he comes home.
Gay paree.
I'll never believe another story about paris.
And I don't believe this.
You can fool s. Winthrop Putnam with that act, but not sam.
I'm a new kind of boy!
Shh. You'll wake the children.
If he has children,
I'll eat 'em all...
On toast.
White or whole wheat?
<I>Silence! Silence.</I>
les enfants, these are my good american friends-- mademoiselle Jackson and mr. Putnam, who don't believe that you exist, by the way.
Hello. Hello.
That is enough.
Let's go to bed.
Charles. Yvonne.
She's right.
I'll take you upstairs.
<I>Oui, papa.</I> you see?
This is my career.
Good night.
Good night.
Well?
Well, all this proves is you're running around with a married man.
It proves nothing of the sort!
How did I know he was married?
It's a state secret.
Then you were seeing a man who wasn't married.
Well, I didn't know he had five children.
You probably wouldn't care if he had five wives.
Please, please, please!
Go home. Kiss each other.
Get married.
Do something...
So we can all go to bed.
I married her once.
That's enough.
How do I convince this poached egg that I love him?
Love is for peasants.
All right, so I'm a peasant.
Philippe, isn't love wonderful?
I ask you.
Love? It is marvelous.
I tell you.
 Ask anybody in paris 
 He'll agree 
 Well, it's not for me 
 But it's so enjoyable 
 I hate it 
 So girl and boy-able 
 Huh! Overrated 
 Love is a happy thing 
 Sheer stupidity 
 You're stupid 
 Stop being a fool 
 And give me a kiss 
 She's right, you're a mule 
 You keep out of this 
 The fault is not hers, it's mine 
 That's fine, now can I go? 
 If I can follow 
 It's so deplorable, it's frightful 
 She's so adorable, he's spiteful 
 I only hope they can work it out alone 
Philippe! Philippe!
 Au revoir, my friends 
 I've got problems of my own 
 You're following me 
 Well, that isn't true 
 You're following me 
 Who's following who? 
 Let's call it a day 
 O.K., Let's kiss and say good-bye 
 Good-bye forever 
 Please 
 Isn't love wonderful? 
 I ask you 
 Isn't love marvelous? 
 I ask you 
 I never knew my heart could sing 
 Never missed a warm embrace 
 April in paris 
Isn't it beautiful?
What a built.
 What have you done to 
 My heart? 
Poof!
Singin' in the rain
Just singin' in the rain
What a glorious feelin'
We're happy again
We'll walk down the lane
With a happy refrain
And singin'
Just singin' in the rain
This is Dora Bailey, ladies and gentlemen...
talking to you from the front of the Chinese Theater in Hollywood.
What a night, ladies and gentlemen. What a night!
Every star in Hollywood is here to make Monumental Pictures' premiere... of The Royal Rascal, the outstanding event of 1927.
Everyone is breathlessly awaiting... the arrival of Lina Lamont and Don Lockwood.
Look who's arriving now.
It's that famous "zip" girl of the screen... the darling of the flapper set...
Zelda Zanders!
Zelda! Zelda!
Her new red-hot pash,
J. Cumberland Spendrill III... that well-known eligible bachelor.
Zelda's had so much unhappiness,
I hope this time it's really love.
And here comes that exotic star, Olga Mara!
Ooh.
And her new husband, the Baron de la Bonnet de la Toulon.
They've been married two months already, but still as happy as newlyweds.
Well, well, well. It's Cosmo Brown!
Cosmo is Don's best friend.
He plays the piano on the set for Don and Lina... to get them into those romantic moods!
Oh, folks, this is it. This is it!
The stars of tonight's picture, those romantic lovers of the screen...
Don Lockwood and Lina Lamont!
Ladies and gentlemen, when you look at this gorgeous couple... it's no wonder they're a household name all over the world.
Like "bacon and eggs."
"Lockwood and Lamont."
Don, tell me confidentially, are these rumors true... that wedding bells are soon to ring for you and Lina?
Lina and I have no statement to make at the present time.
We're just good friends.
You've come a long way together.
Won't you tell us how it happened?
Lina and I have made a number of pictures together...
Oh, no, no, Don. I want your story from the beginning.
Dora, not in front of all these people!
The story of your success is an inspiration... to young people all over the world.
Please!
Well, to begin with, any story of my career... would have to include my lifelong friend, Cosmo Brown.
We were kids together, grew up together, worked together.
Yes?
Well, Dora, I've had one motto which I've always lived by:
"Dignity. Always dignity."
This was instilled in me by Mum and Dad from the very beginning.
They sent me to the finest schools, including dancing school.
That's where I first met Cosmo.
And with him, I used to perform for
Mum and Dad's society friends.
They used to make such a fuss over me.
If I was very good, I was allowed to accompany Mum and Dad to the theater.
They brought me up on Shaw...
Molire, the finest of the classics.
To this was added rigorous musical training... at the Conservatory of Fine Arts.
We rounded out our apprenticeship at an exclusive dramatics academy.
And at all times...
the motto remained...
"...Dignity."
"Always dignity."
In a few years, we were ready to embark on a dance concert tour.
We played the finest symphonic halls in the country.
Fit as a fiddle
And ready for love
I can jump over
The moon up above
Fit as a fiddle
And ready for love
Haven't a worry
Haven't a care
Feelin' like a feather
That's floatin' on air
Fit as a fiddle
And ready for love
Soon the church bells will be ringin'
And a march with Ma and Pa
How the church bells will be ringin'
With a hey-nonny-nonny
And a hot-cha-cha
Hi diddle diddle
My baby's okay
Ask me a riddle
I'm happy to say
Fit as a fiddle
And ready for love
Audiences everywhere adored us.
Get out of here!
Finally we decided to come to sunny California.
We were stranded... We were staying here, resting up...
when offers from the movie studios started pouring in.
We sorted them out and decided to favor Monumental Pictures.
Lina, you hate him. Resist him.
Keep that mood music going.
Now, Phil, you come in.
Keep on grinding.
Now you see her. Now here's the bit,
Bert, where you get it on the jaw.
Cut!
No, no! That wasn't right!
You were supposed to go over the bar and crash into the glasses! Try it again!
Okay, Bert? Bert!
Oh, that's swell, just swell.
Take him away, fellas!
You'll be all right. We've lost more stuntmen on these pictures...
It'll take hours to get a new one from Central Casting.
Mr. Dexter, I can do that.
- You? You're a musician.
- That's a moot point.
No kidding! What's your name?
Don Lockwood, but the fellas call me "Donald."
Wise guy, huh? Okay. I'll try you.
Get this guy into Bert's suit!
And remember, Lockwood, you might be trading that fiddle in for a harp.
Camera!
Phil, come in. Now you see him. That's it.
Now, here's where you get it right on the jaw.
Cut!
That was wonderful!
Got any more little chores you want done?
Plenty!
Okay.
My roles in these films were urbane...
sophisticated...
suave.
And of course, all through those pictures...
Lina was, as always, an inspiration to me.
Warm and helpful.
A real lady.
Hello, Miss Lamont. I'm Don
Lockwood, the stuntman.
It was a thrill working with you, Miss Lamont.
Hey, Don.
Meet the producer of the picture, R.F. Simpson.
I just saw some rushes and asked
Dexter who the stuntmen were.
He said they were all you. I'm putting you and Lina together in a picture.
Come to my office.
We'll discuss a contract.
Thanks, Mr. Simpson!
Are you doing anything tonight, Miss Lamont?
That's funny.
I'm busy.
Lina and I have had the same wonderful relationship ever since.
But most important of all,
I continue living up to my motto:
"Dignity.
Always dignity."
Thank you, Don.
And I'm sure you and Lina will continue making movie history tonight... in your greatest picture,
The Royal Rascal.
Get enough, boys?
She's so refined...
I think I'll kill myself.
Thank you, ladies and gentlemen.
Thank you, thank you, thank you.
We're thrilled at your response to The Royal Rascal.
We had fun making it, and we hope you had fun seeing it tonight.
We screen actors aren't much good at speaking in public.
So we'll just act out our thanks.
- Hot diggity! It's a smash!
- Don, Lina, you were gorgeous!
Lina, you looked pretty good for a girl.
For heaven's sake!
What's the big idea?
Can't a girl get a word in edgewise?
They're my public too!
The publicity department... thought it'd be better if Don made all the speeches for the team.
Why?
You're beautiful. Audiences think you got a voice to match.
We gotta keep our stars from looking ridiculous at any cost.
- No one's got that much money.
- What's wrong with the way I talk?
What's the big idea?
Am I dumb or something?
No, it's just that Don's had so much more experience...
Next time, write me out a speech. I could memorize it.
Sure. Why don't you recite the Gettysburg Address?
What do you know about it, you piano player? Are you anybody?
Donnie, how can you let him talk to me like that, your fiance?
My fia...
Lina, you've been reading those fan magazines again.
Look, you shouldn't believe all that banana oil... that Dora Bailey dishes out.
Now, try to get this straight:
There is nothing between us.
There has never been anything between us.
- Just air.
- Oh, Donnie, you don't mean that.
We'll be late for R.F.'s party.
Better go in separate cars to break up the mobs. Come on, honey.
Ta-ta, Donnie! See you there!
"Donnie."
Can't that girl take a gentle hint?
Haven't you heard? She's irresistible. She told me so.
I can't get her out of my hair.
This romance for publicity...
The price of fame.
You've got the glory.
The little heartaches go with it.
Look at me. I got no glory.
I got no fame. I got no mansions.
I got no money. But I've got...
- What have I got?
- I don't know.
I gotta get out of here.
Don't tell me. It's a flat tire.
This car hasn't given me trouble in nearly six hours.
Hey, there's Don Lockwood!
Hey, give me an autograph!
- Give me your autograph!
- I want a souvenir!
I want a souvenir too!
Hey! You're playing rough here!
You're tearing my...!
Hey, Cos, do something!
Call me a cab!
You're a cab.
Thanks a lot!
- Lady, keep driving.
- Get out!
- Everything's all right!
- I'll call a policeman!
- Just a few blocks.
- Don't hurt me!
- I'm not a criminal.
- I don't care...
You are a criminal! I've seen that face. You're a gangster!
I've seen your picture in the paper or in the post office.
Officer!
- This man jumped in my car and...
- Why, it's Don Lockwood!
- Don Lockwood?
- How are you? Out for a joy ride?
Just a lift. My car broke down.
I got surrounded by...
- You're a lucky lady. Anything wrong?
- Why, no.
No, I should think not. Good night.
Good night, officer.
Well, thanks for saving my life. I'll get out now.
I'm driving to Beverly Hills.
Can I drop you someplace?
I'd like to get out of this suit if you're going by Camden and Sunset.
Yes, I am.
I'd like to know whose hospitality I'm enjoying.
Selden. Kathy Selden.
Enchanted, Miss Selden.
I'm sorry I frightened you.
I was getting a little too much love from my fans.
Oh, that's what you were running away from.
They did that to you?
That's terrible!
Yes. Yes, it is, isn't it?
It is terrible.
Well, we movie stars get the glory...
I guess we have to take the little heartaches that go with it.
People think we lead lives of glamour and romance... but we're really lonely.
Terribly lonely.
I really can't tell you how sorry
I am about taking you for a criminal.
But it was understandable, under the circumstances. I knew I'd seen you.
Which of my pictures have you seen?
I don't remember.
I saw one once.
- You saw one once?
- I think you were dueling.
And there was a girl. Lina Lamont.
I don't go to the movies much.
If you've seen one, you've seen them all.
Thank you.
No offense.
Movies are entertaining for the masses... but the personalities on the screen don't impress me.
They don't talk or act.
They just make a lot of dumb show.
Well, you know.
Like that.
You mean, like what I do.
Well, yes.
Here we are, Sunset and Camden.
Wait, you mean I'm not an actor?
- Pantomime isn't acting?
- Of course not.
Acting means great parts, wonderful lines, glorious words.
Shakespeare. Ibsen.
What's your lofty mission in life... that lets you sneer at my humble profession?
I'm an actress. On the stage.
Oh, on the stage.
I'd like to see you.
What're you in now?
I could brush up on my English or bring an interpreter.
That's if they'd let in a movie actor.
I'm not in a play now.
But I'm going to New York...
You're going to New York, and someday we'll all hear of you, won't we?
Kathy Selden as Juliet, as Lady Macbeth, as King Lear!
You'll have to wear a beard!
Laugh if you want, but the stage is a dignified profession.
Why are you so conceited?
You're nothing but a shadow on film.
You're not flesh and blood.
- Stop!
- What can I do? I'm only a shadow.
Keep away from me! Just because you're a big movie star... you expect every girl to faint at your feet. Don't touch me!
Fear not, sweet lady.
I will not molest you.
I am but a humble jester. And you?
You are too far above me.
Farewell, Ethel Barrymore.
I must tear myself from your side.
Is this R.F. Simpson's house?
I'm one of the Coconut Grove girls.
- Yes, the floor show. Around the back.
- Oh, I see. Thank you.
- Nice little party, R.F.
- Thanks, Roscoe.
Do you really think you can get me in the movies?
- I should think so.
- Really?
- The picture's great.
- There's Don. I loved the picture.
- Did you come by way of Australia?
- Hello, Cos. Excuse me.
Cos, tell me the truth.
Am I a good actor?
As long as I work for Monumental, you're the greatest.
No kidding. You're my pal.
You can tell me.
What's the matter?
Of course, you're good.
Keep telling me from time to time. I feel a little shaken.
- The new Don Lockwood.
- Don!
- Hi, R.F.
- It's colossal. Where have you been?
There you are. Where were you?
I was lonely.
Hello, Lina.
Okay, fellas. Hold it.
Together again, my two little stars, Don and Lina.
No kidding, folks, aren't they great?
All right, open that screen.
- A movie? We just saw one.
- Gotta show one at a party. It's a law.
Everybody, I've got a few surprises for you.
All right, sit down, sit down.
This'll make you laugh.
There's a madman coming into my office for months, and...
- You got that gadget working?
- All set.
Okay, let her go.
Hello.
This is a demonstration of a talking picture.
Notice, it is a picture of me and I am talking.
Note how my lips and the sound issuing from them...
are synchronized together...
in perfect unison.
- Who's that?
- Somebody's talking behind that screen.
Come out from behind that screen, Mr. Simpson.
Oh, no. I'm right here.
My voice has been recorded on a record.
A talking picture.
Thank you.
Goodbye.
Well?
- It's just a toy.
- It's a scream!
- It's vulgar.
- You think they'll ever use it?
I doubt it. Warners is making a picture with it, The Jazz Singer.
- They'll lose their shirts.
- It'll never amount to a thing.
They said that about the horseless carriage.
Let's get on with the show.
Okay, boys.
Come on, my little starlets.
I have a surprise.
A very special cake.
I want you kiddies to have the first piece.
Well! If it isn't Ethel Barrymore!
I do hope you'll favor us with something special. Say, Hamlet's soliloquy... or a scene from Romeo and Juliet? Don't be shy.
You make about the prettiest
Juliet I've ever seen. Really.
All I do is dream of you
The whole night through
With the dawn I still go on
Dreaming of you
You're every thought
You're everything
You're every song I ever sing
Summer, winter, autumn and spring
And were there more than
Twenty-four hours a day
They'd be spent in sweet content
Dreaming away
When skies are gray
When skies are blue
Morning, noon and nighttime too
All I do the whole day through
Is dream of you
It's the cat's meow!
All I do the whole day through
Is dream of you
- I had to tell you how good you were.
- Excuse me.
Now that I know where you live,
I'd like to see you home.
- Listen, Mr. Lockwood...
- Say, who is this dame anyway?
Someone lofty and far above us all.
She couldn't learn anything from the movies. She's a stage actress.
Here's one thing I've learned from the movies!
- I'll kill her!
- Lina, she was aiming at me!
- You never looked lovelier.
- It was an accident.
It happens to me five or six times a day.
Where is she?
Donnie?
Excuse me. Where'd Miss Selden go?
She grabbed her things and bolted. Anything I can do?
Sorry. I don't have time to find out.
Kathy!
Hey, Kathy!
Hey!
Keep that action going.
More steam in the kettle!
More action, boys.
A little more rhythm.
More steam and more water.
- Hi, Maxie.
- Hi, Don.
- Good morning, fellas.
- Hiya, Don.
Did you read Variety today?
"First talking picture, The Jazz Singer.
All-time smash end of first week."
- All-time flop end of the second.
- We start today.
- Good luck.
- Thanks.
I'm now Count Pierre de Bataille, known as the Duelling Cavalier.
- What's it about?
- It's a French Revolution story.
You're a French aristocrat.
She's a simple girl of the people and won't even give you a tumble.
Well, it's a living.
Good morning.
Keep the background moving.
Hit him.
Come on. Knock him down!
Get up there and hit him again. Hurry up!
Why bother to shoot this? Release the old one under a new title.
You've seen one, you've seen them all.
- Why'd you say that?
- What's the matter?
That's what that Kathy Selden said to me that night.
That's three weeks ago.
You still thinking about that?
- I can't get her out of my mind.
- How could you?
She's the first dame who hasn't fallen for you since you were 4.
She's on my conscience.
It's not your fault she lost her job.
- I've got to find her.
- You've been trying to.
Short of sending out bloodhounds and a posse.
Come on, now. Snap out of it.
You can't let this get you down.
You're Donald Lockwood. Donald
Lockwood's an actor, isn't he?
What's the first thing an actor learns?
"The show must go on, come rain, come shine, come snow, come sleet!"
Yeah.
The world's so full
Of a number of things
I'm sure we should all
Be as happy as...
But are we? No
Definitely, no
Positively, no
Decidedly, no
Short people have long faces
Long people have short faces
Big people have little humor
Little people have no humor at all
In the words of that immortal bard
Samuel J. Snodgrass
As he was being led
To the guillotine
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Don't you know everyone wants to laugh, ha, ha
My dad said, "Be an actor, my son".
"But be a comical one"
They'll be standin' in lines
For those old honky-tonk monkeyshines
Now you could study Shakespeare
And be quite elite
And you could charm the critics
And have nothing to eat
Just slip on a banana peel
The world's at your feet
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Make...?
Make 'em laugh
Don't you know everyone wants to laugh?
My Grandpa said,
"Go out and tell 'em a joke"
"but give it plenty of hoke"
Make 'em roar
Make 'em scream
Take a fall, butt a wall
Split a seam
You start off by pretending
You're a dancer with grace
You wiggle till they're giggling
All over the place
And then you get
A great big custard pie in the face
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Don't ya...
All the...
What...?
My Dad...
They'll be standing in lines
For those old honky-tonk monkeyshines
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Don't you know everyone...
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Make 'em laugh
Ready, Don?
- All set.
- Here we go again.
- We have another smash on our hands.
- I hope so.
You're darn tooting we have.
- Where's Lina?
- Here she is, Mr. Dexter.
Well! Here comes our lovely leading lady now.
This wig weighs a ton. What dope'd wear a thing like this?
Everybody wore them.
Then everybody was a dope.
- You look beautiful.
- You look great.
Let's get into the set.
Thanks, Joe.
I looked for you at Wally Ray's party. Where were you?
I've been busy.
And I know what you've been busy at. Looking for that girl.
- As a matter of fact, yes.
- Why?
I've been worried about her.
You should've been worried about me.
I'm the one who got the whipped cream in the kisser.
Yes, but you didn't lose your job, and she did.
Darn tooting she did.
I arranged it.
What?
They weren't gonna fire her, so I told them they better.
- Why...
- Don, now remember.
You're madly in love with her and you have to overcome her shyness.
Cosmo, mood music.
Roll 'em!
Okay, Don.
Now enter.
You see her.
Run to her!
Why, you rattlesnake, you.
You got that poor kid fired.
That's not all I'm gonna do if
I ever get my hands on her.
I never heard of anything so low.
Fine. Fine. Looks great.
What did you do it for?
Because you liked her.
I could tell.
So that's it.
Believe me, I don't like her half as much as I hate you.
You reptile.
Sticks and stones may break my bones.
I'd like to break every bone in your body.
You and who else, you big lummox?
Now kiss her, Don.
That's it. More.
Great! Cut!
You couldn't kiss me like that and not mean it just a teensy-weensy bit.
Meet the world's greatest actor.
I'd rather kiss a tarantula!
- You don't mean that!
- I don't...?
Joe, bring me a tarantula.
Now listen...
Stop that chitchat, you lovebirds.
Let's get another take.
Hold it.
- Hold it, Dexter!
- Hello, Mr. Simpson.
We're really rolling.
Well, you can stop rolling at once.
All right, everybody! Save it!
Save it? Tell them to go home.
We're shutting down.
Don't stand there. Tell them!
Go home until further notice!
What is this?
What's the matter?
The Jazz Singer, that's what's the matter.
Oh, my darling little mammy
Down in Alabamy
This is no joke. It's a sensation.
The public's screaming for more.
- More what?
- Talking pictures.
- It's just a freak.
- We should have such a freak.
I said talking pictures were a menace, but no one would listen.
We're going to make The Duelling
Cavalier into a talking picture.
That means I'm out of a job.
I can start suffering and write that symphony.
We'll put you in as head of the music department.
Thanks. I can stop suffering and write that symphony.
Wait a second. Talking pictures!
You should wait...
Every studio's jumping on the bandwagon.
All the theaters are putting in sound equipment.
We know nothing about it.
What do you have to know?
You do what you always did.
You just add talking to it.
Believe me, it'll be a sensation.
"Lamont and Lockwood. They talk!"
Well, of course we talk.
Don't everybody?
I got a feeling
You're fooling
I got a feeling
You're havin' fun
I get the go-by
When you are done foolin' with me
It's a holiday
Today's The Wedding of the Painted Doll
It's a jolly day
The news is spreading
Should I reveal exactly how I feel
Should I confess
I got a feeling you're fooling
I got a feeling you're
It's a holiday
Today's The Wedding
Should I reveal
Exactly how I feel
Should I reveal
Beautiful girl
You're a lovely picture
Beautiful girl
You're a gorgeous mixture
Of all that lies
Under the big blue sky
My heart cries
Who's that? She looks familiar.
You're a dazzling eyeful
I featured her before, in lots of nightclub shows.
I've seen her there.
She'd be good as Zelda's sister.
- That's a good idea.
- Excuse me.
There may be blondes and brunettes
That are hard to resist
You surpass them like a queen
You've got those lips
That were meant to be kissed
And you're over sweet 16
Beautiful girl
What a gorgeous creature
Beautiful girl
Let me call a preacher
What can I do
But give my heart to you?
A beautiful girl
Is like a great work of art
She's stylish
She's chic
And she also is smart
For lounging in her boudoir
This simple plain pajama
Her cloak is trimmed with monkey fur
To lend a dash of drama
Anyone for tennis?
Well, this will make them cringe
And you'll knock 'em dead at dinner
If your gown just drips with fringe
You simply can't be too modest
At the beach or by the pool
And in summertime, it's organdy
That'll keep you fresh and cool
You'd never guess what loud applause
This cunning hat receives
And you'd never dream the things
That you could hide
Within these sleeves
A string of pearls with a suit of tweed
It's started quite a riot
And if you must wear fox to the opera
Dame Fashion says, "Dye it"
Black is best when you're in court
The judge will be impressed
But white is right when you're a bride
And you want to be well-dressed
Beautiful girl
For you I've got a passion
Beautiful girl
You're my queen of fashion
I'm in a whirl
Over
My beautiful girl
- That's stupendous!
- Thanks.
Kathy, come here.
This will start a trend in musical pictures.
Mr. Simpson's thinking about casting you as Zelda's sister.
That's wonderful!
Hey, Kathy!
That's Kathy Selden.
Thanks anyway. It was nice of you.
- Wait a minute.
- That's all right.
Before Mr. Lockwood refreshes your memory, you may as well know...
I'm the girl who hit Miss Lamont with a cake. it was meant for Mr. Lockwood.
Goodbye. I'm sorry.
I should've told you.
Wait a minute.
What's this all about?
We were gonna use her, but if it'd make you and Lina unhappy...
Unhappy? It's wonderful.
He's been looking for her!
Are you speaking for Lina also?
The owner of the Coconut Grove may do what Lina tells him...
- ...but you're the head of this studio.
- Yes, I am.
She's hired. Don't let Lina know she's on the lot.
Take care of that.
Thank you, Mr. Simpson!
I'm glad you turned up. We've been looking inside every cake in town.
Is it all right for you to be seen with me?
You mean, lofty star with humble player?
Not exactly. But for lunch, don't you tear a pheasant with Miss Lamont?
Look, Kathy. All that stuff about
Lina and me is sheer publicity.
Oh? Certainly seems more than that... from what I've read in all those articles in the fan magazines.
Ohh, you read the fan magazines?
I pick them up in the beauty parlor or the dentist's office... just like anybody.
Honest?
I buy four or five a month.
You buy four or five...?
To get back to the main point... you achieve a kind of intimacy in all your pictures...
Did you say all my pictures?
Now that I think of it,
I've seen eight or nine of them.
Eight or nine.
It seems to me
I remember someone saying:
"If you've seen one, you've seen them all."
I did say some awful things that night, didn't I?
No, I deserved them.
Of course, I must admit I was pretty much upset by them.
So upset that I haven't been able to think of anything but you ever since.
Honest?
Honest.
Well, I've been pretty upset too.
Kathy...
Kathy, look, I...
Kathy, seeing you again now that I...
I'm trying to say something to you, but I...
I'm such a ham.
I guess I'm not able to without the proper setting.
What do you mean?
Well...
Come here.
This is the proper setting.
Why, it's just an empty stage.
At first glance, yes.
But wait a second.
A beautiful sunset.
Mist from the distant mountains.
Colored lights in a garden.
Milady is standing on her balcony, in a rose-trellised bower... flooded with moonlight.
We add 500,000 kilowatts of stardust.
A soft summer breeze.
And...
You sure look lovely in the moonlight.
Now that you have the proper setting, can you say it?
I'll try.
Life was a song
You came along
I've laid awake the whole night through
If I but dared
To think you cared
This is what
I'd say to you
You were meant for me
And I was meant for you
Nature patterned you
And when she was done
You were all the sweet things
Rolled up in one
You're like
A plaintive melody
That never lets me free
But I'm content
The angels must have sent you
And they meant you
Just for me
But I'm content
The angels must have sent you
And they meant you
Just for me
Now...
Ta, te, ti, toe, too.
Ta, te, ti, toe, too.
No, no, Miss Lamont... round tones, round tones.
Now let me hear you read your line.
"And I can't stan' 'im."
And I can't stand him.
"And I can't stan' 'im."
"Can't."
Can't.
"Can't."
Can't!
Can't. Can't.
Very good.
"Around the rocks the rugged rascal ran."
"Around the rocks the rugged..."
No, no. "Rocks." "Rocks."
"Around the rocks the rugged rascal ran."
Very good.
Hi, Don.
- Shall I continue?
- Don't mind me.
Now. "Sinful Caesar sipped his snifter..."
"seized his knees and sneezed."
"Sinful Caesar snipped his sifter..."
Sipped his snifter.
"Sipped his snifter."
Oh, thank you.
"Sinful Caesar sipped his snifter, seized his knees and sneezed."
- Marvelous.
- Wonderful.
Here is a good one.
"Chester chooses chestnuts, cheddar cheese with chewy chives."
"He chews them and he chooses them."
"He chooses them and he chews them..."
"those chestnuts, cheddar cheese and chives..."
"...in cheery, charming chunks."
- Wonderful! Do another one.
- Thank you.
"Moses supposes his toeses are roses..."
"but Moses supposes erroneously."
"Moses, he knowses his toeses aren't roses..."
"...as Moses supposes his toeses to be."
"Moses supposes his toeses are roses..."
"but Moses supposes erroneously."
"But Moses, he knowses his toes aren't roses..."
"as Moses supposes his toeses to be."
Moses supposes his toeses are roses... but Moses supposes erroneously.
A mose is a mose.
A rose is a rose.
A toes is a toes.
Moses supposes his toeses are roses
But Moses supposes erroneously
Moses, he knowses
His toeses aren't roses
As Moses supposes his toeses to be
Moses supposes his toeses are roses
But Moses supposes erroneously
For Moses knowses
His toeses aren't roses
As Moses supposes his toeses to be
A rose is a rose
Is a rose is a rose is
A rose is what Moses
Supposes his toes is
Couldn't be a lily
Or a taffy daffy dilly
It's gotta be a rose
'Cause it rhymes with "mose"
Moses
Moses
Moses
"A"
All right, here we go.
- Quiet!
- Quiet.
Roll 'em!
Oh, Pierre.
You shouldn't have come.
She's gotta talk into the mike.
I can't pick it up.
Cut!
What's the matter?
It's Lina.
Look, Lina, don't you remember? I told you.
There's a microphone right there...
- ...in the bush.
- Yeah.
You have to talk into it.
I was talking.
Wasn't I, Miss Dinsmore?
Yes, my dear. But please remember, round tones.
"Pierre, you shouldn't have come."
Pierre, you shouldn't have come.
That's much better...
Hold it a second.
Now, Lina, look.
Here's the mike.
Right here in the bush.
Yeah.
Now, you talk towards it.
The sound goes through the cable to the box.
A man records it on a big record in wax... but you have to talk into the mike first.
In the bush!
Now try it again.
Gee, this is dumb.
She'll get it, Dexter. Don't worry.
We're all nervous the first day.
Everything will be okay.
By the way. You know the scene coming up where I say:
"imperious princess of the night"?
I don't like those lines. Is it all right if I say what I always do?
"I love you. I love you.
I love you."
Sure. Any way it's comfortable.
But into the bush!
Okay.
Again!
Quiet!
Roll 'em!
Cut!
We're missing every other word.
You've got to talk into the mike!
Well, I can't make love to a bush!
All right, all right.
We'll have to think of something else.
What are you doing?
- You're being wired for sound.
- What?
Watch out for those dentalized
D's and T's and those flat A's.
Everybody's picking on me.
Okay, Lina.
Now look at this flower, see?
The mike is in there.
That's it.
The sound will run from it... through this wire, onto the record.
It'll catch whatever you say.
Now let's hear how it sounds, Lina.
Okay, quiet!
Roll 'em!
Oh, Pierre, you shouldn't have come.
You're flirting with danger.
What's that noise?
It's picking up her heartbeat.
Swell.
Cut!
That's right. That should do it.
Now, don't forget.
The mike is on your shoulder.
And whatever you say goes through the wire onto the record.
Now, please, Lina, talk into the mike.
Don't make any quick movements or you might disconnect it.
Okay, let's go.
- Quiet.
- Quiet.
Roll 'em.
Oh, Pierre, you shouldn't have come.
You're flirting with danger.
What's this wire doing here?
It's dangerous.
You'd better not go in together.
Lina's probably waiting right inside the door.
- Oh, how I wish...
- Don't worry.
I'll lead the cheering section in the balcony. Good luck.
- Mr. Lockwood.
- Hello.
What's that? The storm outside?
It's those pearls, Mr. Simpson.
I am the noblest lady of the court, second only to the queen.
Yet I am the saddest of mortals in France.
What is the matter, milady?
I'm so downhearted, Theresa.
My father has me betrothed to the Baron de Landsfield...
and I can't stand him.
Oh, but he's such a catch.
All the ladies of the court wish they were in your shoes.
My heart belongs to another...
Pierre de Bataille.
Ever since I met him, I can't get him out of my mind.
Sounds good and loud, huh?
Oh, Pierre!
You shouldn't have come.
You're flirting with danger.
They will surely find you out.
Your head is much too valuable.
She never could remember where the microphone was.
'Tis Cupid himself that called me here...
and I...
smitten by his arrow, must fly to your side...
despite the threats of Madame Guillotine.
But the night is full of our enemies.
What you hitting him with, a blackjack?
Imperious princess of the night...
I love you.
Oh, Pierre.
I love you.
I love you, I love you, I love you,
I love you, I love you.
I love you, I love you,
I love you, I love you!
Did somebody get paid for writing that?
Sounds like a comedy.
- It's a Lockwood-Lamont talkie.
- What?
This is terrible.
What's that?
The sound. It's out of synchronization!
Tell them to fix it.
Yes, sir.
What's this? Yvonne?
Captured by Rouge Noir of the Purple Terror?
Ohh. Oh, my sword!
I must fly to her side!
Yvonne, Yvonne...
my own.
Pierre will save me. Pierre!
Pierre is miles away, you witch.
No, no, no.
Yes, yes, yes.
No, no, no.
Yes, yes, yes.
This is a scream.
Give me pictures like
The Jazz Singer.
"I love you, I love you,
I love you"...
- We're ruined. We're all ruined.
- You can't release this picture.
We're booked to open in six weeks all over the country.
But you're such big stars, we might get by.
I never wanna see Lockwood and Lamont again.
Wasn't it awful?
This is the worst picture ever made.
I liked it.
Well, take a last look at it.
It'll be up for auction in the morning.
You're out of your mind.
It's Saturday. No bank will foreclose until Monday.
- It wasn't so bad.
- That's what I told him.
There's no use kidding myself.
Once they release The Duelling Cavalier,
Lockwood and Lamont are through.
The picture's a museum piece.
I'm a museum piece.
Things went wrong with the sound. Get the technical...
No, it wasn't that.
This is sweet of both of you, but I...
Something happened to me tonight.
Everything you said about me is true.
I'm no actor.
I never was. Just a lot of dumb show.
I know that now.
Well, at least you're taking it lying down.
No kidding, Cosmo.
Did you ever see anything as idiotic as me on that screen?
Yeah. How about Lina?
Heh. I ran her a close second.
Maybe it was a photo finish.
I'm through.
You're not through.
Why, of course not.
With your looks, you could drive an ice wagon.
- Or shine shoes.
- Block hats.
- Sell pencils.
- Dig ditches.
Or go back into vaudeville.
Fit as a fiddle and ready for love
I could jump over the moon up above
Fit as a fiddle and ready for love
Too bad I didn't do that in Duelling
Cavalier. They might have liked it.
- Why don't you?
- What?
- Make a musical.
- A musical?
Sure. Make a musical.
The new Don Lockwood. He yodels, he jumps about to music.
The only trouble is that after Duelling Cavalier... nobody'd come to see me jump off the
Woolworth Building into a damp rag.
Turn The Duelling Cavalier into a musical.
- Duelling Cavalier?
- Sure.
They've got six weeks before it's released.
Add songs and dances, trim bad scenes, add new ones.
And you got it.
Hey, I think it'll work.
- Of course!
- It's a cinch.
It may be crazy, but we'll do it.
The Duelling Cavalier is now a musical.
- Hot dog!
- Hallelujah!
Whoopee! Fellas, I feel this is my lucky day, March 23rd.
- Your lucky day's the 24th.
- What?
It's 1:30 already. It's morning!
Yes. And what a lovely morning!
Good mornin'
Good mornin'
We've talked the whole night through
Good mornin'
Good mornin' to you
Good mornin'
Good mornin'
It's great to stay up late
Good mornin'
Good mornin' to you
When the band began to play
The stars were shining bright
Now the milkman's on his way
It's too late to say good night
So good mornin'
Good mornin'
Sunbeams will soon smile through
Good mornin'
Good mornin' to you
And you and you and you
Good mornin'
Good mornin'
We've gabbed the whole night through
Good mornin'
Good mornin' to you
Nothing could be grander
Than to be in Louisiana
In the mornin'
In the mornin'
It's great to stay up late
Good mornin'
Good mornin' to you
Might be just as zippy
If we was in Mississippi
When we left the movie show
The future wasn't bright
But came the dawn, the show goes on
And I don't wanna say good night
So say good mornin'
Good mornin'
Rainbows are shinin' through
- Good mornin'
- Good mornin'
- Bonjour!
- Monsieur!
- Buenos dias!
- Muchas fras!
- Buon giorno!
- A ritorno!
- Guten morgen!
- Guten morgen!
Good mornin' to you
Ol!
- Toro!
- Toro!
Hey, we can't make this a musical.
What do you mean?
Lina.
- Lina.
- Lina.
She can't act, she can't sing and she can't dance.
- A triple threat.
- Yeah.
What's so funny?
I'm sorry, I was just thinking.
I liked her best when the sound went off and she said:
"Yes, yes, yes."
"No, no, no."
"Yes, yes, yes."
"No, no..."
Wait a minute.
I am just about to be brilliant.
Come here, Kathy.
Come here. Now, sing.
- Huh?
- I said sing.
Good mornin'
Good mornin'
Don, keep your eyes riveted on my face.
Good mornin'
Good mornin' to you
Watch my mouth.
Good mornin'
Good mornin'
It's great to stay up late
Good mornin'
Good mornin' to you
Well, convincing?
Enchanting. What?
Don't you get it?
Use Kathy's voice.
Lina moves her mouth and Kathy sings and talks for her.
That's wonderful!
- I couldn't let you do it, Kathy.
- Why not?
You wouldn't be seen. You'd throw away your career.
It has nothing to do with my career.
It's only for this picture.
The important thing is to save
The Duelling Cavalier...
- ...save Lockwood and Lamont.
- Yeah.
Well, all right, if it's only for this one picture, but...
- You think it'll get by?
- Of course.
It's simple to work the numbers.
Just dance around Lina and teach her how to take a bow.
We'll spring it on R.F. in the morning.
Don, you're a genius.
I'm glad you thought of it.
Oh, Cosmo.
Good night, Kathy.
See you tomorrow.
Good night, Don.
Take care of that throat.
You're a big singing star now, remember?
This California dew is just a little heavier than usual.
Really?
From where I stand, the sun is shining all over the place.
I'm singin' in the rain
Just singin' in the rain
What a glorious feelin'
I'm happy again
I'm laughin' at clouds
So dark up above
The sun's in my heart
And I'm ready for love
Let the stormy clouds chase
Everyone from the place
Come on with the rain
I've a smile on my face
I'll walk down the lane
With a happy refrain
Just singin'
Singin' in the rain
Dancin' in the rain
I'm happy again
I'm signin'
And dancin' in the rain
I'm dancin'
And singin'
In the rain
Why, that's wonderful!
We'll keep it secret until we're ready to release... just in case it doesn't come off.
I'm worried about Lina.
She doesn't like Miss Selden.
There might be fireworks.
Lina won't even know she's on the lot.
Boys, this is great.
The Duelling Cavalier can be saved.
Now, let's see.
The Duelling Cavalier with music.
The title.
The title's not right. We need a musical title. Cosmo?
Hey! The Duelling Mammy.
No.
I've got it.
No.
The Dancing Cavalier!
That's it. The Dancing Cavalier.
- Remind me to make you a scriptwriter.
- Thanks. Have a cigar.
Thanks.
Now, what about the story?
We need modern musical numbers.
We throw a modern section into it.
The hero's a hoofer on Broadway.
He sings and he dances.
One night, backstage, he's reading The Tale of Two Cities.
A sandbag hits his head.
He dreams he's back during the French Revolution.
This way, we get in the modern dancing numbers.
But in the dream, we can still use the costumes.
Sensational! Cosmo, remind me to give you a raise.
- Oh, R.F.
- Yes?
Give me a raise.
He holds her in his arms
Would you?
Would you?
He tells her of her charms
Would you?
Would you?
They met as you and I
And they were only friends
But before...
...the story ends
He'll kiss her with a sigh
Would you?
Would you?
And if the girl were I
Would you?
And would you dare to say
Let's do the same
As they
I would
Would you?
And would you dare to say
Let's do the same
As they
I would
Would you?
Perfect! That Selden girl is great.
I'm gonna give her a big buildup.
- Swell!
- How much is there left to do?
- One scene and a number.
- What number?
It's a new one. It's for the modern part.
It's called "Broadway Melody."
It's the story of a young hoofer who comes to New York.
First, we set the stage with a song.
It goes like this.
Don't bring a frown to old Broadway
You gotta clown on Broadway
Your troubles there
They're out of style
For Broadway always wears a smile
A million lights
They flicker there
A million hearts beat quicker there
No skies of gray
On that Great White Way
That's the Broadway
Melody
Gotta dance
Gotta dance
Gotta dance
Shh.
Gotta dance
Gotta dance
Gotta dance, gotta dance
Broadway rhythm
It's got me
Everybody dance
Broadway rhythm
It's got me
Everybody dance
Out on that Gay White Way
And each merry caf
Orchestras play
Taking your breath away
Broadway rhythm
It's got me
Everybody sing and dance
Oh, that Broadway rhythm
Oh, that Broadway rhythm
When I hear that happy beat
Feel like dancin' down the street
To that Broadway rhythm
Writhing, beating
Rhythm
Gotta dance
Gotta dance
Gotta dance
Gotta dance
When I hear that happy beat
Feel like dancin' down the street
When I hear that happy beat
Feel like dancin' down the street
Gotta dance
Gotta dance
Gotta dance
Gotta dance
Gotta dance
That's the Broadway
Melody
That's the idea. What do you think of it?
I can't visualize it. I'll have to see it on film first.
- On film, it'll be better yet.
- Don't forget.
Have Selden re-record all of Lina's dialogue.
- It's all set up.
- And remember... don't let Lina know about it.
All set in there?
Right.
Nothing can keep us apart.
Our love will last till the stars turn cold.
All right, Kathy. Go ahead.
Nothing can keep us apart.
Our love will last till the stars turn cold.
That's great! Perfect. Cut.
Till the stars turn cold.
Oh, Kathy, I love you.
I can't wait till this picture's finished.
No more secrecy. I'm gonna let Lina and everyone know.
Your fans will be bitterly disappointed.
From now on, there's only one fan I'm worried about.
There!
- What did I tell you?
- Thanks, Zelda. You're a real pal.
I want that girl off the lot at once!
She ain't gonna be my voice.
Zelda told me everything.
- Thanks, Zelda. You're a real pal.
- Anytime, Don.
Look, Don and I...
Don! Don't you dare call him Don!
I was calling him Don before you were born.
I mean... You were kissing him!
I was kissing her. I happen to be in love with her.
That's ridiculous! Everybody knows you're in love with me.
Ha, ha. Now look, Lina.
Try and understand this.
I'm going to marry her.
Silly boy. She ain't the marrying kind.
She's a flirt trying to get ahead by using you.
Well, I'll put a stop to that!
I'm gonna go up and see R.F. right now!
A little late.
The picture's finished.
If she weren't in it, you'd be finished too.
As far as I can see, she's the only one who's finished.
Who'll hear of her?
Everybody. Why do you think
Zelda's in such a sweat?
Kathy nearly stole the picture from her.
She's only doing you a favor in The Dancing Cavalier.
And she's getting full screen credit for it too.
It'll say on the screen that I don't talk and sing for myself?
Of course. What do you think?
- They can't do that.
- It's already done.
There's a whole publicity campaign planned.
Publicity?
They can't make a fool out of me.
They can't make a laughingstock out of Lina Lamont.
What do they think I am, dumb or something?
Why, I make more money... than Calvin Coolidge... put together!
"Monumental Pictures enthusiastic over Lina's singing and dancing."
I never said that.
"Premiere tomorrow night to reveal
Lina Lamont, big musical talent."
You can't pull a switch like this on the publicity department.
We were prepared for the Selden campaign.
Now you do this. At least keep us informed.
Wait a minute. I don't know anything about this.
What are we gonna do?
Nothing.
Absolutely nothing.
You wouldn't wanna call the papers and say Lina Lamont... is a big fat liar.
Did you send this stuff out?
I gave an exclusive story to every paper in town.
You'll never get away with it. Call the papers.
I wouldn't do that if I were you.
Don't tell me what to do, Lina.
What do you think I am, dumb or something?
I had my lawyer go over my contract.
Contract?
And I control my publicity, not you.
- Yeah?
- Yeah.
The studio is responsible for every word printed about me.
If I don't like it, I can sue.
What?
I can sue.
If you tell the papers about Kathy Selden... it would be "detrimental and deleterious" to my career.
I could sue you for the whole studio.
- That's a lot of nonsense.
- Says so.
Right here.
Contract dated June 8, 1925, paragraph 34, subdivision letter A.
"The party of the first part..."
- That's me.
- You win, Lina.
We better take Kathy's credit card off the screen.
All right, go ahead.
Let's just get this premiere over with.
Satisfied?
There's just one little thing more.
You want me to change the name of the studio to Lamont Pictures, Inc.?
R.F., you're cute.
Now, I was just thinking.
You've given her a part in Zelda's picture... and you'll give her a bigger one in the next.
So, what?
If she's done such a grand job doubling for my voice... don't you think she ought to go on doing just that?
- And nothing else.
- You're out of your mind.
I'm still more important to the studio than she is.
I wouldn't do that to her in a million years.
You'd take her career away.
People don't do things like that.
People?
I ain't people.
I am a...
"A shimmering, glowing star in the cinema firmament."
It says so... right there.
Oh, Pierre, Pierre, my darling.
At last, I've found you.
Oh, Pierre.
Pierre, you're hurt.
Speak to me, speak to me.
I'll kiss her with a sigh
Would you?
Would you?
And if the girl were I
Would you?
Would you?
Oh, Pierre, hold me in your arms always.
Lockwood's a sensation.
Yes, but Lamont! What a voice!
Isn't she marvelous?
- It's going over wonderfully, isn't it?
- Yeah.
Our love will last till the stars turn cold.
And would you dare to say
Let's do the same as they
I would
Would you?
R.F., it's a real smash.
- Congratulations. We owe you a lot.
- Thank you.
- Kathy, we made it!
- It's a miracle!
It's great, Don. Just great.
You were fabulous. You sang as well as Kathy Selden.
And I'm gonna for a long time.
What do you mean?
I mean she's gonna go right on singing for me.
Listen, Lina.
I thought something was cooking beneath those bleached curls.
Kathy has her own career.
She only did this for this picture.
That's what you think.
Come on, come on.
- Lina's getting carried away.
- Yeah, she is.
Listen, you boa constrictor.
Don't get any fancy ideas about the future. Tell her!
Never mind, R.F.!
Listen to that applause.
Wait till the money rolls in.
You won't give all that up because a nobody don't wanna be my voice.
She's got something.
It's a gold mine.
Part of that choice is mine.
And I just won't do it.
You've got a five-year contract.
You'll do what R.F. says.
What's the matter?
Why don't you tell her off?
I'm confused.
This thing is so big...
- They're tearing the house apart.
- Take a curtain call.
I once gave you a cigar.
Can I have it back?
Listen! I'm an avalanche!
Selden, you're stuck.
If this happens, get a new boy.
I won't stand for it.
Who needs you? They'd come to see me if I played opposite a monkey!
Don's a smash too.
I'll say a few words.
I'm still running the studio.
I'm not so sure!
You're Mr. Producer, always running things, running me.
From now on, as far as I'm concerned, I'm running things.
- Lina Lamont Pictures, Inc., huh?
- Yeah.
You've gone a little too far.
- They're yelling for a speech.
- A speech?
Yeah, everybody's always making speeches for me.
Tonight, I'm gonna do my own talking.
I'm gonna make the speech!
- No, please!
- Wait a minute. Wait a minute.
This is Lina's big night and she's entitled to do the talking.
- Right?
- Right.
Ladies and gentlemen.
I can't tell you... how thrilled we are at your reception... for The Dancing Cavalier, our first musical picture together.
If we bring a little joy into your humdrum lives... it makes us feel as though our hard work... ain't been in vain for nothing.
Bless you all.
She didn't sound that way in the picture.
Cut the talk, Lina. Sing!
Sing us a song, Lina. Sing to us.
- Please.
- Come on, Lina, sing.
I got an idea. Come here.
Now, listen.
What am I gonna do?
We've got it. Get a mike set up back of that curtain.
Kathy, come here. Kathy will stand back of there and sing.
She'll be back of the curtain singing, and I'll be in front...
- Like in the picture?
- Right.
You've gotta do it.
This is too big.
She's got a five-year contract with me. Get over to that mike.
You heard him, Kathy. Now do it!
I'll do it, Don.
But I never want to see you again... on or off the screen.
Now, come on, Lina.
What are you gonna sing?
"Singin' in the Rain."
"Singin' in the Rain."
"Singin' in the Rain."
In what key?
A-flat.
A-flat.
In A-flat.
I'm singin' in the rain
Just singin' in the rain
What a glorious feelin'
I'm happy again
I'm laughin' at clouds
So dark up above
The sun's in my heart
And I'm ready for love
Let the stormy clouds chase
Everyone from the place
Come on with the rain
I've a smile on my face
I'll walk down the lane
With a happy refrain
And singin'
Just singin' in the rain
I'm singin' in the rain
Just singin' in the rain
What a glorious feelin'
I'm happy again
I'm laughin' at clouds
So dark up above
The sun's in my heart
And I'm ready for love
Let the stormy clouds chase
Stop that girl!
That girl running up the aisle!
Stop her!
That's the girl whose voice you heard and loved.
She's the real star of the picture, Kathy Selden!
Kathy.
You are
My lucky star
I saw you
From afar
Two lovely eyes
At me they were gleaming
Beaming
I was starstruck
You're all
My lucky charms
I'm lucky
In your arms
You've opened heaven's portal
Here on earth for this poor mortal
You
Are my
Lucky star
 She's the hostess with the mostest, on the ball 
 Square dance, the Washington square dance 
I, Sally Adams, do solemnly swear... that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office... on which I am about to enter, so help me God.
Madam Ambassador, you are now the accredited representative of the United States... to the Grand Duchy of Lichtenburg.
My congratulations.
This is the proudest and happiest moment of my life.
I am proud because my duties take me to a country it has long been my dream to know and love... the glorious Grand Duchy of Lichtenburg.
Lichtenburg and the United States of America are both conscious... of the historic friendship that has existed between our two peoples.
I shall seriously endeavor to preserve that warm relationship.
And I shall strive with all my heart and strength... to bring about a closer unity between us.
Congratulations, Madam Ambassador.
- How soon do you leave us?
- Tomorrow morning.
And when do you arrive at your post?
I'm not sure. Hey, boss.
Where the heck is Lichtenburg?
- Step on it. She's on her way down.
- Hope I got enough light.
With Sally's diamonds, you don't need lights.
Hey!
- Mrs. Adams!
- Madam Ambassador.
Hold it.
Big smile now. Thank you.
- How about a statement?
- Tell us about it.
One at a time, boys.
One at a time. You tee off Johnny.
This way, Mrs. Adams.
That's fine. Thank you.
Mrs. Adams, as our new ambassador to Lichtenburg, is there any statement you'd like to make?
Yes there is. You can say for me boys, that the farewell party
I'm throwing tonight is gonna be a killer-diller.
And you're all invited.
End of statement.
- Hey. - Wow. - But Mrs. Adams.
Don't you feel that Lichtenburg should be included in some multilateral system...
- to promote exchange stability?
- He talks cute.
No, I mean, shouldn't Lichtenburg be brought into the IBRD?
You don't have to spell it out.
You can say it in front of these fellas.
- Seriously, Mrs. Adams.
- Okay, seriously...
I don't know what the h-
I don't know what you're talking about.
My city editor thought up those questions, not me.
But I would like to know how you got this appointment.
- That one I can answer.
 I was born on a thousand acres of Oklahoma land 
 Nothing grew on the thousand acres
For it was gravel and sand 
 One day Father started digging in a field 
 Hoping to find some soil 
 He dug and he dug and what do you think 
Oil, oil, oil
The money rolled in and I rolled out with a fortune piled so high 
 Washington was my destination 
 And now who am I 
 I'm the chosen party giver 
 For the White House clientele 
 And they know that I deliver 
 What it takes to make them jell 
 And in Washington
I'm known by one and all 
 As the hostess with the mostest on the ball 
 They would go to Elsa Maxwell 
 When they had an axe to grind 
 They could always grind their axe well at the parties she designed 
 Now the hatchet grinders all prefer to call 
 On the hostess with the mostest on the ball 
 I've a great big bar and good caviar 
 Yes, the best that can be found 
 And a large amount in my bank account 
 When election time comes 'round 
 Entertaining vodka drinkers 
 Is a job they give to me 
 Making nice guys out of stinkers 
 Seems to be my cup of tea 
 What they really need behind the iron wall 
 Is the hostess with the mostest on the ball 
 In the handbag that I'll carry 
There's a precious little note 
 To Their Highnesses from Harry 
 Introducing me, he wrote 
 I'll appreciate a favour, large or small 
 For the hostess who's the hostess 
 With the mostest on the ball 
Uh, Sally. You wouldn't like me to make a little farewell speech tonight, would you?
That's right. I wouldn't.
I hear you were wonderful in the senate today, Charlie.
- I didn't speak today.
- Everybody loved it.
Hi, deep and thoughtful.
Why aren't you dancing?
- Nobody asked me.
You're gonna be sorry you said that.
- Excuse me, Charlie.
- Surely.
Let's see. You're with the Morning Globe, aren't you?
Not anymore.
I'm going with you to Lichtenburg.
- With me?
- As your press attach.
- Who hired you? - Nobody yet. But you're gonna need a press attach.
- And I need a job. I got fired this afternoon...
- ls that a recommendation?
In a way. I got fired for writing nice things about your appointment.
- Yeah?
- Uh, no. I just made that up to impress you.
Actually, the boss and I did have a difference of opinion.
But it concerned a matter of eight bucks a week.
Well, I'm available, Mrs. Adams.
I think you'll find me useful.
I know quite a lot about European politics.
And you think I don't.
Is that it?
Well, I think you're gonna learn very fast.
- Well, thank you, Mr.-
- Mr. Gibson. Kenneth Gibson.
I can be cleared by the State Department in the morning, and be ready to leave by noon.
- Uh, no dice, huh? - Pardon me, Mrs.
Adams. You're wanted on the phone.
- Whoever it is, tell them to come right over.
- It's long distance, Mrs. Adams.
- You'll want this call.
- Oh. Thank you, Burton.
Sorry, kid.
I don't need a press attach.
Wish I did.
Hello?
Hello, Harry.
How's everything in Independence?
Yep. I'm leaving in the morning.
What? Oh, sure.
The party's going fine.
I'm sorry you and Bess couldn't make it.
Is Margaret with you?
Denver? How did it go?
Even in Denver.
Well, the critics don't know everything.
She made money, didn't she?
Good. Harry, I'm afraid
I won't get to see you before I leave.
Yes, I'm gonna take this job very seriously.
Thanks, Harry, for everything.
Love to the family. Bye, Harry.
We're all ready for the newsreel shots.
We're set up in the den.
- Just a short talk. It won't take a minute.
- Talk? What will I say?
Oh, you know. What you intend to do when you get over there.
- A few facts about Lichtenburg. Anything.
- What do I know about Lichten-
Mrs. Adams. Excuse me.
Those notes you dictated.
- Notes?
- I think it's about what you'll need.
Oh, thanks, kid.
Uh, Kenneth here, Mr. Gibson, is my press attach.
- He's going with me to Lichtenburg.
- Oh, splendid.
Okay, let's get it over with.
Now, Mrs. Adams. If you'll just step over here, please. You boys all set up?
And though as a diplomatic post, Lichtenburg's importance cannot be overestimated.
The country is no bigger than... Brooklyn?
While Sally's celebrated friends congratulate and wish her Godspeed...
they may recall the days when the fabulous
Oklahoma widow, new in Washington...
made her still widely quoted remark...
a remark that was to endear her in the hearts of the nation's capital.
I'll take the check.
But in the years to follow...
it was her simple forthright charm and native common sense...
that made her Washington's number-one hostess...
and brought to her home, leaders of society, leaders of the nation's government.
Quiet everybody! Quiet!
 Too small to be a city 
 Too big to be a town 
 Too poor to have an army 
 And too easy to knock down, 
 But somehow 
 We manage to play the game 
 While the other lands 
 Keep changing hands 
 Old Lichtenburg stays the same 
Three columns in the Lichtenburg City
Sun, and two in the Kallenhaffen Express.
- That's not bad, huh?
- Seven hours late.
- What have you to say to that?
- I tried to get her to fly over with me.
You and your female ambassador.
Sir?
- Yes?
We finally have a report on Mrs. Adams.
- Well?
- She was in Switzerland last night.
- Switzerland? - And this morning at
8:00, she tried to cross the border into Italy.
She insisted it was Lichtenburg.
- Well, it's comforting to know she's found Europe. - Yes, sir.
This reflects on me.
I made an appointment with her... to receive the prime minister at I 2:00.
- Now it's after 3:00.
- Take it easy, Maxwell. She'll get here.
Gibson, you are talking to the embassy's charg d'affaires.
Don't you think it would be more courteous to address me as Mr. Maxwell or "sir"?
Why, certainly, if it seems important, sir.
But I think you're going to find that Mrs.
Adams prefers informality in the office, sir.
Mrs. Adams' preferences interest me very little.
I fully intend to go on running the embassy while she remains quietly in the background.
Like to make a little bet?
Mr. Maxwell.
Oh. Sir.
Mr. Maxwell, about the presentation at the palace tonight...
- what should we inform the Grand Duke?
- Let's not bother the Grand Duke.
His Highness has troubles of his own.
Gentlemen, I see no necessity for all this talk, talk, talk!
We are agreed that the marriage is desirable for both countries. We are agreed on the terms.
- Otto! Not so excited.
- Please, Sophie.
I do not see how parliament could have made it any clearer.
When my niece marries Prince Hugo...
Here, I'll read it again.
"The dowry of the Princess Royal upon her marriage will be two million krobbles..."
"and her income will be tripled."
Well, Excellency, does that not answer all your questions?
All but one, Mr. Prime Minister.
The, uh-
Well. What? What? What?
Where is Lichtenburg going to get the money?
If I may be so blunt... your treasury is no better off than our own in Mittledorf.
The answer, Excellency, is simple statesmanship.
We will get an American loan.
The minister of finance means he will ask for an American loan.
- It amounts to the same thing.
- To be sure.
Now, and mind you, I'm speaking for my government rather than Prince Hugo... who, as you know, is not interested in material things.
He is simply a young man, wholesomely in love.
Now, I see no reason why this marriage should not take place immediately- uh, after these unpleasant financial details have been worked out.
Do not worry, Excellency.
When the lady ambassador gets here, there will be no problem.
We have very reliable reports that she's extremely warmhearted... tremendously generous and very inexperienced.
It will be... Oh.
She's here!
She has arrived!
My type.
Your Highnesses, if you will excuse us.
- We will be back immediately with everything arranged. - Good, good.
- Not bad, huh?
- It'll do.
- Say, this is quite a layout. - Yes, it was built by the Grand Duke's uncle, Count Maximillian... for his, uh... for a dancer he was crazy about.
Why, the old son of a gun.
- And, uh, this is your office here, Mrs. Adams.
- Oh?
- I'll go see about the trunks. Excuse me.
- Right.
Thank you, staff. Any problems, my door is always open. At ease.
Hello, I'm Sally Adams.
Who are you?
- The charg d'affaires.
- Who?
I am Pemberton Maxwell. I'm in charge of affairs here at the embassy.
Oh, you're one of the office help.
You'll find me easy to work for.
Mrs. Adams, we might as well understand each other immediately.
- When I have appointments, I arrive on time.
- Well, bully for you.
Of course, I happen to have a diplomatic background... a family tradition of government service.
- My father was a public servant, so was my grandfather. - What do you know?
My grandmother was a servant too. She was a chambermaid at the Old Waldorf.
Call the duke and duchess, will you?
And tell them I'll drop in around 4:00.
Sort of get acquainted.
Mrs. Adams, apparently I'm going to have to teach you a great many things...
- you quite obviously do not know.
- You're gonna teach me?
Look at you.
Your coat and pants don't even match.
Oh, Mrs. Adams. The prime minister is here with the minister of finance.
Well, ask them to come in, Ken.
Mrs. Adams, in these matters of state it would be wise to consult me.
I could tell you, for example, they are desperate for an American loan.
Oh, I know all about that. They told me in Washington to turn them down.
Cold but diplomatic.
Come in, gentlemen.
Mr. Charg d'affaires.
Your Excellencies, it is my pleasure to present to you... the representative of the United States of America, Mrs. Sally Adams.
- Madam Ambassador.
- And this is-
This is the proudest and happiest moment of my life.
Lichtenburg and the United States of America are both conscious... of the historic friendship that has existed between our two countries.
- Grab some chairs. - And if I may be permitted an extremely unofficial remark... off the record, as you say...
- the American ambassador is very beautiful.
- So beautiful.
Well, thank you.
A good optometrist could clean up around here.
- - Now, if the minister of finance may speak officially...
Mr. Tantinnin.
Madam Ambassador, we, too, are conscious... of the historic friendship that has existed between our two countries.
When one contrasts the wealthy and prosperous nation you represent-
- Not a dollar.
- With the position of my poor country...
- Not a quarter. - You must realize the need for a closer relationship between us.
Not a dime.
Of course, if you'd care to stick around for a few beers.
No. No, thank you.
But if we could only go back and tell the Grand Duke... that we have opened negotiations for an American loan.
- Okay, you open them.
- Oh, thank you. That's wonderful.
And I'll close them.
Madam Ambassador is jesting.
Yes. I'm sure we can come to some kind of an agreement that will be mutually satisfactory.
Ten will get you 20.
Drop in again, boys.
Madam Ambassador.
Mr. Charg.
Well, I told them, didn't I?
Yes. And with such great finesse.
It strikes me that a woman with your enormous lack of experience, Mrs. Adams...
Call me "Madam."
- Madam.
- When you call me madam, smile.
Madam, I happen to be charg d'affaires.
And I happen to be charge the whole works.
Aw, look, fancy-pants. We have to work together. We ought to be friendly.
- You're gonna like me and-
- I prefer to keep our relations official, madam.
Okay, now we understand each other.
I'm the madam, and you're just one of the boys.
Yes?
Mr. Maxwell, the foreign minister is here.
- He wishes to see you immediately.
- Me?
I beg your pardon.
I'd expected to find you alone.
- May! address myself only to you?
- Certainly, General, certainly.
I would not think of calling on the American ambassador without an appointment.
But perhaps you would inform Her Excellency... that with all Lichtenburg,
I rejoice in her arrival.
She will be so informed, General.
Would you be good enough to add, that at Her Excellency's convenience... the foreign minister will be happy to make an appointment to receive her credentials.
- Forgive the intrusion.
- What's your hurry, General?
May, uh-
May! introduce myself?
- I am the...
- Pardon me, madam.
Your Excellency, it is my pleasure to present to you... the representative of the United States of America...
Madam Ambassador, Mrs. Sally Adams.
General Cosmo Constantine, secretary of state for foreign affairs... for the Grand Duchy of Lichtenburg.
Excellency.
Get lost. Get lost.
Here are my references.
This is the proudest and happiest moment of my life.
Lichtenburg and the United States of America... are both conscious of the historic friendship... that has existed between our two countries.
I shall seriously endeavor to preserve that warm relationship.
And I shall strive with all my heart and strength... to bring about a closer unity between us.
- How much do you want?
- I do not understand.
- How much money?
- Money?
Cabbage, lettuce, you know, that green stuff.
 Money, money, money, money
Can you use any money today 
 Money, money, money, money
Nice new bills that we're giving away 
 There are photographs on every one 
 Lincoln, Grant and Washington 
 Or you might like the ones with Henry Clay 
 Can you use any money today 
Two million, four million six million, eight million 
 Ten 
 Take what you want
When it's gone you can come back again 
 Bills that haven't been printed yet 
 You can have them by the sack 
 Coins that haven't been minted yet 
 That you never have to give back 
 Money, money, money, money
Uncle Sam puts it right on the line 
 And if we ever run out of checks for him to sign 
 You can have mine, all of mine 
 You can have mine 
 Home in the States underground there's a cave full of gold 
 Back up a truck and we'll fill it with all it can hold 
 Take 10 million and please don't fuss 
 If you find it can't be spent 
 You can lend it right back to us 
 And we'll pay you at seven percent 
 Money, money, money, money
Uncle Sam puts it right on the line 
 And if that fellow with whiskers 
 Ever should decline 
 You can have mine, all of mine
 You can have mine 
Name your own figure. Could you use
50 million? How about a hundred million?
Madam Ambassador, I am convinced that the people of Lichtenburg... can and should help themselves without foreign aid.
- I would oppose an American loan.
- You're kidding.
- No, Excellency. - Well, seems to me, that's not a very friendly attitude.
Borrowing money is not always difficult, but paying it back.
Paying it back?
That is naive.
Uh, of course, all I can do is make a recommendation.
But, uh-
Sit down, General.
Thank you.
- Lovely room.
- Yes.
I understand it was built by the
Grand Duke's uncle for his cutie-pie.
Yes, that was quite a scandal.
Uh, I believe it is in this room... that the door to the secret passageway is located.
- Oh?
- Yes, somewhere along here.
Here it is.
It leads to the palace through the royal wine cellar.
Very interesting. It sort of gives the old room a romantic feeling.
Don't you kind of sense it, Excellency?
Forgive my digression, but, uh...
I would like to clarify my views on foreign policy... if the American ambassador is interested.
If she isn't, she ought to have her head examined.
I was just thinking that the American ambassador... might understand the foreign minister's views a little better... if she knew something about him.
Unquestionably. What is it that
Madam Ambassador would like to know?
Uh, is the foreign minister married?
No, Excellency.
Any other questions?
Just one. Does the foreign minister like roast turkey?
- We're having it for dinner tonight.
- Tonight?
With candied yams and cranberry sauce.
The foreign minister has a passion for roast turkey, with what you said.
But isn't it tonight that Her Excellency is going to the palace?
The palace?
Who's playing there?
No. Tonight...
Madam Ambassador and her staff will be presented at court.
Their Highnesses are giving a bail.
Oh, yeah? Oh, swell. Well.
I must jot that down.
Now, let me see.
- Tonight, presentation at palace.
- 8:30, Excellency.
Tomorrow night, turkey dinner.
7:30, Excellency.
I am very sorry.
I wish I were free tomorrow night.
- Friday night? Sunday, Monday,
Tuesday, Wednesday? - No, I-
- Tuesday would be perfect.
- Fine.
Then we can talk more about the loan. Seriously.
You are the most American
American I have ever met.
That's the nicest thing anybody ever told me.
You couldn't have said anything that...
"The most American"...
Of course, I know there's a knock in there too.
Please translate into English this word "knock?"
You know, you think
I'm all right except...
Okay, I can take it.
What are the exceptions?
Well, forgive me, but perhaps for Americans, money is a little too important.
There are more valuable things than money.
That's what money's for, to buy them with.
- With money you cannot buy-
- What can't you buy?
Many things.
For one, love, a happy marriage.
I thought that marrying for money was sort of an old custom around here.
Yes, and in my own family for generations.
But to me, a marriage for money, something never to do.
- I learned that lesson when a child.
- You were married while a child?
I learned it from my parents, my grandparents, my uncles... my great-uncles, my cousins.
 Ten generations of Constantines 
 Lived very comfortable lives 
 They were contented to live in style 
 Supported by their wives 
 Daughters of men who were wealthy 
 Fitted them like a glove 
 They all married for money 
 I mean to marry for love 
 It's an old-fashioned idea 
 Marrying for love 
 And that old-fashioned idea 
 Is what I'm thinking of 
 Where there's love 
 Poets have said 
 Two can live as one 
 That's an old-fashioned idea 
 But it's being done 
 If she must have gold 
 Let it be in her hair
 Rubies, let them be in her lips 
 Diamonds 
 Let them shine in her eyes 
 Just an old-fashioned romance 
 With the moon above 
 A romance, one that will end 
 Marrying for love 
 That's the kind of love 
 That I'm thinking of. 
Me too.
 That's the kind of love 
 That I'm thinking of. 
Mrs. Adams, about the presentation tonight.
I... Anything wrong?
- I just met General Constantine.
- And?
Wow.
Maxwell said this thing is strictly formal.
I've got everything but a high hat.
- Ken.
- I guess I'd better get one.
Oh, pardon me.
What were you going to say?
Wow.
Here we are.
- The Grand Duke Otto, he has one just like it.
- Is that so?
Oh, perfect.
Fits like a glove.
- I kind of wanted it to fit like a hat.
- Only 300 krobbles.
Three hundred? Bigger hat, smaller price, if you don't mind.
- Two hundred krobbles. Twenty dollars.
- Two hundred?
Ah, this is it.
That's fine. I'll take it.
- I will get a box. Just a few seconds.
- Thank you.
Oh, pardon me.
- Are you busy?
- No.
No. No, not at all.
Is that an American song?
Why, yes. It's a hit from a show that ran a couple of years on Broadway.
Could I hear the words, please?
Don't see why not.
 It's a lovely day today 
 So whatever you've got to do 
 You've got a lovely day to do it in 
 That's true 
 And I hope whatever you've got to do 
 Is something that can be done by two 
 For I'd really like to stay 
 It's a lovely day today 
 And whatever you've got to do 
 I'd be so happy to be doing it with you 
 But if you've got something that must be done 
 And it can only be done by one 
 There is nothing more to say 
 Except it's a lovely day for saying 
 It's a lovely day 
And it's very danceable too.
Oh, yes. Thank you.
I shall want that.
- Anything else new from America?
- Mm-hmm. Me.
- You see, I, uh, I really don't work here.
- Oh.
- Your Highness.
- Oh.
I am still looking.
Thank you.
- I will call.
- Your Highness.
Well, I...I guess that makes us about even, Your Highness.
I...I mistook you for somebody professional.
An actress or a dancer.
Oh, yes? That is very odd. Because I've always wanted to be an actress or a dancer.
- Oh, really?
- I'm afraid it is very improper for me to-
Oh, forgive me. I'm Kenneth Gibson of the American Embassy, Your Highness.
I am terribly sorry.
This may sound pompous.
- But until we are formally presented-
- Oh, I understand perfectly.
The first thing you learn in a State Department job is protocol.
Why, we shouldn't even be talking at all.
- We are not anymore, are we?
- Oh, no.
The thing that threw me...
Well, I had no idea that the Princess
Royal would be travelling about alone.
Oh, I am not alone.
My equerries.
They would like to stay closer to me.
I can understand that.
But I enjoy the feeling of privacy.
The people, don't they all know you?
Oh, yes. But they are considerate and kind.
They pretend they do not notice me.
Why, I think I could do almost anything.
Dance, sing, stand on my head even... and no one would look at me.
That's hard to believe.
 It's a lovely day today 
 And whatever you've got to do 
 I'd be so happy to be doing it with you 
 But if you've got something that must be done 
 And it can only be done by one 
 There is nothing more to say 
 Except it's a lovely day for saying 
 It's a lovely day 
Well, that's very nice.
Very nice, Your Highness.
And you were right, nobody seemed to be watching it.
It is a good thing Uncle Otto was not.
Oh, forgive me.
I have many things to do.
 Well, if you've something that must be done 
 Now don't forget two heads are better than just one 
 And besides
I'm certain if you knew me 
 You'd find I'm very good company 
 Won't you kindly let me stay 
 Well, if you've got something that must be done 
 And it can only be done by one 
 There is nothing more to say 
 Except it's a lovely day for saying 
 It's a lovely day 
 It's a lovely day 
 It's a lovely day 
- I hope you're not as upset as I am.
- About what?
All these sordid formalities, dowries, income.
It would be wonderful if we could run away like simple peasants and marry tomorrow.
- No? - I cannot pretend I am dying of impatience, Your Highness.
- We scarcely know each other.
- My mother did not meet my father... until three days before their wedding.
- Have they been happy?
- Well, uh-
Your Highness should not listen to backstairs gossip.
Besides, things would have been entirely different if our country were not so poor.
Which reminds me. I understand the
American ambassador will be here tonight.
Yes, with her staff.
Your Excellency, Their Highnesses will receive you in a very few moments.
I'll wait.
- Are you sure you know what to do, madam?
- I curtsey at the door...
Bending the left knee, keeping the back straight, the head up...
- with under no circumstances a wobble.
- Okay, no wobble.
I step inside and curtsey again.
Why? I'll never know.
I walk to the throne and curtsey again, for Pete's sake.
- Then I hand the Grand Duke my recommendations.
- Your credentials.
Okay. I hand them to him. Then
I tell him how glad I am to be here.
And he tells me how glad he is
I am here. I make out I believe it.
Then maybe he says, "Sit down." In that case, I tell him a couple of jokes...
- Please.
- I'll keep it clean.
When he gets up, I get up.
I curtsey again, no wobble.
And just to make sure I haven't got a chance, they make me wear this.
I don't mind a train, but they shouldn't have given me the super chief.
- Good evening.
- General.
I am very sorry, but the delay is unavoidable.
His Highness has been resting.
- A slight indisposition.
- Oh, I'm sorry to hear that.
- Uh, we could make it some other time.
Their Royal Highnesses... the Grand Duke and
Grand Duchess of Lichtenburg.
- - Now, now.
No need to be nervous.
You go ahead, Cosmo.
I'll be fine.
You just be yourself and Their
Highnesses will find you enchanting.
Curtsey in here, in there.
Then I walk to the-
The ambassador and her staff will now be received.
Okay, boys. Here we go.
Where are my credentials?
- I have them here, madam.
- Oh. - Mrs. Adams.
- Yes? - Don't you want to get the train back on the track?
Oh.
I do want Harry to be proud of me.
Her Excellency, the Ambassador from the United States of America.
I must have wobbled.
My credentials, Your Highness.
And I want to tell you how happy I am to be in this Grand Duchy of Lichtenburg.
I think one reason is it just so happens that one of my ancestors was Dutch.
So you can understand how happy I am to be in this Grand Duchy... and to meet all you grand Dutchmen.
- Dutchmen?
- Does she think we are Dutch?
We are Lichtenburgers,
Madam Ambassador.
Yes, of course.
Extremely amusing, Madam Ambassador.
So amusing.
Your Excellency.
Why don't you sit down, Highness?
I understand you've been under the weather.
Well, these are very trying times for small nations.
But I imagine the wise ambassador from a much more fortunate country knows... what would make me feel a great deal better.
- Am I right, Excellency?
- Could be.
Tomorrow I'll send you a bowl of nice, thick chicken soup.
It's my grandmother's recipe.
Do you know that she never once called a doctor in 40 years?
Of course, she did owe him money.
And now, if it's all right with you,
Your Highness... there's a member of my staff who hasn't been presented yet.
He's a nice kid.
Mr. Kenneth Gibson.
Your Highnesses.
Your Highness.
- The interview is over, madam.
- Oh.
Well, it's sure nice to have met Your Highnesses.
- Uh, Your Highness, is it proper for me to-
- Oh, no. No.
- I must ask you.
- Oh.
I hope you're enjoying your stay in Lichtenburg, Mr. Gibson.
- I'm not, Your Highness.
- No?
Well, you see, it's extremely personal,
I'm afraid, not protocol.
You may tell me.
Well, they'd never believe this back home, not in a thousand years.
- What? - Well, I met a girl, and
I can't get her out of my mind.
Is that so unpleasant?
Ordinarily, no. But, uh-
Well, this is like a fairy tale without much chance for a happy ending.
You see, the girl turned out to be a real honest-to-goodness princess.
You dance very well, Mr. Gibson.
I'll shut up, Your Highness.
Cosmo, I'm getting very fond of Lichtenburg.
Well, you couldn't have arrived at a better time.
Our annual fair opens next week.
- Yeah? I hear that's quite a shindig.
- Oh, yes. Very colourful.
Much to see. The Princess Royal leads our dance festival.
You will enjoy it, Excellency.
- What is it? I have said something?
- Oh, this "excellency" business.
Isn't it about time the foreign minister started getting less foreign?
You say such amusing things.
I wish I could understand them.
I shall have to spend some evenings with an English-American dictionary.
You name the evenings, and I'll be over.
- May I, Excellency?
- Of course, Your Highness.
I have not danced for years.
- But in honor of the American ambassador-
- Oh, you're doing fine.
One, two, three.
One, two, three.
Well, now you're really groovy.
- Yeah?
- One, two, three. One, two, three.
- Fine.
Tell me just how does this reception differ...
- from your famous Washington parties?
- Well, we have a good time.
Uh, I mean, we're less formal.
- You know, everybody sort of pitches in and...
Look. Why don't I just show Your Highness?
Why, yes.
Please do, Excellency.
Got anything hot, maestro?
- Hot?
- Yeah. You know, sizzling.
Oh, yes. I know what you mean.
Something up-to-date?
We have it. Let's see.
Here it is.
An American song.
Irving Berlin.
- "The International Rag."
- Hmm, 1913.
Well, that's fairly up-to-date.
Let's give it a whirl.
- Real razzamatazz, Highness.
- Razzamatazz.
Excuse me.
- Hit it, boys!
 What did you do, America 
 They're after you, America 
 You got excited and you started something 
 Nations jumping all around 
 You've got a lot to answer for 
 They lay the blame right at your door 
 The world is ragtime crazy 
 From shore to shore 
 London dropped its dignity 
 So has France and Germany 
 All hands are dancing to a raggedy melody full of originality 
The folks who live in sunny Spain 
 Dance to a strain 
 That they call the Spanish tango 
 Dukes and lords and diplomats 
 Dressed in tails and opera hats 
 Throw up their shoulders to that raggedy melody full of originality 
 Italian opera singers 
 Have learned to snap their fingers 
 The world goes round to the sound of the International Rag 
 That was 1913 
 Still today each "Europeen" 
 Throws up his shoulders to that raggedy melody full of originality 
 All Harrys, Dicks and Tommys 
 And someday even Commies 
 Will dance around to the sound of a raggedy melody full of originality 
 Oh, oh
Wiggle your personality 
 Doing the International 
 Doing the International Rag 
Bravo! Bravo!
Hey, what are we waiting for?
Hit it again.
- Come on, everybody. Let's have some fun.
Shake it up.
No. Oh, please, we had better get back.
Oh, yes.
You're perfectly right.
We... We...
- That was impertinent.
- I know.
No. No, it was not. It-
Good night.
You know, Sally, you have brought a new vitality to Lichtenburg.
The old vitality suits me fine.
General. Forgive me, Excellency.
- At your convenience, could His Highness see you?
- Of course.
Go ahead.
Maxwell's right here.
As you say in America, okay.
You are going to permit me to take you home?
Sure. Where do you live?
- It's a pleasure to watch them work.
- Work?
When those old-world diplomats are good, they're magnificent.
So beautifully sly and devious.
Surely, madam, you don't suppose the foreign minister's attentions are purely personal?
You mean, you don't think he likes me?
To be perfectly candid, I doubt the question has even entered his mind.
With these fellas, there are only two kinds of people: those who can serve their purpose and those who can't.
You, madam, as the ambassador of a rich country...
If you're referring to the loan, let me tell you something.
Oh, I'm quite sure I can tell you the same thing.
He said he didn't want a loan-
- that he would oppose accepting a loan.
- Yes, he did.
The "hard to get" method.
They don't miss a trick.
You don't suppose they're discussing the weather?
- Mrs. Adams, if you don't mind-
- Ken, I-I think we'd better go.
I'd like to.
- Yes?
- You wanted to see me, Mrs. Adams?
Yeah, I'd like to hand the president a few laughs.
Will you dream up a funny cablegram for me?
You know, about the presentation.
Tell him about my pratfall.
- I will, Mrs. Adams.
- I'll appreciate it, kid. Be out in a minute.
Yes, ma'am.
 It's a lovely day today 
 And whatever you've got to do 
 You've got a lovely day to do it in 
 That's true 
 But if you've got something that must be done 
 And it can only be done by one 
Ken, Cosmo expects me to go to the fair with him.
Remind me to cancel, will you?
This the cable to the president?
"Dearest Maria"...
Well, that should hand him a laugh.
Look, kid, these things happen... to all of us.
Nothing could be as bad as...
Ken, what's happened to you?
 I hear singing 
 And there's no one there 
 I smell blossoms 
 And the trees are bare 
 All day long I seem to walk on air 
 I wonder why 
 I wonder why 
 I keep tossing in my sleep at night 
 And what's more
I've lost my appetite 
 Stars that used to twinkle in the skies 
 Are twinkling in my eyes 
 I wonder why 
 You don't need analyzing 
 It is not so surprising 
 That you feel very strange but nice 
 Your heart goes pitter-patter 
 I know just what's the matter 
 Because I've been there once or twice 
 Put your head on my shoulder 
 You need someone who's older 
 A rubdown with a velvet glove 
 There is nothing you can take 
 To relieve that pleasant ache 
 You're not sick
You're just in love 
 You don't need analyzing 
-  I hear singing 
 It is not so surprising 
-  And there's no one there 
 That you feel very strange 
-  I smell blossoms 
 But nice 
-  And the trees are bare 
 Your heart goes pitter-patter 
-  All day long I seem 
 I know just what's the matter 
-  To walk on air 
 Because I've been there once or twice 
-  I wonder why, I wonder why 
 Put your head on my shoulder 
-  I keep tossing 
 You need someone who's older 
-  In my sleep at night 
 A rubdown 
-  And what's more 
 With a velvet glove 
-  I've lost my appetite 
 There is nothing you can take 
-  Stars that used to twinkle 
 To relieve that pleasant ache 
-  In the skies 
 You're not sick 
-  Are twinkling in my eyes 
 You're just in love 
-  I wonder why 
- Come on now. Snap out of it.
- I hear singing.
- But you just said that.
- I know, but...
 I hear singing and there's no one there 
-  It is not so surprising 
 That you feel very strange 
-  I smell blossoms 
 But nice 
-  And the trees are bare 
 Your heart goes pitter-patter 
-  All day long I seem 
 I know just what's the matter 
-  To walk on air 
 I wonder why, I wonder why 
-  Because I've been there once or twice 
 Put your head on my shoulder 
-  I keep tossing 
 You need someone who's older 
-  In my sleep at night 
 A rubdown 
-  And what's more 
 With a velvet glove 
-  I've lost my appetite 
 There is nothing you can take 
-  Stars that used to twinkle 
 To relieve that pleasant ache 
-  In the skies 
 You're not sick 
-  Are twinkling in my eyes 
 You're just in love 
-  I wonder why 
 Dance the polka 
 Dance to the music of the ocarina 
 Ocarina, ocarina 
 Gretchen and Otto
Hans and Wilhelmina 
 Dance to the ocarina, dance 
 Dance to the music: of the sweet potato 
 Sweet potato, sweet potato 
 Cheeks getting redder than the ripe tomato 
 Dance to the ocarina, dance 
 Listen and hear the notes escaping 
 Out of that tiny hole 
 Doesn't it please your soul 
 Doesn't it say, dance the polka 
 Step to the music of the ocarina 
 Who refuses Wilhelmina 
 Wait till she listens to the ocarina 
 I know that Wilhelmina will 
The lady ambassador is late.
I don't know. What do we gain by waiting for her?
This, Mr. Sebastian, is a job for a man who understands women.
Oh. Here.
Let me talk to her alone.
You'll see.
- Madam Ambassador.
- Your Excellencies.
- Hi. - Your presence adds so much to the beauty of our fair.
So much.
- Thank you.
- Now, if madam will enter the official car.
We thought it might be more fun walking.
Oh, no. This is an honor you cannot deny us.
Okay. See you boys later.
To the royal box.
What about your sidekick?
Doesn't he go along?
Well, you see, we have a saying in Lichtenburg...
"Alone at the fair with a lady fair..."
- "no greater delight anywhere."
- That so?
Madam Ambassador, you're a diplomat from a great country.
But to me, you're also a woman.
Very interesting point of view.
When I'm with a lovely lady,
I forget all problems of state.
I forget budgets.
I forget foreign loans.
Ever try a memory course?
You know, it is spring,
Madam Ambassador.
I know. We've got a calendar at the embassy. Cut it out, Excellency.
Forgive me. I'm trying to control my ardent nature. But madam-
I said cut it out, Mr. Tantinnin.
- I want you to call me August.
- Well, that'll be soon enough.
- I'll get out here, driver.
- Your Excellency.
Look here, buster. I thought this was the foreign minister's racket.
If he hasn't got a chance, nobody has.
Thanks for the ride, August.
- Mrs. Adams!
- Cosmo!
Uh, Your Excellency.
- Are you alone? - Yes. Tantinnin was taken out in the first inning.
He was plenty fast, but a little wild.
- I-I beg your pardon.
- It's nothing important.
Well, it was nice seeing you.
- You are not going to walk unescorted?
- I thought it might be safer.
- I'm meeting people. - I was very sorry you were unable to come with me, Sally.
- Why?
- Well, we have a saying in Lichtenburg.
- "Alone at the fair with a lady fair..."
- I know all about that.
It means I may be the ambassador, but I'm also a woman.
A woman of very refreshing charm.
From a country with very refreshing money.
- What made you say that?
- A hundred million reasons.
Quite a fiesta you're tossing here.
Yes. Such a pity. This might be our last fair for a very long time.
- Unless you can raise more money. - The problem will be solved if my program works out.
I'll bet. This program of yours, it's a little like Tantinnin's, isn't it?
Hardly. Tantinnin is an impatient schoolboy... interested only in immediate results.
- Our methods could not be more dissimilar.
- I can see that.
I don't know why it is
I always seem to fall for heels.
- This I do not understand.
- I find it pretty puzzling myself.
- Well, let's stick to the subject of money. Tell me... - Sally...
- I'm going to ask a great favour of you.
- That figures. Let's hear it.
Stop talking about money.
You're a very clever man, Cosmo.
Won't you let me get you something to eat?
Look. If you weren't the foreign minister,
I mean, just some guy that I'd met, I'd say yes.
But as it is,
Yes.
Oh, Your Highness. Eh,
Emil! Heinrich!
Mr. Gibson is with the American Embassy.
A thousand pardons, sir.
That's all right.
I enjoyed the trip.
Well, I-I'm very sorry.
My equerries are overly conscientious.
But they're very considerate.
They didn't break either arm.
Well, uh, good-bye, Mr. Gibson.
- Good-bye?
- We have got to be sensible.
It is not permitted for me to talk to a young man in public.
I'm willing to make it private.
Yes. But it is not possible.
You see, even if I do not marry Prince Hugo, I...
- Are you going to?
- Those decisions are not left to me.
I am not a private citizen.
Oh, I know.
You're going to inherit a throne.
Look, Maria, I don't think I've slept three solid hours since we met.
I, too, have not slept very well.
Oh, I believe you have met Mr. Gibson,
Your Highness.
Oh, yes. You seem to have been discussing something very fascinating.
No.just insomnia.
We both have it.
I wondered what you two have in common.
- Good day, Mr. Gibson.
- I-I'm in no hurry, Your Highness.
I'm-I... Oh, yes, yes.
I-I guess I am.
Well, good-bye.
Good-bye.
Mr. American?
I do not think I care for your attitude toward the Princess Royal.
Oh, I'm sorry, Your Highness.
It's hard to please everybody.
Uh, Gibson, I'm a man with a rather violent temper.
That's a pity.
Bad temper can get you in trouble.
Perhaps. But more likely, it can get you in trouble.
I'm gonna give you some very sound advice.
Leave Lichtenburg.
Hmm. You know, I'm not sure your advice isn't worse than your temper.
Oh, Hugo.
I think we had better get back to the box.
Uncle Otto will be wondering.
I've just indicated to Mr. Gibson... that his attentions to you are far from discreet.
I think he is right, Mr. Gibson.
In that case, he is.
Nah! Caught you again.
But, young man, that is Slivitzberger.
- If you're not used to that...
- I'm getting used to it. Now...
Also, it is much past midnight, and we would like to close.
Well, that's very sensible of you.
Very sensible.
Just as soon as I finish... this.
Sure. A man's got to be sensible.
Like falling in love with a princess.
Hmm Love.
 Love is beautiful
Love is swell 
 Love is as sweet as a nut 
 Love is grander than tongue can tell 
 Love is remarkable, but 
 Look at what it did to Anthony 
 It made a fool out of Anthony 
 If love could do that to Anthony 
 What chance have I with love 
 Look at what it did to Romeo 
 It dealt poor Romey an awful blow 
 If love could do that to Romeo 
 What chance have I with love 
 Look what it did to Samson 
 Till he lost his hair he was brave 
 If a haircut could weaken Samson 
 They could murder me with a shave 
 Look at what it did to Bonaparte 
 He lost his head when he lost his heart 
 If he kicked over the apple cart 
 What chance have I an ordinary guy 
 What chance have I with love 
 Look what it did to Adam 
 From that bite he couldn't escape 
 If an apple could finish Adam 
 They could knock me off with a grape 
 Well, if love could do that 
 To old Adam and Tony and Sam 
 And the boys named above 
 Then what chance have I an ordinary guy 
 What chance have I with love 
Please, young man, go home.
I know you are sad, but,
Sad? What's there to be sad about?
- I'm a happy boy.
Hello! Get me the police!
Hurry! Quick! The police!
The police!
Send Mr. Gibson in right away.
Mrs. Adams...
I am in.
I, uh-
- I thought you'd want to see me.
- I do.
I've got a report here intended for Washington. It's about you.
- Maxwell, huh?
- And it's a lulu. Especially this part.
"After being released by the police because of diplomatic immunity..."
"Gibson fell asleep in a gutter."
"On being awakened, he publicly bellowed an announcement..."
"of his engagement to the Princess Maria."
- Well?
- I-I don't think it was a gutter, Mrs. Adams.
Otherwise, I guess the report is pretty accurate.
Look. With the possible exception of myself... nobody in this office is expected to act like a knucklehead.
How long do you think you'll last here if this goes to Washington?
About as long as I deserve.
- Headache?
- A pip.
And the royal family isn't helping it any.
Look, Mrs. Adams,
I'd just as soon go home.
Well, on your way, stop by my bathroom.
- You'll find some aspirin there.
- Thanks.
And, uh, Kenneth... save this for the wastepaper drive.
Never mind.
I'll do it myself.
Thank you, Mrs. Adams.
Madam, the foreign minister's office called to confirm his engagement Tuesday night... for, um, your turkey dinner.
Relax. Relax.
It's business.
Oh, naturally.
The diplomatic pouch is ready to go.
Have you signed my report on young Gibson?
Oh, yes. Your report.
I think it's in here.
Madam, you certainly aren't gonna treat this lightly.
Gibson's actually been trying to date the princess.
The Grand Duke is highly exercised.
What about? After all, they let Princess
Margaret go out with Danny Kaye.
Permit me to warn you. If there's any interference with this royal marriage...
- Sebastian will protest to Washington.
- Sebastian.
Look, fancy-pants, have you ever been in love?
If you'll read the book of foreign service regulations...
I don't think you'll find "love" listed as a justification for disorderly conduct.
I've read the book of regulations... and it says that I'm supposed to take a complete inventory... of everything in the embassy.
I did, and you're shy four dish towels... an egg beater and nine bed sheets.
Is madam under the impression that I am the housekeeper here?
No comment.
- Anything else?
- Yes.
Slither back to your desk and write...
"I won't be a tattletale" 500 times.
Yes? On the phone?
Well, I should say so.
Put her on.
Hello? Hi, honey- uh, Your Highness.
I've been wanting to talk to you.
Yes.
Certainly, Princess.
I understand.
Yes. Oh, I think that's a fine idea.
I'll be glad to tell him.
Not at all, Princess. Bye.
- Ken.
- Mm-hmm?
- I want you to do something for me.
- Sure.
- You know about this underground tunnel thing to the palace? - Yeah.
Well, they're sending someone over with a message. I want you to get it for me.
- A message?
- It's very confidential.
Oh.
- It's dark in here.
- Here, take this.
- Got a match?
- No. Got a lighter.
- I still can't see.
- Then take off your glasses.
- Your Highness.
- Hello.
- B-But Mrs. Adams said-
- I know.
I told her I had to see you.
She was very sweet.
Oh, I'm not complaining.
Kenneth, Prince Hugo has been making very bad threats... about what he would do to you if we met again.
That's very good news. I didn't think there was a chance we'd meet again... but you weren't really worried.
Well, not too much. I think mostly it was an excuse for seeing you.
Darling. Oh.
Oh. Here.
There. Now I can see you better.
Maria, you can't marry that guy.
I am not going to.
There is no money for the dowry... and I understand there definitely...
- will be no American loan.
- Yeah, but what if there is?
Is it not silly to bother about things that will not happen?
I would like you to kiss me.
- Look. Maria-
- Ah.
That was a command.
Well, I guess there's nothing else to do but obey.
Oh, Kenneth. Oh.
I like being in your arms.
I remember at the presentation,
I was so afraid you would not ask me to dance.
That's something you'll never have to be afraid of.
 Not when there's something to dance about 
 Someone to dance it with 
 Something to dance it to 
 To a foxtrot or a waltz 
 Put on your dancing shoes 
 Dance to the happy news 
 Let's dance away the blues 
 To a foxtrot or a waltz 
You and someone have parted 
 And your lonely heart yearns 
 While you're there brokenhearted 
 Suddenly he returns 
That's something to dance about 
 With someone to dance it with 
 To something to dance it to 
 To a foxtrot or a waltz 
 To a Charleston or a waltz 
 To a tango or a waltz 
- Yes?
- Madam, the foreign minister just phoned.
- He's on his way over.
- Fine.
- Tell the butler we'll have cocktails up here.
- Yes, madam.
And, uh, Maxwell... it might be a good idea if we're not left alone.
I want you to sort of hang around.
Well, I must say, that's an astonishingly sound suggestion.
It's very wise to have a witness present at high-level discussions.
Yeah. And just to be polite,
I'll probably hint that you get out.
But no matter what I say, just pretend that you don't understand.
I confess I misjudged you, madam.
This is what I'd call real diplomacy.
Oh, and before you come in... you might give him a couple of minutes to say hello.
I understand perfectly.
And, uh, Maxwell, how do I look?
I never thought I'd say so, madam, but,
Hello? Oh, yes.
Put it through.
Hello?
Hello, Harry.
How are you?
How's Bess?
Good. And Margaret?
You mean to tell me they've got critics in Galesburg, Illinois?
Hmm.
Oh, not bad, Harry... but they're trying to slip a fast one over on me.
Yeah, the man I told you about- the foreign minister.
Is he a smooth character.
Don't worry, Harry.
I'm having him over to dinner tonight.
I'm gonna tell him off but good.
I've got a speech all memorized, and it's a honey.
Bye, Harry. Love to the family, and thanks for calling.
Bye.
Now, see here, Cosmo.
We're gonna put our cards on the table.
If there's something you're after, why not come out and say so?
The foreign minister, madam.
Sally, my dear.
Hi, Cosmo.
Now, see here, Cosmo.
We're gonna put our cards on the table.
Must we play cards?
Uh. Other attractive men have tried to influence me... and not one has failed- uh, succeeded.
If I may use one of your expressions, what the devil are you talking about?
I know what's on your mind.
Why not be straightforward and direct about it?
Well, of course.
Uh, what I mean is... if there's something you're after... why not come out and say so?
Well, you know, that was probably the first time... a foreign minister ever kissed an ambassador.
We've made history.
- Cosmo.
- Yes?
I, uh,
Let's make more history.
Forgive me, Excellency.
Uh, madam, they're typing that report to Washington. It will be right up.
What report?
Oh. Thank you, Maxwell.
- You needn't wait.
- Oh, I don't mind. Not at all.
- Maxwell.
- Yes, madam?
The situation has changed- really changed.
Don't you understand? Blow.
Mrs. Adams likes service.
Maxwell, those instructions
I gave you-
They'll be carried out, madam.
You may be sure of that.
Oh, have you heard the very amusing story they're telling at the hofbrau?
- We heard it.
- Yes, very amusing.
Look, Maxwell, the general and I are gonna have a cocktail before dinner.
Oh. You must permit me to mix them for you.
- But I don't want you-
- I insist.
- Now, what'll it be?
- Murder, I think.
That's a drink I'm afraid
I don't know.
A little brandy, a dash of scram... some "et-gay, "out-gay,
'ick-quay" and an egg.
Then you beat it. Beat it!
- There doesn't seem to be an egg.
- Then get one, you lunkhead!
Poor Maxwell.
It's just nerves.
He needs a vacation.
- Uh, Cosmo.
- Yes?
I realize that whatever you're doing is for your country.
Nobody can be blamed for that.
Well, if through my job I can help you.
Darling, your generosity's charming.
You are charming.
But in diplomacy, an impersonal attitude is the best thing.
Best thing for who... uh, whom?
For you, me, everyone.
But who cares about everyone?
I'm only interested in you.
 Please let me say from the start 
 I don't pretend to be smart 
 I just suggest 
 What I think best 
 Having your interest at heart 
 I only want 
 What's the best thing for you 
 And the best thing for you 
 Would be me 
 I've been convinced 
 After thinking it through 
 That the best thing for you 
 Would be me 
 Every day 
 To myself I say 
 Point the way 
 What will it be 
 I ask myself 
 What's the best thing for you 
 And myself and I 
 Seem to agree 
 That the best thing for you 
 Would be 
 Me 
Sally, my dear, you never fail to amaze me.
You reveal now a quality I never suspected.
I have a quality?
This touching unselfishness- thinking only of me.
But we must also think of you.
 I ask myself 
 What's the best thing for you 
 And myself and I 
 Seem to agree 
 That the best thing for you 
Yes?
 Would be 
 Me 
Ooh. Did you have to wear one with points on it?
Madam Ambassador, please.
Oh, your call, madam.
It is ready.
Hello. Harry? Sally.
Well, he just left, and...
Oh, yes. Very satisfactory.
Uh, Harry... do you think we can spare $100 million?
- From Washington.
- D.C.
Delighted to see you, Senators.
Welcome.
- Well, how are you?
- I'm Pemberton Maxwell...
- senior officer at the embassy.
- Glad to know you, sir.
- Where's Sally?
- You know Mrs. Adams. She's at the caterer's.
Very busy preparing for tonight's party.
- Oh, a party, huh?
- For us?
For anybody. Mrs. Adams' parties require no explanation.
Uh, great gal, Sally.
- Oh, yes, indeed.
- Yes.
- Come in, gentlemen.
- Thank you, sir.
Gentlemen.
Come. We'll get our hats.
But the party does not start for five, six hours.
So we come a little early.
- This is Mrs. Adams' office.
- Oh, yeah.
Make yourselves comfortable, gentlemen.
The guest rooms aren't quite ready.
- Not the most efficient staff in the world.
- No hurry.
I understand you gentlemen are here as an investigating committee.
Yep. That's the general idea.
Thank you.
Well, I'm prepared to talk.
- What about?
- The-The ambassador.
And what passes for her management of the embassy.
Are you knocking Sally?
I-I'm afraid you misunderstood.
I-I admire her, enormously.
Yes.
Splendid woman. Very able.
But, uh, you are here to investigate?
- Yeah, a loan to Lichtenburg.
- Welcome to Lichtenburg.
Uh, may I present the Prime Minister of Lichtenburg, Mr. Sebastian... and the Minister of Finance,
Mr. Tantinnin.
- Senators Gallagher, Brockway and Wilkins.
- Gentlemen.
I'll, uh, see about your rooms.
Excellencies, I know that you Americans do not like to waste time.
But we will not rush. We will sit down before we discuss the loan.
But what about-what's his name-Mrs.
Adams' friend? Our plan was to talk to him.
Oh, yes.
Cosmo, the foreign minister.
He's the opposition leader.
He's a very difficult man.
Also, Excellencies, the negotiating of loans... that is the business of the prime minister exclusively.
That's too bad.
Our ambassador thinks very highly of this Cosmo.
She seems to want us to deal with him.
- She does?
- Cosmo?
- Will you excuse us, please? We'll be right back.
- Just for one minute.
Make sure there's plenty of hot dogs... and ketchup and mustard and all the condiments on the table.
- Mrs. Adams.
- Oh, Ken, I left the senators at the bar.
- Kind of see that they have fun, will you?
- The loan-it's going through?
Got my fingers crossed.
What do you suppose happened to him?
Cosmo, what are you doing in here?
Fascinating book-your State Department's foreign service regulations.
Yeah, it's a book I always curl up with at parties.
I was particularly interested in this chapter... on American consuls and ambassadors who marry citizens of foreign countries.
Got any particular consul or ambassador in mind?
Darling, there is something
I have wanted to say.
Mr. Sebastian, madam, and members of the cabinet.
Just don't forget what you were going to say.
- Come in, boys. Glad you could make it.
- Excellency.
- Excellency.
- Cosmo, the government has fallen.
- No.
- Yes. Congratulations, Mr. Prime Minister.
- Congratulations.
- Very good luck.
Is this true, Sebastian?
The cabinet felt that only you... could solve the problems of Lichtenburg.
We are very happy for you.
Very happy.
Excuse me, please.
It's wonderful news, Cosmo.
Thank you, Sally.
Gentlemen, I have only one question.
Will I be given an absolutely free hand?
Mr. Prime Minister, is a party the place to discuss politics?
- Where is Tantinnin?
- Probably at the bar.
The cabinet meeting was very exhausting.
- If you will excuse us.
- It's out in the garden.
- Thank you.
- Thank you.
Well, this gives me a chance to carry out my program.
- But I wish I knew what they were up to.
- Don't you worry, Cosmo.
If the deal I've been working on goes through... you can even run for grand duke.
Madam Ambassador.
Ah, Mr. Prime Minister.
Congratulations. My heart is so happy.
- Thank you, Tantinnin.
- I would've come in immediately... but I've been talking to the American senators.
- They will see you now.
- Now?
- Now.
- What about?
They're waiting in
Her Excellency's office.
They're on your side.
Go in and level with them.
I don't understand what the big hurry is.
Sooner the better.
I can't wait to get at those hot dogs.
- Sally having hot dogs?
- And beans.
Look, boys.
We've got to watch ourselves.
This Cosmo strikes me as a very smooth customer.
Oh, come in, Mr. Prime Minister.
Sit down, won't you?
Well, thank you.
Now, uh, we're very fond of Sally...
Uh, Mrs. Adams.
- Everyone is.
- And she likes you.
But you've got to realize this is government business.
How about $50 million?
- Well, I do not think I understand.
- Pretty cagey.
Could you understand a loan of 70 million?
No. I made my position clear.
I thought you knew.
Okay. We're here to approve a loan... but this is final. 100 million.
Gentlemen, I must gratefully, but emphatically decline.
I-I request no loan.
I accept no loan.
Do you mean to tell us this country couldn't use $100 million?
Oh, we could use it, but...
Well, gentlemen, I will be frank to the point of indiscretion.
I appreciate your generosity in wanting to help Lichtenburg... but if my country is on the verge of bankruptcy... it is because very drastic reforms are needed.
Now, with outside help, these reforms would be impossible.
You must not lend my country one penny.
Well, how's he doing?
Sally, the prime minister has made a profound impression on us.
- Good.
- Boys.
- What did you tell them, Mr. Prime Minister?
- The truth, Mr. Sebastian.
Swell. It's going to work out fine.
- Don't you think so?
- Right. Yeah. I'll tell 'em.
Gentlemen, we have been in many European countries.
We have talked to the heads of many governments.
They have been all too eager to reach down into Uncle Sam's pockets.
Today, for the first time, we have met a statesman.
We have finally met a man who has said,
"Don't give us any money."
No, huh?
We have tremendous admiration for your prime minister... and we have only one way of showing our gratitude.
We're going to lend Lichtenburg
$200 million.
Bravo! Bravo!
On behalf of the cabinet, we happily accept.
And we vote the prime minister our lasting gratitude... for his very successful negotiations.
Gentlemen, I cannot say that I have enjoyed my ten minutes as prime minister.
Of course, I resign, and I request that parliament... be called into session as soon as possible.
Good night.
- But r-r-resign?
- Why? I don't understand.
- My hat, please.
- Cosmo.
- Cosmo, I'm sorry... - I do not understand how you could do this to me.
Things I have fought for all my life, you have in one day destroyed.
Cosmo, if you really didn't want the loan-
Oh, I know you said you didn't.
All right. I didn't believe you. I...
- Thank you.
- I thought it was, well, old-fashioned diplomacy.
Anyway, I wanted to help you.
Helping people in my country is what got me where I am.
Yes, it got you out of your country, into my country.
- Good night.
- Cosmo, have a heart.
I love your country.
I love you.
I was trying to help both of you.
What's so wrong with that?
Wrong with it?
Justice, Mrs. Adams.
So long as I have any voice in the matter...
Lichtenburg is not for sale.
What is it, Kenneth?
Bad news?
Well, I-it doesn't have to be.
I just heard the loan is going through.
- Oh.
- Maria, this isn't the 17th century.
- That marriage contract...
- I gave my word, Kenneth.
- If I I'm to inherit the throne-
- But suppose you don't?
Maria, you're beautiful, you're charming and I adore you... but do you honestly think you have any special talent for ruling a country?
The fact that you do not consider me bright...
No, I-I didn't say that. I...
I-I'm the one who isn't bright.
To even suggest that you give up the throne-
A guy earning my salary, it's crazy.
Your salary. I wish that were the problem.
I wish it weren't. Back home, my apartments a lot different from the palace-
Two rooms.
It's not very big.
And the maid only comes in once a week.
You make it sound very attractive.
Oh, sweetheart.
Of course, the maid could come in twice a week.
Even once would be an intrusion.
What do you say?
I-I love you.
And good-bye?
Oh-
Come in.
You too, huh?
What?
 I hear singing 
 And there's no one there 
 I smell blossoms 
 And the trees are bare 
 All day long
I seem to walk on air 
 I wonder why 
 I wonder why 
 You don't need analyzing 
 It is not so surprising 
 That you feel very strange but nice 
 Your heart goes pitter-patter 
 I know just what's the matter 
 Because I've been there once or twice 
 I keep tossing 
-  Put your head on my shoulder
 In my sleep at night 
-  You need someone who's older
 And what's more 
-  A rubdown 
 I've lost my appetite 
-  With a velvet glove 
 Stars that used to twinkle 
-  There's nothing you can take 
 In the skies 
-  To relieve that pleasant ache 
 Are twinkling in my eyes 
-  You're not sick 
 I wonder why 
-  You're just in love 
You know what happened, Ken?
She's gonna marry that guy.
Me and my big mouth.
There's nothing I can do about it.
Yes? This is Mrs. Adams.
Hello? Hello, Harry!
Oh, not so good.
How are you?
The family?
Oh, Harry, that's wonderful news.
I'm so glad to hear it.
Margaret got a good notice.
Television, huh?
You must be very proud and happy.
You don't sound too happy.
Sebastian? What's his complaint?
Look, Harry, you don't have to pull any punches with me.
Shoot.
Well, sure, I often helped them meet.
They're swell kids.
Yes, technically, I guess
I was interfering, but-
I see.
I'm sorry, Harry.
Does that mean
I can't even stay here?
Okay. We'll leave on the first boat.
Bye, Harry.
Love to the family.
Home, huh?
That dirty Sebastian!
 Mrs. Sally Adams requests the pleasure of your company 
 At a supper and dance a coming-home party 
 That she's giving at her house tonight 
 Mrs. Sally Adams the queen of Washington society 
 Anybody at all who's anybody 
 Will be gathered at her house tonight 
 Mrs. Sally Adams is back among us very suddenly 
 Loaded down with secrets about what happened there across the sea 
 Yes, Ms. Sally Adams 
 Ms. Sally Adams 
 God bless America 
 For Mrs. Sally Adams who wants the pleasure of your company 
 You will be proud to accept and root for 
 Mrs. Sally Adams queen of all the madams 
 Madam Ex-ambassador 
Sally! Sally.
I'm so sorry I'm late, honey.
- Welcome home.
- Thanks Jim.
- What's the matter with you?
- Sally thinks she's in the doghouse.
Why? You saved us
$200 million, didn't ya?
You can thank Cosmo for that. He got his parliament to turn down the money. I didn't.
What's the difference?
He's your friend.
- So you get some of the credit.
- Thanks boys. You can have my share.
- Sally.
- Excuse me.
I don't know why she feels that way about it.
- Hello, Ken.
- Sally, I just came from the State Department.
Constantine is the new ambassador from Lichtenburg.
- Cosmo?
- He's just arrived in Washington.
No! This is the best news I've had in...
Why didn't he let me know?
Hmm. I couldn't say.
Well, come on, Ken.
What is it?
Well-
You're gonna find out anyway.
They told me that he sailed over with a woman.
Oh.
Uh, probably just a shipboard acquaintance, don't you think?
He's bringing her here tonight.
I can understand him falling for somebody else... but why should he bring her here?
Oh, well. Come on. Let's have a good time. How about a drink?
Sure.
His Excellency, the minister from Magrador.
- You go ahead. I'll be right out.
- All right.
- My gracious hostess, welcome home.
- Hi.
His Excellency, the ambassador from Lichtenburg.
Hi.
- Sally.
- How are you, Cosmo?
- I've never been happier.
- So understand. Enjoy your trip?
Enormously. I had the most charming companion.
- How charming.
- She's getting off her wrap.
She'll be right in.
I suppose I should have waited...
- but I was so eager to see you.
- That was real peachy of you.
The honorable
Miss Hammenschlaffen.
- Hello, Mrs. Adams.
- Princess!
- Oh, am I glad to see you.
- Didn't I tell you I had a charming companion?
Gee, this is certainly a...
He's here.
Outside somewhere.
Oh, Cosmo.
Do you still have to wear that thing?
Yes, while I perform an official and very pleasant duty.
Ladies and gentlemen... may I have your attention for a moment, please?
General! Glad to see you!
Senator. Gentlemen.
Pardon me.
Quiet, everybody, please!
Mrs. Adams, as a token of Lichtenburg's great esteem... the Grand Duke has asked me to confer upon you... the Order of Philip I.
This order entitles you to be called a dame.
A dame?
Say, that's quite a promotion.
Hello.
- Your Highness.
- I use our family name now, Kenneth.
It's Hammenschlaffen.
Well-Aren't you getting married?
Next week, I expect.
Oh. Th-Then I suppose you'll be going right back?
Not if I get married here.
I've renounced the throne, Kenneth.
We have Uncle Otto's blessing.
Darling.
And let me add, sir, that we are delighted by your appointment... and extend to you our heartiest welcome.
Thank you, Senator, and thank you, ladies and gentlemen.
The Grand Duke seemed to think it was a good thing for Lichtenburg... and unofficially, I think it is the best thing for me.
 I hear singing 
 And there's no one there 
 I smell blossoms 
 And the trees are bare 
 All day long I seem to walk on air 
 I wonder why 
 I wonder why 
 I wonder why 
 You don't need analyzing 
 It is not so surprising 
 That you feel very strange but nice 
 Your heart goes pitter-patter 
 I know just what's the matter 
 Because I've been there once or twice 
 Put your head on my shoulder 
-  You keep tossing 
 You need someone who's older 
-  In your sleep at night 
 A rubdown 
-  And what's more 
 With a velvet glove 
-  You've lost your appetite 
 There is nothing you can take 
 To relieve that pleasant ache 
 You're not sick
You're just in love 
 You're just in love 
 Now we've got something to dance about 
 And someone to dance it with 
 And something to dance it to 
 To a foxtrot or a Charleston 
 Or a tango or a waltz 
 You're in love
You're in love 
 You're not sick
You're just 
 In love 
What do you see in that girl?
- Well-
- I'll tell you.
All that's beautiful, clean, decent, desirable, wholesome and commercial.
- You'll photograph in color.
- Of course.
- Who'll do narration?
- I will-
Quiet. Take this down.
- Here's a pen.
- I have one.
This is better. Courtesy of Cypress Gardens,
Florida. The name's on the pen.
- Thank you.
- Come in.
Here's the frangipani, Mr. Lloyd.
- Well...
- Just arrived from Borneo.
- Wonderful.
Oh, doesn't smell very good.
Well, plant it out in back.
All right, sir.
Yep, they're all my girls.
Get this down, Barnes.
American industry owes me a debt that can never be paid.
I have made this country bathing-suit-minded.
This freezer, for instance.
Nobody bought it, not even the man who made it.
Since I put Marie on top of it, they can't turn them out fast enough.
Come in.
I want your okay, Mr. Lloyd.
- Trim her tail a little.
- Yes, sir, Mr. Lloyd. Right away.
Thank you, Mr. Lloyd.
- You like that?
- Very interesting.
This is the worst television set ever made.
I had Cynthia make love to it, became a bestseller in two weeks.
Come here. Look at that girl.
- Here.
- Oh, thank you.
Her smile has sold more toothpaste, her legs more nylon...
...her middle more girdles than you could believe.
I believe everything.
Described by Look as the girl with the perfect figure.
Could run away with the Miss America title, but I won't let her compete.
- Why?
- Wouldn't be fair.
Besides, I need her here with me.
She's been working with me since she was 15.
Oh, you should have seen her.
Just bones stuck together with freckles.
Who do you think made those shoulders and legs?
Me. And of course, Florida oranges.
I'll send you a box.
That's all. Show's over.
Hey, chief, 5600 paid admissions today.
- Pretty good, huh?
- Not bad.
This is Ben, my press agent.
Best in the world.
- How are you?
- Greetings.
Turn around, Ben.
- Designed that jacket himself.
- Very clever.
Go tell Julie and Hank we shoot the picture at 8 tonight.
- Check.
- Come on, Barnes.
I'll show you around.
Sights you've never seen in your life.
Beautiful Cypress Gardens.
Take a look. See for yourself.
I personally chose every plant, every tree and every girl.
Good morning, Mr. Lloyd.
- Hello, girls.
I wanna check this over here.
Good morning, girls.
Hello, Mr. Lloyd.
What's this?
Advertisement for Palm Beach.
- Why don't you shoot it in Palm Beach?
- This is more realistic.
Looks good, Tram.
Bye, Mr. Lloyd.
Morning, Mr. Lloyd.
- Good morning, girls.
- Say, you married or anything?
- No.
- So how do you do it?
- Do what?
How do you stay single?
In this business, you can have only one boss.
Get married, that's two.
That means trouble.
I stay single and beautiful Cypress Gardens stays one big happy family.
- I'm not gonna appear at the pool at any time. Tonight or any time.
Julie, baby doll, he gave me orders.
Julie?
Well, give him this.
Very high-strung girl.
Look at that fabric, made for us.
Why did I ever learn to swim?
- I'm gonna tell that-
Hello, angel.
Now, listen, you slave driver.
I've been wanting to tell you something.
- Will you help me with this darn thing?
- Sure, angel.
These things are impossible.
- Sure.
And stop calling me names.
Do you know I work
16 hours a day for you?
I waterski, I swim, I pose for pictures.
I smile at the tourists in this hoop skirt, take dictation, type.
Why don't you ask me to mow the lawn?
Ouch.
Say, you're putting on weight.
You better watch that.
About shooting the picture tonight...
Not with me.
Tonight I have a date with Hank.
I'm going into town.
I'm gonna have dinner and dance.
Really?
- This is Mr. Barnes.
- How do you do?
- I'm entitled to a little relaxation.
Well, of course.
- Mr. Barnes is here to do a travelogue.
- Tonight, I'm gonna enjoy myself.
For one heavenly, brief moment,
I'm gonna enjoy myself.
Well, bless your heart.
And I want you to.
Mr. Barnes flew five hours today just to get here.
I've been walking on the water for six hours.
Well, that's that.
We'll have to get somebody else, I guess.
It's too bad.
Mr. Barnes wanted you especially.
- He can't see anybody else.
- Too bad. Sorry.
But you go ahead and enjoy yourself with Hank. With Hank?
- Yes.
- Well, have fun.
- But I wanted to photograph her.
- You will, you will.
Gee, baby doll, you really hurt him pretty bad.
Hurt him? Oh, if I only could.
If I could squeeze one human feeling out of that man.
- I'd give anything.
- Take it easy. Calm down.
Why did I ever learn to swim?
Julie, come on.
- What?
Come on, let's go make pretty faces at the tourists, huh?
Oh, all right.
What a way to make a living.
Oh, that man.
Imagine that penny-pinching slave driver asking me to swim at 8:00 at night.
- Oh, and a travelogue.
- Oh, save your breath, sugar.
I happened to overhear it.
You know my ears, like radar.
Anything for a buck.
Oh, if I could only get my-
- Hello.
- How do?
Hey, hey. You look mighty pretty.
Hold it, please.
How about a date?
Boy, I'll take the one in blue.
He keeps me in the water
18 hours a day as it is.
What does he think I am, a fish?
If you are, you're the strangest one I ever saw.
A fish who'd like to be hooked by that penny-pinching slave driver.
Excuse us, girls.
Can we make your picture?
- Of course, that's what we're here for.
- Dick, get in the middle.
Take your glasses off.
Smile, everybody.
If he thinks I'm gonna work tonight, he's just out of his mind.
All right, you ready?
Roll them.
All right, cut.
You were wonderful.
Oh, Hank, not now.
We have an audience.
What's wrong?
I want the whole world to know.
- Gee, I love you, baby.
- Hank.
Nice job, kids. I couldn't be happier.
You have time for dinner and dances.
You take her to Happy Joe's. It's on me.
- That's mighty kind of you, Ray.
- My pleasure.
Mr. Lloyd, New York's on the phone.
LIFE magazine calling.
- Okay, tell them I'm flying in tomorrow.
- Yes, sir.
- You're going away? You didn't tell me.
- Yes. Oh, didn't I?
- Well, no. How long are you staying?
- A few weeks.
Have her back by 11.
You've got four shows to do tomorrow.
Goodbye, now.
I'll send you a card from the big city.
Thanks a whole lot.
Hank, you go get dressed.
I'll be along in a minute.
I forgot to tell Ray something.
Rush it, baby.
We gotta make every minute count.
That winds up the pool. What's next?
Here's the schedule for tomorrow.
Be right with you.
- We shoot the clowns-
- I came to say goodbye.
We just said goodbye.
Then the flying saucers.
- I won't be here when you come back.
- And then the ballerinas.
Be with you in a minute, Barnes.
Let me get this straight.
- You won't be here?
- No.
- Where will you be?
- I'm quitting. I'm gonna marry Hank.
Hank? That leftover from the Mr. America contest?
Oh, no.
I'll bet you've never even seen him with his clothes on.
You're going through an emotional experience.
- I see it in your skiing and-
- Oh, no. Not this time.
- You've tried to maneuver every man out-
- I've tried to protect you.
What do you see in him?
He'd Indian wrestle you dawn to midnight.
What kind of life is that?
- What kind of life is this?
- Oh, that's gratitude.
You've been on every magazine in America.
I've made you famous.
You've made toothpaste and oranges famous.
I'm sorry.
I'm going to marry Hank. Goodbye.
- Is that a snake?
- Where? Where?
- Where?
- Just a dead limb.
Angel, there are no snakes in Cypress Gardens.
You see what I mean? Emotional crisis.
Well, it's no wonder. Eight years of you.
Eight years in and out of a bathing suit
20 times a day.
- In and out-
- You're right, you need a change.
I'll tell you what I'll do.
I'll take you to New York.
- You'll take me where?
- New York.
We'll see the shows, take in some nightclubs.
We'll have the time of our lives.
Would you like that?
Would I like that?
- Oh, Ray.
- Ha-ha-ha. We'll have fun. Nothing but fun.
- Hi.
- Hi. How'd it go?
Fine, fine. All finished.
Well, let's see.
Where is that thing?
Have you seen my black dress?
- Why? Who died?
- There it is.
Everybody knows you have to have a black dress in New York.
Mm.
- It's all wrinkled too, at that.
New York? You're going to New York?
Twelve-fifteen tonight.
I've got him hooked.
Who's hooked?
Who hooked who?
Human fish catches man.
Stranger than fiction.
Oh, come on now. Stop with the riddles.
Come on.
In simple English, from the beginning.
Well, you know how many times
Hank has asked me to marry him?
I told him I was going to accept.
You're going to marry Hank?
No, no, I told Ray
I'm going to marry Hank.
And that's why he's asking me to go to New York.
- Why?
- Because he's jealous.
Well, if I were Hank, I'd be jealous too.
Not Hank. Ray's jealous.
- Ray?
- Yes.
Why else would he ask me to go to New York?
- Now, let's see. What will I need?
- Oh.
Ray. Hmm.
There's a slight possibility he might just want a deduction from his taxes.
Oh, no. No, not this time.
You should have heard him.
"Shows," he said. "Nightclubs," he said.
"Fun," he said.
"Fun, nothing but fun. "
All right, hold it.
That's good.
That's fine. Thank you very much.
Next change.
The settee goes on the platform, Bob.
Wonderful, angel.
Now, change for the lipstick ad.
- Fun, nothing but fun.
- Oh, now wait a minute, angel.
This picture might be on the cover of LIFE.
Any other girl would cut her arm off.
This girl would like to cut your throat.
Oh, I'm sorry. Excuse me.
I said I'm sorry.
I'm not.
He's not here right now.
His appointment's in two hours.
- Hi, Felix. How's the family?
- Hi, Mr. Gordon.
- Be ready in a sec.
- Say, who's the body?
A doll from Florida.
Now I know what they mean by the solid South.
- Check that fill light, will you?
- Tell me, is she coming back?
- Yeah, she just went to change.
- Not too much, I hope.
All right, Felix.
Let's look alive.
Gotta sell a lot of records, you know.
- Ready, Joe?
- Yeah.
All right, hold it.
That's it.
Okay, relax a minute...
...Mr. Gordon.
Gotta change some lights.
Hey, Johnny, you're wanted on the phone.
- How do you do, Mr. Gordon?
- Hello.
I guess you don't remember me.
I was in the chorus of your last show.
I'm doing a little modeling these days to fill in between jobs.
- Fine, fine.
- It isn't much, but 25 bucks to kiss a girl.
It's better than nothing these days, what with show business-
Wait a minute, wait a minute. What girl?
Her.
Of course I remember you.
You were in the chorus.
You were very good.
- Yes. What was your name again?
- Ted Hilbert.
Teddy Hilbert. You're looking so good.
- Thank you, sir.
- I hardly knew you. Sit down, Ted.
Just a quick kiss, angel, and we're through.
- Who's gonna kiss me?
- You know him.
- Wonderful guy. What's his name?
- Ted.
- Ted.
- Ted who?
Ted? Front and center.
Lower the flowers.
- Where did that fathead go?
He was here a minute ago.
- You mean the fella in the tuxedo?
He left.
Said he had a horrible stomachache.
- Stomachache? Who does he think he is?
- Okay, we're ready.
Well, do something, somebody.
Get me a guy in a tuxedo.
I'm in a tuxedo.
You, Mr. Gordon?
- Why not?
You fellas are in a jam.
I'm only too happy to help out.
Well, that's mighty nice of you.
I appreciate it.
Angel, meet Barry Gordon.
He's willing to kiss you for Ted.
- That's very nice of you.
- Anytime. Anytime at all.
Mr. Gordon, would you mind stepping around the back and sitting there?
The idea is you love the taste of that lipstick.
- You know what I mean?
- Yes, I think I do.
Now, just put your arm around her and then pretend you're kissing her.
Well, that's it. Shoot it.
- Swell. Shoot it.
- Okay.
Would you mind if I took one more?
- Not at all.
- Go right ahead.
That does it.
You'd better take another one.
I think I moved.
- Yes, you did. She moved.
- I moved.
I moved.
- You alone in New York?
- Practically.
Good.
Okay, I got it.
He got it.
He got it. Hey!
You know, I like the taste of that lipstick.
- What are you doing tonight?
- Nothing I know of.
I'm at the Club Mornay.
May I reserve a table for you?
Well, I can't promise anything.
Still. Got it.
Okay, angel. All right.
That's all for tonight.
Thanks a million, Henry.
- Thanks. Wonderful.
Okay.
You're my girl, you know.
I don't know what I'd do without you.
I'll order some supper for you, then off to bed you go. Room service, please.
- What do you want to eat, angel?
- Nothing. I'm going out.
Out? Hold the phone.
Are you out of your mind?
You've gotta be at the Citrus Show at 8.
I'm going out.
You're spending the morning in the Florida booth handing out grapefruit.
- Where do you wanna go?
- Gonna have some fun. I'm going dancing.
I'm gonna kill myself on an overdose of champagne and caviar.
And look terrible tomorrow?
You've had a hard day.
You're tired already. Look at yourself.
She looks okay to me.
- Thank you.
- You're welcome.
You've gotta look fresh for the Citrus Queen contest.
Hold it, will you?
There's stiff competition.
The California girl's a knockout.
Four years younger than you are.
Thank you.
Thank you, ladies and gentlemen.
Thank you very much.
It's so nice to see such a lovely-
You know, my curiosity has gotten the best of me.
I'd like to know more about you.
It's not that I'm inquisitive
It's because I love you so
This is not an investigation
It's just that I'd like to know
Did you ever, did you ever, did you ever
Kiss before?
Did you ever, did you ever, did you ever
Whisper just once more?
Did you tremble? Did you tingle?
Did your heart begin to jingle
Like a pocket
That was loaded full of dimes?
Did you like it when you did it?
If you did it, then admit it
Did you have such wonderful times?
Did you ever, did you ever, did you ever
Get that thrill?
Did you ever, did you ever, did you ever
Feel your heart stand still?
I don't care who held you tightly
I don't care who saw you nightly
Or who shared your kiss
But did you ever, did you ever, did you ever
Love like this?
Did you ever, did you ever, did you ever?
Yes, we kissed before
Thought so.
Did you ever, did you ever
Did you ever whisper?
Just once more?
Right.
Did you tremble? Did you tingle?
Did your heart begin to jingle?
Yes, it did, like a pocket full of dimes
Good.
Did you like it when you did it?
If you did it, then admit it
Oh, we had such wonderful times
Did you ever, did you ever, did you ever
Get that thrill?
Did you ever, did you ever, did you ever
Feel your heart stand still?
I don't care who held you tightly
I don't care who saw you nightly
Or who shared your kiss
But did you ever?
No, we never
Did you ever?
Hardly ever
Did you ever love like this?
- Oh. Aren't they beautiful?
- Why didn't you tell me you liked orchids?
I got a whole tree of them down by the boathouse.
Don't sigh like you do
I'm giving fair warning to you
Look out, I'm romantic
One sigh and I'm through
Don't stand quite so near
I'm not what I seem to appear
Look out, I'm romantic
Be careful, my dear
Your eyes have a manner of glowing
That makes you so hard to resist
Don't tempt me for once I get going
I won't stop
Until you've been kissed
So don't let me start
Don't look in my eyes if you're smart
Look out, I'm romantic
You might lose your heart
Two Scotch, one water, one soda.
One Manhattan, dry.
Say, Johnny.
A bottle of champagne to Table 47.
- My compliments.
- Right away.
Oh. He's just marvelous.
With his voice, anybody can sing like that.
I wonder what he looks like in a bathing suit.
Probably can't even swim.
I'd sure love to teach him.
- Well, that's that. Shall we go?
- Go?
But that was just the last number we heard.
Waiter.
- What time does the next show go on?
- Twelve, sir.
That's midnight. How about once around the floor then get out of this firetrap?
Why once around?
Why not just across and out?
Now, don't be a killjoy.
You said you wanted to have fun, didn't you?
Oh, hello, honey.
- Who's the picture of health?
- What picture of health?
The one with the orchid. Who is she?
- A customer.
- Customer? For what?
Silly child.
Can't you see she's with a man?
I was with a man too the first time you met me.
That was different.
He was your husband.
See you later, honey.
Hello.
Oh, Mr. Gordon, thank you for the lovely champagne.
Yeah, the name is Huffnagel.
This is Mrs. Huffnagel.
We're from South Dakota.
The folks back there won't believe it when we tell them...
...we were guests of none other than Barry Gordon.
Here, I want you to sit down. Sit down.
Ah, you're making a big fuss over nothing.
A whole week in New York working like a dog.
Finally had my fling, my big, mad whirl, lasting exactly 27 and a half minutes.
Believe me, you didn't miss a thing.
You see one club, you've seen them all.
You get a good night's sleep and be fresh as a daisy.
And you know what?
I bet you 10-to-1 you're the new Citrus Queen.
Sweet dreams, angel. See you at 7, huh?
- You know what?
- What?
I hope you drop dead at exactly 6:30.
Sweet dreams, angel.
Hello?
Oh, hello, Barry.
Oh, I know, and I'm sorry.
But-
Now?
Oh, no, I just couldn't possibly, Barry.
I've got to get up early in the morning and I-
Oh.
Well, you're awfully sweet. Ha.
Well, no, no. I really-
I just couldn't possibly.
No.
Well, I shouldn't.
- Oh, this is so much fun.
- Yeah.
- Um... Could I ask you a question?
- Yeah, go right ahead.
Do you know how to swim?
- Swim? Sure, why?
- Mm-hm.
Oh, I was just wondering.
I kind of thought maybe you did.
There are a lot of things I do better.
Well, let's swim a little.
All right.
Oh, oh, oh, look, look, look.
1927, the year I was born.
Isn't that terrible?
Bottled up all those years, just like me.
Look at it bubble.
Feels good to be free, doesn't it?
How do you like New York?
It's nice, huh?
Well, have fun.
Nothing but fun.
I hate him. I really hate him.
- Who?
- My boss.
Imagine what I've been missing on account of that monster.
Putting me to bed every night at 10:00 in New York.
You wouldn't do that to a girl, would you, Barry?
- Ten o'clock? Never.
- Hmm.
- Come on, let's dance.
- Oh, you're so nice.
- Hi, Irving.
- Hi, Irving.
Good morning, Mr. Gordon.
- Hi, Oscar.
- Hi, Oscar.
Hello, Barry.
Hi, girls.
Good morning.
Bye, girls.
- Hi, Melvin.
- Hi, Melvin.
- Good morning.
- Say, you know everybody, don't you?
Sure thing.
Stick with me and I'll make you famous.
- Hi, Melvin.
- No, that's Irving.
- Melvin's at the piano.
- Oh.
Lots of hot coffee and scrambled eggs with chives, the way I like them.
I know, I know.
Scrambled eggs  la Barry Gordon.
- Right.
- See?
You're getting famous already.
Don't sigh like you do
I'm giving fair warning to you
Look out, I'm romantic
One sigh and I'm through
So don't let me start
Don't look in my eyes if you're smart
Look out, I'm romantic
You might lose your heart
- Hey. Hey.
Can't you stay?
- You.
Oh, it's a lovely idea, Barry.
But I've just got to get back to Florida.
What do you do down there?
Waterski, swim, do four shows a day.
In between shows,
I do secretarial work, pose for ads...
...take dictation, type.
I'm just a Southern gal who loves that easygoing, lazy Southern life.
If I'm not too personal, what do they pay you?
- Seventy-five dollars.
- A day?
A week.
For $ 75 a week, you swim, you ski and you type?
- Ninety words a minute.
- Ninety words?
Mm-hm.
Wait a minute. I'll be right back.
All right. Hurry.
- Oscar, I want you to meet a girl.
- Why?
Because she swims, she skis and she types 90 words a minute.
And besides, she's beautiful.
I'll bring her over.
Not now, please.
Did I ever ask you for a favor?
No. Only about a hundred times.
So, what's one more time?
Look, kid, if it helps you with her, bring her to the theater at 11, all right?
- Girls, you're with a living doll.
- Barry.
Good night.
- Eleven?
- Yeah.
- He's dying to meet you.
- That's nice. Who's he?
It's Oscar Levendon, the biggest producer in town.
- He's putting on the new Water Follies.
- Oh, good.
Oh, not now, darling. Tomorrow at 11.
Oh. Oh, I can't at 11.
The Citrus Show.
I've gotta hand out grapefruit.
- Hand out grapefruit?
- Mm-hm.
You mean you'd pass up an opportunity like this to hand out grapefruit?
You're right.
If they want grapefruit, let them go to the market like everybody else.
- Of course.
- To tomorrow.
It's today.
Thank you, Barry...
...for the most wonderful evening and morning of my life.
Good night.
Good night.
- See you at 10:30, darling.
- All right.
- Floor, please.
- Ten-thirty, darling.
Twelve, I mean.
Twelve, please.
Morning, Ray.
You're up already?
I was just gonna wake you.
I'm not up already. I'm still up.
- Where have you been?
- I couldn't sleep, so I went for a walk.
- You've been walking all night?
- You don't believe it, do you?
I went to the top of the Empire State Building.
The Empire State Building closes at midnight.
It does?
- Where have you been?
Okay.
I went out with Mr. Gordon.
We danced, we drank champagne, he sang to me.
And the most important producer in New York is dying to see me.
Come on, now, stop kidding.
Where were you?
You really wanna know?
I went swimming in Central Park.
Swimming?
People threw pennies at me and I threw grapefruit at them.
Good night, Ray.
Why didn't you wake me up?
I would have walked with you.
Ugh. What's the use?
What about the Citrus Show?
You gonna be able to make it?
No. Good night, Ray.
You've got to make it.
They select the queen at 1:00.
Now, be ready, understand?
I'll pick you up.
You do that.
Hah.
Oh...
Hello?
Go away. I wanna sleep.
Barry? It's 10:30?
Uh- Of course I'm ready, Barry.
I'll be down- I'll right there in a minute.
Uh...
Well, how do you like her?
- Eh. When does she type?
- Huh?
- You said she swims and types.
- Not at the same time.
Have her report Monday morning.
Three hundred a week.
Three hundred a week?
Are you out of your mind?
You just saw her perform.
The price is 750 a week.
Not a penny less, take it or leave it.
Monday morning.
All right, Levendon.
Seven hundred a week, take it or leave it.
Darling, it's Barry.
- Ah. Come in, Barry.
Hey, why didn't you tell me?
- You're good.
- Am I?
Oh, great, great.
It's all set. You start Monday.
- Three hundred a week.
- Three hundred a-?
Oh, start Monday, so soon?
- I have to talk to Ray.
- Don't talk to him, tell him.
- What can he do? It's all set.
- What can he do?
If you've ever seen a bomb explode, that's my boss.
Well, you go on. I'll get dressed.
- I'll meet you.
- All right.
Oh, and thank you, Barry. Thank you.
Now, Ray, please be reasonable.
Just don't blow up.
After all, it's a lot of money.
Now, Ray,
I hope you're gonna be reasonable.
Just don't blow up this time.
It is a lot of money, and you've got-
- Floor, please?
- Three hundred- Twelve.
Three, please.
Twelve, please.
Three.
Where have you been?
I've been looking all over for you.
- I've been out.
- Out?
I thought I told you to wait in your room. Down.
Up. I have to talk to you, Ray.
There isn't time. The Citrus Queen contest starts in 20 minutes.
- Down.
- Up.
This is more important-
This is the most important
Citrus Show in history.
Forty mayors, six governors, three brass bands. Down.
Down.
Hold the music.
Lades and gentlemen, your attention, please.
Your attention, please.
Ladies and gentlemen, the judges have made their decision.
I give you that gorgeous girl from the great state of Florida...
...your new Citrus Queen,
Miss Julie Hallerton.
Wake up. Wake up. Wake up.
Wake up! Wake up!
I told you, no pictures. Now, take off.
So for a lousy 300 bucks, you'd walk out on me?
It's not the money. I'm tired of being treated like a piece of merchandise.
That's nice.
You've forgotten the birthday party
I gave you in the lake?
Five-foot cake. Twenty living candles.
You sold the picture rights for a thousand dollars.
All right, all right.
Forget the birthday party.
Remember the time you came into my office?
- A 15-year-old kid-
- Just bones stuck together with freckles.
I've heard it a million times.
Why don't you save your breath, Ray?
I'm staying.
Don't give me any trouble. If you're gonna work for anybody else, you're crazy.
We've got a contract.
The whole show's built around you.
We're flying back at 7, Flight 6.
Be at the airport.
I don't need it. Here.
I won't need it. And take this too.
You can put it among your trophies.
Why don't you show it to the tourists for 10 cents a look?
And for another dime, you can tell them a very pretty story.
About the queen who left her throne to live happily ever after in New York.
- All right, all right, I give up.
- What?
I give up.
I'm not going to force you, although I could.
- You can't force me to do-
- You've made up your mind, that's that.
- Well, I have.
- What about Hank?
- What?
- What about Hank?
Well, what about him?
The boy back home, the one you were gonna marry, remember?
Well, I'll- I'll write to Hank.
Oh, he'll miss you. I'll miss you.
You must let me hear from you now and then.
You're my girl, you know.
Always were and always will be.
Goodbye, angel.
I want you to know you can always come home.
Remember, beautiful Cypress Gardens will be waiting for you.
Bye, angel.
Tell me why you keep fooling
Little coquette
Making fun of the ones who love you
Breaking hearts you are ruling
Little coquette
True hearts tenderly dreaming of you
Someday, you'll fall in love
Go on.
- Hello, Barry.
- Hi, darling.
- How'd he take it? What'd he say?
- He's flying back at 7.
- By himself.
- Good.
You should have unloaded that two-bit tyrant years ago.
Well, he's not that bad.
Matter of fact, he was quite nice about it.
- Considering their show's built around me-
Ray, telephone. Ray.
- Who?
- Tell her I'm busy.
My wife, always checking on me.
Hey, Barry, how about doing the number?
Almost 7.
- Oh, it's only 6:30.
- Almost 7?
I'll see you in a minute, darling.
All right, Eddie. Take it from the top.
Tell me why you keep fooling
Little coquette
Making fun of the ones who love you
Breaking hearts you are ruling
Little coquette
Fasten your seat belt, angel.
- Good to be home, isn't it, angel?
- Yeah.
You know, I feel kind of guilty.
I should have taken you out every night.
Nightclubs, dancing.
That's all right, Ray. I understand.
Business before pleasure.
Well, next time, it's gonna be different.
Pleasure first, huh?
Angel, there's something
I'd like to tell you.
Something I think you'll like very much.
Very much.
- Yes?
- If you feel hungry about 8:00 tonight...
...how about coming around to my house for dinner and I'll tell you?
- Oh. I'll be very hungry, Ray.
- Good. Don't forget, first show at 10:30.
Hey.
Nancy, wake up.
- Wake up.
- What's the matter?
- I've got news. I've got big, big news.
- Leave me alone, will you?
- Hi.
- Hi.
- I've got him.
- Who you got? Are you married?
- No, not yet.
- Engaged?
- Not yet.
- Did he propose?
No, but I think tonight.
He said, "I have something to tell you, something you would like very much.
Very much. "
Well, come on, let's have the details.
How did you swing it?
- Well, I just-
- Oh, wait a minute.
Hello?
New York? New York.
Barry who?
I'm not here.
She's not here.
Okay, Mr. Gordon, I'll tell her.
Come on, tell me about it.
I was offered the most wonderful job.
Barry Gordon?
- More money than-
- That was Barry Gordon.
- I went to the nightclubs with him.
- Barry Gordon?
- Well, what's wrong? Don't you like him?
- Well, yes, but-
Well, why don't you wanna speak to him?
Well, I don't know want to tell him.
- Tell him you got a girlfriend, stupid.
- Oh.
- Ugh.
- She's back, huh? Is she in there?
- How'd she look? Did you talk to her?
- Uh-huh. Yes, I did.
I talked to her.
Hank. Hank.
You're a very nice fellow.
Everybody likes you. We all like you.
I like you.
But, well, you must understand.
- Girls sometimes-
Who you are talking to, Nancy?
- Hi, honey. May I come in?
Oh, yes, Hank, come on in.
- Hi, honey.
- Hello, Hank.
Let me look at you.
- You look wonderful.
- Thank you, Hank.
You don't look bad yourself.
Hank, I'd better go.
They're waiting for me.
Let them wait. This is important.
You know what happened?
Dad struck oil again.
So much oil, we could ski on it.
- That's fine.
- You know what he wants me to do?
He wants me to come back to Texas and help take care of things.
Well, I told him
I'd have to talk it over with you first.
How about it, baby?
- Well, Hank-
- Yes?
Well, Hank, I really better go.
Ray will be awfully mad if I'm late.
- Let's talk about it after the show, okay?
- Well, look, all you gotta do is say yes.
Hurry up, Freddie.
You know how Mr. Lloyd is when we're late.
Yeah, hurry up, hurry up.
Always it's hurry up from that whip cracker.
Makeup for the clown show.
Get the costumes cleaned.
Polish the skis.
Next thing you know, he'll be having me press his pants.
Oh, Freddie.
You don't seem to understand.
- Mr. Lloyd is running a business here.
- Yeah, a business, sure.
We all owe a lot to Mr. Lloyd, Freddie.
You'd have to look a long time to find a better boss or a finer man than Mr. Lloyd.
Well, here we go.
Ar-ar-ar.
Gee, baby, it was great.
- You're just wonderful.
- Oh, Hank.
When do we leave?
Hank, sit down a minute. Sit down.
You're just a wonderful guy.
I like you so much.
- But I can't go with you.
- What?
But I wrote my folks we'd leave as soon as you got back from New York.
I'm in love, Hank.
With someone else.
I'm sorry.
- When did this happen?
- It doesn't matter when it happened.
I mean, it just happened, that's all.
Oh, Hank. You'll find another girl.
Someone who'll be better for you than I would be.
I'm not in love with any other girl.
I'm in love with you.
That's the trouble with love.
Somebody always has to get hurt.
I'm just so terribly sorry that it had to be you.
Turn around.
- I don't like it.
- You don't like it?
- Yes?
It's long-distance.
- Mr. Barry Gordon again.
- Tell him Julie's busy.
I did. He insists on talking to her.
Tell him she went to Africa to become a missionary.
- It's cut too low.
- Not for me it isn't.
Well, it is a little bit revealing, but people love it.
Men love it.
Men come here with their wives.
And wives hate the things their husbands love.
- I wanna talk to you.
- Get out and knock first.
And put your pants on.
This isn't a nudist colony.
I wanna talk to you right now.
All right. Wait outside.
- What is it?
- I'm quitting.
Before I do,
I'm gonna slug you right in the kisser.
Get up.
- What's on your mind?
- You know.
- I don't know.
- Julie.
What about Julie?
I don't know, speak up.
I know how you tried to cut me out, taking her to New York...
...showing her those fine shows, making her fall in love with you.
In love with me? Who told you that?
She did.
If she's in love with me,
I had nothing to do with it.
I don't believe you.
I don't care whether you believe me.
It's the truth.
- Do you still wanna quit?
- Of course I wanna quit.
All right, then.
- A week from today, March 1 st.
- That's good enough for me.
Now, beat it. Go eat your yogurt.
Send Ben in.
What's with laughing boy?
Do you know anything about Julie being in love with me?
I had a slight notion, yes.
Most all the girls are.
It's only natural, I suppose.
Young, good-looking boss, female employees.
- Why?
- Did she ever talk to you about me?
Yes, yes, she told me what a monster you were.
Not about love, though. No, no, no.
They don't confide that sort of thing to a publicity man.
All right, Ben, that's all. Thanks.
You can't win, boss. It's no use.
You know what my girl used to say to me? She used to say:
"You can't fight nature, baby.
You can't fight nature. "
She always said everything twice.
So I didn't. So I got married.
So you don't fight nature anymore.
You fight your wife.
Oh, you're so right.
Oh, Ben, there's something
I wanna talk to you about.
Would you mind raising your chin, please?
Would you lift your right hand a little?
Thank you. That's it.
You know, I'm here on my vacation.
You doing anything special tonight?
I certainly am doing something special tonight.
- No harm in trying.
- No harm at all.
I've been trying for years.
- Hold it, please. Hold it.
- Mm-hm.
Julie, telephone.
In the booth.
Telephone, Julie.
Oh, excuse me.
Hello?
Barry. Well, how are you?
I just got back from where? Africa?
Look, Barry, I-
I can't hear you. Hold on a moment.
There. Now...
...hello, Barry.
Well, I'm sorry.
Well, I'll write to you and explain.
You're not in New York? Where are you?
Where? I haven't the slightest idea.
I see a few cows.
One of them has black spots, if that means anything to you.
Look out.
If you still wanna know where I am,
I could be more specific.
Ha-ha. I'm in a ditch.
Oh, Barry, be sensible.
Listen, there's something
I've just got to tell you. I-
Oh, gotta go. Goodbye.
Now, remember, now, you're hard to get, huh?
Don't worry,
I won't say yes till he asks me.
Okay.
I'll get it, Flora.
Oh, lovely, lovely.
- Hello, Ray.
- Is it new?
- Oh, no, no.
You remember the ad for Miracle Vitamin Cream?
When you dream, when you dream
Dream of Miracle Vitamin Cream
I remember. I remember.
Oh.
I just love this house.
Oh.
It's so friendly and warm.
Makes a person feel so, well, at home.
- It's too big.
- Is it?
- Yes.
- Oh.
- How about a martini?
- Fine. I'll make it.
- Let me make it.
- You sure you know how?
Now, don't you worry. I'm an expert.
- I'm kind of particular about my martinis.
- Are you?
So am I.
Yeah, it's too big.
I'm thinking of selling it.
Oh?
I'd like to build a small bungalow, one-bedroom, maybe a guestroom.
That's all I need, really.
Oh.
Yeah, it's too big.
- Well, here we are.
- Oh.
Ah.
- To the expert.
- Thank you.
To us.
Good?
I can cook too. I can cook anything.
Complicated French or exotic Hawaiian...
...heavy Hungarian, and just good, plain American.
Mm.
Of course, I don't have a kitchen.
- Oh.
- No, I don't have one.
I know.
Why don't I come here and cook for you some night?
Yes, you do that sometime.
- I think I'll have- Want any more...?
- No, no, thank you.
Good evening, Miss Julie.
- Oh, hello, Flora.
- Oh, that's lovely.
- Want some of these?
- No, I don't care for any.
Thanks, Flora, I'll take them. Thank you.
- You sure you won't have some?
- No, no.
- Well, shall we?
- Oh, alrighty.
You know, Ray, you're terribly cruel.
You tell a girl at 6:00 in the morning that you have something on your mind...
...something she'd be very happy to hear...
...and, well, here it is, it must be 8:30, and-
- Of course.
- Still waiting to hear it.
Of course.
Wouldn't you like some hors d'oeuvres?
They're awfully good.
No, no.
Excuse me. Hello?
Yes, this is Mr. Lloyd.
All right, I'll hold on.
Miami.
Hello, Beverly. How are you, angel?
Well, what are you doing in Miami, looking for a new husband?
No, I'm still not available. Ha-ha.
I'm having too much fun to get married.
Ha-ha.
Sure, I believe in matrimony, but only for women.
What?
Well, I'd like to, angel, but I'm kind of tied up now.
Maybe next week. What, honey?
I just- Mm-hm.
Oh, what did I say?
Well, I just said
I hope to see you next week in Miami.
Heh-heh-heh. Goodbye.
Heh-heh. You remember Beverly, that tall blond, worked for me in New York?
You know, in this business, you sure have to watch your step.
Take a girl out a few times and wine her and dine her...
...flatter her a little, and pretty soon she wants to get married.
Where do they get ideas like that?
Well, that's not your problem.
Now, let's get back to you.
Here's what I wanted to tell you.
To show you how much I appreciate your cooperation and your loyalty...
...I'm doubling your salary as of today.
That's very nice of you, Ray.
Very nice.
Uh- Ray, I think I'd better go.
Why? What's wrong?
- Well, I don't feel very well.
- Well, let me get you something.
No. No, no, I'd just better go.
- Well, I'll get the car and drive you home.
- No, please, please, I'd rather walk.
I'd really like to get some fresh air anyhow.
Dinner's ready.
- Thank you, Flora.
Where's Miss Julie?
She left.
- You're going to eat alone, Mr. Lloyd?
- Why not?
I've been eating alone for years.
That's the way I like it.
Don't sigh like you do
I'm giving fair warning to you
Look out, I'm romantic
Hello, remember me
- What are you doing here?
- I live here. I just moved in.
Barry, be serious. Why did you come?
Enjoy the Florida sunshine, see beautiful Cypress Gardens.
Meet a lovely lady, maybe take her out, have some fun.
You know, the usual tourist stuff.
Oh, yes, one other reason.
I'm crazy about you.
Barry, it was wonderful in New York...
...and it's sweet of you to come all this distance...
...but I wish you hadn't.
Southern hospitality they call it.
First, Ray Lloyd says you're in Africa.
- Now you tell me to go home.
- What?
- Huh?
- What did Ray Lloyd say?
He says you're in Africa.
- I couldn't figure out at first.
- He did, did he?
I hardly know the guy.
- I had nothing to do with-
- I can't tell you how glad I am to see you.
This is the nicest surprise
I ever had in my life.
How was your trip? Are you tired?
There's a wonderful place outside of town.
- Would you like to go? Come on.
- Just a moment. Mr. Ray Lloyd's calling.
She's gone to Africa.
Uh- Ladies and gentlemen, may I have your attention, please?
I know that you're looking forward...
...to the first performance of that great spectacle...
...our annual winter water carnival.
However, due to technical difficulties...
...there will be a slight delay before the beginning of our carnival.
If you'll just give us a few minutes, we'll get this show on the water.
Thank you.
What's the trouble? Technical difficulties?
- Julie. She's not there.
- Where is she?
- Still asleep, probably.
- Asleep?
What do you expect?
You keep her up till 4 in the morning.
She left my house at 9.
I don't know.
Nancy said she got in at 4.
Listen, you. You know the rules.
Nobody keeps the girls out after 11.
Look, cash register,
I don't know what you're talking about.
What's the idea of keeping Julie out so late?
I haven't seen Julie since yesterday.
And just watch what...
- Who's that?
- Barry Gordon. She met him in New York.
Looks like she knows him pretty well, kissing him like that.
It's a habit she picked up the minute they met.
- I was a dope. I apologize.
- For what?
For slugging the wrong guy.
Oh, wait till I get my hands on him.
You'll do nothing.
This is the kind of a situation
I'd like to handle personally.
Get ready.
You'd be so easy to love
So easy to idolize
All others above
So worth the yearning for
- How did he get in the act?
- Julie's idea.
Great publicity stunt, huh, chief?
Huh? Ha-ha.
Well, stop worrying.
He's doing it for nothing.
I always say there's no business like free business.
You're killing me. Someday I'll kill you.
We'd be so grand at the game
So carefree together
That it does seem a shame
That you can't see
Your future with me
'Cause you'd be
Oh, so easy
To love
We'd be
So grand at the game
So carefree together
That it does seem a shame
That you can't see
Your future with me
'Cause you'd be
Oh, so easy
To love
I'd like to ask you a few questions.
- Nothing personal, I hope.
- Uh-uh.
- Well, what?
- Love me a little?
Next question.
Tell me...
...how would you like to sit in a little outdoor restaurant...
...on the Champs Elysees, spring afternoon...
...watching the people pass by?
- I think I'd like it. Why?
- Oh, I was just wondering.
And how about cocktails at the George Cinq?
- Uh-huh.
- Dinner at Maxim's?
Yes, yes, go on.
And later on, some dancing.
Yes, of course, I'd give my right arm.
Get to the point.
All right.
Well, I leave for Paris in two weeks.
I open in a show.
It'll be spring.
Paris in the spring is a horrible place when you're alone.
- I know, because-
- Now, now, just a minute.
You alone in Paris?
You'll have a girl before you can count to two.
- Yes, I know, a girl in every town.
- That's right.
Julie, I wish all of them were you.
Will you come with me?
Well...
...it sounds wonderful.
And it sounds as though you were talking about a honeymoon.
More or less.
- May I ask you a question?
- Sure.
Which is it, Barry? More or less?
Pardon the intrusion.
Go on, get dressed. I'm taking you home.
Thank you very much, but Mr. Gordon can take me home.
I'm taking him too.
I'll show you a shortcut.
Okay.
- Go on, get dressed.
- I'll just be a minute.
- Ever ride in a motorboat?
- Many times.
- You like it?
- Very much.
Glad to hear it. Come on.
Lovely ride, Lloyd.
I don't know how to thank you, but I'll think of something.
- Aah!
Come here. Hey, come back.
Hey. Hey. Come back here.
Ray, take me back. Do you hear me?
If you don't stop this boat, so help me...
...I'm gonna hit you right over the head with a...
Oh! Oh.
I've never understood how anybody could commit murder before-
All right, calm down.
I've got a few things to say.
- I've heard everything.
- This you've never heard.
I'm freezing, I'm soaking wet.
I'm gonna catch pneumonia.
What?
There's a dry shirt and sweater in the locker. Go put them on.
Oh!
Angel, I've been doing a lot of thinking.
I don't know just how to say this...
...but in this business, girls come and go.
I've never tried to keep them here.
But with you, it's different.
I can't let you go. I need you.
And I'm not talking about the show.
I know, you think it's another trick to keep you from leaving with that charm boy.
Well, you're wrong.
I guess I've been in love with you for a long time.
I never realized it.
Now I know.
Julie, I want you to marry me.
What do you say?
Hey, you forgot something.
You're home early.
Did you have a good time?
Oh, did you swim home?
You think it's very funny, don't you?
I did.
Well, it's a silly question,
I know, but why?
- Oh, it's all right. It's the laundry.
- Oh.
Oh, hello, Ray.
I was expecting the laundry.
That's very amusing.
- Come on in.
Would you mind leaving us alone?
- Sure.
Stay here.
- Please go.
- Don't move.
For your information, when somebody has something to tell you...
...it's not good manners to jump in a lake and swim away.
For your information, when a girl has a date with a gentleman...
...it's not good manners to try to drown that gentleman, behave like an idiot.
It just so happens your gentleman makes me sick.
- Oh, isn't that a coincidence?
- Yes.
You make me sick.
Now, if you don't mind,
I'd like to change my clothes.
- Will you please go?
- Just a minute, I'm not through.
Oh, yes, you are.
Oh, forget it.
He sure has connections.
It's probably my laundry.
Well, hi, Hank.
- How's every little thing?
Terrible.
Would you mind leaving the room?
- Well-
- Stay here.
- Please, Nancy, will you?
- Don't move.
- Say, you're all wet.
- That's right, Hank.
What is it, huh?
Well, when I thought it was you and Ray,
I sort of held back.
When I found out it was that slick character-
Hank, I appreciate the interest you're taking...
...but I'd appreciate it a lot more if you'd just leave me alone.
- Now-
- Don't think I'm giving you up, honey.
If I get my hands on that snake,
I'll plaster the walls with him.
- How do they do it?
- No idea.
They slam the door.
Thunder.
- Oh, I was just trying to-
- Good evening.
Come right in.
Thank you.
Thank you very, very much.
- If you want me to leave the room-
- Oh, not at all.
We have no secrets, do we, darling?
Were you caught in the rain?
Not exactly.
Barry, I know we had a date and everything, but-
Well, it's raining so hard, and I-
I don't feel much like going out, and-
But it's so lonesome having dinner all alone, especially on a rainy night.
Barry, please excuse me.
If you're lonesome, we could have dinner downstairs.
The food's awfully good.
Darling, we don't have to go out.
We can eat downstairs.
I hear the food's out of this world.
Oh. All right, Barry.
I'll meet you downstairs.
Oh, you're sweet.
I'm gonna send you a bottle of champagne.
- Oh, thanks.
- Anything else?
- Yes. A hamburger.
- With onions?
Good.
That's what a rainy day is for
The sound of the rain
On each window pane
Says, "Kiss her, kiss her, kiss her again "
That's what a rainy day is for
- How late is the dining room open?
- Nine.
Thanks.
'Cause we all know
The wetter the season
The better the reason
To huddle up tight
And cuddle up tight
And love you, love you, love you tonight
That's what a rainy day is for
The weather is right
To cuddle up tight
And love you, love you, love you tonight
That's what a rainy day is for
The sound of the rain
On each window pane
Says, "Kiss her, kiss her, kiss her again "
That's what a rainy day is for
It isn't just to make
The pretty flowers grow
'Cause we both know
The wetter the season
The better the reason
To huddle up tight
And cuddle up tight
And love you, love you, love you tonight
That's what a rainy day is for
More. Sing again.
All right, all right, if you'll sing it with me.
Will you?
Come on. Try it.
The weather is right
To cuddle up tight
And love you, love you, love you tonight
That's what a rainy day is for
The sound of the rain
On each window pane
Says, "Kiss her, kiss her, kiss her again "
That's what a rainy day is for
It isn't just to make
The pretty flowers grow
'Cause we both know
The wetter the season
The better the reason
To huddle up tight
And cuddle up tight
And love you, love you, love you tonight
Yes, ma'am.
hat's what a rainy day is for
It isn't just to make
The pretty flowers grow
'Cause we both know
The wetter the season
The better the reason
To huddle up tight
And cuddle up tight
And love you, love you, love you tonight
That's what a rainy day is for
That's what a rainy day is for
The sound of the rain
On each window pane
Says "Kiss her, kiss her, kiss her again "
That's what a rainy day is for
- It isn't just to make
- It isn't just to make
- The pretty flowers grow
- The pretty flowers grow
- 'Cause we both know
- 'Cause we both know
The wetter the season
The better the reason
To huddle up tight
And cuddle up tight
- And love you, love you, love you tonight
- And love you, love you, love you tonight
- That's what a rainy day is for
- That's what a rainy day is for
Yes, that's what a rainy day is for
Thought you were leaving town today.
Changed my mind.
Got some unfinished business to take care of.
Morning.
Good morning.
Good morning, Hank.
Morning.
- Good morning, darling.
- Hello, baby.
How do you do it?
Looking so beautiful so early in the morning?
It's because I'm so happy.
See you after the show.
Oh, that was great, baby doll.
Only the greatest.
You'll never give a better performance.
You're so right.
And it was my last show.
- You can tell your boss I'm quitting.
What?
- Julie.
- Julie.
- Julie, honey, what did I do?
- Julie.
- Baby doll.
Angel, what happened?
What happened? Are you hurt?
It's me, Barry.
Hey.
- Watch who you're shoving.
- Why, you big ape.
- I'll break every bone in your body.
- You and who else?
- I've just been waiting for this.
- So have I.
- Where'd she go?
- Bet I can guess.
Bye, Hank.
Well, at least we put up a good fight.
Seems like I'm always slugging the wrong guy.
Hank.
Yeah?
- When are you leaving?
- Who cares?
I do.
- You do?
- I always did.
- You did?
- I'm very fond of Texas too.
No kidding?
- And cattle.
- Yeah?
- And oil wells.
- Yeah?
Say, is it true that some people have oil wells in their living rooms?
Sure, honey.
Let me tell you about Texas.
Hello.
Oh, hello.
- Why, thank you.
- Are you going swimming?
No. They're gonna take a picture of me.
I'm posing for a lipstick ad.
Lipstick? Well...
Angel, say something. It's me, Ray.
Honey, I'm crazy about you.
Do you hear me?
You'll never have to work again, never.
Well, maybe one show on Saturdays.
Do you hear me? I love you. I love you.
- I wanna marry you.
- When?
As soon as you finish the second show.
- Oh, darling.
- Oh, darling.
# There's no business like show business #
# Like no business I know #
# Let's go on with the show #
# There's no business like show business #
# Like no business I know #
# Yesterday they told you you would not go far #
# That night you open and there you are #
# Next day on your dressing room #
# They've hung a star #
# Let's go on with the show #
# You promised #
# That you'd forget me not #
# But you forgot to remember #
# When that midnight choo-choo leaves for Alabam' #
# I got to catch that train #
# I'll be right there #
# I've got my fare #
# When I see that rusty-haired conductor man #
# I got to find that man #
# I'll grab him by the collar #
# And I'll holler #
- # Ala... #
- # Bam' #
- # Ala...' #
- # Bam... #
# That's where you stop your train #
# That brings me back again #
# Down home where I'll remain #
# Where my honey lamb #
# Am #
# I will be right there with bells #
# When that old conductor yells #
# All aboard #
# All aboard #
# All aboard for Alabamy #
Board!
# For Alabam' #
# For Alabamy #
Board!
# I'll be right there with bells #
# When that old conductor yells #
# All aboard #
# For Alabam' #
# When that midnight choo-choo leaves for Alabam' #
Stop!
# In days of yore before the war #
# When hearts now old were young #
# At home each night by firelight #
# Those dear old songs were sung #
# Sweet melodies and memories #
# Around my heart still cling #
# That's why I like to hear a song #
# Like mother used to sing #
# Won't you play a simple melody #
# Like my mother sang to me? #
# One with good old-fashioned harmony #
# Play a simple melody #
# Musical demon #
# Sets your honey a-dreamin' #
# Won't you play me some rag? #
# Just change that classical nag #
# To some sweet beautiful drag #
# If you will play from the copy #
# Of a tune that is choppy #
# You'll get all my applause #
# And that is simply because #
# I want to listen to rag #
# A... #
# Musical demon #
# Sets your honey a-dreamin' #
# But won't you play me some rag? #
# Just change that classical nag #
# To some sweet beautiful drag #
# If you will play from a copy #
# Of a tune that is choppy #
# You'll get all my applause #
# And that is simply because #
# I want to hear some ragtime music #
# That's what you want to hear #
# A sweet song with a sigh and a tear #
# A good old ragtime simple melody #
"Peter Rabbit was a very bad little rabbit,
"and that's why
Peter Rabbit
"was sent to bed without his supper.
"But Flopsy, Mopsy, and Cotton-Tail, they had ice cream and raspberry jam."
They say it's late.
How late?
I don't know.
They just said it was late.
Well, I know that.
You didn't have to go all the way over there to find that out.
Don't yell at me, Molly.
I don't run the railroad.
Wake me up when the train gets here.
Terry.
Already?
No. No. Terry, this is a crummy way to bring up kids.
Oh, Molly, don't start sending the kids back to your mother just because the train is late.
Steve ought to go to school, and they should be sleeping in beds instead of--oh, it's just not right keeping them up all hours of the night like this.
I want them to have an education, a real education.
They have to learn arithmetic and spelling and geography.
You never went past the sixth grade.
It was probably the fourth grade because you said it was the sixth.
My age is the only thing
I lie about, and I don't add on,
I take off.
All right, the sixth grade, but there's nothing wrong with your arithmetic.
You can whistle
Mandy
doing
Off To Buffalo and count the house at the same time and tell me within 5 cents how much is out there.
That's not arithmetic.
Darn right that's not.
That's higher mathematics.
Besides, the welfare workers are going to crack down on us wherever we go, just like they did in Pittsburgh.
I handled it there, didn't I?
Why don't you let me worry about that?
Oh, quiet. You'll wake up the children.
Oh, Father dear, will you see if there's a dry diaper for the baby in that basket?
Diaper. Is that the kind of thing you mention in public?
Sometimes.
Don't bother. He hasn't worn them for two years.
You know, if there was any way to divide up three children evenly...
Yes?
P.A. Announcement:
The Western track two.
All aboard for Scranton.
Come on, joy boy.
That's our train.
Come on, darling, wake up.
Wake up. Come on.
We have to go.
You get these two, will you?
And that big one.
I can handle the rest of them.
Here, honey, you take this one.
Take good care of it now.
Help with the luggage now.
Steve, ask your father if he remembered to change my berth to a lower.
Katy, ask Pop if he remembered to make the change.
How about the change,
Daddy?
I got plenty of change.
I'll take care of the porter.
He says he's got it.
He got the lower, Mom.
Good. If there's one thing I hate, it's sleeping in an upper berth with three kids.
Come on, honey.
Here's Flopsy.
Here's Mopsy.
And you've got
Cotton-Tail.
And you, too,
Peter Rabbit.
Wait till you see our finish.
Terry yelled his head off, of course.
He still wanted to keep them on the road with us, but as the children grew older,
I finally won out.
We put them in a very good school in Boston.
Poor kids.
And that meant we had to figure out a new act.
You sure had a brilliant idea for that little gem.
I sure did:
Eight beautiful blondes.
Nine.
Nine?
Yes, nine.
# A pretty girl #
# Is like a melody #
# That haunts you night and day #
# Just like the strain #
# Of a haunting refrain #
# She'll start upon a marathon #
# And run around your brain #
# You can't escape #
# She's in your memory #
# By morning, night, and noon #
# She will leave you and then #
# Come back again #
# A pretty girl is just like a pretty tune #
# A pretty girl #
# La ta da ta da de da #
# Is like a melody #
# La ta da ta da de da #
# That haunts you night and day #
# They go together like sunny weather #
# Goes with the month of May #
# Just like the strain #
# La la la la la la-- #
# Of a haunting refrain #
# She'll start upon a marathon #
# And run around your brain #
# You can't escape, no, no, no, no, n-- #
# She's in your memory #
# In your memory by morning, night, and noon #
# She will leave you and then... #
# Come back again #
# A pretty girl is just like a pretty tune #
Terrence was having so much fun that I hated to spoil it, but Saturday night, that was the end of that.
It was good-bye, blondes.
Shh!
Tim, we ought to go back.
We're just going to get in a lot of trouble.
Katy's waiting for us out in the bushes.
You're not going to go chicken now, are you?
Come on!
Going somewhere?
Suppose you come in here, boys.
What is it?
Trouble.
Where?
School.
I don't want you to think that the children have caused any serious trouble.
On the contrary, they're fine youngsters, and we'd like to keep them very much.
I just thought it best that we have a little talk.
I hope my telegram didn't interfere too much with your plans.
That's all right, Father.
We closed last night.
We'll be laying off for Lent anyway.
Oh, isn't that interesting?
I didn't know actors gave up the theater for Lent.
Well, not exactly, Father.
Let's say that the theater gives up actors for Lent.
Does the box office fall off?
Yes, Father. Ours falls off.
Yours picks up.
Oh, I understand, but to return to the children.
The fact is, they want to be back with you.
Did they tell you that?
Well, they've done more than that.
They tried to run away. Twice.
No.
Yes.
Why? Is the work too much for them?
I mean, are they dumbbells?
Oh, no.
Not at all.
If there's something wrong with our kids, you don't have to horse around. You can...
Oh, I beg your pardon,
Father.
That's quite all right.
No, there's nothing wrong with them.
Quite the contrary.
Steve is a fine student, quiet, serious.
Quite an unusual boy.
Katherine, well, the sisters tell me she's above average.
And, uh, Timothy?
Well, uh...
Timothy is all boy, shall we say?
A natural born leader.
Great kid, huh, Father?
Unfortunately, sometimes he leads the others in the wrong direction.
Oh, there's nothing serious.
What I'm trying to say is, the children are just not happy away from you and the theater.
Happy? Who told them they're supposed to be happy?
They're supposed to be learning things.
Well, in any event,
I think that you and your husband should have a talk with them and try to explain to them how you feel.
Personally,
I find something very rare and precious in this feeling they have for you and your profession.
Of course, it's up to you to decide.
Excuse me.
I'll get them.
Get that bit about Tim?
"Natural born leader."
Look, birdbrain,
Father Dineen was trying to tell us in a very nice way that we've got a little gangster on our hands.
Didn't you get it?
The kids are going to stay right here, Terry.
Who says they're not?
Don't act so innocent.
I know you.
You're a pushover for those kids.
Me? You're the one that's always giving in to them.
Not this time.
I'm going to be as firm as the rock of Gibraltar.
The rock of Gibraltar.
The kids knew we bought a house in Jersey, but this was the first time they'd seen it.
And what a time to face a big fat mortgage.
Crash!
Depression!
And the first thing that people gave up was the theater.
And the first thing the theater gave up was the Donahues.
Boy, the things we had to do to make a buck.
A couple of seasons there, we even split up.
# She's not so good in the house #
# But on a bench in the park #
# You'd be surprised #
# She isn't much in the light #
# But when she gets in the dark #
# You'd be surprised #
# At a party or at a ball #
# I got to admit, she's nothin' at all #
# But in the Morris chair #
# You'd be surprised #
And when I say coffee,
I don't mean just any coffee.
I mean Shelby's aerated, vacuumized flavor in the bean coffee, which comes in three delicious grinds:
Instant... perk...
And drip.
# So #
# Let's have another cup of coffee #
Yes, let's have another cup of Shelby's aerated coffee.
# And let's have another piece of pie #
Then one day things started picking up.
We were in the chips again, playing big picture houses all across the country.
Till about '37.
That was the year
Tim surprised us all and graduated from high school.
And we started working out a new act for the whole family.
Katy's love was dancing, and the kid was good.
Steve was no hoofer, but he sure could sell a song.
Our name for the new act?
What else?
The Five Donahues!
Working together, we soon hit the top:
Headliners in a big hippodrome extravaganza.
# Come on and hear #
# Come on and hear #
# Alexander's Ragtime Band #
# Come on and hear #
# Come on and hear #
# It's the best band in the land #
# They can play a bugle call #
# Like you never heard before #
# So natural that you want to go to war #
# That's just the bestest band what am #
# My honey lamb #
# Come on along #
# Come on along #
# Let me take you by the hand #
# Up to the man #
# Up to the man #
# Who's the leader of the band #
# And if you care to hear
The Swanee River #
# Played in ragtime #
# Come on and hear #
# Come on and hear #
# Alexander's Ragtime #
# That raggy beat #
# Gets in your feet #
# Come on and meet #
# Alexander's Ragtime Band #
# Ah, come un zee hear #
# Ja? #
# Come un zee hear #
# Alexander's Ragtime Band #
Ach, du liebe, shee, come see und hear #
# Ein, zwei, drei, vier #
# That's the best what am in the land #
# If you want to hear
The Swanee River #
# Spieled ragtime #
# Come hear, ach, ja #
# Das oompah pah pah #
# Alexander's Ragtime Band #
# Alexander's Ragtime Band #
# Oompah pah pah, oompah pah pah #
# Oompah pah--oop #
# Alexander's
Ragtime Band #
# Come on and hear #
# Hoot, man #
# Come on and hear #
# Hoot, man #
# Alexander's Ragtime Band #
# Come on and hear #
# Hoot, man #
# Come on and hear #
# Hoot, man #
# It's the best band in the land #
# And if you care to hear
Swanee River #
# Played in ragtime #
# Come on and hear, come on and hear #
# The bonnie music of
Alexander's Ragtime Band #
# Hoot, man #
# Alexander's
Ragtime Band #
# Allons, mon cher #
# Attention! #
# Alexander, ooh l l #
# Ecoutez, amis #
# Ecoutez, amis #
# Alexander, ooh! #
# Touch #
# And if you care to hear #
# Vraiment magnifique, zee Swanee River #
# Che che che che che #
# In ragtime #
# Allons, allons #
# Marchons, Marchons #
# Alexander's Band #
# Oui, certainement #
# Come on along #
# Come on along #
# Let me take you #
# By the hand #
# Up to the man #
# Up to the man #
# Who's the leader of the band #
# Come on and hear #
# Alexander's
Ragtime Band #
# Come on and hear #
# Come on and hear #
# It's the best band in the land #
# They can play a bugle call #
# Like you've never heard before #
# So natural that you want to go to war #
# That's just the bestest band what am #
# Honey lamb #
# Come on #
# Come on along #
# Let me take you by the hand #
# Up to the maestro #
# That man #
# The leader of the band #
# I want to hear that
Swanee, Swanee River #
# Play it, play it, play that ragtime #
# Hear, hear #
# Hear, hear #
# Alexander's band #
# Is #
# Here #
# It must be the man #
# It must be Alexander #
# Hey, hear the band, dance with the band #
# They're here #
# Come on and hear #
# Alexander's
Ragtime Band #
# Come on, come on, come on #
# It's the best band in the land #
# If you hear that bugle call #
# That's about the bestest band what am #
# Honey lamb, come on #
# Come on along #
# Come on along #
# I want to take you by the hand #
# Up to the man #
# Up to the man #
# The leader of the band #
# And if you want that
Swanee River #
# Played in ragtime #
# Come on along #
# Come on along #
# Come on along, come on along #
# To see and hear
Alexander's Ragtime Band #
Oh, you!
Hey, it went great, huh, Pop?
Yeah, Tim. Fine.
You know who was out front tonight? Flo.
Ziegfeld?
No, Flo Zimmerman, my cousin from Passaic.
Mit de apple strudel und the lager beer.
- Lager beer. Skol.
- Skol.
Hi, Timmy.
Oh, hiya, kid.
I'll be with you in just a minute.
Oh, excusen me.
Important business up and comin'.
You're excused.
Good-bye.
Terry, have you ever had a talk with Tim about--you know--girls?
Yeah, a few times, but he wouldn't give me any phone numbers.
No, seriously!
You kidding?
That'd be like me teaching Dempsey how to fight.
I wish they'd pick on someone their own age.
Yeah, me, too.
I hope the kids are ready.
I'm starved.
Me, too.
Come in.
Hiya, Stevie.
Be with you in a minute.
Mind if I go on ahead?
Got a date?
No, no.
It's such a beautiful night,
I just feel like walking.
I got some thinking to do.
OK, if that's your idea of fun.
See you later.
So long, Steve.
Terry.
What?
Do you think something's bothering Steve?
Why?
Well, he seems so far away these days.
I mean, he's not always with you.
Kind of like a poet or something.
Maybe he'll write lyrics.
No, it's not that.
It's...
No, it's not that, either. It's...
I don't know, but it's something.
Yeah.
Well, I'm glad we got that cleared up.
Ready?
Katy, we're ready.
Katy, you in there?
Where could she be?
She's usually the first one.
Tim?
Timothy?
How about it?
Fine.
We'll be right back.
Well, uh, don't hurry.
You better bring us another gin and tonic, another straight bourbon, another scotch and soda... and another ginger ale, please.
Ginger ale.
Why don't you break down and have a real drink?
Relax.
Oh, I'm completely relaxed.
Well, this is more like it.
That other place was a creep joint.
Yeah, and the one before it was a morgue.
Right.
I'll check my hat.
OK, baby.
Miss?
Uh, Miss?
Good evening, sir.
Welcome to Gallagher's
Golden Pheasant Room.
Check your hat, sir?
Try it again, a little bit more from the chest.
Oh, you think so?
My vocal teacher sa--
My vocal teacher says it's all diaphragm.
All diaphragm?
Hmm hmm.
I'd say there's quite a lot else there.
Tell me, what's a girl with such pear-shaped tones doing checking hats?
I am temporarily between engagements.
Six months temporarily.
And a girl has to eat and pay for her singing lessons.
Oh, you're a singer?
I could've sworn you were a dramatic actress.
You think that's impossible.
No, no,
I can just see it now:
You as Lady Macbeth.
What a sleep-walking scene!
I wonder if some evening you'd mind--
Skip it. I don't give private auditions.
Number 35.
How now, brown cow?
Good evening, sir.
Welcome to--
Eddie, did you get him?
Is he coming over?
Yeah. Believe it or not, the great Lew Harris is coming over to hear you.
He's on his way.
Helen, take over for me, will you?
Well, sure, honey.
What's up?
Lew Harris is coming over.
Lew Harris?
The producer?
I'm going to sing with the band.
Oh, good luck, honey.
Is this the dress?
Are you sure it's the right one?
He said it was the one you picked out.
It cost and arm and a leg just to rent.
I hope you know what you're doing.
Eddie, will you stop worrying?
I've known what I was doing since I was 6 years old.
Does Gallagher know you're going on, or is this a secret between you and the band?
Sure, Mr. Gallagher's in on it.
He knows I've worked in clubs before.
But how can you go on and sing with a strange band?
I'm not singing with a strange band.
I rehearsed with them all afternoon, and they're very friendly.
The head waiter's name is Carlos.
He has a very good table for you and Mr. Harris.
And the drinks are on the house.
Carlos is in on it, too?
Of course. He's even going to make the waiters stop serving while I sing, and he's very friendly, too.
I have been an agent for a good many years, but this is the first time the client has ever managed me.
Oh, and another thing.
When you bring him back to see me,
I want to show him that I'm an actress, too.
I've been working on a scene from The Cherry Orchard.
The Cherry Orchard.
Vicky, let's save the acting as a surprise for him for later. Much later.
Right now, Mr. Harris wants a singer.
A hot singer!
What song are you singing?
I'm singing
"After You Get What You Want,
You Don't Want It."
Vicky, for the love of Mike, will you forget that elocution stuff?
It's
After
You Get What You Want.
After. After. After.
OK, Eddie. You run down and wait for Mr. Harris.
I'll change.
After.
After.
After.
After.
The girls in the chorus say you're not to be trusted.
Yeah? What else they say about me?
Wouldn't you like to know?
Yeah.
I beg your pardon.
May I please get by here?
Well, if it isn't
Ethel Barrymore.
It was only yesterday--
Please, let's not play any more games.
I'm in an awful hurry.
Must be losing my grip.
Something's happening to me.
You're getting old,
Buster.
Why, you must be almost 20.
What difference does it make how old a man is?
Listen, Cheri, one man in 20 years may still be a baby,
a mere enfant, but another may have lived a full lifetime, seen everything, done everything.
It is not how old you are, mon patoot.
It is the way you have lived.
It's the wine you have drunk, the music you have heard, and the women you have known.
Oh, the stories
I could tell you, kid.
Yeah?
So tell me.
Well, I--Hey, hey.
I'll take the bottle.
And bring another double gin for Snow White.
You know, you're real cute.
Oh.
Well, uh, bottom's up.
You're pretty cute yourself.
Well, now, that's more like it.
I thought you were great in the show tonight.
Oh, did you?
Uh-huh.
You were swell.
Oh, thank you, but you know, you didn't see all of it.
No?
No. We've got a lot of comedy stuff that we didn't do.
Real slapstick.
I like slapstick.
I'll bet you do.
We have one bit that never fails.
Here.
I'll show you.
Put your hands out like this, flat.
Now, I take these two glasses and put them like so.
And?
That's all.
Bye!
Hey!
Mr. Harris' table.
We have a reservation.
Yes, sir.
This way, please.
Ladies and gentlemen, ladies and gentlemen,
Gallagher's has a little surprise for you tonight:
A new young talent,
Miss Victoria Hoffman.
Come on, everybody, let's give the little girl a great big welcome.
# After you get what you want #
# You don't want it #
# If I gave you the moon #
# You'd grow tired of it soon #
# You're like a baby #
# You want what you want when you want it #
# But after you are presented #
# With what you want #
# You're discontented #
# You're always wishing and wanting for #
# Something #
# When you get what you want #
# You don't want what you get #
# And though I sit upon your knee #
# You grow tired of me #
# 'Cause after #
# You get what you want #
# You don't want what you wanted at all #
# Changeable #
# You've got a changeable nature #
# Always, always changing your mind #
# There's a longing in your eye #
# Hard to satisfy #
# And here's the reason why #
# 'Cause after #
# You get what you want #
# You don't want it #
# If I gave you the moon #
# You'd grow tired of it soon #
# You're like a baby #
# You want what you want when you want it #
# But after you are presented #
# With what you want #
# You're discontented #
# You're always wishing and wanting for #
# Something #
# When you get what you want #
# You don't want what you get #
# And though I sit upon your knee #
# You grow tired of me #
# 'Cause after #
# You get what you want #
# You don't want what you wanted at all #
# Baby, I don't mean to make you blue #
# But you need a talkin' to #
# 'Cause after #
# You get what you want #
# You don't want what you wanted at all #
I know you!
Well, what do you think?
I'm interested.
I knew it.
I knew you'd flip your lid over this girl.
Ha ha ha ha.
How do you do, Mr. Harris?
Hello, Mr. Harris.
Hi there, Mr. Harris.
Hello.
Oh, not again.
I'm waiting for someone terribly important.
This is terribly important, too.
I happen to be
Kirby from Variety.
I think the world should know about you.
How about an interview?
This not another one of your little jokes.
Oh, no, not when I'm working.
The only thing is I'm expecting these people.
That's all right.
Why don't we start and see how far we get.
Oh, excuse me.
Uh, tell me, have you had any previous experience?
Doing what?
I was thinking of your stage career, but I'd be interested in anything else you have to tell me.
I see.
Why don't I give you my telephone number?
Why don't you?
I have a much better idea.
I'll call you tomorrow at Variety, and we can make a date.
Oh, it's, uh, well, tomorrow happens to be my day off.
I was afraid of something like that.
Excuse me.
That must be my guests.
Oh, hello.
Vicky, this is
Mr. Lew Harris.
Charmed, I'm sure.
I enjoyed your performance,
Miss Hoffman.
Did you?
Did you really?
Come in please.
This gentleman was just leaving.
Tim Donahue.
How are you, kid?
I hear you and the family are knockin' 'em dead over at the Hippodrome.
Thank you, Mr. Harris.
One of
The Five Donahues?
Oh, you do a great act.
I didn't know you knew him.
We just met.
Mr. Donahue, it was awfully sweet of you to come back and tell me how much you admired my work.
When one performer troubles to tell another, that's praise indeed.
And tell your family while I do appreciate it,
I couldn't possibly join their act.
I'll tell 'em, but they'll be broken-hearted.
I'm sorry, but there are five of you already, and I much prefer working as a single, if you know what I mean, and I think you do.
Mad about me.
Timmy, where you been?
I been lookin' everywhere for you.
I just fumbled, and the coach took me out.
Whoop, that's a cute step.
Come on, let's go someplace where they appreciate me.
Oh, this is silly.
After all, they're not children anymore.
No. Come on,
I got a good hand.
They're certainly old enough to take care of themselves.
Exactly. You go.
Why do you suppose they didn't tell us, just sneaking out that way without--
Molly, that's just part of growing up.
Remember our first date?
Yeah.
We didn't tell anybody, either.
No.
You remember how late we stayed out?
Mm-hmm.
You should've been ashamed of yourself.
Where the heck is Katy?
Take it easy.
Now you got me worried.
It's about time, you big lug.
Here's a taxi.
What do you mean by coming home at this hour, young lady?
You have some explaining to do.
How sweet of you to wait up for me.
Do pay the cab fare, darling.
I'm flat.
Where did you pick her up?
Outside of Gallagher's joint.
How much do I owe you?
6.20? How'd ya come, by way of Canarsie?
I brought her home, didn't I?
Thanks.
Got change of 20?
Oh, yeah.
And for all I know, Mom, he's still sitting there, dripping.
Let me tell you about the one I used to use.
A handbag full of nickels-- anybody got fresh-- clunk.
We used to call it the woman's defender.
What's so funny?
Your daughter stays out gallivanting till all hours of the morning, and you think it's a big joke.
Maybe Katy never went to finishing school, but there are some parts of her education
I'll match against anybody's.
Um, Tim get home yet?
No. Why? You see him?
You know where he is?
No. I just wondered.
Where in blazes have you been?
In church.
Church?
Now I've heard everything.
No, seriously.
Church at this time of night?
I went for a walk through the park first.
Who with?
Nobody. Just myself.
Mom, Dad, there's something
I want to tell you.
Well...
I don't want you to think
I haven't given this a lot of thought, but...
Go on.
I'm going to be a priest.
A what?!
A priest.
You're kidding.
Steve, what are you talkin' about?
I know this comes as a big shock to all of you, but... it's what I want more than anything else in the world.
A priest?!
Why, you must be abs--
Let him finish, Terry.
I talked to Father Dineen about it last summer.
Today I got a letter telling me to report to the seminary next week.
I am not going to let you do it.
Terry--
Now, you stay out of this.
Look, son, you're very young.
You don't understand what a wonderful thing life can be.
You don't know how wonderful it is to fall in love and get married and raise a family.
I'm not gonna let you give all that up.
I've thought about it, Pop.
It's just that some people are meant to be one thing, some another.
What about your work?
What about everything you've been trained for?
What about the theater?
In a way, it's just a change of booking.
You must admit the church has had a pretty long run.
I just hope
I have the talent for it.
Beats me.
I can't figure it out.
# Come on along, come on along #
# Alexander's
Ragtime Band #
# Come on along #
Hello, everybody.
Oh, great.
He's crocked.
I beg your pardon-- stinkied.
Whoops, forgot to remove my hat.
I'll fix him.
- Now--
- Pop--
I can handle him. I've been handling him his whole life.
Is there some sort of dispute going on?
Can I be of any assis--
Can I be of any--
Oh, Mom, I don't feel so good.
Oh, no, you don't.
Upstairs for you.
I just had this carpet cleaned.
What a family.
One of 'em goes sneaking off to a nightclub, one of em comes home smelling like a saloon, and the third one--you--
I might've expected you to come home drunk like Tim, but I will be a Hindu swami if I expected what you gave me tonight.
Pop, don't take it so big.
Steve might turn out to be something really big, like a bishop or even a cardinal.
Yeah? The only cardinal
I want in this family is one that plays ball with St. Louis.
I could take a--
Bath.
Big man now.
Comin' home like--
You're drowning me.
Don't put any ideas in my head.
Yeah, but I--
Down, boy. Down.
And don't come up till I tell ya.
Where am I?
Here.
Give me that.
Will you please, Ma?
Timmy, this hurts you more than it hurts me.
Now get in there.
I'm getting there.
Come on, get in.
Hurry up.
This way. Put your head down here on the pillow.
Come on.
All right, let's have it, sport.
Who were you out with?
Lillian Sawyer.
That tomato?
I think I asked her to marry me, Mom.
I know I proposed something.
I bet you did.
What'd you have to drink?
I don't remember, but we topped it off with champagne and root beer.
I was trying to forget.
Forget what?
That's another thing
I don't remember.
Another girl, I think.
Little man, you've had a busy night.
Yeah. Hello? Hello?
Everything's going round and round, Ma.
Yes, I know. I know.
You go to sleep now.
We'll talk this over in the morning.
Oh.
I'm sorry, Mom.
I know you are, kid, and I'm sorry, too, if I hurt you.
It's just that we love you so much that we intend to make a man out of you, even if we have to murder you first.
Thanks, Mom.
Go to sleep now.
Good night, Ma.
Good night, Tim.
Is he all right?
Oh, he's fine now, but what he's gonna feel like in the morning.
Anyway, I hope so.
Steve, I wanna talk to you.
Sure, Mom.
Are you disappointed in me, too, the way Dad is?
You can't blame your father, Steve, the way you threw it at him, just cold, without any build-up.
He wasn't lookin' for it.
He had different plans for you.
There's still
Katy and Tim.
Yes, but you're the firstborn.
There's always something about the first.
Life's funny.
You raise a kid backstage, you teach him every trick you know about singing and dancing and how to make people laugh, and then one day, this.
Why? How come?
I don't know, Ma.
It's inside me.
It must have always been there.
It's like losin' ya, Steve.
Oh, I know, not really, but--
Then you are disappointed.
No, I'm not disappointed.
It's a wonderful thing.
I'm just not used to it yet, but I'm proud.
Very proud.
Mom.
# Remember the night #
# Remember the night #
# The night you said #
# I love you? #
# Remember? #
# Remember, my love #
# All the stars #
# Above you? #
# Remember? #
# Remember, we vowed to own this spot #
# And after I learned to care a lot #
# You promised that you'd #
# Forget me not #
# But you forgot #
# To reme-em-em-ber #
When do we open?
Where?
Have another sandwich.
Oh, come on, let's go inside.
They're starting.
Showtime.
Quiet!
Showtime! Showtime!
You all get settled down.
Shh! Shh! Shh! Shh!
There. Now, since you were nice enough to surprise me,
I have a surprise for you.
We have a couple of very talented young people here with us tonight--songs, dances, and impressions--
And they would like to perform for you.
Now, this act hasn't been seen in something like
20 years, and if I'm any judge of talent, it'll never be seen again.
Ladies and gentlemen,
The Two Donahues!!
# When that midnight choo-choo #
# Leaves for Alabam' #
# I gotta catch that train #
# I'll be right there #
# I got my fare #
# When I see that rusty-haired conductor man #
# I gotta find that man #
# I'll grab him by the collar #
# And I'll holler #
- # Ala #
- # Bam' #
# That's where you stop your train #
# That brings me back again #
# Down home where I'll remain #
# Where my honey lamb am #
# I will be right there with bells #
# When that old conductor yells #
# All aboard, all aboard #
# All aboard for Alabamy #
# For Alabam' #
# For Alabamy #
Board!
# I'll be right there with bells #
# When that old conductor yells #
# All aboo-rd #
# For Alabam' #
# When that midnight choo-choo leaves for #
# Alabam' #
Thank you.
Thank you very much, ladies and gentlemen.
My sister and I both thank you.
Would you like to say a few words, sweetheart?
Yes.
Thank you. That's enough.
Now, ladies and gentlemen, for the piece de rsistance.
We're supposed to add a new song to our act for next season, but the fella who was supposed to sing it got himself a new job.
It's not as much money as we were paying him, but that's what he wants to do, so we're all for him.
Would you like to hear it?
Ladies and gentlemen, your guest of honor,
Mr. Steven Donahue.
Thank you very much.
A couple of years ago, when we were playing down in Memphis,
I heard a song that impressed me very much, and it's the kind of a song we snap our fingers and clap our hands, and I want you to come along with me.
We'll have a little fun.
# Brothers #
# And sisters #
# Listen #
# You non-believers, listen #
# You better start to believe #
# All you doubters #
# Be hallelujah shouters #
# Or else you're going to grieve #
# There's no time to wait #
# You may be too late #
# So listen #
# You don't know what you're missin' #
# Until you start to believe #
# If you believe #
# That there's a heaven #
# You'll get to heaven #
# If you believe #
# If you believe that there are angels #
# You'll see the angels #
# If you believe #
# I'm not making promises #
# To the doubting Thomases #
# But if you believe the Lord can help you #
# The Lord will help you #
# If you believe #
# Do you believe? #
# We do, we do, we do #
# Do you believe? #
# We do, we do, we do #
# Well, Jonah went out one night in a gale #
# Do you believe that? #
# We do, we do, we do #
# Soon he was swallowed up by a whale #
# Do you believe that? #
# We do, we do, we do #
# Daniel laid down with lions that roared #
# Noah was on his ark when it poured #
# Moses looked up, and he spoke to the Lord #
# Do you believe that? #
# Do you believe that? #
# We do #
# We do, we do, we do #
# Now, I'm not making promises #
# To the doubting Thomases #
# But if you believe the Lord can help you #
# The Lord will help you #
# If you believe #
More! More!
More! More!
Thank you very much.
I hope you won't take this as my farewell performance.
I'm just going into rehearsal now for four years, and when I get the new act put together--
New material, new costumes--
I hope you'll all find the time to come and see me.
Will you?
Thank you.
We're going to miss you around here.
Somebody put a slice of raw onion in this sandwich.
You better give me a bite.
I need an excuse, too.
Florida.
We now take you to beautiful Florida, land of golden sunshine, balmy breezes, swaying palm trees.
Playground of the millionaires.
Yeah. Things were going so swimmingly for The Four Donahues, one winter, we even vacationed there.
Some vacation.
Two shows a night.
Three on Saturdays.
# Ta-da-da-da-da-ta #
# Tropical heat wave #
# Da-da-da-da-ta #
# Da-da-da-da-ta, bum-bum #
Your aim's gettin' better.
I take it those are the new costumes
for the Heat Wave number.
Yeah. Cuban. You like?
Yeah.
You better.
They cost a week's salary.
A week's salary?
If the number doesn't go, we can always eat the act.
Take your hands away.
Those grapes cost a dollar a piece.
Muchachas, we are in the wrong business.
Oh, take the arrangements down to the band and go over the routine with them before we rehearse.
OK, Mom.
If you see Katy, send her in here.
All right.
Hold it, fellas.
Mac, would mind trying the vocal with me first?
Just easy, you know?
When the boys get here, we can take it from the top.
OK, honey. Let's try it.
Hi, Tim.
Hi.
Vicky, do you know
Tim Donahue?
Miss Vicky Parker.
Hello, Mr. Donahue.
Victoria Hoffman--
Gallagher's.
Right.
But he said
Vicky Parker.
Don't tell me you're married.
Don't tell me this is going to be another interview.
Are you?
Mac, did you know that Mr. Donahue, in his spare time, is a well-known reporter?
- Yeah.
- Are ya?
No, Mr. Donahue.
I have a new manager, and he's doing me over completely.
New name, new clothes, new, uh...
I guess everything else is pretty much the same.
Yeah. But my sensitive ear tells me that you're not using quite as much diaphragm.
My vocal teacher is gone with the wind, and please don't remind me.
Ah, dear. And I thought this was just gonna be another nightclub engagement.
Thank you, fellas.
I couldn't have said it any better myself.
Would you mind terribly if we got on with the rehearsal?
Of course not.
You go right ahead.
I'll just sit right here and watch you.
Help yourself.
Won't bother me.
It'll bother me, but I like it.
OK, Mac.
# We're havin' a heat wave #
# A tropical heat wave #
# The temperature's rising, it isn't surprising #
# She's certainly-- #
Hold it.
Wait a second.
Hold it, fellas. Hold it.
This is terrible.
Terrible?
No, you don't understand.
You can't use that song.
We're using it.
We have new costumes and new arrangements.
Well, it's all set.
It's a big number.
You're joking.
I wish I was.
But Heat Wave's my big number, too.
It is?
What are we going to do?
My whole act's built around it.
I have boys working with me... but of course, you're the headliners, so I guess it's out.
I'll just have to cancel and go back to New York.
No, you can't do that.
What about us?
What about all the things we're gonna do together?
But, Tim, what else can I do?
It puts me in a terrible spot.
Well--
I'll tell you what, forget about it.
Forget the whole thing.
You go right ahead.
It's your number. There are lots of things we can do.
We'll work something out.
I'll go talk to the family.
I'll see you later.
I hope so.
And thank you.
Yeah.
I'll see you later.
Whew. That was close.
He had me worried.
Not me. I never had a moment's doubt.
Gentlemen, the winner and new champion.
Wow!
# We're havin' a heat wave #
# A tropical heat wave #
# The temperature's rising, it isn't surprising #
# She certainly can #
# Can-can #
# She started a heat wave #
# By letting her seat wave #
# In such a way that the customers say that #
# She certainly can #
# Can-can #
# Gee, gee #
# Her anatomy #
# Makes the mercury #
# Zoom #
# To 93 #
Oh! Oh! Oh! Oh!
# We're havin' a heat wave #
# A tropical heat wave #
# The way that she moves that thermometer proves #
# That she certainly can #
What's your name, honey?
Pablo.
# Certainly can #
Chico.
# Certainly can #
Miguelito.
# Pablo #
# Chico #
# Miguelito #
# Ahh! Can-can #
# Pablo #
# It say here under #
# Weather report #
# It say #
# A front of warm air is moving in from #
# Where? #
# Jamaica #
# Moderately high barometric pressure #
# Will cover the, uh, Northeast and #
# Where else? #
# The deep South #
# Small danger of #
# What? #
# Fruit frost #
# Hot and humid nights can be expected #
# St. Vincent, 95 #
# Guadeloupe, 97 #
# Santo Domingo, 99 #
# Martinique #
# We're havin' a heat wave #
# A tropical #
# Heat wave #
# The temperature's rising #
# It isn't surprising #
# He certainly can #
# Can #
# I started this heat wave #
# By #
Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah!
# And in such a way that #
# The customers say that #
# I certainly can #
# Can-can #
# Gee, gee, gee... #
It's easy to see why he did it.
Ow!
# Makes the mercury #
# Rise to #
# We're havin' a heat wave #
# A tropical, tropical heat wave #
# The way that I move that thermometer proves #
# She certainly #
# Certainly, certainly can #
# I certainly, certainly, certainly can #
# Can-can #
Yeah? Then what happened?
Then after Lew Harris bought my contract from Eddie, he sent me out on the road for a few seasons.
He told me I had an awful lot to learn and I talked as if I had marshmallows in my mouth.
Ha. I liked it.
It was different.
Yes, like green hair.
Yeah.
It's lovely.
You know,
I never thought anything like this could ever happen to me.
Well, anyway...
I guess Lew thinks
I'm ready now.
He's planning to build a whole new revue around me next season on Broadway.
I'd like to build something around you:
A barbed-wire fence.
Where do you think we should go on our honeymoon?
What?
I think we oughta stay right here.
Then we wouldn't waste all that time traveling, and, besides, they tell me the rainy season's coming on.
I really have to go, Tim.
It's getting late.
Why don't we get a sandwich at the hotel?
I'm hungry.
We just had spaghetti at the other place.
You bought me breadsticks, remember?
Huh? Yeah. I forgot.
Well, when we're married, we won't eat out.
We'll bake our own breadsticks.
Grow our own wheat?
Sure. With a large family, you gotta cut corners.
Just how large a family are you planning?
Oh, quartet:
Baritone, tenor, soprano, alto.
You like the script so far?
You left out a very important part:
The menace.
Oh, we don't need one.
We'll keep it light and airy.
What if your heroine is a career woman, gonna fight her way to the top, no matter what?
Then I'll clear the path for her.
Why, I'm... trustworthy, loyal, helpful, friendly, courteous, kind, obedient, cheerful, thrifty, brave, clean, and reverent, and we could start a fire without rubbing two sticks together.
What do you say, baby?
Don't call us.
We'll call you.
Good night, Tim.
Is that all?
Good night.
Oh, I forgot to return your breadstick.
I'm awfully sorry.
I'll forgive you.
Good night.
Is that still all?
Tim, I had a wonderful evening.
I like you very much.
I hope you ask me out again sometime.
And if you want to kiss me good night...
Mm-hmm.
Good night.
# A man chases a girl #
# Until she catches him #
# He runs after a girl #
# Until he's caught #
# He fishes for a girl #
# Until she's landed him #
# It all comes out exactly the way she thought #
# Uncertain #
# He tags along behind #
# Uncertain #
# Till she makes up his mind #
# A man chases a girl until she catches him #
# But don't run too fast while you are saying no #
# And once you've caught him #
# Don't ever let him go #
# A man chases a girl #
# Until she catches him #
# He runs after a girl #
# Until he's caught #
# He fishes for a girl #
# Until she's landed him #
# It all comes out #
# Exactly the way she thought #
# Once you've got him #
# Don't ever let him #
# Once you've got him #
# Don't ever let him #
# Once you've got him #
# Don't let him go #
"Well, Mom, Latin and I are finally on speaking terms,
"and I am not as worried
"about the final examinations now
"as I was a month ago.
"However, I'll be grateful for all the help I can get,
"so please light a candle for me.
"Please light four candles for me.
"I miss you all very much.
"Love, Steve.
"Pax vobiscum.
That's Latin for "peace be with you."
Let me see that.
You know, it wouldn't surprise me if he was top man in his class.
Morning, Pop.
Morning, Mom.
Would you like to try that entrance again?
See, I'm your father.
This lady happens to be your mother.
Leave him alone, Terry.
He hasn't got anything straight for two weeks.
Why should he start now?
What's up?
Let him eat.
He needs his strength.
I'll get it.
Hello.
Yes, he's here.
That girl who steals everybody's material wants to talk to you.
Shh!
She'll hear you.
Good. Maybe she'll give me back my song.
Hello, Vicky.
How are you this morning?
Hmm?
Yeah, it's me.
No, really.
No--no--no--no, there's nothing wrong.
It's just--yeah.
Yeah, capacity.
Standing room only.
No, I haven't had a chance to tell them yet.
I--I--I--
Excuse me.
Wait just a minute, will ya, Vicky?
Excuse me, Mother.
Uh, excuse me.
You know something?
I think they're married.
Married? Who?
Tim and that girl.
Didn't you hear him?
"I haven't had a chance to tell them yet."
What else could it be?
No, no, no.
What do you mean,
"no, no, no"?
Of course that's what it is.
What are we gonna do?
They're not married.
Then they're making plans.
You've gotta step 'em,
Terry.
Me?
Certainly. You run this act.
Ha! All of a sudden, when something goes wrong, I run the act.
Don't raise your voice to me!
What do you think you are,
Whispering
Jack Smith?
Come in.
Oh, it's love's young dream.
He locked himself in.
There's no knob on the inside.
I'll complain to the management.
Tell them and get it over with, will ya?
OK.
Uh, Mom, Pop... uh, Katy and me, we, uh--
Well, me and Katy--
Oh, for heaven's sakes.
Lew Harris is going to star Vicky Parker in a big Broadway revue next season--
I got a great title for it:
Something Borrowed
And Something Blue.
Now, come on, Mom.
Let Katy tell you, will ya?
Well, Vicky wants
Tim and me to be in the show with her, so she asked Mr. Harris to catch the act last night, and he liked us, so he wants to sign us.
And the question is, should we or... or shouldn't we do it?
First she takes our song, and now...
Oh, this kid and I have just gotta wind up the best of chums.
Well, I think it's great.
I think it's just wonderful.
Now, you understand it's just Katy and me.
That's why we didn't say anything definite.
Are you worrying about your mother and me?
Young lady, we were an act before you were an idea.
And you, you weren't even penciled in.
What do you think we raised you for if it wasn't for this?
What do you say, Mom?
OK.
On one condition.
They have to take the four Cuban costumes, too.
Molly, I love you.
"Orchids to Molly and Terry Donahue,
"wowing them at The Blue Angel.
"Though back to two slices, still smasheroo.
"Their kids Katy and Tim
"are rehearsing
"in Lew Harris'
Manhattan Parade,
"slated to open next month.
"If they're anything like Mom and Pop,
"look for some very fancy hat-tossing by the New York critics."
OK, kids. Here we go.
Quiet, everybody!
Settle down, now.
Quiet!
This time, we'll take it right from the top, huh?
Now, watch those phone cues, will ya, honey?
You ready, kids?
You ready, kids?
# Hello #
# Here we go #
# No, sorry, not tonight #
# That was quick #
# Shh, yes? #
# Jim? Jack? Jeffrey? #
# No, it's just that I'm languid #
# Well, how do you do?
It's nice to know ya #
# Physically,
I'm in pretty good shape #
# Brother, you can say that again #
# It's my attitude that's passive #
Meow!
Ruff!.
# You know you're the only one I love #
# That's all, he's hooked #
# Bye, now #
# Bye, now #
# Hello #
# We're off again #
# No, sorry, not tonight #
# She's languid #
# Shh, quiet #
# Bill? Bobby? Bruce? #
# No, it's just that I'm supine #
That's a word?
Who knows?
# Physically,
I'm in pretty good shape #
# See? She did say it again #
# But, mentally,
I'm comatose #
# Quick, boy, the dictionary #
# You know you're the only one I love #
# New fish, same hook #
# Bye, now #
# Bye, now #
# She won't get up, she won't go out #
# Baby, what's it all about? #
# Why? Why?
Why? Why? Why? #
Well, in simple
English, I'm...
# Lazy #
# I wanna be #
# Lazy #
# I long to be #
# Out in the sun #
# With no work to be done #
# Under that awning #
# They call the sky #
# Stretching and yawning #
# And let the world #
# Go drifting by #
# I wanna peep #
# Through the deep #
# Tangled wide world #
# Counting sheep #
# Till I sleep #
# Like a child would #
# With a great big valise full #
# Of books to read #
# Where it's peaceful #
# While I'm #
# Killin' time #
# Being lazy #
Wrong number.
Wrong number.
Oh, Sam, you're sweet.
Aah!
Lew, I did that lyric over.
You want to look at it?
Oh, thanks, Charlie.
That boy and girl are just what Vicky needed.
They make her look great.
Yeah, they sure do.
You know something, Lew?
I think I'm gonna marry that girl.
You what?
Don't get nervous.
I mean the little Donahue.
Oh.
# With a great big #
# Valise full #
# Of books to read #
# Where it's peaceful #
# While I'm #
# Killin' time #
# Being #
# Lazy #
That's fine, kids.
Very good. Keep it that way.
Let's go to lunch.
OK, kids, that's it.
Lunch, everybody.
Back at 2:00 sharp.
I'm starved.
I'll get my coat and be with you in two minutes.
All right.
Tim, toward the finish where I slide over the end of the couch, am I too close to you?
Can the bee get too close to the honey?
Come on.
Let's go to lunch.
Vicky, I have lunch sent upstairs for us.
I think that'll be less tiring for you.
We can't take any chances with our star, you know?
Can I have a rain check, Tim?
Maybe tomorrow, huh?
That dance looked great.
Nice work, boy.
Boy, you can take me to lunch.
Come on.
Oh, by the way,
I fixed it.
We've got Friday off.
Yeah? Where are we going?
To church.
Steve is being ordained.
How could you forget that?
Honestly, Tim, don't you think about anything these days but Vicky Parker?
No.
Miss Donahue.
Oh, hello.
Excuse me.
I was just wondering if you were free for lunch.
Well, um...
Oh, don't worry about me, Sis.
Of course,
I'm not sincere, but would you like to join us?
Well, thanks, but I'll send out for a sandwich.
You go ahead.
Be sure and eat, now.
You really looked like you were enjoying that number.
I love it.
But when I got up to the altar,
I was real scared.
The ordaining was so beautiful, Steve.
Father Donahue.
Hey, you know where your parish will be?
I haven't been assigned yet.
You make sure they give you a good booking, son.
Don't let them put you out in the sticks.
Oh, Charlie,
I'm sorry.
Steve, you haven't met Charlie Gibbs.
Charlie, may I present
Father Steven Donahue?
Glad to meet you,
Charlie.
Congratulations,
Father.
Thank you.
Look, I know this is family, and I kind of hate to butt in, but I was wondering if you'd have any time in the near future to perform a small wedding ceremony.
A wedding ceremony?
That's right.
Who are you gonna marry, Charlie?
You.
What is this?
When did all this happen?
It's the first
I've heard of it.
It's the first I've heard of it, too. Charlie.
Well, it looks like it's my turn to congratulate you.
I'll be happy to perform the ceremony.
Thanks, Father.
Wherever you are, whenever you're ready, just give me a call.
Have black suit, will travel.
I think I oughta congratulate him, too.
I'm gonna give the bride away.
Tim?
Yeah. Ready?
I have the evening all planned.
Dinner at Shambor.
Pheasant under glass, broccoli hollandaise.
Not for me.
I'm a simple girl with simple tastes.
2-inch-thick steaks,
French fries, and a big salad.
Then steak it'll be.
Hitch on.
Nellie, what is that?
That's not for me.
Well, yes, Miss Parker.
It's the first dress you wear.
But I understood it was out.
Well, I don't know.
Mr. Harris put it through.
He wants to see it in his office right now.
Then I have to see him right now. Thanks, Millie.
Hey, Vicky.
Steak, French fries, you and me, remember?
You go ahead, Tim.
I thought
I'd convinced Lew this dress is wrong for me, but I guess I'll have to persuade him again.
It won't take long.
I'll join you at the restaurant.
I'll give you exactly 20 minutes.
I'll be there just as soon as I can.
I promise.
All right, honey, but don't be long, huh?
I won't.
Night, Kelly.
Good night.
I still can't see anything wrong with it.
Lew, it's my first entrance.
I have to make an impression, and this dress won't do it.
This shade of purple is wrong for me.
The color is heliotrope.
Heliotrope, hydrangea, petunia, whatever you call it, it's still the wrong shade of purple for me.
Hey, kids, simmer down.
For two solid hours,
I haven't been a producer.
I've been a referee.
Lew, it's as simple as this:
Do you want me to look right in this show?
Everyone else thinks it looks wonderful.
She doesn't like it because it's classic.
In color, in line, in everything, it's different.
It's different, all right.
Different from anything
I'm going to wear.
Let's be practical.
The dress cost $1,400, and that's not heliotrope.
Yes?
Oh. Just a minute.
Did you have a date with young Donahue?
Poor Tim.
What time is it?
Oh, no.
Hello, Tim.
I'm terribly sorry.
It's taking longer than I thought.
Yes, I know, but--
Look, why don't you start your dinner?
I won't be long.
I will. Bye.
- Now--
- Oh, now--
4th round, coming up.
Oh, this whole argument's ridiculous.
Are we alive, or are we dead?
Just as I thought. Dead.
Well, as long as we're not on the air,
I can speak freely.
The time is now...
It's tomorrow morning.
First the news.
The news is all bad, so we'll skip it.
Instead, we'll bring you the musical portion of our program.
I would like to dedicate this number to a little girl who's about to become a big star because she knows exactly where she's going and who she's going there with.
With whom she's going there... with?
Anyway, I dedicate this next number to her and to me, too, because...
I ain't goin' there with her.
Well, hello,
Miss Vicky Parker.
I'm terribly sorry, Tim.
Speak up.
I had no idea Geoffrey was going to be there and that we would get into such a big hassle.
Oh, Geoffrey was there, too?
Well, well...
Geoffrey!
Geoffrey. Geoffrey.
Here, Geoffrey.
I don't see him.
Do you see him?
However, just because
I can't see him doesn't mean he wasn't there.
Of course, I can't see anything. No.
Things can be right in front of my nose, and I can't see them.
What things?
You want me to spell it out for you?
No.
Maybe it's crazy to try and explain anything to you the way you are now, but, Tim, try to understand, to you, this is just another show.
You're part of this business.
You were born to it.
You never had to pound on doors to get people to listen to you.
Your family did it all.
It's different with me.
I've been on my own since I was 15.
This show is my big chance.
It's make or break.
Don't worry, honey.
You'll make it.
You've got what it takes, and you know how to use it.
I don't have to take that from you, Tim.
Why should I?
I don't owe you a thing.
That's right.
You don't.
You only owe Lew Harris.
You owe him everything.
And let it not be said that you're a girl who welches on her debts.
Get out.
Get out of here!
Did you send the flowers?
Molly, for the 40th time, yes, I sent the flowers.
The florist said they'd be at the theater by 7:30.
And what about the reservation at 21 for after the show?
Yes, I made it, Molly.
Now, will you calm down?
You'd think it was our opening night.
I wish it was.
Those poor kids.
Oh, just another show.
They'll be great.
Hello.
Hello?
Katy?
What's the matter, honey?
You sound like you're crying.
What? No. Where?
Well, is he hurt bad?
Who? Who's hurt?
Was there anybody with him?
Oh, I see.
Is it Tim?
Yes, but he's not hurt bad.
He's just banged up a little.
Look, Katy, I'm gonna go right out there.
What hospital did you say?
Yeah, I got that.
Uh-huh.
Now, look, honey...
Now, you stop crying and get hold of yourself, and I'll send Mother down to the theater right away.
Yes, I'm leaving this minute. Right.
All right, honey.
Good-bye.
What is it?
What happened?
He was with one of the chorus girls, and the car turned over.
Katy said he'd been drinking up in White Plains somewhere.
Are you sure he's not badly hurt?
Katy said no.
What about the show tonight?
Why would Tim--
Now, look, you get a cab right away, will ya?
Go to the theater.
Katy needs you.
Will you call me the minute you see him?
Yes, I will, and don't worry.
Taxi. Taxi.
We'll just have to cut it, that's all.
But you can't cut that number, Lew.
That's Katy's best spot in the show.
But, Mom, the understudy can't do it like Tim.
Wouldn't mean a thing.
He can get away with some of the routines, but not that number.
I don't know.
Maybe the best thing to do would be to postpone.
Lew, why don't I do it with her?
You?
Sure. I've been rehearsing with her every night.
I know it backwards.
Oh, Molly, that's crazy.
I'm telling you, it'll work.
I'll have to fake the dancing, but I've been getting away with that for years.
You think you can go out there cold and sell that number with Katy?
No, I'm just talking.
Of course I could.
Why not, Lew? Why not?
OK, Molly.
You're on.
You're hired.
Get the wardrobe mistress up here.
Charlie, take them to the green room.
I'll send the orchestra leader right down.
Me and my big mouth.
All right, everybody, what are you standing around here for?
Let's go. We've got a show to do.
# I'm an old salt #
# I'm a young salt #
# In the navy #
# We've been working very hard #
# I was part of that flotilla #
# With Dewey in Manila #
# I'm a new recruit #
# At the Brooklyn
Navy Yard #
# Tonight we're on a spree and feeling flowery #
# We've got a date with gals and drinks and food #
# Across the Brooklyn Bridge #
# Into the bowery #
# And I'm gonna get the kid tattooed #
Tattooed?
Tattooed.
# A sailor's not a sailor #
# Till a sailor's been #
# Tattooed #
# Here's an anchor #
# From a tanker #
# That I sailed upon #
# When first
I went to sea #
# Here's another #
# Of my mother #
# Takes me back to when
I sat upon her knee #
# Here's a crimson heart #
# With a cupid's dart #
# Here's a battle cruiser #
# And when
I sit down #
# On that, too #
# There's a tattoo #
# Of my hometown #
# To the bowery #
# To the bowery #
# Cross the Brooklyn Bridge #
# And I'm just in the mood #
# He'll be filled with different mixtures #
# And covered up with pictures #
# I can't wait to be #
# It'll be great to be tattooed #
# Tattooed #
# Tattooed #
# A sailor's not a sailor #
# Till a sailor's been #
# Ta-a-a-ttooed #
# Tattooed #
# Tattooed #
# Tattooed #
# Tattooed #
# A sailor's not a sailor #
# Till a sailor's been tattooed #
# Oh, a sailor's not a sailor #
# Till a sailor's been tattooed #
# Tattoo, tattoo #
# A sailor's not a sailor #
# Till he's been tattooed #
# Tattooed #
# Tattooed #
# A sailor's not a sailor #
# Till a sailor's been #
# Tattooed #
Hiya, Pop.
How's the girl?
She's all right,
I guess. Uh... they had to take a couple of stitches, but the doctor said none of them would show.
How 'bout you?
I'm all right.
They, uh... took a couple of X-rays, just want me to stay overnight for observation.
All right, let's have it.
What happened?
Didn't they tell you downstairs?
Yeah, they told me downstairs.
I'd like to hear it from you.
OK, I was drunk.
I was loaded.
The girl didn't like the way I was driving, so she took the wheel, and I passed out.
Next thing I knew, we were in a ditch, the car rolled over a couple of times, and, uh...well, that's about the whole story.
Well, if you think that's the whole story, you got even less sense than--
You know, I thought you were just a kid who got out of line a few times.
But you're not a kid anymore.
You know the score.
Have you any idea what you pulled tonight?
What do you mean, it's opening night, the show must go on, that routine?
No, no. They'll get the show on without you.
You're not that important.
You didn't hurt anybody tonight but yourself.
All right. So I had the chance of a lifetime, and I blew it, so what?
What's got into you?
Who do you think you are?
I'll tell you what you are.
You're nothing, because you've made yourself nothing, you conceited little punk.
I wouldn't care if I never saw you again.
Oh, come on now, Pop.
I heard there's a big crop of corn this year,
- but--
- What?
Corn. H-A-M. Corn.
Did you put in a clean shirt?
Yeah. I got everything he needs.
Now, remember, when we get to the hospital, you promised me not to be tough with him.
He's just no good,
Mother.
You should've heard him last night.
But it's not all his fault.
I found out a lot of things last night.
That Parker girl's been giving him a rough time.
I knew she was no good for him.
You can blame the girl, but everybody else blames him.
Are you gonna tell him that they want you to stay in the show?
Sure. It'll only be a few days.
It's down here.
Oh.
Can I help you?
I'm Mr. Donahue.
My son is in 4--
Oh! I--
Is there something wrong?
Your son isn't here.
He seems to have picked himself up last night and walked out.
He left this note for you.
Thank you.
"Dear folks,
"I'm sorry I gave you such a bad time.
"I think Pop was right.
"You'll all be better off without me.
"See you around sometime.
"Don't worry.
Love, Tim."
"Don't worry." Ha.
That's a laugh.
You start worrying about your kids the day they're born, and you never stop.
Even after they bury you,
I bet you never stop.
Of course we did everything we possibly could to find him.
Went to the police.
Checked booking offices, in case he tried to work.
Even hired detectives of our own.
Once, later on, we heard he was working under a different name with a trio down in Greenwich Village.
# Oh, Marie #
# Time for sleepin' is done #
# The dawn is breaking #
# Take a peek at that sun #
# Sweet Marie #
# Better open your eyes #
# You'll soon be awake #
# Now's the time to arise #
# Oh, Marie #
# My broken heart #
# My heart is #
# Aching for you #
# For you #
# My sweet
Ma-Ma-Marie #
Every place you went those days, you saw more and more uniforms.
Half the world was fighting already, and the other half was rehearsing to get into it.
Even Steve had applied to go over as a chaplain.
Better wait under here,
Miss Parker.
I'll only be a minute.
Thanks, Kelly.
Oh, uh...Kelly's getting me a cab.
May I drop you someplace?
No, thank you.
I just thought it would give us a chance to--
Oh, that's quite all right.
There are plenty of cabs.
I'll find one.
All ready?
I changed my mind,
Molly. I'm not going.
Aw, come on, Terry.
You can drop me off at the theater and then go over
The Lamb's Club and have a few laughs.
And then I'll pick you up after the show.
We can take in a midnight movie, hmm?
Thanks, Molly.
I'm just not up to it.
OK.
See you later.
Oh, uh, Terry,
I came across some old arrangements, the stuff we used to do with the kids.
Let's go over them tomorrow, huh?
What for?
Well, the actor's fund's having a benefit on the 19th.
I told you about it.
They're tearing down the Hippodrome, and they're trying to get together some of the old acts that played there.
I'm a pretty old act.
Maybe they better tear me down, too.
But they want us to be in the show.
You're kiddin', Molly.
You know I couldn't go out on a stage.
I haven't done an act since--
Oh, Terry will you stop talking this way?
It's not gonna help anything.
What are you gonna do, spend the rest of your life moping around like this, blaming yourself?
Look, I miss him, too.
Every day. Every minute.
But at least I keep goin'.
How do you think I feel goin' on every night, working with that girl?
Oh, Molly.
Come on, you're going into town with me.
Why? So we can walk down Broadway, and you can look into the face of every young kid that goes by?
Terry, please.
Oh, Molly, for Pete's sake, will you stop nagging me?
I said I'm not going, and I'm not.
And that benefit on the 19th, just figure to play it yourself because I won't be here.
Why? Where you going?
I'm gonna go find him.
Where? How do you know where to look?
I don't. But I can't sit around here any longer, Molly.
I got to do something. I--
Terry, I'll be late if I don't go now.
Promise me you won't do anything crazy.
We can talk about it when I get home.
I'll be early. I'll skip the curtain call, OK?
Sure, Molly.
# I'll grab him by the collar #
# And I'll holler #
- # Ala #
- # Bam' #
Hi.
Well, hello,
Molly darling.
Bobby!
Hello, Molly! Heh heh!
- Oh, Mrs. Donahue.
- Yes?
You and your daughter are in, uh, 12-A.
Up these stairs to your left.
Thanks.
I'll hang your dress up back here.
Thanks, Katy.
Now, look, when she gets here, let me get things started.
I know how to handle her.
OK. But you know how many times
I've tried at the theater.
She just won't listen to me.
Oh, hi, Mom.
Come on in.
Here, I'll take that.
It's a little crowded in here, isn't it?
No. You'll have loads of room.
I've moved upstairs.
You and Vicky are sharing.
Oh, are we?
Well, if it's all the same to you,
I'll dress in the powder room or someplace.
You'll do nothing of the kind.
I told you it wouldn't work.
It'll work.
It'll work.
Probably won't, but I'm curious.
What is it?
Mom, I think you owe Vicky an apology.
What?
This isn't my idea,
Mrs. Donahue.
No, it isn't.
It's mine.
I think it's high time you two got things straightened out.
Ooh, so that's the plot.
Apparently, my daughter--
You are my daughter, aren't you, Mrs. Gibbs?
I think so.
Apparently, my daughter has the idea that you and I ought to be friends.
Do you mind if I ask her what she thinks we have in common?
It's very simple.
You both love Tim.
Oh, I see.
Aren't you a little late?
I might be.
I hope not.
Mom, I'm crazy about you, but... but you're stubborn, and you're awfully tough.
You can't go on blaming Vicky.
It was really Tim's fault.
He did this whole thing to himself.
I was around. I saw it.
You've gotta hear her side of it.
I'm getting out of here.
The doctor said
I shouldn't get excited, and I'm all worked up.
Be a little easy, will you, Mom?
Maybe I am tough and stubborn, Miss Parker, but from where I sit, it's pretty hard to believe that you're really in love with Tim.
I don't know how to convince you, but it's true.
Then fit Lew Harris into this pretty picture, will you?
Lew did everything for me.
You know that.
Maybe he did have some ideas.
It doesn't mean that I shared them.
There was never anyone for me but Tim.
Too bad you didn't let him know.
I tried to,
Mrs. Donahue, but he was pretty stubborn, too.
Come in.
Steve! Steve!
Mom!
Mom!
Oh, it's so good to see you!
You look wonderful,
Father Donahue!
Thin, but wonderful.
Oh, excuse me.
This is Tim's brother
Father Donahue.
Steve, Vicky Parker.
How do you do,
Miss Parker?
I'm glad to know you, Father.
Tim used to talk about you a lot.
He was very proud of you.
Thank you. He talked a lot about you, too.
That's nice.
Well, if you'll excuse me,
I'll find out where they have me spotted in the show.
Oh, Vicky.
Will you do me a favor?
If you see Katy, tell her that her mother isn't stubborn.
It might take her two or three years to change her mind, but she's not stubborn.
Thanks, Mrs. Donahue.
See you later.
So that's the girl?
Yeah. Nice girl, too.
Your mom was wrong again. Ha.
Why didn't you let us know you were coming?
Mom, I didn't know myself.
The whole regiment was just handed a 24-hour pass.
Now, I knew by the papers that you're doing a show here, so--
A 24-hour pass?
Does that mean that--
It means a 24-hour pass.
Don't you double-talk me,
Steve Donahue.
Mom, I'm not supposed to say any more.
Besides, I don't know any more.
Say, shouldn't you be getting ready?
Oh, I'm all made up.
Just have to put my dress on.
Only be a minute.
Is, uh...
Pop back?
No.
How did you know?
Katy wrote me.
I wish there was some way we could help him.
Yeah. Did, uh,
Katy also write you that you're gonna be an uncle?
Yeah. Isn't that great?
She booked me for the christening.
At least she and Charlie are happy.
Any news about Tim?
Not a word.
It's over a year, Steve.
Even the detectives have given up.
I still believe he'll be back, Mom.
I'm not so sure.
Sometimes I think we'll... never see him again.
Mom... don't lose faith.
I don't always think that, Steve.
Just sometimes.
You're on next,
Mrs. Donahue. Five minutes.
Be right with you.
You wanna watch from the wings?
Yeah. That'll be great.
OK, I'll fix it.
# There's no business like show business #
# Like no business I know #
# Everything about it is appealing #
# Everything the traffic will allow #
# Nowhere could you get that happy feeling #
# When you are stealing that extra bow #
# There's no people like show people #
# They smile when they are low #
# Yesterday they told you you would not go far #
# That night you open #
# And there you are #
# Next day, on your dressing room #
# They've hung a star #
# Let's go on with the show #
# The costumes, the scenery #
# The makeup, the props #
# The audience that lifts you when you're down #
# The headaches, the heartaches #
# The backaches, the flops #
# The sheriff who escorts you out of town #
# The opening when your heart beats #
# Like a drum #
# The closing #
# When the customers don't come #
# There's #
# No business like show business #
# Like no business I know #
# You get word before the show has started #
# That your favorite uncle died at dawn #
# On top of that, your pa and ma have parted #
# You're broken-hearted #
# But you go on #
# There's no people like show people #
# They smile when they are low #
Mom.
# Even with a turkey #
# That you know will fold #
# You may be stranded out in the cold #
# Still you wouldn't change it #
# For a sack of gold #
# Let's go on with the show #
# Let's go #
# On with the #
# Show #
Tim!
Darling!
Oh, why did you do it, Tim, why?
Well, I had to, Mom.
I had to work things out for myself.
Oh!
Where's Pop?
Oh, he's...he's...
Here, son.
Terry!
Hello, Pop.
Oh, Tim.
Oh, Terry!
Hi, Molly.
Will you look at the woman?
You'd think I was the one who'd been lost.
Please, Mrs. Donahue.
We're dead out there.
You're supposed to lead us into the big number.
Oh, yes. I'm sorry.
I'll be right with you.
Somebody give me their handkerchief.
Here. I got one.
All right, now, you all hold it.
I'll take care of this.
Just stand back.
Ladies and gentlemen, first I want to thank you for being so patient.
My wife got just a little excited.
You see, the last time we played this wonderful old theater was the last time that The Five Donahues appeared together as an act.
Well, after that, lots of things happened, and... well, that's just the way it was until... just now, backstage when The Five Donahues got together again.
And because we're kind of sentimental about this old theater, we'd like to do a little bit of
Alexander's
Ragtime Band, the number we did when we played here.
Thank you.
Ladies and gentlemen,
The Five Donahues.
# Come on and hear, come on and hear #
# Alexander's
Ragtime Band #
# Come on and hear, come on and hear #
# It's the best band in the land #
# And if you care to hear the Swanee River #
# Played in ragtime #
# Come on and hear, come on and hear #
# Alexander's Ragtime #
# That raggy beat, gets in your feet #
# Come on and meet #
# Alexander's #
# Ragtime Band #
# There's no business like show business #
# There's no business #
# That's half so thrilling #
# The cowboys, the tumblers, the wrestlers, the clowns #
# The roustabouts that move the show at dawn #
# The music, the spotlights, the people, the towns #
# The thrill of that applause when you go on #
# You're standing out in front on opening nights #
# And there's your billing right up there in lights #
# There's no people like show people #
# They smile when they are low #
# Even with a turkey that you know will fold #
# You may be stranded out in the cold #
# Still you wouldn't change it #
# For a sack of gold #
# You go on with the show #
# There's no business like show business #
# Like no business I know #
# Everything about it is appealing #
# Everything the traffic will allow #
# Nowhere can you get that happy feeling #
# When you are stealing that extra bow #
# There's no people like show people #
# They smile when they are low #
# Yesterday they told you you would not go far #
# That night you open, and there you are #
# Next day, on your dressing room #
# They've hung a star #
# Let's go on with the show #
# Let's go #
# On with the #
# No business like show business #
# Let's go, go on with the show #
If you feel like singing, sing Tra la la your cares away
There's something about
Giving out with a song
Makes you belong
Helps you to find A peace of mindful day
If you feel like humming, hum
Fiddle dee-dee-da-dee dum
Supposing you do-re-mi slightly off key
Everyone can't be a Bing
Tell your friends to go places
If they start making faces
If you feel like singing, sing
There's something about
Giving out with a song
Makes you belong
Helps you to find A peace of mindful day
Just look in the mirror And do a duet
And raise your voices aloft
Don't move out of your dwelling
If your neighbors start yelling
If you can't sing good Sing soft
When your luck is in need of repair
Don't you care
Anyone who feels chipper Will chirp out like a whippoorwill
It mustrt necessarily be any anniversary
Or be an extra-special event
If you feel like singing, sing
Tra-la-la fiddle dee tra-la-la
Sing to your heart's content
If you feel like singing, sing
- Good morning, Es.
- Never mind the bed now.
Frank and Zeb are waiting to see you. In their Sunday clothes.
- Sunday clothes?
- Hats and all.
- What for?
- Well, you can't put it on me.
You know them. Never tell me nothing.
Just stand around acting mysterious.
Good morning, Zeb, Frank.
- It's a beautiful day, isn't it?
- Yep.
- Are you going someplace?
- Yep.
You see, we figured, that is my brother and me, now that the planting's done...
...we were going to run along down to
Hartford way and get us a job in a factory.
- You're quitting without giving a notice?
- Wait a minute. Wait a minute.
Why, you two worked this farm for my father.
And for his father before him.
You know how much I need you.
Your grandpa paid us and your pa too. But you ain't, Miss Jane.
I know, but how could I? We haven't had a decent crop for three years.
You can't say you ain't been eating good, can you?
No, but Zeb won't be able to eat at all unless he gets his new teeth.
Takes money.
We're gonna have a fine crop this year. Everything points to it.
And I'll make it up to you. You know that.
I've got to have my teeth.
We don't doubt your intentions, Miss Jane.
But we made up our mind.
- We're set on it. Bye.
- Wait a minute.
Wait. Just a minute.
It's car fare, anyway.
Watch Bessie careful-like.
She ought to calve pretty soon.
Hope it's a heifer.
Don't slam the door.
Traitors!
I been expecting something like this for a long time.
Each got one shifty eye, them two.
- Ever notice?
- Oh, I don't blame them.
I wouldn't blame you if you left too.
Me? Where'd I'd leave to?
If we're gonna be two women alone on this farm...
...we better get that old shotgun ready for snoopers.
Next time to town, get some blanks, will you?
Blanks? Why blanks?
If any mars gonna snoop around me, I don't want to kill him. Just stun him.
Oh, Es, what would I do without you?
Anyway, we're not just two women alone.
Abigail will be here this afternoon.
How long will she stay this time?
That sister of yours is the reason this farm's in trouble.
Bringing money out for college and not finishing.
- Then painting lessons and drawing lessons.
- I know.
Abby had to have her chance though, Es.
You wait and see. When she finds we're in trouble, she'll pitch in.
How about field work and heavy work? Women can't do that.
Get a jar of that new marmalade, will you?
I want to see how it compares with what I made last year.
Yes, they can. We could do the heavy work if we had a tractor.
- A tractor?
- I'm going into Wingait Falls.
If Abigail comes while I'm out don't tell her anything yet.
A tractor? It seems to me tractors cost money!
Hi, Orv.
You're here awfully early. Good morning, Jane.
Good morning. Oh, aren't you feeling well?
It's my allergy again.
It's that new clover seed.
- It's attacking my sinuses.
- Oh, I'm sorry.
Getting the barn ready for tomorrow night?
Well, I haven't had time to put any decorations up yet.
I was gonna come over tonight and help you blow up the balloons, but...
- I don't think I better.
- I don't think you better.
You got anything special on your mind, Jane?
Yeah. I need a few things.
I'll get my order blanks.
They're right over here.
- Some baling wire.
- Baling wire?
And...
...I need some of that clover seed. I'm sorry...
Clover seed.
And some paint. Red paint.
- Gallon?
- Yeah.
A bucket of paint.
And some thumbtacks.
Thumbtacks.
And a tractor.
And a tract...
Zeb and Frank quit this morning. And
I'll never get the crops in by myself.
- But if I had a tractor...
- Do you know what it costs?
I know, but I could have everything paid off by harvest time. Look.
This is the kind I want.
- They're very expensive.
- But, Orv, it's so important.
I'd better speak to Dad about this. He'd... He'd...
All right.
Not that there'd be any trouble, you understand. It's just that...
You wait...
Yeah, what do you want?
- Speak up.
- It's Jane.
What does she want?
What does she want? What?
A tractor?!
- She's outside.
- Why didn't you tell me? Go on, let her in.
All right, Dad. Jane.
- Good morning, Jane.
- Good morning.
- Come in. Sit down.
- Thank you.
- I suppose Orville has told you about...
- Oh, yes, yes, yes.
- Zeb and Frank quit this morning...
- I'm going to talk to you just like a father.
I'll be your father someday.
Now, Jane, running a farm isn't womars work.
Why don't you put the burden where it belongs?
- But Mr...
- I know how you feel about your farm.
Why shouldn't I? Why, my forefathers got the second land grant in this area.
Just one year after your people.
Why, our folks built this part of the country with their bare hands.
That's why I've always dreamed of you and Orville. The Falburys, the Wingaits.
Carrying on our heritage.
- I understand...
- You know how Orville feels about you.
Why, he's been in love with you ever since you both were that high.
And each year he's loved you more.
Havert you, Orv?
- I said you love Jane.
- She knows that, Dad.
Mr. Wingait, Orville and I can't get married just yet.
I mean, how would it look?
I owe the store so much.
The debt's cleared off the books. A wedding present.
Oh, no, Mr. Wingait.
I can't accept that.
I mean, I think you're terribly kind, but...
But no.
No, Orv and I will just have to wait until I work my farm free of debt.
Yup, you're a Falbury, all right.
When would you like that tractor?
Oh, Mr. Wingait. Could
I get it right away?
- Go on and pick it out.
- Oh, well, thank you so much.
That's wonderful. Can you drive the truck back tomorrow?
- Sure, Jane.
- All right. Goodbye.
- Goodbye, Mr. Wingait.
- Goodbye. See you at the dance.
Well, go on. Help her.
All right. Don't I ever do anything right here?
No.
- Nose drops.
- Nose drops.
- Howdy, neighbor
- Howdy, neighbor
Happy harvest
May your 40 acres Soon be fields of clover
Yes, indeed, and plant a wish
With every seed and by and by
The sun and rain will make an etching
Of a million little green fingers Stretching to the sky
Howdy, neighbor
- Howdy, neighbor.
- Happy harvest
Get your rocking chairs
For all your cares are over
Clap your hands and lick your chops
Your bumper crops are on the climb
Hey, we're gonna roll in plenty Spend a five or 10 or 20
And those happy harvest bells Are gonna chime
Remember, neighbor When you work for Mother Nature
You get paid by Father Time
Chicks are gonna cackle
And every burlap sack'll be
Full of taters and tobaccos
And dozens of different
Good and healthy greens
- Do tell.
- And if the weatherman won't upset us
Mister, you can bet us
There'll be lots of crispy lettuce In your jeans
Corn and taters, you can bet us, Ripe tomatoes, crispy lettuce in your jeans
Begin to live And find out just what living means
- Howdy, neighbor
- Howdy, neighbor
- Happy harvest
- Happy harvest
May your 40 acres Soon be fields of clover
- Yes, indeed
- Go on, puff your corncob pipes
And no more gripes And no more groans
No mortgages or loans
And you won't see a trace of worrying
On the face of Farmer Jones
- Howdy, neighbor
- Howdy, neighbor
- Happy harvest
- Happy harvest
Get your rocking chairs
For all your cares are over
Clap your hands and lick your chops
Your bumper crops are on the climb
Hey, we're gonna roll in plenty Spend a five or 10 or 20
And those happy harvest bells Are gonna chime
Remember, neighbor When you work for Mother Nature
You get paid by Father Time
Hey, give me a hand with these flats.
You! Young lady...
- Wait. Stop that.
- Heave ho. Heave ho. Heave ho.
Oh, wait a minute. Whoa.
Whoa, you slime, whoa!
What's going on here? What are you doing up there?
I'm looking for a needle. It's the
"needle in the haystack" bit. Funny?
- I love you!
- What?
- Love you...
- Leave me alone.
Impetuous little fool.
No, don't turn your back.
- I want to remember you as you are.
- Now, wait.
Here, this goes in the house. Hey, Herb...
- Oh, excuse me.
- Hey, Joe, where do we put these flats?
Oh, Herb, come on.
Give us a hand here.
- Now, wait just a minute.
- Fred.
That's my barn.
Quiet!
What are you doing in my barn?
- Your barn?
- Yes!
You're Jane. Hello, I'm Joe
Ross. Say, this setup's perfect.
- Wait till we get the stage, you'll love it.
- A stage? For what?
For the show, my show, Fall in Love.
Mr. Ross, I don't know anything about you or your show.
Will you tell these people here there's been some kind of mistake and go away?
You mean you didn't...?
Didrt Abigail write you?
Abigail? What's Abigail got to do with this?
Jane!
- Jane.
- Abby.
It's wonderful to be home again.
- This is Joe Ross. He's directing the show.
- We've met.
- My sister.
- Abigail...
...did you ask all these people here?
Of course, darling.
And isn't it wonderful?
A musical show in our barn.
Oh, wait till you see my part.
- It's wonderful, isn't it, Joe?
- Yeah, sure.
Abigail, I'd like to talk to you inside.
Didrt you tell her were coming?
Well, not exactly, Joe. I thought it would be sort of fun if we surprised her.
- We surprised her, all right.
- Oh, now, Joe, don't worry.
I'll take care of everything.
It'll be all right.
Abig...?
Let's go in here for a minute.
You still haven't gotten the new curtains for the parlor.
No. I've been pretty busy.
Abigail...
...start from the beginning, huh?
- Well, after I flunked out of art school, I...
- Yes, I felt bad about that.
Oh, darling, I'm sorry. But all my friends said I should go on the stage.
- That's where I met Joe.
- On the stage?
- No. You see, he, we...
- Where?
In a drugstore on Broadway.
But, Jane, it was really very romantic.
We were both having a sandwich...
...and he... Well, he began to talk to me and he asked me if I could sing.
The next thing I know, I'm rehearsing with his show.
Look, Abigail, you just can't bring all these people here. It...
You don't understand. You see, Joe needed a place to try out the show.
A place where producers could see it. We couldn't find anything.
Well, I suggested our barn.
Our barn, just sitting here.
Abigail, darling, this is a farm. This isn't Broadway.
These people just don't belong here. They wouldn't fit in.
Once you get to know them, they're wonderful.
- I'm sure they're...
- They won't be any trouble.
You won't even know they're around.
- Really, darling...
- This must be Mr. Keath.
- Another one?
- Oh, he's our name.
- Name?
- A name people know.
You have to have a star in the lead. Hi.
Abig...!
And this is the most fascinating place. However did you find it?
- How do you like this? The bellhop bit.
- Wait.
- What?
- This is Harrison Keath. My sister, Jane.
- How do you do?
- A very talented lady here, Miss Falbury.
And a lovely old house, so utterly quaint. Which is my room, please?
- No, Abigail. Abigail...
- I'll have tea in my room in half an hour.
In your room...? Wait a minute.
- Tea girl, quickly! To the galley.
- But...
- Your face is familiar.
- Just a moment.
- Where are you going?
- Upstairs.
No, you're not. You take your bags outside.
Oh, these aren't mine.
They're Abigail's.
Well, Mr. Ross, will you come in here, please?
Mr. Ross...
...my sister is apt to be very enthusiastic.
At times, it gets the better of her judgment.
She should never have invited you. You all have to leave.
- Have to leave?
- I'm sorry. My farm is important to me.
I've got hard work to do here. Serious work.
You are gonna have to find some other place to play.
- Play?
- That's what it is, playing.
- I've got a harvest...
- Wait a minute!
What makes you think putting a show is a lot of laughs? You ought to try it.
- Mr. Ross...
- Try rehearsing all day...
...knocking yourself out in the same routine, doing them in your sleep.
That's what these kids have been doing.
In empty warehouses, garages, any place they could find.
Your barn looked like a great break.
So we put all the money we had in second-hand sets and costumes.
Now you want me to tell them it's no go, deal's off.
I made no deal, Mr. Ross.
- Abigail told me...
- I run this farm.
I don't mean you have to drive back tonight. You can all sleep in the barn.
But tomorrow you have to leave.
Dinner's at 6:30.
There'll be 24 for dinner, Esme.
Twenty-four!
Would you pass the potatoes, please?
All this very much reminds me of the time...
Of the time when I was stranded in Booth City, Iowa.
Very early in my career, of course.
Thank you. May I have some salt, please?
It seems the county fair opened simultaneously with us.
Which proved rather unfortunate, since...
Are there any more string beans, please?
You wouldn't want a rubdown, would you?
Thank you.
Ah, well, as we of the theater say, never become disheartened.
Poor child.
Excuse me.
Come on. Let's clear the table.
Abigail...
...what are you doing?
Darling, now you mustrt be upset by this.
You don't want to be an actress.
This thing is ridiculous.
Why is it ridiculous?
Because you say so?
You say I don't want to act because you're not interested in acting.
I notice you're doing what interests you.
You like farming, so you expect me to like it.
But it's not fair. I wanna make something of myself.
I don't wanna sit around, be an old maid and hoe potatoes for the rest of my life.
I've found something I want to do and I'm going to do it.
And if you try and stop me, you're just being selfish, Jane.
- Okay, take these out with you too.
- Okay.
- Attagirl.
- Mr. Ross.
I've changed my mind. You can stay and put on your show.
Miss Falbury, you don't know what this means. All right, kids.
All right, kids. Listen, listen kids. All right. All right.
Look, rehearsal tomorrow, 10:00 sharp.
Wait a minute. No. Wait, wait. Wait a minute. You didn't let me finish.
You see, a farm can't support a lot of people who do nothing.
Things don't just grow, you know.
There are chores to be done, milking, weeding, candling...
...and I'm afraid you're...
You're all going to have to help.
Now, we start tomorrow morning at 6.
Okay.
Good night.
Six o'clock? Hey, Joe, I didn't come up here to be an early bird.
- Now, listen. Listen, everybody.
- Quiet! Quiet!
- We've got a chance...
- Good night.
- Good night. Good night.
- We got a chance to put on this show.
Now, suppose we have to milk cows or pick eggs or make with a hoe?
- What of it? What's so tough about it?
- Joe, I don't...
- You want everything to fall in your lap?
- No.
Do you want to quit now and give up the whole show?
- Go back to rehearsing in warehouses?
- No.
Well?
I hear your message, brother. Show me the way.
You're wise and good. I don't wanna be a lazy no-account like you all.
I wanna be saved.
Save me.
Save me.
Well, I don't wanna sound like I'm preaching a sermon.
Oh, preach to me. Preach.
But I've heard people say
What did they say?
They said, "The early bird catches the worm. "
And there's a lot of good logic In that old clich
You know, he's right. Listen to him, children. He's right.
There are certain obligations you just can't shirk.
You gotta put the heat on To make the kettle perk
Now, ain't that the truth?
Are you listening to the man?
This is the man who saved me. I was wicked. I was blind.
This is the man who showed me the way.
Took me by the hand up to the glory river.
This man showed me the light.
This man here. This is the man who give me the beat.
This is the man who made me be righteous. This man.
And if you want it to be a good day
You gotta do a good day's work
You gotta dig, dig, dig Dig for your dinner
Nothing's what you get for free
You gotta dig, dig, dig Dig for your dinner
Never was a money tree
And furthermore, my friends, I must repeat
Nobody's living down on Easy Street
And if you wanna owe for groceries
You're gonna get An awful lot of "No, sirees"
You gotta dig, dig, dig Dig for a dollar
'Tain't as simple as you think
You can't purloin a sirloin Or the butcher'll put you in the clink
You just can't be a lazy bird
You gotta get off of your twig
So you can afford Your room and your board
And it's nice to have the price of a cig
Hey, you gotta pay the fiddler man If you wanna do a jig
You gotta be as busy as a bee To be a Mister B-I-G
And if you want some dig-dig-dignity
You gotta dig, dig, dig
Dig, dig for your dinner
- Dig, dig, dig, dig, dig
- Hear him talking to you
- Dig, brother, dig
- That's the spirit, brother
- Dig, brother, dig
- Join the chorus, brothers
Dig, brother dig, brother
Dig, dig, dig, dig, dig
That's right You gotta see the light
You gotta pull your load
You gotta dig the ground
You gotta get it hoed
- You gotta pitch right in or hit the road
- Save me!
You're saved
You gotta feed the chickens Gotta milk the cow
You gotta stack the hay
You gotta push the plow
You gotta feed, milk, stack, push The time is now
And dig, dig, dig, dig, dig
You gotta pull the weeds
You gotta rope the steer
You gotta bag the tiger
Gotta shoot the deer
- You gotta see your dentist twice a year
- And dig, dig, dig, dig
- Dig, brother, dig
- I been digging, brother
Dig, brother, dig
Up there?
Dig, brother, dig, brother
Dig
Dig
Dig, dig
Dig, dig, dig, dig, dig!
Dig for your dinner It's harder than you think
Purloin a sirloin And you wind up in the clink
You just can't be a lazy bird
You gotta get off of your twig
So you'll afford your room and board And it's nice to buy a cig
Say, you got to pay that fiddler man If you wanna do a jig
Be as busy as a bee
Be a
Mr. B-I-G
If you want dig-dig-dignity
Dig, brother, dig
Dig, brother, dig
Dig, brother, dig
Dig
Dig
Dig
Dig, dig, dig, dig Dig for your dinner
Dig, dig, dig, dig, dig
Dig!
On our feet. On our feet. Hit the floor.
On our feet.
Joe.
Good morning. Good morning. Did you have a good night's rest?
You three girls weed the truck garden.
You can each get a hoe over there.
And you two clean the pen, feed the pigs. Right over there.
Clean the henouse and feed the chickens.
I'll bring the grain in a minute.
Separate the cream, give the skim milk to the hogs.
You better help her. No, it's over that way. That's right.
- Do you know how to milk cows?
- Sure.
Well, you'll find the pails in the milk house. You'd better oil the harness.
Come on. Pretty piggy. Here, piggy.
Here, piggy. Piggy, piggy. Come on.
All right.
Pig, pig, pig, pig, pig. That's right.
All right, chickens.
Hey, chickens. Look what I got.
- Hey, chicken. Here, chick...
- Here, chick, chick. Here chick, chick, chick.
Here, chick, chick, chick.
Here, chick. Here, chick, chick, chick.
Chick. All right, here.
Here, chick. Chick, chick.
Say, I think this is gonna work out all right.
At least we got a few extra hands.
Extra mouths too. Look at that.
Why not get some girls in to help you?
No, thanks. I'd rather break them myself.
Actresses.
I knew it was going to happen someday.
Either you or Abigail going on the stage.
Felt it in my bones. The whole thing's your Aunt Matilda's fault.
Run off with a vaudeville magician in 1919.
Three months after they married, he disappeared.
Never saw hide nor hair of him.
Family hushed it up, of course.
- I used to catch her out in the barn.
- Hey, Es, look. Joe Ross.
"Those kids have talent," she'd say, "real talent. "
"Never mind their talent," I says to her.
- Where's your talent...
- Please.
Where did you learn to dance?
- Her Aunt Matilda, a real scatterbrain.
- Esme, please.
You're good. It must run in the family.
Here. Try this one:
What's wrong? Too tough? Come on, you can do it if you try.
- Look...
- Oh, she don't have to.
- Jane's brains are in her head, not her feet.
- Oh, Joe. Good morning, darling.
- It's a good morning now.
- Your orange juice is in the refrigerator.
- Good morning, Jane, Es.
- Good morning.
Don't go, I'll be right back.
I think we've wasted enough time.
Have you finished with the milking?
Well, sure.
There you are.
- This is from 10 cows?
- No, nine.
We've got another whole cow to go yet.
- We usually get a 135 quarts a day.
- What?
They'll never do it. I'll never do it.
I think you could do if you tried.
Actors.
Oh, Joe, you're not going to leave without saying goodbye?
So long. See you next Thursday.
Oh, isn't he wonderful?
It's ridiculous. It's ridiculous.
- Hi, Lem.
- Hi, Zeke.
Think the rairll hurt the rhubarb?
Show business? What do you think I'm doing?
- Picking eggs.
Eggs. E-G-Z. - Herb?
- What?
- Can you milk a cow?
- Certainly.
- You can?
- Certainly.
- Look, Herb.
I'll pick the eggs, you milk the cow. It's a deal, huh? Thank you.
I lied.
Well, you play ball with me, I'll play ball with you. All right?
How are you? Here we go. Ready?
Go!
Some of us are not trying.
Just give me one, huh? One egg?
You don't have to steal them. They belong to us.
The chickens don't think so.
Mr. Ross, what are your plans?
I mean, concerning Abigail.
- Oh, that.
- It's only natural that I'd be concerned.
I mean, she is my younger sister. I've taken care of her all of my life. And...
Wait a minute. Wait a minute. Don't get upset.
Certainly, you've got a right to know about Abigail and me.
Here's how it is.
I like Abby.
I like her a lot.
Right now, I'm broke.
I own a station wagon and a pile of debts.
My whole future is tied up in this show.
If it's a hit, I get clear, we'll be all set.
If it's a bust...
Well, I won't ask Abby to marry me on a breadline.
So you see, you've got nothing to worry about.
Who opened the gate?
Who's got my glasses?
Glasses. Who's got my glasses?
Oh, I see.
What happened?
- This doesn't feel right.
- Guess we've got the wrong glasses.
- Let me see.
- Those are my glasses.
- Don't get panicky now.
- Give them to me!
- Have you seen Jane?
- Seen Jane? I can't see the house.
- Oh, you all right, stranger?
- I'm all right, thank you.
You don't see very well, do you?
- Orville. Orville, what happened?
- I'm all right.
- Oh, he's terribly nearsighted.
- You got all dirty.
Jane, what's this I hear about a show? Actors?
Please, no, the dust. My allergy.
The whole town is... The whole...
Gesundheit.
Father wants to see you in town right away.
He says there's a rumor in town that these people are...
- Gesundheit.
- Well, Orville, it isn't exactly a rumor.
You mean that they...
- Gesundheit.
- He's catching cold.
Well, I'm going in town for a while. I'll be back shortly.
Oh, you. Get off that tractor.
I don't want that touched.
- You're an actor, huh?
- Oh, yeah. Joe Ross is my name.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
- Miss Falbury is my fiance.
- No.
- Just thought I'd tell you.
- Oh, well, congratulations.
- We've been engaged for four years.
- You don't say.
- Well, don't rush into anything.
- We won't, thank you.
- Gesundheit.
- Come on, Orville.
Well, busy, busy, busy.
- Hiya, farmer.
- Hiya, think the rairll hurt the rhubarb?
Oh, for heavers sake.
Funny?
Can't you find him a job someplace where he can't do any damage?
- Good morning. Joe.
- Good morning.
- Good morning.
- Good morning. How are you?
Glad you came. We're rehearsing "Memory Island. "
I'd like you to see. Oh, girls...
...get on the train, remember what we've set.
- It's a rough start.
- Surely.
The setting is, the two of you are on an island.
- What'll I wear?
- Well, I don't know yet.
At any rate, Harrison, when the curtain goes up you're all alone.
- How about my pink dress?
- Well, maybe the pink dress.
Back here, there's a tropical garden. A mass of hibiscus...
Oh, but Joe, hibiscus is red.
It would clash with the pink.
- We'll change the flowers. That's easy.
- Thank you.
And now, Harrison. Girls.
Hold it down, will you, please?
Back here, there's a sky blue cyc. White, fleecy clouds...
You know then, I'd rather see myself in tweeds for this number.
Yes. Yes. Tweeds would be fine.
Now, the ballet enters upstage.
- Perhaps this very jacket.
- Wonderful, I love this jacket.
Thank you. Not these trousers.
I have eggshell flannels...
Better, I've a dress that the line is casual...
- Pardon me, Harrison.
- Yes, Joe?
Wardrobe later, try the number.
- Surely.
- Curtairs up, you're here.
- Let's say this is a log.
- I wondered what it was.
Good. I'll get you a lyric.
Thank you.
- Harrison.
- Oh, I know my lyrics, old boy.
- Like this, Joe?
- Yes, good.
All right, kids. Places, please, for the number.
All right, Artie. Slowly, please.
Sail away with me to Memory Island
I think it would be better standing.
- Enchanting Never Say Goodbye Land
Strolling on the sands of time together
Lovely. Lovely.
Time will help us find the love we knew
No, no, no. Next chorus.
Drifting on the Bay of Can't Forget You
Moonbeams will relight
The night I met you
I'll know then we'll meet again
When yester dreams come true
Somewhere on Memory
Island Lost with you
This is the ballet: Sea nymphs, water sprites, mermaids all around you.
Proteus rising from the sea.
Drifting on the Bay of Can't Forget You
Splendid.
Moonbeams will relight
The night I met you
I'll know then we'll meet again
When yester dreams come true
Harry.
Somewhere on Memory
Island Lost with you
Somewhere on Memory Island
Lost with you
Get out of the way. I'll take care of it. No stump...
Don't scratch that tractor.
Herb. Herb, turn it off!
Shut off the switch!
Herb!
Herb! Herb! Herb, you pinead!
If you can hear me, don't come out! I'll slaughter you!
I'll slaughter you! Oh, Herb!
But how can theatrical people help out on a farm?
You don't need any help.
Just yesterday I let you have a new tractor.
I know, Mr. Wingait. It's beautiful and I thank you for it.
But all they want to do is put on their show and leave.
I wonder what the first Falburys would think of using their barn for a musical.
- Well, we're using it for a dance tonight.
- I don't think that's the same. Is it, Dad?
The Wingait Falls Historic Society has held these dances for over a hundred years.
- Square dancing is tradition.
- That's what I meant.
In 1594, there was a law passed in this community...
...prohibiting theatrical entertainments of any kind.
Do you know who proposed that law?
Your ancestor, Phineas Falbury.
I'm sure that in 1694, Uncle Phineas must have a good reason for it.
The reason still exists.
This is a farm community.
- These people don't belong.
- What about the dance tonight?
Yes, these dances are important to us, Jane.
I know, Mr. Wingait but...
Orville...
Please, please trust me. I promise you they won't interfere in any way.
What do you think, Artie?
Maybe if I had a week or so to work on her.
A week? This thing's gotta be rolling by tomorrow.
This thing? There's maybe a hundred parts busted.
A hund...?
Start talking.
- Well, rear axle.
- Rear axle.
- Drive shaft.
- Drive shaft.
- Brake drum.
- Brake drum.
Ladies and gentlemen...
...to close the meeting of the
Wingait Falls Historical Society...
...we will dance an old favorite, "The Portland Fancy. "
Everybody will dance this.
Would those folks back there...
...please move the chairs away because we're gonna need plenty of room.
All right, now. Choose your partners.
All join hands, circle to the left.
End gents over, sashay down the line.
Sashay back to your places.
Sashay in line. Ladies in the lead.
Turn your partners one and all
Half right and left across the hall
Dig the squares, they're having a ball
Quiet, we'll get in trouble.
- Crankcase.
- One crankcase.
- Need a front tire too, Joe.
- One front tire.
How are the back ones?
- Hi, what do you want?
- We want to hide here.
I'm sorry. We're busy.
Come back some other time.
Find some other place to play. Attaboy.
- Hey, that was Miss Jane's new tractor.
- Let's go ask if we can have the tires.
Hey.
Come here. Where have you been? Take that hat off.
Miss Jane, Miss Jane,
I just saw your...!
May I have this dance?
Hey, look, there's Joe.
- What are we waiting for?
- Hi, Joe.
Come on, everybody. Come on.
Joe's down there. Here we come.
Get back up there.
Geronimo!
Get back up there.
Stay back there.
We'd better break it up, kids. Go ahead.
Well, Jane, that's a fine finish to the meeting of the Historical Society.
I thought they werert going to interfere.
I'm not talking to you. I suggest you ask these people to clear out.
Well, I can't. They're helping me.
When you need help, you ask your own people. Charity begins at home.
Yesterday, you wanted a tractor. I gave it to you, no strings attached...
It's the second time you've brought that up.
Mr. Wingait, if that's bothering you, I'll bring the tractor back.
- Take it easy.
- You keep out of this.
I didn't mean it that way. I didn't say that.
I did, Mr. Wingait. You'll get your tractor in the morning.
- Don't say that, Jane.
- Keep quiet.
I refuse to accept it.
I won't even hear of it.
- Good night. Good night, Jane.
- Mr. Wingait...
Well, just the same, he's going to get it.
Jane, you're being silly about this. I mean, why make enemies?
If the man wants you to keep his tractor, well, make him happy. Keep it.
Now, listen, don't you try to tell me how to run my affairs.
All right. You're gonna find out about it anyway, you might as well know it now.
- Find out about what?
- Now, don't get too excited, that's all.
You see, the tractor...
We had a little accident.
- Don't tell me you scratched the paint!
- Yeah.
Oh, it's not too bad. All we need's a couple of parts.
Now, don't worry. We'll fix it.
Artie's a great little mechanic.
No, wait a minute, please.
What's the matter?
How stupid can you...?
- Oh, hello, Joe. Where you been?
- Come here.
I meant to tell you. I was in the tractor,
I was trying to get the stump out and:
You know what I mean?
You're not listening, Joe.
I'm trying to explain, you see? You all right, Joe?
Joe, now wait. I can... Joe. Joe.
- Now, wait a minute. Joe.
- I swear if...
Flipping down out at that hayloft, stamping, yelling, hooting...
...hollering like a tribe of Indians...
What are you doing? Are you listening on the party line?
Those Fliggerton sisters, buzzing like a beehive.
I can imagine.
- Who's that for?
- Abigail.
- She isn't up?
- According to what you call being up.
She's up enough to want her breakfast in bed.
I'll take that.
- She learned such a thing I don't know.
Disgraceful, just disgraceful.
I never saw such a disgraceful thing in my life.
It's just that I'm tired, so terribly tired. L...
I think you should go now.
- Oh, good morning, Jane. How sweet.
- You think so?
I think you should go...
From now on, you come down in the kitchen and have breakfast.
When you're finished, get into a pair of jeans.
- Jeans?
- You'll do a little work here for a change.
I'm giving Joe Ross and his friends
10 minutes to clear off this farm.
Jane, you can't.
- The costumes and lights arrive...
- I don't care about costumes and lights.
I've had all I can take.
These people are completely irresponsible, thoughtless, destructive...
And I'm not gonna have them making you that way.
- Lf they're leaving, so am I.
- No, you're not.
You're gonna stay here. I've pampered you and spoiled you...
...all of your life. But this farm is ours, yours and mine.
The debts are half yours too. And you're gonna stay and help me work them out.
- But I can't...
- Without any argument or tears or whining.
Do you understand?
Yes. Yes, I understand.
What?
What...?
- How did you...?
- I told you Artie was a great mechanic.
A couple of parts, new tires, that's all she needed.
Shipshape.
Don't touch it. The paint may be wet.
All right. It's a new one.
We busted your tractor. The cast chipped in. There it is.
- Well, you shouldn't have done that.
- It's all my fault.
I guess I'm sort of a misfit. I was gonna leave.
But the gang and Joe had cash...
That's enough hearts and flowers. Let's go back to work.
Wait. Wait a minute. Mr. Ross.
I can't accept this.
Oh, I'm afraid you're stuck with it.
What are we gonna do with a tractor?
Well, I know much they cost.
I know that you could...
Wasrt your station wagon parked over there last night?
Look, the way I see it, the farm needs a tractor.
Me, I don't need a station wagon. It got us up here, that's all that matters.
When the show's a hit, I'll buy two to bring us back.
Joe, the truck's here with the costumes and lights. What do we do?
What do we do?
Oh, the chores can wait. Unload the trucks.
- Okay, Herb.
- Solid.
Okay, gang, unload the truck.
You know...
Be careful with the lights. Put the props there.
Don't be too disappointed.
I'm glad it's over.
I was getting awful tired sleeping up there in that hayloft.
You'd better get used to it, Es. They're staying.
- Staying?
- Oh, Jane, you won't be sorry.
They'll eat us out of house and home.
I'll get your dinner now.
Good morning, Jane.
- Oh, Orville, how are you?
- Good morning, Orville.
- I'd like to apo...
- I'd like to apo...
- Orville, I'm...
- Jane, I'm...
- I'm sorry, didn't mean...
- I knew you would be.
It got out of hand.
When you make a promise to Father, it's a good idea to keep the promise.
I didn't intentionally break the promise...
He gave an expensive tractor. And when he gives...
- He didn't give me the tractor.
- I know. I was there.
It was a business deal.
- I'll pay for the tractor.
- I know.
- I didn't...
- I'm tired of hearing about the tractor.
- But, Jane...
- Did your father send you here?
- He doesn't know I'm here.
- You better tell him.
Tell him he can have that tractor back anytime he wants.
- But, Jane, he...
- Excuse me.
I said we were sorry.
I apologized.
You don't know the first thing about women. You never did.
I remember in school. Lots of girls had crushes on you.
So did I. But you just didn't know what to do about them.
Orville, a woman doesn't want apologies. She wants romance, excitement.
- She wants to be swept off her feet.
- That's only in big cities.
Oh, no, it isn't. Orville, you have to be strong, forceful.
A woman doesn't want to be asked. She wants to be told.
Maybe you're right. I'll speak to Father about it.
Thanks, Abigail. You're very nice.
- Here.
- Thank you.
- Give those to Jane, will you?
- Yes, I will.
You're very nice.
Hey, kids, kids. Hey. Pay attention to me. Listen, kids.
There'll be a run-through tonight at
7:30. Seven-thirty sharp. Look alive.
- Alive? We're half-dead. -
Look half-dead. But be there.
- Hey, who's this one for? The chickens?
- Chickens. Hey, that's funny.
The chickens.
How do you like it?
Well, I don't...
I don't know much about all of this.
But with the lights and all, it's kind of exciting.
Exciting? Yeah.
But wait till opening night when the people come in.
Even the air gets exciting.
You can feel them out there.
You can't see them but you can feel them.
It's like electricity.
Oh, boy.
- You really love this, don't you?
- What, show business?
There's nothing else in the world.
If I couldn't be up here, I'd work backstage or sell tickets.
Why?
Why?
Oh, a lot of reasons.
Here's one.
Now, look, close your eyes.
Take a whiff of that.
You like it?
- Yes, I think I do.
- Sure you do. It's greasepaint.
Go easy. That's very potent stuff.
You smell it once too often, it gets away down deep inside you.
You can wipe it off your face, all right.
But you'll never get it out of your blood.
No, it's the same old stuff, but that's one of the reasons I love the theater.
And everything it stands for.
The heartaches, the excitement, the applause...
...the lights, the hokum, everything.
- Hokum? What's hokum?
- Hokum? Well, hokum's comedy.
Well, no, it isn't either, exactly. Well, it's hard to explain.
The word itself comes from the old vaudeville days.
Two comics would come out on stage and one would say to the other:
"How come I seen you at the party last night stealing spoons?"
The other would say, "Doctor's orders.
The doctor says, 'Here's your medicine, take two spoons after each meal. '
That's how come. "
They were called "how come" jokes. "How come. " Hokum. See?
You don't have that kind of
"how come" in this show, do you?
Well, we better not have. No, no.
No, we're trying to tell a story with music and song and dance and...
Well, not just with words.
For instance, if the boy tells the girl that he loves her, he just doesn't say it.
- He sings it.
- Well, why doesn't he just say it?
Why?
Oh, I don't know, but it's kind of nice.
Look, let me show you.
Now, you're the girl and
I'm the boy. Oh, here.
When the curtain goes up, you're sitting here.
Yeah. Yeah.
I'm in love with you and I tell you.
I'm glad I met you
You wonderful you
I can't forget you
You wonderful you
You're like a breath of spring
A whole new thing has happened
And without much ado
I look at you and
There stands love
My arms around you
That's wonderful too
So glad I found you
You wonderful you
Remember, finders keepers
Losers weepers
And because it's true
You're mine now
You wonderful you
- I like that.
- And then they dance.
A nice, easy dance.
It's a nice, easy song.
You're like a breath of spring
A whole new thing has happened
And without much ado
I look at you and
There stands love
My arms around you
That's wonderful too
So glad I found you
You wonderful you
Remember, finders keepers
Losers weepers
- And because it's true
- And because it's true
- You're mine now
- You're mine now
You wonderful you
Good evening, Jane.
- Mr. Wingait.
- We came over this evening...
...because Orville has something to say to you.
- Hello, Orville.
- Evening, Jane.
- Oh, Jane, may we sit down?
- Oh, yes. I'm sorry. Please.
Jane, Dad was thinking... I mean, I was thinking that...
- Orville is going to be very frank.
- Frank.
He can't see why you invited these people here or permit them to stay.
- He didn't come about that.
- No.
- Well, go on. Go on.
- Jane, Dad feels, I mean, I feel...
He feels you should have a definite understanding.
He's been very patient the last four years, Jane.
- You can't expect a man to wait forever.
- No, you can't.
- You mean, you want me to set a date?
- Yes.
Yes. It's not only for his sake.
Orville's greatly worried about you.
He didn't sleep a wink last night.
Didrt you walk the floors until morning thinking?
- I'm sorry.
- Well, Jane?
Orville.
When these people leave, I'd be very happy to marry you.
- Congratulations.
- That's wonderful.
- Congratulations.
- Wonderful.
- Give it to her.
- I've got it, Jane.
- I've got something that I...
- Go on. Hurry.
- Where'd you put it? Here.
- I think it's in my pants...
Oh, here. Here. What's the matter with you?
Here you are, Jane. Here you are.
- Oh, Mr. Wingait.
- Been in the family for generations.
Oh, my, it's lovely. Thank you.
The Falburys and the Wingaits.
Well, come on, son. It's getting late.
Good night, Janie.
Good night, Mr. Wingait.
Good night, "daughter. "
Good night, dear.
Well, come on!
When young'uns can't make up their own minds...
...it's up to an old codger like me to make it up for them, eh, Janie?
Fine for Niagara Falls this time of year, son.
Mighty pretty up there.
Night, Janie.
See you in church.
There's a star for everyone
Brightly shining in the sky
It seems to be a part of our destiny
Every night I eagerly
Watch them all go twinkling by
But I can't seem to find
The one the heavens assigned
To me
Friendly star
Where can you be hiding
Smile for me from out of the lonely night
Friendly star
My fate needs deciding
How I need the glow of your guiding light
I know that you are near
For I am strangely dreamy
And so if you can see me from afar
Wort you kindly
Light my way
Lead me to my lover
Just point him out and whisper
"There you are
There you are"
Then my love, you will be
Standing here, close to me
In your eyes
I will see my friendly
Star
That was nice.
You...
You and...
You set a date?
It'll be soon.
Well, that's fine. Fine.
I think it's a good idea.
Anyway, what I came to talk to you about, I...
Well, you know that...
Down in the barn, I...
Well, don't worry about that.
That didn't mean anything.
Oh, I know.
I showed you a number.
We sang. We danced.
- You're a very good dancer.
- Thanks.
But nothing happened.
That is, nothing important.
So it's certainly no reason for rushing into a marriage.
We're not exactly rushing.
No, you've been engaged.
- Four years.
- I know. Well, I...
I just wanted to tell you. I didn't want you to worry about...
No, no.
It was like... Well, you know, like...
...you're walking across a field and everything's great.
The surs shining and birds are singing...
...and all of a sudden out of a clear sky, a bolt of lighting hits you.
It's not your fault.
But you don't have to walk in the field again.
No.
Good night, Jane.
Good night.
I love this farm.
You know, I was all over the south pasture yesterday.
The acid constituent is too high, by far.
You see, that's due to the lack of silicic itself.
After we're married, I intend to make regular applications of calcium...
...magnesium and...
Jane?
- What?
- You seem more interested...
...in that show than you are in me.
I'm sorry, Orville.
It's gonna seem rather strange, having an actress for a sister-in-law.
Abigail. Rather uncomfortable.
Come to think of it, that Ross fellow will be my brother-in-law.
Well...
...we won't see much of them.
They'll be living in New York.
You know, a couple of weeks ago, I was actually jealous of that Ross fellow.
Just a little silly idea I had.
Before I knew about him and Abigail.
What does she see in a fellow like that?
Well...
...love's a funny thing.
You never know where the lightning's going to strike.
That's right.
Look how it struck us.
Drifting on the bay of Can't Forget You
Moonbeams will relight
The night I met you
I'll know then...
All right, kids, hold it. Hold it. It's still dragging. We gotta pick it up.
Try it again. Pretty good, Abby.
Oh, Joe, not again.
I've been going all day.
We all have, honey. All right, Artie, from the top.
I told you I don't want to do it again. I'm tired.
Look, we gotta do it again. Now, take it easy.
Just run through it easy.
- I don't think we have to.
- You don't think?
- No, I don't think we have to.
- Just a minute. Just...
- You have no right to work us like this.
- Nobody is complaining.
- The number's fine the way it is.
- I'll decide that, not you.
Your job is to do what I tell you and to do it right for a change.
You know, you're not so perfect in this part.
- What?
- No. Your timing's off, you miss your cues.
You don't know your lines.
Don't act like a prima donna.
Well, if I'm so awful, why didn't you get somebody else?
If I'd known this was gonna happen, I would have.
You know your trouble?
You got a star complex.
You think you're the whole show. You're not.
The sooner you find out, the better.
Listen, you're gonna buckle down and get to work like everybody else.
You're gonna play this part, play it the way I want it...
...if I have to drag a performance out of you with my two hands!
Okay, kids. Break it up. Same time tomorrow.
That means everybody here ready to work.
Good night.
Now, now, my dear, you mustrt let these things upset you.
- He didn't have to talk to me like that.
- After all, my dear, this is hardly theater.
It's just a little barnyard entertainment.
Don't you worry, someday they'll treat you the way you deserve.
I'll see to that personally.
- I had a call from New York this morning.
- Oh, Harrison, what?
Something very interesting.
- Good night, Joe.
- Good night, Joe.
- Let's go make some coffee.
- I sure need it.
Good night, Joe.
Was that necessary?
Oh, hello, Jane.
Yeah, yeah, I'm afraid it was.
Abigail's been acting up a little.
It seems to me you were trying to hurt her. Deliberately.
It will do her some good. We might get a rehearsal out of her.
You mean you have to browbeat someone to get a rehearsal out of them?
- It happens in this business.
- You ought to make a change...
...in this business.
Don't do that to the girl you're gonna marry.
Jane, this has nothing to do with getting married.
- What?
- No, it's all part of putting on a show.
Now, look, I don't tell you how to run your farm.
Believe me, in my work, I know what's gotta be done.
All I know is what you've done to my sister.
And as long as you happen to be using this barn...
Okay. I'll handle her with kid gloves.
If it'll make you happy.
It'll make her happy and that's all that counts.
- Oh, Artie.
- Yeah, Joe?
- Let everything go, I'll close up.
- Oh, okay. Good night, Joe.
Good night.
- What's my next line?
- Okay, Abby.
- I didn't want to hold him.
- Abby.
All right. Hold it, hold it, hold it. Where's Abby?
- He's free to go.
- I didn't want to hold him.
- Abby.
- He's free to go. What's the matter?
Abby, we're waiting for you. That was your cue.
I'll never make that, even if I change in the wings. It's impossible.
Okay. Okay. That's what run-throughs are for.
We'll shuffle things around a bit.
- Sarah can take the number. Sarah?
- Just a minute. Just a minute.
This is my number. Nobody else is going to do it.
What do you suggest?
I suggest you don't try cutting anything of mine.
If you had the show properly routined...
...you wouldn't expect people to do the impossible.
As the matter of fact, I think this whole thing is unprofessional.
Obviously, this isn't a Broadway show, it's just a little barnyard entertainment.
Well?
I'm still trying to do things your way.
I'll talk to her.
And while I think of it, don't forget ambers on Abby.
- I don't want a dark stage.
- Okay.
- Coffee?
- Yeah.
- Where is Abby? Isn't she up?
- Es has gone to get her.
Wow! Hey kids, we're in Variety.
Get a load of this. "Word along the stem is that Joe Ross' new musical...
...Fall in Love, looks like a real buy. Six producers...
...will be trekking to his barnyard theater next week for their first glimpse. "
- We're in.
- Read that part again, Herb?
"Word along the stem is that Joe Ross' new musical...
...Fall in Love, looks like a real buy. "
What is it, Jane?
"... am leaving for
New York with Mr. Keath.
He's got a part for me in his new play.
Please understand, this is my big chance. "
I just thought of a wonderful idea.
That stage wait in the second act?
It doesn't have to be. All you have to do is lift the curtain just...
- Who died?
- The show died.
- What?
- Abigail walked out on us.
- What?
- With Keath.
- With Keath?
- Oh, I don't care about him.
I can get along without him.
I can do his part myself.
- Without Abigail, I'm sunk.
- What about the girl in New York?
I don't understand why she'd do a thing like this.
- Some of them sing, some dance.
- Go to New York with Mr. Keath?
- I don't know Mr. Keath.
- It's tough to get a girl...
She didn't leave me an address.
These kind of girls don't grow on trees.
She didn't even say goodbye to me.
You think it'll work?
- Maybe.
- Joe, we only got three days.
- I know.
- Got the numbers.
- Gotta rehearse...
- I know. What else?
- We can try.
- What else are we gonna do?
I don't know.
Jane?
- What?
- Jane...
...you're gonna do the part.
- You're gonna do the part.
- Don't get excited.
- I'm not excited. I'm not...
You can sing. You can dance. And you know the part.
- I couldn't do that.
- You're a girl in 100,000.
- No.
- Take it from me. I know you can.
- No, no.
- Listen to him.
- You can do that part.
- Listen to him.
Again. Again.
That's right, turn.
Come on, get in now. That's it.
- Gosh, I can't...
- Come on.
- That's right.
- I'll never get it.
No, look, baby...
Come on now.
That's it.
All right, hold it. That's too slow.
- We gotta do it a lot faster.
- I've done that entrance 20 times.
So we'll do it 40, 50,
100 times and do it right.
- All right, all right.
- Jane.
- Oh, Orville.
- What are you doing up there?
Well, I'm making an entrance.
Forty, 50, a lot of times.
What in the world is going on here?
Orville, I'll tell you about it later.
Well, I demand to know right here and now.
Orville, this is none of your affair. Just go away.
I will not go away, you come down from that stage immediately.
Come on, come on.
Orville, I've got enough trouble. Don't you start in on me.
I've only got two days to get up in this part. This is no time to argue.
You're not in this show?
- You're not.
- I just told you. Yes, I am!
Why, I won't have it.
I won't have a fiance of mine working in a...
Orville, if you don't stop this, you won't have a fiance.
So just sit down and be quiet.
If you can't be quiet, leave.
- Now, look here.
- All right.
Go away. Go home.
- What do we do now?
- We'll rehearse that entrance.
All right.
What kind of a man are you, anyway?
Your fiance mixed up with a theatrical show...
...and you not stopping it.
You call yourself a Wingait? You ought to be ashamed to use the name.
- A sniveling, helpless...
- Shut up.
- What did you say?
- I said shut up!
Well, that's a fine way to speak to your father.
You've been talking that way to me for 27 years and I'm sick of it.
I'll prove whether
I'm a Wingait or not.
I'll stop that show if it's the last thing I do.
And I'll do it without your advice or your help.
And hereafter, when you talk to me, keep your voice down! Look out!
Good, good, good. All right, that's swell.
Take an hour for dinner.
Your feet hurt?
I forgot to mention that.
It's an occupational disease.
You'd better go to dinner.
You only have an hour.
Oh, Joe, you wanted me to remind you.
- What?
- You haven't done the first act finale.
- You can't make the change.
- I forgot.
Well, I don't know who to put in it, Artie. Let me see.
- Frank can't do it.
- No, he's in it now.
Or Charlie. A big number ahead of him.
Come away with me on Memory Island
Come away, my sweet To my own far land
Oh, Cynthia, you're a gay, impetuous fool, aren't you?
Dig, dig, dig, dig for your dinner
Nothing's what you get for free
You silly little goose. You're a mad, impetuous fool, aren't you?
Come away with me on Memory Island
- Come away, my sweet, to my own far...
- Herb.
- All right, you'll do the number.
- Who, me?
Why, this comes as a rather surprise. I don't think I'm ready.
I have an orchestra in my dressing room.
I'll tune them up. I must tell my agent.
He'll be so pleased.
I haven't got an agent.
Jane, Jane, wait, I've got something to tell you.
Old man Wingait's telling everybody there ain't gonna be no show.
Says Orville's gonna stop it.
- Orville? How?
- I don't know.
They're talking about returning their tickets.
But they can't do that. All that money's been spent. Every penny. But...
Wait a minute, don't say anything to anybody. Be quiet.
Yes sir, that boy of mine is really wrought up.
"I'll stop that show if it's the last thing I do," he says.
And by ginger, he means it. Yes, come in, come in.
- Oh, Jane, you know the city aldermen.
- Oh, yeah, hello. Please sit down.
Mr. Wingait, where is
Orville? I can't find him.
- I've been to the house and I've been...
- I haven't see him since this morning.
It's not true he's going to do something to interfere with the show, is it?
- You'll have to ask him.
- Well, I can't find him.
He just mustrt interfere with this show.
It means too much to Joe.
Joe Ross, he...
It's his show.
- And a rumor like this could...
- I'm not so sure it is a rumor.
You know when he makes up his mind, how headstrong Orville is.
Why, he's a young bull.
- Orv...?
- He's doing it for you, Jane.
A Wingait fighting tooth and nail for the woman he loves.
All right, Mr. Wingait. I'm a Falbury, fighting tooth and nail for the...
For this show.
And if Orville does anything to interfere...
...there won't be any woman he loves.
- But, Jane.
- Tell that to the young bull.
There he is, Artie.
That's him. Jerry Solliman, the biggest ticket broker on Broadway.
Well, this is it, kid.
- Herb, I'm scared.
- Scared?
Don't let me hear you talk that way. What do you mean?
This is it, what we've been waiting for.
Nothing can stop us now. Opening night.
First thing you know, you're on there alone.
All these people looking up at you and then the spot hits you, and...
- You heard anything about Orville, Es?
- Oh, no. Don't worry about that.
My life and happiness...
Oh, I knew this, Es. I did know it. I knew my lines.
What's happening to me?
Come in.
Oh, no, Joe, please, don't you start on me now.
Esme, would you take these dresses out to the stage for the quick changes?
I brought you these.
Not much for a star on her opening night.
But it's the best I could do.
I picked them in your garden.
You mean, you're not gonna yell at me?
Why should I? You're wonderful.
Everything I ever hoped for in a leading lady.
- You people are crazy.
- Sure.
Sure, we're crazy.
Here, give me your foot.
Now, you just relax. You're gonna be great tonight.
I'm gonna be awful. You better start yelling right now...
...because I can't remember a single line.
They'll all come back when the curtain goes up.
And remember, if you need me,
I'll be right there beside you.
- Will you, Joe?
- Every second.
And when the show's over and it's the success I hope it is...
...we've got a lot of talking to do.
- What about?
- Oh, all kinds of things.
First, I wanna hear the story of your life.
Everything that's ever happened to you since you were so high.
And then I wanna know what you eat for breakfast.
What's your favorite color.
What comic strips you read.
Then we'll talk about shoes and ships and sealing wax...
...and shows and farms and families.
It may take hours. Weeks.
Years. I wanna know everything.
Now I won't... Now I won't remember a word.
Good luck.
Good luck.
It's a lovely world
That's all around you
Count your treasures
You are well-to-do
There's so much to see
That's absolutely free
And it's all for you
Don't you know That
Lady Luck has found you
And she's by your side
Your whole life through
Pick your favorite sight
You'll find the price is right
'Cause it's all for you
If you should fall in love The moon is yours
A bird's tune is yours Take your choice
Say, it's an almost perfect paradise
There are lots of reasons
Why you should rejoice
You can make the pleasures That surround you
Like an endless dream
That's coming true
Add up what you got You'll find it's quite a lot
And it's all for you
Don't you know That
Lady Luck has found you
And she's by your side
Your whole life through
Pick your favorite sight
You'll find the price is right
'Cause it's all for you
If you should fall in love The moon is yours
A bird's tune is yours Take your choice
Say, it's an almost perfect paradise
There are many reasons
Why you should rejoice
You can make the pleasures That surround you
Like an endless dream
That's coming true
Add up what you've got
You'll find it's quite a lot
- You're wealthy indeed
- With no gold in your purse
'Cause the whole universe
Is all
For you
- I'm glad I met you
- Wonderful is the only word for you
- You wonderful you
- You wonderful you
- I can't forget you
- Isn't it grand to find what love can do
- You wonderful you
- You wonderful you
- You're like a breath of spring
- Tell me
- A whole new thing has happened
- All the pretty things I like to hear
- And without much ado
- I can see
I look at you
- That there stands love
- There stands love
- My arms around you
- Isn't that what your arms are really for
- That's wonderful too
- That's wonderful too
- So glad I found you
- Looking around I found there are no more
- You wonderful you
- Like you
- You
- You
Remember, finders keepers
Losers weepers
And because it's true You're mine now
- You wonderful you
- You wonderful you
Orville around?
- What would he be doing here, sheriff?
- I don't know. I got a call.
- What kind of call?
- He told me to meet him backstage.
- What's he want with you?
- I don't know.
- Well, where is he?
- Don't know.
- Will he be here tonight?
- Don't know.
- Don't know. Well...
- Don't know.
He don't know nothing.
We get up each morning at noon
And our day is a glorious tune
Of all things unpleasant It's free
We live it, we love it, mais oui
The morning, A scherzo by Brahms or Faur
Or maybe a quaint
Little French rondelet
We're cultured, tactful, discreet
We're definitely of the elite
You wake up in the morning
And the rooster crows
You wake up in the morning
And the ducks quack, quack
The chicks peep, peep
The turkeys gobble
The sheep baa, baa
And the cows moo, moo
You might think it's an awful squabble
To me that's heavenly music
That's heavenly music to me
Some folks like the noise of a city
They think our barnyard songs ain't pretty
They even say it mostly sounds off-key
Still it's heavenly music to me
I love to hear the music
When the donkeys bray
Chickens start to cackle
And it sounds right gay
Pigs oink, oink The birds are trillir
The frogs croak, croak
And the hens cluck, cluck
The crows caw, caw
Gol'dernit, it's thrilling
Aw, shucks, to me
That's heavenly music
That's heavenly music to me
Still it's heavenly music to me
The cats meow The crickets jumping
The billy goats bleat
And the geese peck, peck
The owls hoot, hoot
Now ain't that sumpir?
Why, heck! To me that's heavenly music
That's heavenly music to me
Yes, that's heavenly music to me
Heavenly music
Yes, it's heavenly music
Yes, it's heavenly music to me
Forget your troubles
Come on, get happy
You better chase all your cares away
Shout hallelujah Come on, get happy
Get ready for the judgment day
The sun is shining Come on, get happy
The Lord is waitir to take your hand
Shout hallelujah Come on, get happy
We're going to the promised land
We're heading 'cross the river
Wash your sins away in the tide
It's all so peaceful on the other side
Forget your troubles
Come on, get happy
You better chase all your cares away
Shout hallelujah Come on, get happy
Get ready for the judgment day
Forget your troubles
Come on, get happy
Chase your cares away
Hallelu, get happy
Before the judgment day
The sun is shining Come on, get happy
The Lord is waitir to take your hand
Shout hallelujah Come on, get happy
We're gonna be going
To the promised land
We're heading 'cross the river
Wash your sins away in the tide
It's quiet and peaceful on the other side
Forget your troubles Get happy
Your cares fly away
Shout hallelujah Get happy
Get ready for your judgment day
Come on, get happy
Chase your cares away
Shout hallelujah Come on, get happy
Get ready for the judgment day.
Sun is shining Come on, get happy
Lord is waitir to take your hand
Hallelujah Come on, get happy
We're going to the Promised Land
Heading 'cross the river Throw your sins away in the tide
It's all so peaceful on the other side
Shout hallelujah Come on, get happy
You better chase all your cares away
Shout hallelujah Come on, get happy
Get ready
Get ready
Get ready
For the judgment day
Get her into that for the reprise.
How'd you like it?
Don't know, huh?
- Can't you go any faster, Orville?
- I'm going as fast as I can with safety.
If I hadrt looked all over New
York for you, we'd be there.
- But they're holding the curtain for me.
- I know.
I sent them a wire, didn't I?
Didrt I?
You did?
Oh, no.
Orville... Orville, look out!
Hey, kids, it went great.
- Joe, did I make any mistakes?
- You were beautiful. How about it, Es?
- She slayed them.
- Jane. Jane, I just want...
Orville! Oh, if you do anything to stop this show...!
- I don't wanna stop it.
- You don't?
Of course not. What do you think I went to New York for?
Why did you come here if you don't want...?
Quiet!
- I wanna get this settled.
- I think it's a good idea.
I think so too. Jane, you can get out of that...
Abigail's here. You can give it to her.
Why wasrt she here four days ago when we needed her?
You can't switch actors in the middle of a performance.
- Why not?
- We're going great out there.
I've never had so much fun in my life.
- What are you talking about?
- This is what I'm talking about.
Smell. Greasepaint. Show business.
- Gesundheit.
- Joe, Janie. Change for your next number.
- Orville.
- Jane, I'm warning you.
If you step on-stage, you're forcing me to close the show.
I'm warning you, Orville.
If you even look like you're gonna close this show...
...I won't break our engagement, I'll break your head!
- Jane, you're sweet.
- Oh, Joe.
- Did you hear...?
- Yes, I did. I'm trying to tell you.
- Will you please be quiet!
- I just don't understand...
That actor.
She's in love with that actor.
And that actor is in love with her.
- I'm not gonna stand for this.
- Stay where you are.
- Stay out of the way.
- No.
- I'm warning you.
- I'm warning you!
I'm giving an order around here.
The Falburys give the orders and I'm a Falbury.
Sheriff, come over here.
- Yep. She's a Falbury, all right.
- Orville, speak to me.
He'll be all right. Just take him out in the air. He'll be all right.
Will you please leave us alone?
Orville, darling, I didn't mean to...
The Falburys and the Wingaits.
- Howdy, neighbor
- Howdy, neighbor
- Happy harvest
- Happy harvest
Get your rocking chairs
For all your cares are over
Clap your hands and lick your chops
Your bumper crops are on the climb
- Hey, we're gonna roll in plenty
- Spend a five or 10 or 20
And those happy harvest bells Are gonna chime
Remember, neighbor When your work for Mother Nature
You got paid
By Father Time
Ashes to ashes, dust to dust
Women don't get you
The whiskey must
He was a good man.
Sure enough he was.
He's gone but not forgotten.
- Amen.
- Amen.
- We'll always remember him.
- Sure enough we will.
- Yes, he's gone.
- Good man gone.
- We'll never forget him.
- Amen.
Yes, he was a good man.
Glory.
He rambled and he rambled till the butcher cut him down.
All right, that'll do it.
Let's go let up some air.
Blow through that a while.
We need time to count it. Sugar can.
How about it, Pete?
Next set on the drums.
It's all right with me.
Get Joey's vote.
If you're looking for a new way to grow old, this is the place to come.
17 Cherry Street, Kansas City.
It's a speakeasy one flight down.
It was a brownstone at first.
After that an undertaker had the place.
But he went to Chicago to get a piece of the flu epidemic... and Rudy Shulak took over.
Rudy got a booze contract out of
Joplin and bought some tablecloths.
It's been a gin bin ever since.
There's even a little business on the side for shut-ins.
Rudy's a puny little guy.
Sew an extra button on his vest, he'd fall down.
But he's all right.
The beer's good, the whiskey's aged, if you get here late in the day.
On top of that, he knows where to spend money.
He knows where to save it.
And he's good to the help.
He pays scale with a $5 kickback.
I play cornet and run the band.
We play from 10 till 4 with a 20-minute pizza break.
The hours are bad but the music suits us.
There's one other thing about
Rudy's and that's trouble.
You can get it by the yard, the pound, wholesale or retail.
Like one Tuesday night.
A lot of people were busy that night.
- Rudy wants to see you.
- What have you got in there?
Milo Violets, Deities, Sweet Caporals.
Anything you want.
You going by the Plantation later?
Bennie Moten's in.
I don't know.
Pack some lunch. We'll see.
Go in my office. Have a talk with Fran McCarg.
- Who's she?
- It's a he.
Go light. He's downstate gun for Colissimo.
We're out of champagne.
You gotta squeeze.
- What's this McCarg doing up here?
- I heard some 22nd Ward business.
- What's he want with me?
- Huh?
What's he want with me?
Maybe he wants you to run for something. I got no idea.
But you'd better see him.
I don't know why you let people like that in here.
In Topeka I let in three nice old ladies.
They took out an ax and broke every bottle.
What's that got to do with it?
Stuck up a sign, said I was a disgrace to fatherhood.
They know I didn't have no kids.
Now, don't tell me stuff.
Just go talk to McCarg.
All right, Dad.
Hey, wanna go to a party?
Two hundred people, Ivy's house.
- Bring the band.
- If the party was so good, why'd you leave?
To get more people. It's the only reason to leave. Have a drink.
Hey, you coming or not?
Not.
- Quite a fighter, Johnny Risko.
- He'll do.
I'm Fran McCarg.
You know Guy Bettenhouser?
- You've got a nice band, Kelly.
- Thanks. We finished together.
That's why I'd like to do something for you.
- Cigarette?
- This what you had in mind?
- No, an agent.
- We got one.
I'm going into business handling a few bands. I'd like to sign you.
We got an agent, Phil Mishkin.
I know, but you don't want him, he's a bungler.
We got a contract. We can't break it.
And we can't pay two commissions.
Get that lump out of your throat.
We're already on short dough.
The fellas, they got families.
Everybody's got them.
They can't come up with 10 percent.
They got families.
Look, the only guy who didn't was Adam.
How long did he come up empty?
So don't tell me your troubles.
Point is, I'm starting a list of clients, I want you on it.
I can't answer for the whole band.
Line them up and count noses.
I'll be back at closing.
Kelly, just so you know, we give services.
Not 10 percent, it's 25.
We got a big overhead.
Yeah. I noticed him.
We should add a baritone.
Plenty of bands got them.
- Too muddy. No bite.
- No, it wouldn't hurt.
Couldn't we add something on the low end?
Maybe.
What about "Tin Roof Blues"?
In the morning, that phonograph does "Tin Roof," all right?
- You listening, Pete?
- It'll keep.
How'd you boys like another manager?
Fella named Fran McCarg.
We got an agent.
I covered all that.
It's a shakedown, he wants 25 percent.
- Serious?
- Waiting to hear from us.
Tell him no, you can tell him now.
- You get in touch with the union?
- Not yet.
Guy must be crazy.
Rudy don't pay us nothing now.
I don't mind working free, but I don't wanna pay commission.
- What about the rest of you?
- When it's late at night, pay off.
- He's not talking about tonight.
- That's what I say, when it's late, pay off.
Bedido?
Maybe Joey's right. Get a few bucks ahead, you don't wanna give it all away.
We're getting ahead. Enough to buy new drums and coats that match.
- You tell us we gotta cut ourselves out.
- I'm not telling you anything.
You wanna vote? We don't need no vote. Tell this guy no.
- Do you know who McCarg is?
- No, I never met him.
Do you know? You?
- You?
- I don't care who knows him.
If the band throws in with him,
I'll go to the Blue Devils.
He'll get to them. He'll get to every ragtime outfit in town.
Then I'll go with the Salvation Army.
That's the truth, Pete.
I'm rather be second drummer for them.
We can't argue all night.
What do I tell McCarg?
Everybody's had a say. Now you say.
I don't wanna break the band up.
If Joey's on the level, let's say no and see what happens.
Joey.
Salvation Army wouldn't have worked.
You gotta be able to read music.
Al, what do you think about McCarg?
Will he cause any trouble?
I don't see how. He'll kill one of us. That's no trouble.
All right, let's do some Scott Joplin.
How about "Pineapple," all right, Al?
- Yeah, if I can find my fingers.
- Kelly.
I don't care what the menu says. Spaghetti separate from meatball, charge for both.
You can pack up.
I promised you'd go to a party.
We gotta be around for closing.
McCarg's coming.
- I'll tell him.
- Where will we be?
- Her name's Ivy Conrad.
- Not that open furnace. I told her no.
- I already told her yes.
- How much?
We're in trouble. I gotta see McCarg and explain.
I made a deal, she wants you to do a favor.
- What kind of favor?
- She lost her hat.
Bring it to her.
A few minutes after, we borrowed
Rudy's car and got started.
We were late because Joey said he wanted to change his tie.
My name's Kelly. If a call comes in, will you let me know?
She's a real eggbeater, isn't she?
Put this in your pocket, will you?
Hey, let's you and me be a big secret.
No. Not now.
I've got plenty left, Ivy.
Catch, Kelly.
Oh, no, let me stay. I'll pay rent.
This is Kelly, everybody.
He's a musician.
You don't like me, do you?
I don't know much about you except what's in the papers.
- Oh, the kidnapping.
- Huh?
I was kidnapped once.
- What happened?
- They turned me loose after three days.
- Yeah?
- Couldn't stand me.
I wish they'd play
"Roses of Picardy."
Wouldn't it be wonderful to go there, Kelly?
Run off to some romantic spot.
Capri or the Dardanelles.
Some romantic place like that.
Have you ever thought of it?
I once spent a weekend at the Muhlebach.
If I ever go to the Dardanelles,
I want you to go too, Kelly.
I'll get the horn.
Mr. Kelly. Phone call.
Mr. Pete Kelly.
Here.
- Phone call. Mr. Pete Kelly.
- He's busy. I'll take it.
Hello?
No, this is Joey Firestone.
Who are you?
Oh, well, I can tell you, Mr. McCarg.
The answer is no.
If he was here, he'd tell you the same thing.
Go get a ticket to nowhere!
That's telling him, fat lady?
Come here, everybody.
Kelly's gonna toot for us.
- They're having too good a time.
- You're supposed to play.
I got ordered to a party, not a concert.
- You won't play, so Johnny will play.
- Put down that horn, buster.
- I'll just play one tune.
- You'll play it off your tonsils.
- Give me the horn.
- We'll throw it in the pool.
Maybe the fish will play.
Give me the horn. Give it to me.
Don't catch cold.
Come on, Pete, get a bar in.
Now, calm down.
There's somebody following us.
He must have banged out right through the windshield.
We'd better get up to the road and stop a car.
You go that way.
Let's try to get to a phone.
He didn't bang out, he floated out.
- That sounded pretty good.
- Yeah.
How was it?
Think you'll like that.
I'll play it back.
Yeah, mac, let's hear it.
- It was a good chorus, Al.
- Thanks.
Can I talk to you, Pete? Outside.
Sure.
I was wondering how soon you could spare me.
Never. Unless you're serious, Al.
And if you are, anytime.
Then I guess I'll mosey on.
All this trouble,
I'm not rested up for it.
It'll blow over.
You've been with the band the longest.
You and I, what's it been?
Six, seven years?
It won't blow over.
You're playing with a cold deck, but I don't blame you, Pete.
You wanna keep the band together, you've gotta fight back.
You could hang on for a while.
No.
I'm older than the rest of you. Lots older.
I've been through the band wars, too many of them.
I was thrown out of hotel rooms because I had an instrument case.
If it had been a machine gun, it would have been all right.
But nobody wanted a clarinet player around.
There was all that time trying to get people to keep their word.
They'd book you in and play you for a week... and then say you were drunk and dump you without a cent.
I've had too much trouble, Pete.
I don't want any more.
Where do you think you'll go?
East, maybe.
Thought I might try to catch on with a big outfit.
Goldkette, somebody like that.
Paid up, you got train fare?
Well, I'll catch a bus into St. Louis.
I ought to be used to it by now.
I bet I spent half my life in bus stations.
Isn't that the dangest thing?
Sure wish you'd go along, Pete.
You would do good with somebody like Goldkette.
Who's playing the horn there?
Bix, I guess.
I'm safer here, Al.
I'll see you around, Pappy.
Hope you get a good man.
Oh, I'll get someone, don't worry.
But he'll never sit all the way down in that chair.
We're going right into town.
We'll give you a lift.
I'll thumb a ride.
Well...
We'll play one for you every now and then.
Don't do that. I'm tired old folks.
Take five for me sometime.
That drummer of yours.
- So?
- We had words.
Do you know who that was?
- You're always asking if I know...
- Guy Bettenhouser. He's McCarg's.
I get the drift.
He made a grab for me.
- What happened?
- Joey took a beer bottle to him.
Joey, you're a fool, a real fool.
- Where's McCarg? How do I get in touch?
- Run an ad.
Operator, get me the 22nd Ward Club.
- What are you doing?
- Trying to call off the dogs.
Twenty-second Ward?
I wanna talk to McCarg.
Where can I find him?
Well, isn't there some way to run him down? It's important.
When will he be back?
The minute he comes in, tell him to call Kelly at Rudy's. It's important.
- It's not important to me.
- Go on home for the night.
- I get paid to play drums.
- You're not.
I'll sit at the bar. I don't start trouble, but I ain't afraid of nobody.
- You remember that.
- You remember it.
- I need a favor, Cootie.
- I'm eating. Somebody left good meatballs.
I'll buy you dinner. Get out and hit the clubs, dig out Fran McCarg.
You think I can find him, Pete?
You found some leftover meatballs.
I knew it was silly to send Cootie.
He had some savvy once, but he got shell-shocked... and after that, he couldn't set fire to a bucket of kerosene.
He was our only chance, though.
Cootie didn't show up and
McCarg didn't call in.
It got to be 2:00.
I thought we might make it.
We almost did.
- Hey.
- Joey.
On your way. I'll stop them here.
Joey, look out!
Clear the place. Get somebody to help bring Joey in.
- What's the matter?
- It's raining on him.
Later on, they came and took Joey away.
I cleaned out his locker and started for home.
This is a single.
You got the wrong gutter.
I'm sorry.
Rudy gave me the address.
- What are you doing?
- Making tea.
Could I have some?
You won't like it, I'm using water.
I don't blame you for being mad.
I don't feel good. If you got tanked up and lost track of the party... go down to the street and start another one but don't bother me, I'm tired.
- I came to apologize.
- You have.
And I was lonesome.
Were you ever lonesome?
It shouldn't be any trick for you.
Hire a stadium and fill it with people.
Wouldn't it be wonderful?
Except that's when you feel the most lonesome of all, with so many people.
- You might try an empty stadium.
- Just two people.
That's the only time you're not lonesome.
One time, when we lived on Bellafont, there was a boy down the street.
- We built a cave.
- Yeah.
I wasn't lonesome at all.
Wouldn't you know, it rained and ruined the cave... and after that, he moved away.
Do you know what happened to him?
I couldn't guess.
He went to France and got killed.
When I read it in the paper,
I could have cried.
I only knew him a week or so... but I could have cried.
You better have the tea and wander on.
What's that?
What's it look like? It's a bird.
Well, isn't it beautiful?
A lady gave him to me.
She was potted.
It's beautiful. What's its name?
Fred.
What's that all about?
You're not mean, if you're that nice to a bird.
I'm nice to him because I may get hungry someday and have to eat him.
In a meantime, he can hit G above high C, so I keep him around.
Doesn't he fly away when you leave the window open?
- Doesn't seem to.
- Here's to us.
It's your drink.
I don't wanna leave. I'm like Fred.
Look, I never took Fred by the seat of the pants... and threw him down the stairs.
I know Fred.
He'd walk back up.
McCarg must've been pushing hard with all the bands.
Because that night, the word went out.
We were all gonna meet at a roadhouse over on the Kansas side.
A place called Fat Annie's.
It was a grog shop and there was pressure to close it.
So far, none of the Prohibition boys had been able to find it.
Oh, she is sweet as sour milk.
There's a cop looking for you by the window.
So sorry to hear about Joey Firestone.
So am I.
It's all right, I suppose. I guess he's gone to the good Lord.
If he can take his drums.
- The boys here yet?
- Yes, up in the still.
- I say we're ready.
- Yes.
We have to get ready.
- There's no plan.
- There is.
I say if we're gonna vote...
- We're voting.
- On what?
- Getting protection.
- We'll send out for a gun.
- You think that will scare McCarg?
- It might kill him.
Ever hear of Mike Sloan?
Two, three years ago, he sent to St. Paul for a $5000 hoodlum.
- Yeah?
- Fella took the 5... missed his man and left with Mike Sloan's wife.
- I don't know you felt like joking.
- I don't.
- What's it mean, then?
- What's it sound like?
- It sounds like you'll go along with McCarg.
- Anything wrong with that?
Well, I suppose not.
After what happened to Joey, we figured you'll fight him.
- We figured wrong.
- Who are you? I never saw you before.
Listen, I got an outfit.
I got a right to vote.
- Take it easy, he's new.
- Tell him to roll down his sleeves.
- I didn't come to hear some banjo player.
- All right, Pete. All right.
Joey was in your band.
He was a friend of yours.
Joey's seen the man, I can't pull him back.
I lost a clarinet, best chair I knew.
I'm tired. I don't want any more of it.
And that's how I feel.
If you go along, we'll all have to.
Suit yourselves.
You don't have to run away, you can stay and talk.
There's nothing to talk about.
It got said last night.
Bring it back and sit down.
George Tenell.
Suppose they'll go along with McCarg.
I guess.
I want your help on him.
I got some pictures.
The law was there last night,
I told them all I know.
- Different branch.
- I told them. Leave me alone.
- Go steal an apple.
- You're scared, Kelly.
I don't think you know it but you are.
Don't let it bother you.
I'm going after McCarg and you can join up... if you get anything in back of your belt buckle.
You won't get McCarg.
- No?
- He's not poor enough.
Don't ever say that again.
Just a minute.
I told them 10 times, one anchovy is plenty.
Cut it up, one's plenty.
- What's the idea, having a kid play drums?
- Get him a higher stool.
I'm gonna talk to that union. I pay full salary, I'm entitled to a grown-up.
- How do you think it sounds?
- All right.
- Don't lose your head.
- I said, all right.
- The kid?
- Rushes the beat.
- Where's the clarinet from?
- Mound City Blueblowers.
If they used him, it was to carry beer.
- I guess we got a deal.
- Good.
You know what I'd like to do, Kelly?
Start fresh. We ought to be friends.
You're too moody.
Talking about last night?
That was Bettenhouser's show.
One of your men jumped him.
He didn't like it.
That shouldn't bother you or me. I like you.
I can do you some good.
You couldn't give me a cold.
In a month, I'll have
30 club bands here.
Another 50 in St. Louis, and spread out as far as Indiana.
And it's not just bands.
There's food supply, laundry service.
You could get a hunk of that.
Aprons, tablecloths, towels.
- Do you ever count all the dirty faces?
- Cut another side.
You need time to cool down.
I don't know what you heard.
You've been to prison twice.
You got a due bill at McAllister.
Downstate, they're not as nice.
They say you got rubber pockets so you can steal soup.
We'll still get along because you're not like these bums.
You don't wanna go through life with crumbs in your bed.
Don't worry. We'll hit it off.
Now, I'd like you to meet someone.
Pete Kelly. Rose Hopkins.
- How are you?
- Hello.
- You give her a tryout.
- What?
- She's a singer. Tell him.
- You just did.
- We don't carry a singer.
- What do you mean?
- It's jazz. People come for the noise.
- He's right. It's not that kind of band.
She's good. Have the boys play something.
- They broke for the night, going home.
- I'll hold them.
I wonder if I could have a drink.
Thanks.
I'm sorry.
About the singing, I mean.
Did you ever sing before?
Sometimes in clubs and one time for a road show.
That's when I met him. I was singing.
Were you any good?
Couple of people said I was.
Even talked about New York.
But I got sick and had to go away.
It was a long time back.
Only he won't forget it.
Keeps saying, all I need is a good start.
Yeah.
When you're 35, the only start you need is for home.
Come on.
After you.
Don't worry, Fran, I can't climb that high anymore.
All right, that's it. Goodbye, now.
Come on.
- You're not gonna take her?
- We may have to.
Look, Pete, we don't need a singer, we agreed.
She sounded good but we can't afford a singer.
Why not?
If I want a postcard,
I gotta buy it on time.
- We can't afford her.
- Don't worry about that.
She comes free.
- All set?
- I don't know.
She'll need some help.
Here's 25 bucks a week for you.
Go ahead and take it.
You got a girl or something, you can use it.
We all set?
I suppose so.
Ten years he's known me, and all he can say is, "She comes free."
But I guess that covers it.
Rose came every night to sing.
McCarg came every night to listen.
Before he came and after he left, Rose drank.
The way she went at it, the bartender was gonna have to get an iron jigger.
Even Rudy was getting tougher.
He fired the cook for using fresh peas and started to cut the whiskey more.
Down on 12th Street, they said Rudy was gonna be a rich man someday.
He'd learn how to cut water.
But he was good-hearted.
That's one thing you could say for him.
In the meantime,
McCarg got us outside work.
On our night off, he booked us at the Everglade Ballroom... over on 10th and Locust.
I heard McCarg had a piece of the place but I don't know why.
It was dark three nights a week.
They had a player piano for three more.
Whatever night it was... you could put the crowd in a bathtub and have room to splash around.
The only good thing was Ivy.
Say, fella, that's some music.
- Take it from me.
- That's right, George has a good ear.
Oh, gotta have,
I'm on it all the time.
Here, have a cigar.
Go on, light it up and be somebody.
Hello.
How about a smoke?
- You can dance to this, you know.
- Can you smoke to it?
- Don't you want the cigar?
- It's all yours.
It's nice and warm.
I love it this time of year, don't you?
I never bothered to rate it.
But I like April better. Or June.
No, April. April's my favorite.
If you like it that much,
I'll get it for you.
No, thanks. The ring's enough.
You see? I'm engaged.
You said it was all mine.
- Very pretty.
- The good thing, it's different.
You go out for lunch, it's not like all the other rings you see.
Ivy, you're wonderful.
When will we get married?
Let's do it on your 10th birthday.
I'll tell you what.
If I can make you say, "I do," is it all right to get married?
It's a game.
For instance, what color is the American flag?
Red, white and blue.
Who was the first president?
George Washington.
What's the largest...?
- Oh, you don't wanna play.
- Sure.
- You don't even understand the game.
- Of course I do.
There, you said it. "I do."
I used to play it all the time.
Only I never cared how it came out.
Why don't we get married, Pete?
I don't know.
We'd look a little silly, that's all.
Tramp musician, I don't know where my next meal is coming from.
You skating around to Spain and France.
Don't know where your next country is coming from.
We just look silly together.
I don't think we look any more silly together than by ourselves.
Ask anybody, ask them what they think.
Us sitting in a rocker with a lot of gray hair.
- But that's 40 years away.
- Suppose it is.
Well, I don't know.
Except we could have fun.
And I'd love you the whole time.
I don't think we'd look so silly.
Hey.
Don't flood out the joint, we still got another set to play.
I won't.
Except it's true.
And after 40 years, if you don't like the idea... you can have your cigar band back.
- Can I keep the ring, Pete?
- Sure.
But don't expect a fur coat too.
What did you get, a bleacher seat?
Wanna ask you a couple of questions.
If it's about Joey, ask Bettenhouser.
They had the beef.
- I can't find him.
- That's too bad.
- Yeah, it is, I can't find anybody.
- What do you mean?
- You know a guy named Cootie Jacobs?
- Yeah.
You sent him on an errand the night Firestone was killed?
- That's right.
- He never got back.
I thought you might tell me why.
Come on in. I'm celebrating.
Celebrating what?
You and Ivy. That's wonderful.
Get married and have kids.
That's what anybody ought to do.
- Care to celebrate?
- No, thanks.
Grab a chance when you get it.
That's what I should have done.
Grab it and have a little girl.
Why didn't you?
That's what I always wanted.
What do they called it,
"the patter of little feet"?
Well, there will never be no patter of little feet in my house.
Unless I was to rent some mice.
Here's to you and Ivy.
Go easy, we're only gonna get married once.
But there's two of you doing it.
Do you ever hear McCarg mention Cootie Jacobs?
- Why?
- I just wondered.
Don't worry about anything with McCarg.
Leave him alone. He's too mean.
- I'm not worried.
- You don't know him, Pete.
He'd do anything in the world that's mean.
He'd shoot crap on the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier.
Just the same, I'd like to know about Cootie.
Stay away from him.
It's a real favor I'm telling you.
I'll mark it down that way.
But if you gotta know about this Cootie, I'll poke around.
Thanks, Rose.
I owe you a kiss, maybe a couple.
You couldn't make it an even dozen?
We better go.
Do you wanna skip tonight?
It's a tough house anyway.
No. No, I'll be fine. I'll be fine.
Be right along, as soon as I have a nightcap.
Aren't you getting a little ahead of yourself?
I always start around noon, in case it gets dark early.
I knew it was a mistake the minute Rose got out there.
She'd had bad crowds before but never like this.
They wouldn't pay attention to a naked girl yelling, "Fire."
Rose tried but she couldn't handle it.
I guess she was feeling that soup a little too.
McCarg quieted down a couple of people but there was no way to cover the room.
Besides, the way he was acting, you'd think it was Rose's fault.
"Somebody Loves Me," all right?
Happy birthday, folks.
They don't wanna hear it.
They do if you sing right.
Act sober and sing.
Everybody here, quiet down.
I said, everybody.
Out in the kitchen too.
She's gonna sing, you're gonna listen.
All right. Go ahead.
All right, keep it going. One, two.
- Where's Rose?
- Up to her dressing room.
- Why don't you order them out of here?
- I don't know them good enough.
I'm sorry, Kelly.
- It wasn't your fault.
- It's not hers either.
She didn't even try.
I wanted to give her a start.
She didn't even try.
[DOOR OPENS
Rose. Rose.
Later that week, we got a job playing a stag party.
I went outside to find some clean air.
Somebody beat me to it.
- Hello, Pete.
- Al, Al.
You look skinny.
Don't they feed you there?
Yeah, but it's thin spaghetti.
I heard about you in Goldkette.
What's it like?
It's big. Hit that bandstand is like walking into some out-of-work local.
We got a good section.
I get a solo now and then.
- No fooling?
- We did a record.
- I bet you robbed big Ed.
- I know the right bank.
- We're having a pour.
- Yeah, they said downtown.
What are you doing here?
- Wichita, I laid over for the night.
- You can stagger. Come in.
- Great bunch.
- Anybody I know?
Not too many but what's the difference?
Anybody you know?
I guess that's true, a thing like this, a bunch of freeloaders and drifters.
Who'd you expect, Joey Firestone?
I guess you didn't hear.
Right after you left, that night,
Joey Firestone...
I heard about it.
- Then why the nudge?
- You were talking tough at first.
Said McCarg couldn't lay a glove on you.
When he laid one on Joe, you quit your band, ducked out.
You came all that way just to tell me this?
No, I came for my mouthpiece.
Mouthpiece?
A long time ago when you were first getting started I gave you a mouthpiece.
It belonged to the bugler in my outfit.
When he ran out of legs one night, I gave it you.
I liked him. I don't want you blowing on it anymore, so give it back.
Al, I don't see why it has to finish like this with you and me.
Maybe I was a little off base, but how can that ruin all the old times... when we did anything to keep going?
Like the night Bedido broke his bow... and you told him to beat the base the way you saw him do in Algiers.
The time we stole that crate of oranges, only it was marked wrong.
We had to eat turnips all the way from Memphis clear up past Davenport.
All the good times.
I don't see how you can forget them because you don't like one thing.
I want the mouthpiece.
If that's how you feel, see if I care.
Dust off. Get the night boat to Phoenix, go on.
- Go on. I'm ready to wave goodbye.
- You can't wave goodbye to anybody.
- Huh?
- You're too busy shaking hands with McCarg.
Get in.
It won't fit a clarinet.
Al was back. I made up my mind.
I went to see George Tenell.
We tried to figure up a plan.
Each time it came out Bettenhouser.
He ducked out of town.
There was only one person who'd know where to find him, Rose Hopkins.
Your friend Rose is down at Cedardale.
- Where is that?
- State home for the insane.
- What'd you find out?
- I checked with the doctors.
Some kind of a mix-up.
She's wandering around with the brain of a 5-year-old... and she'll never get past there again.
That's awful.
I don't know.
Maybe she made a good trade.
Cream and sugar?
On the house.
- Ls this yours?
- There's 70 bucks in there.
- Take 55 and close us out.
- Huh?
That'll get you through next Wednesday.
Your last commission.
- We don't need you anymore.
- You're tired.
- Go home and sleep.
- As long as you know where you stand.
- Where do I stand?
- In the middle of a hole, that's where.
- Well, well, who plugged you in?
- Joey Firestone.
You're late, Kelly, the worms got him. He's on the menu.
What can you do?
Wait a minute.
- You're looking for a war?
- Put it anyway you like.
I think you ordered up
Joey and I'll prove it.
- If that's war, we got one.
- I don't think you're that tough.
Give me an empty, a beer bottle. Hurry up.
Go ahead. Let's see how tough you are.
You got one free swing, right or left hand.
Go ahead, you got a bonus.
Pick it up and get tough.
I didn't think so.
You made a mistake, Kelly.
Because I'm gonna keep on taking that 25 percent.
The very next time you open your mouth or look sideways or even talk to me...
I'll put you down for good.
That's the truth.
- Don't you ever go to bed?
- Hi.
I have wonderful news.
Tommy's letting us have his lodge for the honeymoon.
- Who's Tommy?
- Oh, you don't know him.
But he's got this place near some bighorn sheep.
He won't be using it for the next two weeks.
We can't get married right now and run off.
- Why not? I told everybody.
- Then you'll have to UN-tell them.
- You said it was up to me, you didn't care.
- I know, but something's come up.
What?
It's about the band. I can't go into it now, but we'll have to wait.
- What's so important you can't tell me?
- What's so important about bighorn sheep?
- Why can't we wait?
- For how long, three weeks?
Six months, 15 years?
I don't think you'll ever know.
You'll wanna play another set or hire a new piano player.
I don't wanna argue. If that's the way you feel, that's the way you feel.
I don't blame you.
I guess I tricked you into it.
- That's not the point.
- That's the whole point.
You don't wanna get married, Pete.
Unless you find a girl who looks like a cornet.
I'm short three valves. I might as well pack up and move someplace else.
Sure, that's what you've always done.
Light out for Paris.
How long do we have to wait, Pete?
I don't know, but it won't be forever.
You know that.
Thanks, but I don't wanna be an old lady when I get married.
- I don't want the rice to knock me down.
- Stop it, will you?
If that's the way it's going to be we might as well say goodbye right now.
Suit yourself.
See you around.
That's the way it would be, isn't it?
According to you. Goodbye, Ivy.
Gosh, I'm sorry to see me go.
This is my baby.
Would you like to say hello?
Does your baby have a name?
Amy.
That's her name for today.
- She has different names.
- Oh?
One for every day.
Sometimes she wakes up sad, and then her name is Dolores.
But if she's happy, I call her Penny.
Rose, you and I were once friends.
My name is Kelly.
Are you a nice man?
If you're not, my baby will know.
You once knew a man name McCarg.
He was mean to my baby.
Do you remember him?
Do you remember him? McCarg.
She's cold.
It's always chilly in the afternoon.
He was a bad man.
Do you know about his friend?
His name was Bettenhouser.
You know where he is?
After the baby's had her nap, we can have tea.
- Would you like that?
- Yes, I would.
- Were we good friends?
- I hope so.
I have so many good friends.
All the people here.
Amy is so sleepy.
She's a very beautiful baby.
Is there a place called Coffeyville?
In Kansas. Is that where he went, McCarg's friend?
Don't ever go there.
It's full of bad people.
Is that where he went? Coffeyville?
We can have biscuits with the tea, and I'll put on another dress.
This is not my nicest dress.
It's a very pretty dress.
It's time for Amy's nap.
You've been very good to us.
Goodbye, Rose.
I have so many nice friends.
I got in touch with Tenell.
He wired the police at
Coffeyville, Kansas.
But I didn't have time to wait on an answer.
Somebody said there was a message for me in the band room.
Maggie Jackson wanted to see me.
It was important.
Up in the still, somebody waiting for you.
- Well, who is it?
- I don't know. A friend, I guess.
- Not these days.
- Huh?
If I wanted a friend, I'd have to send to Sears Robuck.
Thanks for the message.
One good kick, put your head in the basement. We agree on that?
I've come to talk a deal.
Talk it.
To begin with, I didn't kill your friend Firestone.
- He'll be glad to hear it.
- It was McCarg's, he brought a gun.
You ready to say that?
I'd last an hour.
There's another way.
- Can you get next to $1200?
- Why?
No 1200, no deal.
I'll tell you where you can get papers... canceled checks, everything you need for McCarg.
I can get rid of the car.
Sell my watch and borrow.
When do you need it?
By morning, I've gotta take it and get out.
It doesn't hang right, friend.
Why would you wanna dump McCarg?
- I can use $1200.
- Get it from him.
He doesn't owe me anything.
He won't advance anything.
He claims the whole thing was my fault.
- Maybe it was.
- Maybe, maybe not. It's his wash now.
Twelve hundred, I can get part of a rum boat out of Detroit.
Gotta make the move, I can't stay in Coffeyville the rest of my life.
Your life may not amount to much.
It will if you cover me. McCarg doesn't have to know who pointed the finger.
- Are we talking a deal?
- I can't gamble 1200.
How do I know about these papers and canceled checks?
Take a look. I'll tell you where.
If they work for you, you deliver
1200 by 6 in the morning.
- If they don't, I'll shop somewhere else.
- Where are they?
- Is it yes or no?
- Yes.
- In McCarg's office.
- At the 22nd Ward Club?
Another office at the Everglade
Ballroom in the back. Take a crowbar.
- Where will you be?
- Right here, I can't afford to go out.
- I'll see you.
- You better.
I don't get 1200, you'll be looking for something to put your hat on.
You understand?
- Some ducks out front?
- I'm going to the Everglade.
Dark tonight, isn't it?
I got a chance to take the skin off
McCarg, some papers and things.
- Good, I'll go along.
- Keep your seat.
This is none of your business, Al.
Besides, it won't be any trouble.
Fine. I wouldn't go otherwise.
Now, listen, there's one way to keep you here.
You wouldn't hit me again, would you, Pete?
No, I guess not.
- Hello, Pete.
- How's Paris?
- I wonder if we could talk.
- I'm busy, Ivy.
- Can we have a dance, one little dance?
- Please.
Even if it's the last one?
Ivy, I've got a lot to do.
I got till morning to do it.
I was wrong about things.
- If we could just talk...
- Some other time.
I'm busy. Rudy says you are too.
You don't have to be mean.
I missed you, that's all.
Not even a dance?
We had one, remember?
I wish I hadn't used it up.
See, I never give up.
Get out of here, Ivy.
- I followed you over.
- I can see that. Now, please get out.
Not till we dance.
Don't be a fool. This is no time for a drunken stunt, go on home.
Not till we dance, and it's not a drunken stunt.
If we dance once, then will you go?
Maybe.
Let them get comfortable.
I got nothing to gain.
No, no, no!
You have no step unless you get your leg up.
All right, come on, watch.
Give me that dicer.
Hit it, the last 16 bars. Now, watch.
- What time you got?
- Ten to 3.
Take over, Eve. Last chorus.
All right, well, pick up.
Hello, Jerry. Bix.
Ran out, huh?
Well, look, give me a $20 parlay...
...from Laughing Boy in the seventh to Happy Eve in the eighth.
You heel.
Can't even pay a hotel bill.
In debt up to your ears, and it's horses.
Horses every second you're awake.
Horses, horses, horses.
I don't drink or smoke.
You, Elwin Bixby, a man of talent, a genius of Broadway.
The brightest future of anybody in show business.
Take five, kids.
Had hit after hit, season after season...
...now beating out a time step in this broken-down saloon.
Take 10, sweetheart.
Take 10?
I've been taking 10 ever since I've known you.
Watching you fight your way to the bottom.
- I don't fight, baby. I'm a lover.
- Don't change the subject.
You fought with Ziegfeld, Harris,
Hammerstein, Eberhart, always battling.
But you know who you're really fighting?
Yourself.
Where do we go from here?
We'll land right on our feet, and when we do:
That tune went off my hit parade long ago.
Sorry, but here goes the bride.
Eve, Eve, you haven't heard the whole story.
Heard it? I could put it to music.
"Meet me at the city hall. This is it.
We'll have our honeymoon in Bermuda."
"Had to postpone it."
- Something happened to the money.
- Something always happened to the money.
Answer it. It's probably your bookie with another sure thing.
- Hello.
- Bix, old boy. How are you, fella?
I've been combing the town for you.
Where you been? How do you feel?
When did you start being interested in the state of my health?
Oh, now, Bix.
You know I've always been interested in how you're doing.
Listen, I've got a proposition for you.
Go blow your brains out, you thief.
Eberhart.
- Harry Eberhart?
- Yes, offered me a job.
You fool.
The only producer in town who'll give you a job and you insult him?
I wouldn't work for that chiseler if you put a gun in my back.
Well, that does it.
Pick up the phone when you roll out of bed around 2 tomorrow afternoon.
Call my two-room, cross-ventilated basement.
Ask for Eve.
She won't live there anymore.
Oh, now...
Sit down, sit down, sweetheart.
You're overheated.
- Bix, I'm leaving.
- Yeah, sure, sure.
I've been offered a job to do a single and help stage the dances...
...at a hotel in Las Vegas.
Eve, you can't do that.
You're my feet, you're my memory.
I couldn't work without you.
You better start getting used to it.
All right, Eve, Eve.
So help me, word of honor, word of honor, no more horses.
- Word of honor?
- Yeah.
You don't know what it means.
Sorry, Bix. I gotta pack.
- I'll be up to your place as soon as I finish.
- Won't do any good.
Save yourself the bus fare.
You might need it.
Bix, every year at West Point, the cadets put on a musical...
...the 100th Night Show.
They call it that because it's a kind of a celebration.
The winter's over, only a hundred days till June.
Well, I made a special trip up there to look over the show.
It's wonderful what those kids have done.
Of course, some of the material was amateurish.
But I've seen a lot worse on Broadway.
Bix...
...l'm gonna help those boys.
That's why I sent for you.
- Did you say something?
- I didn't say anything.
You know, Bix, you and I have done a lot of shows together.
I can't think of a man with more on the ball.
That's why I gave you such a big build-up with those cadets.
Don't you talk to me about West Point.
That is the greatest collection...
...of big-headed, salute-happy, station-house characters in any man's army.
I took it for four years from those muzzlers from Camp Dix to the Rhine.
And all the way, nothing but trouble.
And how do they get that way?
They have a special factory up there for putting square heads into brass hats.
West Point?
But, Bix, I'm asking this as a personal favor.
Why should I do you any favors?
Bix, I've got a nephew up there,
Tom Fletcher.
The kid's written the music and he's putting on the show.
He's my only sister's boy.
The kid's dad died when he was 3.
There isn't anything in this world
I wouldn't do for that boy.
As a friend, go on up there and whip that show into shape.
Now, suppose...
...you tell me the real story.
All right.
I've got a big musical for the fall.
Can I put it on?
Not without a leading man.
And where am I gonna find a good-looking guy that can sing?
Don't tell me, don't tell me.
- West Point.
- Exactly.
My own nephew, Tom.
Oh, a tremendous voice.
Believe me, and the chump wants to be an Army officer.
Now, what kind of a career is that?
I tell you, I've tried every angle to get that kid out of there.
Now, come on, Bix, go on up there.
Give them that stuff.
Let that kid get a taste of applause.
Get under his skin.
You can make him listen.
He'll make us a fortune.
- Who'll wind up with it?
- We will.
Harry, you got your start robbing a blind man.
Six years, you sat on the broad end of your back...
...collected the dough, took the bows for hits that I made for you.
You fired me and had me blackballed with every producer in town.
And now, when you need me...
Now, wait just a minute, Bix.
Just one minute.
- What did you do to me?
- Do to you?
- Jan Wilson?
- Yes, Jan Wilson.
You stole her out of my own show, right from under my very nose.
Stole her? I found her.
Now, Bix, Bix, you stole her.
You signed her to a personal contract and then sold to the pictures.
- Of course I did, to give her a break.
- And never even cut me in.
Cut you in?
You chiseler.
- You had her buried in the chorus.
- Now, all right.
Let's let bygones be bygones, shall we?
Now, I know that you've been having a little trouble lately...
...so here's my proposition:
I'll give you 5000 as an advance against 2 percent of the gross.
- If you'll get the b...
- No, there is no if.
I will not steal your nephew out of West Point.
Get yourself another boy.
- Oh, Bix?
- Yes?
- How's Eve? Seen her lately?
- Yeah, why?
Nice girl. I heard she'd been having kind of a hard time.
You know, a friend of mine owns a hotel in Las Vegas.
Las Vegas?
Friend of yours?
That's throwing them in there pretty low, even for you.
Five thousand against 2 percent of the gross if you deliver that boy.
- Ten thousand.
- Seventy-five hundred.
That should straighten out a lot of troubles for you and Eve.
You got a deal.
Detail.
Forward, hut.
Isn't this wonderful?
Think of this place, its history, its tradition.
Think of all the great men who came from here.
General Grant, Eisenhower, Pershing.
Benedict Arnold. He tried hard to give this joint to the British.
I think he should have his case reviewed.
Look at that scenery, those buildings.
Alcatraz on the Hudson.
And get a load of this weather. Cold enough to freeze the medals off a brass general.
Oh, Bix, stop beefing.
Say, buddy, how do we get to the Army theater?
To reach your objective, proceed through that entryway...
...between the academic building and the barracks.
Walk west on Jefferson Road, past Thayer Monument...
...opposite Washington Hall.
That, sir, is our cadet mess hall.
Turn left on Scott Place.
Proceed until you approach a yellow brick building.
That's our gymnasium.
Proceed to the northeast corner, where you will see nine doors.
Enter any of these doors, proceed to the second floor.
There you will find the Army theater.
Couldn't you just point?
That way, sir.
- Thanks.
- Pardon me.
Are all those men walking just for the exercise?
No, they're walking punishment tours.
They broke rules or regulations.
See that? Wasting shoe leather.
Who pays for it? Taxpayers, me.
Taxpayer? You wouldn't know a tax return from a racing form.
Wait for your laugh.
- Where do you think you were going?
- Extra instruction, sir. French, sir.
Don't you know that even when you're late, you don't use Diagonal Walk?
- That's reserved for upperclassmen.
- Yes, sir.
Now, I'm going to make a soldier out of you...
...from the top of your head to your toes.
First thing, put that hat on properly.
Pull in that chin. Lots of wrinkles.
Get those slimy green eyes off me.
Now let's see you pop that chest up.
Touch my hand.
You heard me. Pop up that chest.
Suck up that horrible gut.
You can't run around with that stomach dragging on the pavement.
Get those knees together.
Report to my room, 1423, immediately after extra instruction. Got that?
Drive on.
Pop up that chest! Touch my hand!
You don't have to break it off.
If you don't like this place and you don't like Eberhart...
...why did you get on that train at 125th Street...
...drag me off and sell me a bill of goods...
...about coming up to do an amateur show?
Just for you, sweetheart. Just for you.
First classmen wait
For the dance to come
With all the joys they bring
So join us and sing
One hundred days till June
June will come soon
Lieutenants we will be
With the shining bars of gold
On our Army OD
We'll cast one glance
At these old gray walls
We'll bid a fond farewell
Oh, join and sing
Of 100 days till June
Oh, join and sing
Of 100 days till June
Is that coming out of him?
- Mr. Bixby?
- Yes.
I'm Colonel Martin. Glad to see you.
Mr. Eberhart's told me so much about you.
Welcome to West Point.
Thank you. Eve Dillon, my assistant.
- How do you do.
- How do you do, miss.
- Oh, Mr. Fletcher.
- Sir?
- Mr. Bixby.
- Fletcher.
My uncle phoned me you were coming, sir.
- This is Colonel Martin, our faculty adviser.
- Met the colonel.
- Hal Courtland.
- How do you do, sir.
Eve Dillon, my assistant.
- How do you do.
- How do you do, Miss Dillon.
This is Bull Gilbert, sir.
He's our princess in the show.
Too bad you couldn't find a big one.
"Honey Blond, Red Head, Ash Blond,
Strawberry Blond, Auburn."
"Brownette..." Somebody can't spell.
"Blond, Brunette."
Now, these characters with the signs on, what are they?
Our chorus girls, sir.
No women in the show?
This isn't Broadway, Mr. Bixby.
This is West Point.
You see, sir, all our girls are men.
But every one's a lady.
That makes it cozy.
Something Rodgers and Hammerstein never thought, a musical show without women.
We're about to do one of our numbers, sir.
- Suppose we do it for you?
- That'd be fine.
Now, you'll have to imagine that this is Flirtation Walk.
And that chair is the Kissing Rock.
Bull here is the princess.
This the Flirtation Walk, that the Kissing Rock...
...and this is the princess.
You've been kissed, I know
In the very last row
When the love scene is on
At the movie show
But wait until tonight
And you'll be kissed but right
By the Kissing Rock
It's a lovely spot
And believe it or not
If you'll just care a little
You'll care a lot
So let's dispense with talk
And take a little walk
By the Kissing Rock
A girl once refused to kiss a lad
The lad was a man of honor
He warned her
She'd make the rock real mad
And the legend is the rock fell upon her
That was years ago
And it must have been so
'Cause from that day to this
Not a girl said no
And that's the story of
Whoever falls in love
By the Kissing Rock
How'd you like it, sir?
Wouldn't hiss and wouldn't cheer.
Got a copy of the lyrics?
Right here, sir.
Colonel, you mind if I go to work?
- Not at all. Go ahead.
- Thank you, colonel.
- Tom, would you come down here?
- Yes, sir.
Son, don't give it everything you have in the first eight bars.
Don't belt it at them, like this:
You've been kissed, I know
No, it's no good.
Singing a song is like a horse race.
You don't ride a horse from wire to wire, you rate him.
Now, rule one: Like your audience.
They're all nice people.
They bought tickets, they want to hear your story.
Tell it to them simply, sweetly, warmly.
You like them and they like you.
Hit it. Eve.
You've been kissed, I know
In the very last row
When the love scene is on
At the movie show
But wait until tonight
And you'll be... but right
By the Kissing Rock
It's a lovely spot
And believe it or not
If you just care a little
You'll care a lot
So let's dispense with talk
And take a little walk
By the Kissing Rock
A girl once refused to kiss a lad
- And the lad was a man of honor
- You'd know.
He warned her
She'd make the rock real mad
And the legend is the rock fell upon her
That was years ago
And it must have been so
'Cause from that day to this
Not a girl said no
- That's the story of whoever falls in love
- That's the story of whoever falls in love
- By the Kissing Rock
- By the Kissing Rock
Ham.
Well, there's an idea.
- It was great.
- I could've done it better with two legs.
We'll open in one, go to full stage.
Now... Well, bring on the rest of your dancers and we'll see what we've got.
We won't have any more time today, sir.
No more time?
I wanna hear the rest of your score.
You see, we have to spoon up for mess or we'll get slugged.
But meet us tomorrow at the Boodlers at 1600...
...why, we can have a drink...
- Cherry phosphate.
- We'll play the whole score for you then.
See you tomorrow, sir.
Did I hear him right?
Let me translate. He means they won't be off again until tomorrow at 4.
Fletcher and his roommate can meet at the Boodlers.
Now they've got to stand formation for supper.
Whoever heard of breaking into rehearsals for supper?
West Point, Mr. Bixby.
Rules and regulations.
Oh, rules and regulations.
Well, they'll have to take a tuck on the rules and regulations.
Make a note of that, Eve.
Long before I knew you
I knew you'd be as you are
How did I know?
Don't ask me to explain
Do you suppose the budding rose
Would question summer rain?
My heart led me right to you
Or was it my lucky star?
I don't know if you
Believe that dreams come true
But long before I kissed you
I knew
- This is going to be fun.
- You think we have a show?
You got a few good jokes, a few good songs, but a show, I don't know.
It's gonna be a lot of hard work. Hal?
- Yes, sir?
- I like your dancing. Nice style.
- Thank you, sir.
- Don't let the Army flatten those arches.
You got a lot of voice.
Lot of voice. Like to talk about it sometime.
Good jokes, songs.
You did the material yourselves?
Yes, sir, Hal and I.
What happens to the show when it closes?
- Nothing.
- They put it in the archives.
- Any chance of a fella getting it?
- Not a chance, it's West Point property.
- How about buying it?
- It's not for sale, sir.
I'm afraid I gonna have to call time on you again.
- First call for supper.
- More supper.
I want you guys at the gymnasium promptly at 4:00 tomorrow. Four o'clock.
In the Army, sir, it's 1600.
Sixteen hundred, 1650,
I won't give you a cent more.
Be there at 4:00.
After reading this book and hearing this score...
...I think these kids have really got something.
You know, this story is charming.
A Brooklyn GI in Europe falling in love with a girl...
...who turns out to be a royal princess.
Romantic, isn't it?
Sets me on fire.
And that Bull Gilbert is such a fascinating wench.
Then the princess comes to America, to West Point...
...to see her GI, who is now a cadet.
But because she's a princess and he's a commoner...
...the romance gets the cadet into trouble.
However, being royalty, she asks for amnesty and gets it.
Right out on the stage?
- Amnesty means a pardon.
- No.
Then she gives up being a princess, moves to Brooklyn with her GI...
...and lives happily ever after. Cute?
If you ask me, the whole plot needs amnesty.
He gets out of trouble because she's a princess.
What gimmick is that?
Nobody's gonna believe it.
The tunes are good and that boy Tom...
Tom's great.
That Gilbert is a cute hunk of cadet, but he's no princess.
Why not use a real girl? A local.
A daughter of one of the officers, maybe, to play the part?
There are to be no females in this show.
One woman couldn't hurt.
That's what Adam said, Eve.
No, no, no!
No!
How many times you guys have to be told?
This is a march tempo.
Don't you guys know how to march?
All right, come on, give me a pickup.
And go.
And go!
Now, you got the idea?
Try it. Once more.
Hit it.
Sorry we were late, sir.
It's about time you prima donnas got here. What's the excuse?
- Lacrosse practice, tried to get here.
- I had mathematics.
I was attending intercollegiate student forum on geopolitics.
- You see, sir...
- Don't "sir" me. I'm a civilian.
And you, princess, the beauty parlor?
Problem in fluid mechanics, sir.
The 300-ohm resistors and the venturi tubes are giving me trouble.
- That's a new one.
- Mr. Bixby, I'd like to explain, sir.
We have to do this show on our spare time.
- Rules and regulations.
- Rules and regulations.
All I wanna do is get a show on and get out of here.
All right, girls, places.
Fast, fast. Come on.
Hit it.
No, no, no!
Quiet. Quiet. Quiet!
This is murder!
Murder.
Call a rehearsal and 50 percent of the company's absent.
Punishment chores, studying for a quiz...
...lacrosse, venturi tubes.
I've heard a great deal about the discipline in this joint.
You're supposed to be famous for it.
Well, I haven't seen a sign of it in connection with this show.
There's more discipline in a broken-down burlesque troupe...
...than you have up here with all your salutes, your "Yes, sir"s, your "No, sir"s...
...your fancy uniforms and parades.
Discipline in the theater means being on time.
Getting the job done.
Rehearsal is called for 2:00, it's not 2:01 or 2:02.
If an actor is late, he apologizes to the entire company.
If he's late a second time, he's fired.
Now, two of you men have taken the trouble to put together a good show.
A show worthy of Broadway.
Well, if it's worth doing at all, it's worth doing well.
And if it weren't...
...I wouldn't have stayed here 24 hours.
So from here in...
...punishment chores can wait, studies can wait, lacrosse can wait.
And we'll throw out some rules and regulations.
Rehearsal is called, you'll be on time.
You'll know your words and you'll know your routines.
You're gonna work harder than you've ever worked.
I'll show you what discipline is.
Because I don't like this brass-hat factory, and I never expect to like it.
Tell him not to go away mad, just go away.
Quiet. Quiet!
The next guy that opens his kisser gets thrown out of the theater.
That's final.
That goes for each and every one of you.
- Is he always this violent?
- The Army did it to him.
It started when he asked for a size 8 shoe...
...and they gave him a 12.
Never been the same since.
Catch me on this.
And, princess, you and the rest of the girls watch.
We'll take that again.
See what I mean?
Discipline.
Gentlemen, this conduct of Mr. Bixby's cannot be tolerated.
But, sir, the men don't seem to feel it's entirely Mr. Bixby's fault.
It takes time for an outsider to get to know West Point.
That I can understand, but this request is very unusual.
Unusual, yes, colonel, but not without precedent.
George M. Cohan did it to get material for a play.
Damon Runyon for some newspaper stories...
Gentlemen, I'd like to read you some excerpts from Mr. Bixby's record in the Army.
"During four years of active service,
Elwin Bixby fought two wars...
...one against the enemy and one against the Army.
He'd gripe from reveille to taps.
He was insubordinate to all ranks...
...and he went AWOL so many times, it was impossible to keep count.
In Africa, he sold a B17 to an Arab for a crate of eggs.
He swiped mattress covers and pillowcases from QM supplies...
...and sold them to Arabs for Sunday suits.
And after being missing for two weeks, he was found in residence in a harem."
This was quite a man.
"He was ordered court-martialed five times, always bluffed his way out.
But his courage was incredible.
In Italy, he saved his company...
...from being trapped by superior enemy forces.
In France, when action became dull, he went AWOL...
...and joined the French underground.
He was wounded twice.
He was awarded the Distinguished Service Cross...
...the Silver Star and the Mdaille Militaire.
He was finally promoted to the rank of sergeant...
...but for an infraction of a rule, was broken back to private...
...on the day of his discharge."
A very interesting career.
You are at the
United States Military Academy.
You take a sock at a cadet...
...you're taking a sock at the United States government.
Now you're barred from the post.
Come in.
- I have news for you.
- What did they say?
- Are they gonna let him stay?
- That depends.
They took the case to the commandant's office.
He was pretty reasonable about it.
He realizes that punch-happy over there isn't the first civilian to come up here...
...with a chip on his shoulder.
And he's willing to give Bix another chance.
Well, they figure if Bix got to know them better...
...he might get to like them better.
Who wants to like them better?
You see, Harry, it's no use.
That ham always...
Shut up. Yeah, what else, doll?
Well, on one condition would they allow him to stay:
They have invited him to become one of them.
- I told them he'd do it.
- You told them what?
I accepted their invitation for you to become a cadet.
You what?
You heard me.
And I just accepted an invitation for you to go over Niagara Falls in a barrel.
Now, who goes first?
Eve, darling, you're wonderful.
I love you.
Look, Bix, this is great.
You move right in, you become one of them.
Go to work on the boy...
...the boy discovers what he's got, what we can do for him.
- Work on what boy?
- What?
Oh, well, you know, Hal and Tom.
You know, to make them good in the show.
Oh, Bix, you'll become a cadet.
What do you say?
What do I say?
No!
No, he says.
Oh, Eve, why do you put up with him?
Harry, you think that job in Las Vegas is still open?
If it isn't, I'll open it.
Stop off if you're passing through
Las Vegas.
I'll put in a good word for you if they need an extra busboy.
Now, Eve. Eve...
Las Vegas.
You reached way out into left field for that one, didn't you?
And now I should become a West Point cadet.
I think it's a great idea.
Really, a great idea.
We still got a deal.
Bixby. Hey, Bixby.
- Reveille.
- Cut it out. Cut it out. Cut it out.
Reveille, Bix, you have to be in formation by the two-minute bell.
The middle of the night.
Out of the sack, Mr. Dumbjohn.
You don't sleep all day.
- Gee whiz, now, fellas...
- Close your window.
- Yeah, sure.
- This way.
Come on, mister, move.
This your gear? Come on.
Hut, two, three, four.
Hut, two, three, four.
Hut, two, three, four.
Attention.
A company present and accounted for.
What are you, the tail gunner, Mr. Do-willy?
About-face.
About-face.
Now, let me see you function.
Put a brace on those shoulders,
Mr. Ducro.
Stretch up from the top of the head.
Touch my hand.
Break forward.
Pull in that chin.
More. More.
Why can't you pull in that chin?
- Don't taste nice.
- Don't answer me.
Now, look military, Mr. Dumbjohn.
Suck up that gut.
Pop that chest up in the air.
Lift it up. Lift it up.
Straighten that cap.
You were instructed to get a haircut.
See that it's done.
Report to my quarters after recall.
Do you keep those clippers on the ice?
It's all part of a plebe's life, Bix.
Anyhow, it'll be over...
...when upperclassmen shake your hand and recognize you.
- How many lights in Cullum Hall?
- Three hundred and forty, sir.
Next, how many gallons in Lusk Reservoir?
Ninety-two and 210 million gallons, when water's over the spillway.
What do plebes rank?
The plebe rank, the commandant's dog, the superintendent's cat...
...the hellcats and all the admirals in the cockeyed Navy.
A 12:00 boy in a 9:00 town, that's me.
There's another thing
I don't like about this place.
Too much buttoning and unbuttoning.
- All right, 641?
- All right, sir.
- All right, 642?
- All right, sir.
- Hey...
- All right, 643?
- All right, sir.
- Everybody in a rut around here?
- What is this "all right" business?
- Oh, it's a bed check.
When you answer "all right," that means everyone's present.
- They take your word for it?
- Certainly.
At West Point, your word is your honor.
Now, the definition of leather, they'll be sure to ask you that one.
And put some soul in it.
The definition of leather.
And put some soul into it, right.
If the fresh skin of an animal, cleaned and divested of all hairs...
...fat and other extraneous matter...
...be immersed in a dilute solution of tannic acid, a chemical compound ensues.
The gelatinous tissue is converted...
...into a non-putrescible substance impervious to and insoluble in water.
This, sir, is leather.
Beautifully done, Hal, beautifully done.
Only one thing wrong.
Not enough straw hats.
Harder.
Although I am a princess,
I'll be happy to marry you...
Let's hear it. Let's hear it. Come on.
This whole business will follow me for the rest of my life.
- I can't say that.
- Put a "sir" on it, understand?
- Yes, sir.
- You are a princess.
A princess, and he's a GI.
You met in Europe and fell in love.
Why, I don't know. Don't know.
He's asked you to marry him and live in Brooklyn.
You hear? Now, get up.
Suck up that royal gut.
Extend that lovely little pinky.
Attaboy. Now, give us a lovely, lovely smile with those pearly-white teeth.
You're a doll. A doll.
All right. From the beginning.
I wanna talk to you, Tom.
Why, Hal, that's sweet of you to ask me.
I'd love to.
Doing a little research, doll face?
Look, son.
I've been wanting to talk to you.
- Yes, sir.
- Talk to you about your future.
I think you should give it careful consideration.
Just something that you don't, you know, pass over lightly.
I wanna know, what are you gonna do with that voice of yours?
Sing the regiment to sleep?
What do you mean?
You have an annuity in your throat.
Why don't you cash in on it?
Go into show business.
My uncle been talking to you?
Only from the floor.
Look, son, I've been working with talent all my life.
All I've got to do is listen once and I know. Now, you've got it.
Where you got it, how, don't know.
But what are you gonna do with it?
Are you gonna waste that voice on a parade ground singing:
"To the rear, harch.
To the rear, harch."
- Bix, do you like your profession?
- Sure.
Well, I like mine.
Ever since I was an enlisted man,
I considered the Army a profession.
Just like law or medicine.
And that's the thing that people like you and my uncle refuse to understand.
He wanted me to go to work for him.
Well, maybe you should have listened to your uncle.
I wouldn't have listened even if
I'd liked him, which I don't.
Neither do I, that thief.
Now, look...
What I'm about to say to you is just between us.
You and me.
What I wanna do is sign you to a personal contract.
Bixby exclusive.
You'll be working for me and I'll be working for you.
I'll teach you everything I know.
Take a couple of years to bring you along.
Then I'll set you in a Broadway show.
Good part. Good part.
And you'll wind up with a lousy fortune.
- Thanks, Bix, no sale.
- No?
When I graduate from here in June,
I've an obligation to the government.
But you could quit. People have been known to change their agents.
But you don't quit West Point, Bix.
You don't even get busted out.
Unless you break some strict rule or regulation.
Like violating honor, or getting found in your studies...
...or getting married.
You see, Bix, what the gentleman is trying to tell you is no.
Well, think it over, you might change your mind.
No, not a chance.
But don't think I'm not grateful.
Well, that wasn't only a brush.
He threw in the comb and mirror.
I like that kid. I like them both.
I heard you.
I saw that huddle you were in with Hal.
- Yes.
- He's going to drag me.
By what?
He's taking me to the hop.
I'm gonna be his little old drag.
- And where do you suppose I'll be?
- Plebes aren't allowed to attend hops.
And you're just a little old plebe.
Little old plebe just got an idea
Little old plebe just got an idea
Little old plebe just got an idea
Come in.
Well, Mr. Dumbsquat, what do you want?
- Cadet Bixby reporting to ask a question.
- Proceed, Mr. Bixby.
Well, sir, I was just wondering...
...if you were dragging anyone to the hop Saturday night.
Why? You got any ideas?
Ever hear of Jan Wilson?
The movie star?
- Why, sure, who hasn't?
- Friend of mine.
That's the kind of friendship
I'd like to make.
At ease, Mr. Bixby.
Well, sir, you see, I kind of helped her up the golden ladder.
She's in New York.
I might be able to coax her up here.
As my drag?
I could try.
And you might persuade her to play the princess in the show.
Wouldn't you rather make love to her than Bully Boy Gilbert?
Start persuading, Mr. Bixby.
I didn't sleep again last night
And I'd like to discuss the matter
The nerves to which I'm strung are tight
And I'm as beat as a bowl of batter
If old man Rip Van Winkle
Thought his long sleep was a curse
I know how the old man felt
Because I've got his problem in reverse
Ten thousand
Four hundred and thirty-two sheep
How long can I toss like this?
Ten thousand
Four hundred and thirty-three sheep
What did you put in that kiss?
I've tried all the remedies
The well-known good advice
Took a hot tub and an alcohol rub
Did the alphabet backwards twice
Ten thousand
Four hundred and thirty-four sheep
We'd better get married soon
Ten thousand
Four hundred and thirty-five sheep
I'll never hold out till June
How much do I love you?
Just in case you didn't know
You get a mental kiss
With every sheep I count
And I've still got a million sheep to go
- Did you ever try seeing a doctor?
- A doctor?
I went to see a noted doctor
Who's a famous analyst
And he led me to the couch
And he gently took my wrist
I paid him $50
- Well, that sounds pretty cheap.
- Cheap? I should have paid him nothing.
'Cause I still can't sleep
Ten thousand four hundred
And 36 sheep
And one sheep that got away
He took it on the lamb.
- Ten thousand four hundred
- And 38 sheep
Won't night ever turn to day?
Oh, what a fool I am
How much do I love you?
Just in case you didn't know
You get a mental kiss
With every sheep I count
Add them all together
That's a large amount
- 'Cause I've counted a trillion sheep
- How many?
- I've counted a billion sheep
- How many?
Well, at least a million sheep, I know
How the numbers grow
And I got about a million more to go
Ten thousand, 9000
Eight thousand
Seven thousand
Six thousand, 5000
Four thousand, 3000
Sheep.
Hey, Steve, will you get the door, please?
- Thanks, boy.
- Bix!
- Well...
- Of all people...
- Hello.
- I'm so glad to see you.
What's this uniform?
- Are you the doorman here?
- Lower than that.
Superintendent's dog, commandant's cat, hellcats and all the admirals.
- What?
- All right, boys, everybody out.
Walk, don't run to the nearest exit.
Women and children first.
I'm rehearsing for a record date tonight.
All these men are from the press.
Leave your names.
Anything comes up, we will call you.
Wait, I'm handling things here.
I'm the press agent.
Your secret is safe.
Now, join the others like a good boy.
- But wait a minute...
- Yes, all right, fine.
I'll do the same for you sometime.
Jan Wilson, Jan Wilson.
Hollywood hasn't done a thing, not a thing...
...to tarnish that unspoiled loveliness.
Oh, that haircut.
This you'll have to sit down for.
Sweetheart, you're in for a shock.
- What?
- Yup. I...
- Oh, no.
- Oh, yes, yes.
I'm a West Point cadet.
- You're a what?
- Yeah.
If things are bad,
I'd better unload my government bonds.
I had to get in the act.
I'm putting a show on for them.
The place will never be the same, old boy.
I had to bring you the news.
I took a poll up there to find out who's the top favorite...
...of the movie stars among all the cadets.
All 2500 of them.
And who do you think they picked?
Who?
- You, Jan Wilson.
- Really? Oh, isn't that nice?
- Vindicated my judgment.
- What's your angle?
- What's your angle?
- Angle?
You've always got one. What is it?
Oh, now, Jannie.
All right, all right.
I do need a favor.
They're giving a hop for the cast next Saturday night.
All great kids, great kids.
- And I made them a promise.
- What?
- I promised you'd appear.
- I've got two recording dates...
...three personal appearances, radio broadcasts, interviews.
- I can't do it.
- Can't do it, huh?
Well, I can't find the time to do it.
All right.
All right.
- But, Bix...
- Oh, it's all right, it's all right.
Just don't worry about a thing.
Bix, I'm sorry.
Oh, I said it was all right.
All right. I gave it the old college try.
But just think of me when you're counting your money.
But I said I was sorry.
Oh, well.
Look, sweet, I thought you might as well have these.
The dancing shoes you wore the day I took you out of the chorus.
You didn't tell me you saved these.
Oh, well, how many stars can a guy make in a lifetime?
But you can't blame a fella for being sentimental.
I went without lunch a whole month to buy them.
Then you didn't know what to do with them.
Remember that first time step
I showed you?
- Air taps.
- Oh, don't tell me I looked like that.
That was on your good day.
Now, here was one you never could do:
Move over, old boy, watch this:
- Oh, now, look, sweetie.
- What?
Life isn't all taking. There comes a time when you gotta do a little giving.
It isn't as though we were absolute strangers.
You just can't let old friendships go unheeded.
And, pal, I do need a favor.
All right, I'll do it.
There's my girl, my girl.
Knew all the time you wouldn't let old Bix down.
Knew it all the time.
My studio's gonna blow a fuse.
It'll be more fun than making a living anyway.
Why, you phony, no-good, two-timing character.
- Oh, Bix, it's just like old times.
- Oh, no. Your aim is better.
I can't believe it.
Somewhere along the line,
I must have been a very good boy.
Now that I'm here, couldn't we dance together?
Someone may walk between us, you know.
- Buttons, they're guided missiles.
- I see what you mean.
Changing the guard, sir.
Every time I see you in that uniform,
I break up.
Cute, don't you think?
What cooks?
You didn't bring me up here just for laughs.
Step into my office.
Now, look, sweet.
That cadet you were just dancing with, Tom?
- That is Harry Eberhart's nephew.
- He is?
Now, I'm gonna bust that kid out of this joint.
But when I do, he's not gonna sign with his Uncle Harry.
He's gonna sign with Bixby.
And what felony do you want me to commit?
I want you to give the kid a taste of show business.
She's here, all right, but why?
- Well, didn't you know?
- No.
Well, Bix got her to come up as a blind drag for Tom...
...and Tom got Bix special permission to come to the hop.
Now, tonight, he's gonna ask you to be in the show.
I told him to do it.
And when he starts selling, baby, you start buying.
I came up here for one night, not to make a career out of this.
Now, didn't we say that this was time for a little giving?
And just think, just think...
...the first dame ever to be in a West Point show.
Do you think I can swing it?
With what you have to swing?
Start swinging.
I thought you might enjoy a little refreshment.
Say, that's nice. For you.
After you, sir.
- Do your boys have this?
- Yes.
When she comes up here, give her an introduction...
...and send her right into it, huh?
- Right.
You did a number in your last picture, the "Military Polka."
- We liked it up here.
- Oh, thank you.
- How about doing it for us now?
- Oh, really, I don't want to sing now.
- Come on, they'd enjoy it.
- But I didn't bring my music.
Please.
- All set?
- All ready.
Put your arms around her shoulder
When the order's "Shoulder arms"
Take a full, firm grip
Of the lady and her charms
If her heart is your objective
You can win it right away
When they play the "Military Polka"
"To the right flank" is the order
And the dancers gaily twirl
- Then it's:
- Left about-face
So you face your neighbor's girl
But you turn back to attention
Love's the order of the day
When they play the "Military Polka"
Hut, two, three, four
Hut, two, three, four
Hut, two, three, four, here they go
See those military men in line
See their uniforms
Their buttons all a-shine
It's amazing how erect they stand
And your heart begins to beat
Begins to beat to beat the band
And the band's terrific
It's positively great
When they play for marching
And when they syncopate
Get set
Fall in
They're all set to begin
Hut, two, three, four
Hut, two, three, four
Hut, two, three, four
Put your arms around her shoulder
When the order's "Shoulder arms"
Take a full, firm grip
Of the lady and her charms
If her heart is your objective
You can win it right away
When they play the "Military Polka"
"To the right flank" is the order
And the dancers gaily twirl
- Then it's:
- Left about-face
So you face your neighbor's girl
But you turn back to attention
Love's the order of the day
When they play the "Military Polka"
See the dancers marching forward
Straight across the ballroom floor
If he steals a kiss
All is fair in love and war
From now on there's no retreating
'Cause you'll fall in love to stay
You can bet your boots
You'll all be recruits
When they play the mil...
Military
The "Military Polka"
- Would you like a little air?
- Fine.
You see, up here, every spring, we put on our show.
- Well, that's the musical without girls.
- That's right.
- Not much fun in that, is there?
- Well, we have to break out sometime.
Sort of celebrate the end of the gloom period.
Look what I've done.
I'm all thumbs.
I'll get it.
What's the name of that song they're playing?
- Oh, that's the ballad from our show.
- Is it? Sing it for me.
No, no, I'm out of my class.
You're used to professionals.
Oh, come on. Tonight you may lose your amateur standing.
You love me
The miracle of miracles
You love me
In every dream
You seem so unattainable
It's not explainable
And yet you're mine
You're mine
Believe me
Believe me
I'm sure this heart of mine
Would not deceive me
And even if you never say it
This I know is true
You love me
Just as I love you
Tom, that was just wonderful.
Oh, and I love that song.
Really, your voice just thrilled me so...
Here. Don't spill it.
Kiss her.
Kiss her!
Not on the hand. No.
On the mouth.
Look.
Like that.
- What's that?
- That's "Army Blue."
It means we have exactly one hour to get back to barracks before taps.
Will you please tell me what this is all about?
You know that idea you had about the local playing the princess?
I've thought it over. It's positively great.
That's not a local, that's a movie star.
And she's cadet-happy.
And the cadet is movie-star-happy.
And in about five minutes...
...they'll be on Flirtation Walk.
Doesn't that make you wish you were young again?
I suppose you know this crooked little path is famous.
This isn't the road that's paved with bad intentions, is it?
- Rocks in your shoes?
- Feels like a whole quarry.
I'll get it.
Wonderful little pebbles.
Scattered in the most convenient places.
Slows down the enemy...
...and brings her into range.
Something tells me
I'll be safer as a moving target.
Warn you: Flirtation Walk gets darker.
Also previously arranged?
You know, the girls sometimes call this Temptation Walk.
Tom, you know, you really have a beautiful voice.
What are you gonna do with it?
You know my uncle too?
Well, yes, but you can't throw away talent like yours.
You could have a great career.
You could be a star.
Well, right now I'm concentrating on a star on my shoulder.
Incidentally, Tom, it was nice of you to ask me.
It was wonderful of you to come.
Oh, I mean about the show.
- Do you really want me?
- Want you?
Well, I mean, if you do,
I could arrange my schedule.
That'll be wonderful.
- And what a lovely princess you'll make.
- Thank you.
Well, what do you know.
By a fortunate coincidence, we're under the Kissing Rock.
Nice maneuvering, general.
- Now what?
- Well...
You've been kissed, I know
In the very last row
When the love scene is on
At the movie show
But wait until tonight
And you'll be kissed but right
By the Kissing Rock
It's a lovely spot
And believe it or not
If you just care a little
You'll care a lot
So let's dispense with talk
And take Flirtation Walk
To the Kissing Rock
Now, a girl once refused to kiss a lad
And the lad was a man of honor
He warned her she'd make
The rock real mad
And the legend is the rock fell upon her
That was years ago
And it must have been so
'Cause from that day to this
Not a girl said no
- And that's the story of
- Whoever falls in love
By the Kissing Rock
- What's this for?
- You're supposed to put it on.
And now, so the rock won't fall down and kill us both...
It's just a legend.
Oh, it's a lovely legend.
And a wonderful timesaver.
Would you stop making a Supreme Court case out of nothing?
- Out of nothing?
- Yes.
How much did Eberhart promise you to come up here?
Now, look, sweetheart,
I've been doing this all for you.
- For me?
- Yes.
Why do you suppose
I'm in this usher's outfit?
Because I like to play soldiers? No.
All right, I'm gonna get the kid busted out of here.
Does he know what he's got?
No. But you know, and so do I.
There's gold in them thar tonsils.
After I've had him a while, we'll own a hunk of the mint.
He doesn't want a hunk of the mint.
I do.
And to get it, you're willing to upset this boy's life.
All his hopes, plans, happiness.
And you brought me along to help you.
- I've got your future to think of.
- Not mine, you haven't.
Of all the miserable, rotten, contemptible tricks.
Even for you, this is a new low.
- Oh, now, sweetheart...
- Don't "sweetheart" me.
This time, I thought you might be on the level.
Well, you're hopeless.
Making you one of the crowd hasn't changed you a single bit.
I'd stick around if I thought I could stop you from ruining that boy's life.
But I can't compete with movie stars.
- Let's go inside and talk it over.
- No.
I'm going inside, and tomorrow
I'm going back to New York.
Go back to your barracks before you're late.
If you don't, they'll throw you out...
...and you won't get your boy, nor your hunk of the mint.
Oh, Eve.
Mr. Bixby.
Yes?
What are you doing out of your room after taps?
Have you a pass?
All right.
"All right"?
He shouldn't be saying "all right."
He hasn't got a pass.
At ease, Mr. Bixby.
Mr. Bixby, we've got trouble.
My girl is walking out on me and you've got trouble.
You gave your word.
You said "all right" when you came in, and you had no right to say it.
You weren't authorized to be out after taps.
So I said "all right." What are you gonna do, shoot me at sunrise?
I don't get up that early.
Mr. Bixby, not so long ago,
I heard you talking about your theater.
Its discipline and traditions.
Well, at West Point, we have ours too.
The heart of it is the honor system.
You give your word, we take it.
But by what you did tonight, you dismissed it as unimportant.
Now, that may not mean anything to you.
Now, look, son.
There was no intention of hurting anybody.
But you did, you hurt us.
We vouched for you. We went out on a limb for you and you sawed it off.
You mean to say that you two personally vouched for me?
That's right, Tom and I.
By special permission, Mr. Bixby...
...you were allowed to become a member of the corps of cadets.
That's a privilege rarely granted to an outsider.
But you were absent without authority and you lied about it.
That's unforgivable up here, and we can't let you get away with it.
Nobody knows better than we do...
...how much you've done for our show, and we appreciate it.
But since you can't live here as we live here...
...then we can't have you.
West Point has no need for you.
I see what you mean.
Sir...
...Cadet Bixby reports himself late from hop without authority.
Okay, Mr. Bixby.
There he is.
Elwin Bixby, walking punishment tours.
He's on the level.
We have a way of knowing up here.
Look, Eve...
...we need him almost as much as he needs you.
If you walk out on him, you walk out on us too.
How about it?
Hey, Bix.
I think she's gonna stay.
All right. Okay, fine, take five.
Hal, I wanna talk to you.
Up to here, show's good and solid.
A lot of good entertainment.
But I think, right about this time, we need a change of pace.
Now, audiences don't only see and hear.
They feel.
Really feel, and that's where we're letting them down.
Now, they should hear your songs.
They should feel what West Point means.
Its history, its tradition, its great men.
- You wanna do that in one number?
- They can't shoot us for trying.
We've got the material, the songs and the poems.
I'll tell you what we'll do.
We'll open with the glee club singing "The Corps."
The corps, the corps
The corps
To the long gray line of West Point, to its gallant companies.
The corps bareheaded, salute it
With eyes up thanking our God
That we of the corps are treading
Where they of the corps have trod
In the beginning, as in all things, it was only a dream.
But the dreamers had names, like Washington...
...Hamilton, Jefferson.
They stood on a point of land on the west bank of the Hudson...
...and planned that this fortress that guarded our newborn nation...
...should become our military academy.
The corps was founded...
...and the father of our country became the father of a legend.
A tradition.
What made this dream become the magnificent reality that is West Point?
Duty, honor, country
For a cadet to become an officer, he must have an understanding of duty.
Duty
He must have respect for honor.
Honor
But for all his duty and all his honor...
...a soldier fights not only because he is told to fight...
...but because there is something to fight for.
His country.
Country
Duty, honor, country.
This is why the dream materialized into the stone and steel...
...and spirit that is West Point.
A dream that can be measured by the names of its giants...
...striding through the pages of American history.
Giants whose voices rang so loud that the entire world trembled...
...yet who once were cadets, marching nervously across the plain.
Cadets like Lee, Grant...
...Pershing, MacArthur,
Wainwright, Arnold...
...Patton, Bradley, Eisenhower.
And thousands of others who left this point on the Hudson...
...to end their earthly lives in the dirt and mud of foreign lands.
Men who didn't want wars and didn't make wars.
But simply fought them...
...because they had the understanding and the courage to want a free America.
Because, like Washington,
Hamilton, Jefferson...
...they believed in a dream that is West Point.
A legend, a tradition, one of the great guardians of human liberty.
Please, God, may we always keep faith with them, as they have with us.
For duty, for honor, for country.
Let duty be well performed
Honor be ever untarn'
Country be ever armed
West Point
By thee
Fine, fine.
Couldn't ask that you do it any better.
It was fine, thanks.
Just a minute, Mr. Dumbjohn.
- Mr. Gilbert, do your duty.
- On-stage, Mr. Dooley, on-stage.
Come on, boys. What goes, what goes?
Take me into your confidence. What is it?
Mr. Bixby, every year up here after graduation parade...
...the plebes are recognized by all the upperclassmen.
But since you won't be here, we'd like to recognize you now.
You've taken everything we could give you.
And you were great.
So from now on, you're no longer Mr. Dumbjohn.
You're just plain Bix.
We're proud to know you.
Proud to know you, Bix.
Shake hands, boys.
Good boy.
Wait a minute. Wait a minute, fellas.
I've got a speech too.
Bix, in deep appreciation for everything you've done...
...the fellas in the cast have whipped up this little token.
It's something you'll hold dear to your heart...
...because of your deep affection for all that it implies.
Oh, no, no, no.
Lookie here, now, lookie here.
Well, I'm very happy to see you got one large enough.
From here in,
I won't be able to blow my top.
Come on, now, Bix, don't let the shine on that brass hat put a halo around your head.
Yeah, mighty pretty, mighty pretty.
But I would just like to call your attention to one thing.
Only six stars.
Well, fellas, as a general thing,
I'm not at a loss for words.
But at a time like this,
I can never think of anything to say.
I just want you to know that you've hit me right in the center.
You really have.
Makes me think of a little guy
I used to know out in Brooklyn years ago.
Curious little fella and...
Oh, look, you'll have to excuse me.
My nose gets awfully red.
What are you crying about?
- What's the matter, Bix?
- I'm worried about Tom.
Jan calls him every day. He persuaded her to be princess in the show.
You should have seen his face when he told me about it.
- Kid's on his heels.
- Wasn't that your idea?
Yes, yes, but she's leaving for California on the train tonight.
- Sure, unless...
- Unless what?
- Unless she's fallen in love.
- Not enough time.
It doesn't take very long.
Remind me sometime to tell you about boys and girls.
But wait until tonight
And you'll be kissed but right
By the Kissing Rock
- What's all this for?
- Flirtation Walk.
The rock, the Kissing Rock.
- See? That's the way it's done up here.
- Oh, is that so?
Now, how do you know that that's the way it's done up here?
I've been up here four weeks.
Oh, I see.
Well, beginning tomorrow,
I'm putting you on a short leash.
Well, there it is.
West Point.
There's the chapel. There's Cullum Hall.
And that's the Hudson, of course.
Oh, it's just beautiful.
And this is Fort Putnam.
Built in 1778 to keep away the British.
But it serves a more useful purpose today:
To keep away Mr. Bixby.
Tom, do you know what they're saying in New York?
- What?
- "Jan Wilson has blown her top.
She goes up the Hudson like the Albany night boat...
...to see a soldier."
- No.
- Yes.
Bix, I have the most wonderful news.
Tom asked me to marry him. Look.
Congratulations, Jan. I envy you.
That is not news, that's calamity.
- We love each other, Bix.
- Marriage was not part of the deal.
Tom is at West Point, wives are not standard.
Remember, Cupid...
...you shot the arrow.
He doesn't know what he's doing.
But I'm blowing the whistle on you.
- You're going back to New York tonight.
- How come you're giving out orders?
Do you own a piece of the Academy now?
- Hello?
- Hollywood...
Miss Wilson? Yeah, she's here, hold on.
California.
Hello?
- Jan.
- Speaking.
Jan, what's the matter with you?
Have you lost your head?
Who told you to cancel your personal appearances?
But the New York office approved it,
Mr. Jocelyn.
Did the New York office okay your making a fool of yourself with a West Point cadet?
Now, just a minute, Jan,
I'll do the talking.
I'll tell you about your personal life:
You haven't got one.
You've got a contract.
This studio spent a lot of money to make Jan Wilson a star.
You think we did that just so she could marry an Army officer?
He might get shipped to Okinawa and take you with him.
And we don't make pictures on Okinawa.
I want you back here on the Coast.
You start a new picture in two weeks.
Now, a company car will take you back to New York.
No, no, no excuses.
You leave West Point immediately.
Goodbye.
Bix...
...l'll never forgive you for that.
- Someday she'll thank me.
- What for?
For bringing her up here, messing up her life?
- She's young, she'll get over it.
- She's a woman.
She met someone real and wonderful for the first time in her life.
- Oh, shut up!
- Don't tell me to shut up!
Why not?
Fine, Hal, fine.
Come here, I wanna talk to you.
Look, son, can you arrange to send a car in to New York to get a costume for Eve?
Sure, why?
I went up to the commandant's office and got permission for her...
...to do the Brooklyn number with you.
Hey, that's wonderful!
How did you ever work that?
Oh, he just kept talking and wore the poor man down.
Which, may I say, was not easy.
Bix.
Can I talk to you a minute?
- Tom's checked out.
- He's what?
I found him talking crazy.
Jan walked out.
He's desperate. He's going after her with all his things.
I'm going after him.
- Can you get leave?
- No, I'll get slugged.
- It'll be worth it if I can get him.
- Wait, I'll go get him.
- You may need me.
- All right. Eve, take over.
It isn't as simple as making a choice between marriage and a career.
We have obligations.
I understand your life, darling.
Please try to understand mine.
- But I do understand.
- Tom.
At 15, I was singing in a band.
Making one-night stands when other girls were going to high school dances.
At 17, I had a Hollywood contract.
I'm a commodity now, I'm not a woman.
You know something, Tom?
All my life, I've never known a boy like you.
I guess I never had time.
I've had plenty of time to think things out.
Somehow, being a soldier doesn't seem so important anymore.
Tom, you can't give up your career.
Plenty of people, even you, said I could earn a living in a theater.
- Bixby wants me.
- Bix?
He can't do anything for you, darling.
He can't even get a job for himself.
My uncle wants me for a show.
I'll get a job.
Jan, will you marry me?
I can't, Tom.
I can't.
All there is?
Please go back before it's too late.
- Thought I told you to go to Hollywood.
- Are you out of your mind?
Why are you here?
You're AWOL, you'll get slugged.
- They'll bust you out on your ear.
- Not me. I resigned.
- Resigned?
- You can't resign.
I sent a letter to the superintendent, through channels.
Subject: Resignation. Intention: Marriage.
We've gotta get that letter back.
- You can't, it's too late.
- Oh, no.
Through channels, it takes time to get to the superintendent's desk.
You are coming with us.
There's a plane leaving for California at 9.
You be on it.
Fletcher, Courtland.
- Yes?
- I've got some bad news for you, Fletcher.
I've got an order from the commandant's office.
You and Courtland are to return to your quarters.
You're under arrest.
Okay.
Battalion.
Attention.
"Attention to orders.
By direction of the commandant...
...the 100th Night Show is herewith cancelled."
I say again:
"By direction of the commandant...
...the 100th Night Show is herewith cancelled."
Oh, how are Tom and Hal?
I just talked to them.
They're both pretty low, especially Tom.
Bix, we appreciate your effort to square matters with the commandant.
Too bad it didn't work.
Oh, you know, it's great, really great.
For over a hundred years, this show has always gone on.
Civil War, Spanish American War,
World War I, World War II.
Nothing could stop it.
Bixby comes to West Point:
Forget it.
How about next year? Will you come up again and put on the show?
Too far off, son.
Where is Eve?
I spend half my life waiting for that dame.
We're gonna miss that train.
Eve, come on!
Come on! You wanna miss the train?
Where you been?
I've been doing a little research.
- You what?
- Here, read this.
"U.S. To fete French premier.
General Marcell Donet arrives in New York."
So a Frenchman comes to town.
What can he do?
Plenty. Listen to this:
"The shah of Iran at West Point.
Secures amnesty for cadets."
You see, Bix, amnesty is a famous custom up here.
Royalty, heads of state, kings, queens, all diplomats...
...when visiting West Point are given reviews.
They lay out the red carpet, and in return, they can request amnesty.
A pardon, remember?
Just like the princess bit in the show.
Sure. Last fall, the shah of Iran.
A lot of us were slugged, couldn't go the Army-Navy game...
...he came and got us off the hook.
Well, if Donet can do that for us,
I'll have him up here...
...if I have to carry him all the way on my back.
Now, trick is, how to get in to see him?
Who do we know?
My girl's mother knows the secretary of state.
- My uncle knows Gen. Eisenhower.
- My father knows Gen. Bradley.
- I know Touture.
- One of our best officers.
How many of you have weekend leave?
- All of us.
- Well, then, pile in. Come on.
And you, sweetheart, hold the fort and I'll bring you a Frenchman.
But, David, the whole idea is absolutely impossible.
But, Dad, if you can't do this little favor, what's the use of your being a senator?
Sometimes I wonder.
I wonder myself.
Yes.
Yes, sir. I know, sir...
But will you at least mention it to the honorable secretary of state?
He's in Europe?
Well, whereabouts in Europe?
You can't just brush this off.
This is really important.
- And you tell me you can do nothing.
- I've tried my best, Mr. Bixby.
But the premier is locked up in conference with the president.
He said he's very sorry, but it is impossible for him to see you.
A fine way to treat a taxpayer. Come on.
Hello?
Charlie and I waited outside the French Embassy all day.
We find out the premier went from the White House to New York.
Then we go to New York.
- Take us to the airport.
- Yes, sir.
This is very tragic, monsieur.
But it is impossible for His Excellency to see you.
He's very busy.
- I speak English, monsieur.
- Then you know what this mission is about?
Yes, and it leaves me in the most embarrassing position.
Well, Your Excellency,
I don't wanna take up your time...
...to tell you about the Gls and cadets up at West Point...
...who fought to help liberate France and their friendship with the French people.
Yes, but how come, monsieur?
- I'm a guest of your country.
- Yeah.
Your State Department has made plans for me.
I know, Excellency.
But these cadets need liberation now.
And you are the one man in the country who can ask for amnesty and get it.
You just can't refuse.
If the French people hear about this...
These things do have a way of getting back.
Monsieur, I'm very sorry, but it is absolutely impossible.
Impossible?
Well, didn't wanna do this...
...and I'm very sorry to have to flash that on you.
This is our highest decoration.
Some way or another, monsieur, it will be arranged.
I shall be very glad to be of service.
I didn't know you spoke French.
Picked it up from a chick at the Folies Bergre.
Your request for amnesty shall be granted.
You saved them. Bix, you saved them.
You know, I like kissing you much better than I do the premier.
Do I have to curtsy?
My girl's out there.
My father and mother are out there too.
I'll never live this down.
- Couldn't I just bow?
- And destroy the whole illusion?
Come on, chin up, princess, and suck up that royal gut.
Sir, the princess has arrived.
You love me
You love me
The miracle of miracles
You love me
In every dream
You seem so unattainable
- It's not...
- It's not explainable
And yet you're mine
You're mine
Believe me
- Jan's back.
- Yeah.
Relax, princess, you got a reprieve.
I'm sure this heart of mine
Would not deceive me
And even if you never say it
This I know is true
- You love me
- You love me
- Just as I love you
- Just as I love you
Just think.
If we were only opening with this show on Broadway tonight.
It isn't going to open on Broadway, and never will.
When that curtain goes down tonight, they'll stick it in the archives.
And for all the future I have, they might just as well stick me with it.
How do you like it, Bix, huh?
You look fine, son. Fine.
Don't go far away.
- You'll be on in a few minutes.
- Okay, Bix.
Eve, I've been mulling this thing over.
If that job in Las Vegas is still open...
...I suggest you grab it.
Las Vegas?
Bix, I'm your memory.
I'm your feet.
You can't work without me.
Work?
In a few minutes,
I'm gonna be out of a job.
And jobs are gonna be awfully scarce on Broadway.
- Especially for me.
- You can say that again.
You double-crossed me again.
Tom was almost busted out of this place and you got him back in. Now, why?
Because the kid wants to graduate from West Point.
Being in the Army means more to him than anything else in the world.
Didn't wanna see his career ruined.
- Couldn't have it on my conscience.
- Your conscience?
Oh, that's a laugh.
Now, let me tell you something.
I asked them to give me this play to do on Broadway. I'm gonna get it.
But you're not going to do it.
And do you know why?
Because you've double-crossed me for the last time.
You're through, you're dead, you're washed up.
You'll never work in show business again as long as you live.
I'll see to that.
- I'm through, I'm all washed up.
- For good!
Well, in that case,
I've got nothing to lose.
- Hal.
- Hal.
Hal.
Hal.
Are you hurt, huh? Get out.
- How are you?
- I guess I forgot to duck.
How do you feel?
Do you think you could go on?
- All right, I think.
- You think?
Well, get on your feet and see how you are.
- What is it?
- My knee.
Your knee?
Well, punch-happy, what do we do now?
Go get ready.
Attention.
You there, where are you from?
San Francisco, sir.
- You?
- Well, I'm from Texas.
- How about you?
- Los Angeles.
- You?
- I'm from Boston.
I suppose you're not interested in hearing where I come from.
- What?
- I said:
"I suppose you're not interested in hearing where I come from."
- All right, where are you from?
- Me?
I'm from:
B- postrophe, K-no-postrophe, L-Y-N
They know my shield
From Ebbets Field to Cheyenne
You can keep those other places
Just give me that oasis
Where it's "erl," not "oil"
And a girl's a goil
And goils are goils at 28 paces
B- postrophe, K-no-postrophe, L-Y-N
That's the place I make me home in.
They know my shield
From Ebbets Field to Cheyenne
That's a spot out in Wyoming.
The Manhattanites don't want us
Heap abuse upon us
They will gladly yell we are not Chanel
But Chanel don't smell
Quite like the Gowanus
B- postrophe, K-no-postrophe, L-Y-N
Your mother wears suspenders.
Agree or not
We're just as hot as cayenne
And when they ask
"Are you going my way?"
They're asking you
To take a walk up King's Highway
B- postrophe, K-no-postrophe, L-Y-N
It could only happen in Brooklyn
On a street called Avenue D
If you've never been there
You'll tell me it can't
You'll tell me it's fantasy
But this happened to me
I was walking down to the subway
Yeah, I travel by BMT
When I bumped
Right into a fabulous wench
From some other century
Yes, this happened to me
What a lucky break
That she was going my way
'Cause we strolled down
King's Highway
She murmured:
And I asked her:
"Are you sure?"
It could only happen in Brooklyn
When a he meets up with a she
They get hitched
And after the honeymoon, bam
They're raising a family
This should happen to me
B- postrophe, K-no-postrophe, L-Y-N
They know my shield
From Ebbets Field to Cheyenne
You can keep those other places
Give me that oasis
Where it's "erl," not "oil"
And a girl's a goil
And goils are goils at 28 paces
B- postrophe, K-no-postrophe, L-Y-N
Agree or not
It's just as hot as cayenne
It matters not
What stuff you've been reading
Brooklyn is the U.S.A. 's
Garden of Eden
B- postrophe, K-no-postrophe...
- Manhattan!
- What?
- Listen!
- Who said that?
- We!
- No.
Canarsie!
B- postrophe, K-no-postrophe, L-Y-N
My home
Brooklyn!
Wonderful, Eve.
Oh, Bix, you were great, terrific.
- Thanks. How do you feel?
- Fine.
- Leg all right?
- Sure.
- You able to do the finale?
- Right. Thanks.
Don't thank him. The ham loved it.
Bix.
- All is well?
- Oh, better than that.
- That's fine, princess, fine.
- Just call me Mrs. Second Lieutenant.
- I think we'll be stationed in Brooklyn.
- Still better.
Miss Eve Dillon and Mr. Elwin Bixby.
Eve, Bix, we really wanna thank you.
West Point wants to thank you.
You once said you'd like to produce this show on Broadway.
Well, on behalf of the
United States Military Academy...
...we'd like to present you with the book...
Rudy?
- And the songs from this 100th Night Show.
It's yours.
- Take it with you and make it a hit.
- Well, I just wanna say that...
...nothing like this has ever happened to me before.
But then, ever since I've been up here...
...every day's been Christmas for me.
Makes me think of a little fella
I used to know in show business years ago.
A curious little guy, and...
What I'm trying to say is
I'm deeply, deeply grateful.
This is the finale
We have finally come to that time
Better known as coat-and-hat time
Here's the place
We get to face your cheers or hisses
This is the finale
It's where the whole cast freezes
Which means reprises are coming up
A reprise is a thing that we sneak in with
We repeat the songs
You hated to begin with
By the Kissing Rock
By the Kissing Rock
Either night or day
All around the clock
You can depend on this
It's always time to kiss
- By the Kissing Rock
- By the Kissing Rock
See the dancers marching forward
Straight across the ballroom floor
If he steals a kiss
All is fair in love and war
From now on there's no retreating
'Cause you'll fall in love to stay
When they play the "Military Polka"
He's from B-postrophe
K- no-postrophe, L-Y-N
That's the place I make me home in.
B- postrophe, K-no-postrophe
L- Y-N
And now that it's over...
...l'll sure miss the going to classes.
Miss you cadets, yes, the brasses.
So take my thanks to all the ranks, with love and kisses.
This is the finale
The end
[ENGLISH]
Yes, ladies and gentlemen, we are in luck today here in Los Angeles.
Through the years, the Bullwinkle Galleries... have brought up for auction... many collections of the personal effects of your famous movie stars.
But today, today is indeed a red-letter day.
The personal effects of Tony Hunter!
Lot 94.
Ladies and gentlemen, let's start out with Lot 94.
Some of the potpourri of Mr. Hunter's own personal costumes... that he used in his famous dancing-singing pictures.
Remember this?
Perhaps the most famous top hat... and stick of our generation.
Yes, the one he used in Swinging Down to Panama... and all his other famous pictures.
Let's start with $5. Do I hear $5?
It's worth a lot more.
All right. Let's start with 2.
Well? Fifty cents?
Anything?
Just one more for the road.
About 20 minutes to New York.
Bottoms up.
- So you're from California?
- That's right. Sunny Cal.
- Sunny Cal?
- Yeah. Sunny Cal.
Say, you're from Sunny Cal. I bet you know a lot of movie stars out there.
I got to confess.
I'm just like you and me.
- Only get to see them in the movies.
- Ha, ha.
But I read about them.
I know all about them.
Boy, I'd sure like to meet that Ava Gardner.
- You're a little late. She's married.
- Yeah.
- You know this one?
- Who's that?
- Tony Hunter.
- Oh, him. The singing-dancing fella.
My wife used to go see all his pictures.
Almost broke up our home.
"Tony Hunter! Tony Hunter!"
He was good 12 or 15 years ago... but the columnists out there say he's through.
Through? He's washed up.
Hasn't made a picture in three years.
- Did you say something, mister?
- I said I agreed with you.
That Tony Hunter's a has-been.
- Got a match?
- Yeah.
I wouldn't go to see him if they gave away $5 bills with the ticket.
Yeah.
We should be pulling...
The funny thing about what you're saying, boys, is that it's absolutely true.
Here. Have an exploding cigar.
- This the last of the bags, Mr. Hunter?
- Yeah.
Say, porter... could you see that they get put in a taxi...
- ...and taken up to the... Plaza Hotel?
- Yes, sir. Thank you, sir.
Everybody's getting off, sir.
If you don't mind,
I'll just sit for a minute or two.
You couldn't just... make up my berth for the night here, could you?
No, sir. I couldn't do that.
There's a mob of reporters and photographers out there.
Yep. There must be some big shot aboard.
Maybe the president.
No, too many for that.
Probably a movie star.
- Hi, fellas.
- Tony Hunter! Hello, Mr. Hunter!
Thanks for the red-carpet bit.
I didn't expect it.
- What brings you to New York?
- Just fooling around.
- Between pictures, Tony?
- In a manner of speaking.
Didn't I read something in Variety about you going into a show?
Lily and Les Marton had something planned for me. I haven't decided yet.
I haven't been on the stage in a long time.
And you get into a different medium.
- What it actually is...
- Here she is!
- Excuse me, Mr. Hunter.
- See you later.
Hi, Miss Gardner.
Miss Gardner, hold it, please?
Smile pretty. Thanks.
- How long you going to be in town?
- I have no definite plans.
Tony! I had no idea you were on the train.
This is a surprise.
You going to be here long?
- Perhaps a week or two...
- Excuse me, Miss Gardner.
Could the boys get one more shot of you coming out the door?
Honestly, isn't all this stuff an awful bore?
- Good to see you, Tony.
- It's nice to see you.
By the door, please, Miss Gardner.
Once more! Here we go! Thank you.
Miss Gardner, my paper would like to do a Sunday feature on you.
Those poor movie stars.
People just won't let them alone, will they?
No. I don't know how they stand it.
I'll go my way by myself
Like walking under the clouds
I'll go my way by myself
All alone in a crowd
I'll try to apply myself
And teach my heart how to sing
I'll go my way by myself
Like a bird on the wing
I'll face the unknown
I'll build a world of my own
No one knows better than I, myself
I'm by myself alone
Tony Hunter! There's Tony Hunter!
Rah-rah, Tony, Tony Hunter
Sis-boom-bah, yay
Did you kids paint those signs just for me?
That's cute. Piggy.
Let's get rid of this stuff.
This is the biggest surprise I've had.
- Mister, can I have your autograph?
- You certainly can, gal, come here!
That's my wife. Let go.
Don't worry.
I'll get around to you in a minute.
- Who's he?
- Never saw him before in my life.
- Hello, piggy!
- Hello, yourself, you two-headed creep!
Why didn't you say when you were coming?
We had to ask your agent.
- Why didn't you send us a wire?
- I wanted to sneak in quietly.
Believe me, I didn't have any trouble.
I want to see if you've changed in a year.
No, Les, you haven't changed a bit.
You look desperately ill, as usual.
- What'd you have to say that for?
- Just kidding.
I've been feeling terrible all day.
Kind of faint, lightheaded, a lot of pressure here, queasy inside...
- ...my pulse...
- You look great.
As for you, that New York pallor is like a breath of fresh air.
You're too pretty to be a successful writer and much too pretty to be married to that.
That's the prettiest compliment
I've had all day!
Come on, you two-headed lovebirds, there's work to be done!
- Now I have here a script of a show!
- Les, you didn't bring it.
It's great. It's the best thing we've ever written.
Take it, boy. Smell it!
You can tell it's good.
There's a great part in it for you, nice little parts for us.
Wait. This boy must be starving.
Let's take him to Sardi's.
Only two blocks more, then Sardi's.
- Shall we tell him, Lil, the big surprise?
- You tell him, Les.
Who do you think is going to do the show?
Only the greatest director-producer in town, Jeffrey Cordova.
- Who?
- Jeff Cordova.
We're meeting him tonight, backstage, right after the show.
- What did you say his name was?
- Jeffrey Cordova!
You're not serious.
I don't think he ever heard of this fella.
What's the matter? Don't you get newspapers back in California?
This genius directed Man in a Mousetrap...
The Lost Nymph, and did them both while starring in Oedipus Rex.
He's got three hits running, and he's starring in one of them.
Only one?
This fella's fabulous, phenomenal, fantastic! He can do anything.
- Has he ever directed a musical?
- Oh...
What's the difference?
He can do anything.
He's theater.
He's a new kind of theater man, Tony.
The theater's changed.
Lots of things have changed.
They certainly have.
What's happened to 42nd Street?
I just can't get over it.
I just can't understand it.
This used to be the great theater street of the town. The New Amsterdam.
I had one of my biggest successes there.
Ran a year and a half.
Noel Coward and Gertie were here in
Private Lives in the Selwyn.
Strictly carriage trade, nothing but the finest.
First show I ever did was at the Eltinge, and I don't believe that's here anymore.
- Oh! Oh! Oh!
- What's the matter?
- I think he broke my leg.
- Can you put your weight on it?
- I'll try.
- I'm sorry! I didn't mean it.
- Okay, forget it.
- Let's get him a cab.
Taxi!
Here, let me carry you.
My dear man, it's entirely my fault and I apologize.
Here's for your trouble.
Lean on me.
- I can stand anything but pain.
- You'll be all right.
It's swelling. I'm getting a hematoma.
The blood is spurting out.
I want some cold compresses!
Not hot, but cold.
Listen, you go over to Sardi's.
I'll see you later.
Driver, take them on over.
Order me a steak.
I'll see you in a few minutes.
Excuse me.
I'm just a little bit fuzzy.
Wasn't this formerly the Eltinge theater?
What are you doing in there?
When you feel as low
As the bottom of a well
And can't get out of the mood
Do something to perk yourself up
And change your attitude
Give a tug to your tie
Put a crease in your pants
But if you really want to feel fine
Give your shoes a shine
When there's a shine on your shoes
There's a melody in your heart
With a singable happy feeling
A wonderful way to start
To face the world every day
With the deedle-dum-dee-dah-dah
A little melody that is making
The worrying world go by
When you walk down the street
With the happy-go-lucky beat
You'll find a lot in what I'm repeating
When there's a shine on your shoes
There's a melody in your heart
What a wonderful way to start the day
Now there's a shine that you get
In the barbershop
There's a shine that you get
In the Pullman car
There's a shine that you get
In the pool room
There's a shine that you get
In the school room
But it doesn't matter where you get it
It'll do a lot of good if you let it
A little bit of polish will abolish
What's bothering you
When there's a shine on your shoes
Melody in your heart
Singable happy feeling
Wonderful!
Got a shine on my shoes
Got a shine on my shoes
Got a shine on my shoes
Got a shine on my shoes
Got a shine on my shoes
Got a shine on my shoes
Got a shine on my shoes
Got a shine on my shoes
Shiny shoes! Shiny shoes!
Shiny shoes! Shiny shoes!
Shiny shoes! Shiny shoes!
Shiny shoes! Shiny shoes!
I got a shine shoes
Shiny shoes! Shiny shoes! Shiny shoes!
Shine, shine, shine, shine on my shoes
I got a shine on my shoes
I got a shine on my shoes
I got a shine on my shoes
I got a shine on my shoes
Got a shoeshine
Got a shoeshine
Got a shoeshine
Got a shoeshine
Got a shoeshine
Got a shoeshine
Got a shoeshine
Got a shoeshine
Yeah! Hooray!
In such a time, indeed
You must reap doubly
With a twofold pain
Kind friend, you alone are faithful to me.
Blind though I am...
I know that you are here, and your voice is known to me.
Oh, man of dark deed
How did you find the heart to blind yourself
But deliver to all?
Apollo, friends! Apollo!
Come near me.
Lay your hand upon a wretched man.
Do not fear.
My plague can touch no one but me.
Seize me and drive me out!
Send me, for God's sake, to some distant spot!
Conceal me! Kill me!
This guy is going to direct a musical?
This guy can do anything.
Therefore plan
For to death shall watch life's hand
And can't all happy till thee pass
The earth away
Sweetie, we start on the left foot!
Always the left!
The whole exit depends upon...
Lily, darling! How are you?
Lester, how am I doing?
- Jeff, this is Tony...
- Excuse me.
Underneath it all, very simple.
Isn't he wonderful?
Listen. Order me a corned-beef sandwich, will you?
Lean, now, no fat, no gristle.
And a cream soda and a pickle.
- Mr. Cordova wants a...
- Stay right here. It's all right.
That maniac. Honestly! Say, Hal?
- Yes, Miss Marton.
- The maestro wants his...
I know. The corned beef.
It's in his dressing room already.
Hal, this is Mr. Hunter.
- This is Hal Benton, Jeff's manager.
- Nice to meet you.
- I'm a great admirer of yours.
- Thank you.
- When did you get in town?
- I got off the train a couple of hours ago.
- Wasn't that curtain slower tonight?
- It was my fault. I'm sorry.
No, don't change it. Keep it that way.
It's wonderful. Doubles the applause.
- This is Tony Hunter.
- How do you do?
Sorry, kids. Be with you soon as
I get out of this sackcloth and ashes...
Max, what happened to that amber spot?
It was way off.
Must have more light on me there.
Don't let us keep it a secret
I'm in the show.
- Excuse me.
- Hello, sweetheart.
- You look wonderful.
- Thank you.
Hal, call a full dialogue rehearsal, will you?
Friday, for the full company.
Sloppy diction. The original was in Greek, but this is in English.
Don't let us keep it a secret it's in English.
I want to catch the matinee tomorrow...
- ...of Man in a Mousetrap.
- Can't do. We got a drama lecture...
Never mind. We'll work it out somehow.
Jeff, this is Tony Hunter.
Yeah, I know. We just met.
Mr. Hunter.
- I beg your pardon.
- I'm glad to know you.
So happy to meet you.
You have no idea how delighted I am to see you.
- Delighted and thrilled.
- Thank you.
We need our theater greats right here.
So when Lily and Lester said they were doing a show with Tony Hunter... that's all I had to know.
I'm dropping every other project, and there are plenty, believe me.
That's wonderful, Mr. Cordova, but all this... The classics...
- Do you really want to do a musical?
- Musical, musical!
I'm sick of these artificial barriers between the musical and the drama.
In my mind, there is no difference between the magic rhythms... of Bill Shakespeare's immortal verse and the magic rhythms... of Bill Robinson's immortal feet.
Hal, write that down.
I'll use it at Princeton.
It's already down.
You used it last week.
I tell you, if it moves you, if it stimulates you... if it entertains you, it's theater.
When the right combination gets together and it spells theater...
I got to be right in there up to my armpits.
That's higher than usual.
Now, that's what I wanted
Tony to hear you say.
I tried to tell him how you feel, but I knew that you could say it so beautifully.
Lily, you splendid animal.
Take your hands off my wife and let's get down to business.
Now I have here a script.
It's great. It's ready to roll.
Jeff, I want you to take this home.
I want you to read it tonight...
But before I do, give me a rough idea of the plot.
- Now?
- Throw it at me for a quick impression.
- I'm dying to hear it.
- You tell it.
- You do it so much better.
- Lester, honestly.
- Please, Lily, tell them.
- Lester, honestly.
With Tony in mind, we naturally visualize a light and intimate show.
We want to give him a chance to play a charming guy, with just enough plot... to make him do lots of gay and varied numbers.
He's a writer and illustrator of children's books... but to get in the real dough... on the side, he writes lurid murder mysteries... full of violence and buckets of blood.
The success of these makes him feel he's sort of... sold his soul to the devil, but he keeps on doing it.
There's lots of comedy implications with his friends, played by us.
- With his girl.
- I love this. Terrific possibilities.
And some of the best numbers we've ever written!
Children's playground, a reform school,
12 showgirls playing softball!
- And a number about a murder mystery!
- You two are the end.
- Tony, I'm so glad!
- Some of the best lines we've written.
What do you think, Jeff?
Kids, you're geniuses.
The whole thing is a brilliantly imaginative idea.
Why, Jeff!
You've hit on something that's not only great as a musical... but valid in terms of today, of modern life.
Jeff, I'm so glad!
Of course, these modern thrillers, he's got to keep turning them out.
They make him fame, money. He's caught.
It's a funny situation.
Of course! It's brilliant, contemporary, perceptive.
This story's a modern version of Faust.
- Faust?
- You're kidding, Jeff.
I guess I didn't tell it right.
I didn't bring out the point.
But you did bring out the point admirably.
You used the phrase:
"He sells his soul to the devil."
Now, that's the line you have to follow straight through.
Just like Faust, this man is tempted by the devil... and his compromise, his sellout, must end in eternal damnation.
That'll leave them laughing.
Kids, you've got a choice here between a nice little musical comedy... and a modern musical morality play... with meaning and stature!
- But we don't want to write Faust.
- You're taking me too literally.
I want to do your story. I love it!
But I want to angle it to bring out the analogy... between the Faust legend and this man's story.
Won't this make it heavy?
Is this a box-office idea?
Is Faust box-office?
Listen, Faust by Christopher Marlowe,
Faust by Goethe, Faust by Gounod...
Faust by Hector Berlioz.
I tell you, anyone who's touched this legend has turned it into a gold mine.
It's got to be a smash.
It could still have all the fun in it, couldn't it?
- Yeah, and some stature thrown in.
- Now, kids, I'm happy about this.
- Really happy.
- So are we, Jeff.
This publisher you mentioned... obviously, he could be the counterpart of the devil.
Evil personified!
Leading all mankind into the paths of temptation!
- But nobody could play it like you.
- Nobody's going to.
You mean you're going to play it?
The part of the girl... Somebody fresh.
Somebody with fire, charm, grace, beauty.
Gabrielle Gerard.
- Gerard? She's a ballet dancer.
- She doesn't want to do a show.
- She turns them all down.
- Nobody ever turns me down.
Do you really think you could get her?
What a cast!
Tony Hunter, Jeff Cordova,
Gabrielle Gerard! Tony! Isn't this exciting?
Yeah.
Now, look, this is going to be a sort of modern Faust story.
I play the Faust character. You play the Devil. It'll have stature, importance.
- I have to dance with this ballet dancer?
- She's wonderful.
It'll be great.
It'll be great for somebody.
I'll pick up my marbles and go home.
Fellas, bless you and good luck, but this just ain't for me.
I know what I can do, and I'm sticking to it.
That's the trouble. You've stuck to it, and you're stuck with it.
- What?
- Nobody admires you more than I.
I've seen every show and every movie you've ever done... but let's face some brutal facts.
Times have changed, Tony.
You haven't changed with them.
- You've gone stale.
- Then you certainly don't need me.
Yes, we do!
Because you can be greater than you ever were!
We are going to make you explode on the theater scene like a skyrocket!
Not just the old trademark, with the top hat, tie, and tails... but a great artist at the peak of his powers.
The new Tony Hunter. Tony Hunter, 1953!
- But can I do it?
- It's a challenge to all of us... but that's what the theater's about: a challenge.
Whatever I am, whether it's a new me or an old me... remember, I'm still just an entertainer.
What do you think I am?
What do you think they are?
What do you think the theater is?
It's all entertainment!
Believe me, there is no difference between the magic rhythms...
- ...of Bill Robinson's immortal feet...
- You said that before.
All right, what did Bill Robinson do?
He danced on the stairs, didn't he?
Now I happen to play Oedipus the king on the same stairs.
What's the difference?
We're all theater.
Show me the greatest tragic actor... or the lowest red-nosed comic in burlesque... and I'll show you an entertainer.
We're all...
Jeff, are you all right?
Everything that happens in life
Can happen in a show
You can make 'em laugh
You can make 'em cry
Anything, anything can go
The clown with his pants falling down
Or the dance that's a dream of romance
Or the scene where the villain is mean
That's entertainment
The lights on the lady in tights
Or the bride with the guy on the side
Or the ball where she gives him her all
That's entertainment!
The plot can be hot
Simply teeming with sex
A gay divorce who is after her ex
It could be Oedipus Rex
Where a chap kills his father
And causes a lot of bother
The clerk who is thrown out of work
By the boss who was thrown for a loss
By the skirt who is doing him dirt
The world is a stage
The stage is a world of entertainment
That's entertainment!
All right!
That's entertainment!
Look what I can do.
It's still me!
The doubt while the jury is out
Or the thrill when they're reading the will
Or the chase for the man with the face
That's entertainment!
The dame who is known as the flame
Of the king of an underworld ring
He's an ape who won't let her escape
That's entertainment!
It might be a fight
Like you see on the screen
A swain getting slain
For the love of a queen
Some great Shakespearean scene
Where a ghost and a prince meet
And everyone ends in mincemeat
The gag may be waving that flag
That began with a Mr. Cohan
Hip hooray, the American way
The world is a stage
The stage is a world of entertainment
- You gone yet, Hal?
- I'm in here, Jeff, on the phone.
Drama desk? Hello, Mike. It's Hal.
You know that item Mr. Cordova sent you about signing Gabrielle Gerard... for the Marton show?
There's been a mistake.
I wonder if there's still time to kill it.
- Yeah. I'd appreciate it. Thanks, kid.
- Why did you do that?
To save you from making an idiot of yourself in print.
- You know you can't get Gerard.
- Why?
Because Paul Byrd won't let her do a show. He's a tough customer.
He's not only her choreographer, he's also her boyfriend.
She doesn't make a move without him.
That will be Paul Byrd now.
- It's 3 in the morning.
- Let him in, Hal, will you?
- Hello, Paul.
- Where are they?
He's in there.
Hello, Paul.
- Where is he?
- Who?
- Oscar Hammerstein.
- Home in bed, I hope, at this hour.
- Who is it? Dick Rodgers?
- What are you talking about?
Didn't you say the greatest producer of musicals today... was here and wanted to see me?
- That's me. I'm doing a musical.
- Did you get me out of bed...
I see what this is all about.
You needn't go any further because the answer is no on Gabrielle Gerard.
Gabrielle... Paul, I don't follow you.
Gabrielle is not going to do a show.
She's too important to ballet.
This has nothing to do with Gabrielle.
Paul, I want you to do the choreography for the greatest musical in years.
Oh. Oh.
- I'm sorry...
- That's why I wakened you, Paul.
I'm so keyed up I just can't sleep.
You know how brilliant the Martons are.
This time, they've excelled themselves.
This show is a choreographer's dream, and only you can do it.
- I wouldn't say that.
- No time for false modesty.
You're the greatest, and we know it.
This is just your meat.
A great classic theme.
The story of Faust in a modern setting.
Say, that sounds interesting.
I've never been so excited about a project in my life.
Now, there's Tony Hunter, myself, a great score by the Martons.
Wonderful. My brain's beginning to churn already.
Good. Now we must comb the country for a wonderful singer for the girl.
Singer? Jeff, don't you think we ought to stress the dancing in that role?
No, Paul.
This girl has to be a virtuoso performer, with fire, charm, beauty... a great lady with a gamine quality.
You know no dancer can give you that.
Wait. Of course I wouldn't let her do it, but Gabrielle has all that and more.
Gabrielle? Paul,
I feel a little embarrassed.
I think she's charming, within her limitations. Charming.
She's a great artist, and you know it.
- Sorry. I know how fond of her you are.
- That has nothing to do with it!
She can be one of the greatest stars in the theater.
Everybody's been trying to get her.
For the right vehicle, something light and fluffy.
Light and fluffy? Now, see here, Jeff.
I'm not gonna do this show unless Gabrielle Gerard plays that part!
Now, Paul, this throws a little monkey wrench into things, doesn't it?
Never mind.
You and I will work together sometime...
Wait. At least do this. You come and see her in the ballet tomorrow.
- Bring Hunter, bring the Martons.
- No. Impossible.
I have a performance.
But I'll gladly send the Martons.
We can get together afterwards and talk.
Mind you, I'm promising nothing.
Good night, sweetie.
Drama desk?
Mike. Hal again.
Better print that item after all.
And, Mike, after this, if Mr. Cordova tells you he's casting Tallulah... for Little Eva, believe him.
Well?
She's fabulous, sensational, loveliest thing I've ever seen.
A little tall, isn't she?
Stage illusion.
So you didn't care for it much?
The girl's fantastic, beautiful... but I can't dance with her.
Stop worrying!
It isn't that I don't appreciate what she does.
I tell you, I know she's magnificent.
That's what scares me.
But I haven't done ballet since I was a kid. I'd look silly.
Hello, Lil. You look wonderful.
Put your things over there.
Hello, Mr. Hunter. How are you?
- Hello, Les. Glad to see you.
- How are you?
What is this?
The annual fur trappers' convention?
- The boss is inside with big money.
- His backers?
- They're raising money for the show.
- What show, ours?
- Sure.
- He hasn't read the script yet.
- I better go back...
- Sorry, Mr. Marton.
You disturb the water, you scare the fish.
They're biting tonight.
- What's he telling them?
- Whatever it is, it's going over big.
- Come on, Lil.
- Please don't go in yet.
Wait here.
He's saving you for the finale.
Excuse me.
- Lester, isn't this wonderful?
- Yeah.
- This is going to be great, Tony.
- Why?
Cordova. The dough for the show.
No problems.
How many times did we have to audition the last time?
- Fifty.
- A hundred, maybe more.
Jeff might raise the backing tonight.
We'll be ready to rehearse in three weeks.
- Hello, Hal.
- Hello, Paul. How are you?
How nice to see you. Come right in.
Hal, this is Miss Gerard. Mr. Benton.
How do you do?
Jeff's inside with the backers.
Why don't you wait in the library?
- Excuse me.
- Thanks.
Paul.
Let's wait in here a minute?
Now, wait a second. I'm not ready yet.
There's a lot to be cleared up first.
This girl Gerard, it's not just her dancing.
On top of everything, she's too tall for me.
This girl is a giantess.
She's not too tall for you.
I know this girl.
She comes up to here, maybe 2 inches shorter.
You know I'm the perfect height for you.
Now look... turn around. Measure. Look.
You see? Isn't that fine?
Listen. Gabrielle Gerard in her stocking feet is at the most 3-feet tall.
Now relax. I'm going to find you a drink, and you can stop worrying about her.
Jeff only wants her in the show because she's the best.
We all gotta go along with him too, Tony.
In the show, one guy's got to be at the helm... and in Jeff, we got someone we can trust to... it is the Devil, come to claim the soul of the modern Faust man.
With flapping wings and grinning evil eyes... he points the way to the yawning pits of Hades.
Hallelujah.
- I'm embarrassed.
- Don't be childish.
I'm sure Tony Hunter doesn't want me in this show.
- What makes you say that?
- Did he come backstage to see me... after the performance?
He knew he was going to meet you here.
- I'm just a ballet dancer...
- You're a famous leading ballerina.
What does he want with me?
He's a famous movie and stage actor.
He's practically a historical character by now.
Dancing with him is like dancing with a statue of General Grant.
Now look, Gaby.
You know, this is a Cordova show.
It's an important step for you.
I'm going to do the choreography, so there's nothing for you to worry about.
But I still think he doesn't want me in the show.
Your nose is shiny.
- Where's the?
- Maybe this is it.
He passes by all the writhing souls in torment paying for their deadly sins.
Gluttony, avarice...
It must be upstairs.
Lester, what have we got ourselves into?
The story he's telling them has nothing to do with the story we wrote.
This will mean months of rewriting.
He expects us to go into rehearsal in three weeks?
Brimstone and flames. Save me.
Corrupter of children.
Purveyor of evil. Dungeon... bubbling cauldrons.
Fiery furnaces of doom.
- You're...
- And you're... How do you do?
How do you do? It's certainly a...
- We've been waiting for you in there.
- We just got here.
We just got here ourselves, about five minutes ago.
A little early, I guess.
Mr. Cordova's busy.
Yes, I know, and I rushed so to get here.
- I'm a mess.
- No. You look wonderful.
- Will you have a cigarette?
- No, thanks. I don't smoke.
- Never?
- I don't think a dancer should smoke.
I see.
- Is anything wrong?
- No.
- Pretty shoes.
- Thank you.
You always wear high heels?
No. Not always. Sometimes toe shoes.
Toe shoes.
I'm afraid I've been awfully rude.
I haven't told you how wonderful you were tonight.
Thank you.
I'm a great admirer of yours too.
- I didn't think you'd ever even heard of me.
- Heard of you?
I used to see all your pictures when I was a little girl.
I'm still a fan. I recently went to see a revival of them at the museum.
Museum?
"Step right this way, ladies and gentlemen.
"Egyptian mummies, extinct reptiles... and Tony Hunter, the grand old man of the dance."
I didn't mean...
I want you to know that I can still thread a needle without my eyeglasses... and still occasionally do a soft-shoe shuffle.
Nothing balletic, of course.
You're not a ballet devotee, are you?
Yes. I was going to the ballet before you were born.
I saw Pavlova, Karsavina, all the real ballet greats.
You don't see dancing like that nowadays. I'm sorry.
That's okay. I don't expect you to class me with Pavlova.
In fact, if she were around...
I doubt if she'd be good enough to dance with you.
You'd probably insist on an audition first.
I sure would.
I'd audition my own grandmother.
Then why don't you audition mine?
She'd be just about right for you.
- I'm terribly sorry.
- No, you're not.
- No, I'm not.
- Neither am I.
Good.
- Paul, I'm leaving.
- What's the matter, darling?
I can't work with that man.
He's impossible.
We just got here. It'll look funny...
The whole thing is off.
This girl is a monster.
I have definitely had it.
And now, ladies and gentlemen, the brains, the talent, the artists.
Wonderful. Aren't they wonderful?
You have no idea how well things are going.
It's really wonderful.
Ladies and gentlemen.
I want you all to meet the happy little group... that's responsible for the show... that everyone will be clamoring to get seats for next season.
The celebrated choreographer Paul Byrd.
The authors you know:
Lily and Lester Marton.
Take a bow, Lily.
And, ladies and gentlemen... my star, Tony Hunter.
A name, a talent.
Mr. Show Business himself.
And, ladies and gentlemen, his new leading lady.
That glamorous, delightful dancer from the magical world of ballet.
Mr. Hunter's own personal choice,
Gabrielle Gerard.
I think, gentlemen, you will agree your investment is safe, yes?
Now let's relax and have a drink, shall we?
My dear, how do you authors ever think of these brilliant ideas?
That damnation scene.
Did you ever in your life hear...
My boy. I had the pleasure of backing your last show too.
Jeffrey. How about?
There it is, folks. The work light.
Only an electric bulb, perhaps, but for the next four weeks... that will be our sun, our moon, our stars.
These four walls will be our universe, our private world.
We enter with nothing but a dream, but when we leave... we'll have a show.
In between, there will be enthusiasms, frustrations, hot tempers... ha, ha, cold coffee.
Some of us will fight, some fall in love... but all of us will work and adore it... because all of us are inspired by the same thing.
The night that curtain goes up, it will go up on a smash hit.
And believe me, kids... there's nothing in the world as soothing... as a smash hit.
What do you think this is, summer stock or something?
Go!
That's it. That's wonderful.
Why didn't you do it before?
Good, men.
Honey, would you try that cross, please, again for me?
"The same kind of opportunistic snake that he is."
"You got me wrong.
I'm a self-made snake.
"Listen, baby, we all live by the jungle:
Eat or be eaten.
"I just realized that I like to eat, and to eat caviar whenever possible.
"Anything wrong with that?"
"Anything wrong with that?" A bad line.
What we need is some quick image, like "spreading ideals on a cracker."
You all like that? "Ever try spreading ideals on a cracker?"
Let me hear it, Tony.
Did you ever try spreading ideals on a cracker?
- Jeff. I don't...
- Honey, just try that cross again for me.
"The same kind of opportunistic snake that he is."
"You got me wrong.
I'm a self-made snake.
"Listen, baby. We all live by the law of the jungle..."
- Excuse me, Tony.
- "...eat or be eaten."
Pardon me, folks.
You know about icebergs, don't you?
One-eighth above the surface, seven-eighths below. That's you.
You're giving me only that one-eighth.
I'm greedy. I want more.
All eight-eighths. Now let it rip, Tony.
Give it too much. Go way over.
Come along. The whole eight-eighths!
Okay, Gaby. Same place.
"The same kind of opportunistic snake that he is."
You got me wrong. I'm a self-made snake!
Listen, baby. We all live by the law of the jungle: Eat or be eaten!
And I realized that I like to eat, and eat caviar whenever possible.
Did you ever try spreading ideals on a cracker?
Good boy, Tony.
That's it. Eight-eighths.
- Sorry. Butterfingers.
- No. It's not your fault, Tony.
It's an awkward pattern.
I have a better idea.
You hold your position right here, and Jimmy... suppose you pick up Gaby like that, and put her down... right here next to Tony?
Now you see, Tony...
I'd like to practice it with her two or three times.
I think I could handle it.
Do you mind if he tries it with Barbara?
These are new toe shoes.
They're killing me.
Sure. You go ahead and rest.
Barbara, come here. Try it.
I think this is what's throwing you off.
If you hold your balance so, like this, then grab her here by the...
Paul, I think we're making a mistake here.
I think we're wasting Tony in this scene.
He's got the first-act finale right after this. The damnation scene.
I don't want to dissipate his impact in that.
Now, why not let him exit into the house and watch it from his balcony?
- How'd that be?
- Wonderful idea.
See what that would do?
Save your sock for the finale.
Much better that way.
Let's go back to the beginning positions. Gaby.
Boys, get around up here, and the girls, yes.
You were down here in the line like that. Not too close.
This group's down here, you're up there.
- Let's try it this way.
- No!
Let's not try it this way or any other way.
I have had enough. I've had three weeks of these lovely rehearsals... three weeks of Chinese torture.
I don't know what you're trying to do... except make me look like a complete fool. A clumsy idiot.
I've tried. For three weeks, I've tried.
I've taken everything.
I've watched my part being changed, my numbers being cut out day after day... and I haven't said a word.
Got to be cooperative, think of the good of the show.
Let's get this straight:
I am not Nijinsky.
I am not Marlon Brando.
I am Mrs. Hunter's little boy, Tony, song-and-dance man.
I'm supposed to have entertained millions of people in my time.
And I am not entertained by this little ballerina's snide insinuations... that I am a no-talent hoofer.
I am sick of her superior smirk.
I'm sick of her.
I'm sick of Faust. I am sick of this show.
Never mind saying it!
Tony Hunter, 1953.
I hereby declare my independence.
Tony Hunter, 1776.
Bless you.
- Lester, where are you going?
- I don't know. I was...
What's happening to us? Let's try to keep our heads. It's only a show.
I know. I'm sorry, baby.
So am I. Let's try to be sensible about it.
- Do you think we should try to find Tony?
- I don't know. What do you think?
- Maybe we should.
- But Jeff said not to.
And, of course, you mustn't disobey teacher.
Right or wrong, someone has got to be at the helm.
But to you, he's 100 percent right every time.
If you say one more word to me about Jeff's hypnotic influence on me...
- ...I'll scream.
- He's got you so bulldozed...
Someone's liable to think we're quarreling.
We're not quarreling.
We're in complete agreement.
- We hate each other.
- Unh!
Joe, tell Mrs.
Marton I've gone to Tahiti... to paint.
- Hello, Mr. Hunter.
- You must have the wrong apartment.
No. I came to see you.
May I come in a minute?
Please.
I... was just about to slip into my bed of nails.
Oh.
I'm terribly sorry.
That's all right. You couldn't have done it if I hadn't softened it up for you.
- What?
- Nothing.
- Cigarette?
- No, thanks.
That's right. Dancers shouldn't smoke.
- You mind if I do?
- Yes. I mean, it's all right.
Thanks.
How lovely.
I've never seen such wonderful prints in a hotel.
They don't belong to the hotel yet.
They're mine, and they're originals.
Oh.
Don't let that throw you.
I don't know any more about art than I do about dancing. I'm just a Hollywood actor.
I call my agent and say,
"I've got a wall to cover.
"Send me over 20 feet's worth of paintings in assorted colors."
That's a very early Degas, isn't it?
Yeah. I swiped it from his desk in school. Was he sore.
What can I do for you?
I know. You demand an apology.
Okay, let's cut it short. I apologize.
No, don't do that.
I'm supposed to apologize to you.
- Oh...
- I mean...
I see, the fellows got together, stuck a gun in your back...
No, it was all my idea.
I just wanted to tell you that...
All right. It was Paul's idea.
Why do I let him push me around?
What do I want to apologize to you for anyway?
You've been mean to me.
You didn't want me in the show in the first place.
What?
And you think
I'm a dime-a-dozen ballet dancer.
No.
And this whole thing's making me a nervous wreck and no show is worth it.
I wouldn't apologize to you in a million years.
Now, don't do that. Please, just calm down. Now take it easy. Look.
I thought I was the only nervous wreck around here... and all this time you've been behaving...
I've behaved horribly to you, and I know it.
I'm not used to behaving horribly.
It's a big strain.
You just misunderstood me, that's all.
I think you're terrific.
I think everything in the show is probably terrific, except me.
I've been scared to death of you... and scared to death of every last kid in the chorus.
Don't be nice to me.
It just makes me seem twice as ugly.
I'd say you were more plain than ugly...
- ...but at least you've got talent.
- Thanks.
Now look, Gaby. It's just plain silly... that we have never sat down and talked this out.
We are the only animals given the greatest means of communication... human speech.
- And all we do is snarl at each other.
- I know.
We're from two different worlds, two eras... but yet we're supposed to dance together, work together.
No one consulted us... but we're the only things that matter in this whole thing.
Not those geniuses out there, telling us what to do.
You're right.
We have to do the performing.
We're the ones that have to get up on that stage...
- ...and make idiots out of ourselves.
- Tony, is that what's going to happen?
No. Of course not.
Things are going to be fine.
I have a feeling that everything is going to be much better from now on.
Yes, I know, but...
Can you and I really dance together?
I don't know.
Let's find out.
- Taxi, sir?
- Yes, please.
- El Morocco, please.
- No.
Stork? Waldorf?
No. I'm not dressed.
I just came from rehearsal.
- I can't go to any of those places.
- You look fine to me.
- Never mind. Thanks.
- Thank you.
- Where to, sir?
- Leave it to the horse.
Look, trees.
Yes, I remember now, dimly. Trees.
And isn't that called grass?
And, look, there's the sky.
This has all been here... the whole time we have been shut up in our little sweatbox of the arts.
Really? Amazing.
Do you know what those are on those benches? People.
Happy people.
Would you believe it?
They don't even care... whether we have a damnation scene in our show or not.
Neither do I.
You can't get it into the elevators.
And you take this one here, and it won't fit the finale.
- How are we doing?
- It's a disaster.
We're in terrible trouble.
We just can't open in three days.
I told you from the beginning, you are overloading the show.
You can't get all this scenery in the theater.
- Why isn't this hung?
- We've been hanging all night.
You've got more scenery in this show... than there is in
Yellowstone National Park.
Never mind. Get your blueprints.
We'll go have a conference.
Everything will work out all right.
Hold it. I scored for brass, and all I hear is flute.
I don't want so many long bows.
Lester, I gotta cut 16 bars out of that dance.
Sixteen bars! Hey, Lil.
All right, I'll make the cut.
Page to page.
Would you ask Lily if she approves the cut?
- Lil, how about this cut?
- It's fine.
Okay, Lester. Let's give it to her.
This'll sound like hash. I better put some chords in for transition.
Wait, just a minute.
Sublime, time, dime, slime...
You can't hear Tony in Lovelier Than You.
- I'm already holding down the orchestra.
- Maybe the key's too low.
Ask Lester if Tony can take it a key higher.
About Lovelier Than You,
Les, a key higher?
Don't you see I'm trying to make a cut?
The key's perfect.
- But Lily said you'd make the change.
- The key is...
Everyone on their toes for the transformation scene.
- We're not ready.
- Perfectly all right. Next.
Watch it.
I'll cue you for the transition music.
Isn't it great? Herman.
Everybody ready back there?
We got to have more time to make the change.
- I've got to have 16 more men.
- I got elevators...
Do the best you can.
All right, everybody. This is it.
Men in the elevators, watch the signal lights for your cues.
Switchboards. Stand by to come down your number one batten on cue.
Girls on stairs, take your positions, but don't be frightened.
Men in armor, light your chandeliers.
All right, make this great, everybody.
Don't forget, it's the first-act finale.
Are you guys all right in there?
Now, watch your cue.
Light change.
Revolve.
This is going to be beautiful.
It will be a memorable moment.
Memorable.
Yes.
This is real theater.
Everything's smooth as silk.
No, Herman, that doesn't go up, it goes down. Take it down.
What is this? Herman!
I don't think you've got your cues right!
No, stop!
That one doesn't go down, it goes up.
Take it up.
For heaven's sake, look at your cue sheet.
Take it up. No, not me.
Herman, this cable has fouled.
Calm down. Don't let us lose our heads.
This is a setback, but that's what we come out of town for.
We'll never make it work.
Of course it will. You boys get together, think of something brilliant.
You can't put Gaby on that thing.
It's dangerous. I won't allow it.
It's all right. After all, we expected to strike a snag or two.
Get the full company in the lounge for dialogue rehearsal... while they're clearing the stage.
We can't afford to waste a moment.
Here. I'm sorry. I forgot.
That help?
All right?
If you've quite finished, let's try this.
We're going to get the stage soon.
You don't know it yet.
Paul, I'm afraid Gaby's kind of beat.
Nobody's had any sleep for two nights.
Can't you let her rest a while?
If you don't mind, Tony,
I've worked with her for many years.
I happen to know her a good deal better than you do.
All right, Gaby. Come on.
Madame, may I have this dance?
Cut the clowning. It's not going to seem so funny tomorrow night.
All right, Adam.
Okay, Paul, they're ready for you on-stage. Come on.
This is the big moment.
Hal, come on. Take it over there.
Tony, Gaby, this is it.
I want it to be outstanding.
It must be beautiful, fabulous, warm, and fiery.
Your cue is, "Dance, fools, dance!"
You and the night and the music
Fill me with flaming desire
Setting my being completely
On fire, fire, fire
You and the night and the music
Thrill me but will we
Be one
After the night and the music
Are done?
Until the pale light
Of dawning and daylight
Our hearts will be throbbing guitars
Hal, it seems to be a little too much, doesn't it?
Yes.
Are we really supposed to open tomorrow night?
"Dance, fools, dance!"
Hello, there! It's a big night.
Everybody is here from New York.
Simply everybody.
Do you hear that, my dear?
Everybody from New York is here.
Come on. Don't want you to miss the overture.
Think we should get ready, boys?
No, we can finish this hand.
Nobody's made a pep talk yet.
Pep talk?
Yeah. I never seen an opening night yet without some guy... gets all the poor actors together and makes them a long speech:
"They should be brilliant."
On-stage, please. Everybody on-stage.
Mr. Cordova wants to say a few words.
Come on, girls. Hurry up. Let's go.
Step right along.
Company, a final word.
You've all been just wonderful.
Thanks for your cooperation.
Tonight, we're about to perform before an audience in a theater.
It's not only a temple of the arts, but a place of business.
And I feel we have here a venture that is successful on both counts.
Nothing to be nervous about.
We've got to keep our wits and do a show.
There will be rough spots, but we'll smooth them out.
Remember, that's what we came out of town for.
Up to now, I've been giving you orders as director... but when next you see me,
I shall be just as one of you... an eager ham, anxious to make good.
Actors, let's go.
All right, people.
Get ready for the tableau, girls.
Finish your make-up.
Come on, girls. Let's go.
I'm so glad you folks could come.
And don't forget the big party at the hotel after the show.
The whole cast will be there.
You'll meet them all.
Of course, I have to go backstage to congratulate them afterwards.
I'll see you all at the party.
All New York is here.
Big party at the hotel after the show.
I'll look for you. Big party, big show.
Come on, now.
We don't want to miss a thing.
Now, don't forget the party.
Evelyn, big party at the hotel after the show.
I'll look for you.
Champagne's on me.
Shall I drive you to the hotel, sir, to the party?
No. Drive me to the station.
Maybe I can still make the 11:40 back to New York.
Yes, sir.
- Good evening.
- I was looking for The Band Wagon party.
This is it, sir.
This way, please.
- Are you leaving, sir?
- Yes. Good night.
We must do this more often.
Oh, give me something
To remember you by
When you are far away from me
Some little something
It's all Annie's fault.
I should have listened to my mother.
She told me only to be in hit shows.
Hi, I don't want to barge in.
I just want to tell you all how great I think you are.
I didn't get a chance to know you very well.
- I'm sorry I messed up the show for you.
- Wait a minute, come on in, have a drink.
- I don't want to crash the party.
- Give Mr. Hunter a drink.
- What do you say, Scotch, rye, or beer?
- Beer's fine.
- One beer, coming up.
- Want some pizza pie?
How about a sandwich?
We've got ham and deviled egg.
I've had enough of both for one night.
Far away
Me, oh, my
Only yesterday
There we were, the whole act, the 10 Tapping Troubadours.
The 10 Tapping Troubadours?
Yeah, believe it or not... we were stranded in Pittsburgh with $3 between us... crammed into one room the size of that closet.
Gaby, come on in.
We're having a good old-fashioned wake.
I've been looking all over for you.
Where is Paul?
He's at a very exclusive wake with Jeff and the Martons.
Can I get you a drink, Gaby?
How about a beer?
How about some popcorn?
Tony!
Lily, Lester, come on in.
Are you sure? Don't you remember?
We wrote that thing.
This is a wonderful party. Come on in.
Who's going to go out and get the beer?
Okay, Sis, you're elected.
Tony, watch this!
More beer!
I'll never forget. You blew a gasket.
You were really gone. Come on.
Come on, Tony. Come on, get with it.
How I love the glass of beer
More beer
- Beer goes very good with beer
- More beer
When I'm drinking beer I'm thinking
"Ach, life is dear"
But there's someone I love
Even more than beer
I love Louisa
Louisa loves me
When we rode on the merry-go-round
I kissed Louisa
And then Louisa
Louisa kissed me
We were so happy
So happy and free
Ach! Ach! But she's a
Beautiful Louisa
Ach! When I choose 'em
I never want to lose 'em
Someday Louisa
Louisa will be
More als just a Frulein to me
- Frenchmen love a glass of wine
- More beer
- The English think the whiskey's fine
- More beer
But when I comb off all the foam off
I drink a toast
To the Germans and the Mdchen
I love most
Ach! Ach! But she's a
Beautiful Louisa
Ach! When I choose 'em
I never want to lose 'em
Ach! Ach! But she's a
Beautiful Louisa
Ach! When I choose 'em
I never want to lose 'em
Someday Louisa
Louisa will be
More than just a Frulein to me
More beer!
More beer!
More beer!
Gosh, with all this raw talent around, why can't us kids get together... and put on ourselves a show?
Maybe we can find ourselves a barn or something, and maybe...
I could stand anything but failure.
- Where's the telephone?
- In there.
Give me Jeff Cordova's room, please.
Hello, Jeff. This is Tony.
Now, don't say anything. Just listen.
I'm here with all the kids, and we've come to a decision.
We're not closing this show, if you can call it a show. We're going on.
We're going to keep it on the road and redo it from top to bottom.
It won't be a modern version of Faust...
Pilgrim's Progress, or the Book of Job in swing time.
It'll be our show, the show we started out to do... the book the Martons wrote, with the songs you threw out.
It'll have laughs and entertainment.
You remember entertainment?
Look, we'd love to have you with us, Jeff.
But if you're not, it won't make any difference.
We're going ahead just the same.
We're going to put this thing across, aren't we, kids?
All right. What do you say?
Hello? Nobody here.
This is the chambermaid, but if you want...
- ...I'll leave a message for Mr. Cordova.
- Thank you, madam.
He isn't in.
Jeff, did you hear what I said?
Tony, I've learned one thing in the theater, and it's this: one man has to be at the helm, the rest take orders.
I believe in what you said. I got carried away in the wrong direction.
You've got to be the boss, Tony.
I think you can pull this off brilliantly... and I'd like to be a part of it.
Jeff, you're all right.
I must tell you one thing.
There isn't any money.
Colonel Todd and the backers have stolen away into the night.
- We've got backers.
- Who?
A bunch of painters.
A fellow named Degas from...
- You wouldn't sell your paintings.
- Sure, they love the theater.
I figure we need five or six weeks on tour to do what we have to do with this show.
- Jeff, would you help us with bookings?
- Of course.
Hal, have you got paper and pencil?
We can send a telegram.
- Washington? Washington's open.
- And Boston.
Boston's very good.
Can we go to Philadelphia, Detroit, then come on back to New York?
- Paul, aren't you excited?
- Yeah. It's wonderful.
I wish them a lot of luck.
- This kind of leaves us out.
- Why?
With Tony doing the dances, it's not going to be my kind of show.
Yours, either.
I don't want you to do it.
I wouldn't think of leaving the show, Paul.
- I've worked too hard on your career to...
- It's my career, and I want to stay.
I'm taking the 9:00 train tomorrow morning for New York.
I expect you to be there.
Have a nice trip, Paul.
Dancers, singers, the sketches.
Listen, kids, it's going to mean rehearsing every day... all day, right up to curtain time.
We're going to put in new numbers, and learn them as fast as we can... and we're going to yank out all that junk.
We've got our schedule all worked out, and it looks pretty good now.
Philadelphia, Boston, Pittsburgh...
Washington, Baltimore...
I see a new sun up in a new sky
And my whole horizon
Has reached a new high
Yesterday my heart sang a blue song
But today hear it hum a cheery new song
I dreamed a new dream
I saw a new face
And I'm spreading sunshine
All over the place
With a new point of view
Here's what greets my eye
- New love
- New love
- New luck
- New luck
- New sun
- And there's a new sun
In the sky
I guess I'll have to change my plan
I should've realized
There'd be another man
I overlooked that point completely
Until the big affair began
Before I knew where I was at
I found myself up on the shelf
And that was that
I tried to reach the moon
But when I got there
All that I could get was the air
My feet are back upon the ground
I've lost the one girl I found
Get goin', Louisiana hayride
Get goin', we all is ready
Start somethin', Louisiana hayride
No use for callin' the roll
Oh, I like that sport
Sittin' in the hay
Lovin' it away, oh, oh
For the time is short
Crack your little whip
Get your little ship to go
Start somethin', Louisiana hayride
No foolin', we all is happy
Get goin', Louisiana hayride
No use for callin' the roll
- Jasmine Washington
- I is here
- Sweet Pea Oglethorpe
- I is here
- Jonquil Jezebel
- Here
- Lemon Verbena
- I is here
Mo and Freddy
Lily and Lettie
We is here
We all here
- Zeke and Lemuel, Hiram and Samuel
- We is here, we all here
- Primrose Paradise
- I am here
- Daisy Dandelion
- I is here
We all here
We all here
Can't you see?
If you is really ready
And you're goin' steady
Get goin', Louisiana hay
Louisiana hayride
Start something, Louisiana hay
And no use to call, no use to call
- It's no use
- No use to bother to call the roll
Get goin', get goin'
I like that sport, sittin' in the hay
Lovin' it away,
The time is short, crack your little whip
Get your little ship
- Get your little ship
- Get your little ship to go
Get goin'
Louisiana hayride
Clear the way
Watch out, kindly step aside
Get goin'
Louisiana hayride
The scene's only about two minutes.
You won't have time to make the change.
I know it's a rough deal, but we won't make New York if we don't.
- As much rehearsal time as possible.
- Better call them at 10:00.
Don't forget, everybody.
Rehearsal, 10:00 on the dot, Baltimore.
That case is important.
Tell you what we'll do, when we start.
Say, who's the pretty girl?
Why, this couldn't be the mousy little Miss Gerard.
You've been with the firm for years.
I've never seen you with glasses on.
Say, you are beautiful.
How are you, Gaby?
- I'm all right. Thanks.
- Good.
Oh!
I'm sorry.
- You must be tired.
- Yes, I am, a little.
- Bet you are too.
- A little.
Lester, look, I've got a problem with these two numbers.
The murder mystery has a jazz beat and I don't want it to...
- Anyone heard from Paul Byrd?
- No, I haven't heard.
As a matter of fact, nobody has.
At least they haven't mentioned it.
- Wasn't he going to...
- What a rat.
Rat? Lester, wait a second.
He's a wonderful guy, wonderful and talented.
He's written... Listen, don't sell him short.
That boy has got a lot...
He may be a little young, yes.
He needs a little more experience.
- Just give him a few more years.
- Yeah.
Probably when he settles down and gets married.
- You think he'll make a good husband?
- And how. Great.
He'll make a great husband. Sure.
Listen, this kid is solid.
He knows all...
It isn't gonna be easy. No.
Marriage and the theater and two careers.
Problems. It isn't all skittles.
- It's no bed of...
- Is that why you never got married?
Who, me? You know,
I'm the kind of fella...
You got the right slant.
You're pretty happy as you are.
I like to kick around and have a lot of laughs.
Lester, I'm very much in love with this girl.
It's ridiculous, I know, things being as they are, but there it is.
Look, Tony...
I don't know what the chances are... but wait till we get to New York, and see how you stand.
Personally, I think the girl's crazy about you... but what you can see in a beautiful, young and talented girl is beyond me.
Three little unexpected children
Simultaneously the doctor brought us
And you can see that
We'll be three forever and A
E, I, O, You wouldn't know how agonizing
Being triple can be
Each one is individually the victim
Of the clinical day
E, I, O, Every summer we go away
To Baden-Baden-Baden
Every winter we come back home
To Walla Walla Walla
We do everything alike
We look alike
We dress alike
We walk alike
We talk alike
And what is more
We hate each other very much
We hate our folks
We're sick of jokes
On what an art it is to tell us apart
- If one of us gets the measles
- Another one gets the measles
Then all of us gets the measles
And mumps and croup
How I wish I had a gun
A wittle gun
It would be fun to shoot the other two
And be only one!
Mrs. Wifflepoofer loves
To talk to Mrs. Hildendorfer
Of the fatal natal day
She had her silly Willy
Mrs. Hassencooper loves to talk
To Mrs. Goldenwasser
Of her major operation
When she had her twins
But when Mother comes along
She silences the others
She accomplished something
That is very rare in mothers
MGM has got a Leo
But Mama has got a trio
She is proud
But says three is a crowd
We do everything alike
We look alike, we dress alike
We walk alike, we talk alike
And what is more
We hate each other very much
We hate our folks
We're sick of jokes
On what an art it is to tell us apart
We eat the same kind of vittles
We drink the same kind of bottles
We sit in the same kind of highchair
Highchair, highchair
Oh, I wish I had a gun, a wittle gun
It would be fun to shoot the other two
And be only one
- It's raining cats and dogs.
- A rainy opening is good luck... when it rains on opening night.
Good luck, Tony.
Sweetie, I just want to say that no matter what happens tonight, it's been...
I know. It's been that for me too.
If this turns out to be a hit, you'll get sick of the sight of me... six nights a week, two matinees.
No escape.
Course, if it isn't, you won't have to see me at all.
Gaby, I've been wanting to ask you something.
It's been... I felt there's been an obstacle between us.
I wanted to... Is Paul coming tonight?
- Why, I think so.
- I see.
What I wanted to ask...
Perhaps, I better not.
I wish you wouldn't, Tony.
- Tony, good luck tonight.
- Good luck, Gaby.
I see a new sun up in a new sky
- If one of us gets the measles
- Another one gets the measles
Then all of us gets the measles
Get goin', Louisiana hayride
Get goin', we all is ready
The city was asleep.
The joints were closed.
The rats, the hoods, and the killers were in their holes.
I hate killers.
My name is Rod Riley. I'm a detective.
Somewhere in a furnished room... some guy was practicing on a horn.
It was a lonesome sound.
It crawled on my spine.
I had just finished a tough case.
I was ready to hit the sack.
I can smell trouble a mile off, and this poor kid was in trouble.
Big trouble.
She's scared, scared as a turkey in November.
There was nothing left of the guy, nothing at all, except... a rag, a bone, and a hank of hair.
The guy had been trying to tell me something, but what?
So that's the way they wanted to play. All right.
Somewhere in the city there was a killer and that was bad.
Bad for the killer, because I shoot hard.
And I hate hard.
I was playing a hunch.
She came at me in sections.
More curves than a scenic railway.
She was bad, she was dangerous.
I wouldn't trust her any farther than I could throw her.
She was selling hard, but I wasn't buying.
This had to be Mr. Big.
Get him and you get them all.
There was something about this kid that made you want to protect her for life.
That bullet was meant for me.
Maybe this was a long shot, but I've seen some funny ones pay off.
I was beginning to see daylight.
These mugs were smart, but they made one mistake.
They got me mad.
All the pieces fitted together.
I knew how the crime had been done.
The high note on the trumpet had shattered the glass.
The glass with the nitroglycerin.
Now I knew who the killer was, but it didn't matter anymore.
Killers have to die.
Another page in the casebook of Rod Riley was finished.
The city was asleep.
The joints were closed.
The rats, the hoods, and the killers were in their holes.
I felt good, but something was missing.
She was bad, she was dangerous.
I wouldn't trust her any farther than I could throw her.
But she was my kind of woman.
- Who's that? Somebody come in?
- No one, Mr. Hunter.
- You sure? Did you look out in the hall?
- Not a soul, Mr. Hunter.
I can't understand it.
Are you sure this show's a hit?
A very big hit, Mr. Hunter.
Congratulations.
It certainly doesn't feel like one.
I didn't expect them to pull my carriage through the streets or hurl flowers at me...
- Hal, come on, boy. Have a drink.
- No, thanks.
- Got any notes for the cast for tomorrow?
- No.
- Good night.
- Say, look.
Doesn't anybody come backstage anymore on opening nights?
No. It's considered old-fashioned.
Have a good night's rest, Tony.
Did Gaby go out with Paul?
Gaby? I don't know. I guess so.
Good night, Tony.
Bobby, you know what I'm going to do?
I'm going out to the biggest nightclub
I can find.
I'm going to get a glass of champagne and celebrate.
Fine idea, sir.
I'll go my way by myself
All alone in a crowd
I'll try to apply myself
And teach my heart how to sing
I'll go my way by myself
Like a bird on the wing
I'll face the unknown
I'll build a world of my own
He's a jolly good fellow
He's a jolly good fellow
He's a jolly good fellow
That nobody can deny
That nobody can deny
That nobody can deny
For he's a jolly good fellow
That nobody can deny
Tony, the whole company got together.
We all chipped in, and we bought you... nothing.
So we have nothing to give you... but our gratitude, our admiration... and our love.
The show's a hit, but we all feel... no matter what might've happened to it, it was wonderful knowing you... working with you.
Maybe some of us didn't see eye to eye with you at the beginning.
Maybe we thought we wouldn't work out together... but we have.
Yes, there were obstacles between us... but we've kissed them good-bye.
We've come to love you, Tony.
We belong together.
The show's going to run a long time.
As far as I'm concerned, it's going to run forever.
- Tony.
- May we say something?
A show that is really a show
Sends you out with a kind of a glow
And you say as you go on your way
"That's entertainment!"
A song that is winging along
Or a dance with a touch of romance
Is the art that appeals to the heart
That's entertainment!
Admit we're a hit
And we'll go on from there
We played a charade
That was lighter than air
A good old-fashioned affair
As we sing this finale
We hope it was up your alley
No death like you get in Macbeth
No ordeal like the end of Camille
This good-bye brings a tear to the eye
The world is a stage
The stage is a world
Of entertainment
Come on, lads, hurry!
We haven't got all day.
Is that it, captain? Are we here?
Aye, laddie. That's
Bangkok all right.
ANNA: Louis! Oh, Louis!
Mother! Look, there's Bangkok.
Yes, I know. Isn't it exciting?
Captain, I heard them lowering the anchor. Is anything wrong?
We have to wait for the afternoon tide to carry us over the bar.
Oh, I see.
Will the king of Siam come down to meet us, Mother?
I hardly think so, dear.
Kings don't, as a rule.
Come forward, lads.
They need help in the bow.
Get along there.
That's the royal barge.
The king is coming out to meet us.
It's not the king, it's the kralahome.
ANNA: Who is the kralahome?
ORTON: A sort of a prime minister.
The king's right-hand man, you might say.
May I look? Please, may I see?
Aye, laddie.
Ma'am, if I might be allowed to offer you a word of warning, that man has power, and he can use it for you or against you.
You must stop worrying about me,
Captain Orton.
Sometimes I wonder if you know what you're really facing.
An Englishwoman alone in a country like Siam.
It doesn't matter, captain.
I shall have work to do, and the king has promised me a house of my own.
I'll have a place to bring up my boy as his father would have wished.
Mother, look. The prime minister is naked!
Oh, don't be ridiculous, Louis.
He can't be naked.
He's only... half-naked.
They look so cruel, Mother.
Father wouldn't have liked us to be afraid, would he?
No, Louis. Father would not have liked us to be afraid.
Not ever.
Doesn't anything ever frighten you?
Oh, yes, sometimes.
- What do you do?
- I whistle.
Oh, that's why you whistle.
That's why I whistle.
(SINGING) Whenever I feel afraid
I hold my head erect
And whistle a happy tune,
So no one will suspect
I'm afraid
While shivering in my shoes
I strike a careless pose
And whistle a happy tune
And no one ever knows I'm afraid
The result of this deception is very strange to tell
For when I fool the people I fear
I fool myself as well!
I whistle a happy tune
And ev'ry single time
The happiness in the tune
Convinces me that I'm not afraid.
Make believe you're brave
And the trick will take you far.
You may be as brave
As you make believe you are.
You may be as brave
As you make believe you are.
(SPEAKING) I think that's a very good idea, Mother. A very good idea.
Yes, it is a good idea, isn't it?
I don't think I shall ever be afraid again.
Good.
BOTH (SINGING):
The result of this deception ls very strange to tell
For when I fool the people I fear
I fool myself as well!
This is Anna Leonowens.
Mrs. Leonowens, may I present
His Excellency, the kralahome.
Sir, you are lady who will be schoolmistress of the royal children?
- Yes.
- He called you "sir."
Hush, dear, hush.
Have you friends in Bangkok?
I know no one in Bangkok at all.
His Excellency wishes to know, are you married, sir?
I am a widow.
What manner of man, your deceased husband?
My husband was an officer of Her Majesty's Army in...
Tell your master his business with me is as schoolteacher to the royal children.
He has no right to pry into my personal affairs.
He hasn't, Captain Orton.
I don't like that man.
In foreign country is best you like everyone until you leave.
You might at least have told us you speak English, Your Excellency.
It is not necessary for schoolteacher to know everything at once.
You come with me now.
Your baggages shall be carried to palace later.
Just a minute. Not the palace.
I am not living in the palace.
- Who say?
- The king say... Says.
In his letter of agreement, he promised me 20 a month and a house of my own outside the palace walls.
King do not always remember what he promise.
Then you will have to remind him.
If I tell king he break this promise, I will make anger in him.
I think is better if king's anger reserved for more important matters.
Very well, then. If you are afraid to tell him, I will.
I should like to see him at once, while there's time for me to return to England on this boat.
- King very busy now.
- Your Excellency, all I want is a few minutes' audience with him.
I have come here to work and I intend to work, but I shall take nothing less than I have been promised.
You will tell king this?
I will tell king this.
It should be very interesting meeting.
You come now!
If you change your mind...
Goodbye, Captain Orton, and thank you for everything.
Good luck, ma'am.
- Goodbye, captain.
- Goodbye, laddie.
Take good care of your mother, now.
King in bad spirit today.
Suggest schoolteacher wait for better day.
My spirit is just as bad,
Your Excellency. I cannot wait.
Man is Lun Tha, emissary from court of Burma.
He bring present to king from prince of Burma.
Her name is Tuptim.
Why, that girl is a present?
For king.
King is pleased with her.
Sorry. King has concluded audience.
Well, you mean I cannot see him?
Not today.
Louis, come with me.
KRALAHOME: You cannot do this!
- ANNA: Your Majesty.
- Who, who, who?
Your Majesty, is new
English schoolteacher.
Mrs. Anna Leonowens and son.
ANNA: Louis Leonowens.
You are schoolteacher?
Yes, Your Majesty. But before I start my work here, there is one point...
You are part of general plan I have for bringing to Siam what is good in Western culture.
Already I have bring printing press here for printing.
- Yes, I know, Your Majesty.
- How you know?
Before I signed our agreement, I found out about your ambitions for Siam.
How old shall you be?
You do not look like scientific person for teaching.
How old shall you be?
I am 150 years old, Your Majesty.
In what year were you borned?
In 1712, Your Majesty.
How many years shall you have been married?
Several, Your Majesty.
How many grandchildren shall you have by now?
How many, how many, how many?
You do not answer fast.
I make better question than she make answer.
You are not afraid of king.
Not to be afraid is good thing in scientific mind.
I think maybe you make very good schoolteaching.
Come.
A few of my wives.
They have beauty but not gift for knowledge.
I have no time for teaching, being busy with foreign affairs and other situations.
I may present Lady
Thiang, head wife.
There is a happy land far, far away
Where saints in glory stand
Bright, bright as day.
(SPEAKING) "In the beginning, God created the heaven and the earth."
Missionary.
Oh, a missionary taught you English.
Yes, sir. Missionary.
I have boy too.
Crown Prince Chowfa
Chulalongkorn, heir to throne.
You help Madam Leonowens with schoolteaching and she in turn shall teach you the better English.
She is very grateful to me for my kindness.
Lady Thiang, have children prepare for presentation to schoolteacher.
Speaking of teaching, Your Majesty, in our agreement...
Lady Son Klin, Lady
Talap, Lady Piam.
And this girl is present to me from a Burma prince.
She just arrived.
Good day, madam.
My name is Tuptim.
I already speak English.
And very nicely too.
I think I have fine idea.
In addition to children, you will also teach those of my wives as have sense enough for learning.
Siam to be very modern, scientific country.
Everybody speaking the English.
Your Majesty, it is not in our agreement that I teach your wives too.
Also, I will allow you to help me in my foreign correspondence.
I shall be perfectly happy to help you in any way I can provided we can clear up this one little matter of the house.
House?
House? What house?
My house, Your Majesty. The one you promised me, adjoining the palace.
It is a pleasure that you shall live in palace.
You teach in palace, and you shall live in palace.
Will have nice apartment.
Can look out, see many things.
Oh, yes, I'm sure we could see many things, such as iron bars, guards at the doors, et cetera, et cetera.
What is this "et cetera"?
Well, it means "and all the rest and so forth," Your Majesty.
You will meet my children.
I'm sorry, Your Majesty, but if there is to be no house,
I shall have to get back to the boat.
You will stand here and meet royal children.
Very well, Your Majesty.
But there isn't much time.
The royal princes and princesses.
Well, well, Well?
Schoolteacher has graciously changed her mind and shall live in palace.
For the time being, Your Majesty.
These are the children you shall teach.
Someday shall allow you to meet my others.
More, Your Majesty?
Children of wives not in favor with king.
Sixty-seven, I think.
Oh.
Hmm.
No! Oh, ladies, please.
Don't open that, no.
Oh, my goodness! Oh, won't you all go back to your rooms?
Lady Thiang, will you please ask them to leave?
I must have some privacy.
Good heavens!
What are they trying to do to me?
Sir, they think you wear dress like that because you shaped like that.
Well, I most certainly am not.
They wish to know, sir, if they may see the boy?
I'm sorry, Lady
Thiang, he is asleep.
Please, do tell me.
Why do you keep calling me sir?
Because you scientific, not lowly like woman.
But do you all think that women are more lowly than men?
Well, I certainly do not.
Please, sir, do not tell king.
Make king angry.
Perhaps it's time somebody did tell him a thing or two.
TUPTIM: Mrs. Anna?
Please, you have some English books
I can read?
Yes, of course, my dear, but they're not unpacked yet.
They laugh at her because she is foolish child.
She has come to live in palace of king and yet she is unhappy.
After all, she had no choice in the matter.
Perhaps she is homesick.
Is not homesickness that make me sad, Mrs. Anna.
Is love for one I shall never see again.
Oh, poor child.
He is Lun Tha, who was chosen to bring me here.
We tried so hard not to have love for each other but we could not help ourselves.
We did try, Mrs. Anna.
It isn't easy to stop loving a man if he's the man you want.
Even if you know you will never see him again.
I know.
I was very much in love with my husband.
Please ask them to put that down.
They wish to know, sir, who is man?
That was my husband, Tom.
- ALL: Tom.
- Mm-hmm.
He was pretty in face.
Oh, dear, yes, he was.
Very pretty in face.
(SINGING) When I think of Tom
I think about a night
When the earth smelled of summer
And the sky was streaked with white
And the soft mist of England
Was sleeping on a hill,
I remember this
And I always will.
There are new lovers now
On the same silent hill
Looking on the same blue sea,
And I know Tom and I are a part of them all,
And they're all a part of Tom and me.
Hello, young lovers, whoever you are,
I hope your troubles are few.
All my good wishes go with you tonight.
I've been in love like you.
Be brave, young lovers, and follow your star,
Be brave and faithful and true,
Cling very close to each other tonight.
I've been in love like you.
I know how it feels to have wings on your heels
And to fly down a street in a trance.
You fly down a street on the chance that you'll meet,
And you meet not really by chance.
Don't cry, young lovers whatever you do
Don't cry because I'm alone,
All of my mem'ries are happy tonight,
I've had a love of my own,
I've had a love of my own, like yours,
I've had a love of my own.
CHILDREN (SINGING):
Be it pleasures and palaces,
Though we may roam,
Be it ever so humble,
There's no place like home.
A charm from the skies
Seems to hallow us there,
- (SPEAKING) Father, I'll be late for school!
- You wait.
You are pleased to recite proverb you learn yesterday and writing down 12 times in copybook.
"A thought for the day:
East or west, home is best."
"East, west, home, best," means house!
"A man's house is only less dear to him than his honor."
Every day, month after week, something about house.
Are my children to be taught nothing more?
Yesterday we are taught that the world is a round ball which spins on an invisible stick through its middle.
Everyone knows the world rides on the back of a turtle who keeps it from running into the stars.
How can it be that everyone knows one thing if many people believe another thing?
Then which is true?
The world is ball with stick through it.
I believe.
You believe?
Does that mean that you do not know?
But you must know, because you are king.
Good.
Someday you too will be king, and you too will know everything.
But how do I learn?
And when do I know that
I know everything?
When you are king.
When you are king.
But I do not know.
In my head are many facts, but I am not sure.
What to tell a growing son?
How to bring truth and justice to my people?
(SINGING) When I was a boy,
World was better spot,
What was so was so,
What was not was not.
Now I am a man,
World have change a lot
Some things nearly so,
Others nearly not.
There are times I almost think
I am not sure of what
I absolutely know;
Very often find confusion
In conclusion I concluded long ago.
In my head are many facts that,
As a student I have studied to procure
In my head are many facts,
Of which I wish I was more certain
I was sure.
Is a puzzlement.
Shall I join with other nations in alliance?
If allies are weak am I not best alone?
If allies are strong with power to protect me,
Might they not protect me out of all I own?
Is a danger to be trusting one another,
One will seldom want to do what other wishes;
But unless someday,
Somebody trust somebody,
There'll be nothing left on earth excepting fishes!
There are times I almost think nobody sure of what he absolutely know,
Ev'rybody find confusion
In conclusion he concluded long ago.
And it puzzle me to learn that tho' a man may be in doubt of what he know,
Very quickly will he fight,
He'll fight to prove that what he does not know is so.
Ohhhh!
Sometimes I think that people going mad!
Ahhhh!
Sometimes I think that people not so bad.
But no matter what I think,
I must go on living life.
As leader of my kingdom
I must go forth,
Be father to my children,
And husband to each wife,
Et cetera, et cetera, and so forth.
If my Lord in heaven
Buddha show the way,
Ev'ry day I try to live another day,
If my Lord in heaven
Buddha show the way,
Ev'ry day I do my best for one more day,
But is a puzzlement
Come along now, children.
Take your places, please.
Quickly now, and quietly.
Lady Thiang, will you start the lesson, please?
Blue is ocean.
Red.
Siam.
Here is king of Siam.
In right hand is weapon.
Show how he destroy all who fight him.
Green,
Burma.
Here is king of Burma.
No clothes mean how poor is king of Burma.
Thank you, Lady Thiang.
I'll continue.
The map you have been looking at is 25 years old, and today we have a surprise for you.
A new map just arrived from England.
CHOWFA: I do not see Siam.
The white is Siam.
Siam not so small.
Well, wait. Let me show you England.
See? It is even smaller than Siam.
Before I came here, Siam was just that little white spot to me.
Now that I've been here many months it has become far more than that because I've met the people of Siam, and I'm learning to understand them.
You like us, Mrs. Anna?
Yes, I like you very much.
Very much, indeed.
It's a very ancient saying,
But a true and honest thought,
That if you become a teacher,
By your pupils you'll be taught,
As a teacher I've been learning
And I've now become an expert,
On the subject I like most,
(SPEAKING) Getting to know you.
(SINGING) Getting to know you,
Getting to know all about you.
Getting to like you,
Getting to hope you like me.
Getting to know you,
Putting it my way, but nicely,
You are precisely
My cup of tea!
Getting to know you,
Getting to feel free and easy.
When I am with you,
Getting to know what to say,
Haven't you noticed?
Suddenly I'm bright and breezy
Because of all the beautiful and new things
I'm learning about you day by day.
ALL (SINGING): Getting to know you,
Getting to know all about you.
Getting to like you,
Getting to hope you like me.
Getting to know you,
Putting it my way, but nicely,
You are precisely
My cup of tea!
Getting to know you,
Getting to feel free and easy.
When I am with you,
Getting to know what to say,
Haven't you noticed?
Suddenly I'm bright and breezy
Because of all the beautiful and new things
I'm learning about you day by day.
CHILDREN (SINGING):
Getting to know you,
Getting to feel free and easy.
When I am with you,
Getting to know what to say,
Haven't you noticed?
Suddenly I'm bright and breezy
Because of all the beautiful and new things
I'm learning about you day by day
(SINGING) Getting to know you,
Getting to feel free and easy.
When I am with you,
Getting to know what to say,
Haven't you noticed?
Suddenly I'm bright and breezy
Because of all the beautiful and new things
I'm learning about you day by day.
(SPEAKING) Goodness, this started out to be a geography lesson.
Quickly, let's get back to work.
Shh! Shh! Shh!
- Now...
- What is that green up there?
That is Norway.
Nor... way.
ALL: Nor... way.
Norway is a very cold place.
Sometimes it is so cold, that the lakes and rivers freeze and the water becomes so hard that you can walk on it.
Walk on water?
Yes, walk on water.
How is it possible?
Hard water?
Not only that, but the raindrops change into small white spots that look like lace.
And this is called "snow."
Snow.
Spots of lace!
Yes, Your Highness. The water freezes on its way down from the sky.
I do not believe such thing as snow.
And I do not believe such thing as snow.
And I do not believe
Siam is this big.
And other country so big.
- Siam is biggest country in world!
- CHILDREN: Siam!
What, what, what?
How can schoolroom be so unscientific?
Well, Your Majesty, we had a little misunderstanding.
I was trying to describe snow and they refused to believe there is such a thing.
Snow?
Snow.
From mountaintop.
From sky, Your Majesty.
From sky to mountaintop.
That's right, Your Majesty.
I remember. I see pictures of Switzerland.
Land all white with snow.
Who does not believe this?
Well, after all, they've never seen it.
Never seen?
If they believe only what they see, why do we have schoolroom? Rise!
Never let me hear of not believing schoolteacher whom I have bring here at high expense.
Twenty pounds each month.
Twenty English pounds.
Sterling!
Rise!
I command all of you to make most of this opportunity for expensive education.
For sake of selves and country.
Furthermore, it is...
What, what, what? This is not study book I have provide.
No, Your Majesty, it's one of mine.
- I gave it to Tuptim.
- The name! You tell me!
Is called The Small
House of Uncle Thomas.
Is by American lady,
Harriet Beecher Stowe.
A woman has written a book?
Uncle Tom's Cabin.
A wonderful book, Your Majesty.
All about the evils of slavery in America.
President Lincoln of America against slavery, no?
Very definitely, Your Majesty.
Me too.
Slavery very bad thing.
Mr. Lincoln is fighting a war, even now, to set the slaves free.
You admire him for this?
Very much, Your Majesty.
He seems to be a fine man who has studied hard and educated himself.
In that, he is not unlike yourself.
Shall Mr. Lincoln be winning this war he is fighting at present?
No one knows, really.
Does he have enough guns and elephants for transporting same?
I don't think they have elephants in America, Your Majesty.
- No elephants?
- No.
No wonder he's not winning war.
All right, children, you may be seated now.
- CHOWFA: Mrs. Anna?
- Yes, Your Highness?
I do not understand how slaves can be set free if their masters wish to keep them.
It's done by the passing of a law and by the enforcing of that law, if necessary.
But my slaves and the slaves of my father...
Suppose there was such a law in
Siam and we did not want it so?
Sometimes things can't be just a question of what we want, Highness, but of what is right.
Ha.
I think perhaps we had better call recess until after luncheon.
You may be excused.
Young prince has healthy respect for ways of his own people.
Sometimes more than king.
Prince Chulalongkorn is a fine boy with a keen and probing mind.
But he still has much to learn,
Your Excellency.
What is important for him to learn
I do not think he'll find in this classroom.
I'm fully aware that you do not approve of my coming to Siam.
Why are you so blind?
Have you no eyes to see?
King tries impossible task wishing to be scientific man who learn all modern things.
I think it a fine ambition.
Inside him is strong king like his father, who cannot change.
He will only tear himself in two, trying to be something he can never be.
Of course he can never be if those closest to him are unwilling to help him.
You do not know king as well as you think you do.
You believe you have great influence over him.
You will end up as his slave like all the others.
I...
Yes, yes. Just a moment.
The king?
At this hour of the night?
Well, I trust His Majesty won't object if I put some clothes on first.
You sent for me, Your Majesty?
Your Majesty.
Oh, Your Majesty is reading the Bible.
Mrs. Anna,
I think your Moses shall have been a fool.
Moses?
Moses, Moses, Moses.
I think he shall have been a fool.
Here it stands written by him that the world was created in six days.
Now you know and I know that it took many ages to create world.
I think he shall have been a fool to have written so.
What is your opinion?
Is that why Your Majesty sent for me at this hour of the night?
That is not reason, but first
I wish to discuss Moses.
Now, how am I ever to learn truth if different English books state different things?
The Bible was not written by men of science, but by men of faith.
It was their explanation of the miracle of creation, which is the same miracle whether it took six days or many centuries.
I still think your Moses shall have been a fool.
As you wish, Your Majesty.
Now, was there something else?
Take letter.
A letter? Now?
Now. When else?
Now is always best time.
Take letter to Mr. Lincoln of America, who is very scientific ruler.
Very well, Your Majesty.
From Phra Mana Mongut, by the blessing of the highest super agency in the world of the whole universe, the king of Siam.
Sovereign of all tributary countries adjacent and in every direction, et cetera, et cetera, et cetera.
Do you not have any respect for me?
Why do you stand over my head?
I cannot stand all the time.
And in this country no one's head shall be higher than king's.
From now on in presence, you shall so conduct like all other subjects.
You mean, on the floor?
All subjects do so.
I'm very sorry.
I shall try my best not to let my head be higher than Your Majesty's, but I simply cannot grovel on the floor.
I couldn't possibly work that way, or think.
You are very difficult woman!
Perhaps so, Your Majesty.
But observe care that head shall not be higher than mine.
When I shall sit, you shall sit!
When I shall kneel, you shall kneel.
Et cetera, et cetera, et cetera!
Very well, Your Majesty.
Is promise?
- Is promise.
- Good.
To His Royal Presidency of the United States in America...
"Abrahom Lingkong"... et cetera. You fix up.
It has occurred to us...
You see, it has occurred to us... it has occurred to us that if we shall be sending you several pairs of young male elephants to be turned loose in forests of America...
A-mer-i-ca.
We are of opinion that after a while they shall increase in number.
- And inhabitants of America shall...
- Your Majesty.
Well?
I don't think you mean pairs of male elephants.
How can I make letter if you interrupt?
And inhabitants of America shall be able to catch and tame them and use them as beasts of burden.
Only male elephants, Your Majesty?
You put in the details.
Good night.
Moses.
Lincoln!
Elephants!
Groveling on the floor at 2:00 in the morning.
I am Lun Tha.
You are Mrs. Anna, schoolteacher?
Yes, but you shouldn't be...
I must meet with
Tuptim again. Please!
You have been seeing her here?
Twice we have spoken.
Each time it becomes more difficult.
She has said you will help us.
Oh, no, I couldn't!
It's much too dangerous.
Not for me, but for Tuptim and you.
You'll be killed if they find you in the City of Women. You must leave!
Death is not worse pain than empty life. Please, Mrs. Anna.
I'm sorry, Lun Tha.
There's nothing I can do.
Wait there.
Tuptim.
Oh, Lun Tha.
Seeing you this way is not enough.
There is nothing we can do.
I am watched too closely.
Must we go on forever hiding our love like this?
(SINGING) We kiss in a shadow
We hide from the moon,
Our meetings are few and over too soon.
We speak in a whisper,
Afraid to be heard;
When people are near,
We speak not a word.
Alone in our secret,
Together we sigh for one smiling day to be free,
To kiss in the sunlight,
And say to the sky:
Behold and believe what you see!
Behold how my lover loves me!
When will we be together, Tuptim?
When?
It can never be, Lun Tha.
Not ever.
(SINGING) To kiss in the sunlight
And say to the sky:
Behold and believe
What you see!
Behold how my lover loves me!
(SPEAKING) You must go now.
I will be missed, and they will start searching for me.
When I return, it will be to take you from here.
There is no way, Lun Tha.
There is a river. There are boats.
I will find a way.
Oh, if it could only be.
It will be. I swear this.
When all is arranged,
I will get word to you.
I shall pray, Lun Tha.
If you see a chaba flower in your path, broken like this, it will be the sign that
I have come for you. Watch for it.
I will be ready.
Stop, stop, stop!
- Your Majesty.
- What, what, what?
Well?
When Siam's richest province was stolen by France,
I warned it was only beginning of Western treachery.
If enemies of ours, with lies such as this can convince British that you are unfit to be ruler of Siam, our seas will soon be thick with ships, greedy for conquest.
So it has finally come.
We must act quickly.
But how? Where?
I must think.
Clearly. Scientifically.
I must think.
But how can I think while being driven out of mind!
ALL (SINGING):
A charm from the skies
Seems to hallow us there
Which seek through the world, ls ne'er met with elsewhere.
That was splendid. Very effective.
Now...
- Good morning.
- You think you teach king lesson!
This is one lesson you do not be paid for teaching!
You will stop instructing wives and children in "Home Sweet House" in order to remind me of breaking promises I never make, et cetera.
Your Majesty, I do not intend to have my boy brought up in a harem.
You did promise me a house. "A brick residence adjoining the palace."
- Those were your very words.
- I do not remember such words!
- I remember them.
- I will do remembering!
Who is king here?
I remind you so you remember that.
I do not remember any promises.
I do not remember anything except that you are my servant.
Oh, no, Your Majesty.
What, what, what?
I said, you are my servant!
No, Your Majesty, that is not true.
I am most certainly not your servant!
If you do not give me the house you promised,
I shall be forced to return to England.
CHILDREN:
No! No! Please, Mrs. Anna.
BOY:
Please. We believe schoolteacher!
I believe in snow!
Do not let her go away.
I let her do nothing that is not my pleasure.
It is my pleasure that you stay here!
In palace! In palace!
No, Your Majesty.
Why do you wish to leave these children, all of whom are loving you so extraordinarily?
I do not wish to leave them. I love them too, quite extraordinarily.
I cannot stay where a promise has no meaning.
I will hear no more!
A land where there is a wish for Siam to take her place in the modern world, but where everything still remains according to the wishes of the king!
You will say no more! No more!
I will say no more, because there is no more to say!
Come, Louis.
Out, out, out!
Who is it?
THIANG:
Mrs. Anna, it is I, Lady Thiang.
Oh, well, come in, Lady Thiang.
Mrs. Anna, you must go to king at once.
Indeed? And why must I?
I plan to leave on the next sailing.
Please, Mrs. Anna.
Did he send you here to ask me?
No. It is I who ask you.
King is in terrible distress, not knowing where to turn.
Distress?
Agents in Singapore have found copies of letters to British government which describe king as barbarian and suggest necessity of making Siam a protectorate.
Oh, but that is outrageous!
The king is many things I dislike, but he is not a barbarian.
Then you will go to him now?
You mean, to advise him?
It must not sound like advice.
King cannot take advice.
And he will not bring up subject.
You must do it for him.
No, Lady Thiang, I can't.
It's against all my principles.
He needs help, Mrs. Anna.
Oh, but he has you.
I am not equal to his special needs.
Please, Lady Thiang, I simply cannot go to him, especially without his having asked for me.
What more can I say to you?
(SINGING) This is a man who thinks with his heart,
His heart is not always wise.
This is a man who stumbles and falls.
But this is a man who tries.
This is a man you'll forgive and forgive, and help and protect, as long as you live.
He will not always say
What you would have him say,
But now and then he'll say something wonderful.
The thoughtless things he'll do will hurt and worry you.
Then all at once he'll do something wonderful.
He has a thousand dreams that won't come true,
You know that he believes in them,
And that's enough for you
You'll always go along,
Defend him when he's wrong,
And tell him when he's strong,
He is wonderful.
He'll always need your love,
And so he'll get your love.
A man who needs your love can be wonderful.
Your Majesty.
You have come to apologize.
- I am sorry, Your Majesty, but...
- Good! You apologize.
- I didn't say...
- I accept.
Thank you, Your Majesty.
Well?
Do you not see I am occupied?
My mind on very important matters.
Anything you wish to discuss with me?
Why should I discuss important matter with woman?
Very well, Your Majesty. In that case I shall say good night.
Good night!
Your Majesty...
- What, what, what?
- I wonder...
- When the boat came from Singapore...
- Singapore!
- Was there any news from abroad?
- News!
There were news!
- They call me barbarian.
- Who?
Parties who would use this as excuse to steal my country.
Now suppose you are Queen Victoria, and someone say to you king of
Siam is barbarian. Do you believe?
- Well, Your Majesty...
- You will!
You will believe I am because there is no one to speak otherwise.
Oh, but this is a lie!
It is a false lie!
What have you decided to do about it?
You guess.
Well, if someone were sending a lie about me to England,
I would do my best to send the truth to England.
Is that what you have decided to do, Your Majesty?
Yes, that is what I have decided to do. But how?
Guess how I shall do this.
Well, my guess would be that you would seek some kind of personal contact with the British.
Personal contact! When British ambassador and party arrive in Siam...
The ambassador, here?
On quick tour of Orient.
Friendship tour, they say.
I receive letters from his aide, Sir
Edward Ramsay, who accompanies him.
Edward, coming here?
"Edward"?
You call him this?
We are old friends. I knew him in London before I was married.
When they're here, I'll take opportunity of expressing my opinion of thieves who would try to steal my country.
I will show them who is barbarian!
Well, what is this face you put on?
My guess is that you will not fight with your distinguished visitors.
- I will not?
- No, Your Majesty.
You will give a banquet in their honor.
You will entertain them in a particularly grand manner.
You will make them all witnesses in your favor.
They will return to England and report to the queen that you are most certainly not a barbarian.
Naturally!
Naturally! This is what
I shall have intended to do.
That's it, Your Majesty.
Stand up to them.
Put your best foot forward.
It's an expression, Your Majesty.
It means put on your best clothes, show them your most intelligent men and most beautiful women.
Shall it be proper for the British to see my women without shoes?
Shall it be proper for my women to put their best bare feet fonuard?
No, we shall make them look like ladies of Europe:
Shoes on feet, dresses on bodies.
You will tell me which ladies are most like Europeans and educate them in European customs and manner for presentation.
- Also, sew dresses.
- Sew dresses?
All women shall help.
Don't you think it would make a better impression in their own manner and dress?
You are not being scientific. The ambassador knows we are Siamese.
I wish him to know we are also Europeans.
Wake up! Everybody to the temple!
Wake up, wake up, wives, et cetera, et cetera, et cetera.
We will entertain them with acrobats.
We could give them a theatrical performance.
Tuptim has written a play, her own version of Uncle Tom's Cabin.
We shall give them theatricals.
We'll show them who is barbarian.
We could make European dishes for dinner.
You teach. To be served on high table. Long white tablecloth...
- And napkins.
- Of finest silk.
- Using best gold chopsticks.
- Chopsticks?
Don't you think knives and forks would be more suitable?
British not scientific enough for the use of chopsticks.
You are to order finest gold knives and forks.
Also spoons.
Why do you not think of spoons?
An inspired idea, Your Majesty.
We mustn't forget cigars.
Englishmen are fond of them.
You are to make list of all eminent
Europeans residing in Bangkok
- for sending of invitations.
- Very well.
You will instruct court musicians their learning music of Europe for dancing, et cetera, et cetera, et cetera.
Excellent, Your Majesty.
How much time do I have for all this?
British gunboat last reported off
Singkla. This give you one week.
One week? Your Majesty, one week!
In this same time, whole world was created, Moses say.
First, we ask help from Buddha.
Bow to him. Bow, bow, bow.
Bow!
Oh, Buddha, give us the aid of your strength and your wisdom.
CHILDREN (CHANTING): Oh, Buddha give us the aid of your strength and your wisdom.
And help us to prove to the visiting English that we are extraordinary and remarkable people.
CHILDREN: And help us to prove to the visiting English that we are extraordinary and remarkable people.
Help also Mrs. Anna to keep awake for scientific sewing of dresses even though she be only a woman and a Christian, and therefore unworthy of your interest.
CHILDREN: Help also Mrs. Anna...
- (SPEAKING) Your Majesty, this is really...
- A promise is a promise.
Head must not be higher than mine.
A promise!
CHILDREN (CHANTING): and therefore unworthy of your interest.
(SPEAKING) And, Buddha,
I promise you that I shall give this unworthy woman a house.
We will build her a house of her own:
A brick residence adjoining royal palace according to agreement, et cetera, et cetera, et cetera.
- Your Majesty...
- Oh!
CHILDREN (CHANTING):
...this unworthy woman a house.
We will build her a house of her own.
A brick residence adjoining royal palace... according to agreement... et cetera... et cetera... et cetera.
The napkins finally arrived. Would you place them on the table please?
- Thank you.
- No, thank you.
Are we ready?
The guests are arriving.
Please, do not let
Englishmen come here.
We are afraid.
WOMAN: They cast terrible spell on us with evil eye.
Oh, nonsense. Nonsense!
Step back. Let me see how you look.
Stand apart.
Very nice. Now, turn round.
Oh, my goodness gracious!
What is trouble now?
Oh, I forgot! They have practically no undergarments.
Undergarments! Of what importance are undergarments at this time?
Of great importance.
Are you wearing undergarments?
All properly dressed English ladies always wear undergarments.
I have opinion that, in this regard,
England is very backward nation.
Is this what you shall be wearing?
Why, yes. Do you like it?
Well...
Are you certain this is customary, et cetera, et cetera, et cetera?
What is so extraordinary about bare shoulders?
- Your own ladies...
- Yes.
But is different because of not wearing covering-ups on other parts of body, and therefore...
Therefore what?
Is different.
I'm sorry you do not approve.
I have not said I do not approve.
The ambassador and his party must be arriving.
Mrs. Anna, Mrs. Anna.
They are cannibals.
They will eat us!
They will do nothing of the kind.
Remember, when you are presented to the ambassador, for heaven's sake, keep your backs to the wall.
KING: So!
Your Majesty, this shall be
His Excellency, Sir John Hay, most honorable representative of United Kingdom in Great Britain.
Your Majesty.
I am pleased.
Cigar.
Thank you, Your Majesty.
May I introduce my aide,
Sir Edward Ramsay.
Your Majesty.
I am pleased. Cigar.
Thank you.
And this is Madame Leonowens, teacher of English language, customs, et cetera, in royal household.
We've heard of your splendid work here.
Thank you, Your Excellency.
Edward, it's so good to see you.
How are you, Anna?
Come with me. Meet royal wives.
Royal wives.
He has the head of a goat!
Evil eye!
Evil eye! Evil eye!
- Evil eye!
- ANNA: Ladies!
Ladies, come back!
Come back. Oh, dear.
Oh, this is dreadful.
Why have you not educated them in the British custom of spying glass?
Oh, is that what started the panic?
I regret, sir, my ladies have not given good impression.
On the contrary.
We have rarely received so good an impression in so short a time.
You have attractive pupils.
I wish you could see
His Majesty's children.
Unfortunately, they're asleep.
How many children do you have?
Oh, I have only 106.
I am not married very long.
Well, next month, expecting five more.
Anna, my dear.
You're looking lovelier than ever.
I was hoping to find you wasted away with homesickness.
For England? I have no one there, Edward.
Not anymore.
No one, Anna?
Hear that?
We danced to that once.
- Richmond. Remember?
- Mm-hmm.
Still dance?
Not very often.
You should.
Do you remember I asked you to marry me?
Of course. I never allowed Tom to forget it.
I never learned to take defeat like a gentleman.
Dear Edward.
I didn't come to Bangkok just because
I enjoy sleeping on a gunboat or watching Sir John comb his beard.
Anna, Anna, you're much too young to bury your heart in a grave.
Oh, but it's not buried.
It's very much alive.
- Here?
- Yes.
Among people who need me.
People I can help.
You could help me very much, Anna.
I see another 10 years of waiting in those eyes.
Dancing, after dinner!
I'm afraid I couldn't resist talking over old times.
I had impression that Mrs. Anna would help for seating guests at dinner table, et cetera, et cetera, et cetera.
Now it is too late.
They all stand up, waiting.
In that case, we'd better be going in, Anna.
Yes. We better be going in...
Anna.
I forget.
If you'll excuse me, Your Majesty.
KING: Huh.
Now, herewith, shall be list of subjects you try to bring up for talk.
On such subjects I am very brilliant and will make great impression.
You begin with Moses.
Bow.
Eat, eat, eat!
His Majesty made a rather interesting point about Moses when he was reading the Bible.
Oh, yes. Now,
Moses is very fine illustration of little-known fact that men of faith and men of science, by contradicting each other, always manage to arrive at same conclusion.
I shall explain...
JOHN:
I should like to propose a toast.
His Gracious Majesty, the king of Siam:
May the rest of the world regard him with the same high esteem as does the government of Her Majesty, Queen Victoria.
ALL: Hear! Hear!
Your Majesty.
More toast.
To Her Gracious Majesty, Victoria,
Queen of United Kingdom and Ireland, powerful sovereign of British colonies around globe of human world.
I wish to say, warm affection.
ALL: To the queen.
Enough toast for queen. Sit.
Now, theatricals for entertainment.
Tonight.
Play written by member of royal palace as surprise for king.
Siamese version of famous American book.
Your Majesty and honorable guests,
I beg to put before you:
Small House of Uncle Thomas.
WOMEN: We beg to put before you
"Small House of Uncle Thomas"
Small house of Uncle Thomas,
Small house of Uncle Thomas,
Written by a woman,
Harriet Beecher Stowe.
TUPTIM:
House is in Kingdom of Kentucky, ruled by most wicked king in all America:
Simon of Legree.
Your Majesty.
I beg to put before you, loving friends.
Uncle Thomas.
WOMEN (SINGING):
Dear old Uncle Thomas.
TUPTIM: Little Eva.
WOMEN (SINGING):
Blessed little Eva.
TUPTIM: Little Topsy.
WOMEN (SINGING):
Mischief maker, Topsy.
TUPTIM: Happy people.
WOMEN (SINGING): Very happy people.
TUPTIM: Happy, happy, happy people.
Your Majesty...
I beg to put before you one who is not happy:
The slave Eliza.
WOMEN (SINGING): Poor Eliza,
Poor Eliza.
Poor unfortunate slave.
TUPTIM: Eliza's lord and master:
King Simon of Legree.
She hates her lord and master... and fears him.
This king has sold her lover... to far away province of Ohio.
Lover's name is George.
WOMEN (SINGING): George
TUPTIM: Baby in her arms also called George.
WOMEN (SINGING): George
TUPTIM: Eliza say she run away and look for lover, George.
WOMEN (SINGING): George
TUPTIM:
So she bid goodbye to friends... and start on her escape.
TUPTIM: The escape.
WOMEN (SINGING): Run, Eliza,
Run from Simon
TUPTIM: Poor Eliza running and run into a rainstorm.
Comes a mountain.
WOMEN (SINGING)I Climb, Eliza,
TUPTIM:
Eliza lose her way in forest.
WOMEN (SINGING): Hide in forest
TUPTIM: Poor Eliza.
- WOMAN 1: Poor Eliza
- WOMAN 2: Poor Eliza
- WOMAN 3: Poor Eliza
- WOMAN 4: Poor Eliza.
WOMEN (SINGING): Poor Eliza
TUPTIM: Eliza very tired.
Your Majesty...
I regret to put before you:
King Simon of Legree.
Because one slave has run away,
Simon beating ev'ry slave.
Simon clever man.
He decide to hunt Eliza... not only with soldiers... but with scientific dogs... who sniff and smell... and thereby discover all who run from king.
WOMEN (SINGING): Run, Eliza, run,
Run, Eliza, run.
Run from Simon, run,
Run Eliza
Run, Run
Run from Simon
Run, run
Run Eliza
Run from Simon
Eliza Run
Run
Eliza run from Simon Run
Run Eliza
Run From Simon
Run Eliza
Run from Simon
Run Eliza, run, run
Run
TUPTIM: Eliza come to river
Eliza come to river
WOMEN (SINGING): Poor Eliza.
Who can save her?
WOMEN (SINGING): Only Buddha
Save her, Buddha, save her.
What will Buddha do?
TUPTIM: Buddha make a miracle.
Buddha send an angel down.
Angel make the wind blow cold.
Make the river water hard.
Hard enough to walk upon.
WOMEN: Buddha make a miracle.
(SINGING) Praise to Buddha
TUPTIM: Angel show her how to walk on frozen water.
Now as token of his love...
Buddha send a new miracle.
WOMEN (SINGING): Praise to Buddha
TUPTIM: Send from heaven, stars... and blossoms.
Look like lace upon the sky.
WOMEN (SINGING): Praise to Buddha
Praise to Buddha
TUPTIM: So Eliza cross the river... hidden by this veil of lace.
Forgot to tell you name of miracle.
Snow!
Of a sudden, she can see
Wicked Simon of Legree... sliding cross the river fast with his bloodhounds and his slaves.
What has happened to the river?
Buddha has called out the sun!
WOMEN (SINGING):
Buddha has called out the sun!
Sun has made the water soft.
Wicked Simon and his slaves
Fall in river and are drowned.
TUPTIM:
Everybody celebrate death of Simon.
And Eliza make happy reunion with dear old Uncle Thomas... blessed little Eva... mischief maker, Topsy... and faithful lover George... who is looking like Angel to Eliza.
Topsy glad that Simon die
Topsy dance for joy.
I tell you what Harriet Beecher
Stowe say that Topsy say:
"I specks I'se de wickedest critter in de world."
But...
I do not believe
Topsy is wicked critter... because I, too, am glad for death of king... of any king who pursue a slave who is unhappy and who tried to escape.
And Your Majesty,
I wish to say to you:
I beg of you!
Your Majesty... and honorable guests...
I will tell you end of story.
Is very sad ending, with sacrifice.
WOMEN (SINGING): Poor little Eva
Poor little Eva
Poor unfortunate one
TUPTIM: ls Buddha's wish that Eva come to him... and thank him personally... for saving of Eliza and baby.
And so she die... and go to arms of Buddha.
WOMEN (SINGING): Praise to Buddha
Praise to Buddha
Very clever. Very clever,
Your Majesty.
Author! Author!
KING: Ah.
Is there anything else before I say good night?
Sit, sit, sit.
Plenty for two. Eat.
Oh, no, thank you.
Fork is a foolhardy instrument.
You pick up food, and it leaks.
Oh, your conversation at dinner was most amusing, Your Majesty.
I was forced to laugh myself.
I was so funny.
Before leaving, Edward confided that the ambassador was quite impressed.
Edward.
And he will most certainly send a glowing report to Queen Victoria.
I am so pleased, Your Majesty.
I am aware of your interest.
I wish to say... you have been of great help to me in this endeavor.
I wish to make gift.
I have hope you accept.
Put it on.
Put it on finger.
Oh, put it on, put it on, put it on.
Your Majesty,
I don't know what to say.
When one does not know what to say... it is a time to be silent.
It is late, Your Majesty.
If there's nothing else...
There is, there is, there is else.
Have good news to tell.
Yesterday, a white elephant has been discovered in forest of Ayutthaya.
And you regard this as a good omen?
Yes. Very good omen.
Everything going well with us?
Yes, everything going well with us.
Tuptim, your pupil.
Her play tonight.
Oh, but, Your Majesty, everyone enjoyed it immensely.
It is immoral for king to drown when pursuing slave who deceive him.
Immoral. Immoral!
Tuptim shall hear of my displeasure when she is found.
Found?
It is believed she hides somewhere in palace... to escape king's anger and...
You know something of this?
- Only that she has been unhappy.
- Why unhappy?
She is in palace of king!
What is greater honor for girl than to be in palace of king?
Oh, but, Your Majesty, of what interest to you is one girl like Tuptim?
In your house, she's just another woman.
As a bowl of rice is just another bowl of rice, no different from any other.
Now you understand about women.
So many English books I read introduce strange idea... of love, et cetera, et cetera, et cetera.
You disapprove?
But it is a silly complication of a pleasant simplicity.
A woman is designed for pleasing man. That is all.
A man is designed to be pleased by many women.
How do you explain the fact,
Your Majesty... that many men remain faithful to one wife?
They are sick.
But you do expect women to be faithful.
- Naturally.
- Well, why naturally?
Because it is natural.
It is like old Siamese rhyme:
A girl must be like a blossom with honey for just one man.
A man must live like honeybee and gather all he can.
To fly from blossom to blossom,
A honeybee must be free,
But blossom must not ever fly from bee, to bee, to bee.
(SPEAKING) Oh, Your Majesty, in my country we have a far different attitude.
We believe that for a man to be truly happy... he must love one woman and one woman only.
This idea was invented by woman.
But it's a beautiful idea,
Your Majesty.
In England, we're brought up with it.
And by the time a young girl goes to her first dance...
Young girl?
They dance also?
Like tonight?
In arms of man not her husband?
Why, of course.
I would not permit.
Oh, but it's very exciting.
When you're young... at your first dance... and you're sitting on a small gilt chair... with your eyes lowered... terrified that you'll be a Wallflower.
And suddenly you see two black shoes... a white waistcoat... a face. It speaks.
We've just been introduced,
I do not know you well.
But when the music started, something drew me to your side.
So many men and girls
Are in each other's arms,
It made me think we might be similarly occupied.
Shall we dance?
On a bright cloud of music shall we fly?
Shall we dance?
Shall we then say "goodnight" and mean "goodbye?"
Oh, perchance when the last little star has left the sky.
Shall we still be together with our arms around each other,
And shall you be my new romance?
On the clear understanding that this kind of thing can happen,
Shall we dance?
Shall we dance?
Shall we dance?
(SPEAKING) Why do you stop?
You dance pretty. Go on.
Your Majesty, I didn't realize.
After all, I'm not a dancing girl.
In England, no woman dances alone while a man looks on.
But she dances with stranger, holding hands?
Yes, but not always a stranger.
- Usually a very good friend.
- Then we'll dance together.
You show me. Teach, teach, teach.
It's quite simple, the polka.
You count, "One, two, three, and one, two, three... and one, two, three, and..."
(SINGING) Shall we dance?
One, two, three, and.
On a bright cloud of music shall we fly?
One, two, three, and.
Shall we dance?
One, two, three, and.
Shall we then say "goodnight" and mean "goodbye?"
One, two, three, and.
Oh, perchance when the last little star has left the sky.
Shall we still be together with our arms around each other,
And shall you be my new romance?
On the clear understanding that this kind of thing can happen,
Shall we dance?
Shall we dance?
Shall we dance?
- (SPEAKING) And one, two, three...
- One, two, three, one, two, three...
Something wrong.
I know, I forgot "and."
Next time I remember.
BOTH: One, two, three, and one, two, three...
That's splendid, Your Majesty.
Splendid, splendid!
You throw me off count!
BOTH: And, one, two, three, and one, two, three, and...
That is not right.
You were doing beautifully,
Your Majesty.
No, no. Not the way I see
Europeans dancing tonight.
Yes, it was. It was just like that.
Were not holding two hands like this.
No... as a matter of fact.
Was... like this?
No?
Yes.
Come.
Come.
We do it again.
- Your Majesty...
- Why do you burst in here?
We have found Tuptim.
- Where is she?
- Secret police are questioning her.
Her lover has not been caught.
Not yet.
What?
It is believed she was running away with Lun Tha... man who bring her here from Burma.
Dishonor.
Dishonor. Dishonor!
- Bring her in.
- Your Majesty, what will you do?
I shall do what is usually done in such event.
TUPTIM: No. No!
No! Mrs. Anna, do not let them beat me.
Do not let them!
- Where is this man?
- I do not know.
It is known you were lovers with him.
I was not lovers with this man!
Dishonor!
- We will have truth of you.
- Stop that! Do you hear? Stop it!
It is better if you understand at once... that this does not concern you.
Oh, but it does, Your Majesty.
It does, dreadfully.
Because of her, and even more because of you.
She's a child, running away because she was unhappy.
Can't you understand that?
You waste my time!
I beg of you not to take revenge on this girl.
You'll throw away everything you've accomplished for yourself and country.
The girl hurt your vanity, that's all.
She didn't hurt your heart.
You have no heart!
You've never loved anyone and you never will.
I will show you. Give me.
I can't believe you will do this dreadful thing!
You don't? Believe when you hear her screams as you run from here.
I am not going to run. I am going to stand here and watch you.
Hold this girl. I do this myself!
You are a barbarian.
Down, down, down!
Am I king or am I not king?
Am I to be cuckold in my own palace, to take orders from English teacher?
- No, no. Not orders.
- Silence!
I am king as I was born to be... and Siam to be governed in my way!
Not English way, not French way, not Chinese way!
My Way!
Barbarian, you say.
There is no barbarian worse than a weak king.
And I am strong, do you hear?
Strong!
Well?
The man, the lover has been found in river. He is dead.
Dead?
Oh, no!
Oh, no!
Oh, no!
I don't understand you, not you or your king.
I'll never understand him.
You!
When I warn you of this many months ago, you do not listen.
You have destroyed him.
He can never be the king he was before.
You have taken all that away from him.
You have destroyed king!
The next boat that comes, no matter where it goes, I shall be on it.
Give this back to His Majesty.
I wish you have never come to Siam.
So do I.
Oh, so do I!
LOUIS: Mother.
Mother, our luggage is all loaded.
We'll be late for the boat.
Yes, Louis.
I'm coming.
Mrs. Anna.
ANNA: Lady Thiang. Your Highness.
How nice of you to come to say goodbye.
Mrs. Anna, I do not come for myself.
I come for one who must see you quickly.
You may tell His Majesty
I am no longer subject to him.
You do not understand.
Mrs. Anna... he is dying!
Dying?
The king?
Oh, no, Lady Thiang. What happened?
Who can say what it is that makes a man die?
A sad heart that no longer wishes to go on beating?
Ever since night of great banquet, he has shut himself away in palace... turning from all who would speak to him... unwilling to sleep or to nourish himself... searching through many books, only to push them aside in despair.
Doctors warned him he must change his ways quickly... but he would not listen, Mrs. Anna.
He would not listen.
I had no idea.
Everyone who knew was forbidden to speak of it.
And now, doctors have no hope for him.
CHOWFA: Mrs. Anna.
ANNA: Your Highness.
I am frightened, Mrs. Anna.
I am frightened because I love my father... and also because if he dies, I shall be king.
And I do not know how to be.
Many men learn this after they become kings, Your Highness.
It will be good to think back... on all that
Mrs. Anna has taught you.
When king heard you were sailing tonight, he started to write letter.
It was difficult for him, Mrs. Anna.
Very difficult.
He has commanded that I give it to you.
Please, may I hear what my father has said, Mrs. Anna?
"While I am lying here...
I think perhaps I die.
This heart which you say
I have not got... is matter of concern.
"It occurs to me that there shall be nothing wrong that men shall die.
"For all that matters about man... is that he shall have tried his utmost best.
In looking back, I discover that you think much on those people who require that you live up to best of self.
You have spoken truth to me always... and for this I have often lost my temper on you.
But now I do not wish to die... without saying this gratitude... and large respect, et cetera, et cetera.
"I think it very strange... that a woman shall have been most earnest help of all.
But, Mrs. Anna, you must remember... that you have been a very difficult woman... and much more difficult than generality."
We must hurry back now.
You will come?
Mother... now that the king is dying... does that make you friends again?
I suppose so, Louis.
We can't hurt each other anymore.
He always frightened me.
I wish you had known him better.
You two could have been such good friends.
In many ways he was just as young as you.
Was he as good a king as he could have been?
I don't think any man has ever been as good a king as he could have been.
But this one tried.
He tried very hard.
You really like him, don't you, Mother?
Yes, Louis.
I like him very much.
Very much indeed.
Several weeks...
I do not see you, Mrs. Anna.
And now I die.
Oh, no, Your Majesty.
This is not scientific.
I know... if I die or do not die.
You shouldn't be here.
Can't we move you to your room?
No.
I wish to remain here in room with knowledge.
You are leaving Siam?
When?
Very soon, Your Majesty.
In fact, I can stay only a few more minutes.
And you are glad of this?
People of Siam... royal children, et cetera... are not glad.
And all are in great affliction... of your departure.
I shall miss them.
You shall miss them... but you shall be leaving.
I, too... am leaving.
Only I'm not walking onto a boat... with my own feet... of my own free will.
I am just leaving.
Why is your head higher than mine?
Here.
Here is something belonging to you.
Put it on.
Put it on, put it on.
Please... wear it.
The children.
Let my children come in.
Good evening, children.
CHILDREN: Good evening, my father.
- Please, do not go. We'll miss you!
- THIANG: Children!
Stop this noise.
Did you come to see your father or Mrs. Anna?
It is all right, Lady Thiang.
It is suitable.
My father.
Princess Ying Yaowalak.
I have wish to...
She has memorized message for Mrs. Anna.
Speak message now.
Say it, say it, say it.
Dear friend and teacher... my goodness gracious... do not go away.
We are in great need of you.
We are like one blind.
Do not let us fall down in darkness.
Continue good and sincere... concern for us... and lead us in right road.
Your loving pupil...
Princess Ying Yaowalak.
Mother... it's the boat. It's time to go.
- CHILD 1: Do not go, Mrs. Anna.
- CHILD 2: Please do not go.
No, no, Mrs. Anna!
Run down to the boat and ask Captain
Orton to take our things off.
LOUIS: Yes, Mother.
Silence!
There's no reason for doing of demonstration... for schoolteacher realizing her duty... for which I pay her exorbitant monthly fee... of... twenty-five pounds.
Furthermore... this is disorganized behavior... in presence of dying king.
Chulalongkorn.
Rise.
Mrs. Anna... you... take notes.
You take notes... from next king.
Well?
Suppose you are king.
Is there nothing you would do?
I... would make proclamations.
Yes. Yes?
First, I would proclaim for coming New Year... fireworks.
Mm-hmm. Mm-hmm.
Also boat races.
Boat races?
Why boat races with New Year's celebration?
I like boat races.
And, Father, I would make second proclamation.
Yes, what is second proclamation?
Make it, make it.
Regarding custom of bowing to king... in fashion of lowly toad.
I do not believe this is good thing.
Causing embarrassing fatigue of body... degrading experience for soul... et cetera, et cetera, et cetera.
This is bad thing.
I believe.
You are angry with me, my father?
Oh, why do you ask question?
If you are king... you are king!
Don't ask question of sick man.
Nor... of woman.
This proclamation... against bowing to king...
I believe to be your fault.
Oh, I hope so, Your Majesty.
I do hope so.
Up! Rise up!
Father?
Up, up. up!
Like soldiers in lines.
It has been said.
There shall be no more bowing... for showing... respect... for king.
It has been said by one... who has been trained... for royal... government.
There shall be no bowing like toad.
No crouching.
No crawling.
This does not mean, however, that you do not show respect for king.
You will stand with shoulders back... and chin high, like this.
You will face king with proud expression... showing pride in self as well as in king.
This is proper way for men to show esteem for one another... by looking upon each other's faces with calmness of spirit... eyes meeting eyes in equal gaze... bodies upright, standing as men were meant to stand... with dignity and awareness of self.
So from this day forward...
"Who's got the stuff that made the Wild West wild
"Who pleases every woman, man and child
"Who does his best to give the customers a thrill
-"Who
-"Colonel Buffalo Bill
"Who's got the show that gets the most applause
"Five hundred Indians and fifty squaws
"Ten feature acts and there's the special feature still
-"Who
-"Colonel Buffalo Bill
-"Did you ever see a cowboy rope a steer
-"No, we haven't
-"Or an Indian with feathers throw a spear
-"No, we haven't
"Or a marksman shoot an earring from an ear?
"No, we haven't
-"Did you ever see a holdup
-"No, sir
"Then gather closer
"And let me give you some of the atmosphere"
Introducing the world's greatest sharpshooter, Mr. Frank Butler!
"The hour is midnight and all is still
"We see the stagecoach climbing up the hill
"Going along the mountain trail carrying passengers and mail
"Never suspecting danger as they roll along
"The watchful driver is in his seat
"His trusty rifle lying at his feet
"Some of the passengers inside seem to be dozing as they ride
"Never suspecting there is something really wrong
"Suddenly there's a shout!
"What is it all about?
"'What is it all about?' you ask.
It's Indians!
-"Indians?
-"Indians!
"Indians!
"Very notable, cut-your-throatable Indians!
"Indians!
"Just when they've taken everyone by force
"Who makes an entrance on a big white horse
"Who starts shooting till there's no one left to kill
-"General Grant?
-"No. Colonel Buffalo Bill
"Who's got the stuff that made the Wild West wild
"Who pleases every woman, man and child
"Who does his best to give the customers a thrill
"Colonel Buffalo Bill"
Good afternoon.
What's going on here? Indians!
What do you think you're doing?
I'm busy now.
You'll have to make an appointment.
Stop that!
My good man....
Do you suggest we keep the people of this town in ignorance...
...about the grandest show on earth?
I suggest you clear out. This is my hotel and I'll have no signs tacked up.
You must be....
Don't tell me.
Mr. Wilson.
How do you do, sir?
This is a great pleasure.
Allow me to introduce myself.
I'm Charles Davenport, personal manager for Buffalo Bill Cody.
Glad to know you, but--
When we hold our shooting match, everybody will be here watching.
It's the greatest advertising.
What match?
Frank Butler against your local shot.
We do it in every town.
Not here you don't. This is my lawn and you're not holding any match on it.
-We're taking 10 of your rooms.
-For a lot of cowboys and Indians?
For the headliners.
Indians sleep in the lobby.
Indians! Oh, boy!
I don't want any actors.
I just had Pawnee Bill...
...and his Far East Show. Some of them chased my guests on horseback.
Now, take your stuff and get.
Nice lawn you got here.
I'll rent it from you.
-$25 for the afternoon.
-No.
-No.
-How about $50 in cash and two squaws?
-No, no.
-How about 50 squaws and $2 in cash?
-No!
-No?
-No!
No, kid. I'll feed you to the Indians.
Indians. Oh, boy.
Looks a little small for a contest.
-You don't like it?
-Not much.
Good, because you haven't got it.
-Who says so?
-He does.
Get that horse out of here.
He seems to think it's his hotel.
-Did you mention my name?
-He stood up under it.
-Here's some passes for the show.
-Thanks, Frank.
Don't miss my entrance.
All right, Frank. Don't forget dinner now.
-I'll be there.
-I'll send the carriage.
Goodbye.
-I'm Frank Butler.
-You've got nowhere to sleep
Wait a minute. I'm here to do you a favor.
I'll give you a chance to win $100.
Yeah, how?
Just get the local champion up and I'll give you a side bet of $100...
...against 10 rooms for our actors.
No, sir.
Clear all this off the porch before I call the marshal.
-You sure charmed him.
-We don't need him.
Tell the boys to start packing.
-We'll do the match at the fairground.
-Yes, your majesty.
-See you later.
-Yes, your majesty.
All right, start loading up.
We're moving back to town.
I'll go back and break the good news to Buffalo Bill.
Hey, Dolly! Dolly!
Dolly, come on. We're moving.
Moving?
I'm not moving again for anybody!
All right. You stay here and come back in with the boys.
I've been shot!
Indians!
Indians!
That's my bird.
Did you fire that shot?
It wasn't nothing.
It wasn't nothing?
You could have killed me!
-Give me that bird.
-It's mine. I shot it.
You shot it right off my hat.
How did it get up there?
I sewed it up there.
What for? It ain't no good.
Ain't got no meat on it.
It's not an eating bird. It's a wearing bird.
All right. But around these parts, you'll have to keep sewing it on...
...because folks will keep shooting it off.
You've ruined it!
Yeah, it sure looks beat, ma'am.
Here, have one of mine.
Get that filthy thing away from me!
She ain't filthy. She looks better than you, and she's got a bullet in her head.
-I heard shooting.
-This creature tried to murder me.
-Is that gun loaded?
-Sure.
But I can empty it quick.
Wait for me!
I wouldn't have really shot her.
That's mighty civilized of you.
A fellow down the road tells me this here's a boarding hotel.
What if it is?
Maybe you and me can do some trading.
-What have you got to trade?
-I got quails, wild ducks, some grouses--
No, I can get all the game I want.
When folks eat the kind of game you get, they keep spitting out buckshot.
Teeth, sometimes, too.
Mine's different.
Come on out, now.
The man won't chase you.
Come on. It's all right. Honest.
Kid sisters and little brother ain't used to people yet.
They never been out of Dark County before.
Come on.
Shake your tails!
The man's waiting on you.
Hurry up! He can't wait all day.
They look a little dusty, don't they?
We're in business together.
I pop them, she plucks them, she picks them, and she pulls them.
Who is he?
Little Jake? He's my bird dog.
Jake, stop your sniffing.
What you got a sleeve for?
Here you are, mister. Look it over.
Lift up its wings.
No buckshot in that bird, just one little tiny hole in its head.
Mighty pretty shooting.
It's mighty pretty eating, too.
For every one you take, you've got to give me two nickels and a dime.
All right. I'll take two dozen.
How many is that?
Twenty-four.
Who do we know can count up to 24?
I can count up to 20.
Are you sure?
I can only give you 20.
All right. Leave the bill with them.
-What's a bill?
-A bill's a voucher.
Don't you keep books?
Don't any of you read or write?
We don't read as good as everybody.
We don't read as good as anybody.
"Folks are dumb where I come from they ain't had any learning
"Still they're happy as can be doing what comes naturally
"Doing what comes naturally
"Folks like us could never fuss with schools and books and learning
"Still we've gone from A to Z doing what comes naturally
"Doing what comes naturally
"You don't have to know how to read or write
"When you're out with a fellow in the pale moonlight
"You don't have to look in a book to find
"What he thinks of the moon and what is on his mind
"That comes naturally!
"That comes naturally!
"My uncle don't pay taxes his address never gives
"They can't collect his taxes for they don't know where he lives
"Cousin Ben got angry when they caught him stealing chickens
"'I'm within my rights,' said he doing what comes naturally
"Doing what comes naturally
"Uncle Jed has never read an almanac on drinking
"Still he's always on a spree doing what comes naturally
"Doing what comes naturally
"Sister Sal who's musical has never had a lesson
"Still she's learned to sing off-key doing what comes naturally
"Doing what comes naturally
"You don't have to go to a private school
"Not to turn up your bustle to a stubborn mule
"You don't have to come from a great big town
"Not to clean out a stable in an evening gown
"That comes naturally
"That comes naturally
"My uncle out in Texas can't even write his name
"He signs his checks with X's but they cash them just the same
"Grandpa Dick was always sick but never saw a doctor
"He just died at 93 doing what comes naturally
"Doing what comes naturally
"Doing what comes naturally"
All right, kids.
Get on to the house with them birds.
The kitchen's around the back.
Be sure you don't count more than 20.
-Don't worry. He can't.
-Go on. Get along with you.
Say, that was mighty pretty.
Thanks. I like to sing.
'Course, shooting's a lot more fun.
I been shooting since I was 10 years old.
Fancy shooting?
I could shoot the fuzz off a peach.
See that rooster up there?
Yeah.
Now you don't.
Jumping Jehoshaphat!
How would you like to make $5?
Doing what?
There's a swollen-headed stiff from the Wild West Show.
I don't shoot people!
He challenges anybody in the county to a shooting match.
I can hit anything he can hit, standing on my head!
-Watch this.
-No, I believe you.
I'll go make the arrangements.
You wait here.
-What's your name?
-Annie Oakley.
Annie Oakley.
Come on, Grandma.
I got to get you shined up.
How did you get your nose so dirty?
-What's that you got there?
-What's it look like?
It beats me. It's not a rifle, is it?
Ain't you got eyes?
Yeah, you got eyes.
You shouldn't be fooling around with an old piece of junk like this.
You could get hurt.
This thing's liable to explode and blow your ears off.
Give this back to your pappy and get yourself knitting needles.
Hey, mister.
Do you reckon I could keep it till this afternoon?
It makes no difference to me.
I don't want you to get hurt. That's all.
I just want to keep it long enough to win a shooting contest...
...off of a big swollen-headed stiff out of the Wild West Show.
You mean Frank Butler?
They didn't say his name.
Just that he was a swollen-headed stiff?
Yeah.
He's champion.
-What's that?
-He's the best.
He was.
You're set on yourself, aren't you?
About that, I am, but...
...soon as I try to shine up to folks,
I'm gawky as a scrub oak.
Ain't I?
I don't know. I've seen worse than you.
-Honest?
-Sure.
Good luck in the shooting match.
I'll see you there.
Hey, mister.
-Don't you like girls?
-Sure.
I'm a girl.
That's fine.
Is there any special kind of girl that you like?
Yeah. I like the kind that you see in picture magazines...
...sort of dainty and dimpled and rosy.
"The girl that I'll marry
"Will have to be
"As soft and as pink as a nursery
"The girl I'll call my own
"Will wear satins and laces
"And smell of cologne
"Her nails will be polished and in her hair
"She'll wear a gardenia and I'll be there
"Instead of flitting
"I'll be sitting next to her
"And she'll purr like a kitten
"A doll I can carry
"The girl that I'll marry must be"
"Oh, my mother was frightened by a shotgun they say
"That's why I'm such a wonderful shot
"I'd be out in the cactus and I'd practice all day
"But now tell me what have I got?
"I'm quick on the trigger with targets not much bigger
"Than a pinpoint, I'm number one
"But my score with a feller is lower than a cellar
"Oh, you can't get a man with a gun
"When I'm with a pistol
I sparkle like a crystal
"Yes, I shine like the morning sun
"But I lose all my luster when I'm with a broncobuster
"Oh, you can't get a man with a gun
"With a gun, with a gun
"No, you can't get a man with a gun
"If I went to battle with someone's herd of cattle
"You'd have steak when the job was done
"But if I shot the herder they'd lock me up for murder
"'Cause you can't shoot a male in the tail like a quail
"Oh, you can't get a man with a gun
"If I shot a rabbit some furrier would grab it
"For a coat that would warm someone
"But you can't shoot a lover and use him for a cover
"Oh, you can't get a man with a gun
"The gals with umbrellas are always out with fellers
"In the rain or the blazing sun
"But a man never trifles with gals who carry rifles
"Oh, you can't get a man with a gun
"With a gun, with a gun
"No, you can't get a man with a gun
"A Tom, Dick or Harry will build a house for Carrie
"When the preacher has made them one
"But he can't build you houses with buckshot in his trousers
"'Cause a man may be hot but he's not when he's shot
"Oh, you can't get a man with a gun"
Ladies and gentlemen, gather round.
Now, without further ado, it gives me great pleasure...
...and it is a great privilege to introduce to you...
...Colonel William F. Cody...
...loved by you all and known to you all as:
Buffalo Bill!
My young friends, it always gives me great pleasure...
...to return to my favorite state, Ohio.
I am here today to referee a contest of fancy shooting...
...between the best marksman your county offers...
...and one of the greatest sharpshooters the world has ever known.
Frank Butler!
Aided and abetted by his...
...charming assistant, Miss Dolly Tate.
Is Mr. Butler's opponent here?
-Is the contestant ready?
-Yes, sir.
Good.
Ladies and gentlemen...
...prepare yourselves for the thrill of a lifetime.
Two men of steel pitted against each other in a savage struggle...
...of skill and stamina.
What's his name?
-What's his name?
-Annie.
Annie!
What's so funny?
Are you trying to make a fool of us?
Frank Butler can't shoot against a girl.
-You said anyone, didn't you?
-Yes, I know I did.
-Are you afraid of a little girl?
-No, it isn't that, but--
She might fool you.
-What will we do, B.B.?
-Nothing.
The little lady accepted the challenge.
She is entitled to her chance.
Are you really Buffalo Bill?
Why, yes, little lady.
I'm Annie Oakley.
Miss Oakley, I am honored.
You are?
Frank, your opponent is ready.
Howdy.
I told you I'd see you here.
You didn't tell me you were the big swollen-headed stiff.
Ain't we got a tablecloth somewhere?
-Are you ready, Mr. Butler?
-Ready!
Are you ready, my dear?
-Yeah, but what're we shooting at?
-Birds.
Birds?
Where are they? I don't see any birds.
These are clay birds, my dear.
They come out of a trap, in front.
The contest will continue until the first miss.
When you are ready, my dear, just say "pull."
Pull?
Pull!
Hit!
Pull.
It's wonderful!
They got a gadget out there.
All you have to do is holler "pull."
Hit!
I don't want any advantage.
Here, honey. Try this one.
Dolly, the mirror.
Pull!
Watch this.
Hit!
Pull.
Hit!
Pull.
Hit!
Pull!
Hit!
Pull!
-Hit!
-Pull!
Hit!
Pull!
-Hit!
-Pull!
-Hit!
-Pull!
-Hit!
-Pull!
Hit!
Double. Pull.
Hit!
Pull.
Hit!
Quadruple.
Pull.
Hit.
Quindruple!
Five!
Pull!
Five.
Pull!
I declare Miss Annie Oakley winner of this contest!
Where's my money? Where's my money?
Nice work.
Thanks. It wasn't nothing.
It was easy as pie.
I'm sorry.
What are you sorry about?
You're just good, that's all.
You ain't mad at me, are you?
Why, of course not.
Anybody can miss a shot.
I can't.
Excuse me.
Here's your $5, Annie. I'm proud of you.
Thanks, Mr. Wilson.
Where you going now, Annie?
I don't know.
Back to Dark County, I guess.
He sure is pretty.
-Goodbye, Annie.
-Goodbye, Mr. Wilson.
-Good luck.
-Thanks.
You kids get on and get the supplies now.
Hurry on.
I tell you, my boy. She'd be a sensation.
They've never seen a girl who could shoot like that.
What makes you think she's so great?
She couldn't do it again in a million years.
We haven't got a million years!
If business keeps like this, we'll have to fold up.
Pawnee Bill's beating us everywhere.
-She'd be a novelty.
-I don't want any partners.
We'll make her your assistant.
Once in a while, you'll let her take a potshot.
You could break her in. And you know...
...she's quite a pretty girl.
She's all right. Of course, she looks terrible now...
...but we could dress her up.
She couldn't look worse than Dolly.
She wouldn't be willing to join us just to hand me things.
-Yes, I would, Mr. Butler!
-Well, look at here.
I'd be willing to hand you anything, just so I could be near you.
You ever been away from home before?
Do I got to leave home?
I think you'd find that quite fascinating.
We travel all over the country.
Certainly. Have you ever been on a railroad train?
-You know anything about show business?
-Show business?
What's that?
What's show business?
"The cowboys, the wrestlers, the tumblers, the clowns
"The roustabouts that move the show at dawn
"The music, the spotlights, the people, the towns
"Your baggage with the labels pasted on
"The sawdust, the horses and the smell
"The towel you've taken from the last hotel
"There's no business
Like show business
"Like no business I know
"Everything about it is appealing
"Everything the traffic will allow
"Nowhere could you have that happy feeling
"When you are stealing that extra bow
"There's no people like show people
"They smile when they are low
"Yesterday they told you you would not go far
"That night you opened and there you are
"Next day on your dressing room they've hung a star
"Let's go on with the show
"The costumes, the scenery, the makeup, the props
"The audience that lifts you when you're down
"The headaches, the heartaches, the backaches, the flops
"The sheriff who escorts you out of town
"The opening when your heart beats like a drum
"The closing when the customers won't come
"There's no business
Like show business
"If you tell me it's so
"Traveling through the country is so thrilling
"Standing out in front on opening nights
"Smiling as you watch the benches filling
"And see a billing up there in lights
"There's no people like show people
"They smile when they are low
"Even with a turkey that you know will fold
"You may be stranded out in the cold
"Still you wouldn't change it for a sack of gold
"Let's go on with the show
"Let's go on with the show"
Who gave you Indians permission to use this car?
Annie Oke.
I might have known it.
Mrs. Little Horse, this is our car and this is my section.
And I'll thank you not to do your laundry in it.
Look at this place. It's a disgrace!
Sharp.
This is what I mean, Mr. Davenport.
Look at this car. The woodwork!
Hey, you Indians, stop that cutting that thing up.
Look what they've done to our curtains here!
-Looks like the Battle of Bull Run, don't it?
-They've done $100 worth of damage.
Who told you Indians you could pitch a village in here?
I did. They're only sitting till the smoke clears.
-What smoke?
-Back in their coach.
They was cooking a little supper and they had a small fire.
A small fire!
All right, you Indians break up camp and get back to your car. Hurry up. Go on.
Come on now. Get.
What gets into you?
I'm sorry, Charlie. I don't mean anything.
And I want to apologize for Little Jake and the girls unhitching the caboose.
If they only hadn't done it on a hill.
I cut this out of the paper. It's about you.
About me? Thanks.
First call for supper.
That was a close call. Are you all right?
Yeah.
Come back. While they're eating, we'll have our reading lesson.
Now?
Yes, now. Have you got your book?
Let's see, now.
What's that word?
Are you sure that's a word?
How can I learn you if you don't do no homework?
You've got to learn me, and you've got to learn me fast.
What would Frank think if he knew I couldn't read?
I know what it is. It's "the."
Keep going.
The boy had a dog.
Go on.
The dog's name were, was....
What's that, Jake?
Sound it out.
Now that I did it, what is it?
Frank.
Frank. That's a pretty name.
The boy's name was...
...S-T-E-P-H-E-N.
What's that, Jake?
Joe.
That seems an awful lot for just Joe.
Reading's kind of funny sometimes.
Come on.
The dog was....
Bless you. Not catching cold, are you?
No, I'm just trying to learn Little Jake his reading lesson.
I sure am thick-headed, ain't I, Annie?
You get along into the eating car and have your supper.
Annie reads good. Show him, Annie.
Start here.
You get along now. Get. Get.
Charlie gave me this newspaper clipping.
Would you like to read it?
No, you read it to me.
You read it. I want to hear how it sounds when you speak it.
"Butler's assistant, whose name isn't on the program...
"...performed only one trick, but she promises to become a fine marksman."
That's nice of that paper man.
People are beginning to notice you, Annie.
I told Charlie to put you on the billboard.
-You did?
-Yes.
I got a real fancy trick I've been practicing to surprise you with.
What is it?
I can't tell you. It's a surprise.
That's fine. I like you to be ambitious.
I want you to improve.
But it'll take some time.
All I want to be is a pink and white lady like the kind you said you liked.
You're getting pinker and whiter every day.
That ain't pig-wash, is it?
What would you say if someday I make you my partner?
Oh, Frank!
Butler and Oakley.
I never thought I'd ask a girl to be my partner.
Oakley and Butler.
Butler and Oakley.
What's the difference?
You've got to do it in alphabetical order.
You know, there's gonna be a wishing moon out tonight.
Back home,
I used to wish for a lot of things...
...but lately, they sure have been catching up to me.
You ever love anybody?
-You mean, somebody who loved me back?
-Yeah.
That I ain't. But I hear tell about it.
"They say that falling in love is wonderful
"It's wonderful
"So they say
"And with a moon up above it's wonderful
"It's wonderful
"So they tell me
"I can't recall who said it
"I know I never read it
"I only know they tell me that love is grand
"And
"the thing that's known as romance is wonderful
"Wonderful
"In every way
"So they say
"Rumors fly and they often leave a doubt
"But you've come to the right place to find out
"Everything that you've heard is really so
"I've been there once or twice
"And I should know
"You'll find that falling in love is wonderful
"It's wonderful as they say
"And with a moon up above it's wonderful
"It's wonderful as they tell you
"You leave your house some morning
"And without any warning
"You're stopping people shouting that love is grand
"And
"To hold a man in your arms is wonderful
"Wonderful
"In every way
"I should say"
Well, it's getting on to bedtime.
Well, I better mosey on back to my car.
Do you mind if I walk you home?
You better go on to bed.
-Goodnight.
-Goodnight.
Hurry, ladies and gentleman.
Charlie, my boy. Something is wrong.
Here we've been parading around all morning and....
How do you do, my dear?
And still the customers don't come.
-Maybe you need some new attractions.
-No.
What we need is just one good attraction.
Something that'll make them sit up and...
...take notice.
Pawnee Bill! The two-timing, double-crossing--
That's where all your business is.
St. Paul! That's just next door!
He's been doing it to us across the country.
But this time he won't get away with it!
-Who's gonna stop him?
-I am.
I've got an idea. Come on.
Let's see Annie.
Remember that stunt you've been practicing?
Charlie and I thought that this afternoon you might....
Well, that's a very good stunt.
What he means is he wants you to do it in the show this afternoon.
I couldn't do that. Frank might not like it.
Of course he would. lt'll surprise him.
You like him, don't you?
I like him a heap.
Has he asked you to marry him?
Not yet. He ain't broke out in a cold sweat enough for that.
That's why we're doing this for you.
This is your big chance. You'll dazzle him.
When you walk in front of that audience...
...in that beautiful new costume with the music under you...
...and you try that new trick that you've been saving for him--
He'll be so proud of me, he'll bust out in that cold sweat!
-Charlie, Buffalo! Wait till I tell him!
-Wait. Now, look!
We want to surprise him.
He'll expect you to do that old trick where you shoot the egg off the poodle's head.
Instead, you come on...
...you do the new trick...
...you save the show, and you marry Frank!
Just like in a fairytale!
Are you sure he'll like it?
Yes. I think he will.
Mr. Frank Butler is in for a real surprise.
Look at that business.
This'll fix that Pawnee Bill.
When word spreads about Annie, he won't have customers...
...to play a two-handed poker game.
You're right, B.B.
The dirty, two-timing, double-crossing...
...treacherous, thieving, stealing--
Well, Buffalo Bill.
Well, Pawnee Bill, my old pal.
You are a sight for sore eyes.
We were just talking about you, weren't we? Just this minute.
We don't see enough of you.
I've been a little bit lonely, too.
In the past six months, if you wanted to see us...
...all you had to do was turn around and spit.
Same old Charlie. Haven't changed a bit.
You haven't met Big Chief Sitting Bull, have you?
No, I haven't.
Sure. Everybody knows
Big Chief Sitting Bull...
...who defeated General Custer at the Battle of the Little Big Horn...
...and the man who tonight...
...will be the guest of honor in St. Paul of none other than...
...Pawnee Bill.
All right, folks.
Now, don't lose your place in line.
The great Annie Oakley's on the inside.
Annie Oakley. I'm anxious to see her.
I'll get some tickets.
Hold on. I wouldn't have it.
Here are two passes to my own private box.
Well, punched right through the center.
Annie Oakley shot them out.
We've got Annie Oakleys.
Well, I'll see you inside.
There you are, Chief. Come along.
I better follow him.
He's likely to steal the benches.
How's business, Chief?
Going back on the warpath soon?
No. On way home from Washington.
Go see Great White Father about Indian territory.
They gave you a bad shuffle on that land.
Maybe you can farm it.
Nothing will grow. Too much oil.
Fifty thousand barrel a day.
That's too bad, Chief.
How you gonna live? You can't eat oil.
-Tell you what I'm gonna do.
-No put money in show business.
-You can have a lot of fun.
-No.
$20,000, Chief. We could--
Sitting Bull live by three rules:
Keep bow tight.
Keep arrow sharp.
No put money in show business.
How'd we ever get the country away from them?
Hi, Charlie. Business looks....
-Who put that up there?
-It looks great, don't it?
I told you to put her name someplace, not to make a star out of her.
That's ridiculous. She's only doing a few little tricks, isn't she?
-Yes, Frank.
-Isn't she?
Sure.
I don't understand you.
You like her, don't you?
Sure I like her, and I want to keep liking her.
-Where's Buffalo Bill?
-Inside.
Jumping buffalo!
It's me.
Have I been up there all the time?
Do you like it?
Like it?
Oh, Charlie! I can't believe it.
Wait till Frank sees it!
-Yeah.
-Will you go get him, Charlie? Please.
"There's no business
"Like show business
"Like no business I know
"All made up and soon you'll be appearing
"Every bit of nervousness is gone
"Then the sound that's music to your hearing
"To hear them cheering when you come on
"There's no people like show people
"They smile when they are low
"How I wish the folks at home could only see
"What's come to Annie how proud they'd be
"Getting paid for doing what comes naturally
"Let's go on with the show"
What are you doing to me?
I've been here for four years...
...and you finally give me a spot.
Well, that's what we always had.
How about this?
Frank, look up there.
Ain't I growed in the last few days?
Yeah, shot up like a ragweed.
You know, I still can't believe it.
Don't try too hard, because it ain't gonna be there next week.
-Why ain't it?
-That's show business.
The few tricks I gave you don't rate a star billing.
Even I don't get that.
Someday, maybe, but it's got to be gradual.
-If that's the way you want it.
-That's the way I want it!
You ain't sore, are you?
No, I'm not sore, honey.
Be sure and watch me this afternoon.
Don't be nervous. You've done the poodle trick many times.
I know, but today I'm not gonna....
I mean, I'm gonna....
Wait until you see me out there with the music and everything.
Well, you'll....
What will I do?
You'll start to bust out in a cold sweat...
...and then just like in a fairytale, you'll be so proud of me...
...that you're gonna ask me to do something and be somebody...
...and I'm gonna do it and be it.
Honey, I could ask you that right now.
You sure look elegant.
Not now, Frank.
That ain't the way I planned it.
Besides, you can't kneel down here.
Then I'll come back to your tent after I come off.
And then you can take your time and ask me real slow-like.
I better get. Would you like to touch me for luck?
There ain't nothing like that in Dark County.
"My defenses are down
She's broken my resistance
"And I don't know where I am
"I went into the fight like a lion
"But I came out like a lamb
"My defenses are down
She's got me where she wants me
"And I can't escape no how
"I could speak to my heart
"When it weakened
"But my heart won't listen now
"Like a toothless clawless tiger
"Like an organ grinder's bear
"Like a knight without his armor
"Like Samson without his hair
"My defenses are down
"I might as well surrender
"For the battle can't be won
"But I must confess
"That I like it
"So there's nothing to be done
"Yes, I must confess
"That I like it
"Being miserable
"Is gonna be fun
"Your defenses are down
She's got you where she wants you
"And you can't escape no how
"I could speak to my heart when it weakened
"But your heart won't listen now
"Like a toothless clawless tiger
"Like an organ grinder's bear
"Like a knight without his armor
"Like Samson without his hair
"My defenses are down
"You might as well surrender
"For the battle can't be won
"But I must confess
"That I like it
"So there's nothing to be done
"Yes, you must confess that you like it
"Being miserable
"Is gonna be fun"
And now, ladies and gentleman, for the surprise feature...
...of the Buffalo Bill Wild West Show.
For the first time in any arena...
...we will witness this afternoon a feat of marksmanship, daring and bravery...
...never before attempted in all the world.
Ladies and gentleman, we proudly present Miss Annie Oakley.
I don't want you to blame Annie.
She was only trying to surprise you.
She wouldn't cross anybody.
That's what I thought! I thought she was such a sweet, simple little girl.
Simple. In two weeks,
I wind up being her assistant.
Look who's talking. I've watched you push her around for months now.
Handing you your guns.
Grateful for any crumb the great
Frank Butler would deign to drop.
You're so conceited, if you fell in love with anybody else, it'd be a triangle!
Maybe you'd like to hit me, too?
Charlie was talking for both of us.
Frank! I've been looking all over for you.
Did you see me? Were you surprised?
-It was the surprise of my life.
-I knew you'd like it.
Now, if you two will get, we want to be alone.
Get away! You've been chasing me all the way from the big tent.
Make him stop saying that!
What does it mean?
It's all right, honey.
It's a compliment. In the Sioux language,
'Watanya Cicilia' means "Little Sure Shot."
Of course, he wants to meet you.
Miss Annie Oakley, may I present Chief Sitting Bull.
I'm glad to meet you, Mr. Bull.
Thank you kindly.
I want you to meet my best friend,
Mr. Frank Butler.
You in show, too?
In the show? He's the star!
Star?
That means he's the best.
No, you best.
Good girl.
That's all right.
He wants you to be his friend.
Not friend. I make her my daughter.
-What?
-That's a great honor.
He wants to adopt you.
I've called Sioux tribe together.
We have big ceremony.
-When, Chief?
-Now.
Not now. I have to contact the newspapers, send some wires.
-That'll take a little time.
-Now!
That's what I said. Now.
To be near daughter...
...Sitting Bull break rule.
Put money in show business.
You hear that? Now we can go to New York, Madison Square Garden!
We'll tour Europe, the whole world!
Everything's happening so fast.
First, I get me a new papa...
...and now if you two will get, I could get me a husband. Couldn't I, Frank?
-Where did he go?
-He probably went out to change.
Wait a minute.
Buffalo! Charlie! Help!
Come!
You...
...say after me.
Teeth of many bear.
Am I an Indian yet?
Not yet.
Am I an Indian yet?
Not yet.
Am I an Indian yet?
Come.
Watanya Cicilia.
Now!
"Like the Seminole, Navajo, Kickapoo
"Like those Indians, I'm an Indian, too
"A Sioux, a Sioux
"Just like Rising Moon,
Falling Pants, Running Nose
"Like those Indians, I'm an Indian, too
"A Sioux, a Sioux
"Some Indian summer's day, without a care
"I may run away with Big Chief Son of a Bear
"And I'll have totem poles, tomahawks, small papoose
"Which will go to prove
I'm an Indian too
"A Sioux, a Sioux
"I'm an Indian, I'm an Indian
I'm an honest Injun Indian
"I'm an Indian too
"How! "
Well, now I'm an Indian.
Do we carry on that way every time we take in a new member?
I'm beat.
Here's a letter for you, Annie.
For me?
Thanks.
I ain't never had a letter before.
Frank!
Frank. Your best friend.
Papa Bull, can you read writing?
Papa Bull writing book.
Can you make this out?
"Dear Annie. I'm leav--"
What's the matter?
"I'm leaving tonight to join Pawnee Bill's show.
"I'm going to do my old act with Dolly."
Why?
"You put over greatest trick I ever saw.
"You are a smart girl, Annie, too smart for me.
"Good luck to you and goodbye. Frank."
What does he mean? Too smart for....
It must be some sort of joke.
It was gonna be Butler and Oakley.
I was gonna....
Are you sure you can read?
You want him killed?
Papa Bull, we was gonna be married tonight. Me and Frank.
I was gonna be a lady for him and everything.
I was trying so hard!
You great lady, Annie.
You best shot in whole world.
Oh, Papa Bull! I wish I'd never seen a gun.
You kids be good and do everything that Miss Willoughby tells you to do.
Where's Little Jake?
Jake?
Little Jake.
Annie, it's awful important that I go with you. Honest, it is.
I wish you could, Little Jake, but you've got to take Jessie and Minnie...
...and Nellie back to Ohio.
But who's going to teach you to read?
I guess I'll have to learn myself.
Goodbye, kids.
-Take good care of them, Miss Willoughby.
-I will.
-Goodbye, Annie.
-And hurry up back, Annie.
I will.
Goodbye.
Take good care of your shooting arm,
Annie.
I will, Jake. 'Bye.
-There it is. Time to get aboard.
-Not yet.
-Something wrong?
-Maybe.
Maybe what?
Don't you think people would come and say goodbye to people...
...when people are going to Europe?
Annie, maybe he couldn't make it.
You mean, maybe he didn't want to.
I don't care. Don't mean nothing to me.
Come on. I'm gonna be the biggest hit in the whole world.
I'm going to win every shooting medal ever invented.
Then Mr. Frank Butler won't be so proud and mighty. I'll show him.
Yes, now. Come on.
Miss Oakley, you're a very remarkable young lady.
Sit down.
My daughter, Annie, many fine medals.
Hello, Charlie. Great success, wasn't it?
Another success like that and we'll go broke.
What are you saying?
These command performances are costing us our shirts.
They command, we perform, no one pays.
We got enough money to meet our payroll this week?
Meet it? We're not close enough to even wave at it.
Maybe we'll break even in Sweden.
They only have one king and he's on a vacation.
Look, Charlie, what would you think about pulling up stakes here and heading home?
We've got a whole tour ahead of us.
Now is our chance to make a little money.
-This has all just been a buildup.
-I wasn't thinking about the money.
I didn't hear you.
Have you been watching Annie lately?
I watch her every show.
-She's a great little sharpshooter.
-I don't think that's enough for her.
-We'll build up her act a little.
-Charlie, talk sense.
What do you expect me to say?
That she'd be happier back with the great Frank Butler?
I'd rather see her elope with Sitting Bull.
At least she'd always have a tent over her head.
Listen to me. Frank is all right.
The only important thing is
Annie's in love with him.
That's where you're wrong.
Annie is as happy as a little lark.
Here comes your happy little lark now.
-The show went swell, didn't it?
-You were superb, my dear.
You knocked them right out of their seats.
Do you think that I thanked the queen enough?
You certainly did.
You gave a great show.
It's fun traveling around Europe like this, isn't it?
Isn't it?
Sure. You get to travel all around, meet a lot of interesting people.
I love it.
Well, I'm all packed.
Where we heading now?
North? South?
We haven't decided.
We were talking about Sweden.
That's nice.
And then of course, we could go back to America.
We could?
-Do you really mean it?
-Would you like that, honey?
I love Europe, but I've been dying to go home.
That's what we figured.
I'd get to see the kids again.
Yes. Wouldn't that be nice?
Of course, I can't wait till a certain Mr. Somebody sees this.
Aren't they cute?
Yeah, but if we're so rich, what are we doing on a cattle boat?
We thought it'd be nice to keep the animals company.
Our European tour was an artistic success.
He means we're broke.
You don't mean the king of ltaly and the Kaiser couldn't dig up $1 .50?
My dear child, kings don't handle money.
Same as us.
In brief, we had a choice of traveling on this boat or getting our feet very wet.
Shut up!
It costs a lot of money to travel a big troupe up and down Europe.
Remember what happened in Paris when the Indians discovered French pastry?
Sixty-two thousand chocolate clairs.
Sixty-two thousand, five hundred.
You see? That cost a heap of money.
But, Papa Bull, what happened to your heap?
Government put Papa Bull on small allowance.
$32.50 a week.
But why?
Because in the eight months he's been with us, he's drawn $300,000...
...and he has nothing to show for it except an opera hat...
...and a shoebox full of our lOUs.
That's show business.
I'll give it to you straight.
We can't keep the show open.
It costs too much money!
But you can't break up the show.
I go back to reservation.
Reservation very quiet after show business.
What will happen to you, Buffalo Bill?
I'll be fine. Dime museums, side shows.
Everything is going to be all right, honey.
Only just now we've got to raise a little bit of cash.
Let's turn this into a pirate ship.
Sitting Bull, hungry.
Buffalo Bill's hungry, too.
I'd settle right now for....
I'd settle right....
Annie, do you think you could shoot one of those?
Which one do you want and where do you want him?
Get the one with the meat on him.
There, you see?
Everything finally turns out all right.
Take this down to the chef.
-What for?
-A seagull sandwich.
I guess I'll mosey on back to my stall.
It's time to milk my roommate.
Annie, come down to me.
I want you to meet a friend of mine.
There she is.
Heaving to boarding instructions.
Come aboard by port bow.
We got a visitor.
Who is it?
It looks like Frank Butler.
Well, so it does.
Come on, Annie. Take a look.
I don't want to look! And if he's coming on this boat, I'm leaving.
No, Annie!
Stay. Talk.
Maybe I will.
Sure, I'll talk to him.
I'll say:
"What are you doing here, you big swollen-headed stiff? Get! "
Then he'll say:
"I just came down to meet you, honey."
Then I'll say:
"I don't want to get met by you.
Get away from me.
"Take your hands off me. I hate you."
Then he'll say:
"Now, honey."
Then I'll say:
"Don't honey me.
"You thought I'd double-crossed you.
You thought I tried to show you up.
"When you did find out I only done the trick just so you'd love me...
"...why didn't you love me?
Why did you leave?
"Why didn't you write?"
Then he'll say:
"'Cause I was ashamed.
"Besides, not writing don't mean that somebody don't love somebody."
Then I'll say:
"Well anyway, you could have written."
Then he'll say:
"Annie, I've been eating my heart out for you. I can't work. I can't sleep."
Then, of course, if he says that...
...l guess I'll just have to say:
"I ain't slept much, too."
Then by rights...
...he ought to say, "Annie, we both just got to get some sleep!
"I love you so."
Then I don't know how
I'll stop myself from saying:
"I love you, too."
Frank!
You ain't Frank!
Nobody said I was.
Why did you come here pretending, getting me to kiss you.
-He didn't do anything.
-Yes, he did.
He give me an appetite
I didn't want to get.
Who are you, son?
I'm working at Madison Square Garden.
I'm in the Pawnee Billy Show.
-How?
-How!
No. How's business?
We're packing them in.
Mostly society ladies.
Society ladies?
Sure. That Frank Butler, he's catnip for those debutantes.
Debutantes? What's that?
Ladies with long, white gloves.
Them long white gloves you're talking about...
...is there any special pair he likes?
We can't keep track of him. Colonel, sir...
-...I have a letter from Pawnee Bill to you.
-Thank you.
We were expecting you in on the Great Eastern.
Of course, I don't like to be separated from my cattle.
Charlie, show these gentlemen below.
Could I interest you in a tub of nice fresh milk?
-Let me read it.
-Certainly.
"Dear old pal.
"Welcome home, you millionaires.
"We want to give you all a big reception...
"...at the Hotel...."
No, honey. Brevoort.
I can read, lately.
"The Hotel Brevoort.
"Tomorrow night.
"The town's dying to meet you.
"Frank's bringing all his society friends."
All right. Turn over.
"Please tell my messenger that you will come...
"...so we can start to ice the champ-a-ginny."
Champagne.
"Ice the champagne.
"Your old pal, Pawnee Bill."
Champagne at the Brevoort.
That old tenderfoot must be filthy rich.
Good! Pawnee Bill possible sucker.
What are you talking about?
Buffalo Bill poor, but good.
Pawnee Bill bad, but rich.
Put together, make good and rich.
He may have something there.
We could merge, you know.
We've got the prestige and he's got the money.
We could combine our shows.
Annie, how would you like that?
If the shows could merge, me and Frank would just have to work together...
...and then pretty soon, maybe him and me could do some merging.
Yes. I'd better go find that messenger.
Now, you'll be with your friend, Frank.
Papa Bull, he'll make you a wonderful son-in-law.
Maybe he's fallen in love with one of those pink and white ladies...
...he's always talking about.
When you fall in love with Frank?
The first time I seen him.
He took to me right away.
He sung me a love song.
He just spit his heart right out at me.
"The girl that I marry will have to be
"As soft and as pink as a nursery
"The girl I'll call my own
"Will wear satins and laces
"And smell of cologne
"Her nails will be polished
"And in her hair
"She'll wear a gardenia
"He'll be there
"lnstead of flitting
"He'll be sitting
"Next to her
"And she'll purr like a kitten
"A doll he can carry
"The girl that he marries"
-I'm giving a weekend party at my estate.
-That's fine.
I'll be expecting you.
I'm sorry, but I don't think
I could leave my horses.
-Horses?
-Excuse me.
-Frank, don't forget our dance.
-I won't.
Isn't this our dance?
I'm sorry, but I promised this one to Pawnee Bill.
-Excuse me.
-Will you excuse us?
-Frank, isn't it a lovely party?
-Yeah.
-It is a nice party, isn't it?
-If you like witches.
Why did you send that faded Gibson girl to fetch me?
I'm out of my mind worrying if Annie will even talk to me.
Well, I'll have to tell you. We're at the end of our line. We owe everybody.
I don't get it.
We're making a fortune at the Garden.
Yeah. With the sheriff at the door pulling it out again.
Why are you giving this party for Buffalo Bill, then?
It's an investment.
I'm trying to promote a partnership.
-You mean, put the two shows together?
-Yes.
Hey, that's wonderful.
Then she'd have to talk to me.
I knew I could count on you.
Colonel William F. Cody.
-Where are you going?
-I got a surprise for her. I'll be right back.
Mr. Charles Davenport and their company.
Well, well. My old pal, Bill.
Pawnee Bill, my old pal. What a reunion!
You're a sight for sore eyes.
You know, you look wonderful?
-I look wonderful?
-Yes!
I look terrible. You look wonderful.
Doesn't he?
He never looked this good to me.
-Where's Annie?
-She's on her way.
I'm anxious to see her. Let's have a drink.
-Well, Bill, here's to you.
-No. Here's to you.
-No. To you.
-No, I insist. Here's to you.
Let's drink to me.
No. Later.
I read about your European tour.
-Biggest show they've seen over there.
-We got by.
-I hear you're doing fine at the Garden.
-Well, you know, making a living.
Let's have another drink.
The real stuff is in there.
Mighty nice of you to give us this fine party.
Nothing at all. We are buddies, aren't we?
As a matter of fact, we cut off our European tour...
...so Annie could be with Frank.
Is that so?
I wonder how we could manage that?
I've been wondering the same thing.
Let me propose a toast.
To the two greatest showmen in America.
Pawnee Bill and Buffalo Bill.
-What a combination.
-Yes.
We could merge the shows and then
Annie and Frank could be together.
Why didn't I think of that?
This calls for a real celebration.
Let me fill them up again for you.
-Darling--
-Beat it.
There we are.
Here's to the new
Buffalo Bill-Pawnee Bill Wild West Show.
Hold on. No, sir. Here's to the new
Pawnee Bill-Buffalo Bill Wild West Show.
No, you come first.
I'll bet they're going to serve dove for dinner.
This is a night I will always remember.
Me too, B.B.
Now, if we had $100,000--
A hundred thousand what?
I was going to say, if we had $100,000, we could pay off our debts.
-What were you going to say?
-The same thing.
Why, you dirty crook!
Miss Annie Oakley.
Chief Sitting Bull.
-Do you see him yet?
-He'll be here.
Miss Oakley. Enchanted.
You're a friend of Frank Butler's.
-How'd you know?
-White gloves.
Charmed.
'Chanted.
Enchanted.
Charmed.
Oh, charmed.
Oh, 'chanted.
Enchanted.
Oh, charmed.
Delighted.
No. You either got to be charmed or 'chanted.
-May I get you some chicken salad?
-You sure can.
I don't know what's ailing me lately but I'm always hungry.
-I wonder what that's from.
-From not eating.
All those medals,
I read they were worth $100,000.
What is that big one for?
For shooting the apple off the Crown Prince's head.
And this little one?
For shooting the worm out of the apple.
Isn't she heavenly?
Miss Oakley, won't you shoot something for us?
Yes. Please do.
If I'd brought my gun, I'd love to.
I'd love to shoot all of you.
Pawnee Bill!
Waiter, drop the tray and throw the guests of honor out.
-Ain't we merging?
-The merger's off.
Come on, everybody.
-Out!
-Why?
They haven't got as much money as we haven't got.
You've got to do something!
Wait!
Two shows must go together.
Annie want Frank. Annie get Frank.
Papa Bull find money.
Where?
Me know paleface with many diamonds, much gold.
Who?
You.
Me?
But I can't sell my medals.
No sell medals, no money for merger.
No merger, nobody merge.
But we've got to merge.
There's too many white gloves around here.
I'll tell you what I'll do.
If I can keep them until Frank sees them, you can have them.
Well, my old partner.
It'll be great to be working together again.
Waiter, champagne for all the guests of honor.
Come on, everybody.
You realize you just gave up your whole bankroll.
I don't care.
I've got what I had when I started.
Don't fret, Charlie. I'm doing fine.
"Taking stock of what I have and what I haven't
"What do I find
"The things I've got will keep me satisfied
"Checking up on what I have and what I haven't
"What do I find
"A healthy balance
"On the credit side
"Got no diamond, got no pearl still I think I'm a lucky girl
"I've got the sun in the morning and the moon at night
"Got no mansion, got no yacht still I'm happy with what I've got
"I've got the sun in the morning and the moon at night
"Sunshine gives me a lucky day
"Moonshine gives me the Milky Way
"Got no checkbooks, got no banks still I'd like to express my thanks
"I've got the sun in the morning and the moon at night
"And with the sun in the morning and the moon in the evening
"I'm all right
"Got no butler, got no maid still we think you've been overpaid
"I've got the sun in the morning and the moon at night
"You've got the sun in the morning and the moon at night
"Got no silver, got no gold what you got can't be bought or sold
"I've got the sun in the morning and the moon at night
"She's got the sun in the morning and the moon at night
"Sunshine gives me a lucky day
"Moonshine gives me the Milky Way
"Got no diamond, got no pearl still Miss Annie's a lucky girl
"I've got the sun in the morning
"Sun in the morning
"Moon in the evening
"Moon in the evening
"Sun in the morning and the moon in the evening
"And I'm feeling all right"
Where are we going?
What's the matter?
Frank!
Don't move or I'll fall.
I ain't ever moving again.
What have you got spilled on you?
Eau de cologne water.
It's powerful, ain't it?
Frank, look.
Polish.
-You look wonderful.
-Do I?
-Do I dazzle you?
-I couldn't have stood it much longer.
-Am I driving you crazy?
-Plumb.
-I love you, Annie.
-I love you back.
Why didn't you write to me?
Well, I figured you'd be tied up with them European counts and dukes.
I been hearing about your collection of white gloves.
-I missed you every minute.
-Keep talking.
-I didn't like living without you.
-Keep talking.
-You are everybody in the world.
-Keep talking.
I don't want to talk.
I just want to hold you like this.
Annie, I want you to have something.
Frank, I can't take them, honest I can't.
Go on, honey. A little jewelry will look good with that ring.
Go on. Pin them on.
Where?
I got a little piece of space left between...
...France and Switzerland.
-How come you got that vacant lot there?
-I didn't wear them all.
What are you waiting for?
You don't want these.
They haven't got any stones in them.
I got all the stones I want.
Go ahead, Frank.
No, these are too plain for you.
They just got writing on the back.
"To Frank Butler,
The Champion Sharpshooter of the World."
Of what world?
The Old World or the New World?
-The whole world.
-These say you ain't.
-They don't prove anything.
-I ain't been beat yet.
If you mean that time in Cincinnati, that was beginner's luck.
I thought maybe that nonsense had been knocked out of you.
It couldn't happen again in a million years!
It's going to happen again tomorrow!
-Charlie!
-Yes?
Find someplace where we can have a match.
-Who?
-Me and old potshot here.
A love match.
There ain't no love in a shooting woman.
What a wife she'd make!
Instead of tending house, she'd tend her guns.
She'd be out hitting targets.
You'd be out missing them!
That's not the right spirit to start working together.
-We're not working together!
-Not now or ever!
-Cannot stop merger.
-I just did.
And get us a range!
That dress sure had me fooled.
I thought you was getting to be a lady.
It's gonna be a pleasure to give you a lesson in marksmanship.
You couldn't give me a lesson in long-distance spitting!
"Anything you can do I can do better
I can do anything better than you
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
"Anything you can be I can be greater
Sooner or later I'm greater than you
-"No, you're not
-"Yes, I am
-"No, you're not
-"Yes, I am
-"No, you're not
-"Yes, I am
"I can shoot a partridge with a single cartridge
"I can get a sparrow with a bow and arrow
-"I can live on bread and cheese
-"And only on that?
-"Yes
-"So can a rat
"Any note you can reach I can go higher
"I can sing anything higher than you
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
"No, you can't
"Yes, I can
"Anything you can buy I can buy cheaper
I can buy anything cheaper than you
-"Fifty cents
-"Forty cents
-"Thirty cents
-"Twenty cents
-"You can't
-"Yes, I can
"Anything you can say I can say softer
"I can say anything softer than you
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
"I can drink my liquor faster than a flicker
"I can drink it quicker and get even sicker
-"I can open any safe
-"Without getting caught
-"Sure
-"That's what I thought, you crook
"Any note you can hold I can hold longer
"I can hold any note longer than you
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
"Yes, you can!
"Anything you can wear I can wear better
"In what you wear I'd look better than you
-"In my coat
-"In your vest
-"In my shoes
-"In your hat
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
"Anything you can say I can say faster
"I can say anything faster than you
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"I can jump a hurdle
-"I can wear a girdle
-"I can knit a sweater
-"I could fill it better
"I can do most anything
-"Can you bake a pie
-"No
"Neither can I
"Any note you can sing I can sing sweeter
"I can sing anything sweeter than you
"No, you can't
"Yes, I can
"No, you can't
"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can
"No, you can't, can't, can't
"Yes, I can, can, can
-"No, you can't
-"Yes, I can"
Ladies and gentlemen.
You are about to witness a contest of marksmanship...
...for the championship of the world...
...between Miss Annie Oakley...
...and Mr. Frank Butler!
Straight shooting, using clay targets...
...the best out of 100 shots...
...five shots at a time.
This one fixed.
I hope you know what you're doing.
Annie won't like losing this match.
She like. Annie win match, lose Frank.
Annie lose match, win Frank.
We make peace medicine.
Is that satisfactory?
Unless he'd like a handicap.
Let's get started.
I've got a date in town with a lady...
...and I've only got a half-hour to beat her.
Beat me! You wouldn't want to make a bet on that, would you?
-Anytime!
-You got it!
-Give me that case with the medals.
-Wait, now. Let's not get hasty.
I'm betting all these medals against those three tin badges of yours.
Annie, you can't bet away $100,000.
That's our whole bankroll.
-You don't think I'll lose, do you?
-Sure. I mean, no!
-Here they are.
-Here, let me hold the stakes.
You and your peace medicine.
You have heard the rules of the contest.
Are you ready?
-Ready.
-Ready?
Ready!
Pull!
Miss!
Pull!
Miss!
-Charlie, get me another gun!
-Yeah.
Come on. What's the matter?
Nothing. I was just trying to make a little war medicine.
Watch this one, Mr. Frank Butler!
Pull!
Miss!
-I don't know what's the matter with me.
-Now, steady, Annie.
Charlie, give me another gun!
Here, honey. Try mine for luck.
-Did you call me "honey"?
-Sure I did.
Go on. Try it.
Pull!
Pull!
Now, I'm gonna make up what I lost.
Of course, you were just giving me a handicap.
Sure.
Pull!
Pull!
Hit!
Pull!
Hit!
Pull!
Hit!
Pull!
The great Miss Oakley.
Here. I don't need any luck from you.
-Yes, you do!
-No, I don't.
Give me another gun, Charlie.
You have better luck with this one.
I don't know what's the matter with me.
You do fine. Keep missing, you win.
Be second-best, Annie.
You tell me, can't get a man with gun.
Remember?
Yeah.
You get man with this gun.
Why didn't I think of that?
Give me that gun, Papa Bull!
Pull!
Miss!
Pull!
Miss!
I can't. I quit.
I concede this match to Mr. Frank Butler, the greatest sharpshooter in the world.
-You don't know what you're doing!
-Yes, I do.
It just ain't no use.
I ain't the champion anymore.
I'm only second-best.
-Ain't that right, Papa Bull?
-That's right, Little Sure Shot.
I don't know what will happen to me.
I guess I'll have to go back to Dark County.
Go on. He won the medals.
Charlie, give him the medals.
Charlie! Give him those medals.
-Annie, these belong to you.
-No.
You won them. You keep them.
We're gonna be partners.
Partners?
Butler and Oakley?
In alphabelitical order.
"There's no business
Like show business
"Like no business I know
"Everything about it is appealing
"Everything the traffic will allow
"Nowhere could you get that happy feeling
"When you are stealing that extra bow
"There's no people like show people
"They smile when they are low
"Even with a turkey that you know will fold
"You may be stranded out in the cold
"Still you wouldn't change it for a sack of gold
"Let's go on with the show! "
THE MERRY WIDOW
Your attention please.
Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen.
In exactly five seconds, we can welcome the twentieth century.
Should auld acquaintance be forgot
and never brought to mind?
GERMAN IMPERIAL EMBASSY
Should auld acquaintance be forgot,
and never brought to mind?
THE CHINESE EMBASSY
Should auld acquaintance be forgot
and never brought to mind?
ROYAL EMBASSY OF MARSHOVIA
2nd Floor
Happy New Year.
- The same to you, your excellency.
Should we take one more in honor of your majesty?
Telegram.
Make sure that he is not a bill collector.
What is it?
- A cable for the Marshovian ambassador.
Don't take it if it is collect.
- Collect?
Been paid.
It's from the king.
- The king.
And it's in code.
- Take the book.
It probably to wish us a happy New Year.
That's actually very thoughtful of him.
Now we must have that little extra drink.
The first word?
Darling.
- Darling?
Darling.
Darling.
Darling, darling.
Darling, darling.
Ah, here it is, darling.
You are the biggest idiot in the diplomatic service.
You forget yourself?
But these are his majesty's exact words.
It is from the book.
Next word?
Here is the whole message.
Decode it.
Larki.
Larki.
In my medicine kit in my bathroom there is a small bottle with poison.
Take it out and hide it.
Well, what does he say?
You are the biggest idiot in the diplomatic service.
There are only three marshovians in the U.S.
Two are penniless.
One died leaving 80 million dollars to his widow, she is in New York.
Good Morning.
- Good Morning.
We have come to see to Mrs. Radek.
This gentleman...
Do you have an appointment?
- I am sure she will be delighted to see us.
Mrs. Radek is not at home.
We will wait.
- No visitors without an appointment.
What seems to be the trouble, Paki?
Miss Riley, these gentlemen insist on seeing Mrs Radek.
What can I do for you?
I am Mrs. Radeks secretary.
Our mission is private.
- I'm her private secretary.
And personal.
- I am her personal secretary.
We just have to talk to her privately and personally.
You see this matter is confidential.
I am her confidential secretary too.
Confidentially I suggest that you write her a personal appointment and state your private business.
I appreciate your..
- I realise it is very important.
You must be anxious to get that letter written, so I won't detain you any longer.
Thank you.
Thank you very much.
Why did I thank her for?
Thank you.
Paki would you help with the parcels please?
Kitty, Kitty I'm back.
Hello.
- Hello.
I have two tickets to "Captain James."
I hear Ethel Barrymore is just one core.
- Were there any calls?
Yes, the Opera Association called.
There are a couple of papers to sign and two gentlemen were here.
I just got rid of them.
Looked like a tax.
Madame Radek, at last.
We have been most anxious to see you.
These are the gentlemen I told you about.
Oh yes.
I understand your business is confidential?
It is more than that madame, it is a matter of the heart.
And what charity do you represent?
- Charity?
We come to give, not to get.
This gentleman is the Marshovian ambassador, a minister private pensionary to the United States.
This is my attach and personal assistant.
Marshovia.
Well, how do you do gentlemen?
Won't you come in?
What can I do for you?
- Forgive our intrusion madame, but our excuse must be the place that Charles Radek holds in the heart of his countrymen.
- Won't you be seated?
Marshovia never forgets her sons.
We hope your husband did not forget Marshovia.
He had the most pleasant memories of it.
You would be pleased to hear that his majesty is erecting a statue.
To Charlie?
Will you honor his majesty by coming to Marshovia, to preside at the unveiling?
A statue to Charlie.
Oh, he would have been very pleased.
After all he was only a blacksmith in Marshovia.
But an industrial giant in America.
There was a charming little square near the station.
It it still there?
- Madame has been to Marshovia?
Oh never, but Charlie talked about it to me.
You know, he once shot the king's horse there.
And that little inn across the way?
The innkeeper had to pay him with cakes.
Charlie used to watch the nobility when they had their parties at the inn.
Now the nobility will watch Charles Radick.
His Majesty has chosen that very square for the statue.
That will be very nice.
Thank his Majesty. I am very proud to accept his most gracious invitation.
Thank you, madame.
Trumpets will sound.
An entire nation will be there to welcome you.
Follow me, follow me, follow me to a land
where the whiskey is free.
Around your neck like a necklace of pearls
hang the girls, girls, girls, girls.
What can I inter share with the world?
I can take any port in a storm.
Just as long as the girls are as warm as the wine
every girl is my valentine.
Drink it down, drink it down, drink it down
through the purse leather purse of a gown.
To the lips and the eyes at the girls,
of the girls, girls, girls, girls, girls.
Love they say is a state of the mind
and my mind for the girls is inclined.
If I kissed only one, that would not be polite.
So I kiss all the girls tonight.
When we match down the streets a parade.
We erect we inspect the facade.
And my heart like a batter of birds
to the girls. Girls, girls, girls.
For not all of his medals were won
on the run with a sword or a gun.
They were won from the start in affairs of the heart.
And today I will play
my heart.
Men, this is an important occasion.
Mrs. Radek first impression of Marshovia will be this reception.
I challenge each of you to outdo himself, for the honor of king and country.
Ready.
Attention.
Present arms.
Silence.
Silence.
Rest weapons.
Break ranks.
Come on, come on, hurry.
Fast, fast.
Attention.
Present arms.
Stop, stop.
Nitki.
How long are we supposed to wait here?
His majesty said all week if necessary.
- Very well.
Rest weapons.
Men, we are supposed to remain here a week if necessary.
Attention.
Why...
There is no one here to meet us.
It looks like the place from what Charlie used to say.
But is it?
Is this Marshovia?
What else could it be?
Trumpets will sound, an entire nation will welcome you.
It isn't their fault that the train is a little late.
A little late? As far as I can figure that is still yesterday's train.
Fourteen days on a boat, eight days on a train, if you call it a train.
And this is a way they put down the red carpet.
Maybe I can get us a ride to the palace.
Vilia, oh, Vilia,
your love is a flame.
Soft as a kiss,
hear me whisper your name.
Vilia, oh, Vilia,
my heart calls to you.
Where is the love song
we knew?
Dance, little gypsy,
and so weave your spell.
All men must love you,
not wisely but rare.
Vilia, oh, Vilia,
my lovely, my all.
Love me and be mine
not all.
Dance, little gypsy,
and so weave your spell.
All men must love you, not wisely but rare.
Vilia, oh, Vilia,
my lovely,
my all.
Love me and be mine
not all.
Be mine not all.
Mine not
all.
Crystal.
Crystal.
Come on, get on.
The welcome committee is ready if you are.
That man, the one who was singing, what is his name?
Danilo.
Danilo.
Are you sure you were expected?
You saw the invitation and the king's signature.
Maybe it was faked.
I never did trust that ambassador.
It is funny.
A palace with nobody in it.
It looks more like
Grand Central Station to me.
All the morning anguish...
It worked.
Pardon, pardon, are you the rich ladies from America?
We are from America.
Oh, and you find us asleep.
What a catastrophe.
But we have been expecting you since early morning.
If we had walked we have gotten here sooner.
In Marshovia, the right train always comes the wrong time.
Your rooms are ready.
This way please.
His Majesty planned to greet you in person but he too must have fallen asleep.
If the king heard that I dosed off..
Don't worry we won't tell him.
Who is this man?
What are you doing here?
- He brought us from the station.
Did nobody meet you?
Nobody.
- Not the honor guard?
Not the blessed garoons, the hussars, the royal band?
It doesn't matter.
We're here.
But they were going to sing the star-bangled banner.
Count Danilo.
He was in charge of the reception.
Did you not see him?
Well, I heard him singing at the inn.
But it was not the star-bangled banner.
- Wait till the king hears of this.
Welcome to your home in Marshovia.
Now I shall wake the king.
Have orders to bring news of your arrival.
Oh no. Wait till tomorrow.
- Very well.
My instructions are to please you.
And now I have to honor to wish your highnesses goodnight.
Thank you.
Oh, Kitty.
Is it not wonderful?
You can buy this palace ten times over.
But money can't buy this.
Look at this room.
It's a birthday cake room.
And look Kitty.
Everybody came to the party.
Sure. That's why they couldn't meet the train.
- Who cares?
Where did you ever get off a train, to find all the people singing and dancing?
Not in Hoboken, where I come from.
No, not in Yonkers either.
But I didn't have to come from the station in a car.
It doesn't matter, what if the trains are late?
Nobody is there to meet.
At least the people know how to live.
They have time to sing, to dance.
Oh, that is something out of a book, Kitty.
I'll rip the hide of that Danilo.
I told him how important it was to impress the widow.
Not to mention the fact that it costs a pretty penny to prepare the reception.
Oh, that Danilo.
He'll regret this till the end of his life.
If he lives that long.
- Hermann. Stop hallowing.
You run the palace, I run the government.
Where do you think we can find him?
I couldn't say for sure your majesty, but I have a few ideas.
So have I.
We go to mine first.
My hat.
- Yes. Yes sir.
No, no, no, your majesty.
You know,
I never wear my crown in the street.
I'm busy.
- Open the door.
Who is it?
- Open in the name of his majesty.
Yes, tell his majesty I'm sorry, but...
Is Count Danilo in there?
- Just a minute I'll see.
I can tell the rest of your fortune too: you are about in trouble with a big fat king.
I might have known I couldn't rely on you.
A fine officer you are, neglecting your duty.
I ought to rip the stars of your uniform.
Where is your uniform?
Here it is.
What are you good for anyway?
Nothing.
Except to run around after women.
I don't run after them sir, they run after me. It's the family curse.
You're just like your father.
- My father, sir? Your brother.
And just like your grandfather.
- Your father.
I know, I know, that's the problem with your side of the family.
I wonder why I put up with you?
- Well, I'm a relative, sir.
The only talent you have is to make women fall in love with you and I warn you.
Danilo, my dear nephew, we must have a long talk.
You may yet prove a credit to Marshovia.
Kitty.
Are you awake?
I have a date to go dreaming...
with someone I never know.
Tonight, put your white tie and pailes on,
and be my chaperone.
Night, do a favor just
for me,
lift your veil and let
me see my love.
Night, light your candles in the sky.
Did I hear a lady sigh 
above?
Love is a serenade
that may fade
with the moon.
Night,
one more favor for a friend.
Please, don't let this evening end...
too
soon.
I have a life to live
and I give it to love.
Night, I'm waiting
your reply.
Please, do not let her tell me no...
or I'll shall die.
What's going on here?
Count Danilo.
Count Danilo.
Your Majesty, I'll give my life for Marshovia. I will do anything.
I'll fight alone against our enemies...
- We do not have enemies.
Only creditors.
- This woman is not for me.
Exile me, do something drastic, but don't do this.
Oh, she can't be that bad.
Our ambassador has cabled us that the widow Radek is charming and attractive.
Our ambassador is an old man.
There is a difference in points of view.
I am not asking you to fall in love with the woman, marriage is quite enough.
If we don't pay what we owe, the emperor of Austria is threatening to march in and make us a province.
I know, your majesty, but..
- Enough, Count Danilo.
You're under orders.
You will return to your apartment at once and first thing in the morning you receive further instructions and this is a command, Danilo.
You will woo and wed the widow Radek.
I may wed her, your majesty, but I won't woo.
"Count Danilo will bring to the widow Radek... one bunch long stamp freshly cut dark roses."
I cut them myself.
- How nice.
Thank you.
"In the roses will be a card with appropriate settings."
His majesty wrote it himself, all you have to do is sign it.
Does the king really believe, that a woman would fall for this kind of a courtship?
I don't know.
Mittzy, come here.
Tell me the truth.
Would you fall for this?
If it were you captain Danilo,
I'd follow in a minute.
Yes.
- Shall I continue with the program, captain?
It is not a program, it is a death sentence.
"At 12.30 take the widow Radek for a ride in the park."
"Undress uniform".
Thank you.
"2:00 PM lunch at the officer's club."
"4.30 PM horseback riding near the river."
No uniform.
Civilian riding habit.
"8.00 PM official banquet to welcome the widow Radek.
Full dress uniform.
Wear boots comfortable for dancing".
It is all arranged eh?
Like the train schedule.
But she doesn't know it.
- Too bad she doesn't.
It's time to get dressed, captain Danilo.
Wait a minute, what do you think, you are?
- It is a military command from his majesty.
It's inhuman.
Inhuman.
I never thought the king was so romantic.
Listen.
"At precisely 11.00 AM Captain Danilo will bring to the widow Radek one bunch long stamp freshly cut dark roses."
She will fall for that in a minute.
It's a cruel to honor a man to make a man.
Poor Count Danilo, I'm afraid he's hooked.
Unless...
I was wondering...
- So was I.
Do you think?
- I think.
Good morning, your excellency.
- Hello, Susan.
For madame Radek
Do you take care of her?
Gladly, your excellency.
Such beautiful roses.
They are taller than I am.
- You know I like my roses taller and women to think.
Confidentially, Susan, how does she look?
Very rich.
Well, announce me.
Your excellency Count Danilo is here, madame.
- Tell him just a minute.
Danilo. That's the fellow who's serenading us last night.
Oh, the second story man.
It's going to take me some time.
What I can do?
You go talk to him till I'm ready.
I'll get dressed and take care of him.
- No no, no, don't keep him waiting.
Put that on and tell him I'll be right out.
Kitty, don't make jokes about the serenade.
It must be one of their customs.
Remember charming, behave yourself.
Don't worry, I have the manners of a duchess when I set my mind to it.
Count Danilo.
Madame.
I'm here as the king's emissary to make you happy and comfortable in Marshovia.
I am at your service to entertain, to amuse, to give pleasure.
But captain Danilo...
- Please, stop.
I am forced to say what is in my heart.
Last night, when I came to sing for your window, it was at the request of my king.
But when I saw you, you were lovely by moonlight.
You are lovelier now.
I see a face and either I respond at once or I am permanently adamant.
With me it is always and with you?
I must say count it is thrilling for a simple American girl from Yonkers to hear such romantic talk, but is that your customary breeding?
Believe me madame,
I have never made a speech before in my life.
Don't be annoyed, if you find me too impetuous.
I have to see you again.
At 12.30 I will honor myself by taking you for a ride in the park.
Goodbye, dear lady, only a little while.
Goodbye.
Why did he leave?
I never saw anything like it in my life.
- Why didn't you tell him I'll be right out?
He didn't give me a chance. He just took one look at me and got carried away.
You better carry him back.
I want to meet him. Lovely roses.
He'll be back.
He's after something. You.
But, Kitty, he's never really seen me.
- Well that's just it.
That man wasn't talking to me.
He was making up to the rich Mrs. Radek.
He was?
- He was.
Teaches you one thing, when they start kissing your hand, hold on to your bracelet.
Kitty you're always suspicious of people.
Not people, just men.
Danilo is a count, a rich man.
What would he want with my money?
Who knows?
A penny here, a penny there.
"11 o'clock, bring roses, make speech."
What are you talking about?
"12.30, take widow for ride in the park ".
Kings orders, you're official business.
"8:00 PM, state banquet, to welcome the widow Radek."
"Remember Danilo, beauty passes, but 80 million dollars wisely invested remains".
They pretended, they wanted to do something wonderful for Charlie, to honor him.
And I melt.
Charlie didn't mean a thing to them, except money.
And that's all I mean to them.
And I don't like it.
- I don't like it either.
I'd have enough of this place.
I want to be treated like a person, not a cash register.
Forget Marshovia.
You can't even find another man.
Remember we have all of Europe in front of us,
Rome, Vienna, Paris...
Oh, I can't understand a man like Danilo.
But you must admit he is handsome.
Now that you mention it, he is very handsome.
Maybe that's important to you, but not to me.
The most important thing in a man is character.
- It is?
I mean it is.
I guess it would be easy for most women to look ahead for a man like Danilo.
A count, charming, fascinating...
Silly, isn't it?
- What silly?
To be interested in a man, because he is good looking.
Charming, fascinating.
- And tall too.
He is quite tall, did you notice?
I noticed.
And romantic too.
Very romantic.
Three more words and you are going to talk yourself right out of 80 million dollars.
Why did I have to find that note?
- It's the best thing that ever happened.
Attention, mes dames et messieurs.
A votre gauche: Paris.
A votre droit: France.
Special price 8.95, reduced to 9.
A votre droit: Broken clock, 16:15.
A votre gauche: Statue of Kate Riley,
"American girl soaking her feet."
3rd century BC.
If this is Paris, you can have it.
We came here for a good time.
- Now you're talking. When do we start?
Oh, the minute I start being the merry widow, they'll all be chasing my money.
Oh, let them chase me,
I haven't got any money.
Kitty.
Would you?
Sure, I always wanted to act like I had 80 million.
Oh.
Wonderful.
And you can start right now.
Have you a little moment for me, Mrs. Radek?
A big moment if you like.
Charming woman Mrs. Radek, so very gracious.
I hope she likes me.
- How could she help it?
You're a dear thing, but I must not let that pretty face turn my head.
Can't afford it?
- You're a clever girl.
We trust each other?
We are friends?
Good.
Will you help me out?
With Mrs. Radek?
- Yes.
What is it about Mrs. Radek?
All the men run after her.
Can it be love?
Well, I don't know about the others, but with me it's strictly for the money.
Count Danilo, welcome to Paris.
- Hello, Pierre.
Excuse me.
Marshovian Embassy made your reservations.
I hope you find it on your arrival?
- No please don't. Not a word to anybody.
Kitty.
- Yes?
Get your dressing.
We will be late for the opera.
We're getting out of Paris tomorrow.
What happened?
Have you killed somebody?
Not yet, but I'm going to.
Danilo, he is in Paris.
At this very hotel.
Just arrived.
He's following me.
- I dont believe it.
I saw him downstairs.
I suppose he's here. A lot of people come to Paris for a lot of reasons.
His reason is me.
Don't get so upset, he probably doesn't even know you're here.
If he's chasing anybody, he's chasing me.
- He's chasing 80 million dollars.
So was Crillon.
- But at least Crillon was honest about it.
Come in.
For Madame Radek, compliments of the count.
I guess put them there on the table please.
Crillon is a fast worker.
He must be awfully broke to be in such a hurry.
What's the matter?
- You were right.
The sun left Marshovia when you left.
I followed the warmth, the brightness of your face.
I must see you again.
Danilo.
He will see me alright.
Where are you going?
- To tell him what I think.
You're taking the vase?
- And use it.
Don't cause a scandal.
They kick us out of the hotel.
I'll find a place, but I will be going.
- Crystal.
I have nothing on.
Why didn't you tell me?
- I thought you 'll find out.
You loose your temper, hit him on the head and sued for a million.
He's not going to take me all over Europe.
- Well, let me handle it.
Alright. But tell him you 're not the real widow. I am.
I'll tell him plenty.
Now go and get dressed.
And be firm.
Hard.
As hard as steel.
The marshovians are given a lot of air.
Don't melt.
- Cold as ice.
And when you see Danilo, rip him apart.
- Like a tiger.
Girls, girls, girls, girls.
Our ambassador in Paris, your highness.
Ah, come in, baron Popoff, come in.
Count Danilo.
You were to report to me the moment you arrived in Paris.
I have just sent flowers to Mrs. Radek with appropriate sentiments from you.
Well, thank you.
- It's quite alright.I thank you for nothing.
Now I will pave the way for you to see her tonight.
No not tonight, Popoff.
Tonight is my own.
That's quite impossible.
- With his majesty's consent.
Nitki.
- Yes, sir?
Is that so?
- Yes, your excellency.
But we have no time to lose, Danilo.
Even now this very instant she maybe saying "yes" to someone else.
They are all after her.
The Marquis de Savoie, Count Crillon, that improper ambassador from Austria-Hungary.
All bold men.
- And brave.
May the greediest win.
It will serve them right.
This is treason your highness.
- Popoff.
You are a diplomat.
Think.
There must be a way out for me.
- There is no way out.
With honor.
- Then with dishonor.
You forget yourself Danilo.
You are a soldier, an officer.
And you have been chosen to save king and country.
At ease.
Well, if I must I must.
Tonight I refuse to be depressed.
Surely you're losing your sense of proportion.
Who can be depressed by a woman, who has at least...
I know, I know.
80 million dollars.
It is more important than that. The widow
Radek owns 52% of every cow in Marshovia.
And I love every cow in Marshovia, but I do not love the widow Radek.
This is cold blooded feet, Danilo.
When you like her or not, you love her.
The Government I represent, your loyal heart can't just declaim
so to the widow I have send a dozen roses in your name.
Regretfully I must decline
the widow Radek to pursue.
I've got a heart for head and wine,
but not the head or heart to woo.
Consider, sir, without offense, the diplomatic consequences.
Let devil take diplomacy
and leave the ladies all to me.
I'm going to Maxim's,
where all the girls are dreams,
a sentimental army to captivate and charm me.
Lolo, Dodo, Joujou,
Cloclo, Margot, Froufrou.
I promise to surrender
my biggle heart to you.
The champagne I will set, set, set, could sink a battle ship.
And as I woo each top off, they pop like Baron Popoff...
and so, comme Si comme a,
I go tout de suite Ce soir.
Accept my bold adieu, sir.
To you, sir, Au revoir.
I'm going to Maxim's
to squander my centimes.
To look the ladies over like honeybees in clover.
Mimi, Fifi, Ivette and pretty Nicolette,
tonight we live and love and tomorrow we regret.
The music of Maxim's,
I hear it in my dreams,
the tantalizing whisper of petticoats and bustle.
Lolo, Dodo, Joujou,
Cloclo, Margot, Froufrou.
The heart I lost to Paris
tonight I give it to you.
Maxim's.
A car, ma'am?
Voiture.
Where to, madam, the opera?
- Maxim's.
Opera.
- Cabby, Maxim's.
Very well, ma'am, horses go.
This is it, madam.
And now that madame has seen it, we better hurry, she'll be late for the opera.
Oh, but I'm going in.
I think that is most unfortunate.
You can go in without an escort.
It's a bit...
Most irregular.
What about those other women?
Oh, singers, dancers.
They work at Maxim's.
Oh, I see.
Just a moment.
- Very well, ma'am.
Wait for me.
- Very well, ma'am.
Ritanti, Ritantirelle, Ritanti,
Les mademoiselles.
Ritanto Ritantiri...
So do not say "End the happy Paris."
Danilo.
Danilo.
Hello, girls.
Hello.
I'm home again, Maxim's.
If only had more arms, let's say 
twenty-three or -four arms,
they all be holding you,
Lolo, Dodo,
Froufrou.
But pity poor Danilo
he only has but two.
The ladies of Maxim's are generous, it seems.
They take a poor amigo, and exercise his ego,
Mimi, Kiki, Ivette,
Cloco and Nicolette.
Tonight we live and love
and tomorrow we regret.
Did you miss me, girls?
- Yes.
Well, who else buys as much champagne and caviar as you do?
Marcela.
Marcela.
And tonight I'm on an expense account.
When did you get to Paris?
- This afternoon.
Oh, Marcela, I feel like a new man already.
I never minded the old one.
Would you like to dance?
- Yeah.
May I have a light?
- Well...
Of course.
Not bad.
Not bad at all.
Who is she?
- Sais pas. I have never seen her.
See you later, Marcela.
Haven't I met you before?
- If you had, you remembered.
Would you like a drink?
- Alright.
I assure you,
I am going to recognise you next time.
I may be dressed differently.
- Oh, don't worry.
I have a very very good memory for a pretty face.
You know girls who sit at my table, don't flirt with other men.
Well, you can change your mind if you want,
Marcela is still waiting.
Sit down.
What's your name?
Fiffi.
You're the precioust Fiffi I ever met.
What's your name?
Don't you know me?
Should I?
- I'm Danilo.
At Maxim's and you've never heard of me?
You must be very very new here.
You are not French.
English?
- American.
An American at Maxim's?
A lot of Americans come to Paris and the happier they are the more money they spend.
How clever of Maxim's.
You know, I'm a tourist myself.
A Marshovian.
A banker perhaps?
No, we have no bankers in Marshovia.
Oh, what a pity.
And I was so in a mood for a banker tonight.
Oh, you funny Americans, all you think of is money, money, money.
What comes first to you?
Love?
Always.
You are funny Marshovians, such idealists.
An old Marshovian custom.
I am glad to know there is something nice about Marshovia.
Good evening, Count Danilo.
- Hello, Paul.
Thank you, Count Danilo.
For "Madame", with monsieurs compliments.
Did you sent this to my table?
- For the lady.
And it was no concern of yours.
You know this can be a very expensive bottle of champagne.
The lady is my wife, we have five children.
Pardon, monsieur.
Oh, that's alright.
I'm not offended.
You would love the children.
Well, Fiffi, ready for dinner?
Come along.
- Not at Maxim's?
Well, it must be very new to you.
The dining rooms are upstairs, unless you would rather not.
Well of course.
We are supposed to keep the customers happy.
And I am a very good client.
Oh, no, no.
- Come here.
But he is such a bore.
- You wanted Danilo?
A cozy little place you have here.
It's simple, but it's home.
I have to talk to Maxim.
Bright lights make the place so cold.
It's warm enough to me.
You know, Fiffi? It makes me nervous to have anybody follow me.
Afraid?
Of course not.
- That's good.
Oh, now really this is absolutely demoralizing.
Come over here, sit down and be a good girl.
What's the matter with you?
I do not understand you.
No, you wouldn't, but I understand you.
You think you're so irresistible, that every woman is ready to swoon at your feet.
Not at all. There is really nothing romantic about a fainting woman.
And you are such a romantic man.
You, the great lover.
A glass of champagne buys a kiss, is that it?
This is absurd.
Oh, all you know about love is to pay for it or to be paid for it.
My dear Fiffi, I haven't insulted you.
Why are you insulting me?
After all you needed help to join me.
And you are free to go.
That is a very gallant speech, but if I am free to go, unlock that door.
It isn't locked.
I want to apologise.
I'm afraid I made a fool of myself.
The important thing is that you came back.
Come on, let's make up.
It's the nicest part of a quarrel.
Your first time here?
- Yes.
What are you, really?
Well, I'm a chorus girl.
In what show?
Well..
I haven't been in one for some time.
Oh, I see.
You were broken and you came to Maxim's.
Oh, that's why you wanted a banker.
I'm the wrong man, Fiffi.
I haven't a franc to my name.
I never cared before, but...
Right now for the first time,
I wish I had that sort of money.
To help you.
I'm sorry.
And I'm sorry I ruined your evening.
Just a moment.
Why don't you stay and have dinner with me?
No strings attached, not a string.
I like you to stay.
Will you?
Yes.
Still afraid?
- No.
Though I try love,
would deny love.
Yes, I care.
Cause I dare not say I care not
when I care.
So I'll tell the music
why I hold you near.
Who convey what I can't say,
I love you, dear.
You smile at me
and then I'm 17 again.
And though it appear naive
I make believe that I believe.
Stars that twinkle in the sky
tonight that's winkling in your eyes.
While heaven smiles above
we dream of
love.
Nor I try dear,
to deny dear, I love you.
Still I dare not say I care not
when I do.
I tell
the music
while you hold me near.
To convey what I can't say.
I love
you, dear.
Do you love me, Danilo?
- Of course I do.
I mean it, seriously.
Oh, yes, I love you.
For how long?
Forever.
And tomorrow?
- Forget tomorrow.
This is tonight.
Fiffi.
Fiffi.
Come on, arre, arre.
Fiffi.
Fiffi, wait.
Where do you live, Fiffi?
Miss Riley.
Miss Riley.
Did you and Mrs. Radek have a pleasant evening?
I can safely say that Mrs. Radek hasn't a complaint in the world.
Did you mention me to her?
I'm afraid I have bad news, Count Crillon.
It isn't official.
But I can guarantee that Mrs. Radek has decided to marry Count Danilo.
Danilo. That fortune hunter?
- It is a bit shocking.
But I don't understand, how did he do it?
Well, I rather not answer that question.
But what does Danilo got that I have not?
Well, for one thing he's got Mrs. Radek.
It's terrible, isn't it?
I'm looking for a woman.
- In a police station?
Why don't you try down the avenue, monsieur.
There is a little caf most discrete.
No, I have lost a woman and I try to find her.
Your wife?
- No.
No wonder monsieur is upset.
What is her name?
- Fiffi.
Charming.
Fiffi what?
Well, it never occurred to me to ask her her last name.
Romantic, but not practical.
Was your date an informant or did monsieur get a good look at her?
A very good look.
- And?
Yes.
- Monsieur is very fortunate.
Any birthmarks?
I just met the lady and she is a lady.
Missing one lady.
Answers to the name of Fiffi.
No visible birthmarks.
This is going to be very difficult.
Paris is full of women named Fiffi with no visible birthmarks.
She's an American.
That is different.
How tall?
Well, about this.
Long legs.
Yes, how did you know?
All American women have the long legs.
From the waist down an American woman is incomparable.
From the waist up the advantage is all with the French women.
Oh, I assure you sergeant, from the waist up she is completely French.
This is living, monsieur.
You are lucky to find a woman like that.
Yeah, but I cant find her.
Don't worry.
She will turn up.
I can see her now.
Tall, blonde, blue eyes with a lovely sprinkle...
The lobe of the ear sticking out below the golden hair.
Just waiting to be kissed.
Temptation, yes, elusive.
That's her. That's Fiffi.
Do you know her?
No, but I can dream, can't I?
Oh sergeant, please, can you find her?
Sorry.
It's not my job, monsieur.
What?
How do you dare.
I come here for help and all you do is waist my time dreaming. You.
You idiot.
Idiot? I?
- Yes, you.
When you insult me, you insult France, monsieur.
Ah, don't be an imbecile.
Arrest this man.
You'll here about this from the Marshovian embassy.
Who heard about the Marshovian embassy?
Put in jail.
Drink another cup of coffee.
- I won't.
I won't drink another drop of coffee, if I got manslaughter for it.
In the name of his majesty, the King of Marshovia,
I command you to drink this cup of coffee.
I don't need it.
I haven't been drinking.
I'm perfectly sober.
- Sober.
Getting arrested, making a fool of yourself over a woman who's name you don't even know.
It would take a miracle to find her.
- That's what I need, a miracle.
What you need another cup of coffee.
Here drink this.
If you won't help me find her,
I will find her myself.
I thought you were my friend?
Unfortunately I'm not your friend,
I am your commander.
My boy you are now under orders, on his majesty's service.
Oh, now be reasonable.
Not today.
Perhaps the American Embassy can help me.
Count Danilo, you will follow instructions to the letter.
But I don't...
- If you don't
I will revoke your visa and I will send him to Marshovia.
And I promise you the king will cut off your allowance and assign you to garrison duty in Groknik.
Groknik?
- Groknik.
I warn you, his majesty did not send you to Paris to chase Fiffi's.
The widow Radek is our mission.
Why you suppose we rented this?
- Alright. Alright, alright.
I will go back to the hotel and change my clothes.
Just one moment, sir.
I am going with you.
Don't you trust me?
- Funnily enough, I don't.
Good morning, madame.
Brioche still warm and crisp.
Raspberries from Fontainebleau.
One egg on toast l'Amricain.
What's going on here?
It is the crack of dawn.
Oh, I'm sorry I woke you.
I'm going to that dress shop across the street.
I haven't anything to wear.
What's the matter, down your last Sabre coat?
- Not me.
I mean she hasn't anything.
Fiffi,
I told you last night Danilo thinks
I'm a poor American chorus girl.
Why did you get by with that?
That's my suit.
And your hat.
But I have nothing else.
How long are you going to keep this up?
Why don't you make it easy for yourself?
Tell him who you are.
- Not yet.
When he asks me,
I want to be sure it is just me he's after.
That makes sense.
But how is he going to find you?
He does not know who you are or where you are.
But I know where he is.
Fiffi.
Fiffi.
It is a miracle.
That's what it is, a miracle.
I said it would take a miracle to find her.
- That's what you said.
All night I was trying to find you, by morning I was crazy, wasn't I, Popoff?
Insane.
- Oh, I'll never let you out of my sight.
I looked all over Paris.
Well, it was easier for me to find where you were staying.
And I came to say goodbye.
I'm leaving for America.
Oh, but you can't.
I won't let you.
Please, Fiffi, you've got to forget America and stay right here in Paris.
What would I live on?
Air?
I'll solve it someway.
Somehow.
Let that be my responsibility.
But last night you said you hate responsibility.
I know I did, but I feel different now.
I love you, Fiffi.
But you said you'll only loved Maxim girls.
Can't you forget what I said last night?
Don't you see this is another man?
I didn't want it to happen to me, but it has.
I have fallen in love with you.
For how long?
For a day?
How about tomorrow?
Will you love me tomorrow?
Oh, yes tomorrow, tomorrow, and tomorrow.
Every minute, every day.
Every year of my life.
Popoff, not now.
Orders.
Remember Groknik.
State business.
The Ambassador wants me to make a speech.
It sounds impressive.
A speech that may make history for Marshovia.
One of those silly diplomatic speeches.
I'll make it short and fast and be right back.
Come along. You can wait for me in my suite.
- Oh, no. I can't.
I mean I have some errands.
Oh, but I don't want to lose you again.
Will you have lunch with me?
Two o'clock?
Caf de Liszt?
And remember one thing, the only important thing. I love you.
She'll remember, she'll remember.
Now upstairs and get dressed.
My girl, you don't know what you're getting into with him.
Here is 50...
100 francs.
Buy yourself something.
A ticket to Groknik.
Connect me with Madame Radeks apartment.
Oh, no.
Danilo, I'm talking to you as a father.
Why do you bother yourself with a girl like that Fiffi?
As a man of the world I know what she is after.
Money.
You are a count.
She thinks you are rich.
Believe me that kind Al...
Good morning, Madame Radek?
This is Ignace Popoff,
Marshovian ambassador.
Come in.
Good morning, Madame Radek.
I'm at your command, dear lady.
Did you say she was coming back to the hotel?
What was he doing here?
- I was just trying to locate you.
What was Danilo doing here?
He just proposed to me.
He proposed to you?
Oh, if this is a joke, it isn't very funny.
He used all the right words love, marriage...
Of course it wasn't just me he proposed to.
I saw dollars signs dancing through the air.
What did you say?
What did you want me to say?
I has stalled, so that I can think it over.
He wants my answer tonight.
There is a dance at the Marshovian embassy.
Madame Radek is invited.
"Dear Madame Radek, it would be the proudest moment of my life if I can announce our engagement before all our countrymen tonight."
He tells me he loves me and in the next minute...
I can't believe it.
This is no place for us.
We don't know the rules.
Let's go home.
Oh, no.
No.
I'm not going home.
Besides I'm supposed to meet him for lunch.
I'll see you later.
Are you crazy?
- Maybe. Maybe not.
Danilo has had a lot of fun.
Now it's my turn.
At last.
Every time you are out of my sight I think:
"I shall never see her again."
I never felt like this before.
Like what, Danilo?
- Unsure.
Scared.
It's a miserable feeling, Fiffi.
Can it be love?
More than I bargain for.
- Tell me how much.
Well, I myself don't know it.
It's new to me.
Tell me, Fiffi, do you feel the same way?
No more doubts, no more questions?
One more.
But you've got to ask.
A question?
I ask?
With most people, love and marriage go together.
Well?
Most people don't do what they choose.
With me it is different.
I have a duty to fulfill.
But when it comes to love...
- Oh, I see.
A backstairs affair.
- No, you don't see. It's not that way here.
It's that way anywhere.
Fiffi.
I want to marry you.
There is nothing else
I ever wanted so much in my life.
But I can't ask you now.
I can't.
Why not? Are you married?
- No.
Is there another woman?
- No.
Then ask me.
Now, Danilo, right this minute.
I can't.
Fiffi, give me until tomorrow.
I have to see you again, Fiffi.
I must.
Please.
You'll see me again.
- Promise?
That's a promise.
"Baron Popoff,
Marshovian Ambassador to France
Herman III, King of Marshovia, invites you to the reception and gala in honor of Madame Crystal Radek."
Tonight is quite an occasion.
Is his your daughter?
My has she grown.
Big big surprise later on.
But stay secret.
Enjoy yourselves.
How are you?
How are you?
Any sign of the widow Radek?
Report to me the moment her carriage arrives.
Here I am, Baron Popoff.
- Oh, your Excellency.
Ready at last and at your service.
- I trust you had a pleasant journey?
Your room is satisfactory?
You have unpacked?
There is time enough for that tomorrow.
Tonight I'll await your instructions.
There was no need for you to rush to Paris.
I have everything under control.
This is Childs play to an old diplomat like myself.
Pawns on a chessboard.
I just move them at will.
Masterful, Popoff, masterful.
This will mean a decoration from the king.
Oh, I haven't really given it a thought.
Probably this one.
Good looking, isn't it?
Well enjoy yourself and consider yourself a guest.
I have just a little last minute details to confirm.
Nice to see you, my friend.
Forgive me for keeping you waiting.
Perfect.
Charming, handsome, distinguished...
But I like a slight air of secret sorrow.
Women love a man who suffers.
The widow isn't here yet. So go out, mingle with the guests. Dance, have a sandwich.
Eat, drink and be merry, for tomorrow you will be married.
I will not marry the widow.
I beg your pardon?
I'm in love with another woman.
That's normal.
Who isn't?
But what is being in love with one woman, has got to do with being married to another?
Especially a rich one, as the widow.
I won't marry the widow, because I'm not in love with the widow. Is that clear?
Do not raise your voice.
The ballroom is full of people.
Is that clear?
- But...
Why didn't you say that, when his majesty gave you orders.
I wasn't in love then.
- Then this mistake is yours.
It's a time of crisis for your country.
- Crisis.
The world won't come to an end because of me.
But the kingdom of Marshovia may.
Danilo, my dear friend.
Well, this is a surprise.
Have you left your position?
I'm shocked.
Popoff tells me, that this is a time of crisis.
It's the crisis that brings me here.
His Majesty has recalled me from Washington.
The problem in Marshovia is most acute.
It might explode at any moment.
We are counting on you, my dear Danilo.
A cable from his majesty.
It is marked urgent.
Urgent.
Oh.
It's in code.
What's the first word?
"Darling".
- "Darling".
You are the biggest idiot in the diplomatic service.
Watch your tongue, sir.
- It's in the book, I know.
What?
What is the next word?
"Lilac time".
"Lilac time..."
"Engagement must be announced tonight."
"I just received an ultimatum from Austria."
"They want their money.
She has it".
Next?
- "Happy Days".
"Happy Days".
"I warn you, don't fail me."
"I demand good news when I arrive in Paris tonight or heads will roll."
- He's coming here?
The widow Radek has just arrived.
Danilo, be reasonable.
Change your mind.
Did you know what it means "Happy Days"?
Disaster for us all.
I will not marry the widow Radek.
But you leave me no alternative.
Count Danilo is under arrest.
Welcome, Madame Radek.
- Welcome, Madame Radek.
It's nice to see you again.
You remember my friend, Miss Riley?
Uh...
Miss Riley?
Oh, I...
Excuse us.
What?
- Which one?
New York?
Madame Radek,
I know you won't believe this, but
When I met you this morning,
I said to Danilo that is no Fiffi.
"That is a lady of divergence and distinction."
Didn't I, Danilo?
And have you no word of welcome for the widow Radek, Count Danilo?
I don't think we've ever really met.
It's your Fiffi. Remember you said it would take a miracle to find her.
Well this is the miracle.
It's your little Fiffi.
I know Fiffi, but Madame Radek is a stranger.
Then you can get acquainted while you dance.
Well, it's about time we did get acquainted.
If Madame insists...
Why did not you tell me about yourself?
And why didn't you?
I gave you every chance.
I was hoping you would be honest with me.
- How could I?
To be in love with you and might have to choose someone else?
How fortunate, you were not put to the test.
Please, Danilo. I know how enchanted you are with our beautiful guest of honor, but it is your duty to open the dance.
No one can started if you don't.
Will Madame do me the honor?
- Of course.
Nor I try dear, 
deny dear, I
love you.
So I tell the music...
While you hold me near...
to convey what I can't say.
I love
you, dear.
I'll tell the music
when you hold me near
to convey what I can't say.
I love you,
dear.
Beautiful evening, Madame Radek.
What is it, Fiffi?
The trouble is I'm not Fiffi.
I am the rich widow.
You have to believe in me.
How can I?
Or am I to accept the proposal you made to another woman this morning?
For 80 million dollars,
I'm entitled to a first class proposal.
I did have one.
But I'm afraid it's isn't worth a penny, not for you.
Perhaps you're wrong.
Let me decide what it's worth.
Go ahead, Danilo.
Propose.
You want me to crawl, don't you?
Well, I won't.
Money is to important to you.
Guard it, hoard it.
Be happy with it.
What happened?
Madame turned me down.
Madame, we know he loves you and we know you love him.
Whatever he has done that is wrong, whatever he has said. He's sorry.
We'll see that he'll tells you himself.
That he is sorry.
Oh, you've underestimated him.
For the first time, he stood on his own two feet and spoke out like a man.
Forgive him, madame, he is no a diplomat.
- Diplomat?
It never occurred to you, that you cannot tell anyone whom to love and whom to hate?
Then you are the biggest idiots in the diplomatic service.
Darling.
She read the cable.
She read the cable.
Take it easy, what's your hurry?
The party is over.
What happened?
- Madame turned him down.
I warned them.
Heads will roll.
What's he so excited about?
- I've seen that face before.
Let's get out of here.
- Gladly, as soon as we leave.
I told you, it's him, the king.
He knows he's gonna get it now.
Serves him right.
It's a shame we're not there to watch the king ride into them.
He was the maddest king I ever saw.
Heads will roll.
Heads will roll.
What does it mean?
- It's just an expression.
They have some funny customs in Marshovia.
Heads will roll.
- Oh, don't be silly.
They stopped chopping heads off
200 years ago.
They are awfully backward in Marshovia.
It's all your fault.
He chases a woman all night long and when he catches her, he says
Madame Radek is a stranger to me.
No but you, you the great diplomat...
She hates us all like poison.
And I don't blame her.
All you can say is:
"It's your little Fiffi."
In New York, I accomplished the impossible.
I delivered the widow Radek to you.
You blunderer.
What will become of us.
35 years in the diplomatic service and in the end what?
If I am lucky, I'm a waiter.
With his majesty's compliments.
You see?
He has repented already.
Cigars maybe?
No bullets.
He is trying to make us nervous.
With his majesty's compliments.
Where is the king?
- I beg your pardon?
I want to see the king, immediately.
While the king is not the man, one requests an audience.
Then, when his majesty graciously condescend...
Look.
I own 52 percent of Marshovia.
As a matter of fact, I own 52 percent of you.
Now where is the king?
Forgive me, your majesty.
Your majesty, I want to know...
- Just a moment.
Is it all over?
No.
But madame Radek insisted.
Madame Radek?
- What did you mean?
Calm yourself, madame.
You have the word of a king.
Your honor and mine shall be satisfied.
- Never mind. I just want to know one thing.
What did you mean, "heads will roll"?
Oh, that?
Just an expression.
I told you so.
She thought maybe you meant...
My dear Madame Radek, do you take us for barbarians?
Do you think we still go around chopping off people's heads?
Well, it was silly your majesty, but I had a trying evening.
Forgive the intrusion,
I was just a little nervous.
Nothing to be nervous about.
Give an officer a gun and a bullet and he knows what's expected of him.
Your Majesty.
Oh, my God.
Did you say something?
- No, nothing.
Don't be hasty.
Any of you got have 800 millions Drankas?
It's the national debt.
- Exactly.
Where are we waisting time for?
What else have we got?
But...
Excuse me for interrupting.
A great king tempers justice with mercy.
You are a pack of idiots, but I forgive you all.
I should have handled this matter myself.
A few minutes intelligent conversation with the generous madame Radek and the national debt is paid.
The sun begins to shine on Marshovia.
She's writing the check now.
Where are you going?
- To get the check of course.
Good boy, you won't have to marry her now, my dear nephew.
She won't have a penny left.
- I am glad to hear it.
I only hope the check is good for 800 million Drankas.
Don't worry, your majesty, that is less than one million in American money.
Now he tells me...
Darling.
Is the check ready?
Yes.
- May I have it?
It seems to be correct.
Thank you.
Here it is.
Good.
Miss Riley.
Out.
Out?
- Out.
Out.
There was a rich woman here a moment ago.
A very rich woman.
Her name was Madame Radek.
But you took care of that.
You finally got rid of her.
I certainly did.
And now, you haven't a penny. Have you?
How do you know?
The king just told me so.
Well, if that's what the man said.
The king said something else too.
He said I don't have to marry the widow Radek now.
Well that's understandable.
I wouldn't be of any interest to a fortune hunter now, would I?
You certainly wouldn't.
The king understood that immediately.
He is a very wise man.
Wait a minute.
That fortune hunter we were talking about, we got rid of him too.
You really mean that?
You know I do.
I love you.
Say it again.
I say it again.
I love you.
I believe in magic
when our hearts intertwine.
Heaven is near when you are here
and you are
mine.
THE END
Transcript: Joke
Sync: minouhse www.addic7ed.com
Well, thats exactly what we were looking for...
the right atmosphere at the right price.
There we are now, the Sherwood sisters...
one would-be writer and one would-be actress...
in search of fame, fortune, and a for rent sign on Barrow Street.
The one in red, thats me.
And the beautiful blond, thats my sister Eileen.
Here we are.
Youre standing on the brink of disaster.
Take my advice. Forget about it.
- Forget what?
- The vacancy.
You wouldnt care for the apartment.
- Why not?
- Termites.
- Termites?
- This big.
- Believe me.
- Ruth.
An exterminator went in there last week and he got the beating of his life.
However, if you young ladies are seeking a sanctuary in this troubled world... seek no more.
I will show you the best value in Greenwich Village.
- Come along with me.
- Wait a minute. Who are you?
Allow me to introduce myself.
Im Appopolous.
Papa Appopolous to my children on Barrow Street.
How do you do?
I am Eileen Sherwood and this is my sister, Ruth.
- Of the Ohio Sherwoods.
- Of course.
Now, where is this sanctuary?
Due south.
Here we are, darlings.
The pride of Barrow Street, the Appopolous Arms.
You mean you...
- Is the apartment very high up?
- Up?
Down.
Youll be crazy about it.
Here we are, darlings, all righty.
Your luggage, please. Your luggage. Please.
Isnt this exactly what youve been dreaming about?
My dear young ladies, this is the best value you can get for your money in New York.
Architecture, neighbourhood.
Thank you, llI have it fixed.
- It isnt too bad, Ruth.
- Too bad?
Let me point out a few salient features of this studio.
A: It is summer.
B: It is exactly 30 degrees cooler down here.
Cooler? Lts musty enough to hang venison.
Note the exquisite imitation fireplace... the magnificent day beds.
And look here, there is even a piano.
Id never have known without an autopsy.
And here is a model kitchenette... complete in every detail.
And here is a luxurious bathroom.
What fiend designed this?
In those two rooms, you wont entertain.
- It does look clean, Ruth.
- Yeah.
Whats that?
One of your neighbours.
Perhaps a future Lily Pons or Helen Traubel.
Come, let me show you the garden.
Its beautiful in the summer.
- A garden.
- Real outdoor living.
- How are you, Papa?
- Very busy, Mr. OConnor.
You see, youre surrounded by fellow artists like yourself.
- It is colourful, isnt it, Ruth?
- Lf you like loud colours.
- How much is this apartment?
- Only $65.
- $65? For this concrete catacomb?
- Ill even wallpaper the kitchen.
It is cheaper than anything else weve looked at.
As an added inducement, llI tell you what llI do.
Take the place for a month, then, if youre still not satisfied...
Ill give you back your first months rent.
- I dont see what we can lose. Do you?
- Legally, youve got me where you want me.
I gave you my word in front of two witnesses.
Three, including me.
Please, I just cant look at any more places.
- Well...
- Then its all settled.
- The rest of your luggage is at the station?
- Yes.
You girls make yourself at home.
Ill send for it.
Thank you.
You have the luggage checks, dont you?
- Yeah.
- And the...
Just a minute.
Thank you.
Thank you, my children.
Thank you very much.
From now on, you can call me Papa.
Ill have it fixed in the morning. Good luck.
Be it ever so humble, theres no place like home.
Mr. Appopolous!
- Wheres that doorknob?
- Here it is.
Mr. Appopolous, wait just a minute.
- It was terrible.
- Yes?
- What was that?
- What was what?
- That noise.
- The whole room shook.
It goes to show you how you get used to it.
- I didnt even notice it.
- Get used to it?
- It happens all the time?
- You wont even be conscious of it.
A little blasting. The new subway.
- Theyre blasting right under our feet?
- What are you so worried about?
Those engineers know how much dynamite to use.
Does it happen all the time?
No. They stop at midnight, and they dont start again until...
6:00 in the morning.
- How would you like to step outside?
- What are you getting so hysterical about?
- Im not getting hysterical yet.
- All we want is our money back.
- Yes.
I told you Id give back your money and I will... if, at the end of the month, youre still dissatisfied.
Goodnight, darlings.
What are we going to do?
Were gonna do 30 days.
You know, we ought to have that phone connected in the morning... so we can start calling up for jobs.
You dont call up for jobs, you go out and look for them.
I hope we dont have to look too long.
Incidentally, that money from Dad is the last were gonna take from him.
- After that, its beg, borrow, steal, or starve.
- Of course.
Maybe we shouldnt have come to New York just yet, huh, Ruth?
Dont tell me youre getting homesick already?
Maybe a little.
I wonder what Billy Hunniger is doing tonight.
Hes probably at the country club dance with Annie Wilkerson.
- He can have her.
- Dont you think he knows that?
Of course, those things never bothered you.
Men never meant very much in your life.
Not after they got a load of you, they didnt.
Thats the trouble with you.
Youve got a complex or something.
Youre a lot more attractive than you think you are.
Youre close.
Im a lot more attractive than men think I am.
Remember what Dad said.
There are eight million people in New York, and half of them are men.
One of them is bound to be the right boy for you.
Yeah, and I wonder where the poor devil is tonight.
One, two...
- Im gonna take a shower.
- Okay.
Five, six, seven.
One, two...
The heck with it. Let it spread.
When I started shedding my avoirdupois
I thought it would get me somewhere with the boys
I went to a gym and got myself slim
I went on long hikes, I wore out three bikes
And from those masseurs
What beatings I took
Yet nobody said
How lovely you look
- Whatd you say, Ruth?
- I said, Let it spread.
What good
does it do me to slenderise?
Who needs this reducing routine?
Slender or stout
I am a washout
As soon as they see Eileen
I long for a young man with tender eyes
But my competitions too keen
My name is mud
Im a real dud
As soon as they see Eileen
But shes an angel
As well as a cutie
Her kind of beauty is rare
Still I always have found
That when she is around
Nobody knows that Im there
I wish I could dream
And philosophise
With someone who knows what I mean
But what is the use?
Im a gone goose
As soon as they see Eileen
Im over 20 with plenty of knowledge
I earned my college degree
But Im frankly annoyed
Tell me, Doctor Freud
What is the matter with me?
Hi.
Mommy!
Some night
Maybe Ill see the starry skies
With someone who isnt too green
But with all my desire, Im a flat tyre
I have the appeal
Of a fifth wheel
Im just out of luck
Im a dead duck
As soon as they see
Eileen
- Ruth?
- Yeah?
Ruth, where are you?
What are you doing out there?
Just getting a breath of fresh air, frightening little children.
- What?
- Nothing.
I was hoping wed get whats-his-name to fix that shower.
- It just dribbles.
- Yeah, I noticed.
- Its as hot outside as it is in here.
- Yeah. Dont forget to lock the door.
Yeah.
Im sorry.
I didnt think you girls would go to bed this early.
- Thats beside the point. Who are you?
- I live upstairs. My names Ted Loomis.
- You can just call me Wreck.
- Wreck?
Thats what they used to call me at Georgia Tech.
Id have made all-American, only I was expelled.
Thats very interesting.
But dont you think its about time you were rambling along?
Yeah. If theres anything I can do for you girls, you just whistle.
Well do that.
By the way, I was just wondering, are you girls going to be home tomorrow?
- No. Well be out looking for work.
- Thats great.
I always do the laundry down here on Thursday.
Laundry?
Helens a switchboard operator.
She works nights.
I dont like to disturb her during the day.
- Helen?
- Yeah.
Were engaged.
I dont want you to get the wrong idea.
Its just that we cant afford to get married... and we cant afford two apartments.
Im out of work right now.
So when Helens at work, I sleep... and then when she sleeps,
I do the housework.
We dont see much of each other, so we get along just great.
I can see you girls still think thats a little strange?
- Only because were from Ohio.
- Yeah. I guess that would make a difference.
- Violet was from Brooklyn.
- Whos Violet?
She had this studio before they started blasting for the subway.
- It was bad for business.
- Business?
Yeah. She read palms or something.
Thanks a million about the laundry.
Ill see you tomorrow. Goodnight.
What was that all about?
I dont know.
- But he seemed very nice.
- He would. Hes a man.
Everythings so convenient in this dungeon.
- Oh, boy.
- I know what you mean.
I could swear I just put out the lights.
Theres a street lamp shining right in the window.
Well have to pull the curtains.
Were practically sleeping in the street.
Yeah, we sure cant close the windows.
Wed suffocate.
Yeah.
- Whats the matter?
- This bed.
They are kind of hard, arent they?
Hard? We could do better at the morgue.
Lets go to sleep.
Maybe we can have a nice, pleasant nightmare.
- We got a big day ahead of us tomorrow.
- Thats right.
- Good night, honey.
- Good night.
What was that?
Now what?
- Thats one way to keep cool.
- Ruth, youre drenched.
Here, let me get you a towel.
Get away from there.
- Pete, look. Girls.
- Go away! You heard me.
- Beat it, you drunken goons!
- Now, please, madam.
All we were doing was singing.
Since when is it a crime to sing?
Youre certainly not getting into the spirit of things, madam.
Im not in the mood and stop calling me madam!
- Isnt she lovely, Pete?
- She certainly is.
You get away from there.
Now, go on, go away.
Break it up!
- I was saying good night...
- Good night, ladies.
You heard them. Out.
Good night, ladies.
- Thank you very much, Officer.
- Yes. Were so glad you came by.
- Ill bet you are.
- There arent any shades on the window...
And theres a light shining through the window.
- Could you do something about that?
- Sure, llI put a shade on it.
- You kids new in the neighbourhood?
- We just moved in this afternoon.
If youre smart, youll move out tomorrow.
I dont go for this kind of stuff on my beat.
- What did he mean by that?
- Evidently, this studio has a bad reputation.
Violet must have been reading palms without a licence.
- I dont think I can take 30 days of this.
- Everythings gonna be all right.
- Its all my fault. If I hadnt of insisted on...
- It isnt your fault.
...staying here, we couldve gone to a hotel...
- Good morning, Wreck. Im home.
- Hi, baby. You have a hard night?
Yeah, it was pretty busy.
Think llI go to bed now.
I made you something to eat.
Its in the kitchen.
- Thanks, honey.
- You have a good days sleep.
- All righty. See you later.
- Okay.
Here, let me give you a hand.
Thanks, Wreck.
By the way, heres the grocery list.
Are you sure you dont mind?
No, of course not.
I got to go to the store anyway.
Heres the money.
I think that ought to be enough.
In case it isnt, take off the cookies and the soft drinks.
Were on an awfully tight budget.
I know what you mean.
Since Im out of work...
Helen makes me watch the pennies pretty close.
- What kind of work you out of?
- I play pro football during the season.
- What do you do the rest of the year?
- I usually wrestle, but I got suspended.
- Why?
- Overacting.
Really.
How about you girls?
You got any connections here in town?
Yeah. I have a letter of introduction to the editor of Manhatter magazine.
- Thats good. How about Eileen?
- Eileen doesnt need a letter.
Im all ready. Do I look all right?
- I cant remember when you didnt.
- You look beautiful.
Any producer that wouldnt hire you is a girl.
Thanks, Wreck. I dont know where to go or how to get started.
Most of the actors around here read Variety to see whats going on.
If were gonna do it, lets do it.
- Yeah.
- Which way to the subway?
Lts right up the... Come on, llI show you.
Its right up at this corner.
Remember, you take the uptown train.
- This corner?
- Thats right.
- Good luck, you guys.
- Bye.
Good morning, darlings.
Did you have a good nights sleep?
Sure. For a place with a bad location and no neon sign...
- we did a whale of a business.
- Theres no hot water in the shower.
Thats why you look so cool and refreshed.
- I assume youre off to seek employment?
- Yes. I guess we better get started.
Youth. You have this great metropolis... grovelling at your feet like a passionate lover.
Thats what I thought when I left Ohio, but now Im scared.
- Youre not alone, honey.
- Pish-tosh!
There are only two things you need in this troubled world to succeed.
A: Confidence. B: Patience.
Take me, for example.
Im sure that Im a genius
So I havent any fears
I never get discouraged and downhearted
I havent sold a painting
And Ive tried for 20 years
Hes just a little slow getting started
Im great, but no one knows it
No one knows it but me
Im great
And yet I just cant get the critics to agree
My works are masterpieces
Like Picassos and Matisses
Youre certainly an artist
When it comes to drawing leases
Im just as great as he is
But they call me the worst
But when I lose a match
Its cause I havent been rehearsed
You mean that youre a genius
In your own peculiar way
Youre great, but no one knows it
But they will someday
You see, thats our secret.
Youve got to have confidence in yourself.
Miss Sherwood, you could be a female Shakespeare.
- Me?
- Sure you could.
Eileen, you could show these other actresses... theyre not even on the second team.
You can throw a hammerlock around this whole doggone town.
- I could?
- You could. If you only believe in yourself.
Miss Sherwood, what do you think of yourself?
- I guess Im all right.
- No, Eileen. Ruth.
What do you think of yourself?
No. No matter what anybody says, youve got to keep your head up high... and say, Im great. Say it!
Im great
No.
Youve got to shout it out!
So the whole city can hear you.
From the Bronx to the Battery.
Shout!
Im great, but no one knows it
No one knows it
Thats much better.
So far
Thats fine.
But theyll get wise
And realise how wonderful you are
The public may acclaim us
Well be popular and famous
And anyone that pans us
Will be called an ignoramus
Were great, but no one knows it
But who cares about them
Can we be sure?
Theyll say that youre the crme de la crme
Well, I dont know what that means
But I agree with what you say
Were great, but no one knows it
But they will someday
Were great, but no one knows it
No one knows it so far
But theyll get wise
And realise how talented we are
The public will acclaim us
Well be popular and famous
And anyone who pans us
Will be called an ignoramus
Were great, but no one knows it
No one knows it, not yet
But they will even pay us
To endorse a cigarette
As we go by, theyll point us out
And even shout hurray!
Hurray! Were great, but no one knows it
But they will someday
- Wont you sit down?
- Thank you.
Thank...
Thank you. Thank you very much.
- Excuse me.
- Yes?
My name is Eileen Sherwood.
I read in Variety that Mr. Wallace is casting a new show.
- Would it be possible for me to see...
- Im sorry... but Mr. Wallace is only seeing people by appointment.
- Do you think I could make an appointment?
- Im sorry. Thats impossible.
- You can send in the next.
- Thank you anyway.
- Carolyn Christy.
- Im sorry.
- Wont you step in now, please?
- Mr. Wallace, she isnt on the list.
Dont be so technical, Miss Stevenson.
Was America on Columbus map?
I would like to see Mr. Robert Baker, please.
Mr. Baker cant see anyone.
Hes just getting ready to leave on his vacation.
On his vacation?
Cant I see him for just a minute?
Some of my stories were submitted to him...
by Mr. Stover of the Columbus Courier.
- I have a letter of introduction.
- Im sorry.
If you leave the letter and your telephone number... hell get in touch with you when he returns.
The phones not connected yet, but llI leave the address.
There.
Thank you very much.
Keep smiling.
Now here are your tickets, Mr. Baker.
Your bags are in the taxi, and your train leaves in 20 minutes.
- Good.
- Bye, Mr. Baker.
No tears, Judy.
George, I left the bar open. Be my guest.
- Thank you.
- Youre getting taller.
Dont you worry about a thing.
Have a wonderful time.
- Catch a lot of fish.
- I will.
- Have fun, Mr. Baker.
- I was hoping youd say that.
- Bye-bye.
- Bye-bye.
- Mr. Baker...
- Goodbye, dear.
- Im terribly sorry. I dont know you, do I?
- Dont mention it, Mr. Baker.
- Im Ruth Sherwood.
- It was nice kissing you.
- Mr. Baker, I know youre in a hurry.
- Yes, Im afraid I have to catch a train.
Excuse me, Jerry, would you make it non-stop for me?
I guess you dont remember.
Im Ruth Sherwood.
- Yes.
- Bill Stover, of the Columbus Courier...
- he sent you some of my stories.
- Good. Yeah, Bill. How is old Bill?
- We were roommates in college.
- He told me.
- Hes fine.
- Good.
- Did you have a chance to read my stories?
- Your stories. Yes. Oh, yeah.
Yes, I thought youd be more of...
- the spinster type, sort of.
- Spinster?
Those love stories of yours are pretty depressing.
What I mean is, all romance doesnt end in epic tragedy necessarily.
The boy running off and joining the Foreign Legion... the girl setting fire to her hope chest.
Its the funniest thing...
I usually can figure out what a person is like from the way they write.
But like you, you just dont seem to me like a confirmed cynic.
We cynical spinsters can be pretty deceptive sometimes.
Thank you, Jerry.
I didnt mean to offend you.
Offend me? Just because you say
I write like a frustrated old maid?
Id love to... Excuse me, go ahead.
Id love to discuss this thing further with you, but I cant, you see.
And just to keep the record straight,
I didnt call you frustrated.
Thank you.
Look, dont get discouraged.
I think you write very well.
- Try writing something youre familiar with.
- With which Im familiar.
It was nice meeting you, Miss...
- Sherwood.
- Sherwood. Yes, of course.
Of course.
Grand Central.
- Good afternoon.
- Hello.
- Can I take your order?
- Yes. Id like a Coke, please.
- Its warm, isnt it?
- Awful.
Want some lime in this?
Lts good in the hot weather.
All right.
- Saw you in here this morning.
- You did?
- You havent been in before, have you?
- Thank you.
- No, I just got in town yesterday.
- You an actress?
No. Id like to be.
But I dont think its going to be very easy.
Ive already seen three producers this morning.
Dont tell me they werent interested?
They were interested all right, but not in my acting.
Yes, I see what you mean.
Maybe I could help you get started.
I dont know if you know it or not... but this place is a real kind of hangout for people in show business.
- Really?
- Sure.
If I keep my ears open,
I could pick up a lot of inside information... about auditions and that kind of stuff.
- That would be just wonderful.
- I got it.
Why dont you come in here every day?
Say, for lunch. And llI keep you posted.
Foods excellent.
Every day we have a special.
- Thats certainly very nice of you, Mr...
- Lippencott. Frank Lippencott.
- Fountain manager.
- How do you do? Lm Eileen Sherwood.
I guess llI be seeing you for lunch tomorrow, Mr. Lippencott.
- Do I pay here?
- Dont worry about it.
- Courtesy of the management.
- Thank you very much.
Remember now. Dont get discouraged.
Ill try not to. Thank you.
Im great, but no one knows it
No one knows it so far
Theyll get wise
And realise how talented we are
As we go by, theyll point us out
And even shout hurray
Well?
Were great
And no one knows it, but they will
Someday
- Good morning, Mr. Newbetter.
- Sorry.
The last few weeks,
I feel like Im living in my own little world.
Sending all these stories to myself.
I think llI call the next one Boomerang.
Cheer up, maybe the next one wont come back.
Yeah, llI leave off the return address.
- Bad news?
- Not if you like to suffer.
Dont you worry.
Ive got a feeling that this is my lucky day.
If I knock on enough doors... some producer has to let me show him what I can do.
- Anything you want while Im uptown?
- Yeah.
- You can cash the last of the Mohicans.
- The last?
When this is gone, weve had it, honey.
$20 and two return tickets to Columbus, Ohio.
Were not gonna use those tickets.
You just wait. The first thing you know, youll sell a story...
Ill get a job and we can move out of this terrible place.
You know, its starting again.
- What?
- The kitchen wall.
It keeps perspiring or something.
It could break through and flood the place.
I think we should talk to Mr. Appopolous.
Talk to him?
Lve been screaming at him for two weeks.
Could you write a letter of protest to the
Better Business Bureau, or something?
Sure I could, but anything Id write, theyd just send back.
Goodbye. Keep your fingers crossed.
Maybe thats what is wrong with my stories.
Ive been typing with my fingers crossed.
- Whats for dinner?
- The usual, meatballs and spaghetti.
Do you think we could get something kind of interesting for dessert?
I invited Frank Lippencott.
You know, its wonderful the way you manage with only one maid.
Its the least we can do.
He hasnt let me pay for one single lunch cheque since Ive been going in there.
I have a feeling that before long...
Walgreens fountain will be under new management.
- Scat.
- Bye.
Good luck.
Where you been, Chick?
Havent seen you around in a while.
Ive been up to Atlantic City, covering the Miss America contest.
Frank, old boy, our countrys never been in such good shape.
- Whats new with you?
- Nothing.
Invented any new sundaes lately?
- Eileen. Hiya.
- Hi.
I tried to call you at the house, but your sister said youd already left.
- I have good news for you.
- Really? What?
I heard about an audition.
A rehearsal pianist who comes in here, he told me about it.
- When is it? Where do I have to go?
- Its in a theatre on 42nd Street.
The piano players name is Charlie and he said... that if you come over, hell fix it up.
Thats wonderful.
I dont know how to thank...
Pardon me,
I couldnt help but overhear, Miss...
This is Eileen Sherwood. Eileen, Mr. Clark.
Thats right. Chick Clark.
- Reporter at large, New York Daily News.
- How do you do?
You see,
Im well-known around show business... and the producer holding that audition is a buddy of mine.
- Thanks, Chick, but Ive already set it up.
- But with a rehearsal pianist.
Youre gonna let this lovely little girl walk in with that kind of introduction, are you?
Thats certainly very considerate of you,
Mr. Clark.
Dont be silly. Life wouldnt be worthwhile if we couldnt help others.
Ill just put in a call to my friend and fix it up.
- Thank you.
- Be right back.
Now, isnt that nice?
Eileen, I wish you wouldnt get too friendly with him.
Why?
Hes a pretty smooth operator.
- Frank, hes just trying to help.
- But hes not an agent. Hes a reporter.
Id like him to meet Ruth.
She used to be a reporter, too, on the Columbus Courier.
Maybe he could introduce her to his editor or something, huh?
Yeah.
Well, its all set.
- Youll have to hurry. Ill walk you over.
- Okay. Bye, Frank.
Wait a minute. Ill come along, too.
- Good.
- Thats not at all necessary.
Im on my lunch hour in five minutes, anyway.
- Take over, will you, Fred?
- Sure, Frank.
Dont you need some kind of clothes to dance in?
Lve got some rehearsal shorts right underneath here.
- I always come prepared.
- Yeah...
- you sure do.
- Well?
Lets go.
I dont know how to thank you, going to so much trouble.
- After all, you hardly know me.
- Thats easily taken care of.
- How about tonight?
- I couldnt. Franks coming to dinner.
This is it.
Why dont you come to dinner, too?
Lts only spaghetti and meatballs... but Id really like to have you meet my sister.
I just love spaghetti and meatballs.
- Good. About 7:00?
- Right.
- Well, here we are.
- Gosh, Im nervous.
You dont have to be.
Youre gonna be great.
Sure you are. You wait here, Lippencott, while I introduce her to the boss.
Dont forget to say hello to the piano player. Charlie?
Look, why dont you both wait for me here?
If the other girls know Ive got any pull, it might be embarrassing. Okay?
- Okay, if thats the way you want it.
- Well wait for you. Good luck.
- Thank you.
- Eileen.
Dont forget to smile.
Eileen.
- What happened?
- Did you get the job?
Did I get...
They wanted to know if I stripped!
- What?
- Thats a burlesque theatre.
- No.
- I didnt even get a chance to audition.
He looked at me with those beady eyes...
Ive never been so embarrassed.
You two ought to be ashamed, sending me to a place like that!
- But I didnt know about it.
- I didnt know anything about it.
Miss Blyth, these will be fine.
Have five copies sent up to Mr. Parker.
Excuse me, Mr. Baker wants to see me.
- Your name?
- Ruth Sherwood.
His secretary called and said he wanted me to come right over.
- Have you any idea of what he wants?
- Not the vaguest.
Mr. Baker seldom confides in me.
Miss Wilt, Miss Sherwood.
- Yes?
- Miss Sherwood is here.
- Send her in, please.
- Yes, sir.
Hi. That thing look straight to you?
- A little higher on the left, I think.
- Little higher on the left.
- Hows that?
- Thats better.
All righty. Wont you sit down?
- Thank you.
- Wait a minute.
There you are. You know, in a years time,
I read an awful lot of stories.
Id say about one in 1,000 has any merit.
About one in every 5,000 writers makes the grade.
Lately, I would bet it was one in a million.
I told you that day in the elevator that I thought you had talent.
I still do. There we are.
You have it when you write about something youve had some experience with.
With which youve had some experience.
- Another qualification...
- No, thank you.
Another qualification is perseverance, and that youve certainly got.
Even in the face of those atrocious love stories, you wouldnt give up.
Did you really kill all these animals, or just insult them to death?
Will you please let me finish before you start swinging at me?
This story of yours,
My Sister Eileen, I think thats wonderful.
- You do?
- I do.
I havent enjoyed reading anything so much in a long time. Thats charming.
Its funny. Its also very real.
Now do you get my point?
Obviously, you were writing about people and incidents that you were familiar...
With which...
That you had observed firsthand.
What makes you so sure?
Lts my business, Miss Sherwood.
Let me prove my point.
First, you write three phoney love stories.
All of a sudden, you turn around, start writing about your beautiful sister, Eileen... that has a dozen men running after her... and shes got them dangling like puppets on the end of a string... wrapped around her little finger.
Thats delightful.
But by comparison, those three love stories, theyre completely unbelievable.
- They are?
- They are.
Now, wheres the answer?
Suppose I told you
I dont even have a sister?
All right, then you dont have a sister... then shes a good friend of yours.
Whoever she is, shes real.
I bet you my bottom buck shes somebody you know pretty well.
Matter of fact, Id like to know her myself.
She sounds like quite a girl.
Who is she?
I hate to admit it, Mr. Baker... but youre a very discerning man.
It just happens that Eileen and the inexperienced... frustrated, spinsterish Ruth Sherwood... are one and the same.
You mean... You tell me that this...
All those experiences? You?
All those men?
I guess the single girls in Columbus were happy to see you leave.
It wasnt as bad as all that.
- I coloured the stories a little.
- Naturally.
- You know, literary licence.
- Yeah...
What about that army pilot... that flew all the way from Nome, Alaska to bring you a birthday present?
Danny Marshall.
He always was impulsive.
Well, no wonder they voted you the girl most likely to marry a millionaire.
Every girl gets voted the most likely to do something or other, doesnt she?
Yeah. How come you never did get married?
I have to think of my career.
Miss Sherwood, would you consider having dinner with me tonight?
Lm sorry. Id love to... but I have a previous engagement.
Thats too bad. Couldnt you break it?
I could sure break mine.
- No, I couldnt. Hed be terribly upset.
- Im sure he would.
- The least I could do is drive you home.
- No, Id rather you wouldnt.
Frank. He said he might be early and it might be embarrassing.
- Hes terribly jealous.
- I just said I was gonna drive you home.
- You dont have to ask me up.
- Its not up, its down.
Thank you very much anyway, Mr. Baker.
Perhaps some other time.
It was nice seeing you. Ill get a hold of you about that story of yours.
Yes.
- Thank you very much, Mr. Baker.
- Just call me Bob.
Im sorry, honey.
Thats all right, Helen, baby.
- Did you ask the girls yet?
- Not yet.
I sure wish you would ask them.
After all, shes your mother.
All right, already, well ask them together.
Come on.
Ruth, where have you been?
I was so worried about you.
- I wish youd left me a note or something.
- Im sorry. I was in such a rush.
- I got a call from Mr. Baker.
- You did? What happened?
- He liked one of my stories.
- Really? How wonderful!
He didnt say hed publish it.
He just said liked it.
But thats a start. Did he like you?
- He invited me to dinner.
- And what did you say?
- I didnt accept.
- Why not?
Hes a big bore, hes fat, and hes getting bald.
You wouldnt like him, either.
What about you? Your drugstore friend called about an audition or something.
I know. I went. Ruth, it was just terrible.
I was furious at Frank and Chick.
- I didnt know...
- Wait. Frank and who?
Chick. Hes a boy I met at the drugstore.
In fact, I invited him for dinner.
- Im still a little mad at him, but...
- Now wait a minute...
- Who is it?
- Me and Helen.
Come in.
- Hi, Helen.
- Hi.
Hi, Wreck.
Yeah?
This is a little embarrassing, but...
You see, the Wreck and I have a problem.
Wed be glad to help if we can.
Whats the matter?
Helen got a letter from her old lady.
Shes coming here for a visit.
- How nice.
- Its not nice at all.
She doesnt know
Im sharing my apartment with a man.
But its a perfectly innocent arrangement.
Yeah, but Ma doesnt know from innocent arrangements.
So we were thinking... maybe you girls wouldnt mind putting me up in the kitchen?
- Yeah.
- In the kitchen?
Theres not enough room out there to put up preserves.
He wouldnt be any trouble, really.
And it would only be for a couple of days.
And hes real handy.
- He could clean up and do the dishes and...
- But no sewing. Thats womans work.
I guess we could put him up for a couple of days.
Now, wait a minute.
- Thanks, Eileen.
- Thanks a lot.
I just happen to have a few of my things out here.
Boy, you dont know what a help this is.
Gee, thanks, Ruth.
Ill bring my toothbrush tomorrow.
Something tells me you werent quite ready to leave Ohio.
But, Ruth, theyre in love.
And besides, well feel a lot safer having a man in the house.
If you had your way, wed live at the YMCA.
Somethings burning.
What about this man you invited to dinner?
Yes. His name is Chick Clark, and hes a reporter on The Daily News... and hes very attractive.
Honey, if its all the same to you, theres a movie Id like to see.
But, Ruth, I invited him for you.
Why, hes very interested in your work.
Sure. I bet you hes so interested, he cant wait to get you alone.
You got to get over that attitude.
How can you ever expect to fall in love if you dont meet any boys?
Who wants to fall in love?
That might interfere with my career
And from what I hear, men are not sincere
I dont think thats true at all, Ruth.
Why, theyre only big bad boys
Fellows can be fun
And its wonderful
When you meet that certain one
How do you know when youve met that certain one?
Whats gonna happen? How will you feel?
How will I feel?
Ltll be like, I just know.
Theres nothing like love
Its a grand, grand feeling
It really is a gift from up above
What else in the universe
Thrills you so
Nothing
No, theres nothing like love
Theres nothing on earth
That is more appealing
Than walking with your fellow hand in glove
What else gives a person
That sweet, warm glow
Nothing
No, theres nothing like love
If I ever meet the boy
What a lucky girl Ill be
There might be greater joy
But if there is, you tell me
Theres nothing like love
When the dawn comes stealing
And suddenly the stars have lost their light
Hell look in your eyes
And hell sigh and say
Thanks for a wonderful night
And then youre all alone
The sky is bright above
And, oh, youre so aware
That there is nothing
No, theres nothing like love
Gee, I thought I was in love at least a dozen times.
- And while it lasted, it was beautiful.
- Yeah, while it lasted.
At least when the right one comes along, llI know it. What have you got against it?
I dont know. I guess Im just chicken.
I know whats the matter with you.
You just havent met the right one.
I havent?
You just wait.
One of these days... a big, handsome hero will come charging up in a white convertible... and sweep you off your feet.
May I have the pleasure, Miss Sherwood?
Id be delighted.
- Excuse me.
- Thats perfectly all right.
- Youre lovely tonight.
- Thank you.
Lets see what we can do about splitting three meatballs four ways.
Good girl.
And skies are bright above
A girl is so aware
That there is nothing
Theres nothing like love
- Nothing
- Nothing
Nothing
Theres nothing
Like love
Did you make some salad dressing?
Yes, in the blue bowl behind the milk bottle.
- You better get ready.
- Youre right.
I borrowed a pair of your stockings.
I hope you dont mind.
Of course not. Theres one of the boys.
Hurry.
Come in.
- Hello.
- How do you do?
- Thats all right. Everybody does it.
- Sorry.
We tried to fix it.
You must be Frank Lippencott.
Thats right.
And you must be Eileens sister.
Thats what they call me.
Of course, youre a different type.
Yeah. Wont you sit down?
Lts hot.
- Eileen, Frank is here.
- Ill be right out.
Would you excuse me a minute?
Shes not still mad about this afternoon, is she?
I think shell get over it.
Good.
Eileens been telling me about your drugstore.
- She says you have awfully good food.
- The best.
Reasonable, too.
From what I understand, reasonable is not the word for it.
- Good evening, Mr. Lippencott.
- Good evening, Eileen.
We dont have to use these...
I hope youre still not mad about this afternoon. It really wasnt my fault.
Charlie, the piano player, he never said a thing to me.
- I bet. Lets move the table.
- Let me help.
- No, thats all right, we can manage.
- So help me, its the truth.
If it isnt, may I be struck dead on this spot.
- What the devil was that?
- Come in, Mr. Clark.
Is it safe?
Of course.
Theyre just blasting for the new subway.
It doesnt happen very often.
This is my sister Ruth.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
You still mad?
I didnt know anything about that deal.
Ill take an oath.
Dont do it.
Youll get the surprise of your life.
No. Im not mad anymore.
I know you two boys were just trying to help.
Now that were all one big happy family, why dont we sit down?
Sure. Of course.
- Please.
- Thank you.
- Dinner will be ready soon.
- It wont be long at all.
- I wish we could offer you a drink.
- So do I. Its hotter than blazes in here.
This is for you, Eileen.
Its a California Burgundy-type wine.
I thought it would go good with the spaghetti.
- Thank you.
- Its a special were running this week.
So is our spaghetti.
- Ill get the glasses and some ice.
- No ice.
This is the kind of wine that should be served at the temperature of the room.
Then you better cook it a couple of hours.
Eileen tells me youre a newspaperman, Mr. Clark.
Thats right.
- She tells me you write, too.
- Yes.
Thats quite a girl, your sister.
Ive been turning her over in my mind all afternoon.
You dont say.
This is quite a studio you have here.
Ive heard a lot about Greenwich Village, but this is the first time Ive ever been... here.
- Frank! Lm so sorry.
- Whats the matter? What happened?
- The water wagon.
- Oh, no, llI get a towel.
- Hello, darlings.
- Well, dont bother to knock.
I brought the plumber to look at the wall.
Hell only be a minute.
This is a fine time to be conscientious.
Dont you see we have guests?
My apologies.
By the way, I would appreciate knowing if you intend staying on here.
A lady friend of the previous tenant has expressed interest in this studio.
We can talk about this some other time.
- Hey, Appopolous.
- Will you excuse me for a moment, please?
- Good evening.
- Good evening, Officer.
- I see youre entertaining.
- I guess you could call it that.
Enjoy yourselves, but keep your noses clean.
- What did he mean by that?
- Weve been playing the piano too loud.
I can fix it, but you got to tear out the wall.
Its all rotted, anyway. Look.
Ruth, what happened?
Anybody here like meatballs in plaster?
Isnt that a shame.
Im sorry.
Look, dont worry about it.
We can go down to the drugstore and eat.
- Drugstore?
- Sure.
I know a great little spot near here.
Beautiful steaks.
- And the dinners on me. How about it?
- You talked us into it.
- Chick, how sweet. Well get our things.
- Dont mention it.
As long as were going to go out, could we go someplace like the El Morocco?
El Morocco?
- Thats very expensive, dear.
- It is? I didnt know.
The special at the drugstore is baked Virginia ham.
- Sounds good.
- Look, baby, you want to go to El Morocco...
El Morocco it is.
Isnt it wonderful, Ruth?
We wont be a minute.
Chick, this is so exciting.
Ive dreamed about coming to a place like this all my life.
Now that youve seen it, how about you and me sneaking out of here?
I know a spot uptown thats just loaded with cosy corners.
But you seem to forget. Im Franks date.
Youre supposed to be with Ruth.
She and that soda jerk are getting along swell.
Hes not a soda jerk, hes the fountain manager.
Besides, you said you were so interested in Ruths work... and you havent said a word to her all evening.
I am interested in her work, honey.
Im going to speak to my editor about her first thing in the morning.
- Promise?
- Why, sure, baby.
- Good parfait.
- Is it? Lm glad.
Thats quality ice cream.
- Boy, Eileen sure is a good dancer.
- Yes, she is.
Shes really a remarkable girl.
So pretty and talented.
Shes got a healthy appetite, too.
Youre really stuck on her, arent you?
I guess a lot of fellows are, huh?
- Look, if you dont mind my suggesting...
- No.
Faint heart never won fair lady.
- You mean I should take the bit in my teeth.
- Nothing ventured, nothing gained.
Thats easier said than done.
I know what you mean.
Ive seen a lot of girls come in and out of the store since Ive been working there.
Nice ones, too.
Never one like Eileen.
Ill never forget the first time she came in the store.
I was filling the sugar...
Whats the matter, you drop something?
Yes, my compact.
Good evening, Miss Sherwood.
- Mr. Baker.
- Yeah.
Fancy meeting you here.
Mr. Baker, Mr. Lippencott.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
Shall we?
Now, may I present Miss Stewart.
Miss Sherwood, Mr. Lippencott.
This is a very pleasant surprise.
Maybe youd care to join us?
- Thanks very much, but were with Ruths...
- Friends.
As a matter of fact, we were just getting ready to leave.
Thats too bad.
- It was nice meeting you, Lippencott.
- Lippencott.
- Ruth was telling me all about you.
- She was?
Yeah. Shes a very remarkable girl.
I dont blame you for being jealous.
Good night. Nice to have seen you.
- Good night.
- Good night.
He seems like a very nice fellow. Very nice.
I think hes got me mixed up with somebody else, though.
Who is he?
Hes just a fellow whos got me mixed up with somebody else.
- Would you like some more coffee, madam?
- No, thank you. The cheque please.
- Whats the matter? Dont you feel well?
- No.
- How are you two lovebirds getting along?
- Ruths not feeling too well.
Whats the matter? llI have a daiquiri, please.
- And a Gibson.
- A daiquiri and a Gibson. Yes, Mr. Baker.
As I was telling you,
Mr. Powers was terribly upset...
that I couldnt do the bathing suit for Vogue.
But I already had a hat layout for Harpers.
With all the models in New York... youd think they could find one to do a simple bathing suit layout.
Everybody told me how hard it would be to get started modelling... but I didnt have any trouble at all.
My folks wanted me to be a stenographer, but that takes so much studying.
Its really amazing when you consider... that Ive only been in New York for eight months... and already Ive had my picture on the cover of three of the biggest magazines.
Amazing.
- Im sorry you dont feel well, Ruth.
- Yes, thats a shame.
- Why dont you take her home, Lippencott?
- I feel much better now.
As a matter of fact,
I feel so much better, Id like to feel better.
- Lets go someplace and have a drink.
- Why, Ruth.
Why not?
There are a lot of people having a good time tonight, why shouldnt we?
- Call a cab, Chick.
- Get a cab.
Ruth, put your shoes on. Youll catch cold.
Step on a crack, you break your uncles back.
Its after 3:00.
Thats why Ive got my shoes off.
Im tippy-toeing.
I dont care. You put your shoes on.
That makes a grand total of...
half of which is...
- What is it?
- Look at the bandstand.
They have concerts here every Tuesday night during the summer.
Its just like Kiplinger Park in Columbus.
Ruth used to play the cymbals in the high school band.
- No.
- Yeah.
Best little cymbal player in Kiplinger High.
Eileen was a drum majorette.
Really? I played second trombone at East Denver.
I was the ill wind that never blew good.
- How about you?
- I never played anything but the races.
Its about time you learnt. Come here.
You can play this.
- What is it?
- What does it look like? Lts a bass fiddle.
- Of course, how stupid of me.
- Eileen, did you bring your drum?
- I never leave the house without it.
- How about you? Lets hear a few notes.
Its beautiful.
Sound your A.
Drum.
Trombone.
Ready?
One, two, three.
Give me a band
And my baby
And an orchestration full of syncopation
With a sensational beat
Give me that band and my baby
Lordy, thats perfection,
Tell it, rhythm section
I have no objection to heat
Give me that sound
That makes a gal and her fellow yell
Hot diggity dog!
I adore those croony, swoony baritones
But tonight I want to jump
To trumpets and saxophones
Professor, I dont mean maybe
When I shake a footsie
With my tootsie-wootsie
I could dance from here
To dear old Dixieland
Baby, give me my baby
And a band
Once more, everybody.
Once again.
Give me that sound
That makes a gal and her fellow yell
Hot diggity dog!
I adore those croony, swoony baritones
But tonight I want to jump
To trumpets and saxophones
Professor, I dont mean maybe
When I shake a footsie
With my tootsie-wootsie
I could dance from here
To dear old Dixieland
Baby, give me my baby
And a good old ragtime
Give me some ragtime
Red-hot ragtime band
Thank you.
- Did you finish it?
- I think its delightful.
Yeah, so do I.
But do you think its possible?
You mean, the girl in the story and the author are one and the same?
- Yeah.
- Offhand, Id say no.
But then you never can tell about us women. Why?
I think she kind of likes me.
I mean, why else would she try and convince me... shes the belle of the ball, you see.
It could be she just wants to get her story published.
No.
- Do you think so?
- You never can tell about us women.
See if you can get her on the phone for me.
- Hello.
- Well, hello.
You and your friends have a nice time last night?
- Yes. Wonderful.
- Good.
By the way, who was the beautiful blond?
Her. Shes a friend of my friends friend.
I was wondering.
Are you busy for dinner tonight?
Tonight?
I do want to talk to you about your stories... and I know you must be awfully sick of nightclubs by now.
So I thought it would be nice if we just had a quiet dinner. At my place.
I think that would be charming.
Wonderful. Ill pick you up around 7:00.
No, dont do that. Ill be uptown anyway.
Whats the address?
Excuse me. Just a minute.
Yes? What is it? Yes.
Ive got it. Yes, thank you.
Ive got it. Goodbye.
- Another guy for Eileen?
- Not if I can help it.
- Which way you want these pleats turned?
- Toward Mecca.
Twice.
- Have some more coffee.
- No, thanks.
- No? A little bit of brandy.
- Yeah, I think Id like that.
- Excuse me.
- Ill clear the dishes.
Thats all right. Leave them.
Here. Put them right down there.
- I dont mind.
- Dont bother yourself. Its not necessary.
I do it at home all the time.
Thats all right, the maid comes in in the morning.
Have a seat.
- You know, youre a wonderful cook.
- Thank you. Just one of my hobbies.
Im glad you like spaghetti.
Thats my favourite dish. As a matter of fact,
I dont think I could live without it.
I have to make a confession.
I buy my sauce down at Papa Grenuccis on the corner.
- Cheers.
- Cheers.
By the way, I did some work on that story that you liked.
I think I improved it a little bit.
- Would you like to read it?
- Id love to. Later.
I dont want to force the issue... but somethings come up that may make it necessary for me go to back to Columbus.
Come on. Lets not talk about business now.
When do you think you could let me know?
Maybe tomorrow.
Maybe tonight.
You know, I can certainly see... how you wrapped all those men around your little finger.
Bob, Id like to explain about that.
Theres nothing youve to explain about that.
Thats just something with which you were born.
Ruth, you know, you and I could have a wonderful time together.
I mean, youre so intelligent, you have such a great sense of humour... and youre well-read, appealing.
Best of all, you dont want to get married.
Yes, of course. My career.
I may be taking an awful lot for granted... but by now, you must know that youre very attractive to me... and I only hope that Im a little bit attractive to you.
Yes, certainly. You are.
Lets drink to it.
To us.
Its bigger than you and me
Its mad and yet its right
One mad unforgettable night
Is worth a lifetime of dreams
Wed be fools to fight it
Its bigger than both of us
Its fate, it had to be
Keep the moment tender
Why wait, lets surrender
Its bigger than you and me
Bigger
Mad
The wildest
What do you say, baby
Its worth a lifetime of dreams
And wed be fools to fight it
Its bigger than both of us
Its fate
It had to be
Keep the moment tender
Why wait, lets surrender
Its bigger than you and me
You sure you wouldnt like to read the story now?
I know youll like the construction better than the way that it was constructed.
Now the construction is motivated by the characters reaction to the motivation...
You know, you couldnt make things happen if they wouldnt, and vice versa...
Why wait, lets surrender
Its bigger than you
And me
Are you sure you want to publish my story, or is this a package deal?
Dont be so naive. Im no different than any of the other men in Eileens life.
Come on, twist me around your little finger.
Come on, twist.
Slow down.
- Youve got the wrong idea about Eileen.
- I have?
There may have been a lot of men in her life... but she never handled them the way you seem to think she did.
- Didnt she?
- No, she didnt she.
If you think youre going to stuff me... and hang me in your office with the rest of your trophies...
- youre fishing in the wrong stream.
- Wait a minute. I just want to explain.
Thanks for the dinner and the floorshow, but the prices are ridiculous.
Wait. Please.
The least you can do is let me drive you home.
No.
Look, I dont blame you for thinking that I more or less...
- Give me a dime.
- What? Give you a dime? What for?
- For the subway.
- Come on. Ruth, this is so silly.
I just wanted to... Ruth.
Do you really think youll have to go back home?
Lm afraid so.
Unless something happens tomorrow.
I guess Id better go in.
I have to get up early and make the rounds again.
- Thanks for the fan.
- Its a special this week.
Youd be surprised what a breeze that little thing gives off.
Everybody in the stores got a cold.
- Good night.
- Eileen...
I dont have many responsibilities.
I live alone, and Im pretty frugal.
- And...
- Yes, Frank?
- Ive saved a little money, and if I can help...
- Thank you, but we couldnt.
If you could just stay just a little while longer...
Im sure something good would happen.
Something good just did happen.
Youre very sweet.
Good night.
Good night.
Gee, Eileen,
I wish you didnt have to go back to Ohio.
Its going to be just terrible not seeing you in the drugstore anymore.
Besides... next week weve got a special on wedding rings.
I know how much you want a career, and
I wish you all the luck in the world, but...
If you said that Im the boy
What a lucky boy Id be
There might be greater joy
But if there is, you tell me
Theres nothing like love
When the dawn comes stealing
And suddenly the stars
Have lost their light
You look in her eyes and you sigh and say
Thanks for a wonderful night
But here I am with you
The moon is still above
And Im so aware that there is nothing
No, theres nothing like love
Were you there all the time?
Nothing, nothing, nothing, nothing
No, theres nothing
Like love
Whats going on out here?
- Hello, Wreck.
- This guy giving you any trouble?
No. Everythings just fine.
Im sorry we woke you up.
Thats all right.
If you need me, you just whistle.
I will.
Who is that?
Thats the Wreck. Mr. Loomis.
He lives upstairs.
Upstairs?
Why is he sleeping down there?
You see, his girls mother just got in town...
- and so he cant stay with her.
- Who?
With either one.
You see, his girl works nights... and her mother doesnt know theyre sharing the same apartment... so hes staying down here with us. You see?
No. Not exactly.
- Are you inferring theres something wrong?
- Im not inferring anything.
I just didnt think that you and your sister...
- were quite that bohemian.
- Bohemian?
Why, Mr. Lippencott, llI have you know... that we come from a very fine old Ohio family... and youve got a lot of nerve thinking what youre thinking.
And I think youd better leave.
- Look, I didnt mean...
- You heard what the lady said. Get moving.
- Now, just a minute, sir.
- Here.
- Ruth?
- Yes, dear.
- I thought you were asleep.
- No.
Where have you been?
Whats the matter, honey?
- Whats wrong?
- Nothing.
Its just so silly.
You and Frank have an argument?
I thought he was so sweet... and kind and considerate.
But hes not at all.
He practically accused me of being a loose woman.
My date just took it for granted.
Your date?
Do you remember Mr. Baker?
Sure. He was the fat, bald-headed man you said you didnt like.
Thats not exactly an accurate description of Mr. Baker.
As a matter of fact... hes beautiful.
For the first time in my life I met a man I...
And I thought he...
And I was wrong.
Honey, you didnt tell me. What happened?
He wants to buy one of my stories.
On conditions.
That mustve been awful.
It wasnt entirely his fault.
Your smart big sister has been acting like the village idiot.
Oh, well.
It doesnt make any difference now.
Tomorrow well be on our way back to Columbus.
- After tonight, I just dont care.
- Neither do I.
Any way you look at it, honey... we just didnt make it.
Im sorry, honey.
Thats all right, Helen, baby.
- She up there?
- Yeah.
Im taking her to Grants Tomb.
Why dont you leave her there?
- Hi.
- Hi.
- Need any help?
- Not now, thanks.
When we finish packing, maybe you could give us a hand with the bags.
- Sure, you just whistle.
- Thanks.
Its not going to be the same around here without you two girls.
I wonder what people back in Columbus are going to say?
If were lucky, theyll say hello.
I wish I hadnt made that crack at the country club.
Which particular crack?
You know.
Ill never set foot in this town again unless its on a personal appearance tour.
I keep thinking of Dad.
All those letters Ive written saying how great we were doing.
Good morning, my dear young ladies.
Im here to take inventory.
Inventory?
Naturally, theres always a slight possibility... some item of value might have been damaged.
Item of value?
Listen, Papa, I could work this dungeon over with a sledgehammer... and it wouldnt look different from the day we moved in.
You said you were going to give us back our money if we werent satisfied. Were not.
What are you talking about?
Who said such a thing?
I was one of the witnesses, and I dont even remember.
And remember, you have until 5:00.
I wish I could stay till Fathers Day.
Id like to bust Papa right in the nose.
Sherwood residence. Miss Ruth Sherwood?
Whos calling, please?
Yes, shes here.
Just a minute. Wait a second.
Its Chick Clarks newspaper.
Mr. Baines, the city editor.
He wants to talk to you.
- What does he want?
- I dont know.
But if its a job, take it.
Its what we came here for.
Hello.
Yes, this is she. Her. She.
What?
Yes, Mr. Baines.
Yes, Mr. Baines.
Thank you, Mr. Baines. Thats wonderful.
Yes, of course. A pencil, paper, quick.
What is he saying?
Get it, over there. Just a minute, llI be right with you.
Im all ready. I got it. What is that now?
Pier 63, Sands Street, Brooklyn.
Sure. I understand. Ill be there. All right.
I cant believe it.
- I cant believe it!
- What did he say?
Hes gonna give me a chance to show what I can do.
- An assignment over in Brooklyn.
- Brooklyn? What happened there?
Theres a Brazilian training ship, you know, like Annapolis.
And Im supposed to go and get a human interest story.
How wonderful.
You see, Chick was some good after all.
Yes, I guess I owe Mr. Clark an apology.
I thought he was just trying to get around you.
And I still think so.
Do you know how to get there on the subway and everything?
- Yeah, I can handle...
- Whats the matter?
The address.
Pier 63, Sands Street, Brooklyn.
- Here. Goodbye, honey.
- Goodbye. Good luck.
Wreck!
Hold everything, Papa.
We may not be leaving.
Isnt it wonderful, Wreck?
Maybe we wont have to go away at all.
Thats great. Ill keep my fingers crossed.
Excuse me. Ill see you later.
Just a minute.
- Chick!
- Hi, baby.
Im so glad you came by.
I dont know how to thank you.
- I mean, about Mr. Baines and everything.
- Skip it.
Really. Its the most wonderful thing that ever happened to us.
All right. How about getting some ice?
Well celebrate.
Ill get you some.
If Ruth does get the job, how much will they pay her?
Theres no telling.
But lets forget about Ruth, and get your career straightened out.
- Dont do that, Chick.
- Dont be nervous, baby. Relax.
Mr. Appopolous might be showing the apartment.
So, we wont open the door. I went through a lot of trouble to get you alone... without that eagle-eyed sister of yours around.
Now, wait a minute.
That phone call Ruth got was from the editor, wasnt it?
What are you worrying about?
Lm handling it.
It wasnt the editor. It was you.
Look, its gonna work out the same way.
Im gonna hand the story in to the city desk as a sample of what she can do.
You mean you sent Ruth over to Brooklyn on a wild-goose chase?
Wild-goose nothing.
Im letting her cover my assignment.
Now, what kind of a heel do you think I am?
What am I going to say to Ruth?
She was so excited.
Now, dont get tragic.
Its gonna be good experience for her.
- Please, Chick, leave.
- Now, look, Eileen. Put yourself in my place.
Dont do that, Chick.
Whats the matter with you?
Have you lost your mind?
Wreck! Help! Where are you?
- Whats the problem?
- Him.
Now, wait a minute, friend.
I dont want any trouble.
You win.
I look forward to the day... when the Bronx Express runs right through this room.
Its okay. That guy wont give you any more trouble.
I dont care about him.
Its Ruth that Im upset about.
There, there, baby.
You just tell old Wreck all about it.
You see, he called Ruth... and Ruth thinks shes got a job.
I dont know how Im gonna tell...
What are you looking at, you old bat?
- Wreck!
- Oh, no!
Wreck, I hope she didnt think...
Hold on, Helen, baby, let me explain.
Helen, whats the meaning of this?
Do you know that man?
Listen. Helen, baby, wait a minute, will you?
Look, honey, Im bleeding.
Look, Im supposed to interview you... for my newspaper.
Steady now.
Wait a minute. Will you let me out of here?
At ease.
Come on now.
Now he fixes it.
- Hello.
- Good morning, Ruth.
Take it easy and let me do the talking for a minute.
Ive got good news for you.
- Who is this?
- Who is... Its Bob.
Ive got some news for you,
Mr. Robert Baker.
Its men like you that give men a bad name... and youre darn lucky
Ruth doesnt have a big brother... instead of a sister.
Whats going on?
Dont encourage them.
Whats the Portuguese word for scram?
- You mean they dont speak English?
- Not a word.
- Oh, no. What do they want?
- What do you think they want?
- What cooks here?
- They chased me all the way from Brooklyn.
- Most of them got lost in the subway.
- Ill fix it.
Gentlemen, Im Appopolous.
Appopolous.
Im the owner of this building.
I must command you to leave.
- What are they tossing for?
- I got a hunch its not me.
Come on, fellows, break it up.
- Go away.
- Go away. Out.
The door, you know, out.
- I dont understand. I dont want to dance.
- My sister doesnt rumba.
She doesnt samba, either.
Come on, leave her alone.
Look, we dont rumba, we dont even do the conga.
Ruth, do something.
Stop! Open the door.
Miss Sherwood.
All right, more conga.
Ruth?
Is that you, Eileen?
Eileen?
Ruth?
Allo!
Papa.
Come on, lets join the party.
Conga!
If youll just listen to me.
Im sure Eileen can explain the whole thing.
All right, but it better be good.
Let me in there.
Ive never been so mortified in all my life.
Imagine me, chairman of the Womens League, a jailbird.
My only daughter mixed up with a muscle-bound sex-fiend.
Yeah, Ma, but I love him.
I can see the headlines now:
Sherwood sisters incite riot.
Create international incident with Brazil.
Franks really gonna think
Im bohemian now.
Not that I care.
You dont care like I dont care.
- Charlie, have a heart.
- Im sorry, Wreck... but Ive got orders from the State Department in Washington... to hold everyone until the matter is investigated.
Charlie, wow.
- Cant I just see Helen?
- Look, Wreck, dont push your luck.
I might forget I like you and toss you in with the rest of them.
Sergeant, Im Senhor Arajo.
Consul General of Brazil.
Yes, sir.
I have an order here from the State Department... for the release of the naval cadets... and all of the unfortunate people involved in the incident.
Yes, sir.
Does that mean theyre gonna let Helen go?
- Thats right.
- Wait a minute.
Look, Helens old ladys locked up, too.
I was wondering if youd do me one little favour.
So now he knows that theres a you... and Im just me.
You should be ashamed of yourself.
If I were any more ashamed,
Id commit hara-kiri.
No, I mean, for having so little confidence in yourself.
I dont know why you want to be me.
Gosh, all my life
Ive wished I could be just like you.
Besides, how many girls are attractive enough... to have the whole Brazilian Navy chase them?
Come on.
- You mean, were free?
- Thats it. Lets go.
I was beginning to feel like I belonged here.
- Which one of you is Helen?
- I am.
Come on. Youve been bailed out.
- What about me?
- What about you?
Gee, Ma, Im sorry.
- Can we go now?
- Sure. Anytime.
Youll hear from us very soon.
Yeah, itll have to be. Thank you. Goodbye.
Now, where are our naughty boys?
Weve got to figure out some way of getting these bags to the station.
We sure havent got enough money for a cab.
Do you think we shouldve let Dad know we were coming?
No. Well just burst in the door and yell,
Surprise!
Come in.
Good afternoon there, lovely ladies.
My name is Robert Baker... and I represent the Society for the
Rehabilitation of Habitual Criminals.
First off, Id like to know which one of you is Miss Ruth Sherwood.
Dont tell me. Thats you.
You must be her sister Eileen.
Id know you anywhere... and Ive been dying to meet you... because I must ask you about a flyer who came all the way from Nome, Alaska... just to bring you a birthday present?
Tell me, did that really...
Now look what youve done.
- You go right out there and apologise.
- Ill do a lot more than that.
In the meantime, why dont you start unpacking?
- Ruth.
- Okay, say it. Ive got it coming.
- Your sisters very attractive.
- Shes beautiful, isnt she?
- Yes, shes lovely.
- Shes got a wonderful personality.
- Yeah. Shes got a great figure.
- Yes.
I was thinking maybe we ought to run her picture along with the story.
Thats one of the things I wanted to tell you.
Your storys going to be in next months issue, that is, if you agree to my terms.
Thats very nice, thank you.
Theres something else
I want to tell you and I cant...
I remember what it was.
- What was that for?
- I think youre funny.
I think youre wonderful. Really.
I think youre beautiful.
Eileen?
I brought you a box of chocolate-covered cherries.
Theyre a special.
Miss Sherwoods.
Miss Sherwood, come quickly.
Very important.
Come out quickly. Its very important.
Come on, come out quickly.
Very important. Come, Ruth!
- Make room, please.
- Whats the matter? Whats going on?
Senhoritas.
- Hello.
- How are you?
My government wishes to take this opportunity... to right a most disastrous wrong.
Isnt that sweet?
Because of your generosity and understanding...
I have the honour to present to you... the ribbon of the Order of Brazilian Mariners, second class.
- Why, thank you. Thank you very much.
- Youre welcome.
I wonder what you have to go through to get first class?
Thank you.
They wish for you to make a speech.
Not me. Ruths the speechmaker.
Go ahead, Ruth.
- Well, I...
- Miss Sherwood, up here.
On behalf of my sister Eileen and me...
I... Me...
Id like to thank you and your wonderful country... for this great honour.
Actually, we didnt do anything to deserve this.
All I did was say something about the conga.
Paper! Paper!
Lucky Lindy makes it!
Extry! Read all about it.
Officer, excuse me. Could you tell me how I get to the Central Park Casino?
You can't miss it.
It's just behind the mall.
- Thank you.
- And only with two ham sandwiches.
Lucky! Lucky!
Read all about it.
Lucky Lindy makes it!
Ain't she sweet
See her walkin'down the street
Now I ask you very confidentially
Ain't she sweet
Ain't she nice
Look her over once or twice
Now I ask you very confidentially
Ain't she nice
Just cast an eye in her direction
Oh, me, oh, my
Ain't that perfection
I repeat
Don't you think that's kind of neat
Now, I ask you very confidentially
Good afternoon, Miss Oelrichs.
I'll just be a few minutes.
Say, this must belong to somebody important, huh?
I rode in one once.
A fella I knew up in college in Boston had an uncle.
Of course, it wasn't in quite as good shape as this.
It had two or three bullet holes in it.
He bought it from a bootlegger's widow.
They're good cars, though, aren't they?
Excuse me.
A gold key.
What's it for?
What's a key for?
Opens a door, doesn't it?
Philip. Philip, will you come in here a moment, please?
Eduard.
Puts me between Colonel Rutherford and Prince Kaminsky... the two greatest bores in New York.
Philip, I think that we'll exile the prince to the end of the table.
- Yes, Miss Oelrichs.
-Just put the flowers--
- Yes, what is it?
- I was looking for Mr. Leo Reisman.
- I'm going to be in his orchestra.
- Back of the bandstand.
-Thank you very much.
-Next time, use the musicians' entrance.
Right, the musician's entrance.
I'll find it. Thank you.
Mr. Reisman's office?
Mr. Reisman?
Oh, thank you.
- Something?
- Hello, Mr. Sherwood.
- Hello.
- Oh, Mr. Reisman.
- Yeah?
- Remember me? Eddy Duchin.
I remember you.
The Berkshires, that resort.
You remember, Leo. Last summer?
We were lost. It was raining.
- Berkshires?
- Oh, yes, of course. Sure. Come in.
Gee, you had me scared for a minute.
I thought maybe you had--
No. I remember you.
You lent me your raincoat.
-I almost forgot to give it back to you.
-I played the piano.
- That's right. A lot of piano.
- Yes, Philip.
That was some orchestra you were hooked up with.
Nobody's got a right to be that bad, not even for money.
They were just a group of college kids picking up money for school.
- They weren't professionals.
- What are you doing here?
Empty the pockets, will you, Lou?
- Huh?
- In New York.
- I came down from Boston when--
-Jimmy Walker's coming in tonight.
- Great. Swell.
- The mayor?
This is his favorite spot.
You don't know the casino, do you?
It's the playground of high society.
This was given to Mr. Reisman by Mrs. Vanderbilt.
He played at her daughter's coming-out party.
- Yes, I know--
- Money clip was given to Mr. Reisman--
Stop sounding like an auctioneer.
You'll make Duchin want to quit college and be a musician.
- That's exactly what I--
- What school do you go to?
Well, I graduated, remember?
I told you.
The Massachusetts School of Pharmacy.
Oh, yeah. Sure, sure.
I remember.
So you're gonna be a druggist.
Here in New York?
A lot of money in drugstores if you can make a good hot fudge sundae.
I'm not going to be a druggist.
I've decided to take advantage of Mr. Reisman's offer instead.
-My offer?
-Sure. To play the piano with your band.
That's why I'm here.
I didn't offer you a job.
- What?
- I didn't offer you a job.
I remember saying I liked the way you play the piano... but I certainly didn't offer you a job.
Yeah, but you said a lot of other things too.
- You told me to come to New York.
- No, no, no.
What Mr. Reisman said was, if you got to New York, stop by and say hello.
He also told me I had the most distinctive style he'd heard in years.
I've got a piano player.
I've had him for years.
But I'm here.
I can't go back.
Why not?
No. I-- I can't go home.
It was tough enough to leave.
They didn't want you to go?
Mr. Reisman, when a man owns a small tailor shop... and presses pants for a living and works like a dog... so that his son can have an education and get ahead... it isn't easy to give up the dream.
It wasn't their idea that I should live the crazy life of a musician... but I should stay at home and become a druggist... and a respected member of the community.
- There's nothing the matter with that.
- But it isn't what I want.
No, I can't go back.
I've made the break.
Eddy, maybe your father was right.
You keep in touch. Now, be sure.
I'm sorry, Eddy.
Good-bye and good luck.
He wishes us good luck.
He can play. He's got a very distinctive personal style.
He won't get lost.
I like it.
What is it ? Chopin?
- Yes.
- Which one?
'' E-flat.''
Please play it again.
I didn't think that Mr. Reisman went in for rude musicians.
- I'm not with Reisman.
- But I heard you say before--
I'm not with Mr. Reisman at all.
There was no job to get.
I only dreamed of working here.
A crazy dream... of driving back home in a red Stutz Bearcat... walking into the house and throwing down a bankroll as big as the Ritz... and saying, '' No more work, Pop.
I'm rich. I'm famous.''
- Where do you come from?
- Boston.
I'm gonna knock this town on its ear once I get started.
I don't mean only New York.
You don't believe me, do you?
Of course I believe you.
What do you intend to do in the meantime?
- Get a job in a drugstore.
- Playing the piano?
No, I'm a druggist.
My prof at the Massachusetts
School of Pharmacy... he used to play the ukulele, so the two of us, we'd get together and--
- Maybe I talk too much, huh?
- Maybe.
Lou, be sure to get the arrangements for '' Lucky Lindy.''
We're gonna have a lot of requests for that tune.
- He's captured the world's imagination.
- Play some more. Go on, play.
- Mr. Reisman.
- Good evening, Miss Oelrichs.
Leo, I want you to do something for me.
Some special numbers you want me to play tonight?
No, it's something else.
We'll keep your music going tonight without intermission.
Oh, my dear, I can't.
But you can if you hire an extra piano player.
Did you have anyone special in mind?
You know very well I had someone special in mind.
- If he's not good enough--
- He's good enough.
- Then you'll do it?
- Yes.
You're an angel.
Go see Mr. Reisman.
You've got a job.
- I'm late.
- What?
Ajob.
I beg your pardon, miss.
What did you say?
Be sure you play well.
- Thank you, Miss--
- Oelrichs. Marjorie Oelrichs.
Thank you, Miss Oelrichs.
Say, druggist, do you have a prescription for a tuxedo?
Is it time?
Give me a hand here, will you?
Thank you.
No, no.
Oh, I can button it.
How much longer?
Okay, ready now? Good.
Oh, you want me to sit.
Thanks, Mr. Sherwood.
- All right, kid, you're on.
- Yes, sir.
- Oh, and, Eddy--
- Yes, sir?
Remember, this is just intermission music. Play soft.
We don't want to disturb their eating and drinking.
- Yes, sir.
- Well, go ahead. You're on, you're on.
Treat the tuxedo gently, will you?
It's an old friend.
Uncle Sherm, want to dance again?
- Let's. Come on.
- Don't you ever get tired? All right.
Joan, Harry. Come on, dance.
Come on.
It's the first time they've ever danced to just a piano.
- Maybe I'd better sell my fiddle.
- Maybe you'd better.
Say, there's Jimmy Walker.
Call the boys.
Wait a minute.
What did I do wrong?
His Honor the mayor is coming in.
Jimmy Walker?
They'll be running in that good, old-fashioned way
Though my hair be old and gray
Get off the stage.
- That's Jimmy Walker!
- Yes, I know. Get off the stage.
As they do in May
They'll be running in December
As they do in May
They'll be running in that good, old-fashioned way
When my hair is old and gray
That's a great number.
The mayor wrote it, you know.
Yes, I know.
Hello again.
Miss--
This is the weirdest set of books
I have ever looked at.
I'm a decorator, not a bookkeeper.
Honestly!
What good is it to have one of the great bankers of the world for an uncle... when he can't even balance my books?
Sherman, perhaps you are being a little unreasonable.
- She's no child.
- Walter.
- Make sure it's ready by Tuesday.
- Yes, Miss Oelrichs.
Just put it down, please.
Do I have to sign for it?
No.
Well, hello.
Is that for me?
- Yes.
- How nice.
This is Mr. and Mrs. Wadsworth.
This is Mr. Duchin.
He played the piano at the casino last night.
- How do you do?
- Oh, yes, I remember.
- We enjoyed the music very much.
- Thank you.
Marjorie, for the last time, will you please shut up shop... and come down to Southampton for the weekend?
I told you I have work to do.
I wish we'd never let you open this place.
- Aunt Edith--
- You've missed everything--
- Europe, Palm Beach--
- I know, dear, but look.
Look at the wonderful jobs that I did.
Edith, you can't argue with success.
Good-bye, dear.
Good-bye, darling, and don't work too hard.
- Good-bye.
- Good-bye.
Let her live her own life.
It would have been so nice to have her down for the weekend.
- Relatives.
- Yes. My aunt and uncle.
They brought me up, and I love them dearly.
Here, would you fill this, please?
The fountain.
They can't understand why I work.
Why do you work?
- Why do you play the piano?
- You don't have to make a living.
I have to have a reason for living.
Just having money doesn't do it.
Oh? I thought it did.
No. Because then you're dependent on money.
Huh?
Then you're dependent on money, not yourself.
Oh. Well, I can't lie.
I hope money comes right up and bites me.
I never met anyone like you.
I read all the Horatio Alger stories when I was a child.
Sink or swim, do or die.
But I've never actually known anyone... who came to New York to seek fame and fortune.
Do you think I'll make it?
I think you'll make it because you're productive.
I like productive people.
I wish I were part of that royalty.
I only play the piano.
And you produce happiness.
That's nice.
I'll remember that.
Oh, Mr. Sherwood!
I hope I'm not late.
No. You made it just in time.
I rushed over as soon as I got your message.
Mr. Reisman really told you to call me?
- I've got the job?
- Please, they're playing.
- Oh, now?
- No. Between the sets.
- Intermission piano.
- I see. Intermission. Yeah.
Another reason I was late was
I had to rush out and rent a tuxedo.
I hope it fits.
The man told me that it does.
- Does it look all right?
-Just fine.
- Oh, good.
- Eddy. Eddy, you're on.
- Now?
- Wait. Please calm down.
Just settle down. Get--
He'd be a great guy to send out for a cup of coffee.
Eddy, we thought we'd lost you.
- Now remember. Soft.
- Gee, thanks, Mr. Reisman.
- Good afternoon, Mr. Duchin.
- Good afternoon.
Well, how do you like it, Lou?
Don't tell me you bought it just because you're going to a classy party.
- Yep.
- What did you pay for it?
- Well, it's secondhand.
- How much?
- It belonged to one of the Vanderbilts.
- Oh, high class.
Tell me, when it backfires does it say, '' Excuse me''?
- How do I look?
- Like a secondhand Vanderbuilt.
Wait.
I could've booked you for two cocktail parties today-- a very fancy fee.
This was a personal invitation from Mrs. Wadsworth.
I'm invited for myself this time.
I don't have to play.
- I'm a guest.
- All right, fine.
- Good-bye.
- Have a good time.
- There's Eddy Duchin.
- Hello, Eddy!
- Are you going to play today?
- No. I'm a gue-- No, not today.
- Oh, that's a shame.
- I'm so disappointed.
The casino is so much more lively now that he's there.
Hey, look out!
Take it easy.
Oh, hello. My car.
- Hello, Mr. Duchin.
- Mr. Wadsworth.
- Nice to have you with us.
- Thank you.
Thank you.
Thank you.
Miss Oelrichs.
- Hello.
- It's awfully nice to see you.
I didn't know you were going to be here.
Your aunt invited me.
You live here with them, don't you?
- Yes, I do.
- Then I'm your guest too.
- I'm having a wonderful time.
- Good. I'm glad.
I read that you were away at Sands Point doing the Whitney house.
It was a very interesting job.
Since I last saw you, I guess you don't know the whole sky fell in on me.
- Oh, really?
- I made some records with Reisman... and I've been playing some wonderful private parties too.
Can you imagine? Last week, I played a party at the Waldorf-Astoria... and the Prince of Wales was sitting right beside the piano, and--
Oh, I guess I still talk too much, don't I?
You know, this is a new experience for me... being a guest instead of a paid entertainer.
- I love it.
- Marjorie, come here.
Excuse me a moment, please.
Linus Larrabie has the most fabulous idea for a party-- undersea.
- We're all going to wear fishnets.
- Thank you.
-Just imagine-- nothing but fishnets.
- Thank you very much.
Edith, did you make it clear to Mr. Duchin... that he was engaged to play the piano?
I thought I did. Why?
You'd better speak to him, dear.
He's not playing.
Don't you think it'd be better if you did?
- You hired him.
- All right.
Mrs. Wadsworth.
I'm having a wonderful time.
Aunt Edith, why did you ask Mr. Duchin to play?
But he was hired to play.
That's why he's here.
- But he thought he was a guest.
- Oh, nonsense.
That's his business, playing the piano.
Well, I certainly made a fool of myself, didn't I?
Eddy Duchin in high society.
The simple fact is that
I'm a presumptuous, conceited fathead... who thought he'd be invited to a party for his grace and charm.
I remember once when
I was a little girl.
I went to a lawn party and had a lovely new dress.
It rained that morning... and I ran from the house to show myself off to the guests.
Well, I slipped, and I fell in a mud puddle.
I still remember how they all laughed.
I lay there wanting to die.
You don't.
And as you grow up, there's always another beautiful dress... and another mud puddle, and still you don't die.
- You grow up.
- And learn to know your place.
What is your place?
Right now, it's beside me.
That's not so bad, is it?
Ladies and gentlemen, in answer to your many requests... here is Eddy Duchin at the piano and '' Dizzy Fingers.''
Bravo!
- You must be very happy about Eddy.
- Oh, yes.
He's a wonderful boy.
- Tell me, you sing with the orchestra?
- No, she's one of New York's--
- An interior decorator.
- You've known our Eddy a long time?
Almost as long as he's been in New York, I'd say.
You're looking at me in a strange way,
Mrs. Duchin. Why?
Because I think you like our Eddy.
Hmm?
But one question remains, and, by no means, an unimportant one.
Does Eddy like you?
Now, don't you think that
Eddy should answer that?
Yeah. But I wouldn't have the nerve to ask him.
Oh, I'm glad the music stopped.
I was getting a headache.
- Eddy! Eddy, you were so wonderful.
- Congratulations!
Hello. Thank you, Lou.
- We are so proud of you.
- Thank you.
How are you getting along with these old friends of mine?
- I hope they don't send me away.
- Is it like this every night here?
A party all the time.
Oh, Mom, I have everything.
He who has everything always wants a little bit more.
Yeah, a Romanian proverb she made up this morning.
Listen, could I make a quiet little speech?
Go ahead.
Mom and Dad, you've always been my dearest loves.
Sacrifice and hard work so that I could get ahead.
You know what you both mean to me and-- and how grateful I am for everything you've done... for more reasons than you know.
One of the reasons is me.
Well, don't you want to marry me?
Yes, but I haven't asked you.
How do you like that?
Believe me, it was the same with us.
The men in the Duchin family do not like to ask for something... until they are sure they can have it.
That works, Eddy, huh?
It sure works.
Well, to make it official-- and in front of my mother and father-- will you marry me?
- Mazel tov!
- Oh, Mama.
Mazel tov.
Mazel tov.
Now, hold it, Mr. and Mrs. Duchin.
Now steady. Steady.
Now just one more, please.
Just one more. Hold it. That's it.
Look at the cake.
- To our home.
- Our home.
You know, I bet all our friends must think that we--
Oh, look. Come here.
A gold key.
Well, goodness.
What's it for?
For you... to our front door.
- Cold? What's the matter?
- Oh, it's nothing.
Just the wind.
I don't like the wind.
- Why?
- Oh, no reason. See the casino?
This is the first night in two years... that I haven't played at the casino.
Sometimes I think you love the casino more than you do me.
Oh, no, but with you.
You're all mixed up with it.
That's good. I like being mixed up with the things you love.
I knew exactly what I wanted, and I got it.
All of it, even you.
I was a cinch.
You're all of it, really.
But I am the best of it--
I and that deep,
God-given talent of yours.
None of the rest of it really counts, darling. You understand that?
Because if it were all to disappear tomorrow, it wouldn't really matter.
Not as long as you have me, and I'm not quite that important.
You're the most important thing in the world.
I hope so, darling.
I hope so.
The things I want now, I want for you.
Don't you understand that?
I'd like to buy you a diamond as big as the Ritz.
Oh, Eddy, no.
No, darling.
No, not the things you can buy me.
Just you, the things you can give me of you.
Everything you want.
It all comes so easy for you.
It scares me a little.
Well, remember Horatio Alger?
Don't you know about '' Eddy's luck''?
I have it.
I'll always have it-- a very special angel who watches over me and mine.
You talk like I'm one of those statues in the park.
You are.
You're my own statue in my own personal park.
Darling, do you realize that you've never danced with me to my music?
Well, I've always wished I could.
A little difficult on the piano bench, Mrs. Duchin.
Say that again.
Say '' Mrs. Duchin'' again.
Come inside with me, Mrs. Duchin... and let me demonstrate through the miracle of science, Mrs. Duchin... how one man can be in two places at the same time.
I never realized you could step like a dream.
Oh, Eddy.
Eddy, my darling.
I love you.
Oh, I love you, Mrs. D.
I love your hands.
Not just for the sweet music they make, but-- but physically, they-- they excite me just to look at them.
Did you know that I fell in love with your hands... before I fell in love with you?
Well, now look who's talking too much.
Really a storm kicking up.
Marjorie, what is it?
What's wrong?
- It's nothing.
- Nothing? What do you mean nothing?
- Tell me, what is it?
- No.
Please.
Please tell me.
Wind frightens me.
Oh, Eddy. The wind!
Why? Why?
A dream I had... and I can't seem to fight it off.
Darling, darling.
Try to forget it.
I try. I try.
I tell myself it's only a dream, but-- but it keeps coming back.
The wind blows between us, and I--
I keep trying to reach for you, but you're gone.
Oh, it won't be like that.
I know.
I shouldn't have told you.
Oh, darling, darling.
Now, I'm here.
It's only a dream.
You ought to beat me.
I'm-- I'm afraid I spoiled your wedding night.
How could you?
How could you?
Good afternoon, Mrs. Duchin.
Darling, what is it?
You sounded so frantic over the phone.
Darling, are you ill?
Why did I have to rush over here?
Eddy, what is it?
- Well, that's a fine reaction.
- Better go out and come back in again.
Well, what happened to Mr. Reisman?
Leo got an offer of a fabulous tour, and he accepted it.
- When did he decide?
- About six weeks ago.
- He's going to Europe and the Riviera.
- Six weeks?
- He'll be gone about--
- You've known about this six weeks... and you haven't even told me, your own wife?
Now, listen, I'm your own husband and it was almost two months... before you told me we were gonna have a baby.
- You traitor.
- We wanted to surprise you.
- Are you pleased?
- Oh, I'm so terribly happy.
Will you sit here, Mrs. Duchin?
Ladies and gentlemen, the first appearance... of Eddy Duchin and his
Central Park Casino Orchestra... and for a very special audience.
''You're My Everything.''
Mrs. D., do you dance?
Well, I-- I have in my time... but I'm not the girl I used to be.
Shall we?
Just the three of us.
I'm afraid I'm rather keeping you at a distance, Mr. Duchin.
Yes. You have let someone come between us.
Do you mind terribly?
Not as long as I have you.
Oh, she's great.
- Hello, Harry.
- Hello, Eddy. What's new?
Please, pardon the musical interruption, ladies and gentlemen... but we had a birth in the Duchin family this week.
This number is dedicated to my son Peter, and my wife Marjorie.
I hope you're both listening.
It's-- It's hard to believe.
There must be something you can do.
It had nothing to do with childbirth.
Believe me, Sherm.
We've done everything possible.
Doctor, your exchange is on the phone.
Pardon me a moment.
He's certain, of course?
She won't live out the night.
Ladies and gentlemen, it's time to say good night.
This is Eddy Duchin signing off from the
Central Park Casino in New York City... and wishing you all a merry, merry Christmas.
And, Marjorie,
I'll be right there, darling.
Merry Christmas!
Congratulations.
- Mr. Duchin, we heard your broadcast.
- It was wonderful.
Merry Christmas.
- Merry Christmas.
- I'd like to speak to you a moment.
It's not true.
Eddy, you scared me.
I heard the radio.
Did you see the baby?
Of course.
I called him a monkey before... but he's really a little kewpie doll, you know.
Of course.
You talk now.
I'm a little tired tonight.
No. I have to tell you something funny.
I was thinking that, from now on... we'll hang three stockings.
You know, not having any brothers or sisters...
Christmas was always a lonely time for me.
Merry Christmas, Mrs. D.
From Peter Duchin and his father.
You know, Santa Claus...
I think you're really in love with me.
I want to go home.
When can I go home?
Soon.
Very soon.
I'm so good for you.
Always have been.
So very good for me.
The girl that gave me a hand at the start... who sat beside me on the piano bench... nursed the bruises and kissed away the hurt... and taught me all the things I had to learn.
And it'll be like that always.
You can count on me.
Count on your Marjorie.
Where's your hand?
Here.
I'll always take care of you.
Peter too.
Eddy Duchin's special angel's with us all the time... and don't you forget it.
Day and night-- he never sleeps, that angel.
Full of lovingkindness.
For all of us.
- What's that sound?
- Nothing.
- But it sounds like the wind.
- No, there's no wind tonight.
- I'm afraid of the wind!
- Darling, there's no wind.
Easy, now. Easy.
It's all right, darling.
It's all right.
You know... everything's ready for you at home.
The--
The extra room looks kind of strange with a bassinet.
But it isn't an extra room anymore, it's Peter's room.
And the carriage is all bought and waiting... and it won't be any time at all... before we'll be... taking him for walks together in the park... all the places that we used to go and know.
And we'll take him to all the special places that we used to know.
You'll give him--
Merry Christmas.
Merry Christmas.
Merry Christmas.
Merry Christmas!
New York won't be the same without you, Eddy.
I won't miss it.
It won't miss me.
Don't worry about him, Mr. Wadsworth.
This tour'll do him good.
I think he'll enjoy South America.
New audiences.
New surroundings, gay and painless.
And he may get some sleep down there.
Are you leaving, Uncle Sherm?
Eddy, about the baby, about Peter-- you haven't seen him for several weeks.
Edith wondered if you weren't going to drop in before sailing time.
He's just a baby.
He won't know I was saying good-bye.
- I see.
- I know, in Edith's hands... he'll be getting wonderful care.
I'm deeply grateful to you both for looking after him.
- There's no need--
- Marjorie would've wanted it that way.
Till we meet again.
Well, Lou--
Seems like the end of an era.
Maybe it is, Eddy.
Maybe it is.
What is snow-- cold or warm when you're under it for the first time?
Good morning.
- Good morning.
- Have you given up sleeping?
I've been working.
They got a thing now called the eight-hour day.
There's an eight-hour night too.
- There's nothing here from Boston.
- There's one from Sherman Wadsworth.
- Hotel rooms, hotel rooms.
- What's the matter with them?
After five years on tour,
I think I've had them. Haven't you?
Hey, they're tearing down the casino.
That reminds me. I got a wire yesterday from the Waldorf.
They want us very much, right after New Orleans.
- I think we ought to take it.
- They're making a playground out of it.
Have you been listening to me?
This is the third letter I've had in two months from Sherman Wadsworth.
He's kind of worried.
So are your mother and father.
- About what?
- About you. About your son.
You've never seen him, you know.
Look, I've told you before that...
I talk to Edith on the telephone, and the kid's all right.
So don't worry about him.
Sherm may be going overseas for the government.
He has a feeling we're gonna get in this war.
Why is it every time I bring up the subject of your son you change it?
- I just wanna go back to work.
- You can't run away from your own boy.
I'm not!
Now just leave me alone, will you?
I respect your grief, but I'm not going to stand by... and watch you punishing yourself and punishing that boy.
- Who's punishing myself?
- You think you killed your wife.
Shut up!
I'm not gonna listen to this!
You think that if Marjorie hadn't had your child, she'd have lived.
- I don't!
- You do!
For God's sake, will you leave me alone?
I haven't been to New York in five years.
- There's nothing left there.
- You've got a boy growing up there.
- You've got to see him.
- He's better off as he is.
- You can't reject your own son.
- He's happy!
How do you know?
Wait a minute!
For five years, you've been running away from the truth.
Marjorie's dead.
Just don't bury the boy with her.
Please, don't you under--
That's all the Wadsworths care about.
They brought him up, yes.
Really, they brought him up... but they want him to know you, his father.
Just give it a try, won't you?
If a war comes, it may be your last chance, so--
We've got four days between here and New Orleans.
All right.
Peter, this is your father.
- Hello, Peter.
- How do you do, sir?
You two are going to have a wonderful day together.
What are your plans?
Well, I thought we'd just make it up as we go along.
- That okay with you, Peter?
- Yes, sir.
Well, shall we go?
Good-bye, Edith.
- Bye, Aunt Edith.
- Have fun.
What about some ice cream?
Really not?
Well, what about a pony ride?
Well, what do you usually do when you come to the park?
Oh,just fool around.
Just fool around.
Look at the seals.
Look. They're going swimming.
You know, that reminds me.
Out in San Francisco, near the ocean... there's a big rock full of hundreds of really wild seals.
Not tame ones like these.
They're sea lions, not seals.
Hi, Peter.
Uncle Sherman!
It's been fun having your father here, hasn't it?
I guess I won't see you again before you go overseas, Sherm.
- You'll be in Europe soon, won't you?
- Yes.
- It's not a job I relish.
- He thinks it means another world war.
I know.
- I'll keep in touch.
- Write.
- Good-bye, Peter.
- Good-bye, sir.
Thank you very much.
I had a very nice time.
You're welcome, Peter.
So did I.
Thanks for the balloon.
Fire two.
Fire center.
Fire four.
Oil slick to port.
Well, we made it.
Attack successful.
Break off the attack.
- You sent for me, sir?
- Yes, Eddy.
Come in.
How are things going?
Rough, George. Rough.
They'll get rougher the closer we get toJapan.
- Sit down.
- Thank you.
We're putting in to Mindanao for repairs.
I've had two more requests from the Special Services.
They'd like to transfer you to morale duty.
Sitting out the war at a piano wouldn't do my morale much good.
You've been aboard two years now.
Frankly, I need you here.
I won't urge you to go ashore.
Thank you.
But you're like a mule on this subject. Why?
After all, nobody wants to die.
No, of course they don't.
But for me, being able to stay on active duty is--
Well, it's purely selfish.
You see, you can get lost in the big reality in-- in which all the little personal aches disappear.
War, as the man said, is hell.
But for me, it's a kind of a... personal salvation.
Get 'em all out of there now.
That's it. Move it along.
Like some chewing gum?
Want some?
All right.
Now, do you think you can do this?
Now, you just keep doing it.
Dear Peter, there are so many things that I would like to say to you.
We've never really known each other.
There just never seemed to be the time.
But when I come home, things will be different.
- I'm going to try to make up for--
- This is the captain speaking.
I've just received official word-- firing ceased at 2300.
The war is over.
I repeat, the war is over.
Stand by for further information.
It'll be sooner than we thought.
Sooner than we thought.
- Mr. Duchin.
- Hello, Charles.
I'll tell Mr. and Mrs. Wadsworth you're here.
Thank you.
Mr. Wadsworth.
Mr. Duchin is here.
Eddy! Welcome home!
Welcome home, Eddy. We didn't expect you till tomorrow night.
I found an admiral who was in a hurry too, so I hitched a ride.
Edith! You've no idea how good it is to see you.
Come on in and tell us everything.
I'm home to stay this time.
Where's Peter?
He and Chiquita went to the park.
I'm going to stay home now with my son.
- I have so much to make up for.
- We understand.
Sherm, I'm organizing a new band.
Lou's got us booked into the Waldorf for a long hitch... so I can stay right here in New York with Peter.
Maybe I ought to go to the park and get him.
- Eddy, be patient.
- But I have so many plans.
We're going to set up housekeeping, a sort of bachelor hall.
Say, tell me about this little girlfriend of Peter's.
Chiquita. She's a sweet child.
You'll like her.
- Spanish?
- English. ''Chiquita's'' a nickname.
Her father was a London business associate of mine.
The entire family was wiped out during the blitz.
It's been wonderful for Peter having her here.
- They adore each other.
- Aunt Edith. Uncle Sherm.
You can't imagine what happened in the park.
I can skate spread-eagle and--
Hello, Peter.
I'm very glad to be back with you, Peter.
I hope you're happy to see me.
Yes.
You look like your mother.
I'm told I look like you.
Did you get theJapanese sword and the battle flag I sent?
- Yes.
- Good.
I hope your little playmate Chiquita enjoyed the doll.
It came from a very fine
Japanese collection.
It's one of the most--
It's one of the most beautiful dolls I've ever seen.
I'm so very pleased to meet you at last.
Welcome home.
- Thank you.
- Eddy, this is Chiquita Wynn.
I can see I've been measuring you by the wrong yardstick.
I'm desperately sorry.
I do apologize if we've embarrassed you.
No, it's just that
I'm afraid that... salt water has dimmed my sense of humor.
I think I'll go upstairs now.
But your father has just arrived, Peter.
What about the surprise?
Some other time, Aunt Edith.
Mr. Duchin, will you sit here?
Ladies and gentlemen, music by Duchin.
- Where did he learn to play like that?
- Chiquita taught him.
We used to get out all your records and play them.
We love them so.
Excuse me.
I've got a headache.
- Does he really have a headache?
- You know how boys are.
No, I don't know how boys are.
They're unpredictable.
He may have a headache.
At any rate, the experience of meeting you again... is a little more than he can take all at one time... and he is determined not to show it.
It should go, if you don't mind my saying so... by easy stages.
What I feel for Peter isn't a matter of love by installment.
I was not talking about what you feel, Mr. Duchin.
It's wonderful that you're home.
Excuse me.
That's one. Come on.
Throw it in at the mitt.
Way up.
Make it a double-play ball.
Eddy, you sign these contracts and we're in business.
Eddy, you sign these contracts and we're in business.
What a band.
We got everybody we wanted.
These past five weeks, getting the boys together... and getting the arrangements set... reading the small print in the contracts...
I'm beat.
Right in the strike zone.
Ball one.
Strike one.
They're great together, aren't they?
High one, Chiquita.
Would you come in here for a moment, please?
- Where do I sign?
- At the bottom.
All copies.
- You called me?
- Oh, yes. Change your clothes.
We can go as soon as I've finished signing these contracts.
- Go where?
- School starts in a few weeks.
I'll take you shopping and buy you some new clothes.
But Chiquita--
I'm sorry.
Peter and I did that this morning.
You what?
Edith and I thought you'd been so busy that--
Well, return the things.
I want to take him shopping.
But we've already ordered them.
It's easy to cancel an order.
Now run and change your clothes, son.
Why, you act exactly as if I were trying... to steal your son from you,
Mr. Duchin.
Believe me, I'm not.
From now on, I'll take him shopping for what he needs.
Certainly.
But I don't think, for his sake and yours... that we should air our differences in front of him.
Miss Wynn,
I realize that you're here... as a guest of the Wadsworths, not a nursemaid.
I can't give you orders.
-You keep telling me to mend my manners.
-I was not aware--
Well, I certainly want it stopped!
Unfortunately, your son judges you, in part, by how you treat me.
Let's forget it. We're just not on the same side of the fence.
Every child needs a father, Mr. Duchin.
I'm well aware of that.
- You've turned my son against me.
- You're very rude and tactless.
Whatever exists between you and your son was ready-made when I arrived here.
- It's all my fault, I suppose.
- I've no interest in fixing blame.
Did you know Peter owned every one of your gramophone recordings... and he hid them in the cupboard the moment you came home?
- Hid them? Why?
- Why?
Why give the gift of love and admiration... to a god that may depart on the morrow?
It's just a lot of talk.
What does it mean?
Whatever you want to make it mean.
Now, that's a real intelligent answer.
You know, it never occurred to me before.
Maybe you're not--
Maybe you're not the man
I was told you were.
Miss Wynn.
You might not believe this... but I'm ready to go down on my knees to that boy.
Believe me, you'll have to.
There are so many things about him that you know that I don't.
Many.
Would you tell them to me?
Some of the things I have to say may be painful.
Please tell me.
Please.
Fine. Take five.
- Well, how was it, fellas?
- Great.
Solid, Mr. Duchin.
Thanks for asking us.
- Good.
- Eddy, can I see you a minute?
Yeah, sure.
Excuse me.
We're opening the Waldorf in a week, and we've got to make some replacements.
These are the men available.
I like your father.
I seen his picture in the paper.
I've seen it a dozen times.
Take the lead, Peter.
That was a wonderful session, Peter.
- Thanks.
- That was solid, as they said.
- Say, I got another one.
- Now, I regret to add... we have a dental appointment.
I wish I didn't have to go.
Do I have to go?
Why don't you ask your father?
I'm asking you.
This would be our third cancellation.
I think you'd better go.
There'll be other times.
Miss Wynn is right.
Very well.
Good-bye, fellas.
I gotta go to the dentist.
All right, let's go, boys.
Clock's running. Let's go.
We haven't got all day.
We open in a week.
Let's go, boys.
Come on. Eddy's waiting.
All right, fellas,
I want to take the theme now.
Chiquita, I think I'd like to dance.
- Congratulations, Eddy.
- Welcome home, Eddy.
Thank you.
It's good to be here.
Enjoying yourself, son?
Nat, take over for me, will you?
Eddy, the band never sounded better.
- Take it from Cugat. He know.
- Thank you.
- What's the matter with your arm?
- Nothing, nothing.
It's just hot in there.
I'll go back in a minute.
Eddy, what's the matter with your hand?
Nothing.
Nothing that a good massage won't remedy.
- That room's no icebox, you know.
- I know.
I've booked you for 20 years, and we've always given them a two-handed player.
Lou, will you leave me alone!
I just got a little tired.
That's all.
- Let me call the house doctor.
- No, no, no. Really.
It's all right. There's nothing wrong.
See? It's okay.
Good. You know, Eddy, on the rainy side of 40... a man ought to have a medical checkup at least twice a year.
Medical checkup twice a year.
We'll get one next week.
Dad?
Mr. Duchin?
Dad!
I'm afraid.
Can I stay with you?
Of course, son.
Hop in.
Dad?
Yes?
Daddy, I love you!
I was thinking. Why is this holiday next week called Labor Day?
Why?
Because nobody works.
I'm starved!
- Great kid, isn't he, Lou?
- Yes, he is.
Reminds me of you when you flew into the casino first time I met you.
I don't have to have my tonsils out, if you care to know.
I'm hungry.
I want something to eat.
Hey, Hopalong.
Get upstairs and wash.
Cook isn't feeling well, so I'll rustle you up some grub.
Okay!
America's still full of wild Indians.
Did the doctor look at his throat?
Yes, of course.
Both of us. Nothing's wrong.
Edith and Sherm are certainly burning up Europe.
I'll get Peter something to eat.
Will you stay, Lou?
Oh, no, thanks, Chiquita.
That's the kind of woman for you.
- Was, you mean.
- There are other doctors.
Dr. Richter's a specialist, Lou.
Where are you going?
Back to the hotel to think about my sins.
- Maybe I'll see you later.
- Yeah.
Life can be heartless, huh, Lou?
Hungry too?
No, I-- Just in the mood to beat a teakettle.
May I?
- Beat a what?
- Teakettle.
What does that mean?
It's an old expression.
'' Beat a teakettle.''
It means jabber jabber.
Jabber away.
Well, where's the jabber?
You say something.
That bird is brilliant.
Do you hear it out in the garden?
That's topic one. Next.
Next?
Not only packaged bread, but packaged, sliced bread.
This is an American luxury that passes all understanding.
Eddy, if I-- if I may begin again... it makes me very happy that
Peter and you are together and...
Peter really has a father.
I'll miss him.
Miss him?
Where are you going?
Home to England.
What's in England?
England's home to me.
What is home?
Is it perhaps the place where your husband is?
I suppose it is, if you have the husband.
Did it ever occur to you that
I might ask to be your husband?
Well, frankly, no.
I've always known how you felt about Peter's mother.
Chiquita, I'd like to tell you about that.
I loved Marjorie more deeply than my own life.
I'd never deny that.
We were gay friends, tender lovers, a pair of kids together.
How often can you be kids together?
Only once, Chiquita.
And no one, but no one... gets the big jackpots of life more than once.
Young love is once.
The first time you have a child.
Or watching your parents grow old.
That's another ''once.''
I didn't know that when Marjorie went.
I tried to live in a charmed circle... that was gone forever.
I want you to know, Chiquita...
I'd give anything for you not to leave Peter and me.
What did you say?
Excuse me.
I didn't have the right to say it.
In all my life,
I've never admired a woman more.
Do you understand?
Eddy, I really don't understand what you're talking about.
- Eddy, I--
- Please,just go away.
I don't understand.
Are you angry with me?
- Of course not.
- Then what's wrong?
Chiquita, will you--
I love you.
I love you.
- You know that, don't you?
- No, I don't.
I don't understand all this, Eddy.
Well, it's nothing you'd like to understand.
All right.
I'm gonna die.
Maybe you understand that.
It's that plain and simple.
The doctor used a fine 20-dollar phrase--
''unfortunate prognosis.''
That's polite for ''hopeless.''
Eddy, wait a minute.
What's hopeless?
- The doctor said--
- He said I have a year to live.
It's called hematocytosis.
Perfectly harmless to your neighbors... only you get gobbled up and disappear.
I can't believe it.
That's what I told the good doctor.
He turned away and shook his head.
- Then we'll go to another doctor.
- Chiquita, stop it.
I've been to three, and their opinions don't differ.
Eddy, they--
So much for love... or whatever future we might have--
Does anyone know?
Only Lou.
Does Peter know?
Not yet.
Look.
Look at the speed of the river.
It's strange how unreal the real can be.
Have to call my folks in Boston... say hello.
Eddy, I would be so proud to be your wife.
I don't want pity.
It has nothing to do with pity.
No, I couldn't do that.
Eddy, I love you so much.
You love me?
For such a long, long time.
I want to be your wife.
You know... if this weren't
Edith's wedding present... out the window it would go.
Oh, sure.
$20 worth of Renoir?
D-seventh.
You like it there?
You know, this place is getting a little crowded.
Well, not with pictures.
With pianos.
You know, I knew I was marrying for better or worse.
But two pianos?
Doesn't everyone have two pianos?
Say, that's Uncle Lou.
You see? He didn't forget.
Lou promised to take him to a movie.
- The albums?
- Yeah.
- Daddy, your albums are here.
- Fine. Thank you, Lou.
- Don't mention it.
- Hello, Lou.
- Can I borrow him for a couple hours?
- If you promise to bring him back.
I will.
Let's take Lou with us when we go to Bermuda next spring.
- Aren't we going to Bermuda?
- Sure.
And next summer,
Italy and France too?
I'm gonna row a gondola.
- I'm ready. Good-bye, Daddy.
- Good-bye, Peter.
- Good-bye, Chiquita.
- Have a good time at the movies.
I will. Thank you.
Last one out is a rotten egg.
Take the car.
You know, you never trusted me with your Stutz Bearcat.
Stutz scared cat?
What's that?
Last one out's a rotten egg.
You like it better there?
Eddy, you're going to have to tell Peter.
- No, I can't.
- You must.
But I wouldn't know how to do a thing like that.
It doesn't have to be done tonight.
Listen, dear, tonight, next week, a month from now--
What difference does it make?
I just couldn't do it.
What I want to know is why!
Why do they have to destroy a man twice?
You work and work, and just when you get a--
Everything.
When it gets too good, they take it away.
I don't want to die.
I don't.
I'll tell him.
I'll tell him.
Oh, God, give me the proper words to say to him.
This is where you used to play the piano.
The Central Park Casino used to be here, didn't it, Dad?
Yes, that's right.
Say, Dad, how did they happen to have a nightclub... right here in the middle of the park?
Well, it seemed like a good idea at the time.
And you lived up there.
Yes.
Boy, you know what you could've done, Dad?
You could've got a steel cable, run it from your apartment... right down here to the casino.
Then, when you wanted to go to work... you just climb up on your cable and go--
And boom--you'd land right at the piano and start to play.
Now, why didn't I think of that?
The only trouble is, how would you get home?
Well...
I think if I got a running start--
What did you want to talk to me about, Dad?
Well, I... thought it might be fun if we took a walk together.
When I was in the navy in the Pacific...
I tried to write to you.
There were so many things
I wanted to tell you.
You never knew your mother.
But when I lost her, I--
Peter, I need your help.
I've been thinking, son.
The only way I'd ever leave you again would be against my will.
A trip, you mean?
A road tour with the band?
No, not exactly.
You're going away for a long time?
For a long time, son.
Will Chiquita go with you?
No, she'll stay here with you.
You know, Peter, there's no one dearer to me in the whole world than you.
But I--
I can't stay with you, son.
Do you have to do it?
Go, I mean?
Yes.
Well, I don't care.
I don't think you mean that, Peter.
Don't tell me what I mean.
You said you have to go.
You're gonna leave me again.
- Didn't you?
- No, Peter. Listen.
You don't have to bother explaining things.
I can get along without you.
I've done it before, and I can do it again.
You must understand, Peter.
Listen to me.
I told you, it was against my will.
Don't say that!
It's not true.
There's no one who can tell you what to do.
Peter, there's somebody who tells us all what to do.
You remember the hospitals I've gone to, the doctors I've seen recently?
Yes, but you're all right now.
You told us.
No, I'm sick, Peter.
I'm very sick.
And that's why I won't be with you much longer, son.
Do you understand what I'm trying to tell you, Peter?
Do you understand?
Yes.
I... think I understand.
I've been lonesome without my two men.
It's Cook's day off, and you know what that means.
I'll take care of her, Dad.
Well, how about a little double piano?
Music by Duchin.
You're getting awfully good, son.
It's hard to tell where I leave off and you begin.
NIKKATSU CORP.
THE BURMESE HARP
Produced by
MASAYUKI TAKAGI
Original Story MICHIO TAKEYAMA
Screenplay NATTO WADA
Cinematography MINORU YOKO YAMA
Lighting KO FUJIBAYASHI
Sound MASAKAZU KAMIYA
Production Design TAKASHI MATSUYAMA
Music AKIRA IFUKUBE
Edited by MASANORI TSUJII
Assistant Director
TOSHIO MASUDA
Starring
RENTARO MIKUNI
SHOJI YASUI
JUN HAMAMURA, TAKETOSHI NAITO
KO NISHIMURA, SHUNJI KASUGA
TANIE KITABAYASHI
TATSUYA MIHASHI, YUNOSUKE ITO
Directed by
KON ICHIKAWA
THE SOIL OF BURMA IS RED,
AND SO ARE ITS ROCKS...
The war ended long ago, but it left indelibly sad stories in our hearts.
What follows is one such story that happened to our company.
It's a story we shall never forget.
By July of 1945, the tides of war had turned against Japan even in Burma.
Our company retreated from one mountain to the next.
We wanted to reach the border somehow and cross over into Thailand.
Why don't we sing?
Singing is meant for times like these.
Mizushima... play your harp.
A night in late autumn
The solitary traveler
Looks up at the sky
With a desolate heart
His beloved hometown
His parents dear
The path of his dreams
Is one that leads back home
We often sang.
Our captain had graduated from music school and eagerly taught us the basics of choral singing.
Those songs lifted our spirits in times of sorrow and pain.
In our company, we had a special harp fashioned after one used in Burma.
PFC Mizushima learned how to play it.
He'd never studied music, but he had a natural gift and quickly mastered it.
He composed wonderful accompaniments and variations and played along as we sang.
- Kobayashi, watch these.
- All right.
PFC Mizushima reporting.
I'm leaving now to scout ahead.
- Thanks.
- I'll signal on the harp, as usual.
I'll play Danger if I see anything,
All Clear if it's okay to advance.
You look better like that than in uniform.
He looks Burmese.
You should settle down here.
The natives would love you.
Me Burmese.
Burma nice country.
What's taking him so long?
Shall we send out a second scout?
- The harp!
- Mizushima's playing the harp.
Which tune is it?
You still can't tell?
It's the All Clear.
I always confuse them.
Sarge has a tin ear, huh?
Move out!
- What happened?
- Did a fox cast a spell on you?
- Some thieves cornered me.
- Thieves?
What did they take?
What could they take?
All he had on was a longyi.
- They took my longyi!
- And wrapped you in banana leaves?
They gave me these.
They had quite a few.
They held me up and asked me to exchange the longyi for banana leaves.
What a polite holdup!
You look even better in those leaves.
With a gold collar, you'd look just like a cannibal.
A banana waist cloth keeps you cool.
Our greatest worry was food.
Enemy paratroopers had laid traps in the villages, so we couldn't afford to be careless.
Where's the village chief?
Through distant clouds the snows of the Himalayas glisten
We bathe ourselves in its melted waters
Somewhere afar your hidden spirit
Soothes with those waters this burning heart
Can you see the Himalayas?
Not from here.
The sutras and tradition tell us that the Himalayas are the home of the soul.
We long to see them, even if just once.
Your playing has gotten very good recently.
Not at all.
You should just settle here and play.
You've always said you love Burma.
I want to go home to Japan.
Japan...
Your hospitality was quite unexpected.
We thank you.
We'll sing a song of gratitude.
Setting Sail, first verse.
I knew it was too good to be true.
- Stay put!
- The ammo boxes!
Nobody move.
Is it the British?
Sing! They're forming a line in the woods.
We'll make them think we don't know they're there.
Get ready for action as we sing.
Blossoms fall in my jade cup
The moon is reflected in my sweet wine
Lost in thoughts of peace and order
I look down on the fields of glory
Rising toward the far hill
Five stalwart youths in high spirits
Clap your hands!
Laugh!
They could attack at any moment.
Night's falling.
We need to keep them off guard.
Laugh and clap your hands!
What about the ammo boxes?
One shot and they'll all explode.
One shot and we'll be blown to pieces.
O merciful Buddha...
False alarm.
They're not the enemy.
Wait!
Listen.
The song's in English.
That night, we learned that the war had ended three days earlier.
We gave up our arms.
We have surrendered.
Not only us, but our country as well.
I'm not sure what to make of this.
We don't know where we'll be taken, what we'll have to do, or even if we'll be allowed to live.
All of Japan has been heavily bombed.
Many are dead.
Many are homeless and starving.
Our country is in ruins, while we're imprisoned thousands of miles away.
All we can do now is watch and wait.
It's no use fighting our fate.
Far better to accept it like men and wait for the day when we can rise again as a nation.
Up until now, we've lived and died together.
Now we must share this fate together too.
If we die here in Burma, we'll die together.
But if by chance we're able to return home, we'll do so together, leaving no man behind.
We'll rebuild our country.
That's all I can say for now.
What's Mudon like?
So we're finally going to the Mudon prison camp.
- Good thing, too!
- What's so good about it?
You think they'll kill us all?
Are you serious?
So what's Mudon like?
How should I know?
- Where's Mizushima?
- Here.
The captain's calling you.
A Japanese unit has been holding out on a mountain.
The British have laid siege to it for the past three days.
I've asked them to let one of us go and talk our men into surrendering.
I don't want a single man to die needlessly.
That's the mountain there.
What do you say?
Will you go?
It's a half day's trek by foot.
I'll go, sir.
I'm not sure what to do, but Ill proceed as necessary.
Thank you.
The rest of us will go south to Mudon.
Join us once you've completed your mission.
Itll be tough to walk the 200 miles to Mudon alone, but the British have assured you safe passage.
Ill proceed to Mudon once I've fulfilled my duty.
Very well. Persuade them to surrender.
But you only have 30 minutes.
We won't wait any longer.
What happened?
They suddenly stopped.
Must be having their afternoon tea.
- Son of a bitch!
- Wait! He's Japanese!
- Careful!
- How'd you get here?
- Well done!
- Where'd you come from?
Where's your commander?
Hey, what's this?
We can use every man we can get at a time like this!
Stand at attention!
I'm Mizushima from Inouye Company.
I'm here on a mission.
What? You're a messenger?
The Japanese army has surrendered.
Further resistance is useless.
Please surrender as quickly as 
Shut up!
How dare you!
Surrendering is an insult to those who've died!
Unlike your unit, we're not filthy cowards!
Well fight to the death!
- What good are you then?
Live, endure, work for your country!
For our country?
How dare you!
How does surrendering help our country?
No one here wants to live with that humiliation!
As long as nobody surrenders, how can Japan lose?
That's right!
A coward like you can't be Japanese.
Leave!
- I refuse!
Not until you reconsider.
Youll die if you stay.
Aren't you afraid?
I don't want to die meaninglessly.
Dying in battle is meaningless?
It doesn't serve Japan or its people or yourself.
It's meaningless.
- How dare you!
- A harp? What's the big idea?
- I use it to signal.
Captain, you're responsible for these men's lives.
If they die in vain, the blame will be yours.
Who will apologize to their families and to the people of Japan?
Very well.
Ill ask the men.
- Nakai, what about you?
- Ill fight to the end, sir.
And the rest of you?
How's it really gonna turn out?
Just as I said.
If only we had time to discuss it calmly.
Unfortunately, time's almost up.
Please decide in the next three minutes!
It's unanimous:
Well fight to the death!
Ill ask the British to give me more time.
- You're afraid of dying!
- Coward!
- I'm not a coward!
- Should we be taken prisoner?
Go home alone!
Very well.
I don't have time to argue with you.
What are you doing?
Well never surrender!
My captain said not to let a single man die needlessly!
Youll pay for this, you son of a bitch!
MUDON
It's awful quiet.
Old lady, glad you made it!
And in the rain!
It's her livelihood.
Old lady, let's trade.
What do you have today?
That stupid Indian soldier.
Firing blanks to scare me.
A raw recruit, Ill bet.
How can he not know my face?
How about a molasses bar for this broom?
That's a broom?
I made it out of palm leaves.
You're a clever fellow.
Okay, it's a trade.
I made this bamboo flute yesterday.
It sounds really nice.
Trade for some bananas?
Okay, trade.
I don't want this monkey you gave me.
Can I trade it for food?
No, that's a naughty monkey.
I won't take it back.
Ill trade these new socks for shrimp paste.
Okay, trade.
- Is that stuff good?
- Tastes like our salted fish guts.
Old lady... did you ask about what we discussed?
You forgot again, didn't you?
It's hopeless.
We can't get information.
We have to rely on you.
It's no use getting angry.
Please don't forget this time.
The wounded Japanese brought to the Mudon hospital  were they really captured on Triangle Mountain?
And if so, was there a man from another unit?
And is he okay?
Just ask that much.
I'm going to the hospital in a few days for some trading.
Ill ask about it.
- Well pay what we can.
- Don't forget.
Don't forget, please!
I understand.
Thank you.
Good-bye.
She's kind, but completely unreliable.
I wonder what happened to him.
It's been over ten days.
I should have gone myself.
- Don't feed the monkey now.
- It's hungry.
That's the rice I saved.
I was going to feed it tomorrow.
What? Yesterday you gave it my share!
- Go to sleep!
- I smell sake.
Would you all shut up?
We haven't even begun to taste the suffering of defeat yet.
We ought to be grateful that we're just locked up here.
What do you say?
Let's start our rehearsals tomorrow.
The shrike sings on a withered branch
While we beat the straw
Okada, take this.
It's all as it was last year
But something is missing
The chop, chop, chop of my brother's ax
- They're singing with us.
- They come every day.
Sarge, you don't sing so well, do you?
I'm probably the worst in the unit.
- So you know you're bad?
- I guess.
That monk's here again.
People always give him offerings.
He rakes it in here.
Fall in!
Double file, forward!
- What is it?
- What's wrong?
- Kinda looks like Mizushima.
- Looks exactly like him!
Mizushima?
Mizushima!
Stop fooling around.
Youll scare him.
Taking shelter from the rain?
Hello, old lady!
What are you doing here?
This is my house.
So this is where you live!
Did you ask for us?
Yes, this time
I remembered to ask.
What happened to Mizushima?
Mizushima?
I mean, what did they tell you?
Calm down and Ill tell you everything they told me.
You know the hospital, the soldier 
Just give us the gist.
This squall's going to pass.
They said they were on Triangle Mountain.
There was a man from another unit.
They were all running around, bullets flying everywhere, so he probably died there.
So he's dead after all.
He died in battle.
That's the same kind that monk had.
Did you meet the monk too?
This is the brother of the monk's bird.
My husband spent all day yesterday in the woods and caught five parrots.
The monk came along and asked him for directions.
My husband gave him a parrot to earn a favorable rebirth.
He sold three.
Only this one is left.
Old lady... will you sell me that bird?
It's a very cute bird.
This is thanks for all the information.
This is for you too.
Thank you.
Go ahead. Take the bird.
This bird can learn
Burmese, Japanese  anything you want to teach it.
That was the end of our hopes for Mizushima.
We couldn't learn any details.
We didn't even have a way to search for his remains.
We could only believe he had died in battle.
It's been five days already.
Can't you see that whatever you do is futile?
The armies of Britain and Japan can come and fight all they wish.
Burma is still Burma.
Burma is the Buddha's country.
I'm starving.
- Which way is Mudon?
- I don't know.
- Which way is south?
- That way.
A Japanese cartridge.
They're here too.
Aren't you going to Mudon?
Yes, but the corpses of the Japanese soldiers 
In Burma, the bones of many foreign soldiers lie unburied.
It's a terrible pity.
You may take this boat to Mudon.
Thank you.
Please be our guest in this room whenever you visit Mudon.
You seem to have undergone some very severe training.
Good night.
At last.
Tomorrow is the day!
Theyll be so surprised to see me like this.
Playing so early?
I'm sorry.
I play the harp for money.
Why do you play that tune?
If I play this, the English give me money.
May I play?
Please teach me to play like that.
They're sure to give me more money.
Ill teach you, but the monks will complain if we play here.
The British hospital workers are singing a hymn.
A Japanese soldier probably died this morning.
Aren't you going to the prison camp?
The camp is the other way.
Mizushima!
Don't scare him like that.
That monk was
Mizushima after all.
But we couldn't know that at the time.
I know now that I can't go back with them.
It's a Burmese ruby!
Strange to find such a big one along the river.
Must be the spirit of the dead.
Hey...
What is it?
That music.
It's a harp.
Who's playing it?
- That's a famous song.
- I don't mean that.
I mean the way it's played.
The way the notes are played together.
That's how Mizushima played it.
- It's the kid we saw at the temple.
Let's ask who taught him how to play.
What do you think?
If Mizushima's alive, is there any reason he wouldn't want to return to us?
- There can't be!
- Unthinkable!
Why was that boy playing Mizushima's song?
How do you know it was Mizushima's?
We don't, but the captain says it was his style.
And the captain's a musician.
Mizushima died on Triangle Mountain.
How could he teach the kid?
- Maybe before he died.
- Idiot! He didn't have time.
- Did anyone see him die?
- You saying he didn't?
- We can't be sure.
- I've seen deserters pose as monks.
The monk on the bridge may actually have been Mizushima.
- That's right!
- Why didn't he say anything?
That man didn't understand
Japanese.
But he looked just like him.
That's enough!
Captain...
I know it's disappointing to hear this, but I think it's best to forget about Mizushima.
He died bravely trying to carry out his mission.
To doubt his death is actually to dishonor his spirit.
When dressed as a native, he looked exactly like one.
By the same token, there must be
Burmese who look just like him.
You believe he's alive, so you think you see him or think you hear his harp playing.
I'm grateful that you care so much for your men, but youll only hurt your men if you let worry ruin your health.
There's no hope for him.
Please just give up.
I suppose you're right.
Attention!
Eyes right!
Face front!
At ease!
Isn't that Mizushima?
Hey!
Mizushima... let's return to Japan together.
Let's return to Japan together.
Let's return to Japan together.
We're getting nowhere.
Maybe that's too hard for you.
Please just check one more time.
That's impossible.
We've done all we can.
The troops that took Triangle Mountain have returned home.
The Japanese survivors aren't in this town.
But that tune 
You hear a certain way of playing, a few notes floating on the breeze, and it's enough to make you think a dead man is alive.
You must be dreaming.
Mizushima... let's return to Japan together.
You got it! Good boy!
Captain!
What's the point of training it to say that?
I know how much you regret
Mizushima's death, but such behavior is unmanly.
Hearing this bird repeat those words day and night will only demoralize us.
We're already homesick as it is!
I beg of you, sir:
Pull yourself together.
We all saw that monk carrying a white box of ashes.
That's a Japanese custom!
I thought it odd too, but there's a similar custom in Burma.
He was the only one carrying a white box.
I have to find out who that monk is.
If we meet again,
Ill put this parrot on his shoulder.
If it's Mizushima, hell respond to what the bird says.
If he doesn't, then Ill know I'm wrong... and Ill give up.
I'm sorry to put you all through this.
Bear with me just a little longer.
Mizushima... so it was you after all.
Now that I see this box here,
I know for sure.
Mizushima... what happened on Triangle Mountain?
And what happened after that?
I know nothing.
But I think I know how you feel.
You've made a weighty decision.
How hard it must have been.
High in the castle in springtime
At a flower-viewing banquet
The sake goblet makes the rounds
Casting its shadow against the walls
Moonlight shines
Through boughs
Of ancient pine
Where has it gone
That light of days long past
- It's Mizushima!
- That's his harp!
- It's coming from the forest!
- No!
It's coming from that buddha!
Mizushima!
If you're in there, open up!
Can't you hear us?
Mizushima!
That's Sergeant Ito's voice.
That's Kawakami.
That's Baba.
Hey, everybody!
We're going home!
The repatriation order arrived!
We leave in three days!
Really?
The captain said so.
He's at headquarters now!
Mizushima!
Let's return to Japan together.
That's right.
That stubborn bastard Mizushima.
We have to take him back to Japan!
Mizushima, show your face!
Let me think.
How can we get this parrot on that monk's shoulder?
We only have three days!
Well, at least now we can go around and look for him.
I've got an idea!
Well start singing tomorrow real loud.
He's bound to show up.
Your company really likes to sing.
Deep in the countryside of Shinoda
The mother fox
Longs for her cub
Deep in the countryside a red dragonfly...
- I don't think he's coming.
- I'm losing my voice.
Whose bright idea was this anyway?
Look! The old lady!
Congratulations!
I heard you're going home.
I'm very happy for you.
I wish you happiness back home in Japan.
Thanks for all your help.
Ill tell my mother back home all about you.
You've all suffered so much.
Old lady... something to remember us by.
Thank you.
Here's another memento.
This is for you.
This is a good-luck charm.
Thank you very much.
People started calling me
the Japanese granny.
Itll be lonely here without you.
Still speaking in Osaka dialect, eh?
I always will.
That's the Japanese the officers stationed here taught me.
Is it now?
Old lady, do you think you could give this parrot to that monk?
That's impossible.
He's a wandering monk, and a highly revered one too, but nobody knows where he is.
We're leaving tomorrow.
We're not asking you to search all over Burma, but if you see him, could you give him the bird?
What a strange request.
We have enormous respect for that monk too.
In that case, Ill do it.
Don't worry.
Really?
From now on, youll be with your brother on the monk's shoulder, serving Buddha together.
Please make sure he gets it.
Ill visit again before you leave.
Good-bye, and thanks again!
I wonder if shell really do it.
She doesn't seem very serious.
We have no other choice.
There's nothing else we can do.
At least there's a chance.
Finished packing?
There's nothing to pack.
Just put me on that boat.
What's wrong with your voices?
He said Mizushima would show up if we sang.
Now we all have sore throats.
That was stupid.
Captain... don't you care if Mizushima doesn't come back?
He's coming!
What?
- Who's coming?
- He's coming!
- You reek of booze!
- Mizushima!
Where?
I mean, that monk is outside the fence.
That same beggar kid is with him.
He has two parrots on his shoulders.
Hey, Mizushima!
Let's return to Japan together.
The old woman found him.
That's our parrot.
But Mizushima never had such a vacant look.
Maybe it's not him.
How about if we sing?
Mizushima, we're going home tomorrow!
- It's good you came back!
- Come back with us!
What's the matter?
Say something!
Mizushima!
Mizushima, what happened to you?
- Good day.
- Old lady!
We've got nothing left to trade.
These are for you.
Free of charge.
No, I can't go back.
That's a strange phrase to learn.
Get that damn bird out of here!
This is the other parrot.
He kept the one you gave him.
He told me to bring you this one in return.
What?
He asked me to give this to the captain.
He asked me to do that, and since it's the last thing
I can do for you,
I brought it.
Time to go!
There's a letter from Mizushima.
There's no time now.
Ill read it later.
But Captain, what if Mizushima changed his 
Mizushima isn't going to change his mind.
Even if I read this now, it wouldn't make any difference.
Ready for departure!
All units ready for departure.
Company, forward march!
At ease, march!
Is everyone here?
I'm going to read
Mizushima's letter.
I think I understand how he feels.
When I went to the repository that day and saw that white box,
I understood.
But I felt uneasy and said nothing about it.
I think this letter will answer your questions.
My captain and brothers at arms... it's difficult to express how much I miss you all, how much I want to join you, work with you, talk with you and sing with you.
It's even harder to express how I long to return to my war-ravaged country and see the ones I love.
But I cannot return.
I cannot leave the bodies of my comrades lying scattered along the hills and rivers of Burma.
It was when
I turned back for them that I met you on the bridge.
I can't express how I felt at that moment, but by then
I had already decided to stay.
I couldn't rejoin you, or even tell you my name.
I had only one intention, and that was to hurry north.
No, I can't go back.
As I climbed mountains and crossed rivers, burying the bodies left in the grasses and streams, my heart was racked with questions.
Why must the world suffer such misery?
Why must there be such inexplicable pain?
As the days passed,
I came to understand.
I realized that, in the end, the answers were not for human beings to know, that our work is simply to ease the great suffering of the world.
To have the courage to face suffering, senselessness and irrationality without fear, to find the strength to create peace by one's own example.
I will undergo whatever training is necessary for this to become my unshakable conviction.
The Burmese priest who has been my teacher has formally accepted me into the priesthood.
The captain's words that we should all return and work together to rebuild our country... are still fresh in my memory.
But when I saw how many dead were left behind,
I could no longer feel the same way.
I will stay behind to create a place where those thousands of young souls can find repose.
After many years, when that task is done,
I may return to Japan if possible.
But even then I may not.
My life may end here.
I'm writing to you from my room in the monastery.
The parrot you sent me... sometimes says the words it learned from you:
'Hey, Mizushima, let's return to Japan together.'
Each time I hear those words,
I'm startled.
Today, filled with unbearable sadness,
I forgot my monastic vows... and played a song of farewell to you on my harp.
I am now resigned to my fate.
There is no end to words of farewell.
Those of you who still think of me, please accept my deepest thanks.
From snow-capped mountains to the coast where the Southern Cross shines,
I shall wander throughout Burma.
Whenever my loneliness becomes unbearable, Ill play my harp.
Thank you for everything you've done for me.
I shall always pray for your happiness.
Yasuhiko Mizushima.
When I get back to my house in the mulberry orchard,
Ill take a nice long nap on the veranda.
I wonder what's become of the factory.
I miss the sound of those motors.
Ill whistle as I ride my bike through the Ginza delivering telegrams.
And Ill go to movies and 
You really think itll all be so easy?
You really think Mizushima will never come back?
What?
You never cared about him before.
What's gotten into you?
Let Mizushima lead his own life.
Everyone lives as he pleases.
I was a station employee...
It's true that I hadn't given
Mizushima much thought before.
I didn't even think about him much as we sailed home.
All I thought about was how his family would feel as they read his letter.
In an oddly sincere way,
I hoped the captain would find a good way to explain it.
THE SOIL OF BURMA IS RED,
AND SO ARE ITS ROCKS...
THE END
Summertime and the livin' is easy,
Fish are jumpin and the cotton is high.
Oh your daddy's rich and your ma is good lookin',
So hush, little baby, don' yo' cry.
One of these mornin's you goin' to rise up singin',
Then you'll spread yo' wings an' you'll take the sky.
But till that mornin' there's a-nothin' can harm you
With Daddy and Mammy standin' by.
Give me my boy!
Judith!
Yes!
Honey, you take the baby
I'm going' over and shoot dices with the boys for about a half hour
Allright honey, but please only for a half hour
I promise
Ah. - Good evening Mariah!
Hi and there we go
Hi Robbins
Honey, don't play tonight.
Do like I say.
I been sweatin' all day.
Night time is man's time.
He got a right to forget his troubles.
He got a right to play.
If you hadn't been drinkin' you wouldn't talk to me that way.
My ole lady is hell on savin' money to join the buryin' lodge.
I says spend it Baby, while you is still alive and kickin'.
You're right
Summertime and the livin' is easy...
Seven come, seven come to pappy!
Throw that beautiful number!
Come seven to me! Yeah, man!
I'll bet yo' wrong. I'll bet he's right!
Gettin' hot!
Come, seven! Shoot!
Made it! He made it!
...So hush, little baby, don't yo' cry!
Ol' man seven come down from heaven!
What, that chile ain't asleep yet?
Give him to me, honey,
I'll fix him for you.
Lissen to yo' daddy warn you,
'Fore you start a-travelling,
Woman may born you, love you and mourn you,
But... a woman is a sometime thing,
Yes, a woman is a sometime thing.
Oh, a woman is a sometime thing.
Yo' mammy is the first to name you,
Then she'll tie you to her apron string,
Then she'll shame you and she'll blame you
Till yo' woman comes to claim you,
'Cause a woman is a sometime thing,
Yes, a woman is a sometime thing.
Oh, a woman is a sometime thing.
Don't you never let a woman grieve you
Jus' cause she got yo' weddin' ring.
She'll love you and deceive you,
Then she take yo' clothes and leave you
'Cause a woman is a sometime thing.
Yes, a woman is a sometime thing.
Yes, a woman is a sometime thing.
Yes, a woman is a sometime thing.
There now, please you take over him
Here come de honey man.
Yes man, dis de honey man.
You got honey in de comb?
Yes man, I got honey in de comb.
An' is yo honey cheap?
Yes mam, my honey very cheap.
Here come de honey man.
How are you, Peter the other day?
Good. - Good!
Now gimme the money!
Now you go sit down and rest.
Hi Porgy.
Good evenin' ladies, hello, boys!
Oh, we'll have a game
Luck's been ridin' mighty high with Porgy today.
I got a hand full of money, goes to the first man who's got the guts to shoot it off.
Well, come on
Take my bowl and give him some water
Come on in
Lay it down.
Guess, we'd better wait.
I see Crown comin', looks like he ain't gonna stand no foolin'.
Is Bess with him?
Lissen to Porgy.
I think he's sof' on Crown's Bess.
I ain't nebber swap two words with Bess.
Porgy got too much sense to look twice at that liquor guzzlin' slut.
That gal Bess ain't fit for Gawd fearin' ladies to 'sociate with.
Always the same thing!
Between Gawd fearin' ladies and the Gawd damnin' men that gal ain't got a chance.
Can't you keep yo' mouth off Bess.
Didn' I tell you Porgy was sof' on her?
No, brudder,
Porgy ain't sof' on no woman;
They pass by singin', they pass by cryin', always lookin'.
They look in my do' an' they keep on movin'.
When Gawd make cripple,
He mean him to be lonely.
Night time, day time,
He's got to trabble dat lonesome road.
Night time, day time,
He's got to trabble dat lonesome road.
Tell me, mam do you like the little present
I sold to him for you
He like it
Give me a pint and make it quick.
Allright Crown
Get out of here! Come on, get out of here. Go on!
Got the best for you, Crown
Pay him, Bess.
That whiskey is jus' as weak as water.
See that hussy drinkin' like any man!
Here, Robbin have one to the
Gawd fearin' ladies.
There's nothin' like 'em, thank Gawd.
No, you don't.
Nobody is goin' to drink my licker
All right, men,
I'm talkin' to you.
Who says, you're wrong!
Boxcars again.
Cover 'em, brother, cover 'em.
I goin' to pass 'em along and see if I can break my luck.
Robbins' little lady ain't allow him but fifty cent and he can't take no chances with bad luck.
That's all right, honey boy,
I'll stake you when yo' four bits done gone.
Go ahead an' play.
You don't need no charity off no she-devils.
See what I gets for you.
Yo' woman is easy when you know the way.
Shut yo' damn mouth!
You don't give Mingo a chance to talk to the bones.
For your right.
Yo' mammy's gone and yo' daddy's happy
Come home little bones, come home to pappy.
Four to make.
Come four!
Crapped out!
Give me a pinch of happy dust,
Sportin' Life.
Don't give him that stuff,
Sportin' Life.
He's ugly drunk already.
Pay him an' shut up.
Frien' an' dice an' happy dust ain't meant to 'sociate...
You mens bes' go slow.
Leave Peter be, let him alone.
Huh, seven!
Hey! damn it,
I ain't read 'em yet.
Crown cockeyed drunk, he can't tell dice from a watermelon;
Shut up!
Six to make!
I'll take your bets.
Six
Seven!
Porgy shoots now.
I choose that one
Oh, little stars, little stars,
Roll, roll, roll me some light,
'Leven little stars, come home, come home,
Roll dis poor beggar a sun an' a moon,
Li'l Joe.
Little Joe,
Oh, no, my brother, that ain't little Joe.
They the monin' and the evenin' stars.
An' just you watch 'em rise and shine for this poor beggar.
Got!
Made it!
Let me loose!
Roll up your sleeve.
I pass
Get out over here
I'm a crap shootin' idiot.
Rolled out!
Nine to make, come nine!
Read 'em.
Nine spot!
Nine right!
Touch that money an' meet yo' Gawd!
Take yo' hands off me, you lousy houn'.
Nobody's gettin' away with Crown's money.
Oh, stop them, someone will get hurt!
He killed him!
Wake up an' hit it out.
You ain't got no time to lose.
What the matter?
You done kill Robbins and the police will be comin'.
Where you goin' hide?
They know you an'
I pulls together.
Some man always willin' to take care of Bess.
Well, get this: whoever he is, he's temporary.
I'm comin' back when the hell dies down.
All right, only get out now.
That you, Sportin' Life?
Sure, and I'm the only friend you got left. give me a pinch of happy dust.
I'm shakin' so
I can hardly stand.
I'll be goin' to New York soon.
I can hide you out and take you with me.
You an' me will make a swell team.
I ain't come to that yet.
The cops ain't goin' get me for no woman.
You done bring trouble enough, get out before the police come.
You wouldn't have a heart and let me in?
Not till hell freeze!
No way!
Can I wait here a minute?
Sure
Walk here
Sit down
Sit down, don't be afraid
Here, over here
Look!
Where did he come from?
Come on
We better go and report to the headquarter
Did I hurt you?
Don't worry
I guess, it's safe for you to go now
Can I stay here for a while?
You can stay here, as long, as you like, Bess
Where is brudder Robbins?
He's a-gone, gone, gone, gone, gone, gone, gone.
I've seen him in de mornin' wid his work clo'es on
But he's gone, gone, gone, gone, gone, gone, gone.
An' death touched Robbins wid a silver knife
An' he's gone, gone, gone, gone, gone, gone, gone.
An' he's sittin' in de garden by de tree of life.
An' he's gone, gone, gone, gone, gone, gone, gone.
Robbin is gone
Look!
It's Porgy,an' Bess is with him.
What's dat woman comin' here for?
Serena!
I don't need yo' money to bury my man.
Dis ain't Crown's money.
Porgy gave it to me.
Serena
How de saucer stand now, sister Serena? thirteen dollars an' fifty cent.
Dat's a-comin' along fine, you will be burying him real soon.
What am I goin' to do if I ain' got the money?
Gawd got plenty of money for de saucer.
An' he goin' to soffen dese people heart for to fill de saucer till he spill all over.
De Lawd will provide a grave for his chillen,
Bless the Lord!
An' he got comfort for de widder.
Oh, my Jesus!
An' he goin' feed his fadderless chillen.
Yes Lawd, Truth Lawd!
An' he goin' raise dis poor sinner up out of de grave.
Allelujah!
An' set him in de shinin' seat ob de righteous.
Amen, my Jesus!
Overflow, overflow,
Oh fill up de saucer till it overflow,
Everybody helpin' now sendin' our brudder to heaven,
Lawd, Oh Lawd,
Another saucer-burial, ha?
You're the widow?
Yes.
He did not leave any burial insurance?
No, he didn't leave nuttin'.
Well, see to it he's buried tomorrow.
Come here
You, come here
You killed Robbins an' I'm going to hang you for it!
He ain't don um!
Now come on.
I swear, I ain't do it!, Sir
Who did it?
You heard me, who did it?
Crown did it.
I saw him do it.
You're sure you saw him?
I swear to Gawd, I'm telling you the truth, Sir
That was easy.
I thought as much.
Come on
You saw it too, didn't you?. come on, answer, I don't want to have to put the law on you.
Look at me, beggar!
I was in my room
You're a liar.
Uncle, come on.
He saw the killing
Take him along and lock him up
How long you goin' lock him up for?
Till we catch Crown.
I reckon Crown done loose now in de palmetto thickets, an' dere ain' no rope long enough to hang him.
Then the old man's out of luck.
Remember, you've got to bury that body tomorrow or the board of health will take him an' turn him over to the medical students.
I ain't never done nuttin', boss.
I can't puzzle this thing out.
Peter's a good man,
Crown's a killer
And there goes Peter to be locked up like a thief.
I'm goin' out, no matter what de wedder say,
It take a long pull, boy but I'm going, yes, Sir.
Mus' be you mens forgot about de picnic.
Ain' you knows dat de p'rade start up de block at ten o'clock?
Good morning!
That's right, mens.
We'll go to the picnic today but tomorrow morning we'll push that
Seagull clean to de Blackfish banks ' before we wet de anchor.
Jake, you're not goin' to take de Seagull to de Blackfish banks, are you?
Honey, it's time for
September storms.
How do you think dat boy is goin' to get de college education, if I don' work hard an' make money, right, Porgy?
Did you ask me?
Oh, I got plenty o' nuttin',
An' nuttin's plenty fo' me.
I got no car, got no mule,
I got no misery.
De folks wid plenty o' plenty
Got a lock on dey door.
'Fraid somebody's a goin' to rob 'em
While dey's out amakin' more.
What for?
I got no lock on de door,
Dat's no way to be
Dey can steal de rug from de floor..
Dat's okeh wid me,
'Cause de things dat I prize
Like de stars in de skies
All are free.
Oh, I got plenty o' nuttin',
An' nuttin's plenty fo' me,
I got my gal, got my song,
Got Hebben de whole day long!
No use complainin'!
Got my gal, got my Lawd, got my song.
I got plenty o'nuttin',
An' nuttin's plenty fo' me.
I got de sun, got de moon, got de deep blue sea.
De folks wid plenty o' plenty,
Got to pray all de day.
Seems wid plenty you sure got to worry
How to keep de debble away, away.
I ain't afrettin' 'bout hell
Till de time arrive.
Never worry long as I'm well,
Never one to strive to be good, to be bad,
What de hell,
I is glad I's alive.
Oh, I got plenty o' nuttin'
An' nuttin's plenty fo' me.
I got my gal, got my song,
Got Hebben de whole day long.
No use complainin',
Got my gal, got my Lawd, got my song!
Hello Clara, morning Jake
Lovely day for a picnic
So I think
This is a church picnnic, not for your kind
Hello, Bess, goin' to the picnic?
No, I'm stayin' home.
Yes, picnics is all right for these small town suckers, but you and me is use to the high life.
We understands each other.
I can't see for the life of me what you is hangin' roun' this place for; why, with your looks, Bess, an' your way with the boys, there's big money for you, an' me in New York.
I can't remember ever meetin' a no good
I like less than I do you. what about a little happy dus' for old time sake?
I'm through with that stuff!
Tell you, I'm through!
Just a pinch,
No, not directly.
No, no, I done give up dope.
Tell that to somebody else, nobody ever gave up happy dus'.
Oh no!
Go!
Gawd, what a grip for a piece of a man!
Sportin' Life, you stay away from my woman, or I'll break yo' neck!
I'd like to see a lousy cripple, like you, break my neck.
Oh gawd, no!
If I get my hands on you once more, you'll see quick enough.
Get out, you rat,
Get out, buzzard!
You remember, Bess your man friends come and go but Sportin' Life an' happy dus will always be aroun'
Bess, you is my woman now, you is, you is!
An' you mus' laugh an' sing an' dance for two instead of one.
Want no wrinkle on yo' brow, no-how.
Because de sorrow of de past is all done done.
Oh, Bess, my Bess,
De real happiness is jes' begun.
Porgy, I's yo' woman now,
I is, I is!
An' I ain' never goin' nowhere
'less you shares de fun.
Dere's no wrinkle on my brow, no how,
But I ain' goin'!
You hear me sayin',
If you ain' goin', wid you I'm stayin'.
Porgy, I's yo' woman now,
I's yours forever
Mornin' time an' evenin time an summer time an' winter time.
Mornin' time an' evenin' time an summer time an' winter time,
Bess, you got yo' man.
Bess, you is my woman now,...
Porgy, I's yo' woman now,...
Oh, I can't sit down.
Got to keep agoin' like de flowin' of a song.
Oh, I can't sit down
Guess I'll take my honey an' her sunny smile along.
Today I is gay an' I's free
Jes' abubblin', nothin'troublin' me.
Oh, I's gwine to town
I can't sit down.
Happy feelin', in my bones astealin'
No concealin' dat it's picnic day.
Sho's is dandy, see my sugar candy.
Life is dandy, that's the only way because is picnic day.
Oh I can't sit down
Got to keep ajumpin' to de thumpin' of de drum!
Oh, I can't sit down.
Full of locomotion like an ocean full of rum!
Today I is gay an' I's free.
Jes' abubblin', nothin' troublin' me!
Oh, I's gwine to town
I can't, jes' can't, sit down!
What's de matter sister?
Ain't you know you goin' be late for de picnic?
I'm stayin' with porgy.
Sho' you goin', Bess. - No.
But everybody is goin'. You better help me wid my basket.
What's all dis talk about stayin' home when ev'rybody goin' to de picnic?
I don't want to go an' leave Porgy alone.
I want you to
I want you to be so happy here with Candygirl
I know, Porgy
Go, with her, Honey, go
You stay roun' here an' you'll die of de lonesome blues.
You better hurry up.
We'll miss dat boat.
Goodbye, Porgy.
Goodbye, Bess.
Hey
Hey, wait!
I ain' got no shame doin' what I like to do!
I ain' got no shame doin' what I like to do!
Sun ain' got no shame; moon ain' got no shame.
So I ain' got no shame, doin' what I like to do!!
An' de lawd said to himself
I got to get busy an' make me some kinfolk
Yes, yeah!
And he made Adam and he sees, that Adam got one extra rib in his back so he take that extra rib and he made women from his bone
I've got you
The lawd's got you
Yes, yeah!
That's right! Kinfolk!
The Lawd got you
An' the good book got you
We walk as the good book meant
It ain't necessarily so,
It ain't necessarily so.
De t'ings dat yo' li'ble
To read in de Bible,
It ain't necessarily so.
Li'l David was small, but oh my!
Li'I David was small, but oh my!
He fought big Goliath
Who lay down an' dieth,
Li'l David was small, but oh my!
Wa-doo
Zim bam boodle-oo,
Hoodle ah da wa -
Scatty wah.
Yeah!
Oh, Jonah, he lived in de whale,
Oh, Jonah, he lived in de whale
Fo' he made his home in
Dat fish's abdomen.
Oh, Jonah, he lived in de whale.
Li'l Moses was found in a stream.
Li'l Moses was found in a stream
He floated on water
Till Ole Pharaoh's daughter
She fished him, she says, from dat stream.
Wa-doo
Zim bam boodle-oo,
Hoodle ah da wa -
Scatty wah.
Yeah!
It ain't necessarily so,
It ain't necessarily so,
Dey tell all you chillun
De debble's a villun
But 'tain't necessarily so.
Till get into Hebben,
Don' snap for a sebben!
Live clean.
Don' have no fault.
Look at me!
Oh, I takes dat gospel
Whenever it's pos'ble,
But wid a grain of salt.
Methus'lah lived nine hundred years,
Methus'lah lived nine hundred years,
But who calls dat livin'
When no gal'll give in
To no man what's nine hundred years?
Wa-doo
Zim bam boodle-oo,
Hoodle ah da wa -
Scatty wah.
I'm preachin' dis sermon to show
It ain't nessa, ain't nessa, ain't nessa, ain't nessa
Ain't necessarily so.
Stop!
What are you doin'?
Stop it! Stop it!
Shame on all you sinners.
You call yourselves
Church-members, goes on a decent picnic of The Lawd
An' when the Christians turn their back you start behavin' like Sodom an' Gomorrah.
Hear that whistle get on de boat. all you wicked chillen!
Better hurry up, or you miss dat boat.
If dat boat leaves without me, there'll be some sick monkeys when I get back to Catfish Row.
I'm tellin' you, Bess!
Oh my goodness!
Hurry up!
Bess!
Crown!
I saw you lan'
I been waitin' all day for see you.
I'm almos' dead on this island.
You don' looks almos' dead, you look bigger an 'stronger'n ever.
Oh, I got plenty to eat, bird eggs, oysters.
But I 'm almos' dead,
I'm so lonesome wid not one person to swap a word wid.
I'm glad you come.
I can't stay, Crown,
Crown, de boat'll go without me.
Damn dat boat!
You got any happy dus' wid you?
No,
No, I give up happy dus'
I'm livin' wid Porgy now. an' I'm livin' decent.
Porgy? You sho' got funny tas' in men,
In a couple ob weeks I'm comin' for you. an' you're goin' to be there, lessen you wants to meet yo' Gawd you gets dat?
Take yo' han's off me,
I'm goin' a miss dat boat.
You tellin' me dat you'd rather have dat cripple dan Crown?
It's like dis, Crown,
I's the only woman
Porgy ever had, an' I'm thinkin' now, how it will be tonight when all those other people go back to Catfish Row.
He'll be sittin' an' watchin' the big front gate, acountin' 'em off, waitin' for Bess.
An' when the las' woman goes home to her man an' I ain' there. . .
No!
Let me go, Crown!
You can get plenty other women.
What do I wants wid other woman?
I gots a woman an' dat's you, see!
Oh...
What you want wid Bess?
She's gettin' ole now;
Take a fine young gal
For to satisfy Crown.
Look at this chest
An' look at these arms you got.
You know how it always been with me,
These five years
I've been yo' woman,
You could kick me in the street,
Then when you wanted me back,
You could whistle, an' there I was
Back again, lickin' yo' hand.
There's plenty better lookin' gal than Bess.
What I wants
Can't you see, / wid other woman,
I'm with Porgy, /
I gots a woman, yes,
Now and forever /
An' dat is you,
I am his woman, / yes, dat is you, yes, he would die without me./
I need you now an'
Oh, Crown, won't you let me go to my man, to my man./ you're mine jus'
He is a cripple / as long as I want you. an' needs my love, /
No cripple goin' all my love. / take my woman from me.
What you want wid Bess? /
You got a man tonight
Oh, let me go to my man. . .
/ I'm youre man
What you want with Bess?
You ain't goin' nowhere!
Take yo' hands off me,
I say,
Take yo' hands off!
Take yo' hands off me!
Hands off!
I knows you' ain' change - wid you and me it always be the same.
No honey, dat's all de breakfast
I got time for.
It's gettin' late,
I'm on my way.
Come on, you fishermens, it's time to trabble.
All right, Jake.
Bye, Maria.
Good mornin', Jake
Oh, I'm agoin' out to the blackfish banks, no matter, what the weather say
And when I say, I'm goin', I mean goin', and I'm leaving at a pretty good day.
I got a blister on my seven down blaise
I got a blister in my hand. but I roll the road is ready for trust me, Gawd till I'll anchor in the Promise' Lan'
It take a long pull to get there, huh!
It take a long pull to get there, huh!
It take a long pull to get there, but I'll anchor in de Promise' Lan'
In de Promise' Lan'.
Lan'!
Go! Go!
Ask Clara for her help
Oh no!
What a long road, ain' nobody to help me. nobody!
De police folks put me in,
Well, if it ain' ole Peter! an' de police folks take me out an' I ain' know yet what I done, what I done, done, done. . .
Oh, Peter!
No, there's a rattlesnake in dem bushes
Ain' nobody to help me.
Nobody to help me?
What's de matter?
Porgy's woman very sick more'n a week now; she went to the picnic ain' get los' in de jungle. an' didn' come home for two day.
I think she's goin' to sleep now;
It's been more tha a week an' she ain' no better.
Peter, welcome home, ole frien'.
Porgy, I advise you to send that girl to de countal hospital.
I won' let 'em take Bess to no hospital!
Mus' be you all forget how I pray Clara's baby out of the convulsions.
There ain' never been a sick person or corpse in Catfish Row
I refused my prayers.
You pray over her, sister.
You give your prayers.
Oh, doctor Jesus, who done trouble de water in de Sea of Galilee.
Amen!
Likewise who done cas' de devil out of de afflicted time an' time again.
Time an' time again.
Oh, doctor Jesus, how come you ain' lay yo' han' on dis po' sister head?
Oh, my father! Chase de devil out of her down the steep place into de sea like you used to do time an' time again.
Time an' time again.
Oh, my Jesus!
Lif' dis po' cripple up out of de dus'!
Allelujah!
An' lif' up his woman an' make her well time an' time again, time an' time again, an' save us all for Jesus sake,
Amen.
Amen.
Doctor Jesus has taken de case now, Porgy.
When the church bell strikes six your woman is goin' to be well.
No, no, don't!
Take your hands off me, I say!
Oh dey's so fresh an' fine
An' dey's jus' off de vine
Strawberries, strawberries, strawberries,
Oh, dey's so fresh an' fine
An' dey's just off de vine,
Strawberries, strawberries, strawberries,
I'm talkin' about devil crabs
1'm talkin' about devil crabs
I'm talkin' about de food I sells
Cheap crabs, cheap crabs!
Devil crabs!
Shh! On yo' way, brother.
I'm talkin' about de food I sells
When I done talkin' about de food I sells
Talkin' about devil crab.
Hey, crab man!
Good mornin', Maria
Give me three
I's talkin' about yo' pocketbook
Give me that one
I'm talkin' about devil crabs, and it looks like a nice good meal cheap crabs, cheap crabs!
I will take that one
Devil crab,
I'm talkin' about de food I sells.
Now de time, oh Gawd, now de time.
Porgy, Porgy,
Thank Gawd!
Thank Gawd, thank Gawd!
I been sick, ain't I?
You been very sick.
But now I got you back-
How long I been sick?
Over a week now.
You come back from Kittiwah with eyes like fireballs, an' Maria put you into bed, you didn' even know me.
What's de matter, Bess?
I guess I ain' know nuttin' wid de fever, or I ain' come back at all.
Dat's all right Honey,
I know you been with Crown.
How do you know?
Gawd give cripple to understan' much things he don' give strong men.
You don' want me to go away?
No, I don' want you to go away.
How things stan' between you an' Crown?
He's comin' for me when de cotton comes to town.
You goin'?
I tell 'im, yes.
I can' try to keep no woman who don't want to stay.
If you wants to go to Crown,
Dat's for you to say.
I don' want to, Porgy, but when I see him he's like he hypnotize me.
Then when he touches me
Bess, Bess
If dere warn't no Crown, if dere was only jus' you an' Porgy, what den?
I loves you, Porgy,
Don' let him take me,
Don' let him handle me an' drive me mad.
If you kin keep me,
I wants to stay here wid you forever,
An' I'd be glad.
There, there, Bess, you don' need to be afraid no mo',
You's picked up happiness and laid yo' worries down.
You goin' to live easy, you goin' to live high.
You goin' to outshine every woman in dis town.
An' remember, when Crown come that's my business!
Girl!
I loves you, Porgy,...
What you think I is, anyway,
To let another feller steal my woman?
If you wants to stay wid Porgy, you goin' stay.
You got a home now, Honey, an' you got love.
So no mo' cryin', can't you understan'?
You goin' to go about yo' business, singin' 'cause
You got Porgy,
You are my man!
You got a man!
Why you've been stayin' on the street near the water so long, Clara?
It's getting dark
I hate to think that Jake is out there when it's gettin' dark in th daytime
You got no cause to worry 'bout yo' man.
I've never seen de water look so black.
Just sittin' there waitin', an' holdin' its breath, waitin' for dat hurricane bell.
Hurricane bell!
Lawd chile, dere ain' goin' be no hurricane.
I'm gettin' ole now an' I have heared dat bell ring but fo' times in my life.
You go 'long to your baby now an' quiet down.
I'll be home soon
Come here, boys, take these chairs!
Clara, come on with me, child!
Come on
Clara, sing wid us, honey, don' you know, song make you forget yo' trouble.
An' lif' up dat burden of sorrow offen yo' heart.
I'm almos' lose my mind wid yo' singing
Got to sing praises to de Lawd,
Gabriel soun' dat trumpet de graveya'ds spew up de dead.
All we had storm befo',
I ain't so sure this is Judgment Day.
Well, anyhow, it ain' no time fo' takin' no chances.
One of dese mornings you goin' to rise up singin',
Den you'll spread yo wings an' you'll take de sky,
But till dat morning dere's a nothin' can harm you
Wid Daddy an' Mammy standin' by.
Lawd hab mercy on our soul.
What makes you so still, Bess,
You're not afraid, is you Honey?
I'm jus' thinkin', you know what
I'm thinkin' about?
You're thinkin' what dis storm mus' be like atramplin' over de sea islands,
The waves mus' be runnin' clean across Kittiwah.
An' nobody could live in a storm like this on that island.
I guess you got me for keeps, Porgy.
Oh, dere's somebody knockin' at de do',
Oh, dere's somebody knockin' at de do',
Oh, Mary,
Oh, Marta, dere's somebody knockin' at de do'.
I hear Death knockin' at de do'.
You didn' hear nothing, nobody does.
I hear Death knockin' at de do'.
Open de do', Mingo, an' show Peter dere ain' nobody dere.
You is a fine parcel of Christians!
Shut a friend out in a storm like dis!
Whose friend are you?
I'm yo' frien', Sister.
Oh, here's de woman I'm lookin' fo'.
Why don' you come an' say hello to yo' man?
I'm not your woman!
It's sho' time I was comin' back for you, sweet Bess
You ain't done much for yo'self while I been gone.
Ain' dere no whole ones left?
Keep yo' mouth off Porgy.
Woman, do you want to meet yo' Gawd?
Come here!
Porgy is my man now!
You call dat a man?
Woman,
I got de forgivin' nature an' I'm goin' to take you back.
Take yo' han' off me.
You better behave yo'self in dis storm!
Don' you know,
Gawd might strike you dead!
If Gawd want to kill me,
He had plenty of chance
'tween here an' Kittiwah Island.
Me an' Him havin' it out all de way from Kittiwah, firs' Him on top, den me on top.
There ain' nothin'
He likes better den a scrap wid a man.
Gawd an' me is frien'!
Dyo' hear dat? Gawd's laughin' at you!
Oh, de Lawd shake de Heavens an' de Lawd rock de groun'
Stop! I said shut up!
What are you tryin' to say?
What are you doin'?
Shut up!
I didn't come all the way from Kittiwah to sit up wid no corpses.
Dat s right, drown them out, don' let them sing.
How 'bout dis one, Big Frien'?
A red-headed woman makes a cho-choo jump its track.
A red-headed woman she can make it jump right back.
Oh, she's jus' nature's child,
She's got somethin' dat drives men wild.
A red-headed woman's gonna take you wedder you're White, yellow or black.
Show me the red-head that kin make a fool of me!
Oh, she ain' existin' on de lan' or on de sea.
Oh, you kin knock me down
If dey don't fall for Brudder Crown.
Oh, show me de redhead dat kin make a lousy fool of me.
Jake! Oh, Jake!
Oh, he's dead!
Bess, look for my baby till I come back!
Jake! Oh no!
Clara shouldn't to be out dere all by herself.
Somebody go to her!
Ain't dere no man here?
Yeah, where is a man?
Porgy, what you sittin' dere for?
Don't you hear yo' woman callin' for a man?
Looks to me like dere ain' only one man
'roun' here!
All right, I'm goin' out to get Clara, then I'm comin' back to get you.
All right, Big Frien', we's on for another bout!
Clara, Clara, don't you be downhearted,
Clara, Clara, don't you be sad an' lonesome.
Jesus is walkin' on de water.
Rise up an' follow Him home.
Oh, Lawd, oh my Jesus, rise up an' follow Him home. don't you be downhearted,
Jake, Jake, don't you be sad an' lonesome,
You low-lived skunk, ain' you got no shame, laughin' at them po' womens singin' for their mens los' in the storm !
I ain't see no sense in makin' such a fuss of a man that's already dead; when a woman loses her man dere's plenty men still livin' that like a nice lookin' gal.
I know it ain' dem gals you're after, an' you see, Bess ain't got no use for you, can't you see, Bess got a man?
I see more'n dat, good Sister,
I see she got two men.
What do you mean by dat?
Bess got two men?
Crown's dead ain't he?
I ain' tellin' you nothin', but when a gal's got one man, she got him for keeps, maybe but when she got two mens, there's apt to be a carvin', den de cops comes an' they takes de leavin's.
An' pretty soon she ain't got none.
Now you got that out,
Sportin' Life, cut it out!
I'm goin' to squash you like a bone
I'm goin' to squash you so flat that nobody will be able to triple you! get out over here!
Bess!
What do we are goin' to do with that poor motherless baby?
What do yo' mean, we?
I jus' mean, we!
Mus' be, Clara came back from the dead an say some to you I don' hear
I don' hear sayin' nothin' 'bout me
Nobody is goin' to give this child of proper christian raisen an' you ain' the one
What do yo' mean: I ain't the one?
Who said that?
Clara says, the baby says?
The baby don' say nothing to mean that.
He thinks already, I'm his mom.
Don' tell him, I ain't.
Please Serena, don' tell him, I ain't.
Bess was sick, you prayed for her to live
Let her live, Serena!
Summertime an' the livin' is easy,
Fish are jumpin' an 'the cotton is high.
Oh yo' daddy's rich an yo' ma is good lookin' so hush, little baby, don' you cry, Ah.
Crown, crown!
Come in! Come in!
There's a body like that,
What are you here around huntin' for death?
I ain't huntin' for death
I'm after my woman!
Leave alone, Crone!
She's fixed for life with Porgy now.
Why ain't you get out of here and give that girl a chance?
Take's a long time to learn my woman.
We're inverse! We've fight out all these past five years now.
Crown, if you are figurin' of doin' anythin' to her... Hush!
Jus' come how to see how Bess is after the hurricane.
She's allright.
That's all I wan' to know.
Porgy!
My man!
Good mornin', Maria!
Good mornin', Eddy!
Dirty dumb hurricane got no sense but to plough.
Wreck up the houses, mash up the windows
Hurricane get no sense at all!
The police waggons comin'!
See? Nobody lives here!
We'll put the widow through first.
Serena! Serena Robbins!
You come out here Serena Robbins, and make it damn quick!
Serena have been in her bed sick for three days an' I've been with her all de time.
You tell her if she don't come out here
I'll put her in the wagon and run her right in.
Serena Robbins, where were you last night?
I been sick in this bed for three days an' three nights.
An' we've been nursin' her all dat time.
Dat's de Gawd's truth.
Would you swear to that?
Yes, Sir, we swear to that.
There you are, an air-tight alibi.
Serena Robbins, you come down here!
Now just two months ago right here
Crown killed your husband, didn't he?
Actually you'll either talk here or in jail.
Did Crown kill you husband, yes or no?
We swear to dat, Sir.
And last night right here Crown got here, didn't he?
Goin' along, ain' dat gentleman say we got an "alabi"?
Was Crown killed here last night - yes or no?
We ain' see nuttin', Sir.
We been in dis room three days an' three nights an' de window been closed.
Serena!
You mean tell me the man who killed your husband was murdered in this court yarden, and you didn't know it?
We ain' see nuttin', Sir.
We been in dis room
Three days an' three nights.
An' de windows been closed.
You might as well argue with a parrot, you'll never break their story.
We'll try the the butcher over there.
Pretty good, that cleaver
How are you tonight?
Yo' good slice the sharper the knife.
What about a man?
Depends on the man!
Some men too tough to kill with a knife!
Yo' got to wapp off their head!
How about Crown?
Oh, he's a top with the deal
He is, huh?
Now, he was stepped, he was strangled and he was dumped into the ocean.
I wouldn't kill Crown!
Might make him a little sick
Crown is dead!
Well, what do yo' know?
What do you know, Maria?
Me?
I don' know nothin!
I'm the know-nothiest woman on catfish row!
I'm lovable an' when I'm down...
What we can do, is get somebody right there to identify the body.
I'll get you a witness for your inquest.
Step over here, I'll put the cripple through.
All right, come on out, both you beggars! step lively!
What's your name?
Porgy. You know me, Sir.
You see me on Meetin' Street.
Oh, of course - you're the goat man,
I didn't reckognize you without your wagon.
I'm the coroner, not a policeman.
Now this dead one, Crown, you knew him by sight, didn't you?
You'd know him if you saw him again?
Seems like I remember him, when he used to come here around.
Well, you're goin' to look at him again, right now. Come on!
Nothing to be afraid of.
All you've got to do is to view the body as a witness, and tell us who it is.
You mean, look at Crown's face...
That's all.
I would be the only man in that room?
Just you an' Crown, if you can still call him one.
Can I take somebody with me?
Can I take my wife?
You can't take nobody, not even yout goat.
Now get this...
I have summoned you an' you have to go. or you'll go to jail for contempt of court.
What I goin' to do?
Got to go, Porgy, maybe you can jus' make like yo' look at him, an' keep yo' eyes shut;
Only goin' to be a witness, that's all.
Ain't so sure about that.
All I know is that when the man that killed Crown walks in that room an' looks at him.
Crown's wound are goin' to  begin to bleed!
Jesus!
That's one sure way the cops come to know who killed him.
Can't look at Crown!
Gawd, what am I goin' do?
I ain' goin' look on Crown!
Then run, Porgy!
Run!
You'll look at Crown's face!
I won't look at Crown's face!
You'll look on Crown's face!
I won't look at Crown's face!
Oh, no!
They goin' a make him look on Crowns's face!
Sister, that cripple ain' goin' be no witness now.
They goin' lock him up in jail
Not for long, Sportin' Life!
Not for long.
Maybe one year, maybe two year, maybe--
No!
He look on Crown,
Crown's wound is goin' to bleed
An' when Porgy see that he goin' give himself away an' he's done for!
The detective will acome and take him, put him in jail.
You'll die of nerves!
No! Oh no!
But cheer up!
Oh no!
Cheer up!
Ole Sportin' Life's got de stuff that's goin' to scare away dem lonesome blues.
No, I ain' want none of dat stuff,
Take dat stuff away, I tell you!
I don't want it! I don't want it!
That's a stuff, ain' it?
An' remembuh, Bess, there's plenty more where that come from.
There's a boat dat's leavin' soon for New York.
Come wid me, dat's where we belong, sister.
You an' me can live dat high life in New York.
Come wid me, dere you can't go wrong, sister.
I'll buy you de swellest mansion
Up on upper Fi'th Avenue
An' through Harlem we'll go struttin',
We'll go astruttin',
An' dere'll be nuttin'
Too good for you.
I'll dress you in silks and satins
In de latest Paris styles.
And your blues you'll be forgettin',
You'll be forgettin',
There'll be no frettin'
Jes nothin' but smiles.
Come along wid me,
That's de place,
Don't be a fool, come along, come along!
There's a boat dat's leavin' soon for New York
Come wid me, dat's where we belong, sister,
Dat's where we belong!
Come on, Bess!
You 're a rattlesnake! That's what you are!
You're a rattlesnake!
An' I don' want anythin' with a dead eye here
You're a - a dirty stinkin' rattlesnake!
Don't want a second shot?
All right,
I'll leave it here, Bess.
Maybe you'll change yo' mind.
Good mornin'!
Mornin', Missy!
Good mornin', Serena!
It's Porgy!
Porgy's home!
Porgy, it's good to see you
What happened in the jail?
Yeah , Porgy?
Those folks didn' put nuthin' over on me.
They take me in a room with Crown.
I look on Crown's face.
You looked on Crown's face, Porgy?
I sure did!
An' his wound didn't bleed either.
I don' want you let on I'm home yet.
Scipio, go back an get me those luggage
I got a surprise for Bess.
Sweet Bess, an' I don' wants her to know,
'til I get ev'rything ready.
Thank you, Scipio
That's for you, boy.
Maria!
You get underneath dat, an' make all de bluejays an' de redbirds jealous.
Isn't it de style for my Bess though?
You know, she's one gal who always looks so good in red.
Look at that gut!
Hey, hey, ev'rybody;
I guess I'm de firs' man, who wen' to jail po' and came out rich;
All de time I got my little action with me, you know
An' I ran t'ru those crap-shootin' polecats like winds thru the trees!
Maria?
I know, de baby ain' big enough to wear anythin' like dis yet, he's growin'.
Isn't that nice?
Bess,
Bess, Porgy's home!
Wait till dat gal sees me.
Mingo,
Yes, Porgy, what is?
What's the matter with you?
Is sure, it's a funny welcome for a feller who's jus' got out of jail for  beein' in contemp' of court?
Ah, Serena!
Hello, Porgy!
You always sho' work fast.
Here I am gone a week, an' you come up wid a new baby.
Hey, dat's Bess' baby.
Where did you get it?
Where is Bess?
Where's my Bess?
Maria, where's Bess?
You tell me quick now
I told you, the woman is no good fo' you.
I ain' askin' yo' opinion.
Oh, Bess, oh where's my Bess,
Won't somebody tell me where?
I ain' care what she say,
I ain' care what she done, won't somebody tell me where's my Bess?
Bess,
Oh, Lawd,
My Bess!
I want her now,
Widout her I can't go on.
I counted de days dat I was gone
Till I got home to see her face.
Won't somebody tell me where's my Bess?
I want her so, my gal, my Bess, where is she?
Oh Gawd, in yo' big Heav'n please show me where I mus' go, oh give me de strength, show me de way!
Tell me de truth, where is she, where is my gal, where is my Bess!
She's is gone. Porgy.
An' dirty talks would make her believe you were locked up there, gone for the rest of your days.
And she believed him.
She got very low in mind. She's gone.
She was no good for you, Porgy. or she'd never gone away.
Now, you try to get about this.
Bess is dead?
She's worse than dead, Porgy,
She gave herself to de debbil, she's still livin', she's gone far away.
Alive, Bess is alive!
Where's she gone?
Noo York.
I hear you say Noo York.
Where's dat?
Thousand miles from here.
Which way Noo York?
It's way up North. is way pas' de custom house.
Bring my goat, Scipio!
Oh, what do you want with your goat, Porgy?
You bes' not go any place.
Hurry boy, bring my goat!
You'd better stay wid yo' frien', Porgy,
Bring the goat. - You'll be happy here.
Bring my goat, Scipio!
You won't find her, Porgy!
For the Lord's sake, Porgy, where are you goin'?
Where are you goin' Porgy?
Ain't you say
Bess gone to Noo York?
Dat's where I goin',
I got to be wid Bess.
Gawd help me to fin' her.
I'm on my way.
Bless you, honey!
Good luck, Porgy!
Oh Lawd,
I'm on my way.
I'm on my way to a Heav'nly Lan',
I'll ride dat long, long road.
If You are there to guide my han'.
Oh Lawd,
I'm on my way.
I'm on my way to a Heav'nly Lan'-
Oh Lawd.
It's a long, long way, but You'll be there to take my han'.
Oh Lawd.
I'm on my way
I'm on my way to a Heav'nly Lan'-
Oh Lawd.
I'm on my way! an' You'll be there to take my han'!
Subtitles made by Thomas765
There's a bright golden haze on the meadow
There's a bright golden haze on the meadow
The corn is as high as an elephant's eye
And it looks like it's climbin' clear up to the sky
Oh, what a beautiful morning
Oh, what a beautiful day
I got a beautiful feeling
Everything's goin' my way
All the sounds of the earth are like music
All the sounds of the earth are like music
The breeze is so busy it don't miss a tree
And a ol' weepin' willer is laughin' at me
Oh, what a beautiful morning
Oh, what a beautiful day
I got a beautiful feeling
Everything's goin' my way
Oh, what a beautiful day
- Hi, Aunt Eller!
- Don't scare me to death.
- What you doin' around here?
- I come a-singin' to you.
Oh, what a beautiful morning
Oh, what a beautiful day
I got a beautiful feeling
Everything's goin' my way
If I wasn't an old woman, and if you wasn't so young and smart-alecky, why, I'd marry you and get you to sit around at night and sing to me.
No, you wouldn't neither, 'cause I wouldn't marry you nor none of your kinfolk.
- If I could help it.
- Oh, none of my kinfolks, huh?
And you can tell 'em that too. All of 'em.
Including that niece of your'n, Miss Laurey Williams.
Who you takin' to the box social tonight?
I ain't thought much about it yet.
- Bet you come over to ask Laurey.
- What if I did?
You askin' me too?
I'll wear my fascinator.
- Yeah, you too.
- Yeah, yeah.
Oh, what a beautiful morning
Oh, what a beautiful day
I thought you were somebody.
I got a beautiful feeling
Everything's goin' my way
Is this all that's come a-callin' at already 8:00 this Saturday morning?
You knowed it was me before you opened the door.
- No such of a thing.
- Well, you did too.
You heared my voice.
You knowed it was me.
I heared someone singing like a bullfrog in a pond.
You knowed it was me, so you set in there, thinkin' up something mean to say.
I'm a good mind not to ask you to the box social.
- Oh, you two.
- If you asked me, I wouldn't go with you.
Besides, how'd you take me?
You ain't bought a new buggy with red wheels onto it, have you?
No, I ain't.
A spankin' team with their bridles all a-jinglin'?
No.
Expect me to ride on behind ol' Blue I guess.
You better ask that old Cummings girl you took such a shine to.
If I was to ask you, Miss Laurey smarty, there'd be a way to take ya.
Oh, there would?
How'd we get there?
When I take you out tonight with me
Honey, here's the way it's gonna be
You will set behind a team of snow-white horses
In the slickest gig you ever see
Chicks and ducks and geese better scurry
When I take you out in the surrey
When I take you out in the surrey with the fringe on top
Watch that fringe and see how it flutters
When I drive them high-steppin' strutters
Nosy pokes'll peek through their shutters
And their eyes'll pop
The wheels are yeller the upholstery's brown
The dashboard's genuine leather
With isinglass curtains you can roll right down
In case there's a change in the weather
Two bright sidelights winkin' and blinkin'
Ain't no finer rig I'm a-thinkin'
You can keep your rig if you're thinkin'
That I'd "keer" to swap
For that shiny little surrey with the fringe on the top
Would you say the fringe was made of silk
Wouldn't have no other kind but silk
Has it really got a team of snow-white horses
One's like snow
The other's more like milk
All the world will fly in a flurry
When I take you out in the surrey
When I take you out in the surrey with the fringe on top
When we hit that road hell for leather
Cats and dogs'll dance in the heather
Birds and frogs'll sing all together
And the toads will hop
The wind'll whistle as we rattle along
The cows'll moo in the clover
The river will ripple out a whispered song
And whisper it over and over
(SOFTLY) Don't you wish you'd go on forever
Don't you wish you'd go on forever
Don't you wish you'd go on forever
And it'd never stop
In that shiny little surrey with the fringe on the top
You'd sure feel like a queen settin' up in that carriage.
Only she talked to me so mean a while back,
- I'm a good mind not to take her.
- I ain't said I was goin'.
- Well, I ain't asked ya.
- Where'd you get such a rig at?
I'll bet he's went and hired a rig over at Claremore, thinkin' I'd go with him.
I did not hire it. I made the whole thing up out of my head.
- What? Made it up?
- Dashboard and all.
Get off the place, you!
Aunt Eller, make him get hisself out of here! Tellin' me lies.
Now hold on. Makin' up a few "purties" ain't agin no law I know of.
Besides, don't you wish there was such a rig though?
You could go to the play party and do a hoedown till morning if you was a mind to.
Then when you was all wore out, why, I'd just lift you onto the surrey, jump up alongside you, and we'd just point the horses home.
I can just picture the whole thing.
I can see the stars gettin' blurry
When we ride back home in the surrey
Ridin' slowly home in the surrey
With the fringe on top
I can feel the day gettin' older
Feel a sleepy head near my shoulder
Noddin', droopin' close to my shoulder
Till it falls, kerplop
The sun is swimmin' on the rim of a hill
The moon is takin' a header
And just as I'm thinkin' all the earth is still
A lark'll wake up in the medder
Hush, you bird my baby's a-sleepin'
Maybe got a dream worth a-keepin'
Whoa, you team and just keep a-creepin'
At a slow clip-clop
Don't you hurry with the surrey
With the fringe
On the
Top
- Only... Only there ain't no such rig.
- Well...
Why'd you come around here with your stories and your lies, gettin' me all worked up?
Who'd wanna ride alongside of you anyway?
Why don't you grab her and kiss her when she acts that a-way, Curly?
- She's just aching for you to, I bet.
- I won't even speak to him, let alone allow him to kiss me... the braggin', bowlegged, wished-he'd-had-a-sweetheart bum!
She likes you quite a lot.
She liked me any more, she'd sic the dogs onto me.
- Hello, Jud.
- Hello, yourself.
Listen, who's the low filthy sneak
Laurey's got her cap set for?
- You.
- Never mind that.
There must be plenty of men a-tryin' to spark her.
- Plenty.
- What about him?
Oh, she wouldn't take up with a fella like that, that bullet-colored, growly hired hand.
Now, don't you go say nothin' agin Jud.
Best hired hand I ever had.
Just about runs the farm by hisself.
Well, two women couldn't do it.
You oughta know 'at.
He's around all the time, ain't he?
Takes his meals with you and sleeps down in the smokehouse.
I changed my mind about cleaning the henhouse today.
I gotta quit early 'cause I'm driving
Laurey to the party tonight.
- You're driving Laurey?
- I asked her.
Well, wouldn't that just make you bawl?
Don't forget, Aunt Eller. You and me still got a date together.
How we going, Curly, in that rig you made up?
That there ain't no made-up rig, you hear?
I done hired it over to Claremore.
- Why don't you go with him?
- I can't. I promised Jud.
Why ever did you?
'Cause Curly's too fresh and too bigheaded, waitin' till the last minute to ask me.
Aunt Eller, are you really going with Curly tonight?
I sure am. You didn't want him.
But you could go with me and Jud.
You picked your feller,
I picked mine.
That's the way you want it, ain't it?
You're sure a pair.
Crazy young'uns.
Time I started for the station.
Hey, Curly. Tell all the folks to stop by here on their way to the Skidmore party to freshen up.
I will, Aunt Eller. You see you got your beauty spots fastened on proper, so as you won't lose them off, you hear?
That's a right smart turnout.
Ain't no finer rig I'm a-thinkin'
That I'd keer to swap
For that shiny little surrey
With the fringe on the top
Aunt Eller!
Lookin' for me?
Gonna be a nice evenin' for the party.
- Jud.
- What?
I don't think I can...
You ain't figurin' on goin' with someone else, are you?
Well, I...
Laurey!
I'll come by for you along around about sundown.
What'd you do up at the fair, Will? Bust any bones?
Aw, too smart for that. Just made sure I landed on my head.
- Will Parker.
- Hi, Aunt Eller.
If you ain't got them fancy lanterns for the Skidmore party,
- get back on that train.
- (LAUGHS)
- Here you are.
- You do any good in the steer ropin', Will?
Oh, I did pretty good.
I won prize money.
- That's my boy.
- I've got to get over to Ado Annie's.
Her pa said I could have her if'n I was ever worth $50.
And I got that $50.
If Annie's pa keeps his promise, we'll be dancin' at your wedding.
If'n he don't, I'll take her right from under his nose.
Besides which, I won't give him the present I brung for him.
Looky here, fellas, what I got for Ado Annie's pa.
Excuse us, Aunt Eller. You hold it up to your eye like this, see.
Then when you get a good look, you turn it around at the top and the picture changes.
- Well, I'll be "sidegated."
- They call it the Little Wonder.
Silly goats!
The hussy!
Ought to be ashamed of herself.
You too. How do you turn the thing to see the other picture?
- Right at the top, Aunt Eller.
- Wait, I'm gettin' it.
I'm a good mind to tell Annie on you.
Bet you carried on plenty in Kansas City.
Well, I sure did see a lot of things I never did see before.
I got to Kansas City on a Friday
By Saturday I learned a thing or two
'Cause up to then
I didn't have an idy
Of what the modren world was comin' to
I counted 20 gas buggies goin' by theirselves
Almost every time I took a walk
And then I put my ear to a Bell telephone
And a strange woman started in to talk
- To you
- What next
- Yeah, what
- What next
Everything's up to date in Kansas City
They've gone about as "fur" as they can go
They went and built a skyscraper seven stories high
'Bout as high as a buildin' oughta grow
Everything's like a dream in Kansas City
It's better than a magic lantern show
You can turn the radiator on whenever you want some heat
With every kind of comfort every house is all complete
You can walk to privies in the rain and never wet your feet
They've gone about as fur as they can go
Yes, sir
They've gone about as fur as they can go
Everything's up to date in Kansas City
They've gone about as fur as they can go
They got a big theater they call a bur-lee-que
- For 50 cents you can see a dandy show
- Gals
- One of the gals is fat and pink and pretty
- Aha!
As round above as she was round below
I could swear that she was padded from her shoulder to her heel
And then she started dancin' and her dancin' made me feel
That every single thing she had was absolutely real
She went about as fur as she could go
Yes, sir
She went about as fur as she could go
- What you doin', Will?
- Well, this is called a two-step.
That's all they're dancing nowadays.
Why, the waltz is through.
Of course, they don't do it alone. Come on, Aunt Eller!
- Oh, that's about as fur as I can go
- Yes, sir
And that's about as fur as she can go
- What you doing now, Will?
- Well, this here's called ragtime.
I seen a couple actors doin' it.
- Don't like it.
- Oh, Will, I do!
Still don't like it.
Come on, Aunt Eller, do-si-do!
Hey, ha, pick it up!
Hey! Ha ha!
- Hyah!
- Ho!
- Ha!
- Yahoo!
Hey there, Will Parker!
Come back here!
- (BELL RINGING)
- (TRAIN WHISTLE BLOWING)
- GIRLS: Oh!
- (BELL RINGING)
Ado Annie, I could ride with you like this to the end of the world.
Please, Mr. Hakim, don't start talkin' purty.
Laurey! Yoo-hoo! Laurey!
Whoa!
Laurey!
- Hello, Laurey.
- What you doing with that peddler-man?
- Will Parker gets back today.
- Will Parker. Oh, foot.
- I didn't count on today being Saturday.
- I can see that.
My, oh, my, Miss Laurey!
"Jippity" crickets.
Last time I come through here, you was teeny like a shrimp with freckles.
Now look on you.
Quit a-bitin' me! If you ain't had no breakfast, go eat yourself a green apple.
Are you coming in or going out?
Standing still while you're here.
Go up to the house and wait.
It'll be no trouble at all to wait right here.
So much water.
Why don't we all take a swim together?
In Persia, where I come from, bathing is a social event.
- Well, this ain't Persia!
- I can already see you two young ladies in those beautiful
Persian bathing suits.
What do they wear when they bathe socially in Persia?
- Nothing.
- Nothing. Oh!
The peddler-man's gonna drive me to the box social.
I got up sort of a tasty lunch.
But you're promised to Will Parker, ain't ya?
Oh, ain't what you might say, promised. I just told him maybe.
Don't you like Will no more?
Of course I do. There won't never be nobody like Will.
Then what about this peddler-man?
Oh, there won't never be nobody like him neither.
Well, you gotta make up your mind.
Which one do you like the best?
- Well, whatever one I'm with.
- Well, you are a silly.
Well, now, Laurey, you know that nobody paid me no mind up till this year on account I was scrawny and flat as a beanpole.
But then I kinda rounded up a little
- and now the boys act different to me.
- What's wrong with that?
Nothing's wrong. I like it!
I like it so much when a fella talks pretty to me,
I get all shaky from horn to hoof.
- Don't you?
- Can't think what you're talking about.
Don't you feel kinda sorry for a fella when he looks like he wants to kiss ya?
Well, you can't just go around kissing every man that asks ya.
Didn't anyone tell you that?
Yeah, they told me.
It ain't so much a question
Of not knowin' what to do
I knowed what's right and wrong since I been 10
I heared a lot of stories
And I reckon they are true
About how girls are put upon by men
I know I mustn't fall into the pit
But when I'm with a feller
I fergit
I'm just a girl who cain't say no
I'm in a terrible fix
I always say come on, let's go
Just when I oughta say nix
When a person tries to kiss a girl
I know she oughta give his face a smack
But as soon as someone kisses me
I somehow sorta wanna kiss him back
I'm just a fool when lights are low
I cain't be prissy and quaint
I ain't the type that can faint
How can I be what I ain't
I cain't
Say no
What you gonna do when a fella gets flirty
And starts to talk purty
What you gonna do
Supposin' that he says that your lips are like cherries
Or roses or berries
What you gonna do
Supposin' that he says that you're sweeter 'an cream
And he's gotta have cream or die
What you gonna do when he talks that way
Spit in his eye
I'm just a girl who cain't say no
Kissing's my favorite food
With or without the mistletoe
I'm in a holiday mood
Other girls are coy and hard to catch
But other girls ain't havin' any fun
Every time I lose a wrestlin' match
I have a funny feelin' that I won
Though I can feel the undertow
I never make a complaint
Till it's too late for restraint
Then when I want to I cain't
I cain't
Say
No
It's like I told you, Laurey,
I get sorry for 'em.
It's like I told you, Laurey,
I get sorry for 'em.
And now that old Will has to come home.
First thing you know, he'll start talking pretty to me and changing my mind back.
- But Will wants to marry you.
- So does Ali Hakim.
- Did he ask you about marryin'?
- Not directly.
But how I know this, he said this morning that he wanted for me to ride with him to the end of the world.
Well, if we drove only as far as "Catoosy," he couldn't bring me home till morning, and that means a wedding, don't it?
Not to a peddler, it don't.
I've been waiting for you to show your face again, old peddler-man.
Remember what you told me?
You said that eggbeater you sold me would beat up eggs wring out dishrags, turn the ice cream freezer and I don't know what all.
Now, Aunt Eller, just listen.
Don't you Aunt Eller me, you little wart. I'm mad.
If the eggbeater don't work, I give you something just as good. A present.
I wouldn't have it.
- What is it?
- Real silk. Made in Persia.
What would I do with an old Persian garter?
It looks pretty.
Now gimme the other one.
Which one? Oh, you want to buy this one to match that one?
What do you mean do I wanna buy it?
I can let you have it for 50 cents.
Do you want me to get that eggbeater and ram it down your windpipe?
- Gimme that.
- Howdy, Aunt Eller.
- Hi, yourself.
- Now that all the ladies are here, let me show you some pretty "doodaddles."
Lace around the bottom and there are bows running in and out.
Well, I never wear 'em myself, but I sure do like to look at 'em.
How about these?
Yeah, they's all right if you ain't goin' no place.
Don't nobody want to buy something?
How about you, Miss Laurey?
You must be wanting something, a pretty young girl like you.
Me? Of course I want something.
I want a buckle made out of shiny silver to fasten onto my shoes.
I want a dress with lace. I want perfume. I want to be purty.
- I wanna smell like a honeysuckle vine.
- Give her a cake of soap.
I want things
I can't tell you about.
Not only things to look at and hold in your hand, but things to happen to you, things so nice that if they ever did happen to you, your heart would quit beating.
I got a-just the thing.
The elixir of Egypt.
A secret formula, belong to pharaoh's daughter.
- Smellin' salts.
- But a special kind of smelling salts.
Here, read what it says on the label.
You take a deep breath, and you see everything clear.
That's what pharaoh's daughter used to do when she had to decide what dress to wear or which prince she ought to marry.
She would take a whiff of this.
- I'll take a bottle of that, Mr. Peddler.
- Oh, precious stuff.
- How much?
- Two bits.
- Throwin' away your money.
- Helps you decide what to do.
Put your trappings away and come inside.
Come along, Laurey. Maybe we can find him something to eat and drink.
Ali, Laurey and me been having an argument.
- About what, baby?
- About what you meant when you said that about drivin' with me to the end of the world.
Well, I didn't really mean to the end of the world.
Well, then how far did you wanna go?
About as far as say... Claremore.
- What's at Claremore?
- The hotel.
In front is a veranda, inside is the lobby and upstairs, baby, might be paradise.
I thought they's just bedrooms.
For you and me, baby, paradise.
You see, I knowsed I was right.
You do wanna marry me.
- Don'tcha?
- Oh, Ado Annie... What did you say?
I said you do wanna marry me, don'tcha? What'd you say?
I didn't say nothing.
MAN: Ya-hoo!
Oh, foot, just when...
That's Will Parker.
Promise me you won't fight him!
Ado Annie! How's my honey bunch?
How's the sweetest little 120 pounds of sugar in the territory?
Will, this is Ali Hakim.
Hiya, Hak!
Don't mind the way I talk.
It's all right.
I'm gonna marry her.
- Marry her? On purpose?
- No such other thing!
It's a wonderful thing to be married.
- I got a brother in Persia got six wife.
- Six wives all at once?
Why sure. That's the way they do it in them countries.
Not always. I got another brother in Persia only got one wife.
He's a bachelor.
You know what I got for first prize at the fair?
- Fifty dollars.
- Oh, well, that was good.
- Fifty dollars.
- You catch on?
Your pa promised I could marry you if'n I could ever get $50 together all at one time.
That's right. He did.
Your pa's like all the rest of them farmers.
Don't think us cowboys got much sense.
Well, this'll show him. You know what I done with the $50?
- I spent it all on presents for you.
- Oh!
But if you spent it, you ain't got no cash.
What I got's worth more than cash.
The fella that sold me the stuff told me.
- But, Will...
- Stop saying "But, Will."
When do I get a little kiss?
Oh, Ado Annie, honey, you ain't been off my mind since I left, all the time at the fairgrounds even when I was chasing them steers.
I'd rope one under the hoofs, and I'd pull him up real sharp, and he'd land on his little old rump and then I'd think of you.
Don't start talkin' purty.
See'd a lot of pretty girls in Kansas
City. I didn't give one a look.
How could you see 'em if you didn't give 'em a look?
I mean, I didn't look lovin' at them, the way I look at you.
Oh, Will, please don't look like that. I cain't bear it.
Oh, Will, please don't look like that. I cain't bear it.
I won't stop looking like this till you give me a little ol' kiss.
Oh, well, what's a little old kiss?
Nothin', less'n it comes from you.
Oh, you, you do talk purty.
No! I won't!
Supposin' that I say that your lips are like cherries
Or roses or berries
What you gonna do
Can't you feel my heart palpitatin' and bumpin'
A-waitin' for somethin'
Somethin' nice from you
I gotta get a kiss and it's gotta be quick
Or I'll jump in a creek and die
What's a girl to do when you talk that way
Must be the folks stopping on their way to Skidmore's. Oh!
Oh, you're all welcome!
Glad you could all come.
Everybody come in and have a good time.
Curly!
I've been 'bout behind you the whole way.
I know. I heared you.
Oh, welcome. Everybody's welcome.
Oh, what a beautiful morning
Oh, what a beautiful morning
Oh, what a beautiful day
I got a beautiful feeling
Everything's goin' my way
Oh, what a beautiful day
Girls, come on in the house and freshen up.
You boys, better drive your wagons down to the trough and give your horses some water.
Hi, Laurey.
Hey, Curly, don't you reckon you better take care of your horses too?
Thanks, Aunt Eller.
I reckon I better.
Oh, can't I come too, Curly? I just love to watch the way you handle horses.
It's about all
I can handle, I guess.
Another mile in that buggy with that
Perkins boy, and I'd have lost my mind.
I'll take Wilbur if you don't want him.
Looks like Curly's took up with that Cummings girl.
What do I care about that?
Why should a woman who is healthy and strong
Blubber like a baby if her man goes away
A-weepin' and a-wailin' how he's done her wrong
That's one thing you'll never hear me say
Never gonna think that the man I lose ls the only man among men
I'll snap my fingers to show I don't care
I'll buy me a brand-new dress to wear
I'll scrub my neck
And I'll brush my hair
And start all over again
Many a new face will please my eye
Many a new love will find me
Never have I once looked back to sigh
Over the romance behind me
Many a new day will dawn before I do
Many a light lad may kiss and fly
A kiss gone by is bygone
Never have I asked an August sky
Where has last July gone
Never have I wandered through the rye
Wondering where has some guy gone
Many a new day will dawn before I do
Many a new face will please my eye
Many a new love will find me
Never have I once looked back to sigh
Over the romance behind me
Many a new day will dawn before I do
Never have I chased the honeybee
Who carelessly cajoled me
Somebody else just as sweet as he
Cheered me and consoled me
Never have I wept into my tea
Over the deal someone doled me
Many a new day will dawn
Many a red sun will set
Many a blue moon will shine
Before I do
Many a new face will please my eye
Many a new love will find me
Never have I once looked back to sigh
Over the romance behind me
Many a new day will dawn
Many a red sun will set
Many a blue moon will shine
Before...
Many a blue moon will shine
Before I
Do
Maurice, time we got out of here.
Back to the open road.
The open road
Ali. Ali, I'm sure sorry to see you lookin' so happy
'cause what I got to say will make you miserable.
- I gotta marry Will.
- Oh, well, that sure is sad news for me.
Well, he's a fine fellow.
Don't hide your feelings, Ali!
I can't bear it.
I'd rather have you come right out and say your heart's busted in two.
- Are you positive you got to marry Will?
- Sure as shootin'!
There's no chance for you to change your mind?
No chance.
All right then. My heart is busted in two.
- Hello, Pa. What you been shootin'?
- Rabbits.
That true what I hear about
Will Parker getting $50?
That's right, Pa. He wants to hold you to your promise.
Too bad. Still in all,
I can't go back on my word.
Listen to me, Annie, I advise you to get that money before he loses it all.
Put it in your stocking or inside your corset, where he can't get at it...
Or can he?
But, Pa, he ain't exactly kept it.
He spent it all on presents.
See, what did I tell ya?
Well, now he can't have you.
- I said it had to be $50 cash!
- Is that fair, Mr. Carnes?
- Who the devil are you?
- Oh, Pa, that's Ali Hakim.
Well, shut your face, or I'll fill your behind so full of buckshot, you'll be walking around like a duck the rest of your life.
Ali, if I don't have to marry Will, maybe your heart don't have to be busted in two like you said.
- I did not say that.
- Oh, yes, you did.
No, no, I did not.
Are you trying to make my daughter out to be a liar?
No, I'm only trying to make clear to you what a liar I am, if she is telling the truth.
- What else you been sayin' to my daughter?
- Oh! An awful lot.
- When?
- Last night in the moonlight.
- Where?
- Alongside a haystack.
- Oh, listen, Mr. Carnes.
- I'm listenin'. What else did you say?
- He called me his Persian kitten.
- What'd you call her that fer?
- I don't remember.
- I do. He said I's like a Persian kitten
'cause they is the cats with the soft, round tails.
That's enough. In this country, that better be a proposal of marriage.
- That's what I thought.
- That what you think?
- Look, Mr. Carnes...
- I'm lookin'. I'm lookin'.
I'm no good. I'm a peddler!
A peddler has to travel up and down and all around.
You'd hardly ever see your daughter no more.
That'd be all right.
Just take care of her, son.
- Just take care of my little rosebud.
- Oh, Pa, 'at's purty.
You sure for certain you can bear to let me go?
- Are you sure, Mr. Carnes?
- You just try to change my mind.
Aw, Ali, ain't it wonderful,
Pa making up our minds for us?
And he won't change neither.
Once he gives his word that you can have me, you've got me!
I know I got you.
Mrs. Ali Hakim, the peddler's bride!
Oh, wait till I tell those girls!
Laurey! Laurey!
The peddler-man and me's gonna get married!
Congratulations.
I hope we'll be very happy.
Hi, Laurey. What you doin'?
Gonna pick peaches. What you doin'?
(GIGGLES) I peeked in your basket up at the house.
I see you got gooseberry tarts too.
I wonder if they's as light as mine.
Mine would like to float away if you blew on them.
I just did blow on one of mine, and it broke into a million pieces.
Ain't she funny? (LAUGHS)
Oh!
- Stop that!
- (INDISTINCT ARGUING)
- Stop it!
- Gertie!
Go on up the house and cool off!
Get along! Mind!
Don't forget tonight at the auction,
Curly, mine's the biggest hamper!
So that's that old Cummings gal I heared so much talk of.
- You seen her before, ain't ya?
- But not since she got so old.
Never did see anybody get so peaked-lookin' in such a short time.
Yeah. Says she's 18.
Ha! Bet she's 19.
Are you really gonna drive to the box social with that Jud fella?
- I reckon so. Why?
- Oh, nothing.
It's just that everybody seems to expect me to take you.
Then maybe it's just as well you ain't!
We don't want people talkin' about us, do we?
Do you think people really do talk about us?
Well, you know how they are, like a swarm of mud wasps, always gotta be buzzing about something.
What are they saying, that you're stuck on me?
Most of the talk is that you're stuck on me.
Can't imagine how these ugly rumors start.
Me, neither.
Me, neither.
Why do they think up stories that link my name with yours
Why do the neighbors gossip all day behind their doors
I know a way to prove what they say is quite untrue
Here is the gist a practical list
Of don'ts
For you
Don't throw
Bouquets at me
Don't please
My folks too much
Don't laugh
At my jokes too much
People will say we're in love
Who laughs at your jokes?
Don't sigh
And gaze at me
Your sighs
Are so like mine
Your eyes
Mustn't glow like mine
People will say we're in love
Don't start
Collecting things
Like what?
Give me my rose and my glove
Sweetheart
They're suspecting things
People will say
We're in
Love
Some people claim that you are to blame
As much as I
Why do you take the trouble to bake
My favorite pie
Grantin' your wish
I carved our initials
On that tree
Just keep a slice of all the advice
You give so free
Don't praise
My charm too much
Don't look
So vain with me
Don't stand
In the rain with me
People will say we're in love
Don't take
My arm too much
Don't keep
Your hand in mine
Your hand
Feels so grand in mine
People will say we're in love
Don't dance
All night with me
Till the stars fade from above
They'll see
It's all right with me
People will say
We're in
Love
Don't you think you could tell that Jud fella you'd rather go with me tonight?
Curly...
No, I couldn't.
Oh, you couldn't.
Think I'll go down to the smokehouse where Jud's at.
See what's so elegant about him, makes all the girls want to go to parties with him.
- Curly!
- What?
Nothin'.
Well, open it, can't you?
Well, what do you want?
Oh, I... I done got through with my business up there at the house.
I just thought I'd pay a call.
- You got a gun, I see.
- That's right.
It's a Colt .45.
Oh.
Say, now.
That there pink picture...
That's a naked woman, ain't it?
Plumb stark naked as a jaybird.
Shucks, that ain't a thing to what I could show you.
Well, that's a good-lookin' rope.
Feels good too.
That's a good, strong hook you got there, Jud.
You know what? You could hang yourself on that.
- I could what?
- You could hang yourself.
Yes, sir. Easy as rollin' off a log.
Why, in five minutes or less, with good luck,
- you could be dead as a doornail.
- What do you mean by that?
Oh, then folks would come to your funeral.
- And they'd sing sad songs.
- (SCOFFS)
Why, they would.
You never know how many people like you till you're dead.
You'd be laid out in a parlor.
All decked out in your best suit.
Your hair combed down slick, high starched collar.
Lots of pretty flowers all around you.
Would there be flowers, you think?
And palms too, all around your coffin.
Folks would gather round, and men would bare their heads.
Women would sniffle softly.
Some probably even faint, ones that took a shine to you whilst you was alive.
Now, what women ever took a shine to me?
Why, lots of women.
Only they never come right out and tell you how they feel, unless you die first.
I guess maybe you're right.
They'd sure sing loud, though, when the singin' would start.
Sing like their hearts would break.
Poor Jud is dead
Poor Jud Fry is dead
All gather round his coffin now and cry
He had a heart of gold
And he wasn't very old
Oh, why did such a fella have to die
Poor Jud is dead
Poor Jud Fry is dead
He's lookin', oh, so peaceful and serene
And serene
He's all laid out to rest
With his hands across'd his chest
His fingernails have never been so clean
And then the preacher'd get up, and he'd say...
Folks, we are gathered here to moan and groan over our brother Jud Fry
Who hung hisself up by a rope in a smokehouse
And then there'd be weepin' and wailin' from some of those women.
And then he'd say...
Jud was the most misunderstood man in this territory
People used to think he was a mean, ugly fella
And call him a dirty skunk and ornery pig stealer
But the folks that really knowed him
Knowed that beneath them two dirty shirts he always wore
There beat a heart as big as all outdoors
As big as all outdoors
Jud Fly loved his fellow man
He loved his fellow man
He loved the birds of the forests
And the beasts of the field
He loved the mice and the vermin in the barn
And he treated the rats like equals
Which was right.
He loved all the little children
He loved everything and everybody in the world
Only...
Only he never let on.
So nobody ever knowed it.
Poor Jud is dead
Poor Jud Fry is dead
His friends will weep and wail for miles around
Miles around
The daisies in the dell
Will give out a different smell
Because poor Jud is underneath the ground
Poor Jud is dead
A candle lights his head
He's layin' in a coffin made of wood
Wood
And folks are feelin' sad
'Cause they used to treat him bad
And now they know their friend has gone for good
Good
Poor Jud is dead
A candle lights his head
He'd lookin' oh, so pretty and so nice
He looks like he's asleep
It's a shame that he won't keep
But it's summer
And we're runnin' out of ice
Poor
Jud
Poor
Jud
(CHUCKLES) Yes, sir.
That sure will be an interesting funeral.
I wouldn't like to miss it.
Well, maybe you will.
Maybe you'll go first.
Well, let's see now.
Where'd you work at before you come up here?
Was up by Quapaw, wasn't it?
That's right.
Lousy they was to me too.
Always makin' out they were better than I was.
Always treating me like I was dirt.
So, what'd you do? Get even?
Who said anything about getting even?
No one I recollect.
Just come into my head.
If it come to gettin' even with somebody, I'd know how to do it.
You remember the fire in the
Bartlett farm over by Sweetwater?
I sure do.
It was about five years ago.
Burned up the father and the mother and the daughter.
It was a terrible accident.
That weren't no accident.
Fella told me.
Said that the hired hand was stuck on the Bartlett girl and one day he found her in the hayloft with another fella.
And 'twas him that burned the place?
Took him weeks to get the kerosene, buying it at different times.
Fella that told me, he made out like it happened in Missouri, but I knew all the time it was the Bartlett farm.
What a liar he was.
Get a little air in here.
You ain't told me yet what business you had here.
We got no cattle to sell and no cow ponies.
Could be only one other thing on this farm you could want and it better not be that.
- That's just what it is.
- You keep away from her, you hear?
You know, somebody ought to tell Laurey just what kind of a man you are.
And for that matter, somebody ought to tell you once about yourself.
Curly, you better get out of here.
In this country, there's just two things you can do if you're a man.
You can live outdoors is one, and you can live in a hole is the other.
I set by my horse in the brush somewheres and I heared a rattlesnake many a time.
(IMITATES RATTLESNAKE) He'd go...
Scared to death somebody gonna step on him.
- Got his old fangs all ready.
- Curly, you better get out of here!
How did you get to be the way you are anyhow?
Sittin' in here in this filthy hole.
Why don't you do something healthy once in a while,
'stead of stayin' shut up here, a-crawlin' and festerin'?
- (DOG BARKING)
- (CHICKENS CLUCKING)
Well.
You ought to feel better now.
I wish you'd let me show you something.
There's a knothole over there, about as big as a dime.
You see it a-winkin'?
Right through the knothole.
Slick as a whistle.
Who fired off a gun?
Was that you, Curly?
Well, I... I shot once.
Well, what was you shooting at?
- Knotholes.
- Well, ain't you a pair of pretty nothings, a-peckin' away at knotholes and scarin' everybody to death. Well!
What happened, Aunt Eller?
What happened?
Nobody hurt. Just a pair of fools swappin' noises.
Oh, excuse. Excuse.
Mind if I visit with you gents?
I got a few pretties to show you.
Private knickknacks, special for the menfolk.
Not me. I gotta shine up that surrey I done hired for tonight.
Laurey promised to go with me and she better not change her mind.
She better not!
Now, take a look at those.
Straight from Paris.
- You got a frog-sticker?
- You mean one of them long knives?
I tell you what I'd like better.
You know them things called a Little Wonder?
You hold it up to your eye. You look through it. You see pictures.
You say to a fella, "Come here.
Look through here."
And when he's lookin' through it, you press a little jigger on the end... and out snaps a blade, and then bang.
Down you come.
A good joke to play on a friend.
No, I don't have no things like that. Too dangerous.
Here, take a look at these postcards.
I'm sick of them things.
I want me a real woman.
I'm tired of all these pictures of women.
Well, throw them away.
Buy some new ones.
If you get tired of a woman, what can you do?
Nothing. You just keep getting tireder and tireder.
I've made up my mind.
Oh, say, you know a girl named Ado Annie?
- I don't want her.
- I don't want her either, but I got her.
Ain't you done your basket yet?
Lands, you ain't even dressed.
I believe you got something worryin' on your mind.
Aunt Eller, I want everything to stay just the way it is.
Well, won't it?
I like living the way we do.
I like the looks of the prairie outside my window, and the thicket where the possums live, and the way we set round in the evenings in thrashing time, eatin' mush melons and a-singin', and...
Oh, lots of things.
Why should any of that have to change, Laurey, honey?
- What if something happened?
- What could happen?
We got money in the bank and it's gonna be another good year for corn and oats.
You are a silly.
"Hold bottle two inches from nostril.
"Close your eyes and inhale.
"Ask your heart what you really want
"and wait for the answer."
Elixir of Egypt, make up my mind for me.
I'm waitin' for the answer.
Out of your dreams
Your dreams, your dreams
Out of your dreams
Your dreams, your dreams
Out of my dreams
And into your arms
I long to fly
I will come as evening comes
To woo a waiting sky
Out of my dreams and into the hush
Of falling shadows
When the mist is low
And stars are breaking through
Then out of my dreams
I'll go
Into a dream
With
You
JUD: Laurey?
Laurey?
Time to go to the party.
La, la, la, la, la, la, la
La, la, la, la, la, la la, la, la, la, la, la
La, la, la, la, la, la, la
Crawlin' along like this, we'll get there when the party's over.
Last time I saw you alone was in the winter.
I was sick, and I remember you brung me some hot soup, out to the smokehouse and you give it to me.
Me in bed.
And you asked me if I had a fever.
Put your hand on my head to see.
- I remember.
- Do you?
Bet you don't remember as much as me.
I remember everything you ever done, every word you ever said.
I can't get it out of my mind.
You see how it is?
JUD: Whoa, boy! Whoa!
- Whoa there!
- (WHINNYING)
Whoa there! Whoa!
- Whoa now. Whoa there!
- (SCREECHING)
Whoa, boy. Whoa, boy.
MAN: Quiet, everyone.
The farmer and the cowman should be friends
Oh, the farmer and the cowman should be friends
One man likes to push a plow
The other likes to chase a cow
But that's no reason why they can't be friends
Territory folks should stick together
Territory folks should all be pals
Cowboys dance with the farmers' daughters
Farmers dance with the ranchers' gals
CHORUS: Territory folks should stick together
Territory folks should all be pals
Cowboys dance with the farmers' daughters
Farmers dance with the ranchers' gals
No, no, no.
I'd like to say a word for the farmer
- Well, say it.
- Yeah!
He come out West and made a lot of changes
He come out West and built a lot of fences
And built 'em right across our cattle ranges
Why don't dirt scratchers go back to Missouri where they belong?
The farmer is a good and thrifty citizen
He's thrifty, all right.
No matter what the cowman says or thinks
You seldom see him drinkin' in a barroom
Unless somebody else is buyin' drinks
But the farmer and the cowman should be friends
Oh, the farmer and the cowman should be friends
The cowman ropes a cow with ease
The farmer steals her butter and cheese
But that's no reason why they can't be friends
Territory folks should stick together
Territory folks should all be pals
Cowboys dance with the farmers' daughters
Farmers dance with the ranchers' gals
Quiet, everybody.
I'd like to say a word for the cowboy
Oh, you would, would you?
The road he treads is difficult and stony
He rides for days on end with just a pony for a friend
I sure am feelin' sorry for the pony
The farmer should be sociable with the cowboy
If he rides by and asks for food and water
Don't treat him like a louse
Make him welcome in your house
But be sure that you lock up your wife and daughter
Who wants an old farm woman anyhow?
Notice you married one so's you could get a square meal.
You can't talk that-a-way about our women.
He can say what he wants.
Oh, the farmer and the cowman should be friends
Oh, the farmer and the cowman should be friends
One man likes to push a plow
The other likes to chase a cow
- But that's no reason why
- (GUNSHOT)
Ain't nobody gonna slug out anythin'.
This here's a party.
Sing it, Andrew. (VOCALIZES)
Oh, the farmer and the cowman should be friends
Good, but louder. Sing it. Sing it.
Oh, the farmer and the cowman should be friends
Sing. Come on, now, sing.
One man likes to push a plow
Come on. You hear? Sing.
The other likes to chase a cow
But that's no reason why they can't be friends
Sing!
And when this territory is a state
And joins the Union just like all the others
The farmer and the cowman and the merchant
Must all behave theirselves and act like brothers
I'd like to teach you all a little sayin'
And learn the words by heart
The way you should
I don't say I'm no better
Than anybody else
But I'll be danged if
I ain't just as good
I don't say I'm no better than anybody else
But I'll be danged if I ain't just as good
Territory folks should stick together
Territory folks should all be pals
Cowboys dance with the farmers' daughters
Farmers dance with the ranchers' gals
Yeah!
Quiet, everybody. Quiet.
It's time to start the auction.
Who's gonna be the auctioneer, Mr. Skidmore?
Why, Aunt Eller, of course.
- Say, Aunt Eller?
- Huh?
Laurey ain't here yet. What do you reckon's happened?
Oh, they're just pokey.
Loosen up your pockets, fellas.
You've been pounding the floor of the new schoolhouse.
Now let's get money enough to raise the roof.
Mr. Skidmore's been generous enough to give us the land.
- He's got more kids than the rest of us.
- (LAUGHTER)
Now, you know the rules, gentlemen.
You ain't supposed to know what girl goes with what hamper.
Of course, if your sweetheart has told you that hers, will be done up in a certain kind of way, with a certain kind of ribbon, that ain't my fault.
I can't hardly lift this one.
Wonder what's in there.
I'm bound there's a mince pie in here.
- Is there any rum in it?
- Well, come and sniff for yourself.
Is there?
- I'll vote two bits.
- Two bits!
Whoa.
- Hi, Laurey.
- Where's Aunt Eller? And Curly?
Well, up the house, I think.
Sold to Pete Larkin for six bits.
Well, Pete, you sure got a pretty gal to go with your supper.
Well, let's go ahead.
Now, what am I offered for this one?
Anybody just et?
- I'll give two bits.
- Two bits.
- Four bits.
- Four bits.
I've heard enough bits.
Let's hear a mouthful.
Hello, young fella.
Well, Mr. Hakim, I hear you got yourself engaged to Ado Annie.
- Well, I...
- Well, nothing.
I don't know what to call you.
Ain't pretty enough for a skunk.
Ain't skinny enough for a snake.
Too low to be a man, and too big to be a mouse.
- I reckon you're a rat.
- Hmm. That's logical.
Answer me one question.
Do you really love her?
- Well, I...
- 'Cause if'n I thought you didn't,
I'd tie you up in that there bag and drop you in the river.
- Are you serious about her?
- Yes, I'm serious.
Do you worship the ground she walks on, like I do? You'd better say yes.
Yes. Yes.
Would you spend every cent you had for her?
That's what I did.
See the bag? Full of presents.
Cost 50 bucks, all I had in the world.
- If you had that $50...
- I'd have Ado Annie and you'd lose her.
Oh, yeah. I'd lose her.
Let's see what you got in the bag.
Might wanting to buy something.
What would you want with it?
I'm a peddler, ain't I?
Oh, hi! (BABBLING)
What a beautiful hot-water bag.
Looks French.
It must have cost you plenty.
- I give you eight dollar for it.
- Eight dollars?
- That wouldn't be honest. I only paid 3.50...
- All right.
I said I give you eight. I will.
- Oh, that's a crackerjack.
- Take your hands off that.
That was for our wedding night.
It don't fit you so good.
I give you $22.
- Well, what...
- All right, 22.50. Not a cent more.
Oh, mighty dainty.
Fifteen dollar. Let's see now.
Twenty-two and eight is 30, and 15 is 45, and 50 is 45.50.
Forty-five fifty.
Say, that's almost...
- You wanna buy some more?
- Might.
You ever see one of these things?
- How much you give me for this here thing?
- Oh, no.
- I don't handle things like that.
- It's just a girl in a pink...
- No, it's more than that.
- Hey.
Either of you two see'd Laurey?
Up to the house, lookin' for Curly.
- How much you give me for this thing?
- I tell you, I don't...
What do you want for it?
Well, let's see.
- Three dollars and fifty cents.
- Sold.
Now, 3.50 from him, 45.50 from you.
That makes $50, don't it?
No. One dollar short.
Oh, darn it.
I must have figured wrong.
Well, how much for the rest of the stuff in this here bag?
- One dollar.
- Done.
Now I got the $50, ain't I?
Know what that means?
Means I'm gonna take
Ado Annie back from you.
- You wouldn't do a thing like that to me.
- Wouldn't I?
When I tell Ado Annie's pa who I got most of the money off of, maybe he'll change his mind about who's smart and who's dumb.
Say, young fella, you certainly buncoed me.
Oh. Ah.
Now here's the last two hampers.
Whose they are, I ain't got no idy.
The big one's mine, and the next one to it is Laurey's.
That's the end of that secret.
Now, what am I bid for Annie's hamper?
MAN: Two bits.
- MAN #2: Four.
- Who says six? You?
- Ain't nobody hungry no more?
- (LAUGHTER)
What about you, peddler-man? Six bits?
No, no. I don't care.
- Bid 'em up.
- Six bits!
Oh, six bits ain't enough for a lunch like Annie can make.
Let's hear a dollar. How about you?
You won her last year.
Hey, Annie, you still got the same sweet potato pie like last year?
You bet!
Same old sweet potato pie.
What do you say?
I say it gimme a three-day bellyache.
Never mind about that.
Who bids a dollar?
Come on, bid.
Mine was the last bid.
I got her for six bits.
- Bid a dollar.
- Ninety cents.
Ninety cents. We're gettin' rich.
Another desk for the schoolhouse.
Do I hear more?
You hear $50.
- Fifty dollars!
- Hey!
Nobody ever bid $50 for a lunch.
Nobody ever bid 10.
- He ain't got $50.
- Oh, yes, I have.
If you're a man of honor, you'll say Annie belong to me like you said she would.
- Where's your money?
- Right here in my hand.
That ain't yours. You just bid it, didn't you? Give it to the schoolhouse.
I still say the peddler gets my daughter's hand.
- Now, wait a minute! That ain't fair!
- Going for $50.
- Going, going...
- Fifty-one.
- You crazy?
- Fifty...
Wait a minute. Hold on.
Aunt Eller, if'n I don't bid no more,
- I can keep my money, can't I?
- You sure can.
Then I still got $50, and this is mine.
- You simple-minded shag poke.
- Going, going, gone for $51, and that means
Annie'll get the prize, I guess.
- Oh! Oh!
- And I'll get Annie, I guess.
And what are you getting for your $51?
- A three-day bellyache.
- (LAUGHTER)
Now... Now, here's my niece's hamper.
- (MURMURING)
- I took a peek inside a while ago, and I must say it looks mighty tasty.
- What do I hear, gents?
- Two bits.
- Four bits.
- What you say, six?
- MAN: One dollar.
- More like it. Do I hear two?
- A dollar and a quarter.
- (CROWD MURMURING)
MAN: Two dollars.
MAN #2: Two-fifty.
- Three dollars.
- And two bits.
MAN #3:
Three dollars and four bits.
- MAN #4: Four dollars.
- And two bits.
Four dollars and a quarter.
Ain't I gonna hear any more?
Curly?
I got a bid of four and a quarter from Jud Fry.
You gonna let him have it?
Andrew.
- Four and a half.
- Four and a half! Going for...
Four seventy-five.
Four seventy-five.
Come on, gentlemen.
Schoolhouse ain't built yet.
Got to get a nice "chimbley."
Five dollars.
- Five dollars! Going for...
- And two bits.
Too rich for my blood.
Can't afford no more.
Five and a quarter.
Ain't got nearly enough yet.
Not for cold duck and stuffing,
- and that lemon meringue pie.
- Six dollars.
- Six dollars!
- And two bits. And two bits.
My, you're stubborn, Jud.
Mr. Carnes is a richer man than you and I know he likes custard with raspberry syrup.
- Oh, let it go.
- Anybody gonna bid any more?
No, they all dropped out.
Can't you see?
- You got enough, Aunt Eller.
- MAN: Yeah, let's get on.
- I got the money.
- Hold on, you.
- I ain't said "going, going"...
- Say it!
Going to Jud for six dollars and two bits.
Going.
- Going.
- (CROWD MURMURING)
- Who'd you say was getting Laurey?
- Jud Fry.
- And for how much?
- Six and a quarter.
I don't reckon that's quite enough, do you, Aunt Eller?
More than you got.
Got a saddle here. Cost me $30.
You can't bid saddles.
You gotta bid cash.
Thirty-dollar saddle must be worth something to somebody.
I'll give you 10 dollars.
Don't be a fool, boy. You can't earn a living without a saddle.
- You got cash?
- Right in my pocket.
Let's don't waste time.
How high you going?
Higher than you, no matter what.
- Aunt Eller, I'm bidding all of this 10 dollars.
- Ten dollars! Going, going...
Ten dollars and two bits.
Curly?
- Most of you boys know my horse, Blue.
- (CROWD MURMURING)
He's kind of a nice horse.
He's gentle. He's well broke.
Don't sell Blue, Curly. it ain't worth it.
I'll give you $25 for him.
Sold.
Aunt Eller, that makes the bid 35.
Curly, you're crazy.
But it's all for the schoolhouse, ain't it?
- Going for 35...
- Hold on. Hold on now.
I'm not finished bidding yet.
You just sold everything you got in the world, didn't you?
You can't sell your clothes
'cause they ain't worth nothin'.
You can't sell your gun
'cause you're gonna need it.
Yes, sir, you're gonna need it bad.
Well, I'm just as good as
Curly at gettin' what I want.
I'm gonna bid everything
I got in the world.
Forty-two dollars and 31 cents.
Anybody want to buy a gun?
I bought it brand-new last
Thanksgiving. It's worth a lot.
- Curly...
- MAN: Give you 18 for it, Curly.
Sold.
Aunt Eller, that makes the bid $53. anybody going any higher?
Sold!
Going, going, gone.
Well, what's the matter with you folks?
Ain't nobody gonna cheer or nothin'?
Ah, ah, ah, ah.
Now, come on, you two.
Shake hands.
That's better.
- Curly?
- What?
Can I show you something?
Excuse us, Laurey?
You ever seen one of these?
Just what is it?
It's something special.
You just put it up to your eye and you look through it, like that.
Curly! Curly!
- What you doing?
- Nothin'.
What do you want to squeal at a man like that for?
You scared the livin' lights out of me.
Well, then stop lookin' at them old French pictures.
And ask me for a dance. You brung me to the party, didn't you?
All right, all right, you silly old woman. I'll dance with you.
Sam, pick that banjo to pieces.
Now that I got that $50, you name the day.
- August 15.
- Why August 15?
'Cause that was the first day I was kissed.
Was it? I didn't remember that.
You wasn't there.
Now, lookee here. We gotta have a serious talk.
Now that you're engaged to me, you gotta stop havin' fun.
I mean, with other fellas.
You'll have to be a little more standoffish
When fellers offer you a buggy ride
I'll give a imitation of a crawfish
And dig myself a hole where I can hide
I heared how you was kickin' up some capers
When I was off in Kansas City, Mo
No!
I heared some things you couldn't print in papers
From fellers who been talkin' like they know
Foot!
I only did the kind of things I oughta
Sorta
To you I was as faithful as can be
For me
Them stories 'bout the way
I lost my bloomers
Rumors
A lot of tempest in a pot of tea
The whole thing don't sound very good to me
Well, you see...
I go and sow my last wild oat
I cut out all shenanigans
I save my money don't gamble or drink
In a back room down at Flannigan's
I give up lots of other things
That a gentleman never mentions
Before I give up any more
I wanna know your intentions
With me it's all or nothin'
Is it all or nothin' with you
It can't be in between
It can't be now and then
No half-and-half romance will do
I'm a one-woman man home-lovin' type
All complete with slippers and pipe
Take me like I am or leave me be
If you can't give me all give me nothin'
And nothin's what you'll get from me
Not even somethin'
Nothing's what you'll get from me
- It can't be in between
- Uh-uh.
It can't be now and then
No half-and-half romance will do
Would you build me a house all painted white
Cute and clean and pretty and bright
Big enough for two but not for three
Supposing that we should have a third one
He better look a lot like me
The spittin' image
He better look a lot like me
With you it's all or nothin'
All for you and nothin' for me
But if a wife is wise
She's gotta realize
That men like you are wild and free
So I ain't gonna fuss ain't gonna frown
Have your fun
Go out on the town
Stay up late and don't come home till 3:00
And go right off to sleep if you're sleepy
No use waitin' up for me
Aw, Ado Annie
No use waitin' up for me
Come on and kiss me
Why'd you drive off and leave me like that?
Like I said, didn't want to be late for the party.
You didn't want to be with me, you mean, not a minute more than you had to.
I ain't good enough for you, am I?
I'm a hired hand.
I got dirt on my hands. Pig slime.
I ain't fit to touch, am I? You're better.
Oh, you're so much better.
Well, we'll see how much better you are, Miss Laurey, and you won't be so free and easy and highfalutin with your airs.
- You such a fine lady!
- Are you makin' threats to me?
Are you trying to tell me if I don't allow you to slobber over me like a hog, why, you're gonna do something about it?
Well, you ain't a hired hand for me no more.
You can just pack up your duds and scoot.
Don't you as much as set foot inside the pasture gate, or I'll sic the dogs on to you!
You said your say.
You brought it on yourself.
I can't help it.
I can't never rest.
I told you how it was.
You wouldn't listen.
You ain't never gonna get rid of me. Never.
Hey, Laurey, have you seen Annie?
- She's gone again.
- Will, will you do something for me?
Will you find Curly and tell him I'm here?
I wanna see Curly awful bad.
I gotta see him.
Why don't you turn around and look, you crazy woman?
Oh, Curly! (CRYING)
Well, you found yours.
I'm still lookin' for mine.
What on earth is ailing the belle of Claremore?
Well, by gum, if you ain't cryin'.
Oh, Curly, I'm afraid, afraid for my life.
- Jumpin' toadstools.
- Don't you leave me!
- Gosh a-mighty.
- Don't mind me cryin'.
I can't help it.
- You can cry your eyes out.
- I don't know what to do.
Well, here. I'll show ya.
That's about all a man can stand in public. You go away from me, you.
Oh. You don't like me, Curly?
Like you? You get away from me,
I tell ya. Plumb away from me.
Curly, you're sittin' on the stove!
It's cold as a hunk of ice.
Wished it had burned a hole in your pants.
- You do, do ya?
- You heared me.
Now, look, Laurey, you stand right there where you at and I'll sit right over here.
Now, you can tell me what you wanted with me.
Well, Jud was here.
He scared me.
He talked wild, and he threatened me, sol... I fired him.
I wished I hadn't. There ain't no tellin' what he might do now.
You fired him?
Well, then, that's all there is to it.
I'll stay in the place myself tonight, if you're nervous about that hound dog.
Look, you quit your worryin', or I'll spank ya.
Hey, while I think of it, how about marrying me?
Gracious.
What'd I wanna marry you for?
Well, couldn't you maybe think of some reason why you might?
I can't think of nothin' right now, hardly.
Laurey,
Please, ma'am, marry me?
I don't know what I'm gonna do if you don't.
Curly, why, I'll marry ya if you want me to.
I'll be the happiest man alive as soon as we're married.
Well, I gotta learn to be a farmer. I can see that.
Quit thinkin' about throwin' that rope and start gettin' my hands blistered a new way.
Things is changin',
Laurey, right and left.
Buy up mowin' machines and cut down prairies, shoe your horses and drag them plows under the sod.
They gonna make a state out of this.
They gonna put it in the Union.
Country's a-changin'.
I gotta change with it.
- Bring up a pair of boys.
- Curly!
Well, new stock to keep up with the way things is goin' in this here crazy country.
Now I got you to help me,
I'll amount to somethin' yet.
I remember the first time I ever see'd ya.
It was at the fair, and you was ridin' that gray filly of Blue Stars.
I says, "Who's that skinny little thing sittin' up there with the bang on her forehead?"
Yeah, I remember. And you was ridin' broncs that day.
- That's right.
- And one of 'em throwed ya.
Yeah. It did not throw me.
- Guess ya jumped off then.
- Why, sure I jumped off.
- Yeah, you sure did.
- (LAUGHS)
Hey, if there's anybody out and around this shout who can hear my voice,
I want 'em to know that
Laurey Williams is my girl!
Curly!
Ha-ha! And she went and got me to ask her to marry me.
They'll hear you all the way to Catoosy.
Let 'em.
Let people say we're in love
Who keers what happens now
Just keep your hand in mine
Your hand feels so grand in mine
Let people say we're in love
Starlight looks well on us
Let the stars beam from above
Who keers if they tell on us
Let people Say
We're in love
Well, I'll say good-bye here, baby.
Time for the lonely gypsy to go back to the open road.
I wished I was goin'. Then you wouldn't be so lonely.
Look, Annie, there is a man who loves you like nothing never loved nobody.
That is the man for you...
Will Parker.
Oh, yeah. Well, I like Will a lot.
Sure. He's a fine fellow.
He's strong like an ox.
He's young and handsome.
Oh, I love him, all right, I guess.
Of course you do. And you love those clear blue eyes of his and the way his mouth wrinklies up when he smiles.
Do you love him too?
I love him because he'll make my Ado Annie happy.
Oh.
Good-bye, baby.
I will show you how we say good-bye in Persia.
That was good-bye?
We have an old song in Persia. It says...
One good-bye is never enough
Hello, Will. Ali Hakim's saying good-bye.
Ah, Will, I wanna say good-bye to you too.
No, you don't. I just saw the last one.
Aw, be good to her, Will, and you be good to him, baby.
- Oh, friend of the family.
- Did you say you was goin'?
I show you how we say good-bye in my country.
Oh, friend of the family.
Oh, lucky fellow.
I wish it was me she was marrying instead of you.
It don't seem to make much difference.
Well, back to the open road, the lonely gypsy!
Giddyap, boys!
You ain't gonna think of that old peddler-man anymore, are ya?
Of course not. I never think of no one less'n he's with me.
Then I'll never leave your side.
Well, even if you never go away, can't you once in awhile, give me one of them
Persian good-byes?
Persian good-bye? Why, that ain't nothin' compared to Oklahoma hello.
Hello, Will!
- Sleepin' in the saddle?
- Worse than that.
I got to thinkin'. Last time for me, Mr. Skidmore.
No more roundups. Not no more.
Think you're gonna like being a farmer?
If Laurey can marry a good-for-nothing cowhand, without a red cent in his britches, I gotta love farmin'.
I reckon you'll be a good enough husband.
Can't say about the farmin'
I don't like farmin'. Never did.
That ain't gonna keep you from the weddin', is it?
Wouldn't miss it for anything.
After all, the farmer and the cowman should be friends.
With this ring, I thee wed.
I pronounce you man and wife.
MAN: Let's give three cheers for the happy couple!
- Hip, hip! Hip, hip!
- GUESTS: Hooray! Hooray!
- Hip, hip!
- Hooray!
They couldn't pick a better time to start in life
It ain't too early and it ain't too late
Startin' as a farmer with a brand-new wife
Soon be livin' in a brand-new state
Brand-new state
Gonna treat you great
Gonna give you barley carrots and potatoes
- Pasture for the cattle
- Spinach and tomatoes
Flowers on the prairie where the june bugs zoom
Plenty of air and plenty of room
Plenty of room to swing a rope
Plenty of heart and plenty of hope
Oklahoma
Where the wind comes sweepin' down the plain
And the wavin' wheat can sure smell sweet
When the wind comes right behind the rain
Oklahoma
Every night my honey lamb and I
Sit alone and talk and watch a hawk
Makin' lazy circles in the sky
We know we belong to the land
And the land we belong to is grand
And when we say
ALL: Yeow
A-yip-i-o-ee-ay
We're only sayin' you're doin' fine, Oklahoma
Oklahoma, okay
GUESTS: Oklahoma
Where the wind comes sweepin' down the plain, Oklahoma
Where the wavin' wheat can sure smell sweet
When the wind comes right behind the rain
Oklahoma
Every night my honey lamb and I
Every night we sit alone and talk and watch a hawk
Makin' lazy circles in the sky
- We know we belong to the land
- Yo ho
And the land we belong to is grand
Ylippee yi, yippee yi
Yippee yi, yippee yi
Yippee yi, yippee yi
And when we say
Yeow
A-yip-i-o-ee-ay
We're only sayin' you're doin' fine, Oklahoma
Oklahoma, you're okay
Oklahoma, Oklahoma
Oklahoma, Oklahoma
Oklahoma, Okla...
We know we belong to the land
And the land we belong to is grand
And when we say
Yeow
A-yip-i-o-ee-ay
We're only sayin' you're doin' fine, Oklahoma
Oklahoma, O-K-L-A-H-O-M-A
Oklahoma
Say, you better hurry and get in that other dress. We gotta get goin'.
You hurry and pack your own duds and lean on over my...
- Come on now. You girls...
- (CONTINUES, INDISTINCT)
- I wanna go!
- Me too!
What you gonna do, Pa, give
Laurey and Curly a shivaree?
- That's right.
- I wished you wouldn't.
It's a good, old-fashioned custom never hurt nobody.
Wait. You ladies just stay right here now.
Vamoose! Go on! Scat!
Seems like there's times when men ain't got no need for women.
There's times when women ain't got no need for men.
- Yeah, but who wants to be dead?
- (GERTIE CACKLING)
- Thought you's in Bushyhead.
- Just come from there.
Too bad you missed
Laurey's weddin'.
- Been havin' one of my own.
- (GASPING, CHATTERING)
Lands, who'd you marry?
Where is he?
- There he is.
- Oh.
- Is that him?
- GERTIE: That's him.
Oh, hello, Ado Annie.
- GERTIE: Did you see my ring, girls?
- (WOMEN GASPING)
- How long you been married?
- Four days.
Four days with that laugh should count like a golden wedding.
But if you married her, you must have wanted to.
Oh, sure, I wanted to.
I wanted to marry her when I saw the moonlight shining on the barrel of her father's shotgun.
- I thought it would be better to be alive.
- (CACKLES)
Now I ain't so sure.
Hey, Will, did you hear the news?
Gertie married the peddler.
Mighty glad to hear that, peddler-man.
I think I oughta kiss the bride.
Oh.
Oh, friend of the family, remember?
Hey, Gertie, you ever had an Oklahoma hello?
- (MUFFLED SHOUT)
- (WOMEN GASPING)
(SCREAMS) No, you don't!
Hey, hey! What are you doing?
I'm gonna keep Ado Annie from killin' your wife.
Mind your own business.
- (CLOTH RIPPING)
- (SCREAMS)
- (BELLS JINGLING)
- Shh! Shh! Somebody'll hear ya.
They ain't listening to anybody but theirselves.
Shh! Shh!
- (WHISPERING)
- (LAUGHING)
Go on out of here, you bunch of pig stealers!
Why don't you go on back home where you belong?
- Up the ladder with ya, pretty thing!
- Boost her up!
Put your foot in the right place, boy!
Go on, Mr. Bridegroom.
There's your bride.
- (PANS CLANGING)
- (MEN WHOOPING)
MAN: Maybe we'll let you down in time to catch your train!
Hey, Laurey, here's a girl baby for ya!
Fire! Haystack's a-fire!
Get some water!
Get water! Hurry up!
Get the water!
Curly, I got a present for ya!
I didn't get to kiss the bride, but I got a present for you!
There's a present for you!
Come on! Come on!
- Ike! Slim! Quick!
- Come on!
- What'd you do to him?
- I knowed this was gonna happen.
- They've been feudin' for quite a spell.
- (CHATTERING)
- What happened?
- He fell on his own knife.
- Stuck clean through the ribs.
- He's still breathing, ain't he?
Let me look at him.
Can't do a thing here.
Better get him to a doctor.
Carry him over to my rig.
We'll take him to Doc Tyler's.
I don't see why this had to happen, just when everything was so fine.
Don't let your mind run on it.
I can't forget it, I tell you.
I never will.
Don't try, honey.
You got to get used to havin' all kinds of things happenin' to you.
You got to look at all the good on one side and all the bad on the other side and say, "Well, all right then," to both of them.
Lots of things happen to a woman, sickness or being poor and hungry even, being left alone in your old age, being afeared to die, and you can stand it.
There's one way.
You gotta be hardy. Ya gotta be!
Oh, I wished I was the way you are.
Oh, fiddlesticks! Scrawny and old?
You couldn't hire me to be the way I am.
Oh, what'd I do without you?
You're such a crazy.
Sure as you're born.
Jud's over to Doc Tyler's.
They'll take care of everything.
Is he alive?
Laurey, honey, Cord Elam here, he being federal marshal and all, thinks I oughta give myself up, and right now.
Oh, no!
Their train leaves Claremore in less than an hour. It's their honeymoon.
The best thing is for Curly to go of his own accord and tell the judge.
- Why, you're the judge, ain't you, Andrew?
- Yeah.
Then tell him now and get it over with.
It wouldn't be proper.
It's gotta be done in court.
Oh, fiddlesticks. Let's do it here and say we done it in court.
- Can't do that. That's breakin' the law.
- Let's not break the law.
- Let's just bend it a little.
- (LAUGHTER)
Come on, Andrew. Start the trial.
- We ain't got but a few minutes.
- Sure.
- Andrew, I got to protest.
- Aw, shut your trap.
We can give the boy a fair trial without lookin' him up on his honeymoon.
All right. Here's the long and the short of it.
What's your plea?
That means, Why'd you do it?
Well, Jud's been pesterin' Laurey.
- And I always swore...
- Just a minute.
Don't let your tongue wobble around in your head. Listen to my question.
What happened last night that made you do it?
Why, he tried to burn us to death, and he come at me with a knife.
- And you had to defend yourself, didn't ya?
- Yes. Furthermore...
Never mind the "furthermores."
The plea is self-defense.
- All right. Order. Wait. Is there a witness,
- (CHATTERING LOUDLY) wait a minute, who's seen this happen?
- Absolutely.
- All right. Order.
I feel funny about it.
I feel funny.
You'll feel funny when I tell your wife you're carrying on with another woman.
I ain't carrying on with no one!
Maybe not, but you'll sure feel funny when I tell your wife you are.
Laugh all you like, but as federal marshal...
Aw, shut up about being federal marshal.
If we get to be a state, we're gonna elect ourselves a sheriff.
If you don't keep your mouth shut, ain't nobody gonna vote for ya.
Come on!
Yeah, let's get movin' and get the happy couple on the train!
- (SHOUTING)
- Wait a minute! I ain't said the verdict yet.
- The verdict's not guilty, ain't it?
- 'Course, but I gotta say it.
- Then say it.
- (TOGETHER) Not guilty!
- Court's adjourned!
- (CHATTERING)
Got the rice?
Ado Annie, where you been?
You missed all the excitement.
Oh, no, we didn't.
- Hello, Will.
- (CHUCKLES)
Gotta get the young'uns on that train, or they'll miss it.
Hey, there, bride and groom, ya ready?
- Here we come!
- (PEOPLE CHEERING)
- (CHEERING CONTINUES)
- Oh, my crazy young'uns!
I don't know what
I'm gonna do without you!
- All right.
- Take care.
- Good luck, Curly!
- Thank you! Bye!
Yaw!
Yaw!
Oh, what a beautiful morning
Oh, what a beautiful day
I got a beautiful feeling
Everything's goin' my way
Oh, what a beautiful day
This is a Renoir.
Actually, it is the painting of the daughter of the marquis de Marineau... and was said to have been done in 1894.
Renoir is famous for his paintings of children... but this is one of his finest.
Here we have a Corot.
In this painting, the foliage, far more than any signature, proclaims the painter.
Note the rich use of browns and yellow-
A truly fine example of Corot at his best.
And now, as is customary, we conclude the tour... with the Pendleton family portraits.
Uh, here we have a portrait of the firstJervis Pendleton... painted by
James Abbott McNeill Whistler.
Jervis Pendleton II sat, or stood, as you can see...
forJohn Singer Sargent, whose portraits are hung... in every important museum in the world.
Please, madam.!
Oh, I must insist that you stay with the group.
Oh, yes, of course. But what is that in that room up there?
That, madam, is Jervis Pendleton III.
Who, as you can see, has, uh... broken with the family tradition somewhat.
Griggs speaking.
Baldwin Brothers, 99.
Dexter Chemicals, 35.
Just a moment.
- Good. Buy both.
- Both.
Mr. Pendleton accepts both offers.
Griggs speaking.
Native Boy, three-eighths of a mile,
34 and two-fifths seconds.
Just a moment.
Your horse.
Your horse!
Mr. Pendleton wants two dollars across the board.
Griggs speaking!
Oh, yes, that matter will be attended to immediately. I'll call you right back.
What shall I tell the man about-
Hey! Hey.
Aw, no!
Griggs. Griggs, you can't do that to me. You can't d-
The State Department has b-
- State Department has been trying to reach you.
- I don't care who's been trying.
I was right in the middle of a... thing.
It's about the economic mission to France.
The secretary must know your decision about going.
- I was going great. I was with it.
- Aw, Jervis... it's beyond my understanding how a man... who holds the controlling interest in 34 separate corporations... can sit all by himself wasting his time beating these silly tom-toms!
All by myself? Listen, I have one of the finest record collections in the country.
I play with the very best bands.
My father used to get up at 6:00 every morning to train... carrier pigeons, most of whom never came back.
Did you consider that childish nonsense?
- That was his hobby.
- Hobby, my foot. That's the way he got his kicks.
Now, if you don't mind, flip that record.
- I beg your pardon?
- Flip it. Turn it, you know, over.
No, look, the secretary must have your answer.
The mission leaves tomorrow night from Idyllwild Airport.
- The seriousness of the problem-
- I thoroughly understand... the seriousness of the French economic situation.
Vital lag in industrial production... coal mining output can be stepped up... electric kilowatt hour consumption not up to its potential.
Even the agricultural program, of which France... has always been the European leader, can be increased.
Now, flip that record.
- Anything else?
- Yes. Just sit there and listen.
Griggs because I hold you
In affection and great esteem
I shall now begin to instruct you in
What the jazz elite call the modern beat
A complete anthology of"Well, all reet"
And how I made the team
Ah!
Ooh, ooh-
Ooh, boy.
Well?
What shall I tell the State Department?
That we're going, of course.
Did you say "we"?
Certainly. Everyone knows you make all my decisions for me.
Everybody but me!
Now, a little more gravel under that wheel. That's it.
Bring the pole over here. That's it.
Now, give me some of those branches.
- Uh, may I make a suggestion?
- Mr. Pendleton, please.!
Mr. Bronson happens to be our expert in tractors and farm machinery.
If he can't get us out of here, no one can.
Thank you for that vote of confidence.
All ready, Sergeant.
Now, everybody, get behind and push!
Push.! Push.!
Well, I think we finally struck firm ground.
I think you've struck oil.
But you can have my share.
Uh, do you mind if I go up the road a piece... to see if I can find a farmhouse or a telephone or something?
Good, I knew you wouldn't. Uh, Griggs, why don't you break out that last bottle of brandy?
Everybody could use a drink.
Right, Mrs. Carrington?
Well!
I don't know what the president could've been thinking of... when he appointed that man to this commission.
Oh!
- Bonjour.
- Bonjour, monsieur.
Est-ce que vous avez un tlphone?
Un tlphone?
All. All.
All, monsieur.
Est-ce qu'il y a quelqu'un ici...
- le matre ou la matresse?
- Oui. La matresse.
- Entrez, monsieur.
- Merci.
- Attendez, monsieur, s'il vous plat.
- Merci.
Today we speak only English.
But as a reward, you may have whatever you want for lunch.
- Marie.
- Ice-cream soda.
One ice-cream soda. One.
- Paul.
- A "hamburgre."
- "Burger," Paul. "Burger."
- A hamburger with chocolate sauce.
- Paul.
- Please, Julie.
One hamburger with chocolate sauce and three onions.
Claudine-
- Bubble gum.
- Bubble gum.!
Bubble gum!
Bubble gum.
Monsieur.
Bonjour, madame. Uh, je m'appelle Pendleton.
Oh, an American. How do you do,
Mr. Pendleton? I am Madame Savanne.
Well, that takes the strain off my French.
Uh, I wonder, have you a telephone?
A telephone? Oh, no, monsieur.
Why do you need one?
Well, I'm with a group of people and, uh...
- our car skidded off the road into a ditch.
- No!
No one's hurt. It's just that we can't seem to get the car out.
Uh, is there a garage nearby?
For whom?
The only car around here for miles is the one that belongs to our gardener.
Well, your gardener has a car.
That's wonderful.
Oh, you should see it.
It was left here after the war.
- Ajeep?
- Oh, no, no, no. Not that war. The one before it.
Oh. But still, i-it would be better than nothing.
I'd be very glad to pay for the use of it.
I think you better see it first. I will ask the gardener to push it around in the front.
- Push it?
- Oh, only to start it.
After that- it marches.
Julie! Julie!
Oui, madame?
I was watching that girl. She seems quite unusual.
Has a wonderful way with children.
Perhaps it's because she is one of them.
I, myself, found her and named her.
- She has lived her whole 18 years here.
- Is that so?
Oh, but that is not getting your car out of the ditch.
- I will fetch the gardener. He is working with the potatoes.
- Thank you.
C-A-T spells cat
R-A-T spells rat
Although the cat can catch the rat
The rat can't catch the cat
H-E-R spells her
F-U-R spells fur
Just pat her fur and listen to her
P-U-R-R, purr
Do you see the cow
She is eating hay
She is eating hay to give her milk
I have spoken to the gardener.
M- l-L-K
Yes. Every once in a while one meets a person who has it in her... to take life and make something wonderful of it.
Seems a shame.
Oh, I don't mean... that this isn't a wonderful place, a good life-
Oh, monsieur, don't apologize.
I do my job very well... and I know Julie will even do it better.
- Julie what?
- Julie Andre.
- But, uh, for a young woman to spend her life here- Oh! - Oh, but she's so attractive.
- Surely there must be some young man who-
- Oh, yes.
There is the widow farmer who needs a wife.
He sells us our eggs every week and lately has been giving us an extra dozen free of charge.
I am very, very nervous. You know, we need the eggs for the children, and yet-Aah!
- Handkerchiefs too, huh?
- Oh-ho-ho, you have noticed our ginghams.
A little while back we were notified we were going to receive 2,000 yards of cloth.
Oh, monsieur, we were so excited!
And then it came.
All blue and white checkered.
Oh, sometimes I wish charity would not be so mechanical, so cold, so-
- So all blue and white.
- Precisely.
Oh, the car is waiting, monsieur.
- After all, that's what I came for, isn't it?
- Yes, but this car... is not very obedient.
You better think twice before you even get into it.
Hi, Alec!
Stop making noises like an ambassador,
"Alex," and answer the question.
How do I go about adopting a French orphan?
Now, look, Jerv. You stumbled into some orphanage.
You're tired. You've been cooped up with the same people for a couple of weeks now.
All of a sudden you see the bright, shining faces... of these unwanted children, and you catch on fire.
Next thing I know, you arrive here in a beat-up old jalopy...
- you bang into my Cadillac-
- That's the only way I could stop.
I told you that before.
The car had no brakes.
Now, let's get to it.
What red tape do we have to cut?
Jervis, even you cannot go leaping about from country to country adopting orphans.
I am not leaping about.
It's only one country and one orphan.
Will you please stop stalling and get started?
- All right, Jervis, we can try.
- Try? Don't give me that.
- Any time the American ambassador can't-
- Okay, okay.
Now, what's the name of the orphanage?
Uh, Jeanne d'Arc, right outside Soissons.
- And the child's name?
- Julie Andre.
A-N-D-R-E.
- Do you know how old she is?
- Yes. Eighteen.
- Let's have another martini.
- Oh, Alec.
- Oh, Jervis!
- Now, if you're gonna take that attitude...
- we won't get anyplace.
- Mm-hmm.
Tell me, has she got a friend?
This girl has a gift for life.
I want to send her to America.
I want to educate her.
You can't adopt an 18-year-old girl.
You can't ask me-
They have a name for what you're asking me to do.
That is narrow-minded, bigoted and evil.
Jervis, have you any idea how easy it is to lose a job at the State Department these days?
- But my motives are as pure as-
- Just a moment, Jervis. I, uh-
I think the ambassador fears that if the press hear about this... they might conceivably place a different interpretation... upon your motives, however pure in fact they may be.
- Thank you, Griggs.
- Yeah.
Mm-hmm, fair point.
Uh, I have it.
The entire thing can be done anonymously... uh, like a scholarship fund.
There'll be absolutely no contact between the girl and myself.
She won't even know who I am.
The Pendleton Foundation... gives lots of scholarships to American boys and girls.
Why not to this girl?
Why not?
- I don't know why not.
- Well?
But, of course, you're not really adopting her in this case...
- you're merely sponsoring her.
- Right.
But you want to send her to college.
How do we know she'll qualify?
Qualify. Um-
I'm on the board of trustees... of, uh, some institution of learning for young ladies.
- W-W-Which one is it, Griggs?
- Walston College in Massachusetts.
What makes you think they'll take her?
Uh, what was our contribution last year?
Sizable.
She is now an enrolled member... of the freshman class of Walston College in Massachusetts.
Here, start writing.
Now, uh, where were we?
"Eighteen years old."
Julie! Everything is true!
Everything is happening!
Look, here is a letter from the American ambassador.
Your name, Julie Andre.
You-You are going to America to college.
- How do I go?
- By airplane. Everything has been arranged.
Traveling expenses, college, clothes to wear.
- And the food too?
- Food, everything that you desire.
- Hamburger?
- Hamburger!
- Ice cream?
- Three times a day!
Oh! Oh la la la la.!
I will send some back to the children and...
- pictures of Indians a-and cowboys and so.
- Oh!
Maybe where you are going there won't be any cowboys. Indians maybe, but not cowboys.
Oh la la, m-madame.
Is not possible. Is- Is like a dream.
Is- Is-
Is too-
Who is it that would do that for me?
What's his name? Where is he?
Oh, I cannot tell you his name.
He doesn't wish you to know it.
He-Why- How-
I want to thank him!
He doesn't want any thanks!
He doesn't want any gratitude.
His only wish is that you write him once a month... just like he would be your father... and tell him the progress you are making in school.
And, uh, this is the address:
"Mr. John Smith...
Post Office Box 3642,
New York City."
It's all written out here. Of course,
Mr. John Smith is not his real name.
Oh la la, madame.
- It- It has really happened, eh?
- Mm-hmm.
- Is really true?
- Everything is true.
Go on, Julie.
You go to sleep... and say a nice prayer of thanks, huh?
- O-Oh, oh!
- Merci, madame.
- Oh, how beautiful it is!
- It is an American automobile.
- No, no, it is Italian.
- It is not. It's a Cadillac.
- We saw one in the cinema.
- Shh! Kids, what are you doing there?
There is an American automobile with a man.
He has been talking to Emile.
Where? Let me see.
Oh, zut.!
- Did you see him? Did you see his face?
- Yes, I saw him.
You did?
What did he look like?
- Was he old?
- Oh, yes, very old.
- How old?
- Older than him.
Oh! Did you see his hair?
What kind of hair did he have?
- No hair.
- Bald?
- Maybe. He wore a hat.
- We saw only a shadow.
He was very thin and very tall.
Very long legs.
- Comme un faucheux.
- Un faucheux?
Yes, a faucheux.
A daddy longlegs.
Oh, a daddy longlegs!
Yes, a daddy longlegs!
Shh. Now, off to bed, quickly. Be very quiet.
Don't wake up the others.
Daddy Longlegs.
Papa faucheux.
Daddy Longlegs
Daddy Longlegs
Pretty please make
My little dream come true
Daddy Longlegs
If Cinderella's godmama
Could make her coach and four
I'm sure a real-live godpapa
Could do a whole lot more
Make me pretty
Make me witty
Make mejust as nice
As a girl can be
Don't know how
I'll find a way
But I'll pay you back someday
Daddy Longlegs
Wait and see
Julie, Julie.
Daddy Longlegs
Wait and see
That'll be a dollar and a half.
Keep the change, please.
Thank you.
- Hi!
- Hi!
Through those portals, sister.
See ya.
See ya.
- Hi!
- Hi there.
- Hi.
- Hi!
Frosh?
- Pardon?
- Freshman. Are you a freshman?
Oui. Uh, yes.
I'm a freshman.
Well, you must be our
French girl, Julie Andre.
Oh. You know about me, huh?
Yes, I have a list of everybody and where they come from.
I'm Pat Whithers, senior.
Welcome to Walston College.
Thank you.
You're in Room 205 with Linda Pendleton and Sally McBride.
Right up the stairs and down the hall to your left.
Thank you, Miss Senior.
Egghead! Egghead!
Egghead!
Egghead!
Hit it, mama!
- Okay.!
- Come on, everybody.
Welcome, egghead
Wipe that smile off your face
Never speak until you're spoken to
What an egghead
You're an egghead
But you're soon gonna be hard-boiled
Blow your nose, dry your ears
Get up and salute when a senior appears
Move your feet
Get out the lead
Put a hat on to cover the point on your head
Tummy in, sweater out
And eliminate that supercilious pout
But since you are a lady, dear you're very welcome here
Welcome, egghead
You're an egghead
But you're soon gonna be hard-boiled
- Oh! Oh, pardon.
- Excuse me.
Hi. I'm Sally McBride.
This is Linda Pendleton.
- Hi.
- Hi. Hi, Miss Pendleton. I am Julie Andre.
We've heard about you. We're both signing up for French and we expect to get straight A's.
You know, I'd help you with English, but I'm a total loss at it myself. I smell.
Oh! You do?
- At English.
- Oh!
However, I have got a brother at Harvard who's real smooth.
So if I were you, I'd cultivate me.
You better cultivate Linda too... because her folks are big muck-a-mucks around here.
Every time you need a new building or something, her uncle coughs up the mazuma.
Oh, pipe down, Sally. Look, have we said anything that you can understand yet?
Well, most of the words, yes, but the meaning, l-
- I thought so.
- Don't worry. You'll get with it.
Uh, one of us has to sleep in a room by herself.
Would it bother you if you slept alone?
Alone?
A bedroom for myself?
Oh, no. No, no, that would not bother me at all.
Good, then that's settled.
Now, uh, where's your trunk?
Uh, l- I don't know.
What do you mean you don't know?
Didn't you pack?
Oh, yes, but, uh-
All I packed was this.
She's smart.
She believes in traveling light.
Well, surely those aren't all the clothes you have for the whole year, are they?
I don't know. Uh-
Uh, come in.
Miss, uh, Julie Andre?
- Yes, that's me.
- We got a couple of trunks for you.
Oh!
- Okay.
- Oh-
- Oh, you-
- If I didn't-
Good night!
Why, I've never seen anything so big.
- Oh, Julie.
- I don't believe it.
- Miss Andre?
- Yes?
Will you sign here, please?
- And you were the girl who didn't have any trunks?
- Here?
- Yes, please.
- Oh, and she believes in traveling light.
Oh!
Look at them- at two of them.
- Thank you.
- Thank you.
- Well, come on! Aren't you gonna open them?
- Open them!
Ooh, yes. Yes.
- Hurry.
- Well, uh-They are locked.
Well, of course they're locked!
Where are the keys?
Oh, uh-
Oh, the keys!
- The keys!
- Of course, the keys.
Oh, well, uh, I am tired of saying I do not know... but I do not know.
Well, look, we'll try my nail file.
It works great on my sister's diary.
- Yes?
- Julie?
- Yes?
- This just arrived, special delivery.
- Oh, thank you.
- Now, don't get used to this kind of service.
- It's only the first day.
- The keys!
- I think it's the keys.
- See if you're right.
- There they are. There they are!
- Will you come on? Hurry up.
- I am.
- Hurry! I have a strange feeling...
I'm gonna be the best-dressed girl on campus.
- Oh!
- Oh, my heavens. Look at them, will ya?
Oh!
- Oh, wow!
- Wow!
- Wow!
- Oh!
- Whoo! Ooh.
- Oh, get a load of these labels.
- It's from my guardian.
- Are you sure he's your guardian?
Oh, yes, that I do know.
- Oh, there's so many of them.
- Oh! Ooh, here it is.
- What? Oh.
- They're beautiful.
- Oh, this is the one that I like.
- Oh.
- Pardon. Yes, I'll be back.
- Isn't this a beauty?
Look, Linda. You know, if I lose about five pounds-
- I can step right into this one.
- Oh, that's beautiful.
- How did he know my eyes were blue, the darling?
- Julie?
Julie, I'll swap you a date with my brother for a chance to wear this dress.
- Eh?
- Swell, it's a deal.
- There's still some more in there.
- Oh, my heavens, look-
- Oh, I've never seen so many.
- Aren't they beautiful?
- Sally?
- What?
Sally, do you think he's really her guardian?
- Huh?
- Well, I don't care what his intentions are.
His taste is divine.
- Julie? Julie?
- Coming.!
Eh, behold- an American "froshman."
Oh, you look-
Look!
"Dear Daddy Longlegs...
"or perhaps I should say-
Dear kind person... who sends orphans to college."
Yesterday morning...
I was in France.
And tonight...
I am... sleeping in...
Massach-
Walston.
"It is strange to be writing letters to somebody you don't know.
"It is very strange for me to be writing letters at all.
"Never before had I anyone to write to.
But now I belo-"
"But now I belong to somebody...
"and it is a very comfortable sensation.
"I will try to make you proud of me.
Yours very respectfully,
Julie."
Is, uh, Mr. Pendleton to see this?
No. No, Miss Pritchard.
Just start a new file.
"Andre." "Julie Andre."
Yes, Mr. Griggs.
"Dear Daddy Longlegs, I doubt that it will interest you...
"but this semester
I have moved up two places.
"I am now 12th in my class.
My average is just above a 'B'."
Griggs speaking. Yes.
Oh, she is?
Uh, just a moment.
- Yes, Griggs, old boy. - Jervis, your sister-in-law, Gertrude, is on the phone.
I just left for Alaska.
She's called five times.
It's about your house at Murray Bay.
She's decided to spend the summer there with Linda.
She wants you to have it redecorated. French provincial.
She wants me to have my house redecorated...
- so she can use it for her vacation?
- Yes.
For Gertrude, it seems a fairly reasonable request.
Well, you can tell my sister-in-law she can-
Uh, tell Mrs. Pendleton
Mr. Pendleton... will be very happy to have her use the house.
Yes, he agrees with her that French provincial should be most attractive.
He wonders why he didn't think of it himself. Yeah.
Now, where was I?
"My average is just above a 'B'."
- What?
- The Andre letter.
Oh.
Uh, file it.
You didn't finish reading it!
"It is very hard to go on writing to a- a thing.
"You never answer my questions. You never show the slightest interest in anything I do.
"You don't praise, and you don't scold.
"It's like having a machine for a father.
"I love college, and I love you for sending me...
"but couldn't you write just one letter?
Not too respectfully yours,
Julie."
- File it, Miss Pritchard.
- Isn't somebody, someday going to answer that poor child?
All right, all right!
Dear Miss Andre... your letter of the 23rd received.
Mr. Smith's attention will be called to your progress.
I'm sure he'll be pleased with the report. Very truly yours.
That's a cheerful, breezy little note.
I'm sure that'll warm her up!
What do I know about writing to a young girl?
All right, destroy my letter.
Continue the old arrangement. File it under "A."
Yes, Mr. Griggs.
Mr. Griggs!
A person is not a corporation.
A person is- is, uh, flesh and- and blood and- and feelings!
On slide three,
I don't like the word "coach."
Pendleton Airways is selling something better than coach travel.
We must find a new phrase.
Yes, Griggs.
- Jervis, a person is not a corporation.
- Really?
Uh, "Cabin Clipper"just occurred to me.
How does that strike you?
A person is flesh and blood and feelings and has to be treated as such.
- I'll vote for that. Where do I register?
- Your treatment of her...
- has been absolutely shameful.
- She's a monster.
Sometimes I think my poor brother gave up the ghost just to get away from her.
Not your sister-in-law.
I am referring to Miss Julie Andre.
- Miss Julie Andre?
- Oh, I'm not in the least surprised!
- Yes, sir?
- Miss Pritchard, bring in that file.
- Which file, Mr. Griggs?
- The one you've been crying into.
Crying in the file?
Not only does it sound inefficient... it sounds like a tune on the hit parade.
Say, what's going on around here?
Nothing is going on around here, and it's all your fault!
Over two years ago, you impulsively, capriciously... against the better judgment of the American ambassador and myself... picked a young girl out of a French orphanage... and deposited her in Walston College.
- Oh, thatJulie Andre.
- Yes, thatJulie Andre!
She's been kicked out!
Griggs, how could you let this happen...
- after all we do for that college?
- She has not been kicked out.
She stands 12th in her class.
She's a lovely, sensitive, marvelous girl, one that any parent should be proud of.
And yet, no one pays the slightest bit of attention to her.
- Thank you, Miss Pritchard.
- Thank you, Mr. Griggs.
For a moment I was afraid there was a baby in it.
- What kind of a performance was that?
- For more than two years... that poor girl has been pouring her heart out to you in those letters.
And you haven't answered one of them.
You haven't even bothered to read one!
Now, wait a minute.
That was the arrangement. l-lt had to be done anonymously, remember? Alec insisted upon that.
At least you could've asked about her.
Shown some compassion, some humanity.
Hmm. Oh, I see.
I see.
You're in love with her.
Y- No, Jervis, it's much worse than that.
- She's in love with you.
- Y-What?
Although you don't know it, you've been a thoughtful and considerate guardian.
She spent the last two summers on your farm in Nova Scotia.
Although she thinks
Linda's responsible for that.
- Linda?
- Your niece.
Gertrude's daughter. The one you haven't seen since she was born.
- Oh, yes. Horrible looking baby.
- Well, she's no longer... a horrible looking baby, and she's Julie's roommate.
- Who put them together?
- You did.
It was the only way you could arrange for Miss
Andre's summer vacations without causing talk.
And last Christmas, you sent her a nice present.
- I did? What?
- Three pairs of... silk pajamas.
- Griggs-
- All right. Miss Pritchard selected them.
All in all, Miss Andre has a lot to thank you for... and she's very devoted to you.
She calls you her
"Dear Daddy Longlegs."
Y-
"Dear Daddy What-legs?"
Well, it has something to do with your shadow crawling on the wall...
- or a spider, uh, uh-
- Oh.
- Jervis, I think you'd better read these letters.
- I think I better read 'em too.
"Dear Daddy Longlegs."
Hmm.
Hmm, she's a prolific little thing, isn't she?
Uh, Griggs, uh, w-will you tell Miss Pritchard... to hold all my calls until she hears from me?
Dear Daddy Longlegs, you never answered my questions...
and they were very important.
Are you very bald?
Orjust a little bald?
Are you very old?
Orjust a little old?
Oh, well, on second thought, please don't answer.
Not that you will.
It is just as much fun...
not knowing anything about you.
It leaves me free to imagine whatever I want.
You could be anything.
Sometimes I think that you are...
a Texas millionaire.
That's what you are.
And you are so rich...
that there is a special department in the United States Treasury...
which works only on your income tax report.
Down in Texas where the stars are bright
Down in Texas where they treat you right
Everybody sings this little song
Daddy, Daddy why's your legs so long
Love your figure
'cause it's so corn-fed
Love that hair upon your pumpkin head
- Though you're richer than Vanderbilt
- Yoo-hoo!
Daddy, Daddy where'd you get them stilts
Now, chicken in the bread pan pickin'up dough
Stick out your hen and pick out your rooster
First prize is a block of stocks
Second prize is Fort Knox
Let me introduce that dancing fool
Long-leg Tex with the big, fat wallet
Wait'll he starts to walk the dog
He'll bug out your eyes like a stomped-on frog
Alouette left and Alouette right
Parlez-vous and "FrreJacques"
Both feet up
Make a hole in the ground
Hands up high and the gents go under
Grab your gal and swing her like thunder
Kiss her once andjump forjoy
Kiss her twice-
Well, maybe not.
You're probably an international playboy.
No, no, no, no, no.! l- I don't like you like this.
I prefer to think of you...
as my guardian angel.
Oh, it's very confusing.
I wish I knew who you really are.
I wish- I wish one day you would write and tell me.
Your lonesome... Julie.
Will you get my sister-in-law on the phone, please?
- Who, sir?
- My sister-in-law, Gertrude Pendleton.
Oh.
Hello.
Hello, Gertrude.
Tell me. How's Linda?
Who is this?
Jervis?
I don't believe it.
You've been drinking.
No, no. Not a drop. l- I merely called up to find out about my niece.
Uh, tell me.
How is she enjoying college?
Jervis, this is very peculiar.
Linda is 20 years old, and you haven't seen her for more than 19 and a half.
Oh, you're so right.
You're so right, Gertrude. l- I've been the worst of all possible uncles. I'm sorry.
Uh, say. How about you and me driving up to see her?
But this is insane. All I wanted you to do is writeJulie a letter.
Will you keep quiet?
No, no, no. Not you, Gertrude. l- l-There's a mechanical device here that produces strange noises.
Uh, w-
Uh, spring dance? Saturday?
Oh. Sounds charming.
Fine. Uh, we'll drive up together.
Wonderful. Wonderful.
See you then. Good-bye.
But you can't do this. You can't go to the school and reveal yourself to that girl.
It's violating your- your promise to Alec.
Griggs, how you do carry on.
I have no intention of revealing myself.
I'm simply going up there to visit my niece.
And while I'm there,
I'll get a look at my orphan.
But-
Mrs. Gertrude Pendleton on the phone.
Put her on.
Yes, Gertie.
Why, of course it was me you were talking to a moment ago.
Who else? Who else but Linda's UncleJervis?
Oh, Jervis, please remember that you're with me and don't leer.
I wasn't leering.
I was just looking around.
I hope you'll remember, they are very young.
Time cannot wither nor custom stale your infinite charm, Gertrude.
I don't know what wild plans you have,
Jervis, but I don't propose to-
- Ah, here comes Linda.
- Oh!
Linda, darling.
Can you ever forgive your UncleJervis?
- For heaven's sake, Jervis. That's not Linda.
- Oh, I am sorry.
- What in the world are you doing here anyway? Linda, dear.
- Mother.
I don't suppose you remember your UncleJervis, but that's perfectly all right.
- He doesn't remember you either.
- Hello, UncleJervis.
Linda, dear. I-I've been very foolish in not coming to see you more often.
- You're lovely.
- Why, thank you.
Mm-hmm. Well, I guess
I haven't made a mistake.
- What?
- Well, I took the liberty of-
- That is, the girls insisted I fill out a dance card for you.
- Sounds charming.
So if you just go and stand under your initial... you'll be claimed like a piece of luggage at an airport.
A well-traveled piece of luggage.
Linda, dear, do I have the pleasure of a dance with your mother?
- Why, no. Oh, I mean- Well, it never occurred to me when l- - My, my. Isn't it a shame?
Well, here I go.
- Come off it, McBride.
- You can't keep her to yourself.
Sorry, boys. I gave up one dance to somebody's uncle, and that's as far as I'll go.
- I beg your pardon, Professor.
- That's quite all right, fella. Quite all right.
Only I don't happen to be a... professor.
- Mr. McBride.
- Yes, Miss Andre.
- I believe this is our dance.
- Thank you, ma'am. Pardon us, Professor.
I told you
I was not a prof-
- Oh, you must be UncleJervis.
- Oh.
- Well, I'm Sally McBride, Linda's roommate.
- I thought Linda's roommate was-
Oh. You mean the vision of loveliness that just danced off with my brother?
Well, that's Julie Andre.
She's the third cell mate.
Oh, I see.
- Well, uh, shall we have a go at it?
- Why, uh-
Of course, if this is too bluesy for you, we could sit this one out.
- Well, I'll do my best.
- All right.
- I, uh- I can do the box step.
- Oh.
One, two. One, two.
Well, you're quite good.
Thank you. I'm glad those lessons weren't a complete waste.
- Oh.
- Last week they put me on Spanish rhythms.
Hmm. Mr. McBride seems to be quite taken with Miss Andre.
Taken? He's Georgia, and she's Sherman marching through.
- Uh, she the same way about him?
- She'd be a darn fool if she weren't.
Hmm.
- Am I leading?
- Well, up to now, I think it's a tie.
That's a fault of mine.
It comes of going to a girls' school.
- Well, that's that.
- Thanks a lot.
Oh, and, uh, you won't forget.
Tomorrow afternoon we're playing Vassar.
- I do hope you can be there.
- Good luck. Although I'm sure you could beat Yale.
Why, thank you!
Mr. Pendleton?
I am Julie Andre.
How do you do?
Is this our dance?
Yes. If you'd rather not dance, we can talk.
Oh, I think I'd like that. Isn't there, uh, someplace we could go?
In the garden perhaps? Or maybe that would be bad for your reputation.
Uh, it would.
Come on. Let's destroy my reputation.
Spring is in the air, isn't it?
Yes. Isn't it?
Now, uh, where do you suggest we have our flirtation?
Well, one usually goes that way.
- Tell me. Haven't we met somewhere before?
- No.
That sounds like what the boys usually say, but haven't we?
No. No. l- I'm sure
I would have remembered.
I have the funniest feeling-
- Of course. I know. Come on.
- Where?
- You'll see.
- Oh!
I'm sorry. I beg your pardon.
I was just, uh-
- Miss Andre, where are you taking me?
- You'll see.
There you are.
Grandfather.!
What a wonderful way to end his days: in the middle of a girls' school.
Ah. Did he have a weakness for ladies?
Oh, no. Great strength.
Ah. Did you inherit that tendency?
That is a very direct question.
Ah. Suppose it is.
But, you know,
I never talked to an uncle before.
How do I talk to an uncle?
Very respectfully.
And you don't ask questions. You answer them.
Now, sit down, and do just that.
- Yes, sir.
- Not quite that respectful.
- Yes, UncleJervis.
- That's better.
I take it that you haven't any uncles of your own.
No uncles, no aunts, no cousins... no brothers, no sisters, no nothing.
- Isn't there anyone who-
- Oh, it's a very sad story.
My father and mother were the duc and duchesse de Monchartres... and they both died before I was born.
- Both.
- Yes.
It was during a typhoon.
Our yacht overturned in the Sargasso Sea... and I was the only survivor.
Hmm.
- If you don't believe my story,
I have several others...
which are much more interesting.
I'm sure you have.
I only tell the stories because nobody believes the truth.
Would you like to dance now?
Uh, yes. l- I would.
Uh... would you tell me what the truth is?
Yes. I have a guardian.
I see. Now, what sort of man is he?
Oh, he's tall and very skinny.
He always walks with a cane, and he's bald up here.
But he has a lovely fringe of white hair all around.
- All around?
- Uh-huh.
Sounds perfectly stunning.
Oh, don't you make fun of him.
I love him very much.
- When I get out of college, I'm going to live with him.
- Huh?
- You are?
- Yes.
But it's a surprise. He doesn't know it yet.
I have it all planned.
I'm going to read aloud to him and plump his pillows... and warm up his slippers... and always make sure he wears his galoshes when he goes out.
From the way you describe him...
I don't think he'll be going out very often.
Oh, well. He's not a boy anymore.
That is, uh, probably true. Uh-
Does he ever come to see you?
- No.
- Well, why not?
Well, he doesn't care anything about me really.
Oh. Now, I'm sure he does.
Oh, I just pretend. One must have somebody to love, you know.
So I make believe that he really cares.
- Maybe he does care, more than you think.
- Oh, he does, huh?
I write to him all the time whenever
I get lonely. He doesn't even read my letters.
- How do you know?
- He throws them in the wastebasket.
He does no such thing.
I mean, I, uh, uh, don't think he does.
Then why doesn't he ever answer?
Dropsy.
Probably can't hold a pencil.
Oh la la.
Hey, you.
Oh. It's only you, Professor.
I was gonna punch somebody in the nose.
- Hey, Julie. We missed a dance.
- Oh. Sorry, Jimmy.
This is Mr. Pendleton.
He's not a professor.
- Oh.
- Mr. Pendleton, Jimmy McBride.
- How do you do?
- How do you do, sir? Natural mistake, of course.
- Of course.
- Come on, Julie. They're gonna do "Sluefoot."
Oh, good.
Excuse us, UncleJervis.
Thank you for keeping
Little Red Riding Hood away from the wolves.
Now hear this
Now hear this
Everybody everybody, everybody
Get ready for sluefoot
Go!
You want a dance that's easy to do
Then dig the one
I'm hippin' you to
I'm gonna teach you to fall in on what they are callin'
The sluefoot
You make your right foot point to the north
You make your left foot point to the south
And then you stroll sort of westerly
Slow and "siestally,"Sluefoot
Don't be an oddball and don't be a fig
Try
Why be shy
After all, it's even better if your feet's too big
You put the old posterior out
Then you manipulate it about
It is the most
"lackadaisiest"
I mean the craziest
Sluefoot
You gotta rock like a rockin' chair
The step is clocklike but slightly square
You count to one, two, three, four
- Then you holler
- Sluefoot
- You put your toe out
You drag it back
- You really go out, You ball thejack
- Terribly sorry. l-
Do what you done, done before when you holler
Sluefoot
Well.
All right.
Sluefoot
- Go, Julie!
- Yeah!
Don't stop now.
Hey. That's it!
- My, my, my!
- That's it. Keep goin'.
Stay with it!
Yeah, yeah!
- Good morning, sir.
- Good morning.
Thanks.
Hello, Jervis.
Oh, hello, Griggs.
Wonderful day, isn't it?
Yes. The market opened very strong.
- Bring the mail?
- Did I ever fail to bring it, Jervis?
No.
My dear fellow, what are you in such a foul mood about?
The first days of spring always affect me this way.
Oh. Oh, Griggs. Uh, will you please have this record sent to Miss Andre?
- And who is sending the record?
- I am, of course.
Yeah. I'm aware of that, Jervis, but in which incarnation are you sending it?
Jekyll or Hyde?
UncleJervis or Daddy Longlegs?
Jervis Pendleton, and you can leave off the "uncle," if you don't mind.
What you're looking for is in the personal file.
Thank you, Griggs.
"Dear Daddy Longlegs, l-"
"I'm- I met
Linda's UncleJervis.
He seemed very nice."
"He seemed very nice."
"He seemed very nice."
"But an awful thing has happened.
Oh, not to me, but toJimmy McBride.
"He's had a dreadful disappointment.
He was all set to go to South Africa as a mining engineer when the project blew up."
"lmagine. Only about a month from graduation...
"and he considers himself a failure.
"If he would follow my advice, he'd stay in this country...
"and work in his father's overalls factory.
But he hates it."
Hmm. "I can't tell you how miserable I feel for him."
- Griggs.
- Yes, Jervis.
- Would you come here a moment, please?
- I'll be right there.
"He was all set to go to South Africa as a mining engineer when the project blew up."
Uh, Griggs, I'd like to do something for a young chap I know.
Name's McBride.
Brilliant mining engineer.
Do we have an opening for him?
Well, our New Jersey lab can always use a bright young man.
No, no. Not- Not, uh- Not New Jersey.
He- He's the adventurous type.
He- He'd want to go far away.
You know, see the world kind of thing.
I see. Someplace out of the country, eh?
He'd sign up for a year's contract.
As a matter of fact, he wants to.
He's a good man.
Very highly recommended.
- By whom?
- By-
By me. l- I, uh- I met him at that college dance recently.
He's a friend of Linda's.
I was quite impressed with him.
I, uh- I have an eye for these young people who are going places, you know.
Going places.
How about our tin mines in Bolivia?
- Bolivia?
- Would that be far enough away for you?
- It's not for me. It's for him.
- Oh. Of course.
I can't imagine what
I was thinking of.
- Our mines in Bolivia sound ideal.
- Oh, they are.
Almost inaccessible. Takes two days to reach them after you get off a burro's back.
Fine, fine. Uh, will you get
Miss Pritchard in here, please?
- Miss Pritchard?
- Yes. I want her to take a letter now.
I thought perhaps you wanted to teach her the sluefoot.
Hi, Jervis.
Oh. Hello, Larry.
How are you?
- Fine, fine.
- Good, good.
- Meeting someone?
- Yeah. My niece Linda and her roommate.
They're coming down from college.
- Oh, yes? I wish I knew she was on the plane.
- Yeah. Oh.
- Jervis, how are you?
- Hello, Julie. So good to see you. How was the flight?
- Just wonderful. Wonderful.
- Well, Jervis, I'll just-
Pardon me. Uh, M-Mr. Hamilton,
Miss Andre. Uh, uh-
- How do you do?
- Where-Where's Linda?
- She couldn't come.
- She couldn't come?
- No.
- Well, as I was saying, Jervis, I'll just be buzzing along.
Uh, three's a... you know what.
- Very happy to have met you.
- Good-bye.
Uh, uh-
What happened to Linda?
Oh, she woke up this morning with the sniffles... and she told me her colds always get much worse before they get better... so I just let her-
- Shouldn't I have come alone?
- Oh, yes. Of course. Certainly.
I'd have been very disappointed if you hadn't.
- Oh.
- Really. Are these your baggage checks?
- Yes.
- John, will you handle these for Miss Andre, please?
Yeah. Sure.
This way, please,
Mr. Pendleton.
Oh. Jervis, you know, it's-
It's just beautiful.
Count four towers over and nine towers to the right.
In the basement of the 10th tower there's a lovely little restaurant.
I thought we might have dinner.
Why don't we have it right here so we can see the lights of the city?
Don't they teach you anything at that college?
You know what they'll be thinking.
Oh, it's ridiculous.
What time would you like to dine?
Oh, anytime.
- Be back at 7:00.
- Mm-hmm.
- Black tie?
- But of course.
You know, Jervis. I've worked out your whole past.
That doesn't surprise me in the least.
There was someone years ago.
She was tall, slender... blonde, very beautiful, and you loved her madly.
But she married someone else.
- Oh, she was very foolish.
- Thank you.
So you never loved anyone else since.
Is that the way it was?
No. There never was a tall, slender blonde... but there was a short little redhead.
And then there was a very large brunette.
And then there was someone
I met in Switzerland.
- And then there was-
- Hmm. Oh la la.
- And you loved them all?
- Madly.
Hmm. And why didn't you ever marry?
I didn't love them that madly.
I don't think you ever will.
Marry?
Hmm.
That all depends.
You know, there's an old theory.
I mean-
When an irresistible force
Such as you
Meets an old immovable object
Like me
You can bet as sure as you live
Something's gotta give, Something's gotta give
Something's gotta give
When an irrepressible smile
Such as yours
Warms an old implacable heart
Such as mine
Don't say no because I insist
Somewhere, somehow someone's gonna be kissed
So, en garde
Who knows what the Fates have in store
From their vast mysterious sky
I'll try hard
Ignoring those lips
I adore
But how long can anyone try
Fight, fight, fight, fight
Fight it with all of our might
Chances are
Some heavenly star-spangled night
We'll find out as sure as we live
Something's gotta give, Something's gotta give
Something's gotta give
When an irresistible force
Such as you
Meets an old immovable object
Like you
Your morning paper.
Oh.
Uh, did anything happen yesterday?
- A man got robbed.
- Tsk, tsk, tsk, tsk. What a shame.
A girl got married.
Ah. That's nice.
Who did she marry?
- A man.
- Oh.
They've been in love for a long time.
Oh.
Anything else happen?
Yes. But it's not in the paper.
- Oh.
- Good night, Julie.
Good night, Jervis.
Excuse me,
Mr. Ambassador.
- Right this way, Mr. Ambassador.
- Thank you.
I think you'll find this to your liking.
This wing is very quiet.
- How much is it?
- It's worth $200,000.
- Did you say something, Griggs?
- l-
- I was merely inquiring about the price, Jervis.
- Hmm.
Uh, have you something simpler?
Much larger, but simpler.
Yes, Mr. Pendleton.
I think we have the very thing.
Hmm.
Well.
I, uh- I think that's kind of cute, don't you?
Very cute.
Oh. Very cute.
Well, that's it.
I'm glad you all agree.
Now, if you'll excuse me, I have a breakfast appointment. Good-bye.
Uh, uh, you understand, of course, this is subject to the lady's approval.
Naturally. But I think you should know, Mr. Griggs... it's been our experience that a diamond of that quality... never comes back.
Never.
Thank you.
- Coffee now, Jervis?
- Yes, please.
You know, last night was the most wonderful night of my life.
- I'll drink to that.
- Yes.
And let's drink to today.
Look how beautiful it is.
I'm glad you like it. I ordered it especially for you.
I suppose if you're a Pendleton you can make anything happen.
- Can't you, Jervis?
- Mmm. Not quite.
Some things are in the lap of the gods.
You know, Jervis, yesterday when I arrived from college... and you looked so stern, and you thought that I should not have come alone-
Well, I have a confession to make.
I was really terribly afraid and unsure.
But it's been very wonderful.
You know, last time I came in that airport was when I arrived from France.
Was that only three years ago?
Seems like forever.
Let's drink to France for having sent you here.
To America for letting me come.
Connect me with 3203, please.
- Hello?
- I'd like to speak with Mr. Pendleton, please.
Oh. Just a minute.
Jervis, it's for you.
- Hello.
- Jervis, you are the most contemptible... deceitful, dishonorable character it has ever been my misfortune to know.
Who is this? Who?
Oh, uh- Oh. Well, yeah.
I think so, Alec.
Well, all right. I will.
Right away. Yeah.
Um, Julie, I'll be right back.
Uh, just a few minutes.
- Where are you going?
- Some friend of mine wants to see me.
You finish breakfast.
It won't be long. Just-
Hi.
Well, I'm waiting.
Say something.
All right.
Why aren't you in France?
I am here to report to the secretary of state.
- Then why aren't you in Washington?
- I'll be there tonight.
Now that I've answered your questions, suppose you answer mine.
- What are you doing in that next suite?
- Why, you evil-minded-
Jervis, the last time you accused me of being evil-minded... was when you wanted to bring that young
French girl to this country to "educate."
- Alec- - Never mind what the newspapers would make of all this.
How you enlisted the services of the
United States government in your enterprise.
Never mind the part I played.
Let's leave all that out. Think of the girl.
She is here on a student's visa.
Her behavior is subject to constant scrutiny.
She could be expelled, her passport picked up-
Now, wait a minute. Now, wait a minute.
Alec, it is nothing like that.
Jervis, I was on the terrace.
Now, I'm no eavesdropper... but I'd have to be deaf not to overhear the conversation...
- you and the young lady were having at the breakfast table.
- Like what?
"Jervis, last night was the most wonderful night of my life."
Even the most generous interpretation of that is horrifying.
And serving her cocktails at this hour.
- Cocktails? Are you nuts?
- I distinctly heard the glasses clink.
It was orange juice.
Nobody clinks orange juice glasses.
I haven't been out of the country that long.
- Alec, you've got it all wrong. I'm in love with the girl.
- Is she in love with you?
I don't know. I was just about to ask her when the darn phone rang, and it was you.
I'm glad I was in time. What could the poor girl have said but "yes"?
- She could have said "no."
- Don't be ridiculous.
You've obviously swept her off her feet.
You're older than she is.
That's always very attractive.
- You're rich, and that's even more attractive.
- Mm-hmm.
You've changed her life completely, for which she must be very grateful.
She doesn't know anything about that.
She doesn't know that I'm her Daddy-
Daddy what?
Daddy Sugar?
Oh, shut up.
She only knows me as Jervis Pendleton, the uncle of her roommate.
The uncle of her roommate.
Doesn't that at least give you pause?
Not particularly. I'm not the only man she's met in America.
Uh, she's also interested in a Harvard graduate.
Can he afford to bring her to New York and entertain her in this style?
- Well-
- Of course not. He's probably out looking for a job.
He is not. He's working in Bolivia in the tin mine. Now, if you'll excuse me-
It wouldn't by any chance happen to be the Pendleton tin mine, would it?
Well, uh, he- he- he needed a job, uh-
And, well, what's the matter with helping young people? Uh-
It's an interesting hobby.
You seem to have embraced it vigorously.
Well, he applied for a job in Africa.
The project blew up, and- and I just happened to have an opening in Bolivia.
King David.
What are you talking about?
David sent Uriah into battle because he coveted Bathsheba.
Oh, no. Oh, no.
Oh, I've had just about enough.
Now, look here, Alec.
There's nothing underhanded or deceitful about this. l-lt is true
I sent that young man-
Well, he was going out of the country anyway.
He needed a job, and- and I sent him.
Oh, sure. Sure the girl is much younger than I am. l- I'm not denying that.
Sure I'm rich.
There's no question about that.
Certainly I did everything possible to sweep her off her feet.
But doesn't every man who's in lo-
Ah, you're absolutely right.
It's insane.
What was I thinking of?
I don't know.
- You got a cigarette here?
- Hmm.
She must be very attractive, Jervis.
Very.
I'll, uh-
I'll- I'll bring that boy back from Bolivia.
Alec, have you any idea how many hotels there are in New York?
- Not the slightest.
- There are hundreds, thousands.
But, Jervis,
I always stop here.
3203, please.
Jervis, where are you?
What are you doing?
Uh, I'm downstairs in the lobby.
Uh, listen. Something terribly important has just come up... and I'm afraid I won't be able to get back there to see you.
No, no. No.
I'm- I'm all right.
It's just-just business.
You know, uh, State Department.
Um-Well, it's rather hard to explain.
Uh, there are certain things about it that I'm not at liberty to discuss.
- Can you understand that?
- Of course I understand. When shall I see you?
Well, uh-
They may-They may want me to go abroad.
In which case, uh, l- I won't see you for quite some time.
Oh.
Oh.
Oh, l- I see.
I see. Oh.
Well-
Oh, no. I'm-
I'm not upset. I'm... just disappointed.
Uh, Julie, um,
I want you to see New York.
And, uh, I'll send the car and the chauffeur or anything you want.
Thank you very much.
Did you say something?
Well... bon voyage.
Thank you.
Take care of yourself, Julie.
Good-bye.
- Hey, Linda. Catch.
- Hey. You sure this is mine?
Positive.
How am I ever gonna fit this in?
Oh. How do you suppose we ever accumulated so much junk in only four years?
- Say, Linda. Is this yours?
- No.
Well, I don't know who it could belong to.
Anyone belong to this? Hi.
- Hi.
- Hi, Julie.
- Last call. Anyone belong to this?
- Oh. Sally. Sally, it's mine.
Oh. I never saw you wear it.
- Yeah. I know, but it's mine.
- Oh.
Hey, Julie.
Aren't you gonna pack?
Oh. We have plenty of time.
There's a whole week till graduation.
Well, don't you want your things to get there before you do?
Yeah.
I guess so.
Do you know something?
I don't even think she knows where to send her trunks.
- No, it's not that. It's that darn UncleJervis of mine.
- Yeah.
Now you see him, now you don't. There they were having a perfectly wonderful time... and suddenly he calls her up and says he has to go away.
He's been traveling ever since.
Last time I heard, he was in Madrid.
- I thought he was in Calcutta.
- That was three cities ago.
- Last week he was in Hong Kong.
- Oh, the beast.
Still, he can be awfully nice when he wants to.
Look how nice he's been toJimmy.
- Yeah.
- Brought him back to New York.
- Raised his salary. Raised it twice.
- Hmm.
And you can hardly say
Jimmy's been a success.
You know, that new experiment of his nearly blew up the whole lab last week.
I know. My UncleJervis is very strange.
Very.
Rio. Jervis Pendleton in Rio.
Personality of the week in India.
Lisbon.
Spain. Oh-
The Opera of Paris.
Oh, zut.
Dear Daddy Longlegs-
May I please come to see you?
I am desperately... in need of advice.
And there is no one...
I can turn to but you.
Something's gotta give, Something's gotta give
Something's gotta give, Something's gotta give
Something's gotta give
Something's gotta give, Something's gotta give
Something's gotta give
Julie. Julie.
Huh? Oui?
- Oh, Linda.
- I was just going down to the post office.
Want me to mail that for you?
Oh. Oh, yes. Please.
- Can you wait a minute?
- Sure. Take your time.
- Mr. Griggs.
- Yes.
- You are critically ill.
- I am?
- The doctors have no hope for you.
- They haven't?
We must cable Mr. Pendleton to come home immediately.
- There's been another letter from that girl.
- Yes, Mr. Griggs... and what are we going to do about her?
You can't just hand somebody the world and then take it away from them.
Well, I'm in the process of drafting a letter to her now.
- I've been told that she's to be married shortly.
- Oh, a lot you know.
Well, in the event that she doesn't, a trust fund is being established.
And from that she'll be given a sensible income each month.
- She'll have security for the rest of her life.
- Security?
I have security, and believe me, it's nothing.
You have security, and a duller life nobody ever led.
Well, I'm glad to know what you think about security, Miss Pritchard... because you may be about to lose yours!
I can't, Mr. Griggs, because I qualified for my pension last month.
Maybe that's why I don't care. But if you won't cooperate with me, I'll send the cable myself.
Y-
- Well, if you qualified for your pension, how about a drink?
- Bourbon on the rocks.
Uh-
What do you plan to say in that cable?
"Griggs critically ill.
Imperative you come home immediately.
Doctors have no hope."
Oh, that's fine.
Thank you.
If I'd offered you a drink 25 years ago, you'd have slapped my face.
How do you know?
You never asked me.
Helen Adams.
Julie Andre.
Sue Anthony.
Mary Armstrong.
Patricia Benton.
Margaret Benson.
Come in.
Congratulations, my dear.
Congratulations.
- Well, thank you.
- I had a lovely cry too.
This is the first graduation
I've been to since my own.
Well, I don't want to appear impolite, but should I know you?
There's no reason why you should.
I'm Alicia Pritchard.
- And I've come to take you to seeJohn Smith.
- Oh. John-John Smith?
Daddy Longlegs.
Oh.
He wants to see me.
Well, let's say he's going to see you.
Oh.
- Who is he?
- I think he should tell you that himself.
Now you hurry and change because we're going to New York.
Oh.
- We go to New York today?
- Today.
- Today? She's bringing her here today?
- Very shortly.
That cablegram was right.
Brother, you are sick. Sick in the head.
Don't you know about that girl and Jimmy
McBride? Why, they're suited to each other.
They'll be married, happy and have children.
Why, ifJulie comes here today and- and finds out that I did everything... she'd- she'd be beholden.
She'd fling herself into my arms out of gratitude. Now, who wants that?
Don't you know that's just the reason I went away?
Jervis, if I were you,
I'd pull myself together.
Miss Andre will be coming through that door very shortly.
Oh. Well, when she does, do you know who she's gonna find sitting behind that desk? You.
- Me?
- Yes. You started all this, and you can handle it.
- You are Daddy Longlegs. Sit down.
- But-
She's never seen you before.
You fit her description of me... better than I do myself, you old fuddy-duddy.
But this is ridiculous.
What would I say to her?
I don't give a hang what you say to her.
You can propose marriage for all I care.
Let's keep this thing tucked around you so you'll look properly feeble.
Keep your head down. You know, you haven't the strength to keep your chin up anymore.
- You've been very ill. Remember?
- Oh!
Okay. That's good.
Ah. Whistler's father.
You may accept my resignation from your employment- effective as of this moment.
It's too late now. Don't you dare move. Yeah?
- Mr. Pendleton-
- Fine. Have her come right up.
- Yes, sir.
- Now, Jervis, don't be a fool.
Look. I'm an expert at being a fool.
That's why I know
I'm not being one this time.
Y-Y-
Uh, come in, my dear.
Sit down, my dear.
The-The time has come to tell you...
I am John Smith.
Well, I am not Pocahontas.
I'm Linda Pendleton, and I want to see my UncleJervis.
- Linda. Linda.
- Well, w-
- Hello, my dear.
- Hello, UncleJervis.
Now how did you know
I was back?
I have a very nice spy who works for you.
- That doesn't surprise me a bit.
I am surrounded by spies.
UncleJervis, I have a dreadful problem. I must talk to you.
Go right ahead.
- Oh, I have no secrets from Griggs.
- Well, I have.
Thank you. Thank you very much,
Miss Pendleton.
I am so glad to be out of something.
- Well, don't go far.
- Hmph!
Sit down, honey. Tell me.
Uh, what's on your mind?
UncleJervis, I'm in love, and I want to get married.
Well, there's no problem there.
Sounds very nice and natural.
Mother's very much against it.
She doesn't approve of him.
Well, if your mother doesn't approve, you've probably made an excellent choice.
Why don't you just elope?
Or is that too old-fashioned?
No, but I would like a big wedding.
Silly of me, I suppose, but I'm only planning to be married once.
- That is old-fashioned.
- Don't joke, UncleJervis.
I thought perhaps if you talked to Mother... told her how well he's doing at the lab, what a wonderful future you see ahead for him... well, she might forget that his father manufactures overalls.
I think she's afraid his whole family will attend the ceremony in overalls.
Uh, Linda. Linda.
Uh, you couldn't by any chance be speaking of oneJimmy McBride?
The one and only.
Jimmy McBride and you?
How perfectly wonderful. l-lt's sensational.
But tell me.
Uh, uh, when and how?
I got him on the rebound,
UncleJervis...
- but I got him, and that's all that I care about.
- Well, congratulations, my dear.
Your mother will give you the biggest wedding this town has ever known.
- Do you think so?
- I know so. You know why?
- Because I'm going to pay for it.
- Oh, thank you!
I hope you'll be very happy.
Now, make a list of the presents you want.
A long, long list.
Don't stint.
- You're only doing this once, you know.
- Oh, UncleJervis, I love you.
- I love you. If you'll excuse me, I'm expecting-
- Of course. I understand.
Oh, oh. Listen, honey.
Uh, how is, uh-
Uh, how- how is Julie?
- Julie Andre?
- Mmm.
She's- Oh, she's having the most dreadful time. She's terribly unhappy.
Is she?
I thought you'd be glad to hear that.
Good-bye, UncleJervis.
- Good-bye. Good-
- Thank you.
Thank you.
- Griggs.
- Yes?
- Have I been rude to you?
- Most.
Forgive me.
You're utterly charming.
You're a little fat boy with wings and a bow and arrow, and I'm very fond of you.
Mmm. You're a dandy.
Here we are.
This is where he lives.
- Who shall I ask for?
- Don't worry about it. You're expected.
Thank you, Miss Pritchard.
Thank you for everything.
- Miss Andre.
- Yes.
May I take your coat?
Wait just a moment, please.
- As we continue to view-
- Thank you.
this truly remarkable collection of art...
one feels more and more a sense of debt toward its donor.
Now we come to some of the impressionists...
a group of painters who have always been a subject of great controversy.
Their break with the past was viewed with great horror by the academic school...
who had for so long reigned supreme in French art.
This is a Renoir.
Actually, it is a painting of the daughter of the marquis de Marineau... and was said to have been done in 1894.
Will you please stay with the group, miss?
- Me?
- We cannot have people wandering off by themselves.
I must insist that you stay with the rest of us.
Renoir is famous for his paintings of children...
but this is one ofhis finest.
Here we have a Corot.
- In this painting, the foliage, far more than any signature- proclaims the painter.
- Note the rich use of browns and yellows.
- Jervis.
A truly fine example of Corot at his best.
For him, the countryside was a constant source of inspiration.
The homely, rustic scene is brought to life here with great sensitivity.
Hello, Julie.
Hello.
- What are you doing here?
- Shh! Quiet, please. Quiet.
- Do you know my guardian?
- Oh, yes. Yes. Very well.
- Oh. You never told me before.
- He asked me not to.
But I knew you were coming here today, and I had to see him first because... there was something very important I wanted to ask him.
Now, ladies and gentlemen, as is customary, we conclude the tour-
- I'm so happy to see you again.
- with the Pendleton family portraits.
Here we have the portrait of the firstJervis Pendleton... painted by
James Abbott McNeill Whistler.
Jervis Pendleton II sat, or-
stood, as you can see, forJohn Singer Sargent...
whose portraits are hung in every important museum in the world.
This is
Jervis Pendleton III... who, as you can see, has broken with the family tradition somewhat.
Well, good afternoon, ladies and gentlemen.
That concludes our tour.
Thank you very much.
Oh, miss. The tour is o-
Oh. I beg your pardon, sir.
Yes. Of course, sir. Good day, sir.
Tell me.
When you saw John Smith... what did you ask him?
Since he's your guardian,
I felt I should ask his permission... before asking you to marry me.
Oh. What did he say?
He said I'd have to wait my turn- that he wants to ask you himself first.
Ah.
Well, why don't you?
[Rock Around The Clock by Bill Haley and His Comets playing]
 1, 2, 3 o'clock,
4 o'clock, rock, 
 5, 6, 7 o'clock,
8 o'clock, rock 
 9, 10, 11 o'clock,
12 o'clock, rock, we're gonna rock 
 Around the clock tonight 
 Put your glad rags on and join me, hon 
 We'll have some fun when the clock strikes one 
 We're gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 We're gonna rock, rock, rock, 'til broad daylight 
 We're gonna rock, gonna rock, around the clock tonight 
 When the clock strikes 2,
3 and 4 
 If the band slows down we'll yell for more 
 We're gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 We're gonna rock, rock, rock, 'til broad daylight 
 We're gonna rock, gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 When the chimes ring
5, 6 and 7 
 We'll be right in 7th heaven 
 We're gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 We're gonna rock, rock, rock, till broad daylight 
 We're gonna rock, gonna rock, around the clock tonight 
 When it's
8, 9, 10, 11, too 
 I'll be goin' strong and so will you 
 We're gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 We're gonna rock, rock, rock, 'til broad daylight 
 We're gonna rock, gonna rock, around the clock tonight 
Well, that's it, Georgie.
The band's through here.
We're canceled out.
That's the 3rd time on this tour.
What kind of a manager are you?
How do you expect to draw crowds in a town of this size?
This wouldn't have happened if you'd listened to me a long time ago.
I tell you, all the big bands are breaking up.
People aren't dancing anymore, they're listening.
Oh, so I'm supposed to break up my band?
The public's going in for sounds, Georgie.
They want to hear small groups, vocalists, novelty combos.
Sure.
That's right, Steve.
Put the blame on everyone but yourself.
As the band's manager, you do a bad job of selling us--
A bad job of selling?
You listen to me.
The only thing that's stayed up to date
In this band of yours is your watch.
Why don't you get wise to yourself, Georgie?
Take a look at the figures on record sales
And then look at the size of the crowds you've been drawing.
Maybe I should book you into a schoolhouse during fire drill.
You might be able to clear 'em out fast with the kind of music--
You're fired.
Good.
I wouldn't want you to say
I was disloyal by quitting.
But take my advice,
Georgie.
You wait around long enough for a proof that the big band business is dead,
You'll be paying the funeral expenses.
Good luck to you.
Steve.
Steve's giving you the right hop, pop.
I don't like funerals, either.
See you around the cemetery.
Corny, look, there's no reason for you to cut out on the band.
Maybe hiller can still get some work.
Stevie-boy, the handwriting's on the wall.
So I either hock this thing or turn it into a ferryboat.
Where we goin'?
New York.
I think I can get a job with one of the big booking offices.
You thinkin' of
Corinne Talbot?
I wasn't thinkin' of anybody.
Do we leave in the morning?
Ready at 8:00.
Soon as I put on my traveling clothes and lulubelle here
Puts on her g-string.
All righty?
All righty.
Awful lonesome up here.
You sure you know where you're goin'?
According to the map, and it's been right the past 3 days,
We should hit a little town called Strawberry Springs
In time to stay over for the night.
Sort of a shortcut.
Hmm.
Sounds good enough to eat.
What does?
Strawberry shortcut.
Aw, Corny, go back to sleep, will you?
Hey, Corny, wake up.
We made it.
Strawberry Springs, population 1,472.
This is a cute little town, wasn't it?
Now, if we can find a hotel or a motel.
An old barn, anything.
I'm beat.
Hey, man, move the wheels.
You're blockin' the road.
Come on, daddy-o?
We're in a hurry.
Looks like we're holdin' up the works.
We go for 150 miles without seeing a car.
The minute we stop, road hog.
Come on!
Let's go, let's go, come on!
Steve,
The whole 1,472 must be out at once.
Yeah, look at 'em.
Hey, there's a motel up ahead.
Let's hope they have a room.
Yeah.
With hot and cold-- hot and cold running,
I know the joke.
Evenin', neighbor.
Evenin'.
Your sign says you have a vacancy.
Yep.
We don't get many tourists in this neck of the woods.
Stayin' long?
Nah, just overnight.
Probably pull out in the morning.
Say, pop, where's everybody goin'?
Uh, the young 'uns?
This is saturday night, neighbor.
The young 'uns wouldn't
Miss their dance at the meetin' hall.
You mean, they're all going to a dance?
This is saturday night.
Maybe nobody told them that dance band music was dead.
It's probably a dance for squares.
Square dance?
That's what I said.
They've probably been doin' that kind of stuff up here for the last 100 years.
Got a match?
Just the same, they dance, and i'd like to know why.
You think anybody would mind if we went?
I reckon your money's as good as anybody's.
Good. show us to our cabin, will you?
We'll get cleaned up a little bit.
It's over there, 12.
She's open. go right in.
Ok, thank you.
"Dance for squares."
Man, them 2 cats don't dig the most at all.
At all.
[see you later, alligator by Bill Haley and His Comets playing]
Hey, Steve, we must be out of our cotton-pickin' minds.
We should be gettin' some sleep instead of comin' here.
Maybe so.
But something's getting these people out of their houses.
I'm gonna find out what it is.
Ah, what kind of
Cornball music can they have
In a burg like this?
Probably Joe Grubnic
And his "makes you want to sit this one out" orchestra.
They're slaughtering cattle.
Did you hear that?
All I can say is square dancing has sure changed.
 See you later, alligator 
 After 'while, crocodile 
 See you later, alligator 
 After 'while, crocodile 
 Can't you see you're in my way now 
 Don't you know you cramp my style 
I told you, slaughtering cattle.
Corny, how long has it been since you've seen a dance hall jump like that?
About 3 years ago at Roseland
When that flea circus act got loose.
What is that outfit playin' up there?
I don't know.
It isn't boogie, it isn't jive, and it isn't swing.
It's kind of all of 'em.
Hey, sister, what do you call that exercise you're gettin'?
It's rock 'n' roll, brother, and we're rockin' tonight.
It's rock 'n' roll.
 Can't you see you're in my way now 
 Don't you know you cramp my style 
 When I thought of what she told me 
 Nearly made me lose my head 
Say, pardon me, friend,
Would you tell me what the name of that band is?
Later, man, later.
I'm gone, now.
I don't dig nothin'.
 But the next time that I saw her 
 Reminded her of what she said 
 See you later, alligator 
 After 'while, crocodile 
Miss, pardon me, do you know the name of that orchestra that's playing?
Crazy, man, crazy.
 After 'while, crocodile 
 Can't you see you're in my way now 
 Don't you know you cramp my style 
 She said,
I'm sorry, pretty daddy 
 You know my love is just for you 
 She said,
I'm sorry, pretty daddy 
 You know my love is just for you 
 Won't you say that you'll forgive me 
 And say your love for me is true 
 I said, wait a minute, 'gator 
 I know you mean it just for play 
 I said, wait a minute, 'gator 
 I know you mean it just for play 
 Don't you know you really hurt me 
 And this is what
I have to say 
 See you later, alligator 
 After 'while, crocodile 
 See you later, alligator 
 After 'while, crocodile 
 Can't you see you're in my way now 
 Don't you know you cramp my style 
 See you later, alligator 
 After 'while, crocodile 
 See you later, alligator 
 So long that's all 
 Goodbye 
All right!
Say, friend.
Yeah?
Nice guitar you've got there.
Well, thank you very much.
And we were just trying to find out the name of your band.
The name?
Hey, guys, we got a couple of foreigners from the flatlands with us.
Are you serious?
You mean you've never heard of Bill Haley and The Comets?
Well, i, uh,
I've been kind of sick.
I don't get out much.
Well, stick around, alligator.
Rockin' will cure anything you have.
Ready, boys? yeah.
[rock-a-beatin' boogie by Bill Haley and His Comets playing]
 Rock, rock 
Say, friend, you back in this world yet?
Descending, daddy-o.
Comin' in on a cloud.
How come nobody's dancing?
 Rock, rock, rock, everybody 
 Rock-a-beatin' boogie beat 
 You take a rock, you take a beat 
 You take a boogie, you make it sweet 
 You take a rock-a-beatin' boogie 
 Rock-a-beatin' boogie beat 
 Well, the rock-a-beatin' boogie 
 B-o-o-g-i-e! 
Dig, man,
When the most is on the floor, we give 'em room.
 Shakin' to the rhythm of the rock-a-beatin' boogie 
 Jumpin' to the rhythm of the rock-a-beatin' boogie 
 Rompin' to the rhythm of the rock-a-beatin' boogie 
 B-o-o-g-i-e! 
 You gotta jump, you gotta jive 
 You gotta dance, to be alive 
Look at that crazy hop.
Hey, those 2 are good.
Square, huh?
You mean, you didn't know?
 Well, you're rockin' to the rhythm of the rock-a-beatin' boogie 
 Dancin' to the rhythm of the rock-a-beatin' boogie 
 Shakin' to the rhythm of the rock-a-beatin' boogie 
 Jumpin' to the rhythm of the rock-a-beatin' boogie 
 Rompin' to the rhythm of the rock-a-beatin' boogie 
 B-o-o-g-i-e! 
 Rock, rock, rock, everybody 
 Roll, roll, roll, everybody 
 Rock, rock, rock, everybody 
 Roll, roll, roll, everybody 
 Rock, rock, rock, everybody 
 Rock-a-beatin' boogie beat 
Say, uh, that was real keen.
Thank you.
Would you mind telling me what you fellows were playing?
Well, it's easy, alligator.
All you do is play the music upside down.
I suppose for waltzes you play it sideways?
Waltzes?
Watch your language, man.
There are ladies present.
Haley. Mr. Haley.
Mr. Haley?
That's right, friend.
And I can make them call you "mister" from coast to coast.
How'd you like to make a fortune?
In money?
You kidding?
Of course I ain't kiddin'.
All depends on how the crops go.
Sometimes we get paid off in turnips, sometimes in onions--
Ok, in money.
What do we have to do?
Well, you're musicians, aren't you?
Just on saturday nights.
The rest of the week
I'm a tractor mechanic,
Billy has a farm,
Johnny sells seeds, al-- ok, listen.
What if every night was saturday night?
It'd be all right, I guess.
It'd sure mess up the rest of the week.
What if you fellows were musicians all the time and never did anything else?
Something wrong, bill?
Oh, nothing's wrong, Miss.
Incidentally, you were very good.
Thank you.
You work with the band?
Yes.
Then you're in on the deal, too.
I beg your pardon?
Who are you?
Well, I'm Steve Hollis.
I manage orchestras.
You're also managing to be very vague.
Well, maybe I should start from the beginning.
Perhaps you can tell me when and where we can have a little talk?
We can talk here,
I guess.
The dance ends at 12:00.
All right, cinderella.
This is one 12:00
When you won't turn into a pumpkin.
We'll hang around.
Come on, Corny.
Hey, are these 2 guys for real?
[A.B.C. Boogie by Bill Haley and His Comets playing]
Goin' off your rocker,
Steve?
What do you expect to do with an outfit like that?
Corny, we've been kiddin' ourselves too long.
If there's no dance band business, we don't work, right?
So let's find a high bridge and jump off.
No, that's what we're gonna do if my idea doesn't pan out.
You know what we're gonna do first?
Jump off a low bridge?
We're gonna try to get the people dancing again.
I figure if Haley's combo can do this in Strawberry Springs,
Maybe they can do it in the rest of the country.
Buster, is that a long shot.
What have we got to lose?
Well, we got, uh...
Nothing.
I don't know,
Mr. Hollis.
What might be good for us here might not be the answer someplace else.
But I'm not asking the boys to give up their jobs.
Not yet.
Not until I get them a concrete offer.
But, of course, once we get started,
They're gonna have to forget about tractors and seeds.
It sure is a big step.
Lisa usually does that kind of thinking for us.
Well, they have security here,
Mr. Hollis.
Do you call it security, being perched up on a mountaintop?
Why, you kids have talent.
Talent's something you can sell for big money,
Not just onions and turnips.
I hadn't thought dancing the rock 'n' roll was talent.
Take my word for it, honey.
Any gal that can make a guy's eyes pop out
The way you can has plenty of talent.
And nobody can demonstrate this dance
Better than you and your brother.
What do you say?
Do we ride the gravy train together?
How much gravy do you expect for your trouble?
Well, we'll--we'll split,
Corny and i'll take 40.
You shouldn't get more than 10.
Now where did you get that kind of information?
I've read  variety.
Then you should know, my dear young lady, that I'm not an agent.
I'm a manager.
It's a common thing for managers to get 40%, sometimes even 50.
We'll have to think about it.
All right.
How long?
Until you come down from that 40%.
In that case, we'll both think about it.
My name, incidentally, is Lisa Johns.
This is my brother, Jimmy.
Hi.
My father owns the motel.
That's where you can find us when you've made up your mind.
Let's go, Jimmy.
Don't look at me,
Mr. Hollis.
If Lisa won't go for the 60-40,
There's nothin'
I can do about it.
Well, what does she want?
You got me.
All I know is we always get 100% of the onions and turnips.
Leave it to a woman to make all the trouble.
Look, why don't you forget the whole thing?
How are you gonna get booking for a new outfit like that
Without going to Corinne Talbot?
Don't worry.
I'll find a way.
Sure.
Corinne's agency has every top hotel
And nightclub tied up for bands
And acts from New York to California.
You won't get anywhere selling The Comets into some broken-down dive.
In that case, i'll just go to Corinne, that's all.
Definitely.
You know, she won't even let you in her office unless you agree to marry her.
Oh, she's probably forgotten all about that by now.
Besides, what's one thing got to do with the other?
Business is business.
Corny, I'm so sure about that Haley bunch and that girl.
If I could just get 'em signed to a contract and promote 'em right,
We got a sensation on our hands.
You want to take it from old Cornball?
With the face and the figure on that Lisa doll,
She's probably been promoted by experts.
Oh, I'm not talking about that kind of...
Hey, maybe I am.
Sure.
Sure. romance, Corny.
That way I may be able to soften her up into making the deal.
Hey, now wait a minute.
These farmers up here have shotguns.
Ugh, get off of it.
She's no farmer's daughter.
You heard her say so yourself.
Her father owns the motel.
In that case, he probably has 2 shotguns.
Eh?
Eh.
Oh, boy.
Ah.
Get a load of that air.
Take it easy, lad.
What do you wanna do?
Frighten your lungs to death?
Ha.
There's your shotgun bait.
Lisa.
Good morning.
Good morning.
You're up and around kind of early, aren't you?
It's 9:30.
Most folks have been up since 5:00.
I told you.
It's the air.
Nobody can sleep.
Mr. Hollis, this is my friend Holly Jenkins.
Hi.
Corny Lasalle.
Hello, Mr. Lasalle.
How do you do?
How about showing me the town?
Oh, I'm sorry.
I was just on my way for a swim.
Oh, you have a swimming pool?
You might call it that.
I'd be glad to show you the town.
I'll tell you what,
Holly.
You show Corny the town,
And Lisa will show me the swimming pool.
Uh...
I'll get my trunks, huh?
Does your friend always do things on the spur of the moment?
Depends on who's wearin' the spurs.
That didn't take long, did it?
No, just long enough.
I was wondering how you'd look in a bathing suit.
I bet you were.
I must have my imagination overhauled.
You, uh, even look better than what I had dreamed up.
Thanks.
Smell the strawberries?
They grow wild around here.
You come here often?
Often as I can.
That must be what makes them wild.
You don't waste much time.
It's my imagination.
It's in a hurry.
Men's imaginations are always faster than they are.
Oh, what do you mean by that?
You're leading up to the point when you think you can kiss me.
Oh, well,
I don't know about that.
It's all right.
There, it's finished.
Now we can talk about other things.
Who wants to talk about other things?
You do.
To you, I'm just a silly, romantic girl
Who'll want to give you 40% when you should have 10.
No, wait.
I didn't say anything--
Perhaps you won't mind starting your argument at 30%?
Oh, now, young lady, if you think you're gonna...
You're taking advantage.
Isn't that what you wanted to do to me?
And you're also too suspicious.
Now, look, if you think
I'm a silly, romantic guy
Who's gonna take 10% when he should have 40...
Ok, you said it.
That's where I heard it.
Do you object to the way I do business?
I don't know yet.
Let's be fair about this. 25.
Then we have a deal?
Mr. Hollis.
Steve.
Steve.
You are leveling with us?
Honey, managing bands is my business.
If I don't get them work,
I don't eat.
All right, it's a deal.
I'll leave for New York the first thing in the morning.
Now, Corny will stay here and work out some more routines with you, hmm?
I think I'm scared.
There's a lot of world outside of Strawberry Springs.
Ah, don't worry, honey.
Why, the public will dig you the most.
Is that the way you say it?
Yeah.
Remember what
Christopher Columbus once said:
"The world is no square."
Oh, I'm sorry.
Why, Mr. Hollis.
Hi, Lynn.
It's good to see you again.
Nice seeing you.
I hope Miss Talbot feels the same way.
Well, we can find out.
Mr. Hollis to see you.
Send him in.
No earthquake.
Go right in.
Said the spider to the fly.
Thank you.
Hello, Stinker.
You didn't throw it back out, so I guess it's all right to come in.
Hi.
Hi.
I thought you'd be sore.
What about?
Men refuse to marry me every day.
Only those in the home for old men.
And you.
Steve, something's been bothering me.
Why did you lead me to believe you loved me?
Well, let's put it this way.
Why did you lead me to believe you loved all of this more than you could any man?
What's wrong with it?
It's made me rich.
I offered you
$20,000 a year
And a chance, if you worked out right, to become a partner.
Is that bad?
No, it's good.
Except that
I had my own ideas on how to become a success.
Or failure.
Yes.
Except that I at least had my choice.
You're stubborn.
You know, talbot enterprises is the biggest agency in show business.
I don't go around offering a deal like that to every man I meet.
Perhaps you should.
You're a cinch to come up with something better than old Steve.
Then why did you come here?
Business.
A favor?
No, i--i think I can make some money for you.
I never discuss business during business hours.
That's logical.
How about over dinner?
I have to go to the chez suzette tonight
To talk to Tony Martinez about his new booking.
Oh, don't worry about it.
It's on me.
A business expense.
Ok, you've got a deal.
I have a new gown that shows off my vanity in the right places.
I know what you mean.
Don't be too stubborn,
Steve.
I'd hate to see you in the home for old men.
[cueros by Tony Martinez and His Band playing]
Well, my pet,
I hope you haven't forgotten your mambo.
No, it's a little bit like swimming.
You throw a man in the water, he'll swim.
He doesn't want to drown, you know?
I'm not sure
I like the comparison.
Steve, you're trying to be a crusader
With an unknown band such as The Comets.
Tony Martinez is going to be the top novelty outfit in the country.
That's why he's doing business.
After he finishes here he goes to the West River Club with The Platters vocal group.
It's a hot group.
Martinez gave the public something new.
That's why they want him.
Now Haley's got something new, too.
Look, Corinne, i...
I'm not an amateur in this business, you know?
I didn't just get off of the bus.
I've been around a little while.
I think I can pick a winner as well as the next guy.
You've picked a few in your day.
Then why don't you do this?
Book the Haley combo into the right place.
Give 'em a showcase.
And give Lisa Johns and her brother a chance to demonstrate the dance.
This Lisa's a doll, you know?
Looks great, young, fresh, sparkles.
She can't Miss.
Just how old is this doll?
Well, she's 20, 21.
What's the difference?
I'm not sure I know.
Suppose we forget about the dance act and talk about the band.
But they work together.
Look, it takes a great dance team to demonstrate rock 'n' roll.
The young folks all over the country want to see how it's done,
So they can do it, too.
Now, if it's demonstrated right...
And if I don't book the band and the act?
Then there's other agents.
You know better.
We'll manage.
Shall we leave now?
Still stubborn.
Let me think overnight about
Mr. Haley and The Comets.
We can decide in the morning, huh?
They're playing our song.
I never heard it before.
Then from now on it'll be our song.
Come on, darling.
Mike?
Yeah.
Will you come in, please?
Mm-hmm.
That booking for the Mansfield School for girls up in Hartford,
2 weeks from today.
A graduation prom.
Tony Martinez plays the date before he goes to the West River Club.
We still need an inexpensive band to alternate with Martinez.
Yeah, something high-class.
This Mansfield School is the most exclusive in the country.
Calls for a real sweet combo.
You know, heavy on the violins, light on the brass.
The booking mean much to us?
One shot.
Some of these one-nighters are more nuisance than they're worth.
That's what
I was thinking.
I have the alternate band.
Who are they?
A new combination.
They're called Haley's Comets.
Soft music, sweet, refined.
Just the thing for the dear little girls of mansfield.
Ok, boss, if you say so.
You know how they'll be received as well as I do.
I think I know just how they'll be received.
You know, these, uh, these lily-white hands are working too hard.
So you'd rather put them in dishwater?
Maybe you'd like playing housewife.
Look, boss, we're in the right business.
We could write beautiful music together.
We could book ourselves into heaven 52 weeks a year.
Hmm.
Such nice words.
Steve could never think of something like that to say.
Steve Hollis?
He's in town.
Well, I suppose
I can wait for you
As long as you can wait for him.
I'm changing my campaign.
I'm going to play rough.
You think that'll get him?
I don't know.
But i'll know a lot more when we go to Hartford in 2 weeks
To hear Haley's Comets.
Lisa.
Steve.
Hi, honey.
Oh, Steve.
Hey, you did that like you meant it.
We greet all our guests here like that.
Stevie-boy.
Hi, Corn.
Hi, Steve.
Hi, Jimmy.
Well, are we big broadway stars, or aren't we?
Well, let's just say that, uh, you'll be close to broadway.
How close?
Hartford, Connecticut.
Hartford?
Yeah, it's a one-night stand.
It's a high school prom.
Tony Martinez and the band will be there.
No kidding.
Steve, I found somethin' else while you were gone.
Another outfit. with Lisa and Jimmy, The Comets,
And this new bunch, we have our own unit.
What's the name of the act?
Freddie Bell and the Bellboys.
When they don't work nights over at the mill,
They come to our saturday night dances, too.
Are they good?
Oh, yeah.
All right. now look, this is a solid chance.
The top booking agent in the country will be at Hartford to see you.
The top booking agent.
Corinne Talbot.
Yeah, Corinne Talbot.
You sold your soul to the devil.
You sold out for a mess of porridge.
Who's Corinne Talbot?
I told you, porridge.
Only she's no mess.
Uh, Corny's crazy.
Look, this is a great opportunity.
This can be the start of everything for you kids and the band.
Steve, we're in no hurry.
If you don't want to do business with this talbot woman,
We can find other ways.
That's what I told her.
No, it's all set.
Now, we're gonna rehearse every night until we leave.
Corny, you tell Haley and the boys.
Yeah.
Come on, Corn. you can use the phone in the office.
Bully.
You know, when you get there,
Hartford will be closer to broadway than ever before.
Steve, I'm worried.
This doesn't look like a rock 'n' roll crowd to me.
You're right.
Still, the talbot agency should know what they're doing.
I wouldn't trust that Corinne as far as
I could throw lulubelle.
Maybe they just want a contrast in the music, huh?
Man, is it going to be a contrast.
When do we go on?
As soon as Martinez finishes this number.
I'll go get the boys ready.
Senor, if we keep on playing music like this all night,
We'll have much trouble in staying awake.
Just remember what we've been told.
There is to be no exciting music.
Just music.
Si, senor.
It's a living.
Why did you wait until tonight, when we get to Hartford
To tell me that Haley's Comets are a jive outfit?
Those school people will throw them out bodily.
I own talbot enterprises, Mike.
I think I'm entitled to tell you what I please.
This'll make fools out of us.
Just out of Steve Hollis.
You weren't kidding.
You are playing rough.
I want Steve broken, in pocketbook and in spirit.
You think you'll want a man who has to crawl to you on his knees?
I'll decide that when the time comes.
I want that band to fail, and I want that girl
To go back to wherever she came from.
A girl you've never even seen.
I heard Steve talk about her.
It wasn't what he said.
It was the way he said it.
I wonder if you'd, uh, go to all of that trouble for me?
You mean, you'd still want me after what I just said?
Some people love murderers.
There's the hotel.
Well, that's it.
The Comets go on next.
Steve,
I'm scared stiff.
Ah, relax, honey.
Just imagine you're still in Strawberry Springs, hmm? the Bellboys set to go on?
Soon as we call 'em.
Ok, The Comets will warm 'em up first, huh?
Well, everything looks normal.
Our friend
Mr. Haley is just about to cross over the bridge.
 On your mark 
 On your mark 
 Get set 
 Get set 
 Now ready 
 Ready 
 Go 
 Everybody, razzle dazzle 
 Everybody, razzle dazzle 
 Everybody, razzle dazzle 
 If it's all night long 
 Now here's a dance 
 Wack-a doo, wack-a-doo 
Infamous.
Barbaric.
 It's the hipster's dance 
 Wack-a doo, wack-a-doo 
We're dead.
They're not dancing.
Everybody's afraid to break the ice.
Come on.
But, Lisa, they'll crucify you.
 Wack-a doo, wack-a-doo 
 You just take your baby 
 Don't you leave that spot 
 Then you dance like crazy 
 Give it all you've got 
 That's the razzle dazzle 
 If you're ready or not 
 On your mark 
 On your mark 
 Get set 
 Get set 
 Now ready 
 Ready 
 Go 
 Everybody, razzle dazzle 
 Everybody, razzle dazzle 
 Everybody, razzle dazzle 
 If it's all night long 
[audience clapping to the beat]
 Let's get together 
 Get together 
 1, 2 and 3 
 1, 2 and 3 
 Jumpin' to the center 
 To the center 
 Just you and me 
 Just you and me 
 Put your best foot forward 
 Wack-a doo, wack-a-doo 
 Baby can't you see 
 Baby can't you see 
 When you hear them holler 
 And you ain't nowhere 
 Honey, you just foller 
 'cause we're sure not square 
 That's the razzle dazzle 
 Well, it's everywhere 
Stop them. stop them.
Mr. gilfillan, do something.
Just a minute,
Miss dunlop.
My father's going to donate a new library to this school.
You stop the dance, i'll stop the library.
Oh!
 Everybody, razzle dazzle 
 If it's all night long 
Shall we dance, Miss Mullen?
Oh!
 Everybody, razzle dazzle 
 Everybody, razzle dazzle 
 If it's all night long 
So The Comets are going to be thrown out bodily, huh?
 That's the razzle dazzle 
Pardon the expression, boss, but you goofed.
 Razzle dazzle song 
Hi, Mike.
Steve.
Thanks for the big break, Corinne.
Regardless of what's happening here tonight,
The--the big hotels and clubs will never buy The Comets.
Maybe if it was part of a revue with real talent.
Are you kidding?
You see what
Lisa and her brother are doing out there.
Besides, we have a revue.
I'll get the Bellboys.
You kids were wonderful.
Thanks, Steve.
It was awful lonely on that floor for a while.
Excellent.
You succeeded in making a bunch of whirling dervishes
Out of girls who were brought up to be ladies.
Now wait a minute.
You were fine.
Miss Talbot didn't expect that sort of reaction.
Would you mind telling me what she did expect?
I'm sorry we pleased the audience, Miss Talbot.
I thought that's what we were supposed to do.
Hey, Lisa. uh, th-there's the Bellboys.
Oh, let's watch.
[I'm gonna teach you to rock by Freddie Bell and the Bellboys playing]
 Hello, everybody 
 I mean, everybody 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 Yeah, we're gonna teach you to rock 
 Yeah, we're gonna teach you to rock 
 Yeah, so come on and rock with us 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 Yeah, we're gonna teach you to rock 
 Yeah, we're gonna teach you to rock 
 Yeah, so come on and rock with us 
 If you can't swing, get out of the way 
 Well, we don't want no squares 
 Once you learn and you get in the groove 
 You'll jump around and you won't have no cares 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 Yeah, we're gonna teach you to rock 
 Yeah, we're gonna teach you to rock 
 Yeah, so come on and rock with us 
 I said 1, 2, 3, 4 
 Rock, rock, rock, rock 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 Well, we're gonna teach you to rock 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 I'm not Arthur Murray teach you in a hurry 
 Teach you mighty slow 
 Once you learn and you get in the groove 
 You'll jump around and you'll stop the moon 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 We're gonna teach you to rock 
 I said 1, 2, 3, 4 
 Come on and rock with us 
Well, you heard the Bellboys,
Miss Talbot.
What do you have to say now?
There it is, Corinne.
That's our whole unit.
The band, the kids, and the Bellboys.
You can book all
3 acts together.
Sorry, Steve.
I don't think the agency can sell your people.
These sort of acts aren't in our line.
See you back in town.
Good night, Miss Johns.
I think she's dead wrong about all of you.
I hope you make it on your own.
Good luck, Steve.
Thank you, Mike.
If the Bill Haleys and the Bellhops can make like they make,
Why can't we make like we make?
Because the professors have taken the "cha" out of our cha chas.
So we sneak back a couple of little cha chas, maybe?
We sneak.
[Mambo Capri by Tony Martinez and His Band playing]
Steve, maybe it's my fault.
I shouldn't have talked to her the way I did.
Ah, no.
Get one thing straight, honey.
It's--it's really my fault.
She's out after me, and all of you are gonna suffer for it.
We're not licked yet.
Maybe, maybe not.
I just think you'd be better off
Without me around, that's all.
Steve, that's not fair.
You got us this far, you can't pull out now.
Sure, we made cats out of these squares tonight
And you're the one that proved we could do it.
You gonna admit that a dame like
Corinne beat you?
Well, look, I'm perfectly willing to keep trying if you want it that way.
Crazy, man.
He's stayin'.
Give me some skin.
Yeah.
Yeah, but make no mistake about it now.
There's gonna be a lot of tough sleddin' ahead.
We're headin' for New York right after this shindig's over, ok?
 Rocking and rolling the cha cha cha 
 Rocking and rolling, rocking and rolling the cha cha cha 
I know that precious conscience of yours,
Mike,
So I'm not going to ask you to take care of this.
Must be pretty bad if you don't entrust it to my conscience.
I shudder at myself sometimes
When I think of the things I do.
It's so nice to have power.
Ok, ok.
I'll be your straight man.
What are you cookin' up this time?
The agency has a lot of friends, Mike.
And you're going to use them to keep
The Comets from working.
You're going to blackball Steve.
In impolite circles it's known as
"lowering the boom."
Corinne, Confucius say:
"Woman who want man thinks of 1,000 ways to make him love her
And no ways to make him hate her."
That's because
Confucius was a man.
When Steve hates me enough, he'll know that he can't live without me.
Well, so what's the score?
We've been in
New York about 2 weeks.
We've had about
2 dozen turndowns
And we got about 2 dozen bucks left to our name.
You put 2 and 2 together, and what do you get?
Too, too depressing.
If I were old enough to believe in fate, i'd say it was against us.
How do you like that?
Even the radio's singin' the blues.
They make a fortune singin' about trouble.
We spend a fortune getting into it.
In short, we spent our roll on rock 'n' roll.
This is yours truly,
Alan Freed,
The old king of the rock 'n' rollers,
Speaking to you directly from the West River Club.
Alan Freed.
Where we're broadcasting
Our rock 'n' roll party.
Steve, doesn't that ring a bell with you?
And appearing here in person...
If it does, I didn't hear it.
I've been counted out, pal.
No, no kidding, Steve.
Alan Freed is emceeing the show at the West River Club.
Remember when he was running the Alamo Theater down in texas?
The Alamo Theater, yeah.
Well, you loaned him
$1,000 to put on a show.
Corny, you don't think often, but when you do,
You make up for lost time.
Honey, run over to your place and put on something pretty, we're goin' steppin'.
The West River Club?
Yeah.
There's just one thing I've got to say to Mr. Alan Freed.
What's that?
Remember Alamo.
Forget it.
Good evening, ladies and gentlemen,
And welcome to the West River Club.
We're very happy to have you with us tonight and we're really gonna rock 'n' roll.
This is yours truly,
Alan Freed,
The old king of the rock 'n' rollers.
And you're gonna meet 2 of the most exciting combinations you've ever met in your life.
And here they are.
The Ernie Freeman combo
With the sensational recording group, The Platters.
[Only You by The Platters playing]
 Only you 
 Can make 
 This world seem right 
 Only you 
 Can make 
 The darkness bright 
 Only you 
 And you alone 
 Can thrill me 
 Like you do 
 And fill my heart with love 
 For only you 
 Wa, wa, wa, wa 
 Only you 
 Can make 
 This change in me 
 For it's true 
 You are my destiny 
 When you hold my hand 
 I understand 
 The magic that you do 
 You're my dream come true 
 My one and only you 
 Only you 
 Can make 
 This change in me 
 For it's true 
 You are my destiny 
 When you hold my hand 
 I understand 
 The magic that you do 
 You're my dream come true 
 My one 
 And only you 
 One and only you 
So that's--that's about it,
Alan.
I don't know whether Corinne Talbot
Really blackballed our group or not.
I--i just don't know.
I do know that if you'll give our unit a chance here, you'll never regret it.
Well, Steve, you don't have to sell me on rock 'n' roll.
I'll tell you what we'll do.
Uh, Ernie Freeman and The Platters
Leave for Miami the end of this week.
There's another outfit coming in,
But I think we can push 'em back.
And I think we can get your guys in here,
And I know they're gonna do a great job.
You just remember one thing, that Alan Freed did remember the Alamo.
All right?
It's a deal.
 1, 2, 3 o'clock,
4 o'clock, rock 
 5, 6, 7 o'clock,
8 o'clock, rock 
 9, 10, 11 o'clock,
12 o'clock, rock 
 We're gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 Put your glad rags on and join me, hon 
 We'll have some fun when the clock strikes one 
 We're gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 We're gonna rock, rock, rock,
'til broad daylight 
 We're gonna rock, gonna rock, around the clock tonight 
More telegrams.
Boss, you can't go on ignoring this rock 'n' roll stuff anymore.
Every hotel and club in the country is wiring for information.
The only information you can give them
Is that we don't handle that kind of music.
Corinne, for Pete's sake.
How far are you gonna carry this feud with Steve?
An agency has to keep up with the times, or fall on its face.
Corinne, listen to me.
Steve's in love with Lisa Johns.
He's not even looking at other women.
So you think it's all decided.
Lisa wants a ring on her finger.
You want to put a ring through Steve's nose.
Which do you think he'd rather have?
The thing to do, dear Mike, is to see that Mr. Hollis doesn't have a choice.
Call Steve and ask him to come over this afternoon.
Tell him it's very important.
Still playing rough?
Dear, dear Mike, just leave those telegrams on your way out.
Boys, i'll tell you what.
Let's try this.
Ok?
Ok.
All right.
Let's try it.
All right, I think we've got it now.
Let's do it, huh?
[rock by Bill Haley and His Comets playing]
 R 
 O 
 C 
 K 
 R-o-c-k rock 
 Take an "r" from an 8
To the bar 88 
 "o" from the tone of the sax syncopated 
 "c" from the key of a 6-string guitar 
 "k" from the kick of a rim shot meter 
 That's how they made it that's how they played it 
 R-o-c-k rock 
 I know my a's and my b's, and my c'sies 
 P's and my q's and my x, y, z'sies 
 Know how to lose all the blue, blue, bluesies 
 Jump in a pair of my dancin' shoesies 
 Date with my baby, rock with my baby 
 R-o-c-k rock 
 Oh,
Strauss discovered waltzes 
 The handy man found the blues 
 Then Haley came along with a rockin' song 
 Crazy, man, crazy crazy news 
 "r" you would hop, hear the band, it's a movin' 
 "o" more than that, it's a go, go, groovin' 
 "c" what I mean, it's a honky-tonk action 
 "k" like a kiss, it's a cool attraction 
 Who will getcha
I'm gonna betcha 
 R-o-c-k rock 
 R 
 O 
 C 
 K 
 R-o-c-k rock 
 Oh,
Strauss discovered waltzes 
 The handy man found the blues 
 Then Haley came along with a rockin' song 
 Crazy, man, crazy crazy news 
 "r," you would hop, hear the band, it's a movin' 
 "o" more than that, it's a go, go, groovin' 
 "c" what I mean, it's a honky-tonk action 
 "k" like a kiss, it's a cool attraction 
 Who will getcha
I'm gonna betcha 
 R-o-c-k rock 
Okay, fellows, that's it.
Take 5, huh?
Hey, Steve, phone call for you.
Oh, thank you.
You're welcome.
Hello.
Oh, Mike? hiya, Mike.
It's Mike Dodd.
Yeah, boy, how are you?
Oh, yeah, it's goin' great.
Yeah, things are really lookin' up for the kids.
No, no, we haven't set any engagements
After the West River Club.
No.
We've been holding out for the right spot.
Yeah.
Oh, Corinne?
Yeah, I could get in to see her this afternoon,
If it's strictly business.
All right, you tell her i'll be in this afternoon.
Ok, Mike.
How do you like that?
Corinne's after us now.
What do we need her for?
For one thing, Jimmy.
She handles class bookings.
I don't want to see you kids working in dives.
Hey, wait a minute.
Oh, I don't mean here.
I suppose from now on we won't be able to afford you guys anymore.
Well, first of all, we don't even know what Corinne's deal is yet.
Whatever it is, we'd work for nothing if you'd ask us, Mr. Freed.
Thank you, honey.
You kids have all been just great.
And you made more money for this place
Than they've ever made in their history.
And don't forget to tell Corinne Talbot that.
She'll hear it so many times, she'll think it's a broken record.
Wonderful.
Congratulations, everybody.
Thank you.
All right,
So I was wrong about The Comets and your Lisa Johns.
I'll tell you what i'll do.
I'll make you a deal.
Turn your contract with the unit over to the agency,
And you come in as a partner.
Split 50-50 with me on everything.
Sell my outfit to you, so you can sell them down the river?
You'll never get a deal like that anywhere else.
Maybe not.
No, Corinne,
I think your idea of a partnership
Has too many strings attached.
Then it's no soap?
No soap.
What do you want?
Bookings.
The best you've got.
What if we make a 3-year deal without a partnership
For The Comets, the dance team, and the Bellboys?
With a good chance that i'll get them on records.
You're startin' to make a little sense.
I'm prepared to make such a deal
With the unit opening in San Francisco.
Tell you what i'll do.
I'll talk to the kids, and i'll get back to you.
If they're smart, they'll take it.
It'll guarantee their future.
Hmm.
It won't do your future any harm, either, hmm?
See you later, hon.
Ok.
Get me Lisa Johns on the phone, please.
I'm sure you didn't ask me to have lunch
For social reasons,
Miss Talbot.
Steve told you about the deal, of course.
Yes.
You know what that 3-year contract could mean to you and the boys?
$100,000 the first year,
$200,000 the 2nd,
And $300,000 the 3rd.
It seems almost too good to be true.
There's one thing, however.
You're an investment,
Lisa.
You'll become an idol of the teenagers, you'll develop a big public,
Hundreds of fan clubs.
College boys will be voting you
The girl they'd most want to get caught in a compromising situation with.
My agency will be spending a fortune
On your publicity and exploitation.
The bigger you and the boys become,
The more money we'll all make.
But you're the only girl with the outfit.
The only one that means s-e-x.
Like a movie star.
I want my investment protected.
Of course,
I can understand that.
All right, then.
These are the facts.
If you get married, you won't be worth a dime to me or yourself.
The kind of public you're going to get
Won't want to think of you as a married woman.
In short, you will have to sign a clause
That for the life of the contract, 3 years,
You will not marry.
For the life of the contract,
I'm not to get married.
That's what the contract will say?
Exactly.
I don't know why you're worried,
Miss Talbot.
No one's asked me to marry them.
He hasn't...
I mean, they haven't?
Just the same.
You never know when some man
Is going to come out from under a rock
And pop the nasty question at you.
You'll have to sign that clause, or the deal is off.
If I kept all the boys from making a lot of money
Just because
I wanted to be married,
I'd certainly be a terrible heel, wouldn't i?
The heeliest heel that ever was.
How long will it take to make up the contracts?
4 days, 5, perhaps.
I'll get on them right away.
All right, Miss Talbot, i'll sign the contracts.
Just the way you want them.
I knew you were smart.
Then it's all settled.
You and the boys leave for San Francisco at the end of the week.
Fine.
Just one word of advice, Lisa.
Have fun.
You'd be amazed at the number of men around the country
Who don't want to get married.
[Happy Baby by Bill Haley and His Comets playing]
 Happy baby, happy, happy baby 
 Happy, happy baby 
 I got a baby and my baby's happy with me 
 Happy baby 
 I got a baby and my baby's happy with me 
 Happy baby 
 A slick little chick and she treats me tenderly 
 Happy baby 
Hi, ball of fire.
Morning.
Oh, boy.
Hmm, with all that hustle in your bustle
You must be taking your vitamins.
Corinne,
I came up with an idea last night that wouldn't let me sleep.
About me, I hope.
About money.
Well, that's 2nd best.
Now, the returns are in.
You and I both know what rock 'n' roll has done.
It's got people on their feet again, dancing.
Druggists are selling more Corn plasters than ever.
So what's your big idea?
A rock 'n' roll jamboree.
Keep goin'.
Now for weeks,
I've had other bands
And vocal groups making up rock 'n' roll arrangements.
Now as I see it, we take a bunch of these good acts,
Put them all together into one big show,
And we'll give them a night of jive they've never seen before.
Now to get the movement going coast to coast,
I think I can talk one of the big networks
Into televising us on a national hookup.
Son, you hit the jackpot.
Now look,
Los Angeles should be the right spot for this.
They go for these big jazz concerts
And I think they'll eat this one up.
Who do you want to stage it?
Alan Freed.
You know, he's handled a lot of big shows.
Sold.
Freed can leave for Los Angeles immediately
And work with my coast office.
Now the first week in july we rent a great big hall.
All the kids will be out of school
And I think every kid from 6 to 96 will go for this in a big way.
July it is.
Freed goes to the coast,
I stay here in New York, set up the networks.
You're a genius, lad.
Oh, it's nothing, really.
Now that there are 3,000 miles
And 3 years between you and Lisa Johns,
How about thinking over that offer I made you?
My dear young lady, one jamboree at a time.
I gotta go.
I got a lot to do.
[Mambo Rock by Bill Haley and His Comets playing]
 Hey, mambo 
 Mambo rock 
 Hey, mambo 
 Mambo rock 
 Hey, mambo 
 Mambo rock 
 Everybody's doin' it, mambo rock 
It's a sellout.
2 more minutes and the jamboree goes coast to coast.
We've had some big deals in the agency,
Steve,
But this puts the icing on the cupcake.
You know,
I think I'm more nervous than our kids must be.
Drink.
Numb your reflexes.
You know, it's a shame that Mike Dodd isn't here to see this.
Darling, who needs him?
Why don't you marry the guy so he can forget you?
He works for me.
Let's not talk business.
Hmm.
One minute.
I suppose you think
I'm 7 kinds of a witch for the things I did to you.
8 kinds.
But considering why you did what you did,
I suppose
I should be flattered.
Naturally.
Hmm.
You know, Corinne, you're not really a bad sort at all
If you would, uh, not try to run everyone else's life.
It's the mother instinct.
Mothers always do the thinking for their children.
That really puts the icing on the cupcake.
No, I mean it.
Every time the alarm goes off in the morning,
I begin to wonder about this idea of being a career woman.
Well, you're the boss.
Why set the alarm?
You're being evasive.
Hmm.
5 seconds.
hi, everybody!
Hi!
Yours truly, Alan Freed, welcoming you all to our gigantic
Rock and roll jamboree
At famous Hollywood hall here in Los Angeles,
California.
Welcome to the big new beat in popular music
and we've got a tremendous array
of rock 'n' roll talent here for you tonight.
So here we go with Freddie Bell and the Bellboys.
Go, man.
[giddyup dingdong by
Freddie Bell and the Bellboys playing]
 I said, giddy up 
 Giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up, giddy up 
 Well, now I went ridin' the other night 
 I picked out a horse, oh my what a sight 
 The name of the horse was ding dong 
 While I was ridin'
I was singin' a song 
 I said, giddy up 
 Giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up, giddy up 
 Now, we rode and we rode the whole night through 
 The horse was tired and I was too 
 I had a date with my gal at 8 
 Come on ding dong, we can't be late 
 I said, giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up, giddy up 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, giddy up a ding dong 
 Giddy up, a ding dong 
 Come on, horse, roll along 
Wonderful.
We're gonna really rock 'n' roll tonight.
And now, america's number one vocal group, with 2 great record hits,
Here are The Platters.
 Oh-oh, yes 
 I'm the great pretender 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 Pretending that
I'm doing well 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 My need is such 
 I pretend too much 
 I'm lonely but no one can tell 
 Oh-oh, yes 
 I'm the great pretender 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 Adrift in a world of my own 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 I've played the game 
 But to my real shame 
 You've left me to grieve all alone 
 Too real is this feeling 
 Of make-believe 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 Too real when I feel 
 What my heart can't conceal 
 Oh 
 Yes,
I'm the great pretender 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 Just laughin' and gay like a clown 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 I seem to be what I'm not 
 You see 
 I'm wearing my heart like a crown 
 Pretending that you're still around 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 Too real is this feeling 
 Of make-believe 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 Too real when I feel 
 What my heart can't conceal 
 Yes,
I'm the great pretender 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 Just laughin' and gay like a clown 
 Woo-oo, woo-oo 
 I seem to be what I'm not 
 You see 
 I'm wearing my heart like a crown 
 Pretending that you're 
 Still around 
 Still around 
And now, for the thrill you've all been waiting for.
Here is one of the most phenomenal acts in the history of show business.
Bill Haley and His Comets.
Thank you, Alan.
Thank you, kids.
Let's rock 'n' roll
with a real swingin' little tune called Rudy's Rock.
[Rudy's Rock by Bill Haley playing]
It's a hit, Corinne.
It's a big fat hit.
Now, let's talk about us.
Oh, everything's been said, Corinne.
From now on, there's nothing more to talk about.
Why not?
Watch the stage.
Buddy-buddies, before we go into our big finale,
I'd like to introduce that living doll,
That real cool rock 'n' rollin' chick who wants to say a few words,
Lisa Johns and her brother, Jimmy.
Thank you, rock 'n' rollers.
I just want to say how thrilled everybody is backstage
With the way you've received our show.
And I especially want to thank our wonderful emcee,
Alan Freed, who helped us put the show together.
And an equally wonderful man
Without whom, there would be no rock 'n' roll at all,
My husband,
Steve Hollis.
What was that child talking about?
She said "husband."
She ought to know.
Then you are married?
Legally.
I have a contract with that girl.
I'll sue you, Steve, for every cent you have.
I'll ruin you and her and that band.
They'll never make another appearance on a stage.
No one breaks a contract with Corinne Talbot.
Oh, I don't think you'll sue anyone, Corinne.
If you recall, it took 5 days to draw that contract.
And there's a clause that says Lisa's not to be married for 3 years.
Well, she won't.
But you just said that-- she can't.
You see, we were married before the contracts were signed.
Outsmarted by an amateur from Strawberry Springs.
I'll tell you one thing, though.
I think you and Mike will be very happy together.
You know, you wouldn't be such a bad guy
If you didn't try to run everybody else's life.
Then you're not angry?
No, what good would it do?
Hmm, Mike Dodd, huh?
Well, it's a good thing I had another man warming up in the bullpen.
Touche.
Touche yourself.
 When the chimes ring 5, 6 and 7 
 We'll be right in 7th heaven 
 We're gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 We're gonna rock, rock, rock
'til broad daylight 
 We're gonna rock, gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 When it's 8, 9, 10, 11 too i'll be goin' strong and so will you 
 We're gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 We're gonna rock, rock, rock
'til broad daylight 
 We're gonna rock, gonna rock around the clock tonight 
 When the clock strikes 12
We'll cool off then 
 Start a rockin' round the clock again 
 We're gonna rock, gonna rock around the clock tonight 
Ah, Lutz, my friend.
I must remind you once again,
Herr Professor,
I am not your friend.
Aha, but I am yours.
You're a lucky fellow, Lutzy.
My name is Lutz, and as usual Professor Juttner, you will be late.
What can his highness learn from you?
A teacher and you can't even tell time.
Small minds stick with the clock.
His highness is always punctual.
That's what I've been trying to do, educate him out of it.
I don't know why I bother with you.
It's your duty, Lutzy my lad.
I only do it to please his highness.
His highness' very words to me were
"I should esteem it a favor, my dear Lutz, if you could make the professor look more presentable. "
And I said,
I should esteem it an honor, your highness.
Every man is entitled to his honor.
Oh, we're late!
A most appropriate sermon considering the day.
Thank you, your majesty.
Permit me to congratulate your royal highness on your forthcoming betrothal.
And may I include good wishes for Princess Johanna of North Hausen.
Thank you.
She will be here tomorrow and you can extend them to her in person.
She is as gracious as she is beautiful.
This marriage has truly been planned in heaven.
Our prime minister is too modest.
Von Mark planned it years ago when the princess and I was still children.
Of course with your blessings, grandfather.
Should your royal highness feel the need of spiritual guidance and comfort,
I am at your command.
My guidance and comfort have always been the knowledge that I am doing my duty for Karlsburg.
Well, Karl.
I have taken cared of all the preliminaries, but victory or defeat is in your hands.
Tomorrow may well decide the future of our country.
So when you propose to the princess,
I count on you to carry it out with your usual efficiency.
It won't be too difficult.
From her pictures, she seems very attractive.
And in a receptive mood.
Why not?
It is true they have the money but we have the blood.
They are merchants, we are kings.
Oh, I should have worked that subject, my boy.
She can afford to be fussy.
Don't worry, grandfather.
For such a dowry,
I'd marry a princess with two heads.
Then I need scarcely remind you that our treasury is empty.
Our treasury has been empty for 200 years.
Yet somehow we have survived.
We have survived when other thrones have fallen not because we have been rich, but because the men of our family have always been extremely eligible.
Our code of arms reminds us our wealth has been our sons.
Sir, when I hold her in my arms,
I will do my best for Karlsburg.
Her royal highness, the princess
Johanna of North Hausen.
You know, Ferddie,
I believe Karl is even better looking than you were at his age
Not at all.
My dear, Mathilde, it's just that time has dimmed your memory.
Perhaps.
But at any rate, they'd make a very handsome couple.
I can already see their profiles on the coin.
Mother is very impressed with the troop maneuvers today.
I'm pleased to hear it.
And what did you think of it?
After all these years,
I still think parades are great fun, don't you?
Fun, Johanna?
Training our troops is my responsibility, and I assure it's the hardest kind of work.
One can't ever let up.
I think... that doesn't leave much time for relaxation or for dances like this, does it?
Very little.
Why? Does my dancing show it?
Your highness dances with firmness and precision.
But the throne of Karlsburg won't fall if you loosen your knees a bit.
Forgive me.
I've always considered the parade ground more important than the dance floor. perhaps, one of my junior officer...
Everyone is looking at us.
I didn't come to Karlsburg to find a dancing partner.
Why don't you invite me to see the view from the garden?
Here now, this is much better.
No one is looking at us.
So perhaps we can at last look at each other.
It's almost time for us to receive the diplomatic corps of both kingdoms.
Let them wait.
We owe ourselves a little time together.
Surely we'll have plenty of opportunity in the future.
I don't consider marriage an introduction.
Aren't you curious to know what kind of a person you will spend the rest of your life with?
I confess I am.
Oh, you needn't be?
I shall be a most punctilious and considerate husband.
Karl, come here.
Look at me.
Forget your princely self-possession for a moment.
I'm sure that even the great warrior, Frederick the...
What's his name?
Frederick The Bold.
Even he must have had time for other things.
After all, he did found the dynasty.
We're quite alone.
Quite alone.
I hope I misjudge your highness.
I cannot assume that the future queen of Karlsburg wishes to be treated like the ordinary woman, one in contrast on maneuvers.
Oh, then you have encountered other women?
What a question?
But that's no answer.
Very well,
I have on many occassions.
I find it hard to believe it.
Perhaps I can convince you.
Well?
Typically Karlsburg, well-trained and precise.
Your arms are very strong, Karl.
But your heart doesn't beat any faster.
You are a king first, last and always and you never forget it.
You complement me.
I don't mean to. Kings bore me.
Prussian virtues are impressive, but cold comfort aren't on a long winter's night.
Some coffee?
No, thank you.
You've ruined my sleep as it is.
My dear, Ferddie, I am merely giving you an honest opinion.
You asked me to find out and I'm telling you.
Karl won't do.
Just what does she expect?
A human being, not a Prussian machine.
Karl was raised to be a soldier. he is admired by... by his regiment.
Johanna came to get a husband, not to enlist.
The world is full of husbands, but there are very few crown princes.
I don't know how you raise this girl, but even she should see that
Karl is no ordinary fellow.
But there are times when even a prince should behave like an ordinary fellow.
I know how important this alliance is to you, Ferddie.
But you must face facts.
You, too, Mathilde, must face facts.
Money will not get you what you want.
What do you mean?
An interesting thing has happened to the royal families of Europe.
Every queen you encounter has
3 or 4 daughters to marry off.
But there are mighty few royal princes around.
There are eight sons in Grabnick.
They never bathe.
There's Prince Olap.
He has ah... buck teeth.
Do you want your grandchildren to have backed teeth?
Ferddie, that's blackmail!
Well, even the king must live.
Well, let's not quarrel.
We both want this marriage.
I'm not blaming Karl.
It's your fault.
You've taken a perfectly nice boy, and brought him up to be a Prussian pickle.
Pickle?
He has the best education.
Not education, training.
You haven't taught him how to get along with people.
They'd be no problem with your honor if you'd only get him to radiate a little warmth and charm.
Warmth and charm.
Professor Juttner, did his majesty sent for you, too?
Well, it must be serious.
After all, it's the middle of the night.
What do you think it's all about, professor?
Perhaps they're going to behead me for teaching you to read and write.
I was merely obeying orders.
I myself am against higher education for the nobility.
Well, they can't behead me.
I'm the heir apparent.
If you knew more history, you'd be more worried.
Warmth and charm, that's what you need, warmth and charm.
A friendly smile, a cordial hand clasp that's the new order for the day.
Why is that important?
The princess thinks it's important, that's why it's important.
You are a Prussian machine.
I saw you with the princess tonight.
You dance as if you were storming a fortress.
You call that dancing?
You're not much better.
I wasn't engaged as a dancing master.
What were you engaged on?
To educate him.
He's not educated, he's trained.
What have you been doing with your time?
Following your orders!
Never mind my orders, just do as I tell you.
Please, don't blame the boy, your majesty.
Each year, more and more time has been stolen from studies and given to marksmanship, military maneuvers, fencing masters.
His highness has had no time for the graces of living.
From now on, you will study the graces of living.
I hold you responsible.
Order whatever books you need.
Books won't help, sir.
No.
True education comes from people.
I said it before and I say it again.
He should have gone to Heidelberg, mix with people of his own age, learn to get along with them.
There are hundreds of universities, why Heidelberg?
For me, there is only university.
I went to Heidelberg, your majesty.
Very well, we go to Heidelberg.
Make the arrangements.
Heidelberg?
Who does Johanna think she is?
Why should I be made over just to please her?
Because there are 8 princes in Grabnick.
They never bathe.
There's Prince Olap.
He has back teeth.
I will not listen to these silly arguments.
As soon as possible, you'll leave for Heidelberg!
And beggining this instant, you will radiate warmth and charm.
That's a command.
Hubert, this way!
No horse play, Lutz.
Clear the way.
Clear the way, savages.
We wish to get to the street.
Hubert, help! Help, Hubert!
Hubert, the luggages! help! Put me down!
Put me down!
All through life, we're learning
Learning things we ought to know
Through and through we're learning
Well, I don't know if Lutz will enjoy Heidelberg.
But Heidelberg is certainly enjoying Lutz.
In my opinion,
Herr Doctor, these...
I suppose we have to call them students.
These students are a little too old for this behavior.
Oh, the first day of term, good spirits, the excitement of seeing old friends again.
Now, you just give it a chance, and I'm sure you'll find good fellowship very edgy.
Like measles.
Let's find a carriage.
Class of 1874.
Willie Klauber!
Well, well, what are you doing here?
What are you doing in Heidelberg?
Didn't they ever let you graduate?
Graduate? I'm a full professor.
No!
Yes!
Heaven help the younger generation.
When I knew you, you couldn't even spell.
Sssh!
And what brings you here?
Herr Professor klauber, I have the honor to present my pupil...
I don't have a pupil and I don't have the honor.
Cab!
Just a minute!
That's my cab!
New here?
Yes, and let me tell you...
Let me tell you!
A word of advice.
When it comes to cabs, beer and woman, if you want them, grab them and hang on to it.
When I want advice,
I'll ask for it.
Do you know who I am?
We're very broad-minded in Heidelberg.
We let anybody in.
Come on, hop in.
Don't stand there like a stick or you'll get left.
Smile just once and you can have my sit, and I'll sit on your lap.
Prussian pickle!
To the inn we're marching
For our throats are parching
And the fruit trees arching in the month of may
For there's no good fellow
When he's feeling mellow
From the beer so yellow would delay
To the inn we're going
Where the beer is flowing
And we'll soon be blowing off the foam on top
And as we're explaining
They'll be no refraining
Till we're all through draining every drop
All in step we're swinging
While we join in singing
With our voices ringing in a merry rhyme
There is joy alounding
In our song resounding
While our steins are resounding all the time
Now the spring we're greeting
With our merry meeting
And our day completing with a mug of beer
To the inn we're heading
All our cares we're shedding
As we start another college year
To the inn we're marching
For our throats are parching
And the fruit trees arching in the month of may
To the inn we're marching
For our throats are parching
To the inn
To the inn
We're marching on
Beer, here
Beer, here
Turn the barrel upside down
Beer, here
Beer, here
What a lovely way to get drunk!
Savages!
Well, you've... you've chosen a mad house for his highness.
Doctor Juttner said it was the finest inn in Heidelberg.
Juttner would like this place.
Does this carousing go on everyday?
No, your excellency, only every night.
Who is this person?
Herr Ruder, the owner of the inn.
You tell him he is not to speak until we speak to him.
Heae this!
Hubert!
I will not to occupy a suite where I can hear those cattle-hollering savages.
You can hear them everywhere.
Your excellency has the same view as the prince's, the river Nekar.
The river, yes,
I was coming to that.
How considerate when you know
I suffer from rheumatism.
Forgive me, Herr Lutz.
The river was here when I arrived.
Don't interrupt.
I had hoped to come to you and look at you and say
"Hubert, I am satisfied. "
But I am not satisfied, Hubert.
Oh, this might serve for an ordinary lackey.
But did his majesty send an ordinary lackey with the prince?
No, he sent me.
Hubert, who is his excellency?
His highness is valet.
Valet?
Valet, I thought you were a Prime Minister at least.
Let me tell you that this inn has been enter taining royalty for over 300 years.
Oh, they may have lived here but they were not entertained.
Yes, yes, barons, counts and dukes.
Never a prince of Karlsburg. it... it had to enter Heidelberg.
I warn you, we are not amused by impertinence.
Hubert! Lutz!
Hubert, where my room is?
Where is his highness?
Isn't he with you?
No, he's with you.
He's obviously not with me.
Then you've lost the prince.
Lost the prince here?
I knew you couldn't be trusted.
Now, now, don't get excited.
He'll get here, and with more dignity than you did.
Now, you can laugh but he's my responsibility.
Nonsense.
I look after him in Heidelberg.
Only his mind,
I look after his body.
This may come as a shock to you, my dear Lutzy.
But the mind is more important than the body.
Well, you've got to have a body to be a king.
That is not my worry.
His mind isn't lost, only his body.
And if anything happens to it, it will be you who will hang.
Kathie! Kathie! Kathie!
I hear you call my friends
There's beer for all my friends
But patience is a virtue
Kathie recommends
I fear my ears will burst
Before I quench your thirst
I really should teach you manners
But let's tap the barrel first
Come, boys, let's all be gay, boys
For education should be scientific play, boys
Don't dip your pen in ink, boys
Let every prudent student study how to drink
Bom, bom, bom!
Although exams are near, boys
Though you may flunk because you're drunk
Don't shed a tear
Bom, bom, bom!
Folks may call you rowdy
Your reputations may be cloudy
You'll never graduate
"Cum Laude"
But you'll get a passing mark in drinking beer
Come, boys, let's turn to beer, boys
And make it clear we're awfully glad that Kathie's here, boys
Why waste your time with books, boys
Let every prudent student study women's looks
Bom, bom, bom!
Let old professors state, boys you'll be dismissed
Because you've kissed a pretty date
Bom, bom, bom!
Gladly we will throttle
Euripides and Aristotle
Then lift another stein or bottle, boys
And all together we will celebrate
Then lift another stein or bottle, boys
And all together celebrate
Oh, boys, not now.
Who, who?
Who is so charming?
Who, who do we adore?
Who's so sweet and disarming?
Kathie, the queen of the corps
Yah, yah, yah!
Kathie, the queen of the corps
Yah, yah, yah!
Kathie's the girl we adore
Yeah!
Boys, I drink to your health.
To Kathie!
Kathie! Kathie! Kathie!
Kathie, Kathie, come, come, come.
He's here. He's here.
Who's here, uncle?
The prince, of course, his highness.
Let me look at you.
Turn. Oh, take this off, take this off.
So here's the bouquet, and the welcome song to sing for you.
Go, darling.
Oh, uncle, must I?
Of course, what's the matter with you?
I've never done it before and I'm nervous.
Nervous, who isn't nervous?
There isn't an inn in all Heidelberg with a real live prince for a tenant!
And if he doesn't stay,
I shall never live in town.
A matter of pride.
Besides he is going to take 6 rooms.
Your highness, permit me to say...
Your highness, it seems the young lady has something to say.
Go on, my dear.
Welcome highness to Herr Ruder's inn.
We hope you'll like our place.
There's a room to rest for a royal guest, and a bowl for washing your face.
Thank you.
Bravo! That was charming.
What is your name, young lady?
Kathie.
Your highness, it is my duty to remind...
Excuse me, your excellency.
My niece, your highness.
This is the landlord,
Joseph Ruder.
Yeah, that's me, that's me.
At your service, your highness.
Your rooms are ready.
If you will like... to... let... show you... the suite.
Permit me, your highness.
This is no place for the heir apparent to the throne of Karlsburg.
Why, Lutz?
The beds are lumpy.
The linen is cotton.
And as you hear, it's a low drinking place for students who come here to behave like roughings.
Nonsense!
I know this inn.
Well, no palace is here.
This is a place for students, not for lackey's and chamberlains.
In my opinion, this is perfect.
In my opinion, it is impossible.
In my opinion, his highness should form his own opinion.
Permit me, your highness.
And the shelf up here has plenty of room for hats.
It's even high enough to put a crown on.
I rarely take a crown when I travel.
My grandfather prefers
I leave it in the vault.
And this is the most comfortable bed in inn.
For the present,
I'll take your word for that.
I put two feather beds on.
They'll keep you warm on the coldest night.
And the springs are good, too.
See?
I endorse the springs.
Now, in the sitting room.
If your highness will be good enough to go into the sitting room.
Thank you.
Every evening, I'll bring up an eiderdown quilt and put it on your bed so that it's nice and warm for you when you go to sleep.
You frighten me.
It's the first day of may, and you speak as though
I shall expect a blizzard.
Oh, no, your highness.
Why, from now on till autumn, the weather is as mild and fresh, lovely as can be.
There!
Oh, did you ever smell such air?
Go ahead, take a deep breath.
The quality seems excellent.
Right from your highness' window is the most beautiful view in all of Heidelberg.
You can see the river Nekar and way up on the mountain, the castle.
I gather that you, Kathie.
That is your name, isn't it?
That you are most anxious to make sure that I am comfortable in every way.
Good.
But what happens if some other person less understanding should appear on the scene.
My uncle has put me in complete charge.
Your highness' slightest wish will be my command.
It's a comfort to know that the necessities will taken cared of.
However, I hope that Heidelberg will afford some pleasure, too.
Do you think it will?
The students are a lot of fun.
And there are beer parties, and here is the piano.
Why so it is.
I hope your highness likes music.
It's a wonderful way to past time.
I look forward to many musical evening in your company.
That little song you greeted me with.
I recognized the melody, but did you write the words?
I know the words were silly, but
Uncle Ruder made them up especially for you.
And I wouldn't hurt his feelings for anything.
The real words are lovely.
I know.
Why don't you sing them for me?
Go ahead. I insist.
Very well.
When it's summertime in Heidelberg
There's beauty everywhere
All the tress are dressed in their sunday best
And brass band plays in the square
Everyday is like a holiday
Strolling underneath the sun
All the frauleins wear flowers in their hair
With a smile to spare for everyone
The fragrant breeze
The linden trees
The promenade where lovers stray
But have a care
Or someone there
May steal your heart away
Strange things happen on a summer night
When the bells begin to chime
It could happen to
Someone just like you
Down in Heidelberg in summertime
Uncle Ruder's words in my voice.
No wonder you smiled when I sang to you.
Just a moment.
You haven't been dismissed yet.
In Karlsburg, it is not the custom to walk out on royalty.
I beg your highness' pardon.
If your highness will excuse me.
Before you go, there's just one more thing.
Your highness wishes something.
Yes, just this.
I don't know about the custom in Karlsburg, your highness.
But at Ruder's inn, that does not come with the service.
History, Lutz.
The ancient or modern, your highness.
Ancient.
Is this the lecture hall for ancient history?
Yes. New student, eh?
Yes.
Registered for this class?
What is your name?
I am Karl France of Karlsburg.
France.
Whereas, here you are.
Right inside, Herr France.
Herr France?
Move on, Herr France, you'll be late.
Sit down! Don't block the aisle.
His excellency,
Professor klauber.
What's the matter with you,
Herr France?
Stump your feet like the others.
Professor klauber is coming in.
Both feet.
You're no different from the rest.
Welcome to ancient history, gentlemen.
It's a new term and ah... we'll start with the new face.
It means it will be your face.
All history is a record of significant milestones in the development of man.
Can you name just one such contribution in the 500 years before the Christian era?
Just one, that shouldn't be too difficult.
I am aware of many,
I was merely trying to select the most important.
The conquest of Alexander The Great.
Accurate, but not as important as another conquest.
While Alexander was beating people over the head,
Aristotle was awakening the minds of men.
Can the Herr Professor name a figure of greater strength than Alexander.
The gorilla.
We will discuss Aristotle.
Ah, Herr Bauer.
Social graces, indeed.
Warmth and charm.
But it certainly didn't charm me when that officious nobody called me Herr France.
They have no manners.
That's quite polite in talking to a freshman.
But if it bothered you, why didn't you tell him who you were?
At first,
I didn't have a chance, but then I realized he wasn't the sort of fellow who'd be impressed by it.
Ah, you've learned a lot in one day.
They're the ones that'll have to learn.
If they had any knowledge of tradition, they'd know better than to order me to stump my feet just because a professor comes into the room.
It's a matter of respect.
Who was the professor?
Klauber.
Noble prize winner.
It's in the finest tradition to honor such a man.
He's a full professor.
And I am a prince.
Position of no academic distinction.
My dear, Herr Doctor, you find this very amusing, don't you?
My dear, boy.
If you'll only relax, you'll find it amusing, too.
Listen to them.
They are having a wonderful time.
If you could only be one of them, a student.
Why should I pretend to be nobody when I am somebody?
All your philosophy doesn't alter the fact that quality is born in a man.
That's very shrewd, your highness.
And very true.
But in Heidelberg, they either don't know it or they don't care
Oh, no, my boy, no.
You see, in Karlsburg, the quality is in the title.
In Heidelberg, the quality is in the man.
Come in.
Excuse me, your highness, dinner is ready.
Would you prefer it in the privacy of your room? or on the terrace?
Where do the ordinary students eat?
In this weather, on the terrace.
Very well, on the terrace please.
Thank you.
You take a great deal for granted, Herr Doctor.
Oh, no, I'm a slave to orders.
His majesty put me in charge here.
Well, I'll go to my room and freshen up.
Meet you here in a few moments.
Don't hurry yourself.
I hope I have your permission to go to the terrace.
Herr Professor.
Good evening, your highness.
Would you like your dinner right now?
Yes.
What would your highness like?
What do the ordinary students eat?
Kathie!
You haven't been dismissed yet.
I'm sorry, your highness.
I seem to have forgotten again.
I'm not so sure you forgot.
What's this?
Kraut and Frankfurt.
It's good, isn't it?
Are you still here?
You haven't dismissed me.
It's good, isn't it?
It's ah... not bad.
It's very good.
I can see you like it, and it won't hurt you to admit it.
All right then, I like it.
It's even better with beer.
I don't think it could be.
It is.
It's difficult for all new students the first day, and must be even harder for your highness.
Do you know once you get used to Heidelberg, you'll find you like a lot of things you never dreamed you'd like.
I didn't come to Heidelberg for amusement.
What difference does it make if you have fun anyway?
It doesn't cost any more.
You know, you ought to join a corps.
You know, it's more fun than kraut and Frankfurt.
If you say so.
Now, what corps do you like best?
The West Falien.
They're all fine friendly boys.
Seem to have more fun than any other corps.
Then I'll join the West Falien.
Oh, no, your highness.
They haven't a title among them.
You belong with the Sax Blusean.
They don't accept commoners.
They're all barons, counts, dukes.
No princes, but...
There aren't enough princes around to make a corps.
That presents a problem.
I'll need your advice.
Sit down, Kathie.
I shouldn't, your highness.
May I be dismissed?
You may not.
You have made a great disadvantage, your highness.
That's the way I want you to be.
Sit down.
Now, you said you like the West Falien.
Is it because they haven't any titles amongst them?
Oh, surely your highness.
I have the greatest respect for the nobility.
You were all nice young men, but...
But what?
Well, go on. I insist.
It would be most presumptuous of me to...
I give you permission to be presumptuous.
Well, go on.
Well, for one thing.
The nobility doesn't seem to be taught manners.
Etiquette, yes, but manners, no.
They don't ask, they take.
I see.
Then if I weren't a prince, you'll like me better.
I don't know but...
At least I'd get a chance to see what you're really like.
Try it.
Forget that I am a prince.
It is not for me to forget that, your highness.
All right then,
I'm just one of the students, just plain Karl France.
We're equals.
Just a minute.
I didn't say you can go.
Well, if we're equals,
I can go when I choose.
You're not giving me a fair chance, Kathie.
I want us to be friends.
Treat me as you do the others, will you?
Try.
It's impossible.
After all, you are a prince and I work here.
What will people say?
Oh, don't worry so much about my reputation.
Oh, no, your highness!
It's my reputation
I'm worried about.
Well, Kathie!
Is the food here as good as I remember it?
Better, Doctor Juttner.
I'll set another plate.
Thank you.
I owe your highness an apology.
After all, it's only the first day.
I feel I was much too severe.
You were quite right,
Doctor Juttner.
I've just had confirmation of your point of view.
Oh, amazing!
In 10 minutes, Kathie, you accomplish more than I've been trying to do for 10 years.
It wasn't all kraut and
Frankfurt, was it, my dear?
Hello, Kathie.
Ah, I don't remember seeing you here before.
New here?
My name's Lucas, student officer of the West Falien corps.
Now, my dear Kathie, present the gentleman to me.
I have the honor to introduce...
My name is Herr France.
My friend, Doctor Juttner.
Doctor Juttner.
How do you do?
My dear, Herr France, let me welcome you to Heidelberg.
Thank you, Herr Lucas.
Our friend, Kathie, has just been telling me about your corps
Won't you sit down please?
And you can tell more about it.
Thank you.
Well, we're not suppose to boast about our corps.
So what I shall say is a gross understatement.
It just happens to be the finest corps in Heidelberg.
Why, even in the words of our glorious Prospero.
The West Falien can drink any other corpsman under the table.
Their skill with sword and saber is second to none.
That too,
Prospero will tell you.
I'm sure the Prospero will tell you, he's an old West Falien himself.
Oh, then who would know better?
Blocking a fox, Lucas?
This is becoming a bad habit of his.
He lures them away before a gentleman has a chance to look them over.
No one that would interest you, count.
Count Von Asterburg of the sax blusean.
Doctor Juttner.
Herr France.
I've heard your corps highly praised, Count Von Asterburg.
There are many who envy us.
You are very fortunate,
Herr France.
Aside from the Sax Blusean, there isn't a better corps than the West Falien.
Oh, don't go yet, count.
Why don't you join us?
I'll order some beer and you can sit down and tell us about your corps.
Perhaps some other time.
Oh, now is as good a time as any.
We have no vacancies,
Herr France.
I'm prepared to wait.
There are certain requirements,
Herr France.
A man must stick to his class, a person like you would find himself very uncomfortable in our circle.
Good night.
He's a decent chap really, but you pressed him hard.
I forgive him.
Will he forgive you?
We'll have no choice.
Come! Meet the West Falien.
Go on.
Silentium!
Gentlemen, we have a new recruit and a good one at that.
There's only one thing against him.
He eats well, drinks well and looks as though he can afford to pay for it.
I give you Karl France.
Welcome!
Richter, cap.
Beer! Beer! Beer!
Disgraceful!
I shall report you for this, Doctor Juttner, mingling with commoners.
Why you report me?
I'm living like a king.
But you permit his highness to contaminate himself with the rabble.
When his highness retires tonight, Lutzy.
You can burn his clothes and fumigate him.
Gentlemen, salamander!
Salamander, up!
Salamander, up!
Salamander, drink!
Drink it down in one breath.
Drink! Drink! Drink! eins, swei, drei, vier lift your stein and drink your beer
Eins, swei, drei, vier
Lift your stein and drink your beer
Drink! Drink! Drink!
To eyes that are bright as stars
When they're shining on me
Drink! Drink! Drink!
To lips that are red and sweet
As the fruit on the tree
Here's a hope
That those bright eyes will shine
Lovingly longingly soon into mine
May those lips that are red and sweet
Tonight with joy my own lips meet
Drink! Drink!
Let the toast start
May young hearts never part
Drink! Drink! Drink!
Let every true lover salute his sweetheart
Drink! Drink! Drink!
To arms that are white
And warm as a rose in the sun
Drink! Drink! Drink!
To hearts that will love one
Only when I am the one
Here's a hope
That those soft arms will twine
Tenderly, trustingly soon around mine
AII I ask is the right to see
Those smiling eyes beguiling me
Drink! Drink!
Let the toast start
May young hearts never part
Drink! Drink! Drink!
Let every true lover salute his sweetheart
Let's drink!
You take the glasses here.
Let's go, go, go.
Here, let's go.
Please, your highness.
No, no, not your highness, just Karl.
Please, Karl.
I took your advice.
Surely I deserve a reward.
Your highness.
Oh, go away, Lutz!
I'm sorry, your highness.
I shouldn't have done that.
It's not your fault.
You've just had too much beer.
No, no, no, don't blame it on the beer.
I prefer to think it's the beer.
Well,
I prefer you didn't think that.
Good night, Kathie.
Are we alone?
Alone, no, we are together.
What's the matter?
His highness, Karl France, heir apparent to the throne of Karlsburg, knight commander of the grand order of Frederick The Bold, and so on. has just been assaulted.
Where?
On the premises.
Your niece knocked him down.
Maybe he got fresh.
Princes do not get fresh.
They occasionally make advances.
You realize what will come of this, Ruder?
He won't get fresh again.
You take this very lightly, but I do not.
It is my pleasure to inform you that the consequences will be disastrous.
Thank you.
It would... disastrous?
What are you talking about?
In Karlsburg, for what your niece dared to do, she would probably be beheaded.
Please Herr Lutz, don't make a big point out of nothing.
You and I, we are men of the world.
I am not!
Neither am I.
I'm just trying to make a living.
But I don't cause you trouble, why must you cause me a trouble?
It is not a personal matter.
I have sworn to uphold the honor and dignity of the royal house of Karlsburg.
In my weekly report to the royal household in Karlsburg,
I shall include this unfortunate incident.
The report will go to the minister of internal affairs.
He will submit it to the prime minister, Von Mark.
Von Mark will notify our ambassador in Berlin.
It will be presented to the German foreign office.
They will submit the matter to his majesty, the Kaiser.
The Kaiser will communicate with the chancellor of Heidelberg university.
The chancellor will communicate with the burgomaster.
The burgomaster will convene the aldermen of the city of Heidelberg.
They will summon you,
Herr Ruder.
What can I do?
Dear kind Lutz, my good friend, what do you want me to do?
The prince is my responsibility.
Your niece is yours.
I will warn her.
She will never bother his highness again.
That is not the solution.
His highness may wish to bother her.
Get rid of her!
My own niece?
My sister's daughter?
Now don't start snivelling!
This is no time for sloppy sentimentality, Ruder.
Exile her.
Vanish her from this place.
Exile her! Vanish her!
Exile her! Vanish her!
Exile her!
Exile her! Vanish her!
Exile her! Vanish her!
Come in.
Kathie.
What's the first thing I taught you when you came here?
The customer is always right.
That's right.
No, it's wrong.
You mean it wasn't the first thing I taught you?
Oh, yes, that's right.
But that the customer is always right, that's not right, that's wrong.
Right, wrong, wrong, right.
This I know.
When you got the prince for a customer, you got trouble.
Those people are always talking to each other.
The prince to the prime minister. the king to the Kaiser. the more they talk, the more trouble I have got.
Don't get upset uncle, there won't be any trouble.
I knew you would be sensible.
Very sensible.
I'm leaving in the morning.
In the...
What? My own niece leaving me?
Well, as long as he's here, this is no place for me.
I'll get another job.
How... how will I look after you?
I'm your only family.
Don't worry uncle,
I'll be all right.
I do worry.
Maybe if you try to apologize.
Why should I apologize?
Because you assaulted him.
Oh, you know about that.
And do you know he tried to get fresh with me?
But he's a prince, you can not go around assaulting a prince.
That's why I'm leaving.
But if you apologize, everything will be all right.
What if he gets fresh again?
With a nice girl like you, how fresh can he get?
Oh, with a fellow like him
I'm not going to wait around to find out.
I don't like him myself.
But if you are stubborn enough to go, to go through the river, work at Groswaltz.
Why Groswaltz?
Because they are the customers never ask, and the head waiter is my best friend.
My darling.
Kathie! Kathie! Kathie! Kathie!
Stop it! Stop it!
Where is Kathie tonight?
Don't worry about Kathie.
I myself will take care of everything.
Turn around!
What?
Turn around!
Step forward a little.
That's enough!
Sorry, you're no substitute for Kathie.
Where is she?
The truth, Ruder, the truth!
I... sent her away this morning.
She misbehaved.
Struck one of the customers.
Well, if she did, he must have had it coming to him, uh?
He certainly did.
The young gentlemen want their beer.
No beer, Ruder.
No beer.
We want Kathie!
We want Kathie...
Where is she?
Where is who, your highness?
You know who and you know where.
Speak up, Ruder.
I can't.
I can't. My lips are sealed.
I promise.
It's a matter of honor.
You could torture me.
Wild horses couldn't drag it out of me.
But if your highness is really angry,
I wouldn't blame you if you went across the river, to Groswaltz. restaurant near the park.
It wouldn't be my fault.
I'm just angry enough to do that, Herr Ruder.
The river boat leaves every hour.
Kathie, I'm terribly sorry.
I'm sorry, too.
Now... now, go away.
One linden soup.
I don't blame you for being angry, but it wasn't my fault.
I'm not angry.
One kraut and Frankfurt.
It won't be as good as your uncle's.
Then go back there.
Not without you.
Please stop it.
You'll spill the soup.
Who is he?
I never saw him before in my life.
Outside! I don't know how you got in here.
But get out the same way.
Quiet!
Outside!
Don't you shout at me!
Outside!
You'll regret this impertinence!
So will you.
Outside.
Let me go! You'll get me fired.
Exactly why I'm here.
This maybe a joke to you.
It isn't.
You're leaving here with me if I have to drag you.
Let me go!
What's going on here?
She refused to take my order.
He tried to molest me.
Really, do I look like the sort of person who would do that kind of thing?
Frankly, yes!
I know you students.
The wild irresponsible lad.
I shall have to ask you to leave.
This is a public eating place.
I must ask you to leave.
And if I don't?
Oh, that's the way he always gets when he's been drinking.
Obnoxious!
Outside or I shall call the police!
Go ahead! Call the police! it will look fine in the papers.
What will your grandfather say when he reads about it?
Outside.
Oh, Kathie!
Did you hurt yourself?
Don't touch me!
Everytime you come near me
I get in trouble.
You clumsy fool!
You... you stupid girl!
Don't talk to her like that!
Shut up!
Look at those broken dishes!
Is that all you can think about?
Suppose she broke her legs?
Suppose she cut her face?
Who cares about the dishes?
I do.
Who'll pay for it!
If I feel in the mood I may.
If you feel in the mood!
Who do you think you are?
The Kaiser?
No, but you're getting warm.
Oh, you crazy students are all alike.
Big talk and no money.
Out or I'll throw you out!
Try it!
No, no, no fighting.
Your grandfather wouldn't like it.
Even as a favor to your uncle, this is too much!
Oh, I'll pay for the dishes and I'II...
No! Turn in your uniform.
You're through!
I'm awfully sorry that this happened, but just a very unfortunate incident. please excuse, I must apologize.
Did he fire you?
Thanks to you, he did.
Good.
Now you'll have to come back.
Only for tonight.
Tomorrow I'll find another job.
Where are you going?
The ferry land is down this way.
I'm not going on the same boat with you!
But I have to get home, too.
Do you want me to swim?
I don't care if you drown.
My grandfather wouldn't like it.
Come on! We can have the same argument as we walk along.
I have nothing to say to you.
Kathie, please say something.
Anything.
It's a lovely night.
I said it's a lovely night.
Yeah, lovely night!
Please come home, Kathie.
The students are all waiting.
They swore not to drink any beer unless you're there.
They'll change their minds when they get thirsty.
But what about me?
It was awful this morning.
I rang for breakfast.
And do you know what happen?
Lutz came in with the tray.
How dreadful!
But you can always pinch Lutz.
I could, but it's not as much fun.
Kathie,
I've never said this before and it's very difficult for me.
If I offended you last night,
I'm sorry and I apologize.
Please come back.
It's better if I don't.
No, listen.
It's allright for you to pretend to be an ordinary student.
When things get too involved, you can always become a prince again.
But I can't pretend.
I can't be anything but just what I am.
But nobody wants you to be anything different.
Please come back.
I'll be on my best behavior.
I promise.
I don't believe you.
You're still angry about last night.
Last night when I kissed you, it wasn't the beer.
Overhead the moon is beaming
White as blossoms on the bough
Nothing is heard but the song of a bird
Filling all the air with dreaming
Could I hear this song forever?
Calling to my heart anew
My darling
While I drift along forever
Lost in a dream of you
I hear your voice in the wind that stirs the willows
I see your face in the stars that shine above
Hold me closer
Tonight we love
The willows bending the stars that shine
The shore lights blending they're yours and mine
Drifting along in my heart there's a song and the song in my heart will not fade
Oh, hear my serenade
My moonlight serenade
Overhead the moon is beaming
White as bloosoms on the bough
Nothing is heard but the song of a bird
Filling all the air with dreaming
Could this beauty last forever?
I would ask for nothing more
Believe me
Let this night but live forever
Forever and ever more
His highness has never been out so late.
If anything happens to him, the king will shoot you.
That's naturally!
And if I were king,
I'll have you hang.
Believe me if you were king,
I would hang myself.
It's the end of you, Ruder, the absolute end.
How can you sit there calmly writing?
Calmly?
I'm writing my will.
Ah, your highness, you're back safe and sound.
And happy.
Uncle Ruder,
I brought Kathie home.
She's in her room and she's gonna stay.
Oh, Lutz, even though you're interference has caused me a most enjoyable evening.
In the future, don't interfere!
And Ruder, from now on, ignore Lutz.
Lutz, I ignore you.
Just a minute, Herr Ruder,
I warn you.
Just a minute, Herr Lutz!
I warn you.
Make any more trouble and I talk to my niece, Kathie.
And Kathie will talk to her friend, his highness.
And his highness will talk to the grandfather, to the king.
And the king will talk to the Kaiser.
And the Kaiser will talk to the other Kaiser.
And one Kaiser to the other.
And do you know what will happen to you?
You will end up pressing pants in a secondary clothing shop.
Herr Lutz!
I ignore you.
Strange things happen on a summer night
When the bells begin to chime
It could happen to someone just like you
Down in Heidelberg in summer time
A "crambambuli" is as hot as hades
It's got the kind of kick
You only get from mules
A "crambambuli" is not for the ladies
We've heard It's only fit for lunatics and fools.
Kathie, what's going on up there?
Herr France is giving a little beer party for the West Falien.
It's disturbing.
Tell Herr France to keep quiet.
Uncle, Count Von Asterburg is being disturbed.
Tell Herr France to keep quiet.
Lutzy, Count Von Asterburg is being disturbed.
Tell Herr France to keep quiet.
And some red cabbage, Karl.
Yes, sir.
Please, your highness.
Don't stop me now, Lutz!
I forgot to order food.
Oh, let me your highness, please.
All right, then. Sausage and red cabbage for everybody.
And hurry.
Instantly, your highness.
Ruder.
Yeah?
His highness wants sausage and red cabbage for everybody instantly.
You! Come here.
What did I hear you say?
What song shall we sing
For the day that is here
None better than Ergo Bibamus
There's plenty of reason
For making good cheer
So out ring's the ditty Bibamus
The heavens are blue
And the clouds break away
Joy enters the door
All is blooming and gay
And there in our sight all the glory of May
We chant with devotion "Bibamus"
We chant with devotion "Bibamus"
You're the best tenor we've had in 4 semesters.
Well...
I have an uncle with a Berlin royal opera.
When you're ready, maybe
I could do something for you.
Well, thanks, Richter.
That's a good thing to know.
What were you planning to do when you get out, Karl?
Go in the family business,
I suppose.
Oh.
"Round and round," huh?
Round and round and round we go
Drinks around the table
Lift the flagon, let it flow
Long as we are able
Count Von Asterburg!
Gentlemen!
Ah, Count Von Asterburg!
Come in, join us.
Boys, fill up.
To your royal highness!
In Heidelberg, I'm a student.
Also, crown prince of Karlsburg.
Forgive me for failing to recognize your highness.
I'm sorry you did.
I enjoy being Herr France.
I'm sorry
I spoiled your little joke, but your highness will have even more fun with the Sax Blusean.
You forget Count Von Asterburg,
I've already pledged myself to the West Falien.
My dear Lucas, surely I don't have to explain to you that his highness' rightful place is with us.
If your highness wish to change his mind, we will understand.
And give up my friends?
Certainly not!
I refuse to enter your corps.
I'm perfectly satisfied with the West Falien.
But it's completely against tradition.
Oh, don't take it so seriously, Count.
We're all at the same university and the same beer party.
Let's enjoy ourselves.
Membership in the Sax Blusean, corps is not likely offered, nor has it ever been refused.
It's a serious matter to insult an entire corps.
Fortunately for your highness,
I do not have the privilege of demanding satisfaction.
I grant you that privilege.
Karl, it's forbidden to duel with a member of reigning house.
I'm a student here.
I accept your challenge as Herr France.
Lucas, Richter, arrange for time and place.
It's deep enough.
Is the gentleman's honor satisfied?
It is.
Von Asterburg.
Your highness.
Is it over?
It's a beautiful cut.
Straight as an arrow.
He's very proud of it.
Kathie! Kathie! I'm all right.
You didn't have to worry.
Who says I'm worried?
I not worried.
Even if you've been killed...
I'm sorry I upset you.
I'm not upset.
It's a matter of complete indifference to me what happens to you.
Nobody's ever been so violently indifferent to me before.
It's silly for grown man to try and kill each other for nothing.
It's the first time anyone has ever cried over me.
Deep in my heart, dear
I have a dream of you
Fashioned of starlight
Fragrant with roses and dew
Our paths may sever
But I'll remember forever
Deep in my heart, dear
I'll always dream of you
I've waited a lifetime for someone to say
The things you are saying to me
And, darling
I mean every word that I say
Just look in my eyes and you'll see
You smile and my tears have all melted away
My worries were all false alarms
It looks like the start of a beautiful day
Just holding you here in my arms
With you everyday's a beautiful day
As long as I'm here in your arms
Deep in my heart, dear
I have a dream of you
Fashioned of starlight
Fragrant with roses and dew
Our paths may sever
But I'll remember forever
Deep in my heart, dear
I'll always dream of you
Oh, let's go on like this for the rest of our lives forever, ever and ever!
Oh, it would be wonderful, Karl, forever and ever and ever!
Oh, why not?
Kathie, come away with me.
I've always wanted to see the world.
Do you think it's really round?
Kathie, I mean it.
Come away with me.
Princes don't disappear.
What would we do?
Where would we go?
It doesn't matter.
Everywhere! Anywhere!
We'd be together.
Just the two of us,
Kathie, together.
Together. But it's impossible.
But why don't we try it?
We can change at the inn.
No one is there.
The night train out of Heidelberg, to Paris in the morning.
They'll never find us.
Oh, Kathie, I love you. There's nothing else that matters.
Oh, I adore you.
Come on!
Kathie, hurry, before anyone comes back.
Hurry, Kathie, hurry!
Karl.
Kathie, what's the matter?
I can't go, Karl.
Not to Paris, not any place.
But Kathie, a minute ago...
The carnival is over.
Not the same anymore.
This is my uncle's inn.
I'm Kathie Ruder. I work here.
And you're his highness,
Karl France.
The world is not big enough for us to run away from that, Karl.
They'd never let us alone in a week or a month...
But even a week is better than nothing, a day, an hour.
They couldn't take that away from us.
We'll have it for the rest of our lives.
No, Karl. No!
Tonight was just a masquerade
Tomorrow just another day
Let come whatever
Tonight or never
I'll throw the mask away
Beloved!
With all my heart, I love you
With every breath I pray
Someday you will be mine
Summer or spring winter or fall
You are my life my love, my all
Beloved!
The very stars above you
Are jealous of the way
Your eyes sparkle and shine
Day after day
Near or apart
I try to say
Be still, my trembling heart
But try though I may
I cannot hide this passion inside
That won't be denied
If this be madness
Then call it madness
I only know
I'll never rest till you are mine
Beloved!
Believe me when I tell you
From now until the last bright star fades from the blue
Now and forever
Whatever I do
Beloved, I love you
Oh, Karl!
Kathie!
We must hurry.
I'm ready.
Your highness.
Forgive the intrusion, your highness.
I have urgent instructions from his majesty.
Urgent?
His majesty is ill.
He wishes to see you.
How long has he been ill,
Von Mark.
How serious is it?
His majesty is an old man.
At his age, no illness is to be taken lightly.
We can discuss it as we go.
Karl, it's the most...
I beg your pardon.
Kathie,
I have to go back to Karlsburg.
But it's only for a little while.
The prime minister has just come for me.
My grandfather is ill.
He's a husky old man.
He'll live forever.
I'll be back.
Of course.
I promise you I'll be back.
I know you will, Karl.
It would have been a beautiful day.
There'll be many other days, Kathie.
And each day more beautiful than the last.
I'll be back.
You'll never come back.
His highness, Karl France.
Here. Here.
All right. All right.
Tell him to come in.
Your majesty.
Your highness.
Welcome home, Karl.
Let me have a good look at you.
Heidelberg obviously agrees with you.
You're looking well.
What's more important is that you look well.
Von Mark was so depressing that...
You expected to find... a doggerel old wreck wasting away in bed, did you?
Well, I'm sorry to disappoint you.
Von Mark is an alarmist.
I'm considerably better as you can see, and after a few weeks in Switzerland,
I will be quite myself again.
I'm so happy, grandfather.
For your sake as well as for mine.
As you say, Heidelberg agrees with me, and...
I'm extremely anxious to get back.
You are not going back.
This illness has made it quite clear to me that even
I cannot go on forever.
And it is not my intention to leave with important business unfinished.
I have been in communication with the queen.
Your marriage will take place very shortly.
But grandfather...
Formal papers are being drawn up
The details have been arranged.
Except for one detail.
I am not in love with the princess.
It is of no importance.
It's of the utmost importance to me.
That little bar maid, isn't it?
How do you know about Kathie?
It's my business to know, my boy.
I am not criticizing, but surely you can't take this seriously.
It is serious.
I'm in love with Kathie.
Bar maids are as plentiful as gooseberries.
There'll be plenty of other young ladies.
Not for me.
Then the princess will find you an unusually faithful husband.
And if I don't wish to marry?
This marriage is a state affair.
I have never permitted personal feelings to interfere with duty.
I demand the same conduct from you.
All my life I've been told what to do, and I've done it.
But not anymore.
I've had a taste of freedom.
Freedom is a luxury that no king can afford.
Then I don't want to be king.
What else do you think you might be?
A man.
To run away from your duty, your training, your obligation, will hardly make a man of you.
If you're not a king, you are nothing.
Least of all, a man.
But grandfather...
I am not talking as your grandfather, but as your king.
The discussion is over, your highness.
Your majesty.
Eins, Swei, Drei, Vier
Lift your stein and drink your beer
Eins, Swei, Drei, Vier
Lift your stein and drink your beer
Drink! Drink! Drink!
To eyes that are bright as stars
When they're shining on me
Drink! Drink! Drink!
To lips that are red and sweet
As the fruit on the tree
Here's a hope
That those bright eyes will shine
Lovingly, longingly soon into mine
May those lips that are red and sweet
Tonight with joy my own lips meet
Drink! Drink! Drink!
Let the toast start
May young hearts never part
Drink! Drink! Drink!
Let every true lover salute his sweetheart
Let's drink!
How is his majesty?
Splendid.
He told me so himself.
This was all a trick.
We're going back to Heidelberg.
Lutz, get the luggage.
It was extremely clever of you,
Von Mark, to get me here by telling me his majesty was ill.
I'm going back to Heidelberg.
You may tell his majesty that.
Please your highness, his majesty is much too ill to be upset.
If he were really ill,
I would not leave him.
He's going on a trip to Switzerland.
Not Switzerland nor any place else.
The doctors will tell you that his majesty is a great deal sicker than either you or he realizes.
How can I believe you, Von Mark?
Your highness suspects me of trickery.
Your highness is quite right.
But I'm deceiving your grandfather, not you.
I have served my king too long to have the heart to tell him what the doctors say.
It is matter of a few days, an hour, any moment.
I'll walk with God from this day on
His helping hand
I'll lean upon
This is my prayer my humble plea
May the Lord be ever with me
There is no death
Though eyes grow dim
There is no fear
When I'm near to him
I'll lean on him forever
And he'll forsake me never
He will not fail me
As long as my faith is strong
Whatever road I may walk along
I'll walk with God
I'll take his hand
I'll talk with God
He'll understand
I'll pray to him
Each day to him
And he'll hear the words
That I say
His hand will guide my throne and rod
And I'll never walk alone
While I walk with God
Well, Lutz,
I suppose everything is ready.
Your majesty's luggage is already aboard the royal train.
Good.
The people of Karlsburg are waiting eagerly to welcome Princess Johanna as your bride.
This marriage is a very happy event.
Is it, Lutz?
For they've been waiting 2 years for it.
I wish your Majesty every happiness.
Let's drink to that.
It's all right, Lutz, relax.
Is that a command, your majesty?
Not at all, but I wish you would.
Your wish is my command.
This is my bachelor party, Lutz.
At a time like this, a man needs a friend.
We are friends, aren't we?
I hope not, your majesty.
Would the idea upset you, Lutz?
Indeed it does, your majesty.
It is an honor to put on a king's shoes.
But I certainly wouldn't do it for a friend.
If I must treat your majesty as an equal, then Hubert would treat me as an equal.
And I assure you, your majesty
Hubert is not my equal.
Forgive me, Lutz.
I shall endeavor to behave a manner more suitable to the dignity of our relationship.
I'm sorry to interrupt, your majesty.
Please forgive me, but this... this is impossible.
I'm much too old and fat to start wearing uniforms.
Oh, I must resign as privy counsellor.
My dear doctor, if you weren't a privy counsellor, you couldn't be in the official party.
If you weren't in the official party, you couldn't come to North Hausen.
And if you weren't at North Hausen, you couldn't be at the wedding.
And then I couldn't have you as my best man.
I'm afraid
I must refuse your resignation.
Ah, what I go through for friendship.
Besides you can't leave me alone with Lutz.
Why not?
He doesn't approve of me.
No?
Ever since Heidelberg.
We thought of everything, except that one day
I'd have to come back.
And that I'd be changed.
But that Karlsburg wouldn't be.
Perhaps after all,
Heidelberg was a mistake.
I don't regret a minute of it.
No, thank you, Lutz.
One moment.
As a privy counsellor,
I'm not permitted to drink unless your majesty does.
But if I can wear this uniform for you, surely you can drink a small brandy for my sake.
Silentium!
Silentium!
A salamander for the privy counsellor.
Long life.
And pleasant memories.
And pleasant memories.
To Heidelberg.
Heidelberg!
Golden days in the sunshine of our happy youth
Golden days
Full of gaiety and full of truth
In our hearts
We remember them all else above
Golden days
Days of youth and love
How we laugh
With a joy that only love can bring
Looking back through memory's haze
We will know life has nothing sweeter than it's springtime
Golden days when we're young
Golden days
Well, good night, my boy.
See you in the morning.
In the morning at North Hausen.
Good night, Herr Doctor.
Good night.
It would have been a beautiful day.
There'll be other days, Kathie.
And each day more beautiful than the last.
I'll be back.
Your majesty.
Lutz, you will have the train stop at Heidelberg.
Me?
But your majesty, it's not on our schedule.
It is now, Lutz.
It is now.
Drink! Drink! Drink!
To eyes that are bright as stars
When they're shining on me
Drink! Drink! Drink!
To lips that are red and sweet
As the fruit on the tree
Here's a hope
That those bright eyes will shine
Lovingly, longingly soon into mine
May those lips that are red and sweet
Tonight with joy my own lips meet
Drink! Drink! Drink!
Let the toast start
May young hearts never part
Kathie.
Karl.
What are you doing here?
I'm on my way to North Hausen.
I'm gonna be married.
Yes, I know.
It was in the papers.
It's the way it should be.
I never thought
I'd see you again.
I told you I'd come back.
Yes, you did.
That was when you were a student here.
We lived in the same world.
It's all the world
I ever wanted.
And we nearly got away.
Remember the night of the carnival?
Yes, I remember.
Oh, it's was a wonderful dream.
Now it's over.
Everything is different.
Nothing has really changed, nothing except you and me.
You're a king now.
I still love you, Kathie.
I always will.
And you?
No matter what ever happens, that will never change.
My only love.
Your first love.
Goodbye, Kathie.
Goodbye, your majesty.
Gaudeamus!
Let us rejoice while we are young.
END
The second star to the right
Shines in the night for you
To tell you that the dreams you plan
Really can come true
The second star to the right
Shines with a light so rare
And if it's Never Land you need
Its light will lead you there
Twinkle, twinkle little star
So we'll know where you are
Gleaming in the skies above
Lead us to the land
We dream of
And when ourjourney is through
Each time we say
Good night
We'll thank the little star that shines
The second from
The right
All this has happened before.
And it will all happen again.
But this time it happened in London.
It happened on a quiet street in Bloomsbury.
That corner house over there is the home of the Darling family.
And Peter Pan chose this particular house... because there were people here who believed in him.
There was Mrs Darling.
George, dear, do hurry. We mustn't be late for the party, you know.
Mrs Darling believed that Peter Pan was the spirit of youth.
- But Mr Darling--
- Mary, unless I find my cuff links... we don't go to the party.
And if we don't go to the party, I can never show my face in the office again.
And if I can never-- Ouch!
Well, Mr Darling was a practical man.
The boys, however,
John and Michael... believed Peter Pan was a real person... and made him the hero of all their nursery games.
Blast you, Peter Pan!
Take that! Give up,
Captain Hook? Give up?
Never! I'll teach you to cut off me hand!
Oh, no, John.
It was the left hand.
Oh, yes.
Thank you, Wendy.
Wendy, the eldest, not only believed... she was the supreme authority on Peter Pan... and all his marvellous adventures.
Oh, Nana, must we always take that nasty tonic?
Nana, the nursemaid, being a dog... kept her opinions to herself... and viewed the whole affair with a certain tolerance.
Take that!
Insolent boy!
I'll slash you to ribbons!
And I'll cut you to pieces.
- Aha!
- Ouch!
- Careful, Michael, my glasses.
- I'm sorry,John.
You'll never leave this ship alive!
Oh, yes, I will.
Take that!
Scuttle me bones, boy,
I'll slit your gizzard.
Oh, no, you won't.
Back, back, back, you villain!
- Insolent pup!
- Wicked pirate!
- Aha, I got ya.
- You didn't either.
You never touched me.
Take that and that!
And that!
Boys, boys, less noise, please.
- Oh, hello, Father.
- You old bilge rat.
Wh-Wh-What?
Now, see here, Michael--
Oh, not you, Father.
You see, he's Peter Pan.
- And John's Captain Hook.
- Yes, yes, of course.
Uh, have you seen my cuff--
Oh, Nana, for goodness sake!
Where are those cuff links?
- Cuff links, Father?
- Yes, the gold ones.
Michael, the buried treasure.
Where is it?
- I don't know.
- The map then.
- Where's the treasure map?
- It got lost.
- Good heavens, my shirt front!
- Hurray! You found it!
- You found it!
- Yes, so I have.
And hereafter--
Don't paw me, Michael.
This is my last clean--
No! No!
George, dear, we really must hurry or we'll be late--
- Mary, look!
- George.
- It's only chalk, Father.
- Why, Michael.
It's not his fault.
It's in the story.
- And Wendy says--
- Wendy? Story?
I might have known. Wendy!
- Wendy!
- Yes, Father?
- Would you kindly ex--
- Oh, Mother!
- You look simply lovely.
- Thank you, dear.
- Wendy.
-Just my old gown made over.
- But it did turn out rather nicely, didn't--
- Mary, if you don't mind.
- I'd like--
- Why, Father, what have you done to your shirt?
What have I-- Oh!
- Now, George, really.
It comes right off.
- That's no excuse.
Wendy, haven't I warned you?
Stuffing the boys' heads with a lot of silly stories.
- Oh, but they aren't.
- I say they are.
Captain Crook!
Peter Pirate!
- Peter Pan, Father.
- Pan! Pirate! Poppycock!
- Oh, no, Father. Father, have you--
- Oh, you don't understand.
Absolute poppycock!
And let me tell you, this ridiculous--
- Now, George.
- ""Now, George.''
""Now, George''!
Well, ""Now, George,'' will have his say!
- Please, dear.
- Mary, the child's growing up.
It's high time she had a room of her own.
- Father!
- George!
- What?
- No!
- I mean it!
Young lady, this is your last night in the nursery.
And that's my last word on the matter--
No!
No!
Oh!
Poor Nana.
""Poor Nana''?
This is the last straw!
Out! Out, I say!
- No, Father, no!
- Yes!
There'll be no more dogs for nursemaids in this house!
Goodbye, Nana.
""Poor Nana.''
Oh, yes, ""Poor Nana.''
But ""Poor Father''?
Oh, no!
Blast it!
Where is that rope?
Oh, thank you.
Dash it all, Nana, don't look at me like that.
It's nothing personal.
It's just that--
Well, you're not really a nurse at all.
You're, well, a dog.
And the children aren't puppies.
They're people.
And sooner or later, Nana, people have to grow up.
But, Mother,
I don't want to grow up.
Now, dear, don't worry about it any more tonight.
He called Peter Pan
""absolute poppycock.''
I'm sure he didn't mean it,John.
Father was just upset.
Poor Nana, out there all alone.
No more tears, Michael.
It's a warm night.
She'll be all right.
- Mother.
- What is it, dear?
- Buried treasure.
- Now, children.
Don't judge your father too harshly.
After all, he really loves you very much.
Oh, don't lock it, Mother.
He might come back.
- ""He''?
- Yes, uh, Peter Pan.
You see, I found something that belongs to him.
- Oh? And what's that?
- His shadow.
- ""Shadow''?
- Mmm, Nana had it.
But I--
I took it away.
Oh? Yes, of course.
Good night, dear.
But, George, do you think the children will be safe without Nana?
Safe? Of course they'll be safe. Why not?
Well, Wendy said something about a shadow, and I--
- Shadow? Whose shadow?
- Peter Pan's.
Oh, Peter Pan--
Peter Pan!
You don't say. Goodness gracious, whatever shall we do?
- But, George-- Really, I--
- Sound the alarm!
- Call Scotland Yard!
- There must have been someone.
Oh, Mary, of all the impossible, childish fiddle-faddle.
Peter Pan indeed. How can we expect the children to grow up and be practical...
- George, dear.
- when you're as bad as they are.
- Please.
- No wonder Wendy gets these idiotic ideas.
Over there, Tink, in its den.
Is it there?
Must be here somewhere.
Tink! Shh!
Stop playing and help me find my shadow.
Shadow. Oh, shadow.
Huh?
Aha!
Peter Pan! Oh, Peter!
I knew you'd come back.
I saved your shadow for you.
Oh, I do hope it isn't rumpled.
You know, you look exactly the way I thought you would.
Oh, a little taller perhaps.
But then--
Oh, you can't stick it on with soap, Peter.
It needs sewing.
That's the proper way to do it.
Although, come to think of it,
I've never thought about it before.
Uh, sewing shadows, I mean.
Of course, I knew it was your shadow the minute I saw it.
And I said to myself, I said, ""I'll put it away for him until he comes back.
Oh, he's sure to come back.''
And you did, didn't you, Peter?
After all, one can't leave his shadow lying about and not miss it sooner or later.
Uh, don't you agree? But what
I still don't understand is how
Nana got it in the first place.
She really isn't-- Oh, sit down.
It won't take long.
She really isn't vicious, you know.
She's a wonderful nurse.
- Although Father says--
- Girls talk too much.
Yes, girls talk too--
Hmm? Oh.
- Well, get on with it, girl.
- Uh, my name is Wendy.
- Uh, Wendy Moira Angela Darl--
- Wendy's enough.
Oh, uh, but how did
Nana get your shadow, Peter?
Jumped at me the other night at the window.
Well, what were you doing there?
- I came to listen to the stories.
- My stories?
- But they're all about you.
- Of course.
That's why I like 'em.
I tell 'em to the Lost Boys.
The Lost Boys--
Oh, I remember.
- They're your men.
- Uh-huh.
I'm so glad you came back tonight.
I might never have seen you.
- Why?
- Because I have to grow up tomorrow.
- Grow up!
- Tonight's my last night in the nursery.
But that means no more stories.
- Mm-hmm.
- No!
I won't have it.
Come on!
Bu-Bu-But where are we going?
To Never Land.
- Never Land!
- You'll never grow up there.
Oh, Peter, it will be so wonderful.
But wait.
What would Mother say?
Mother? What's Mother?
Why, Peter, a mother is someone who-- who loves and cares for you.
- And-- And tells you stories--
- Good! You can be our mother.
- Come on.
- Now, just a minute, I--
Let me see now.
I-I have to pack.
Oh, and I must leave a note when I'll be back.
Of course, I couldn't stay too long.
And then I'll have to--
Oh, but Never Land.
Oh, I--
I-I'm so happy I--
I think I'll give you a-- a kiss.
What's a-- a kiss?
Oh, well, uh,
I-I'll show you.
- Oh!
- Stop! Stop it, Tink!
John,John, wake up!
He's here.
Huh? Jiminy!
Ooh, what in the world was that?
Tinker Bell.
Don't know what got into her.
Hello, Peter Pan.
I'm Michael.
And my name is John.
How do you do?
- Hello.
- Oh, look, a firefly.
- A pixie.
- Amazing!
- What's the pixie doing?
- Talking.
- What did she say?
- She says you're a big, ugly girl.
Oh. Well, I think she's lovely.
- Well, come on, Wendy, let's go.
- Where are we going?
- To Never Land.
- Never Land!
- Peter's taking us.
- ""Us''?
Well, of course. I-I couldn't go without Michael and John.
Oh, I should like very much to cross swords with some real buccaneers.
Yes, and fight pirates too.
Well, all right, but ya gotta take orders.
- Aye, aye, sir.
- Me too.
But, Peter, how do we get to Never Land?
- Fly, of course.
- ""Fly''?
It's easy. All you have to do is to-- is to--
Is to--
- Ha! That's funny.
- What's the matter?
- Don't you know?
- Oh, sure.
It's-- It's just that
I never thought about it before.
Say, that's it!
You think of a wonderful thought.
- Any happy, little thought?
- Uh-huh.
- Like toys at Christmas?
- Sleigh bells, snow?
Yep! Watch me now.
Here I go!
It's easier than pie.
- He can fly!
- He can fly!
He flewed!
- Now you try.
- I'll think of a mermaid lagoon... underneath a magic moon.
I'll think I'm in a pirate's cave.
I think I'll be an Indian brave.
Now everybody try.
One, two, three!
We can fly! We can fly!
We can fly!
This won't do.
What's the matter with you?
All it takes is faith and trust.
Oh! And something
I forgot. Dust!
- Dust?
- Dust?
Yep, just a little bit of pixie dust.
Now, think of the happiest things.
- It's the same as having wings.
- Let's all try it just once more.
Look! We're rising off the floor.
-Jiminy!
- Oh, my! We can fly!
- You can fly!
- We can fly!
Come on, everybody.
Here we go!
Off to Never Land!
Think of a wonderful thought
Any merry little thought
Think of Christmas
Think of snow
Think of sleigh bells
Off you go like reindeer in the sky
You can fly, you can fly
You can fly
Think of the happiest things
It's the same as having wings
Take the path that moonbeams make
If the moon is still awake you'll see him wink his eye
You can fly, you can fly
You can fly
Up you go with a heigh and ho
To the stars beyond the blue
There's a Never Land waiting for you
Where all your happy dreams come true
Every dream that you dream will come true
Come on, Nana!
When there's a smile in your heart
There's no better time to start
Think of all thejoy you'll find
When you leave the world behind and bid your cares goodbye
You can fly, you can fly
You can fly, you can fly
You can fly
There it is, Wendy. Second star to the right and straight on till morning.
When there's a smile in your heart
There's no better time to start
Think of all thejoy you'll find when you leave the world behind
And bid your cares goodbye
You can fly, you can fly
You can fly, you can fly
You can fly
You can fly, you can fly
You can fly
Oh, a pirate's life is a wonderful life
A-rovin'over the sea
Give me a career as a buccaneer
It's the life of a pirate for me, oh
The life of a pirate for me
Oh, a pirate's life is a wonderful life
They never bury your bones
For when it's all over a jolly sea rover drops in on his friend, Davy Jones
Oh, my good friend
Davy Jones
- Good morning, shipmates.
- And what's good about it, Mr Smee?
Here we are, collecting barnacles on this miserable island.
While his nibs plays ring-around-the-rosy with Peter Pan.
Look out. It might go off.
We ought to be tending to the business of looting ships.
Why, I've almost forgotten how to slit a throat.
- Better hop it.
- And tell the captain... we wants to put to sea, see?
Peter Pan--
Blast that Peter Pan!
If I could only find his hideout,
I'd trap him in his lair.
But where is it?
Mermaid Lagoon?
No, we've searched that.
We've combed Cannibal Cove.
H-Here! No. No, no, no!
That's Indian terri--
But wait.
Those redskins know this island better than I do me own ship.
Ah...
I wonder.
- Good morning, Captain.
- I've got it!
Tiger Lily, Smee!
T-Tiger Lily, Captain?
The Chief's daughter.
She'll know where Pan is hiding.
B-B-But, but will she talk, Captain?
Oh, a little persuasion might be in order.
Now let me see.
Boiling in oil?
Keelhauling? Marooning?
A pirate's life is a wonderful l-life
You'll find adventure and sport
But live every minute for all that is in it
The life of a pirate is short
Oh, the life--
Now let me see, where was I?
Oh, dear, dear, dear Captain Hook.
Shooting a man in the middle of his cadenza?
It ain't good form, you know.
""Good form,'' Mr Smee?
Blast good form!
Did Pan show good form when he did this to me?
Why, Captain, cutting your hand off was only a childish prank, you might say.
Aye! But throwing it to the crocodile!
That cursed beast liked the taste of me so well... he's followed me ever since, licking his chops... for the rest of me.
And he'd have had you by now, Captain... if he hadn't swallowed that alarm clock.
But now when he's about, he warns ya as ya might say with his tick-tock... tick-tock, tick-tock.
Smee? Smee!
Oh, save me, Smee!
Please, don't let him get me, Smee!
Please, don't let him get me, Smee! Smee!
Here now, shame on ya.
Upsettin' the poor Captain.
There'll be no handouts today.
Shoo now, shoo!
Go on, go on, off it. Off with ya,
I say, go away, go away, out of here.
- Is he gone, Smee?
- Aye, Captain, all clear.
- Nothin' to worry about.
- Oh, Smee, Smee.
I can't stand it any longer.
I tell you, I can't.
Now, now, now, now, Captain.
Just relax.
What you need is a shave.
A nice soothing shave.
There now.
Oh, a pirate's life is a wonderful life
A-sailing over the sea
Give me a career as a--
Captain, you know,
I can't help noticin'... you just ain't been your usual jolly self of late.
Give me a career as a buccaneer
And the crew's gettin' a might uneasy, Captain.
That is, what's left of it.
Now, why don't we put to sea, see? Leave Never Land.
Forget Peter Pan.
There now!
Give me a career as a buccaneer
We'd all be a lot happier, not to mention a lot healthier.
Captain? Oh, dear! I never shaved him this close before.
Now, don't worry, Captain.
I-It must be somewhere about.
Get up, you idiot!
Aye, aye, sir.
Ooh! I found it, Captain.
- Good as new.
- Why, you blithering blockhead!
- Peter Pan ahoy!
- What? What? Where away?
Three points off the starboard bow!
Swoggle me eyes!
It is Pan!
Headed this way with some more of those scurvy brats!
Mr Smee, pipe up the crew!
A-Aye, aye, sir. Uh, pipe up the crew. Uh, pipe up the crew.
All hands on deck!
All hands on deck!
All hands on deck!
All hands on deck!
Look alive, you swabs!
- We've got him this time, Mr Smee.
- That we have, Captain.
Man the Long Tom, you bilge rats!
- I've waited years for this.
- That's not countin' the holidays either.
Double the powder and shorten the fuse!
Shorten the powder and double the fuse!
A pretty sight, Mr Smee.
We'll pot 'em like sitting ducks.
- All right, men! Range 42.
- ""Range 42.''
- Elevation 65.
- ""Elevation 65.''
- Three degrees west.
- ""Three degrees west.''
Steady now! Steady!
Oh, Peter, it's just as
I've always dreamed it would be.
Oh, look,John, there's Mermaid Lagoon.
By Jove!
And the Indian encampment!
Oh, look, there's
Captain Hook and the pirates.
Look out!
Quick, Tink, take Wendy and the boys to the island.
I'll stay here and draw Hook's fire.
Hook! Hook!
You codfish! Here!
Tinker Bell? Not so fast.
Please, Tinker Bell.
We can't keep up with you.
Tinker Bell! Wait!
Ouch!
So!
- Who ya shovin'?
- Who ya shovin'?
- You! That's who!
I'll show you!
Huh? Orders from Pan?
- Hold it, men!
- What's the orders, Tink?
- A terrible what?
- Wendy Bird.
- ""Wendy Bird''?
- Flying this way?
- Uh, Pan's orders are--
What? Smash it?
- Kick it?
- Stomp it?
- Stomp it?
- Oh! Shoot it down!
- Shoot it down!
- Yeah!
- Yeah, shoot it down!
- Come on, follow Tink!
- Follow Tink!
- Let's go!
- Yeah, come on. Let's go then!
- We're gonna get 'er!
- I see it!
- Me too!
- Me too!
Ready, aim... fire!
Oh, Peter, you saved my life.
- Are you hurted, Wendy?
- No, Michael.
Good heavens, Wendy, you might have been killed.
- Hey! Hey! Pan!
- We followed your orders, Pan!
- Hey, Pan, I got it with my skull buster!
- Ya did not! We did!
- I did it, Pan! I did it!
- No, I did!
Attention! Well...
I'm certainly proud of you, you blockheads!
- I bring ya a mother to tell ya stories--
- A mother?
- And you shoot her down.
- Well, Tink said it was a bird!
- Tink said what?
- Well, she said you said to shoot it down!
Tinker Bell. Tink!
Come here. You're charged with high treason, Tink.
Are you guilty or not guilty?
Guilty? But don't ya know ya might have killed her?
Tinker Bell!
I hereby banish you forever.
Please, not forever.
Well, for a week then. Come on, Wendy,
I'll show you the island.
Oh, Peter, uh, the mermaids?
- Aw, let's go huntin'!
- Tigers?
- Naw, bears.
- Naw, bears.
Personally, I should prefer to see the aborigines.
- And the Indians too.
- All right, men!
Go out and capture a few Indians.
-John, you be the leader.
- I shall try to be worthy of my post.
Forward! March!
- Come on, bear.
- Oh, Michael, do be careful.
Come on, Wendy.
I'll show you the mermaids.
Following the leader
The leader, the leader
We're following the leader wherever he may go
Tee dum, tee dee
A teedle ee do tee day
Tee dum, tee dee
It's part of the game we play
Tee dum, tee dee
The words are easy to say
Just a teedle ee dum a teedle ee do tee day
Tee dum, tee dee
A teedle ee do tee dum
We're one for all and all of us out for fun
We march in line and follow the other one
With a teedle ee do
A teedle ee di tee dum
Following the leader
The leader, the leader
We're following the leader wherever he may go
We're out to fight the Injuns
The Injuns, the Injuns
We're out to fight the Injuns because he told us so
Tee dum, tee dee
A teedle ee do tee day
We march along and these are the words we say
Tee dum, tee dee
A teedle ee do tee day
Oh, a teedle dee dum
A teedle ee do tee day
Oh, a teedle ee dum
A teedle ee do tee day
Indians!
Oh, Blackfoot tribe.
Belongs to the Algonquin group.
- Quite savage, you know.
- Uh, let's go get 'em.
- Come on! We'll get 'em!
- Gentlemen, gentlemen.
- First, we must plan our strategy.
- Uh, what's strategy?
A plan of attack. The initial phase is an encircling manoeuvre, thus!
John! Indians! Indians!
Let me in!
Now remember, the Indian is cunning...
- Hey--
- but not intelligent.
Therefore, we simply surround them and take them by surprise--
I'm frightfully sorry, old chaps.
It's all my fault.
- Aw, that's all right, Wildcat.
- Oh, we don't mind.
That's okay.
- How!
- Uh, h-how, Chief!
- How!
For many moons red man fight paleface Lost Boys.
- Ugh.
- Ugh, ugh.
- Sometime you win.
- Sometime we win.
- Okay, Chief.
Uh, you win this time.
Now, turn us loose.
""Turn us loose''?
You mean this is only a game?
Sure! When we win, we turn them loose.
- When they win, they turn us loose.
- They turn us loose.
This time, no turn 'em loose.
- Huh?
- Huh?
- The Chief's a great spoofer.
- Me no spoof'em.
Where you hide
Princess Tiger Lily?
- Uh, Tiger Lily?
- We ain't got your old princess.
- I've certainly never seen her.
- Me neither.
- Honest we don't.
- Heap big lie.
If Tiger Lily not back by sunset... burn 'em at stake.
Just imagine, real live mermaids.
- Would you like to meet 'em?
- Oh, Peter, I'd love to.
All right, come on.
- It's Peter.
- Oh!
- Hello, Peter!
- Hello, Peter!
- Hello, Peter!
- Hello!
Hello, Peter!
- Hello, girls.
- I'm so glad to see you.
Why did you stay away so long?
Did you miss me?
- Tell us one of your adventures.
- Something exciting.
Want to hear about the time
I cut off Hook's hand and threw it to the crocodile?
- Oh, I've always liked that one.
- Me too.
Well, there I was on
Marooner's Rock surrounded...
- Oh, Peter!
- by 40 or 50 pirates.
- Who's she?
Huh? Her?
Oh, that's Wendy.
- A girl?
- What's she doing here?
And in her nightdress too.
Come on, dearie.
Join us for a swim.
- Oh, please, I'm not dressed for it.
- Oh, but you must!
- We insist!
- No, no, please!
- Too good for us, eh?
- Peter!
- If you dare to come near me again--
- Wendy! Wendy!
They were just having a little fun, weren't you, girls?
- That's all.
- We were only trying to drown her.
- Ya see?
- Well, if you think for one minute...
- that I'm going to put up with a--
- Shh. Hold it, Wendy.
- Yep, it's Hook, all right.
- Hook!
- Hook!
Hook! Oh!
Quick, Wendy.
They've captured Tiger Lily.
Looks like they're headin' for Skull Rock.
Come on, Wendy.
Let's see what they're up to.
Now, me dear Princess, this is me proposition.
You tell me the hiding place of Peter Pan... and I shall set you free.
- You dog.
- Poor Tiger Lily.
Am I not a man of me word, Mr Smee?
Oh, yes, always, Captain.
You'd better talk, me dear, for soon the tide will be in... and then it will be too late.
- I'll show the old codfish.
Stay here, Wendy, and watch the fun.
- ""Fun''?
Remember... there is no path through water... to the happy hunting ground.
This is your last chance,
Tiger Lily!
Manatoa, great spirit of mighty seawater, speak!
Beware, Captain Hook!
Beware! Beware!
- Did you hear that, Smee?
- It's an evil spirit, Captain.
Stand by, Smee, while I take a look around.
Spirit of the great seawater, is it?
Psst! Wendy. Watch this.
- Mr Smee!
- Uh, yes, Captain?
Release the princess and take her back to her people.
Aye, aye, sir.
Release the princess--
- But-- But, Captain--
- Those are me orders, Mr Smee!
Aye, aye, sir.
- Well, at last Captain Hook's comin' to his senses.
- Odd's fish!
I told him all along you Indians wouldn't betray Peter Pan.
And just what do you think you are doing, Mr Smee?
Just what you told me, Captain.
Carryin' out your orders.
- My orders?
- Why, yes, Captain.
Didn't you just say to go--
Put her back!
You blithering idiot!
- My orders. Of all the bumbling--
- Mr Smee!
Just exactly what do you think you are doing?
Putting her back like you said, Captain.
I said nothing of the sort!
Oh, but, C-Captain, d-d-didn't you?
I thought that--
For the last time, Mr Smee.
Take the princess back to her people.
Understand? Understand?
Understand? Understand?
- Uh, aye, aye, sir.
- Oh, and one more thing.
When you return to the ship, tell the whole crew... to help themselves to me best rum.
- Peter!
- Here's your spirit, Smee!
Why, it's Peter Pan.
- Scurvy brat!
- Thank you, Captain.
Come down, boy, if you've a taste for cold steel.
- Watch this, Wendy.
- Oh, Peter, do be careful.
- Try your luck, Mr Smee?
- Let him have it!
Well, come on, you idiot!
Blast him!
Right here, Mr Smee.
Hold it, you fool!
No! No!
Captain?
Oh, how dreadful.
What a pity, Mr Smee.
I'm afraid we've lost the dear Captain.
Captain!
In the back, Captain?
Give it to him, Captain!
Cleave him to the brisket.
I've got you this time, Pan.
Well, well, a codfish on a hook.
I'll get you for this, Pan, if it's the last thing I do!
I say, Captain, do you hear something?
No.
No!
No!
Mr Crocodile, do you like codfish?
- You do?
- Oh, Peter, no!
No!
- Smee!
- D-Don't go away, Captain!
Uh, stay right there now, sir.
I'll save ya, sir.
Smee!
Smee!
Smee!
Ow!
Captain! Captain!
Smee! Smee!
- Give him back!
- Smee--
Row for the ship!
Row for the ship--
Whoa!
Smee!
Peter, what about Tiger Lily?
Tiger Lily?
Oh, Tiger Lily.
Help--
Peter. Wait for me.
That cursed Peter Pan.
Making a fool out of me.
Oh, my head.
Oh, a pirate's life is a wonderful life
- Your hot water, Mr Smee.
- Shh!
The poor Captain has a splitting headache.
We mustn't annoy him.
Well, Captain, it's nice to see you smiling again.
Brings back the good old days when we was leadin' a healthy, normal life.
Scuttlin' ships, cuttin' throats.
Oh, Captain... why don't we put to sea again?
You know, there's trouble brewin' on the island.
Women trouble.
I wouldn't want this to go any farther, but... the cook told me that the first mate told him... that he heard that Pan has banished Tinker Bell.
Whoa!
Why, you doddering imbecile, I--
Did you say Pan... has banished Tinker Bell?
Aye, aye, Captain.
That he has.
- But why?
- Well, on account of Wendy, Captain.
Tink tried to do her in, she did.
Tink's terrible jealous.
- Well, well.
- That's why we ought to leave, Captain.
This ain't no place for a respectable pirate.
That's it, Smee!
That's it!
I'm glad you agrees, Captain.
Quick, me coat.
Me best dress coat.
Aye, aye, sir. The sooner we get going, the better.
Ah, yes, a jealous female can be tricked into anything.
- My case of hooks!
- Aye, aye, sir.
Here you are, sir.
Your Sunday set, sir.
If we impress the pixie, convince her we're eager to help her... the wench may chart our course to a... certain hiding place.
Our best hiding place is the Spanish main, sir.
I'll set our course--
And where do you think you are going?
T-To tell the boys we sails with the tide, sir.
You will go ashore, pick up Tinker Bell... and bring her to me.
Understand?
Aye, aye, s-s-s-sir.
- How!
- How!
What's the Chief doing,John?
He's delivering an oration in sign language.
- What's he saying?
- He says...
""Peter Pan, mighty warrior.
""Save Tiger Lily.
Make big Chief heap glad.''
Well, he certainly doesn't look ""heap glad.''
Make Peter Pan heap big chief.
You now Little Flying Eagle.
- Hurray for Flying Eagle! Flying Eagle!
- Hurray!
Hurray!
- Oh, how wonderful!
- Hurray!
Teach 'em paleface brother all about red man.
Good, this should be most enlightening.
Uh, what makes the red man red?
- When did he first say, ""Ugh''?
- First say, ""Ugh''?
Why does he ask you, ""How''?
""Why does he ask you, 'How'?''
Hana mana ganda
Why does he ask you, how
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Once the Injun didn't know all the things that he know now
But the Injun
He sure learn a lot
And it's all from asking how
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
We translate for you
Hana means what mana means and ganda means that too
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
- Hana mana ganda
- Squaw, no dance.
Squaw, get 'em firewood.
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
In the Injun book, it say when first brave married squaw
He gave out with heap big ""ugh'" when he saw his mother-in-law
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda
What made the red man red
What made the red man red
Let's go back a million years to the very first Injun prince
He kissed a maid and start to blush and we've all been blushin'since
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda
Now you've got it right from the head man
The real true story of the red man
No matter what's been written or said, no matter what
Now you know why the red man's red
- Wa-hoo!
-John!
Squaw take 'em papoose.
Wa-hoo!
- Michael!
- Squaw, get 'em firewood.
Squaw no get 'em firewood!
Squaw go home.
Beggin' your pardon, Miss Bell... but Captain Hook would like a word with ya.
Yes, Miss Bell,
Captain Hook admits defeat.
Tomorrow I leave the island, never to return.
I'm glad to hear that, Captain.
I'll tell the crew and--
And that's why I asked you over, me dear... to tell Peter
I bear him no ill will.
Oh, Pan has his faults, to be sure.
Uh, bringing that Wendy to the island, for instance.
Dangerous business, that.
Why, rumour has it that already she has come between you and Peter.
But what's this?
Tears?
Then it is true.
Oh, Smee.
The way of a man with a maid.
Taking the best years of her life and then... casting her aside like an old glove!
Ain't it a bloomin' shame?
But we mustn't judge
Peter too harshly, me dear.
It's that Wendy who's to blame.
Mr Smee, we must save the lad from himself.
But how?
We've so little time.
We sail in the morning.
Sail! That's it, Smee!
- We'll shanghai Wendy.
- ""Shanghai Wendy,'' Captain?
Take her to sea with us.
With her gone, Peter will soon forget this mad infatuation.
Come, Smee, we must leave immediately.
Surround Peter's home--
But, Captain, we-- we don't know where Peter Pan lives!
Great Scott, you're right, Smee!
What's that, my dear?
You could show us the way?
Why, I never thought of that.
- Take this down, Smee.
- ""Take this down, Smee.''
Aye, aye, Captain.
- Start at Pegleg Point.
- ""Start at Pegleg Point.''
- Forty paces west of Blindman's Bluff.
- ""Blindman's Bluff.''
Yes, yes. Hop, skip and a jump across Crocodile Creek.
Then north by northeast, one, two, three.
Well, get on with it--
Continue, my dear.
I mustn't harm Peter?
Madam, Captain Hook gives his word... not to lay a finger... or a hook on Peter Pan.
Ah, Hangman's Tree.
So that's the entrance to his hiding place.
Thank you, me dear.
You've been most helpful.
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
- Hana mana ganda, Hana mana ganda
- Hana mana ganda
- Hana mana ganda
- What makes red men red
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda, hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda
Hana mana ganda
Big Chief Flying Eagle greets his braves.
- How!
- Uh, how, Chief.
- How, Chief! How!
- How.
- How.
Big Chief greets Little Mother.
- How!
- Ugh!
Aw, Wendy, is that all you have to say?
- Everyone else thinks I'm wonderful.
- Especially Tiger Lily.
- Tiger Lily?
-John! Michael!
Take off that war paint and get ready for bed.
- Bed?
- Brave no sleep.
Go for days without sleep.
- But, boys, we're going home in the morning.
- Home!
- And--
- Oh, Wendy, we don't want to go home.
No go home. Stay many moons.
Have heap big time.
Now, Peter, let's stop pretending and be practical.
Chief Flying Eagle has spoken.
Oh, for goodness sake.
Please, boys.
Do you want to stay here and grow up like-- like savages?
- Of course.
- But you can't.
You need a mother.
We all do.
Aren't you our mother, Wendy?
Why, Michael, of course not!
Surely you haven't forgotten our real mother!
Did she have silky ears and wear a fur coat?
Oh, no, Michael.
That was Nana.
I think I had a mother once.
- What was she like?
- What was she like?
- I forget.
- I had a white rat!
- That's no mother!
Hey, who ya shovin'?
No, no, boys! Please.
I'll tell you what a mother is.
- Yeah, tell us.
- Yeah, tell us.
- Please, Wendy.
Well, a mother, a real mother... is the most wonderful person in the world.
She's the angel voice... that bids you good night... kisses your cheek... whispers, ""Sleep tight.''
Your mother
And mine
Your mother
And mine
The helping hand that guides you along
Whether you're right
Whether you're wrong
Your mother
And mine
Your mother
And mine
What makes mothers all that they are
Might as well ask what makes a star
Ask your heart to tell you her worth
Your heart will say
Heaven on earth
- Another word
- Shh.
For divine
Your mother
And mine
- I wanna see my mother.
- Yes, Michael.
I propose we leave for home at once.
- Could I go too? Huh, Wendy?
- Me too, Wendy!
- Come on! Let me go!
All right, boys. All right. I'm sure
Mother would be glad to have you.
Uh, that is, if Peter doesn't mind.
Go on!
Go back and grow up!
But I'm warning ya.
Once you're grown up... you can never come back!
- Never!
- Dear.
- Well, then, shall we be off?
- Yeah, come on. Let's go!
- Yeah!
- See ya, Peter.
They'll be back.
Peter.
Goodbye, Peter.
All right, men.
Take them away.
And now, Smee, to take care of Master Peter Pan.
But, Captain, wouldn't it be more humane-like to slit his throat?
Aye, that it would, Mr Smee.
But I have given me word not to lay a finger... or a hook on Peter Pan.
And Captain Hook never breaks a promise.
Yo ho, yo ho
Yo ho, yo ho, yo ho
So try the life of a thief
Just sample the life of a crook
There isn't a boy who won't enjoy
A-workin'for Captain Hook
The world's most famous crook
Crook, crook, crickety crockety, crickety, crick the croc is after Captain--
A special offer for today
I'll tell you what I'll do
All those who sign without delay
Will get a free tattoo
Why, it's like money in the bank
Come on
Join up and I'll be frank
Unless you do you'll walk the plank
The choice is up to you
The choice is up to you
Yo ho, yo ho
Yo ho, yo ho, yo ho
You'll love the life of a thief
You'll relish the life of a crook
There's barrels of fun for everyone
And you'll get treasures by the ton
So come and sign the book
Join up with Captain Hook
- Hey, I wanna join!
- Please! Oh, boy!
- I wanna be a pirate!
- Oh, boy! A pirate!
Boys! Aren't you ashamed of yourselves?
But Captain Hook is most insistent, Wendy.
Yeah! He says we'll walk the plank if we don't.
Oh, no, we won't.
Peter Pan will save us.
Peter Pan will save them, Smee.
Peter Pan will save them.
Oh, Captain, you did it.
But a thousand pardons, my dear.
I don't believe you are in on our little joke.
You see, we left a present for Peter.
Sort of a surprise package, you might say.
Why, I can see our little friend at this very moment... reading the tender inscription.
""To Peter, with love from Wendy.
Do not open till 6 o'clock.''
Huh. I wonder what's in it.
Could he but see within the package... he would find an ingenious little device.
Set, so that when the clock is like this...
Peter Pan will be blasted... out of Never Land forever.
No!
But time grows short.
We have but 1 8 seconds.
Fifteen seconds.
Thirteen seconds.
Twelve seconds.
Well, I guess
I can open it now.
Hey, Tink.
Look what Wendy left.
Hey, stop that! Stop it!
What's the matter with you?
Hook? A bomb?
Don't be ridiculous!
And so passeth a worthy opponent.
Amen.
Hook! It was a bomb!
Why, if it hadn't been for Tink-- Tinker Bell!
Tink? Tinker Bell?
Where are you, Tink?
Tink? Tinker Bell!
Tink. Are you all right?
Wendy? The boys?
But I've gotta save you first.
Hold on, Tink! Hold on!
Don't go out.
Don't you understand, Tink?
You mean more to me than anything in this whole world!
And now, which will it be?
The pen or the plank?
Captain Hook, we will never join your crew.
As you wish.
Ladies first, my dear.
- Goodbye, boys.
- Goodbye, Wendy.
- Goodbye, Wendy.
- Be brave,John.
- I shall strive to, Wendy.
- Goodbye, Michael.
- Goodbye, Wendy.
- Come on!
- Get along over there!
- Get going, miss. Get going!
Don't give us no trouble!
Go on! Go on!
Get it over with!
- Move along!
- The Captain's waitin'!
Wendy! Wendy!
- Captain, n-no splash.
- Not a sound.
- Not a bloomin' ripple.
- It's a jinx, that's what it is.
- No splash.
- No sign of the wench.
- Did you hear a splash?
- I'm telling you, mates, it's a black day.
Mark me words.
We'll all pay for this.
The ship is bewitched.
No splash, Captain.
So, you want a splash, Mr Starkey.
I'll give you a splash!
- Who's next?
- You're next, Hook!
- This time you've gone too far!
- It's Pan! Peter Pan!
- And Wendy!
- It can't be!
It's his blinkin' ghost what's talkin'!
Say your prayers, Hook.
I'll show you this ghost has blood in his veins.
I'll run him through! Ooh!
Take that!
Curse this hook!
Come on, everybody!
Hurry, Michael! Hurry!
Don't stand there, you bilge rats!
Get those scurvy brats!
After the brats, men!
This is no mere boy.
'Tis some fiend fighting me.
A flying devil!
- Hold your fire.
- Get 'em!
Steady, men. Steady.
- Club 'em with the marline.
- Fire!
- I'll crack their bloomin' skulls!
- Let me at 'em!
Down, you blackguard!
Hurray!
- Right through, Michael.
- Yea, Bear Killer!
- Yea for Bear Killer!
Fly! Fly! Fly! You coward!
Coward? Me?
Ha-ha-ha! You wouldn't dare fight old Hook man-to-man!
You'd fly away like a cowardly sparrow!
Nobody calls Pan a coward and lives!
I'll fight you man-to-man, with one hand behind my back.
- You mean you won't fly?
- No, don't, Peter! It's a trick!
- I give my word, Hook.
- Good, then let's have at it!
Now! Insolent youth, prepare to die!
Fly! Fly, Peter! Fly!
No! I gave my word.
You're mine, Hook!
Cleave him to the brisket!
You wouldn't do old Hook in now, would you, lad?
I'll go away forever.
I'll do anything you say.
Well, all right.
If ya say you're a codfish.
- I'm a codfish.
- Louder!
- I'm a codfish!
- Hurray!
Hook is a codfish
A codfish, a codfish
-Hook is a codfish, a codfish, a codfish
-All right, Hook... you're free to go, and never return.
Peter!
Smee! Smee!
Smee!
Smee! Smee!
Smee-ee-ee-ee-ee-ee-ee-ee!
Captain!
Captain! Captain!
Hurray!
Hurray for Captain Pan!
All right, ya swabs, aloft with ya!
We're castin' off!
Heave those halyards!
But, but, Peter--
Oh, that is, Captain Pan.
- At your service, madam.
- Could you tell me, sir, where we're sailing?
- To London, madam.
- Oh, Peter.
Michael!John!
We're going home!
Man the capstan!
Hoist anchor!
Pixie dust!
George, I am so glad you changed your mind about Wendy.
After all, she's still a child.
Oh, pshaw, Mary.
You know I never mean those things.
Do I, Nana?
Oh! Wendy!
Wendy, what on earth are you doing there?
Mmm. Hmm?
- Oh, Mother, we're back!
- Back?
All except the Lost Boys.
They weren't quite ready.
- Lost Bo-- Ready?
- To grow up.
That's why they went back to Never Land.
- Never Land?
- Yes, but I am.
- Uh, ""am''?
- Uh, ready to grow up.
Oh! Oh! Uh--
Well, my dear, all in good time.
- After all, perhaps we were too--
- Oh, but, Mother... it was such a wonderful adventure.
Tinker Bell and the mermaids and Peter Pan.
Oh, he was the most wonderful of all.
- Why, why, even when we were kidnapped, I--
- Kidnapped!
Mm-hmm. I knew Peter Pan would save us, and he did.
And we all called him a codfish!
Uh, Captain Hook, I mean.
And then we sailed away on a ship in the sky.
Hmm. Mary, I'm going to bed.
Oh, Mother.
He really is wonderful, isn't he?
See how well he sails the ship.
- George. George!
- Now what, Mary?
Nana, d-did you see--
You know, I have the strangest feeling... that I've seen that ship before.
A long time ago... when I was very young.
- George, dear.
- Father.
When there's a smile in your heart
There's no better time to start
Think of all thejoy you'll find
When you leave the world behind
And bid your cares goodbye
You can fly
You can fly
You can fly
THE MUSIC ROOM from the short story by Tarashankar Bandyopadhyay
Photography: Subrata Mitra
Music: Ustad Vilayat Khan
Written and directed by:
Satyajit Ray
Ananta!
Master!
Which month is it?
Falgun, Master.
Is it spring?
Yes, Master, the "muchkunda" are in bloom.
Do you want some?
Ananta!
Master!
Where does that music come from?
From the Ganguli's place.
Where?
From Ganguli Babu's house,
Master!
Go and fetch the steward.
Yes, Master!
Pessanna Babu!
Pessanna Babu!
Lord Roy is calling you.
Who?
Master Roy! He's on the terrace. Hurry up.
Why is the Shehnai played at Mahim's?
For his sors initiation,
Master.
Is it the Shehnai of Bande Ali?
Yes, Master.
Have I been invited?
Yes.
Did he come in person?
No, Master.
A written invitation.
Will you go?
Am I going somewhere?
No, Master.
So?
I've brought your syrup.
Put it there.
The initiation.
A letter from the bank.
What do they say?
They say...
No credit?
No, Master.
They say the overdraft already exceeds...
...the limits of banking payment.
Master!
Mahim has come to see you, will you receive him?
Mahim?
Janardan Ganguli's son, Master.
This usurer's son?
He wants the exploitation rights for the river sandbank.
Him?
Yes, Master. He's rich.
A business in town, a house in the village.
Really?
Will you accept to hear him?
The coffers are empty, spending is important...
Call him!
In the music room.
Come in.
You are the son of
Janardan Ganguli?
Yes.
What did you put in the syrup?
Some muchkunda petals.
It's perfumed.
You took over the business?
Which rate?
What?
If you work on
Roy territory, you'll have to abide by some rules.
Yes yes, I know.
Maximum monthly interest is 1%.
Nothing on overdue taxes, no seizure, never bring a lawsuit.
You know that?
I know. We remember your kindness, Master.
Where have you been before?
I spent almost 20 years in the west,
Allahabad, Konpur, Lucknow.
Me too, I like music.
I attended musical parties there.
I can play the percussion, if necessary.
You can go.
Go?
Will Durgabai come?
Invitation cards have been sent?
Yes, the usual ones.
To Mahim too.
At your service... but...
Usurer's money can't be used to pay the initiation ceremony of my only son.
- Do you have another choice?
- Yes.
The jewels of the Roy family are still in the safe.
What's happening?
Are you angry?
There's nothing left now.
Yes, my jewels.
Your jewels?
They're mortgaged but I'll buy them back.
Old fool, do you know the cost of your last musical party?
The cost?
We have to spend money.
Khoka is my only son.
Am I going to cut down on his sacred initiation?
My prestige depends on it.
But... mortgaging in order to pay the singer!
This girl is exceptional.
Her beauty, her voice... you'll know when you listen to her.
No, I won't.
Where are you going?
It's 3. I'm going to bed.
Khoka sleeps alone.
Stay a while.
What is it?
What's the problem?
Close the music room.
Why?
I'll be deprived of music.
Music.
A crazy passion of yours.
That becomes one of your son too.
He neglects his work because of music, only but music.
And now he wants to ride.
Why do you worry?
He'll ride Tufan.
He'll hunt on Mati.
If not, how could he be a landowner from Roy lineage?
Landowner? What's left?
Everything has been swept away.
Haven't you seen the work of the river?
The pretty garden has been carried away the other day.
The flood?
Already forgotten?
I opened the doors of the
Roy house that day.
One thousand people took refuge there.
I have also many virtues.
I know. I am anxious.
A nightmare, last night...
Do you know my dream?
In a nymph music room, there is a big party.
Rambha sings, Urbashi dances...
...and Menaka...
That's enough.
It's very late. Go to bed.
Will we go to Narayanpur?
We'll talk about it later.
Go to bed.
Where do you want to go?
Mother wrote.
Oh! Narayanpur...
Father is very sick.
Mother would like...
You can go.
I consider bringing Khoka.
Good.
And you?
Me? Why should I go?
I'm afraid to leave you alone.
With your crazy ideas...
Let's go there together.
There isn't much work now.
That's absurd.
Who will watch the land?
Who?
You! Watching the land?
Be serious...
Come with us.
Do you agree, if not...
Don't be insistent.
We'll talk about it.
You exaggerate.
Goodbye.
Say "see you soon" rather than "goodbye".
Be good and behave.
Behave.
What do we hear?
A generator.
A generator?
Where?
At Ganguli's place. From the terrace, we see the light.
At Mahim's?
He's been said to have bought some English furniture.
Do you want me to play again?
Did you see the new house of Ganguli?
What do you think of it?
Quite modern. Not as prestigious as your palace.
No music room, no fountain.
No garden, no temple, nothing.
Next monday, Beggars' Day at Ganguli's.
Mahim wishes to see you.
Tell him to come in.
Come in Mahim.
You must visit my house, Master.
I repeat, would you honour me with your visit?
On which occasion?
With your blessing, I have built a house.
The inauguration is on Monday,
Bengali New Year's Day.
New Year's Day?
I already have a party at home.
On the first?
Yes, the lucky day.
The lucky day party?
I have never...
If you insist,
I can put it off.
Will that help?
No, no. It's not necessary.
You're the Master, and we are...
Your plans first.
I can't do anything, you know.
Everything is already planned.
Please allow me to leave now.
Agreed. Good day.
Did you hear?
And the jewels?
It's the last box.
The last one?
How dare you say "last" with this trivial tone...
Nothing is final.
Prepare everything.
Don't count money.
And this old musician?
What's his name?
The man from Murshidabad.
Ujir Khan, Master.
Go and fetch him.
He'll play a recital.
Send a messenger to Narayanpur.
Her Lordship and Khoka must be back on the morning of the first.
Everything's ready for lucky day.
The guests are arriving.
The boat is not back yet.
Must I send two others?
The storm looks threatening.
Go if you want.
I'll join you.
Is the boat back?
What's happened?
Drawn into a whirlpool.
What do you say?
Into a whirlpool?
Who told you that?
Kali is back.
Only Kali?
Who else? Nobody?
Speak! Nobody else?
The young Prince...
Khoka is back? Khoka!
You're still here?
Yes, Master.
Why?
What will happen if we all leave?
Nothing.
It's all over.
It wouldn't have happened... if you had paid more attention.
Because the land...
The land!
Where is it?
Everything is under water, under deep water.
Devastated...
Everything has been devastated.
The Privy Council has given its verdict, everything is lost except the sacred land.
Would Your Honour please come downstairs?
Furniture must be sold.
Please...
I will never come downstairs again.
Do whatever is best.
Listen.
Are Mati and Tufan still here?
Yes, Lord. They're here.
The Royal house of Sundarpur has made an offer, but we were waiting for your order.
They will stay...
My Khoka's favorites.
The musician is downstairs, should I call him?
Do you want to hear him?
Send him back.
No more music for me.
And your syrup?
Tomorrow I'll go downstairs.
You'll go downstairs?
I want to see Tufan and Mati.
You mean right now, Lord?
You go first and you warn them.
How are you doing?
The horse is sad because you don't ride him anymore.
Does he eat his chickpeas?
Has the elephant still his caparison?
I'm going to ask... Ahmad.
Tell him to embellish him.
To go... to Ganguli's house.
Send for the steward too.
I have asked them to adorn Mati.
Put this golden coin on a silver plate and bring it to Mahim's, following the custom.
What are you waiting for?
There is no more silver plate, Lord.
So take a copper one.
Yes, Lord.
That will do.
Close all the curtains.
Porter!
Servant!
You're here, steward!
Are you all dismissed?
Is there someone left to announce me?
It's for a meeting.
A business one?
I'd rather talk to him directly.
Could you wait a moment?
This residence...
What a splendour!
Long ago, but now...
After all, even a dead elephant is still worth 100.000 RS.
What do you say about it?
When you came this morning to my house on this old elephant... people greeted him whereas they stoned and scratched my new car.
I was driving myself!
The Master is calling you.
And you know why?
Because I have no pedigree,
I'm a self-made man.
Grandpa, you have turned my invitation down!
Well... sit down.
I was wrong. I was so busy...
I wasrt able to come in person to ask you...
No, no, it's nothing but...
I can't change my habits
...my age.
Come on Grandpa, don't talk about your age...
I saw you riding a horse.
No Mahim, this time is gone!
I've grown so old since 4 years.
That explains that cane in your hands.
Whatever, tonight you must honour my house with your noble presence.
Tonight?
Yes, tonight. My music room is inaugurated.
Do you know Krishnabai?
From Lucknow.
No? Everybody's talking about her.
It's said at her age... that dance called...
Kathak...
No one is better than her.
Really?
Krishnabai's dancing, and the best drum...
Who could appreciate that as we do?
My car will wait for you tonight around 8.
No, brother, thank you.
Why not?
I don't want to go out at the moment.
Even for a concert?
So you won't come?
No thank you.
Allow me to leave then.
But your syrup?
My syrup! I forgot.
Goodbye.
I have to rush to town.
English officials will come...
The music room is closed?
Yes, since the other day.
Where is the key?
The steward got it.
Open it.
I bring a lamp.
What is Krishnabai's fee?
200, Lord!
How much money is left?
How much?
From the sacred land.
Tomorrow I give a concert.
I must get Krishnabai!
Impossible, Lord!
What did you say?
I'm sorry, I'm sorry.
Everything's ready?
Except for some shopping.
Which ones?
Perfumes, candles...
Everything to honour my guests.
Any drinks?
Send Rahamat right away.
Let him ride Tufan.
Ganguli Babu has just arrived, Lord.
Sit down, Mahim.
Tell me what will happen.
Why?
Well... the atmosphere is strange.
I said: Is there someone... to fan us?
Here you go, Grandpa.
How are you?
Are you satisfied?
Hoorah for the dancer!
The host reserves the right of the first gift.
He failed.
He couldn't do it.
He couldn't do it.
He couldn't do it.
That usurer's son!
He wanted to break the top.
Such an arrogance!
He tries to reach the stars...
In vain, in vain.
Do you know why he fails?
Blood!
Blood in my veins.
Do you know which blood flows in my veins?
Which one, Master?
You want to see?
You really want to?
Come here, come.
Look at my father.
Ramerswar.
My grandfather.
My great-grandfather.
Tarakesvar.
My great-great-grandfather.
Ravanesvar.
To you!
To you, noble ancestors!
To you!
And to you...
...my noble self.
All gone.
Gone?
Yes, all of them.
The lights too, Master.
Yes, the lights...
The candles are consumed,
Lord. It's dawn.
The sun is about to rise.
The sun is rising?
I'll open the curtains.
Tufan is calling me.
You can't, Lord, no.
My riding habit.
You can't.
My riding crop.
You let him go?
I begged him, but he refused.
God help us!
Blood!
The End
Don't even stop to take your makeup off.
Get down to the side entrance. The cops are waiting.
Alan, if you're gonna pull any kind of a trick this time...
I told you, the car's at the curb.
The cops are waiting to get you to it.
What could I possibly pull?
Besides, no one knows what exit you're going out.
Come on.
What a crowd!
How'd they know I was coming out this way?
You got me, Arnie. I don't know.
Well, what do you expect?
When they see four cops rush in, they figure something's cooking.
You did it again. You set it up.
I...
You better get out, Mr. Haines.
The longer you wait the harder it's gonna be.
That's right.
Let him through. Let him through!
Arnie!
Give me a break, will you?
I did five shows today and I forgot to take my vitamin pills this morning.
Okay, honey, cut loose.
My purse!
Somebody stole my purse!
Help! Help, somebody! Stop the thief!
Somebody stole my purse!
That should get you the Academy Award.
Help! Police! Stop the thief!
When he came in, Mr. Freed stopped by the desk and said you might be in need of this.
Alan's here already?
He and others.
Lots of others, a veritable multitude.
Who?
Oh, I don't know, Mr. Haines.
But to me, it sure looks like trouble.
Boy, that guy is just murder.
Take care of the car for me, will you?
It's Arnie!
What's going on here?
Mr. Haines, my name is Tina Stephens.
Oh, hi.
I'm president of the Arnie Haines Fan Club Number 206.
Well, I'm always happy to meet new friends, but I hardly expected to find anyone here.
Mr. Haines, we came all the way in from Philadelphia just to see you.
Some of the kids are from your hometown.
I know. I've seen them.
But it wasn't possible to get into the theater.
So we thought we could see you here.
You did right, honey.
Arnie is always glad to say hello.
We thought you might autograph one of your records for us.
Just to prove to the other kids back home that we really talked to you.
Sure. I'd be glad to.
But maybe you fellows and gals could do me a favor.
You name it.
Well, tell me, what's all the shooting about?
Why do people like yourselves want to see me or talk to me?
Because you're Arnie Haines.
You stay out of this. You...
I'm sorry. You tell me, please.
Golly, Mr. Haines... maybe it's the way you sing, or the beat or something.
You don't really know, though, do you?
Isn't it enough that we want to see you and talk to you?
Sure, and I'm grateful, brown eyes. Thank you.
Will you autograph the record?
Sure, is it the one on the machine?
Somebody got a pen?
I got one, Arnie.
Now, in a nice, bold hand.
"What's all the shooting about?" Brother.
I'm not through with you yet.
Here you go. Here, it's yours.
And thank you.
Thank you very much for coming up... and anytime you're in New York, you come in again.
You hear? I'm glad to see you. Really.
Gee, thanks, Mr. Haines. We will.
Bye~
Be careful going home, now.
What are you trying to do, get us thrown out of the hotel... so you can get more of that idiotic publicity?
Alan, tonight's the last straw.
Arnie, you gotta do these things.
You never wanna string along with me, so...
You'll make a freak out of me whether I like it or not.
Look, everybody's trying to get into the newspapers, Arnie.
You gotta push the other guy aside and make news.
He seems to think that me running around in my underwear, or getting...thrown out of a hotel is news.
Now, does that sound like news to you guys?
Oh, if you were Kim Novak, it might.
Oh, very funny.
Look, fellows, listen to me...
Arnie's right, Alan.
Maybe you have had a lot to do with us getting where we are, sure.
But you're getting everything all twisted out of shape.
You think nothing's more important than getting in the papers.
Listen, that's free publicity. That's our bread and butter.
Bread and butter, my foot.
We ate better back on the farm in Mellondale.
And we had more fun clobbering a guitar and drums there than we've ever had since.
And don't tell us about the money we're making.
With you hounding the agency like a scared rabbit, trying to get us work... like there's not gonna be a tomorrow, we're lucky we get any sleep.
Let alone a chance to spend some of that money on a little pleasure.
What are you trying to do, make us the richest guys in the Mellondale cemetery?
Yeah, man. There just ain't no rock and roll music for a harp.
What do you guys want?
I'll tell you what I'd like.
I'd like some of those fresh-caught lobster and crab from back home.
Steamed clams, a weenie roast at the beach.
I want to lie on my back, look up at the sky... and listen to the folks talk about all that good rain they get for their crops.
That, and getting my own eggs out of the henhouse... a watermelon out of the field.
You sound like you're hungry.
I know what he means.
We haven't seen our folks in over two years.
Tag? Dave?
That's right.
Are you really serious about going home?
Well, how about it?
No more work until September.
We'll spend all July and August back in Mellondale and really live it up.
Oh, Mammy, steam up those clams!
Yeah, that's for me.
Wait a minute. Wait a minute.
What about all those bookings we've got scheduled for this summer?
$80,000 worth.
Cancel them.
Cancel them?
That's right.
How can we cancel out on those dates, Arnie?
If not for the money, for all the good will
We'd be losing in every town we're supposed to play in.
I tell you, Arnie, we'd be letting them down.
Not if we can get another act to take over some of those bookings.
Who?
Well, maybe Bill Haley would play ball with us.
Sure, we've done him some favors.
Hey, Bill's rehearsing over at Brownie's tonight.
Come on, Alan, let's go see him right now.
Hey, just one thing.
Huh?
Who's your tailor?
You guys are murder.
I'll be dressed in a minute.
Man, they really go, boy.
Really something, huh?
Hi, Alan.
Hi, Billy.
Hi, Arnie.
Gee, you were just great. Just great.
Oh, Zee. Thanks.
You know, I don't know whether I ought to speak to you guys or not.
Why is that?
The only way I can get more publicity than you... is to go up Broadway without my underwear.
Yeah, well, the next time it'll be Alan here doing the Lady Godiva, not Arnie Haines.
Say, Bill, I know you're going into the Castle Theatre next week.
But what are your plans after that?
Well, just a few recordings we have to make.
Hey, maybe you can do us a favor.
Can you take over some of our dates?
Man, you can't retire.
The government needs your taxes.
No, just a little vacation. Man, I'm tired.
Well, it's possible, Arnie.
I'll have my manager get in touch with your booking office in the morning.
I think it can be worked out.
Good. That's swell.
Anytime we can repay the favor, you just let us know.
How about listening to my new tune.
Goofin' Around? See if you dig it.
Sold.
Love to hear it, Bill.
Well, park yourselves.
Sit down, Arnie.
Thanks.
Hello?
Yeah, this is Alan Freed.
Oh, hi, Harry.
Yeah.
I told you you'd get a great story if you sent a man to cover the Haines show.
But, man, I got an even greater one for you now.
Yeah, the king is going home.
It's the greatest rags-to-riches yarn you've ever had.
It beats them all.
Cinderella, Horatio Alger.
Man, it's a natural, Harry.
"The triumphant return of Arnie Haines to his hometown.
"A town which Arnie Haines left as a farm boy and comes back to as a king."
Well, we made it.
You sure you won't be angry with me?
With my own mother?
Well, it's being done, you know.
Psychiatrists are blaming parents for everything these days.
It's really quite the thing to be angry with one's mother.
However, I'm sure I'll give you plenty of cause before I'm through with your Mr. Arnie Haines.
Mother...
Now, Francie, you wanted to come with me. That was all right.
But I've got a job to do.
I'm gonna write about Arnie Haines exactly as I see him.
And I've gotta ask you not to interfere.
Well, well, well, if it isn't the competition.
What's a genuine columnist doing at this wingding?
Let's just say I'm getting pains from Arnie Haines.
You drive all the way here?
Yeah. I thought it'd be a nice vacation for my daughter and myself.
The glamor boy due in soon?
Any minute.
My daughter, Francine, boys.
Hi.
How do you do?
And don't get any ideas.
She doesn't go for anyone who doesn't wear an Arnie Haines button.
Well, you'd better find a new hero, Miss MacLaine.
Anybody your mother doesn't like generally winds up in the tail end of nowhere.
My mother says her column is always fair.
We'll see.
Now, baby, you're taking all this too seriously. Relax.
Hey, what is this?
Looks pretty clear to me, boss.
Arnie!
Mr. Haines.
Mayor Bagley.
Hi, Sis.
How's Mom?
She's fine.
I didn't think anyone knew I was coming except my folks.
Your parents thought it best to wait at your home.
But if you want my advice, you'll take the next train back to New York.
Hey, wait a minute.
It's okay. Relax.
You want to keep me out of my hometown? Why?
I tell you, Mr. Haines, and we the people of Mellondale... consider your so-called music outrageous.
Rock and roll is for morons!
You've seen the moral effect it's having on our younger generation.
And I say again, it's outrageous! Depraved!
Well, what's depraved about dancing?
We want Arnie! We want Arnie!
Stop it! Stop it!
Stop it!
I will not tolerate such behavior in this town.
Go home!
Children should be seen and not heard.
Boy, there's a quote from the Middle Ages.
Look, Mayor, the boys and I just came home for a rest, that's all.
We're not here to perform.
Now, if you don't bother us, we won't bother you.
I have no legal right to keep you out of town.
But I want to warn you.
Just one, one exhibition to ruin the morals of our younger people...
Just one toot.
And out you go.
Please stay. Don't go.
I suppose you think that the Mayor is right.
If I said yes, you'd think I'm not being fair.
Let's just say, "no comment."
Come on, let's get back to the hotel.
Arnie, you don't mean that you're gonna let that old windbag stop you from performing here.
He's not stopping me. I told the truth.
The boys and I just came home to rest up for the summer.
Now, look, let's forget the whole thing. It's really not important.
Oh, but we think it's important.
We're human beings, too, aren't we?
We've got some rights.
Look, if we don't break the law.
Bagley can't tell us what to do or what not to do.
You can't get...
Davey Loman, you get on home, before I take a stick to you.
Ma, I'm 17.
In that case, I'll have to get a bigger stick.
Gettin'.
The Mayor was right.
Arnie Haines, you stay away from our kids.
Look, kids, thanks.
Thanks a million for being here.
I really appreciate it, but I guess...
You'd all better get home before there's more trouble. Thanks.
Come on, break it up.
"Go home for a rest," he says.
"Lie on the beach, look at the sky...
"Get eggs right out of the henhouse."
We laid one big, fat, beautiful egg here today.
Come on, let's get out of here.
My suitcase.
Hey, look, you guys aren't gonna print what happened here today, are you?
Now, Alan, you started this.
You're the one who invited the newspaper people out here.
Okay. Now let them print what they came for.
Even if we did give you a break... Arline MacLaine won't.
MacLaine?
She writes that column. She's here?
She sure is.
The World as seen by Arline MacLaine.
And since you happen to be part of this world, Haines, she's gonna take you apart.
But why? What have we done to her?
Well, she sounds as though you give her nervous indigestion.
It could be something about her daughter, though.
I just thought I'd tip you off.
Thanks.
My kid dances that stuff, same as the other kids.
I don't see anything wrong in it.
Just thought I'd tell you.
Thank you very much.
Well, maybe we ought to go back to New York.
The worst that can happen to us there is we get hit by a truck.
Yeah.
I'm staying.
If these folks are gonna keep thinking like this... how do you think it's gonna be for our folks who have to live here?
How do you expect to change their minds?
I have plenty of time to think about that.
I'm going home to see my folks.
Yeah. So am I.
We'll see you at your house after dinner.
Okay. Good idea. Yeah.
So long, fellows.
Arnie, I'm sorry.
I'm not.
I tell you, I was beginning to think maybe I am some kind of a freak.
They called me everything but that today.
I guess that makes me normal, huh?
See you after dinner, too?
Sure, Arnie.
Come on, Molly.
Okay. See you tonight, Alan.
Bye, honey.
Bye.
They do make a cute couple, don't they?
In the old days, the kids used their energy for picking corn.
Hey, maybe we ought to go inside and get cheered up.
Let's go. Come on.
Good.
That must be the rest of the kids.
I'll get it.
Hey! Hi, fellows.
It's the boys! Hi, Alan!
Hello!
Hi, Chas! Tag, how are you?
Hey, fellows. How about that?
What are you, a Benedict Arnold or something?
Playing a Bill Haley record here?
We have to.
All the Arnie Haines records are worn out.
Try Haines' home. To heck with the beach.
And to heck with old Bagley!
Come on! Let's go!
Yeah, you got the rock, all right.
But I think your roll just stripped a gear.
I was on my way to the beach when I heard the music.
I thought you were inside.
I saw you through the window.
We don't always have people gamboling on the green out here.
This is purely clinical research.
I'm only interested in cause and effect, Mr. Haines.
The effect seems evident, and the modus operandi seems clear... but the cause really eludes me.
Hey, hold on. Would you play that chorus over in a different key?
What I mean is...
It just seems like dancing to me.
Why are people like my mother and the Mayor so steamed up?
Your mother?
Oh, I'm Francine MacLaine. My mother writes a newspaper column.
That MacLaine.
What'd she do? Send you out here for more material to slug me with?
Hardly.
She doesn't think you belong in the company of nice little girls.
Well, so long, Miss MacLaine.
Wait a minute.
I didn't say that was my opinion.
I'd like to talk to you.
What about?
My mother's column appears in about 150 newspapers.
If she blasts you, man, you're blasted good.
I'd like to try and change her mind.
Hey, you on the level?
There's a principle involved.
Teenagers are almost adults.
They're entitled to their own opinions not what somebody dictates for them.
So you think your mother could make me or break me, huh?
Her column always manages to stir up something.
It's like living inside of a hurricane.
But I wouldn't want it to even try and hurt you.
Maybe we should both go to the beach.
It'll be nice and quiet there.
We can have a man-to-man talk.
Sure. Man to man.
I'll get a suit. Will you wait for me?
Go ahead. Sing it.
That was lovely.
I didn't know you could sing that kind of a song.
The people who buy my records like rock and roll.
The public always decides what kind of entertainment it's going to get.
It's a business, just like any other business.
Oh, that's for sure.
You know, I've come to the conclusion that rock and roll is a symptom of the young people.
Asserting themselves for their right to do things as they think fit.
They resent the wrong kind of discipline by parents.
Parents would never understand that.
Sometimes people assert themselves in the wrong way.
How did you get so smart at your age, little girl?
Isn't that beside the point?
Pretty, too.
And you couldn't have spent your time in beauty parlors.
Thank you.
You know, for two years I've been wondering what all the shooting is about.
What people really see in the way I sing.
You just told me.
I did?
Sure. It isn't me at all.
Arnie Haines is just a name.
If it weren't Arnie Haines, it'd be somebody else.
Kids just pick somebody like me and wave me like a flag.
They wanna hold me in front of their parents' noses like a pair of red britches in front of a bull.
Of course. That's it.
Miss MacLaine, you're all right.
Boy, I've been thinking for so long about...
Why did you kiss me?
Oh, I'm sorry. I didn't even know I had...
You know, you shouldn't look like that if you don't want to be kissed.
Strictly a sex attraction, wasn't it?
Are you serious?
Mother's kept boys away from me as if they had rabies.
She once read where wolves get rabies like dogs.
I'm sure that must mean something.
I found it quite profound.
Kissing you, I mean.
You're right. It is profound.
Maybe we'd better just talk for a while.
Yeah, and keep talking.
Arnie, I think you should play your rock and roll music at a public function.
What for?
So that my mother can see for herself that your music isn't detrimental to young people.
Oh, no deal. Bagley would run us out of town.
It doesn't have to be in Mellondale.
What if your mother doesn't like what she sees?
Why couldn't my mother have been the kind who just sits home and does knitting?
Seems to me, though, we have nothing to lose.
If we don't do it, she's gonna clobber us anyway.
I know we can change her mind.
And if we do, she won't stop working until she makes things right.
All right. I'll talk to the boys.
If they go along with it, we'll run the dance.
Probably in Friesville the next town.
I think rabies are just wonderful.
Give me the out-of-town papers.
Yes, sir.
Let me see my little....
Yeah, keeping one.
Look at this. "Rock and roll barred by Haines' home town."
Wow. "Rock and Roll Revolt."
Every one of them.
Coast-to-coast frame-up.
Right across the country.
We're dead.
Services will be held in five minutes.
Now what?
Hey, there's one I got to see in particular.
What is it?
Herald Tribune.
Yeah, here it is, right here.
On the back page, it always is.
Boy, she doesn't pull any punches.
Bad, huh?
Now what are we gonna do?
We're gonna turn the other cheek, and let her take a sock at that, too.
We're inviting the lady to a dance.
Come on, let's go to Friesville.
Here you are. Keep the change.
Thanks a lot.
Here, have a good look, Bill.
Arnie Haines has ruined us.
Every booking we had across the country's been canceled.
Well, how do you like that?
He wants a vacation, so he takes us all with him.
Thanks for bringing me the good news.
There it is.
The Mayor owns this place.
Gee, I hope it works out.
Come on, let's see if he's around.
All right.
We're looking for Mr. Everett.
Well, I'm Tom Everett. Something I can do for you?
My name is Freed, and this is Arnie Haines.
Arnie Haines!
Oh, the rock and roll fellow?
There's only one, Dad.
Meet my daughter, Sunny.
She likes to come down and sing and dance with the band once in a while.
How do you do, Miss Everett?
Hello.
I've been reading about you in the papers, Mr. Haines.
Well, that's why we came to talk to you, sir.
Oh?
We'd like to put on a special rock and roll show here some Saturday night.
Man, that'd be the coolest!
Arnie Haines, right here in Friesville!
Whoa, now, honey, not so fast.
You can make more money in one night than all summer long.
Well, Mellondale's five times bigger than we are and Friesville depends on Mellondale for a lot of business.
If Mayor Bagley was to get mad...
Oh, Dad, you don't have to kowtow to old Bagley one bit.
Why, every kid in town thinks he's stupid for banning Arnie.
And we can promise that a lot of top rock and roll artists will appear here with us that night.
Just... Why you fellows going to all this trouble?
Well, we have a point to prove, Mr. Everett.
We'd like to show the rest of the country that rock and roll is a safe and sane dance for all young people.
It hasn't hurt me any, has it?
You'd like to have Mr. Haines here real bad, wouldn't you?
I can't think of any other man in the whole world I'd want more.
You know, I think she's got every record you ever made.
Well.
Okay, Mr. Haines, you tell me what Saturday night you want, and we'll set it up.
That's great. Thank you, sir, very much.
You can thank me.
After all, I was the one who sold my father.
Wasn't I?
You know, she's a pretty good saleslady when she gets started.
I'll walk Mr. Haines back to his car.
Why don't you two talk business?
Okay, Arnie, I'll handle it.
Mr. Everett, what's the first Saturday night you've got available?
Well, let's see. Next Saturday is booked.
You'd never think I'm not 18 yet, would you?
Is that a warning?
Everyone thinks I act much older.
You add me to the list, then.
How'd you manage to get like that, anyway?
Oh, I decided ages ago there wasn't much point in acting too young.
Just old enough, huh?
I like men.
Why shouldn't I be frank about it?
All women do.
They just don't come out and say so.
Where'd you learn that stuff?
Arnie, are there gonna be reporters and men taking pictures the night you're here?
They'll be invited.
I think my father would like it if I were your date that night.
How do you know he'd like it?
Oh, he'd like it if I told him.
Oh, I see.
Miss Everett, look, I'm a lot older than you are, you know?
There. Now I just grew up five years.
See you, Arnie.
Great catfishes, Arnie! Where you been?
What's the matter, Molly?
The phone hasn't stopped ringing since you left the house this morning.
Newspapers?
Newspapers, your television sponsor, newsreels, and a fellow named Ted Collier called from New York 13 times.
Wow, we didn't get in touch with Collier.
The office must be going crazy.
I'll get him right now.
Hey, who is this Collier character?
He runs the theatrical agency booking our act.
I gotta go with Alan, honey.
But Ted...
Ted, I'm trying to tell you that...
Ted, if you'll just listen to me.
Give me that, will you?
Teddy?
Ted, this is Arnie.
Well, if you'd just be quiet for a minute and listen, maybe we could get someplace.
Yeah, we read the papers. We read all the papers.
We may have an angle, though, to overcome the whole mess.
We're gonna run a rock and roll show in the next town.
We want to prove something to Arline MacLaine.
Yeah, we know, but if we can get her to change her mind and write in her column that rock and roll is a good influence for the kids... it'll be a solid argument for us.
Yeah, Ted.
Yeah, we think so, too.
You can help us a great deal.
I'll need the best rock and roll acts you can get. The best, though.
Yeah!
Wow!
Yeah, that's great. That'll do it. Thanks.
The date?
Saturday. Write it down, will you?
Saturday, July 17th?
17th, yeah.
July 17th.
Thank you, Ted. Thanks very much.
Yeah, me, too.
Well, we're all set.
Bill Haley and his Comets, Little Richard and his combo...
The Treniers, have all been canceled out on their dates because of the bad publicity we started.
You started.
But those are the acts that are coming here.
Wow. That's the best in the business.
You bet your life.
That's $1 million worth of talent on one stage.
Wow, Friesville won't ever forget that, I bet.
I'll tell the boys all about it, and I'll handle all the arrangements.
One arrangement I gotta handle myself.
Miss Francine MacLaine, please.
Now, would you mind telling me why you had me come way out here?
You saw that stuff your mother wrote about me.
It was horrible.
I'm worried.
Francine, I'm worried about the dance.
A woman like Arline MacLaine... she'll never eat her words.
Please believe me. She isn't like she sounds in that column.
Not really.
She can be very warm and human and honest.
Wish I could believe that.
I know. Sometimes she goes smashing into things like Carrie Nation with a hatchet.
But she's not small.
She'd gladly eat her words, if only we could convince her.
I don't know.
Honestly, Arnie.
If you don't know her, I guess nobody does.
We'll go ahead with the dance.
Good.
You know, I've been keeping my ears open in town.
You'd be surprised at the things I found out.
Such as?
We have to make sure that Mayor Bagley doesn't hear of it.
That's for sure.
He has to make himself look good for the next election.
He knows if you prove him wrong, he's gonna look like a fool.
So that's it. Reelection.
It figures.
The only way we can advertise now is by word of mouth.
The kids will have to pass it on from one to the other.
My sister, Molly, can start the ball rolling.
And I've made friends with a group of kids from the little theater.
Good.
They can help spread the word around.
Very good.
But do me a favor.
Don't tell your mother about the dance until the very last minute.
Don't worry. I won't.
Hey.
Where does your mother think you are tonight?
At a hog calling contest.
Please don't tell her you were dating the head hog caller.
Hey, I gotta get you home before she gets the bloodhounds out. Let's go.
Arnie Haines, Friesville Palladium.
Arnie Haines, Friesville Palladium.
Friesville Palladium.
The Arnie Haines Show, Friesville Palladium.
The Arnie Haines Show, Saturday night, Friesville Palladium.
The Arnie Haines Show, Saturday night.
The Arnie Haines Show, Friesville Palladium, Saturday night.
Let's rip it up!
Well, Mother, how does it look?
As if they all need a sedative.
But you must admit, it's just dancing. That's all.
These kids aren't doing anything wrong.
Well, darling, how can I tell?
They all move so fast, it looks like a double exposure.
You promised you'd report only what you saw here, nothing else.
If you do that, I'll be satisfied.
I made a bargain with you, baby. I'll live up to it.
Where's your boyfriend?
Boyfriend?
Now, Francine, you don't honestly believe that I thought you were going to hog calling and pie baking contests?
Those were the best things I could think up.
Are you in love with him?
I don't know.
I hope so. I'd like to be.
Francie, you could do so much better.
I'm also old enough to be entitled to my own mistakes, Mother.
All right, darling.
I'm afraid this is as far as our date goes, Sunny.
I have other things to do.
Oh, you won't have any trouble finding boys to dance with here.
No trouble at all.
But I'll be seeing you later.
Well, I'm not sure.
I am.
You won't be on the stage all night.
Do we dig?
Consider it dug.
Good evening, Mrs. MacLaine.
Miss MacLaine.
Congratulations, Mr. Haines.
You must sing romantic ballads much better than I thought.
Mother. She knows.
I'm very sorry you don't think as much about rock and roll as your daughter does, Mrs. MacLaine.
Oh, she's very young, she'll get over it.
And what happens to you, Mr. Haines, when the public gets over rock and roll?
Well, if they ever do, then I'll go back to singing romantic ballads.
And I hope Francine's around to listen to them.
Check with you later.
Touche.
Touche.
Now one of the most fabulous of all rock and roll acts... here are The Treniers!
How are we doing, Dad?
The newspaper gal digging us?
Yeah, real deep.
She sounds like she has us plowed way under already.
That's freedom of the press.
Yeah, and I always thought freedom of the press was a tailor who ironed your suits for nothing.
Shows you.
Hey, we're on next. We better get set, fellows.
Okay. The rest of the boys are backstage.
Good.
Well, at least the latest communique from Mellondale is a good one.
Mayor Bagley is sound asleep.
Who would ever think 500 kids would keep a secret?
Looks like the younger generation has some character after all, eh?
Light up the lantern and let the bells toll 'cause that man's coming out to rock and roll.
So take off your handcuffs and take off your chains... while we dig with the mostest of Arnie Haines!
It's intermission time. Time to rest your feet.
Then Little Richard and his cats will be here with a beat.
You got 15 minutes, so set your clocks.
And then jive on back with your rolls and rocks!
See you later.
Now, look, Sunny. I can't run out like this.
I have guests in there.
I'm your date, whether you know it or not.
But I can't...
Oh, now come on.
If the world was made in six days... we should be able to make a little time in 15 minutes.
Boy, something tells me your father missed up on a few spankings somewhere along the line.
I parked it here just for us.
If you think I'm gonna go for a drive now...
Now, who said anything about driving?
I just want to talk. Get in.
Okay, start talking.
There.
Now I can always say I necked with Arnie Haines.
Necked?
You're the most scared man I ever did see.
I wish you were the most scared girl I ever saw.
Don't you know that in some countries, girls get married at 14?
That's it. You should go there.
By now, you'd be a great-grandmother.
You really are going to talk, aren't you?
Even if I can't think of a thing to say.
Well, try talking now.
You crazy kid!
What are you trying to do, mess me up and yourself along with me?
I could mess you up, Arnie Haines.
I could mess you up good.
Okay, if you're looking for a reason, you've got one.
And now, here's that real solid man of rock and roll...
Little Richard and Long Tall Sally.
<font color=cyan> Gonna tell Aunt Mary 'bout Uncle John,</font>
<font color=cyan> He claim he has the misery but he's havin' a lot of fun,</font>
<font color=cyan> Oh baby,</font>
<font color=cyan> Yeah baby,</font>
<font color=cyan> Woo~</font>
<font color=cyan> Baby~</font>
<font color=cyan> Havin' me some fun tonight.</font>
<font color=cyan> Yeah~</font>
<font color=cyan> Well long, tall Sally.</font>
<font color=cyan> She's built for speed, she got.</font>
<font color=cyan> Everything that Uncle John need, oh baby,</font>
<font color=cyan> Yeah baby,</font>
<font color=cyan> Woo~</font>
<font color=cyan> Baby~</font>
<font color=cyan> Havin' me some fun tonight.</font>
<font color=cyan> Yeah~</font>
<font color=cyan> Well, I saw Uncle John with long tall Sally.</font>
<font color=cyan> He saw Aunt Mary comin' and he ducked back in the alley oh baby,</font>
<font color=cyan> Yeah baby,</font>
<font color=cyan> Woo~</font>
<font color=cyan> Baby~</font>
<font color=cyan> Havin' me some fun tonight, yeah Aow~</font>
<font color=cyan> Well, long, tall Sally.</font>
<font color=cyan> She's built for speed, she got.</font>
<font color=cyan> Everything that Uncle John need oh baby,</font>
<font color=cyan> Yeah baby,</font>
<font color=cyan> Woo~</font>
<font color=cyan> Baby~</font>
<font color=cyan> Havin' me some fun tonight, yeah~</font>
<font color=cyan> Well, I saw Uncle John with bald head Sally.</font>
<font color=cyan> He saw Aunt Mary comin' and he ducked back in the alley oh baby,</font>
<font color=cyan> Yeah baby,</font>
<font color=cyan> Woo~</font>
<font color=cyan> Baby~</font>
<font color=cyan> Havin' me some fun tonight, yeah~</font>
<font color=cyan> We gonna have some fun tonight,</font>
<font color=cyan> We gonna have some fun tonight, wow~</font>
<font color=cyan> Have some fun tonight.</font>
<font color=cyan> Everything's all right,</font>
<font color=cyan> Have some fun, have me some fun tonight.</font>
Yes, what is it? What do you want?
It's Sunny Everett, Mr. Bagley.
What's wrong? Is your father sick?
No, he's fine.
I just thought you ought to know, Mr. Bagley.
There's a rock and roll show going on at the Palladium.
Well, has your father gone crazy?
Well, he needed the money.
But I don't think he knew what he was letting himself in for.
It's a mess, Mr. Bagley. Drinking and everything.
Real sinful!
Sinful, I knew it.
You better come right over.
I certainly will, immediately.
Okay, see you over there.
Right.
Okay, you want another? You've got it.
And you're going to meet the winners of the Harvest Moon contest...
Jimmy and Jovada dancing to Little Richard and Tutti Frutti.
<font color=cyan> Wop bop a loo bop a lop bam bam!</font>
<font color=cyan> Tutti frutti, oh rutti. [x4]</font>
<font color=cyan> Wop bop a loo bop a lop bam bam!</font>
<font color=cyan> I got a gal, named Sue.</font>
<font color=cyan> She knows just what to do.</font>
<font color=cyan> I got a gal, named Sue.</font>
<font color=cyan> She knows just what to do.</font>
<font color=cyan> She rocks to the East.</font>
<font color=cyan>She rocks to the West.</font>
<font color=cyan> She is the gal that I love best.</font>
<font color=cyan> Tutti frutti, oh rutti. [x4]</font>
<font color=cyan> Wop bop a loo bop a lop bam bam!</font>
<font color=cyan> I got a gal, named Daisy.</font>
<font color=cyan> She almost drives me crazy.</font>
<font color=cyan> Got a gal, named Daisy.</font>
<font color=cyan> She almost drives me crazy.</font>
<font color=cyan> She knows how to love me, yes indeed.</font>
<font color=cyan> Boy you don't know what she's doin' to me.</font>
<font color=cyan> Tutti frutti, oh rutti. [x4]</font>
<font color=cyan> Wop bop a loo bop a lop bam bam!</font>
<font color=cyan> I got a gal, named Daisy.</font>
<font color=cyan> She almost drives me crazy.</font>
<font color=cyan> Got a gal, named Daisy.</font>
<font color=cyan> She almost drives me crazy.</font>
<font color=cyan> She knows how to love me, yes indeed.</font>
<font color=cyan> Boy you don't know what she's doin' to me.</font>
<font color=cyan> Tutti frutti, oh rutti. [x4]</font>
<font color=cyan> Wop bop a loo bop a lop bam bam!</font>
Glad Dad had you in the house.
Thank you very much.
And now you're gonna hear something real great by those wonderful guys who work with me.
Open up your earflaps and listen to Dave Appell and The Applejacks.
Francie, I am licked.
This is the most useless two hours I have ever spent.
Nothing has happened but the most violent exercise and I simply abhor exercise.
You mean you'll retract what you said about Arnie and rock and roll?
I've swallowed bitter pills before in my lifetime.
I am sure I will live through it.
Mom, I love you.
Well, now...
You haven't said it like that since you were nine and a half.
Do we dig?
Consider it dug!
Somebody's been drinking something around here.
You don't say.
Sure, I say.
Smells like Four Roses.
Smells more like whiskey to me.
It's you.
I ain't the only one.
Oh, no, Sunny. This could be murder.
Sunny, this is gonna raise Ned.
You gotta get out of here.
No, sir.
Not before I get rid of all my liquor!
Get rid of all your...
Oh, Mother, no!
What's the matter with you, bringing liquor in here?
I didn't bring it.
What are you trying to do? Louse everything up?
I ought to slug you.
You and what glee club?
Me and a soprano's enough.
Look here!
That does it.
That washes us up for good.
It's a riot!
Yeah.
Yeah, Ted.
Yeah, I know, but the whole thing was a frame-up.
I'm telling you. That crazy Everett kid...
Yeah, all right. Goodbye, Ted.
He wants us back in New York real quick.
He says we're not only ruining ourselves.
We're ruining the entire rock and roll business.
Maybe I could murder Sunny Everett and plead self-defense.
Arnie, I'm sorry.
If I hadn't turned on so much pressure for publicity, this would never have happened.
It's not you. It's Bagley and the town and the Carrie Nations with their hatchets, like Arline MacLaine.
Why can't they believe us about that Everett kid?
We're licked.
Let's go home and pack.
Might as well, I guess.
Yeah.
And how does the world look to Arline MacLaine's daughter this bright and cheerful day?
Oh, please...
You did our boy in good.
Just like Samson and Delilah.
Yeah, you gave him a real crew cut.
Yeah, she sure did.
All right, guys, leave her alone.
You don't have to stand there and look so self-righteous!
I believe what you said about Sunny Everett, Arnie.
Thanks.
But what I want to know is why she did it.
You want to know why?
Okay, I'll tell you. Because I'm in love with you, that's why.
Yeah, if I hadn't been so crazy as to fall in love with you...
I wouldn't have given Sunny the brush-off the way I did.
Oh, I could have buttered her up a little, at least until the dance was over.
No, I had to be real smart and fall in love with you.
You, of all people.
You, with a typewriter for a mother.
What does she do?
Stay up all night, thinking up names to call me?
I tried to argue with her, Arnie. I tried to tell her what I thought.
What do you think?
It wouldn't make any difference now.
You don't trust anything I say.
If you're gonna say something, get it over with in a hurry, because we're leaving.
You're quitting?
Let's just call it a strategic withdrawal.
But that would be admitting that they're right.
Please, listen to me.
They're not right. You are.
I even explained to my mother that parents don't want to blame themselves for what their children are doing.
I mean, the kind that cut up classrooms and have knife fights.
They don't want to blame themselves, so they find something like rock and roll to blame it on.
If parents would only realize that... their children are no different than they were 25 or 30 years ago.
Boy, did you just say something.
A faceful, but what does it mean?
We're not going back to New York.
Are you kidding?
What?
We're gonna make Mayor Bagley and all the rest of them apologize to us in print and your mother's going to help us, whether she knows it or not.
But how, Arnie?
Those kids you were telling me about in the theater group. Are they any good?
Some of them.
Where can I get them together so I can talk to them in private?
They've been rehearsing in the school auditorium.
Too public.
Alan, we're going to a place called the Lonely Barn.
Arnie, we've had enough of this talk.
Let's get back to New York.
No, sir. If we leave now, we'll never live it down.
Tell the kids to stand by, will you?
Come on, Alan, we're gonna keep the Lonely Barn from being lonely.
Arnie?
Huh?
You said you loved me.
Hey, how about that? So I did.
Well, wait till later. We'll get real profound.
Ladies and gentlemen, when Francine MacLaine... asked me to make the opening address for this wonderful little show she's put together.
I was extremely flattered.
It isn't often that Mellondale has a chance to participate in a cultural campaign.
One designed to give a distinct, moral uplift to an entire community.
Especially in the light of recent events concerning our young people.
So, although I know absolutely nothing of what the youngsters have prepared for us.
It is with the greatest possible pride I ask you all to enjoy.
The Pageant of Art and Culture.
You mean to say you don't know what kind of a show those kids concocted?
Or have you been too busy lately getting drunk?
Nobody's been able to find out what they're up to.
And now, my friends of art and culture, we are ready to begin.
In our first offering...
We will depict the world-famous painting by Pierre Renoir entitled...
Young Girls at the Piano.
We come to another famous classic.
Lady and Gentleman Drinking Wine by Jan Vermeer, the famed Dutch painter of the 17th century.
Are they kidding with that cornball stuff?
I wish I knew.
And now, another art form...
Which has come down through the ages is that of terpsichore.
The art of the dance.
Our first presentation will be that of a dance that was all the rage... when George Washington was the president of our country.
Wonderful! Wonderful! Now, that's the way dancing should be done.
Like civilized people.
Oh, Dad.
And then, times changed.
And new forms of the dance came into being.
Reflecting how people had changed in a changing world.
We're sure all of you remember this dance.
We're sorry, ladies and gentlemen, if you didn't like our little offering of the dance you yourselves used to do.
We thought it would bring back many pleasant memories for all parents to show them that they really need not worry so much about our younger generation.
For it will grow up to be the same fine sort of people that parents are today.
Young man, you planned this whole thing deliberately.
You're trying to confuse the issue about rock and roll.
I think that maybe we're the ones who tried to confuse the issue, Mr. Bagley.
My own daughter made one point very clear to me.
She told me that we were just trying to find a scapegoat for our own shortcomings in bringing up our children.
Rock and roll happened to be handy, so it was picked to get the blame.
I say we're wrong, and I'm ready to admit it.
Mrs. MacLaine's right. We're all a bunch of narrow-minded fools.
I'm ready to believe what Arnie Haines said about my daughter.
And I'll wale the living tar out of her hide just as soon as we get home.
Well, if it's up to me.
I'm willing to make a public apology to Arnie Haines right now.
And I hope that perhaps Mayor Bagley might do the same.
Apologize? Me, apologize to that swivel-hipped, gravel-throated...
Mayor Bagley, if you want my vote in the next election, you'll apologize.
And that goes for me, too.
Well, then, that's it.
An apology to Arnie Haines is in order.
Thank you. Thank you, Mrs. MacLaine.
But if Mayor Bagley's too embarrassed to make an apology right here and now... he can send me a letter.
I'd love to publish it.
You'll get your letter, Mr. Haines.
But I'm apologizing right now, and I'll see that it appears in my column all over the country.
Well, then, let's get on with the show.
Ladies and gentlemen, some rock and roll terpsichore.
One, two, three, four.
Paper, sir? Paper, lady? Paper?
Paper, sir? Paper, governor?
Feature's a society scandal."Lady Wren to 'tell all' in libel defense".
Paper, governor?
Darling, do stop going on and on.
We'll Have lunch at the club.
That terrible Angle.
Hurry, Pierre, there's that terrible Sybil.
All clear now, darling.
One more, please. One more.
Could you autograph this copy, please?
My wife and y love it.
One more.
Silence. Silence in court.
-Are you ready to resume, Sir Percy?
-Perfectly, my Lord.
I was in the course of my cross-examination of Lady Wren.
Thank you.
Now, Lady Wren, you have acknowledged authorship of this biography...
entitled Les Girls.
I have.
This is your first venture into literature?
How kind of you to call it literature, Sir Percy.
I'd only aspired to write a few amusing anecdotes.
When you wrote that the plaintiff,
Angle Ducros, attempted suicide... for the love of a man who rejected her, was that little anecdote... intended to amuse?
It seemed to me to be readable.
And it was true.
If that's what you're getting at.
Do not concern yourself with what
I'm getting at. Just answer my questions.
You are aware, Lady Wren, are you not, that if certain statements... made in your book are false or misleading... then madam Ducros has been most cruelly libelled... for which she can justly claim damages.
The story of my life in the theatre may read like fiction... but everything I've written in that book happened exactly as I remembered it.
That is not for us, but for the jury to decide.
Wasn't that last observation a comment rather than a question, Sir Percy?
If Your Lordship so wishes.
Now, in Chapter Seven, which you've entitled "All For Love"... you suggest that madam Ducros not only attempted suicide for the love of a man, but for a man who was not then, and is not now, her husband.
Do you swear under oath that that is to be the truth?
I'm not a flighty woman who deliberately fabricates something... to injure the reputation of madam Ducros.
Had I realized she was going to materialize out of the past, claiming damages.
I might have omitted the chapter.
But it did happen.
I must defend my statement.
She did attempt suicide.
-In Chapter Seven, which you've entitled--- "All For Love", thank you, the opening sentence reads:
"Our valiant little musical act had decided to conquer Paris".
-"It was spring".
-Yes, it was spring.
Spring is a chronological truth, it happens once every year.
I can remember what I wrote.
We were in Paris, that was true.
We were playing at the Music Hall Parisien...
in an act called
Barry Nichols and Les Girls.
It happened some years ago.
It was our first engagement in Paris and l can recall the excitement we felt...
at being in this gay city in the world of the theatre.
Everything to us about Paris was exciting.
The smells, the sounds, the taxi noises, everything.
I was sharing a little flat...
with an American dancer called Joy Henderson.
Hey, Sybil!
There's a message from Barry, he wants us at the theatre right away.
-What for?
-Gee, I don't know.
Come on down, I'll wait for you.
Madame, would you hold on to these things for me, please?
-Oh, but yes.
-thanks.
[In French] Georgette, Hurry up.
Be quick.
Please dance, miss.
-I'm replacing Mimi.
-What for?
-Sit down.
-But why?
I don't like complications.
She's been carrying on with that
Romanian necktie salesman.
Thank you. they'll call you.
What do you mean by "carrying on"?
He's going to give her a ring.
Oh, so you knew it all the time.
You didn't tell me. That's what
I call loyalty.
Mr. Manescu wants to marry Mimi.
She wants a home, it's not a felony.
You want a home, you go to a real estate agent. You don't come to me.
-Please.
-I don't ask for gratitude.
But when I hired Mimi, she crossed the stage Mike.
Her rear end was made out of old Venetian glass.
Have you any idea how much time...
I put in day and night teaching her how to dance?
-Especially nights.
-If I need jokes, I'll hire a comedian.
Come on, come on, what's Holding us up?
It's your turn, miss.
What do you do? Do you sing, dance?
I am Angle.
Well, go right ahead.
[In French] That's enough.
But I didn't finish it yet.
It was bad because I was nervous.
Can I take it from the beginning again?
Come here, please, dear, come here.
Please, it's all right.
-I know it was bad, but--
-Are you good at picking up routines?
-I think, very good.
-Good. Show me some chains.
Come here, kids.
-Oh, these heels. they hurt me.
-Take off your shoes. I understand.
Yes, that's fine. Would you try for me the glissade assemble?
Slowly, with a smile.
Yes, Very good.
Why do you want this job with me, an American act?
I've seen you dance. then you know what the act is.
-Come here, kids. You free to travel?
-Yes.
Get in the middle, tall one.
Let's see. Nope. Take it the other way.
And back again.
We're gonna travel around Europe.
I want someone who can stick with us.
-I can.
-You can?
-You married?
-No.
-Engaged?
-Oh, no.
That's all, everybody.
That's all. That's all.
Thank you. Thank you Very much.
That's all.
Well, you're now one of Les Girls.
Oh, Merci!
-Oh la la
-This is Sybil and this is Joy.
-Hello.
-How are you?
We got to work fast. Let's grab some lunch and come back and rehearse.
I was looking for a place to live because I was on tour.
Have you kids got room for Angle?
The flat isn't exactly elegant but if Joy doesn't mind...
I never mind saving rent.
You're both dolls.
We got to grab some lunch.
Get back quickly. 1:15 sharp.
-Come.
-You can change in there.
Girls, listen.
There's only one thing I have to insist on.
No complications.
But she's right.
I don't interfere with my girls' private life, but I don't let it interfere with their work. I have a few simple rules.
And I have to insist on them.
I call them my "three P's".
The girls have to be prompt, persistent and perfect.
Everyone's born with two legs.
Being a good dancer isn't good enough.
-She's here.
-Open the door.
I've got it. You made it.
Hello. Welcome to Liberty Hall.
Oui. Is there a place where I can put my little things?
Of course there is.
Just push something aside.
-I have a few little luggage.
-Bring them in.
Remove those things over there.
[In French] Hurry up.
If you please.
Oui, madame.
-Quite a load of clothes you have.
-My mama makes them.
How sweet.
Does your mama make perfume, too?
These? It's a little weakness of mine.
I love to collect perfume.
-You may help yourselves if you wish.
-Where were you working before?
I was last in a ballet called Le Coquerico.
All about chickens.
-Did you lay an egg?
-I do not understand.
Joy means, "did you get fired?"
Oh, no. I quit.
Nobody could see me behind all those feathers.
It's important to be seen if you want to get ahead.
You will. We saw you dance.
You are very kind.
-Not everyone has been kind to me.
-So I notice.
-That's old.
-Yes, but this isn't old.
That's my fianc, Pierre Ducros.
Fianc! You told Barry you weren't engaged.
They'll never meet. Pierre lives in La Porte.
What if he came to Paris and to the theatre?
Never. Pierre thinks
I'm studying to be a nurse.
He's so sweet. He gave me this watch.
It cost his grandfather 100,000 francs.
-You know why?
-Why?
Listen.
So sweet.
Blimey, there's dear old Dad.
Girls!
-Hurry it up, kids. You got half an hour.
-Right.
He lives here?
Yes. And if he finds out you're engaged, you're a canned frog.
How will he find out?
Surely neither of you....
We are friends and one doesn't betray a friend, no?
No. One does not betray a friend.
I want you to know when the bell rings we'll be in your corner, honey.
-Bring the soup.
-I will.
Do you want some bread?
*'Round the map I've been a dancer
*From New Jersey to Japan
*And if not a perfect prancer
*I'm at least a tip-top travelin' man,
*Yes, I've played ad infinitum
*Ev'ry mountain, ev'ry coast,
*For each country has the item
*That I enjoy the most
*Les Girls, Les Girls,
*There's no doubt about it,
I just love Les Girls!
*Les Girls, Les Girls,
*No wonder I shout it,
*I worship Les Girls!
*Ah, what charms they disclose
*From their hats to their hose,
*From the tips of their toes up to their curls
*I simply adore
*And ev'ry day more
*Les Girls, Les Girls, Les Girls
*Girls, Girls, Girls,
Girls, Girls
*Les Girls, Les Girls
*-Ah, comme je les aime!
-How he loves The Girls!
*Les Girls, Les Girls
*-Je les trouve suprmes!
-He worships Les Girls!
*De la plante des pieds
 la racine des cheveux
*From the tips of their toes up to their curls.
*Formidable! J'adore, mais oui
*But most of all,  me!
*Les Girls
*Les Girls
*Les Girls
*Ah, what charms they disclose
*From their hats to their hose,
*From the tips of their toes up to their curls
*I simply adore
*And ev'ry day more
*Les Girls
*Les Girls
*Les Girls
Wonderful!
All right, hurry, girls.
Hurry, please.
You got one quick change,
Angle, here.
Feel my heart, you can almost hear it pounding.
-Does it chime the hour?
-Oh, Joy, really.
[In French] Be ready for the final act.
Curtain in five minutes.
Do you think Mr. Barry was pleased with me?
Yes, I think he was pleased.
You'll know when he's not.
Is he unhappy to be away from his wife?
He fell in love with himself the first time he looked in a mirror.
-He's been faithful ever since.
-that's not fair.
What she really means is Barry's very ambitious and the act always comes first.
You are in love with him maybe?
Are you kidding?
-He belongs to you, then.
-What a question.
-I like him.
-What about Pierre?
Pierre is in La Porte. And I'm in Paris.
-I mustn't allow myself to be despondent.
-Vive la France.
We're gonna go to the flat and have some cheese or something.
-Do you want to come with us?
-You buy your own food?
We don't grow it.
With Paris full of men who are rich and hungry?
That's such a bore. Besides, there's the old language barrier.
To say nothing of the moral barrier.
To me it's immoral for a beautiful girl to eat alone.
Tonight, I rescue a poor banker from loneliness.
Better wind Pierre's watch.
I think it's running down.
No, you don't understand.
Pierre loves me, we might get married one day.
If his parents consent.
But that's not tomorrow.
-And tonight is tonight.
-What you do is none of our affair.
If you have a dinner date, keep it.
I hope you have a wonderful dinner.
-I intend to.
-Good.
Don't you ever knock before you walk into a room?
What for? You got secrets?
I think we finally got it.
A real act. No complications.
You stick around, you and I got to rehearse.
-Tonight?
-Sure. You don't know those routines.
But it's not possible. I have an engagement tonight. With an uncle.
Make it tomorrow.
-But he leaves Paris tomorrow.
-And tonight is tonight.
-I've got a reputation at stake.
-So has she.
The poor girl's exhausted, can't you rehearse her tomorrow?
My uncle, he would be very sad.
Your uncle ain't running the act.
On stage. 10 minutes.
All right. We'll take it once again from where you pull the rope.
Did I do wrong?
Honey, it was nothing. there was no excitement.
I'm not a potato. I'm a man you're supposed to be in love with.
I wish you were a potato. I'm hungry and tired. It's been already two hours.
-Do you want this job?
-Yes.
Then we'll rehearse until you do it right.
Don't pull so hard on the rope.
The last time I almost went on my ear.
Okay. Start the music.
[Dramatic instrumental music]
-That's more like it.
-Now, may l go to eat?
Tell you what. I'm gonna break a rule.
I never mix business with anything else.
But, you've done so well,
I'll buy you some supper.
With wine?
The sky's the limit. A whole glassful.
And so, Barry paid for her supper.
He even bought her wine.
Not a good wine.
But quite good enough for a beginning.
I wouldn't mention this to any of the girls.
Rehearsal at 11:00.
In the weeks that followed, it might
Have struck certain people as odd...
certainly not me, that Angele needed so much rehearsal.
I decided to have a talk with her.
Would you mind if I said something very personal?
You tell me what it is and I'll tell you if I mind.
I should hate to see you hurt.
-And who will hurt me?
-Are you seeing Barry?
Why?
You see, some men take very casually what you and I... and possibly your friend from La Porte, regard as rather serious.
You English.
When will you learn that love is a souffl, not a pudding?
I didn't say that I'm meeting Barry.
Well, that got you nowhere.
-At least my conscience is clear.
-Your conscience?
Do not talk like the pudding.
Love is a souffl.
So sweet.
And if our little friend, she eat too much... believe me, she get very, very sick.
-Bonjour.
-Bonjour, Barry.
[In French] Have fun!
Come on.
That's our Barry. Strictly business.
No complications.
-Where do you suppose they're headed?
-To the woods, if you ask me.
But I've done my duty.
I think I'll write home to Gerald.
What a dear, sweet, patient darling he is.
I'd write home to my darling, but he isn't quite so patient.
He's marrying my cousin.
-We've paid the rent, haven't we?
-I'll get it.
Bonjour.
[In French] Can you tell me if Miss Angele lives Here?
Yes, Miss Angele lives Here.
She's not in.
-Do you expect her soon?
-She didn't say.
Say, you're Pierre What's-his-name, aren't you?
-Yes, I am.
-Come in.
Come on.
[In French] After you. thank you.
I arrived this morning to surprise Angele.
It's too bad you didn't come a minute earlier... or you would have succeeded.
-Monsieur.
-Do you know where Angele has gone?
Yes, of course.
Every Sunday she... does volunteer work.
-Well, that's good for her.
-Yes.
Do you know that when I first met Angele she was very shy.
She was even afraid of men.
Now she has more courage.
-You don't mind--
-Would you like some wine?
Thank you. You don't mind if
I stay here, do you?
Not at all.
It's been such a long time since we have seen each other, you know.
-Would you like some wine?
-I never touch it.
You have known Angele long?
I never feel as if it's a question of hours and days, do you?
-You are nurses?
-I beg your pardon.
I mean, do you work with Angele at the hospital?
Oh, no.
No, we flunked out, couldn't tuck a sheet.
I'm sorry. But Angele, she goes ahead?
By leaps and bounds.
She has such a gift for applying herself.
Good.
I have come to Paris today.
Yes?
She may have told you.
We hope some day to get married.
No!
Oh, that sly little pussycat.
She has not shown you the watch I gave her?
-She adores it.
-She even sleeps with it.
I am not without the guile, mademoiselle.
I want to be remembered.
Each hour it rings a tiny bell.
What's that?
My heart.
When you touch me, it plays little tunes.
Does anything happen to you when I touch you, Barry?
You set off a fire alarm.
And Sybil, has she ever set off a fire alarm?
She never even started a fire.
-And Joy?
-She never even lit a match.
You want to know something?
I don't believe you.
Do you want to know something?
I didn't expect you to.
Why don't you dance in America?
Well, in America
I'm just another American dancer.
And over here Im something special.
Will you go home one day?
One day.
You are never lonely?
Now and then.
I think you should be in love.
It would be good for you.
Why?
You wouldn't be lonely and you would be something special.
Well, I am.
-In love?
-Something special.
I don't think you know what it means to be really in love.
-Shall l tell you?
-If you like, sure.
To me, Barry, real love is like....
I can't talk when you kiss me.
Well, l can't kiss you when you talk.
Real love is when suddenly you sight... someone for whom you yearn.
*Ca, c'est l'Amour
*And when you delight
*She loves you in return
*a c'est l'amour
*Then dawns a dreary day
*Your darling goes away
*And all is over you are sure
*Oh, when she returns
*And loves you as before
*You take her in your lonely arms
*And want her ever more.
*a c'est l'amour
*a c'est l'amour
*a c'est l'amour
[In French] -How are you?
-Oh, it's you, Barry!
Haven't seen you in a while.
-How are you?
-Good.
Have you been out in the country?
-Am I intruding?
-Hello. Why, not at all.
Your uncle is waiting upstairs for you.
-My uncle?
-Uncle Pierre from La Porte.
My uncle from La Porte. Pierre.
Excuse me, Barry,
I've got to see my uncle from La Porte.
Well, that was a very good rehearsal. Yes.
Getting along fine.
Making a lot of progress.
Making time, too, aren't you?
I am embarrassed, I have talked to you of nothing but Angele.
-Wonderful girl, do you think?
-Oh, yes. Very.
Mon cher, how are you?
Why didn't you write?
I would have been waiting.
Do not scold. I didn't know you would be working.
Working? Oh, well, I, yes, we--
Oui.
Why didn't you write Pierre...
You were doing volunteer work at that orphanage?
-You are too generous with your time.
-Much.
-Everything all right?
-So far.
Then Im sure Monsieur Pierre will excuse us.
Ive promised to wash Joy's hair.
You lucky girl.
I have missed you, little angel.
Let me look at you. You are pale.
-You took me by surprise, mon coco.
-Guess why Ive come to Paris.
-Guess what I have brought you.
-I can't guess. Tell me.
My parents.
Oh, your parents.
My mother and my father. they are to meet you at last.
But Im afraid, Pierre.
Im only a nurse. I have no dowry.
-They may not like me.
-They will adore you.
Tomorrow night we are to have dinner with them.
But I can't. Im working.
At the hospital.
I won't be free until after 11:00.
Don't worry. then, we shall have a late supper instead.
And while we wait, we can....
I shall take my mother to a theatre.
Oh, no, don't.
There's nothing good in Paris.
You're wrong. You are good.
Sweet, lonely girl.
Come away from there.
Angele's gonna have to be better than
Houdini to get out of this one.
Our little French souffl may soon become the pudding... if she does not take care.
It's Angele. I must see you.
Come in.
There's something I must know, and I must know tonight.
-Will I take you to supper? Yes.
-Don't joke. Please.
How would you feel if I decided to give up the theatre and went away?
-Don't you joke either.
-Im serious. How serious are you?
What's got into you?
Everything was fine yesterday.
[In French] On stage.
-Pick up your train, baby, you're on.
-Do you love me? Do I mean anything--
Of course I love you. Come on. Get out on stage. I got to change my pants.
Now, go!
*We're ladies-in-waiting
*In waiting to the King
*As ladies-in-waiting
*We're on the spot
*Because we've got to give the King
*Ev'rything
*I give him his breakfast
*Served in royal state
*I give him his soda
*Bicarbonate
*And when he wants funsy-wunsy
When he wants funsy-wunsy
*-Pray, what do you give him?
-I give him the gate!
*We're ladies-in-waiting
*In waiting to the King
*As ladies-in-waiting
*We're on the spot because we've got
*To give the King
*Ev'rything
*I give him his diet
*When too fat he grows
*I tighten his corset
*When still it shows
*And when he wants candy-wandy
*When he wants candy-wandy
*Pray, what do you give him?
*A punch in the nose!
Someone's in for trouble.
I just spotted Pierre and his parents sitting up in the box.
-Are you sure?
-See for yourself.
-Pierre's in the audience.
-What?
Pierre's up in that box with his parents.
Im not joking, look.
They mustn't see me! they mustn't!
*We're ladies-in-waiting
*In waiting to the King
*As ladies-in-waiting
*We're on the spot because we've got
*To give the King
*Ev'rything
*I fill him with brandy
*When the weather's raw
*I sober him up when it starts to thaw
*And when he wants tiddly-widdly
*When he wants tiddly-widdly
*Pray, what do you give him?
*A sock in the jaw!
-What are you trying to do? Wreck the act?
-There's a thing l must explain.
What excuse could you have for doing that?
There's someone out there who mustn't see me.
What are you saying? those people pay to see you.
You got a half a minute to change.
[In French] What's the matter?
-Angele, are you sick?
-You must get changed. Its all right.
He couldn't have recognized you.
Your mother wouldn't have recognized you.
He's so angry.
If you don't hurry, we're all gonna be in trouble.
I cannot go out there!
You have to. You can't leave Barry stranded on the stage.
Ive lost Barry and now I'll lose Pierre.
[In French] Hurry!
Angele, you'd better hurry. Come on!
She got a little excited but it won't happen again.
[In French] Barry Nichols and Angele. One minute.
Pull.
Pull.
Pull!
[In French] Bring down the curtain.
Hurry up. Hurry up.
Where is she? Where is she?
[In French] On stage, on stage!
Have you lost your mind?
-Barry--
-Get out!
Please.
If you're not out of here in one minute,
I'll throw you out of that door.
What's got into you?
I don't know. Please trust me.
Trust you?
Nobody's ever pulled that on me before.
I'll explain tomorrow, I--
You'll not explain tomorrow, tonight, or any other time!
You mustn't do this to me after we....
I love you.
-Oh, you poor darling.
-Oh, honey.
I love him. He doesn't know how much I love him.
I love him. He doesn't care.
-He isn't worth crying about.
-Hurry back to the flat.
Pierre will show up.
Get there before he does.
Joy and I'll stay away, so you've got the flat to yourselves.
I want to die.
Darling, you'll feel so much different tomorrow, I promise you.
Hurry. Take a taxi, now.
Don't waste any time.
Angele!
Help! Au secours!
Oh, please. Help!
Darling, Angele.
She said she wanted to die.
If it hadn't been for my prompt action, she'd certainly have got her wish...
A point she seems to have overlooked.
And she recovered and disappeared.
I didn't know she'd eventually married
Monsieur Ducros.
Or that she'd read my little book of memoirs or I'd never have mentioned it.
Its the dullest chapter in the book.
And all that you wrote was the truth.
Every word.
Im a little confused, Lady Wren... as to how you can remember so accurately... scenes which you could not possibly have witnessed.
I reported them as Angele repeated them to me.
According to your account, the incident you described... occurred in the year 1949 when you were playing at the Music Hall Parisien.
We played there for months.
Every Paris newspaper would confirm that.
It was at the Music Hall Parisien... that you saw Pierre Ducros in the audience?
What would you say, if l told you that
Pierre Ducros will swear, under oath... that he was not in the Music Hall Parisien that night.
That he'd never been inside the Music Hall Parisien in 1949, or any other year in his entire lifetime?
My dear Sir Percy, if you'll refer to my book again...
I think you'll notice that never at any time did I say I saw him.
But that is precisely what the book implies.
No, you're quite mistaken.
I said that Joy told me that
Pierre was in the audience.
Never at any time did I say
"I saw him".
Heaven knows I can't see 10 feet without my glasses anyway.
Silence. Silence.
Picture, please. One more.
-Excuse me, gentlemen. thank you.
-No, please. No pictures.
Must be quite a shock after all these years, for a chap to learn the truth about his wife.
Poor devil. I feel sorry for him.
Big smile, Lady Wren.
-Big smile this way, please, Lady Wren.
-One more, please.
Another one, please, Lady Wren.
Over this way, please.
Drive on, Travers, will you?
And you told me my watch was lost.
It was lost.
Barry borrowed it and lost it.
I had no way of replacing it.
-Please believe me.
-How can I believe you?
You lied to me about the theatre.
Oh, that!
Im so sorry I hurt you.
I didn't intend it, Pierre.
Are you going to withdraw the libel suit?
No.
Tomorrow, you'll hear my side of the story.
I am not sure I care to hear it.
Don't go out. Don't leave me alone.
Listen, I love you, Pierre.
From what I heard in court, those words come easily.
You don't know what you're doing to me.
Im not worried that you might consider suicide over my going.
That honour belongs to Monsieur Barry alone.
"What happened to Pierre's watch?"
"'Lies! All lies!"
"French dancer promises true story today".
It is not true.
In what manner is it not true,
Madam Ducros?
Mostly in what Lady Wren has left out, of her amusing little anecdotes.
Why don't you tell My Lord and jury just what did happen, in your own words.
Im sure my learned friend can have no objections to that.
Not at all, provided the words are her own.
Proceed.
What Lady Wren says about my joining the act is true.
The three of us lived together, that's true.
And it was spring, that's true.
But that is all that is true.
ANGELE: I'll never forget the lovely
Flower market near our flat.
Joy and I had become good friends.
She had been very nice to me
Since I had joined the company.
We always did the marketing for our little family and we didn't mind...
that Sybil had no interest in such common domestic duties.
We thought it was fun.
-I beg your pardon, do you speak English?
-Nothing else.
These house numbers are rather mystifying.
Do you know if a young Englishwoman,
Sybil Morgan, lives here?
We live together.
This is luck. Im an old friend of hers from London, Gerald Wren.
-I believe she's gone for a walk.
-Walk?
If you'll wait here,
I shall go run up and see.
I thought she was expecting me. I sent her a cable. Do you know if she got it?
She couldn't have.
You know, I'd wait. Its a long walk up.
-Yes, Joy?
-Yell out of the window!
-American?
-Poughkeepsie.
I think I will dash up.
An interesting thing about
Poughkeepsie... it's south of Claverack, and it's west of Mahopac... it's east of Nyack and it's north of Hackensack.
Bit of a sticky wicket, what?
Sybil.
Hello, old girl.
Now, why do you two always insist on wearing the same clothes.
You really are the most extraordinary couple Ive ever....
Im going to make some tea.
Ive lost my cozy.
Where's my tea cozy? Tea cozy.
Tea cozy.
-Tea cozy, who's got my tea cozy?
-Oh, Sybil.
-Sybil, you promised you wouldn't.
-I don't know what you're talking about.
Where did you get it?
We searched the whole place before we left.
You're being very suspicious and very unpleasant.
No, don't go out there, there's someone downstairs you don't want to see.
Who? Where?
He says he's a friend from London.
It must be Gerald.
Sir Gerald Wren.
Rich as Croesus and mad about me.
Have him come up and I shall tell him again, "No, dear boy".
"No, l will not marry you".
Oh, no. You must not see him.
Gerald!
Sybil, wait. Wait.
Lie down.
We have a rehearsal this afternoon and you must be in condition.
Lovely, rich. Lovely, rich pussycat.
I'll be right back.
Promise not to move.
I doubt very much if I could.
-Im terribly sorry, but she's out.
-Out?
Cold! She has a very bad cold.
She probably went out for some sunshine.
-I hope she's taking something.
-She is.
What a pity. I have to catch the 4:20 plane home.
If Sybil does get back in time, you might ask her to ring me at our Paris office.
-Of course.
-thanks awfully. And tell her to take care.
-We will.
-'Bye.
What can we do with her, Joy?
I have an idea, but there's a law against it.
Come on.
I am the naughty cigarette girl.
And all the men, they want my cigarettes.
Put the coffee on. I'll get the bed ready.
-Fill the bath.
-With gin.
She wants some more of her cough medicine.
Don't be hard on her, Joy, she's a sick girl.
Deep, deep inside her.
If she isn't sick now, she's gonna be soon.
But why does she drink? there must be a reason.
There is. She likes it.
I found where she's been hiding it.
Where?
-Gin.
-But what did she do with the perfume?
She probably drank that, too.
Hello, girls. Oh, hi.
Its a lovely afternoon.
I thought we'd walk to the theatre.
Where's Sybil?
Barry, could we rehearse without her this afternoon?
-Why?
-She isn't feeling well.
-What's the matter?
-Sort of a cologne poisoning.
No, don't go in there. She's asleep.
What's the matter?
Im no good, Barry.
Im no good.
Nobody wants my cigarettes.
-That does it.
-We can rehearse without her.
Ive had enough of this cough medicine routine. Im gonna replace her.
-She's sick.
-She is out.
Can you take care of Sybil?
Ive got to talk to Barry.
Remember, she's a sick girl.
She's out. She's through.
She's not that good.
Barry, if you let her go, it will be the end of her.
That's just too bad, she's not my responsibility.
-Why do you think she does all this?
-Because she's a lush.
She's a heartbroken girl trying to forget.
Let her forget in some other dance act.
You're so blind.
She drinks because she's hopelessly in love with you, Barry.
-In love with me?
-Desperately.
Why, you're nuts.
Its true. Haven't you seen the way she watches you?
Yes, she watches me for a chance to sneak out for a snort.
You're so heartless.
You're killing this girl and you don't even suspect it.
-She hates me!
-She loves you.
Is that her fault?
What am I supposed to do?
Be kind to her and help her forget you.
How, by drinking with her?
Let her stay with the act.
Save another human being from self-destruction, Barry.
You really think she's gone on me?
I know she is.
-She's never acted like it.
-She has pride.
Look, Angele, Im not blind. I--
No, just modest.
I thought I knew women.
I can stand her crying, but I cannot stand her singing.
I'll go in and have a talk with her.
Has he been hitting the perfume bottle, too?
I like that. I never knew you could sing opera.
Well, of course I can sing opera, you silly man.
That's why Im dancing.
How do you feel?
What do you care?
You're one of my girls. I care a lot what happens to you.
I think I ate a bad oyster.
That's not fatal.
I don't think you have enough to do in the act.
How about me working up some new routines for you?
I like the old routines.
But, I wanna feature you.
Why?
I don't think the act is taking advantage of what you have to offer.
What have I got to offer?
Talent, beauty. And you sing like an angel.
Then you're not angry with me?
Angry? Why should I be angry?
Because Im always getting ptomaine.
That's not your fault.
You've just got to keep away from bad oysters.
Don't worry, I understand everything.
You can be so sweet.
I think you better get some sleep.
We've gotta help that kid.
Its a strange thing about truth, it can often make enemies of lovers.
But a lie can make lovers of enemies.
Barry gave up drinking...
and insisted that the rest of us set a good example, too.
-What'll you girls have?
-Tea.
-Milk.
-A glass of water.
-Nothing.
-Tea, milk, water, nothing?
That's correct.
And so Les Girls became Les Girl Scouts.
We were going on tour that night.
Joy and I had packed for Sybil and of course, Sybil was packing for Barry.
I was worried about Her.
Now then, there's one thing
I insist on in my act... plenty of complications.
I won't interfere with your private lives if you watch my three P's:
Pickles, pins and poop-poop-a-doop.
Marvelous.
I do find you English very amusing.
Come here, old girl, give us a kiss, won't you?
-Goodness gracious.
-I think it's funny, too.
How could I have been so wrong?
About you?
About me?
You won't believe me, but I didn't like you when l first met you.
-Now?
-Now you make me feel little... and helpless and tiny and frail.
All the absurd things that
I know Im not.
Since we're on a truth kick, I thought of you as a cold-blooded hoot owl.
-Really.
-Hooting at everything I did.
I don't mind being compared to a hoot owl. they're rather sweet.
But you don't really think of me as "cold-blooded", do you?
All americans think the English are.
Oh, no. the English....
Now, take the Latins, they light up like a paper fire.
-You're more like hard coal.
-Heavy and lumpy. thanks.
No.
Hard coal is slow to burn, but once it starts...
There's quite a blaze.
And for a long time.
-Honey?
-Yes, my love.
Honestly, hot or cold, I couldn't care for you more than I do.
But well, you know me.
I know you.
Dear, sweet cautious Barry.
There'll be no complications.
We'll be late. We'll be late.
What's the train schedule?
The train "shedule"?
-Well, I "sharcely" remember.
-"Sharcely".
-"Shertainly".
-You're just too "shilly".
And you're just too too-too.
*You're just too charming!
*You're just too great!
*You're just too faultless!
You're just too first-rate!
*To win you, dear heart, is all I wish!
*Well, thank you Casanova
*'Cause you're just my dish!
*You're just too luscious
*Too very, very sweet!
*You're just too sexy!
*When you turn on the heat!
*So it's no wonder
I love you as I do
*For I've got to say in ev'ry way
*You're just too, too!
*You're just too brilliant!
*You're just too bright!
*You're just too faultless!
*Well, you're just too top-flight!
*Of all fair damsels
'tis thee I toast!
*Well, thank you, Barry Nichols,
'cause you're just the most
*You're just too darling!
*Too very, very, very nice!
*You're just too dreamy!
*You're super-paradise!
*So it's no wonder
I love you as I do
*For I've got to say in ev'ry way
*You're just too, too!
Look at me, Im dancing.
Crazy.
Hot dog.
Hold on, old girl, we'll miss our train.
If we miss the train we'll go by plane.
-I feel like a banjo.
-How's that?
-Everybody's picking on me.
-Oh! Go!
*And it's no wonder
I love you as I do
*For I've got to say, in ev'ry way
*You're just too, too!
*Les Girls, Les Girls
*Ah, come le amo!
*How he loves Les Girls!
*Les Girls, Les Girls
*Ich liebe die madchen
*How he loves the girls!
*Adoro por fin
*But most of all, me
*Les Girls, Les Girls, Les Girls
Ol!
But what I have to tell all took place the week we were in Granada.
Senorita?
No, gracias. I wait.
I expect someone.
A gentleman? He is here.
Gerald, what on earth are you doing in Granada?
For the last two hours
Ive been trying to find you.
I must say it was worth the bother.
Well, as always, you look superbly healthy, extremely rich and jolly nice.
-Nice enough to marry?
-Why, Im sure of it.
You'll have no trouble in finding a wife.
How's your father?
You have absolutely no interest in my father.
-Oh, how nice.
-Hi.
What?
-Gerald Wren. Barry Nichols.
-Hello.
How do you do? If you'd like to have a drink with us?
Thanks, I would.
-Its Barry's act I dance in.
-I know.
I was hoping she's had enough of this career nonsense.
Just why, my friend, should that concern you?
Since Im the chap she's gonna marry--
-I didn't know that.
-Nor do I.
Gerald knows that my foolish little heart has been won over by the theatre.
Why not come back to London? Our theatre's as good as any in the world.
We'll play London all right, but not until I get the proper setup.
My own revue, the right house, the right people.
This may interest you, one of our theatres is going vacant.
-Your theatres?
-Our banks own them.
-Same thing.
-Is he kidding?
Unfortunately, no.
Its the Christopher Marlowe, where
Sybil was playing when we first met.
Do you remember how badly you sang?
-Why, Ive improved.
-Oh, you must have.
No, I don't see why you shouldn't have the Marlowe... with a little financial backing, of course.
American enterprise does very well in West End show business.
And I say British enterprise isn't so bad either.
You know, old man, if this is meant to be a bribe...
Im definitely interested.
You'll want Sybil costarred, of course.
-No, I merely want her in London.
-Well, really!
I see, the big men talking business.
I must be quiet?
Yes, please. the name, though. the Christopher Marlowe, it doesn't--
Its not very suitable for musical shows, is it?
-But it could easily be changed.
-To the Barry Nichols theatre.
This girl has good ideas.
Just where is it?
In Charing Cross Road. that can be changed to Barry Nichols Boulevard.
That'll come later.
Why don't we have supper tonight?
Just the three of us.
-Talk over details?
-Tonight is--
Tonight is fine.
You know, I like the way your friend works.
-Quick decisions.
-I like the way your friend works.
Don't you both think you're working a little too hard?
Your order?
-Tea.
-Champagne.
An aspirin.
-Where's our friend?
-What?
-Where's our friend?
-Im gonna be very candid with you.
I don't want you to see Barry again.
Well, why not?
Well, there are several reasons why I'd rather the show wasn't put on.
I am not ready to go back to London.
I am not good enough yet.
I like the act the way it is.
Ive never had so much fun.
Please don't spoil it.
-Aren't you being a little selfish?
-Very selfish. lf I were a man
I'd have nothing to do with me.
Be an angel and kiss me goodbye.
Is having fun that important?
Don't worry, I'll grow up someday.
I do appreciate your patience and understanding.
Quite frankly--
Gerald, please. Before he gets here.
Have a heavenly trip and do remember me to your father.
Where's he going, Sir Gerald?
-He's not having supper with us.
-No?
Well, I had a little talk and explained a few things.
You're good enough to get along on your own.
Well, sure. But what are you talking about?
I knew you wouldn't want him to be under any illusions.
What did you tell him?
That you and I were lovers.
-Oh, you didn't.
-I did.
You should have seen his face. He turned the most extraordinary shade of green.
-The colour yours is now.
-You're crazy.
-What's he going to think?
-Well, we're lovers.
-Will you stop saying that.
-Sybil.
-I thought over what you just said--
-I know what she said...
Believe me, there's not a word of truth in it.
Not one word.
I don't doubt what she told me,
I merely questioned the wisdom of it.
Sybil, I do understand why you want things to go on as they are.
I know the fun you're having.
Let's not jump to conclusions. there's been no fun.
My dear fellow, I think I know Sybil well enough to know what she enjoys.
-Let's take it easy.
-Barry--
No, we've got to straighten this out now.
Sybil and I, we might have fooled around a little bit...
You know how it is on the road, but we're not lovers.
Just what did you say?
Well, I hate to call anybody a liar.
When she says--
Mr. Nichols, you're speaking of the woman
I'd intended to make my wife.
Im terribly sorry--
You've got this all wrong.
[In Spanish] Perhaps you'd like some wine?
Yes.
Thanks. Do you speak English?
English, no.
[In Spanish] -To your Health.
-To your Health.
This is Very good. My wife makes it.
No, thank you. this is what I need.
-Could I talk to you please, Barry?
-No.
Please come on out in the corridor.
I must talk to you.
You can talk in here, he can't understand English.
The eye is looking much better.
It couldn't feel worse.
[In Spanish] Do you want some wine, miss?
No, thank you. Im sorry it all happened.
It wasn't my fault that the act was cancelled.
We went through all that before.
-With your permission.
-But you're angry.
I can't stand it when you don't talk to me.
-Leave me alone, will you? thanks.
-Miss?
-Why can't we straighten this out?
-Im not interested.
I didn't know it was so important to have a show of your own.
It isn't. With your permission.
I'll make up with Gerald.
But please stop sulking.
Its the story of my life.
Even when I was a kid, if I brought a sick puppy home, it bit me.
Thanks.
I just don't understand why you're so angry.
Look, I tried to help you.
I even quit drinking myself and look at the appreciation I get.
Thank you.
I know how sweet you've been, Barry.
This is what makes me feel really awful. You know....
This is the last time
Im gonna be a boy scout.
When Angele told me that you were drinking... because you were in love with me
I thought I'd try to help you.
Ive done my good deed.
Angele told you that I was drinking--
I broke the most important rule in my life for you. I got myself complicated.
Oh, yes, you did.
Ive been so terribly selfish.
I wish I could pin a medal on you.
"To Barry Nichols for the sacrifices beyond the call of duty".
I don't want no medal.
My eye is killing me.
We were back in Paris...
but things had changed.
The night we opened
Sybil was in very high spirits.
*I tighten his corset when still it shows
*And when he wants candy-wandy
*When he wants candy-wandy
*Pray, what do you give him?
*A... punch on the nose
*We're ladies-in-waiting
*As ladies-in-waiting
*-We're on the spot
-We're on the spot
*-Because we've got
-Because we've got
*-To give the King
-Give him, give him
*-Ev'rything
-Ev'rything
Oh, a little dizzy spell.
They keep the theatres so warm.
-Was it ghastly?
-Well, it was different.
-Sit down over here.
-I was naughty, wasn't I?
-Maybe a cool damp cloth will help.
-Will you two get out for a second?
I wanna talk to Sybil.
He wants to remind me to avoid oysters and he's quite right.
Please don't scold me.
Im not gonna scold you.
I think you better go home.
Maybe somebody there can help you.
No, you can help me, darling. Only you.
You were so sweet to me once.
-So very sweet.
-Sybil.
You mustn't worry about me. Im gonna be perfectly all right, honey.
Please don't scold me.
I have to bring someone in tomorrow morning to replace you.
Im sorry.
Sybil!
What I feared had happened.
Poor Sybil had lost Barry and had decided... life was not worth living.
I fainted and when I recovered she wasn't there.
She had been taken to the hospital.
And I never saw her again. the act broke up and...
I married the only man that
I ever loved...
Pierre Ducros.
We had a good life until this... terrible book was published.
That is the truth.
That concludes my re-examination.
Sir Percy, Mr. Outward... since both litigants under oath have told conflicting stories... only one of which can be true... the other obviously perjury...
I must consider sending the evidence to the public prosecutor.
Court is adjourned until tomorrow.
-Mrs. Ducros!
-Hold it. thank you.
Thank you very much.
Hold it there, please.
Together. Over here, please.
-Smile, now.
-Another one, please.
Just one more, over here.
Thank you very much.
One more now.
-Big smile, please.
-One over here.
-Hold it.
-Thank you very much.
-How do you like London?
-Thanks. Very nice.
-Do you like the climate?
-Very much.
-It takes some getting used to.
-thank you.
But she invented everything.
Everything?
This scar I got from your lover isn't invention.
Oh, Gerald, look, must I explain that all over again?
I told a stupid lie.
It was pointless of me.
Oh, give me a drink, will you?
Would you like it in a perfume bottle?
No, I don't want a drink.
You couldn't be taken in by that absurd story.
You know Ive always had trouble with my throat.
Sybil, I don't mind paying any sum... for the libel damages but I wouldn't give a brass farthing for our marriage.
"Judge warns truth or jail".
Paper. Paper, sir?
Barry?
What is your full name?
Barry Nichols.
Mr. Nichols, as a witness of the court, kindly tell the jury...
if you are familiar with Lady Wren's book, Les Girls.
Oh, yes. I read it on the plane trip from California. I got in last night.
Its quite a book.
-You are employed in California?
-California, Washington, Oregon.
I own a chain of orange-juice stands.
Then you have retired from theatricals.
No, I have a television show, sponsored by Barry Nichols Incorporated.
Mr. Nichols, have you any knowledge of the evidence given in court... by Angele Ducros?
There was hardly anything else in the morning papers. I didn't skip a word.
Now, comparing her story... to the one related in...
Chapter Seven of Les Girls... which, to the best of your knowledge... is accurate and true?
Well, that's kind of hard to say,
Judge, My Lord.
Hard in what way, Mr. Nichols?
Can you clarify that?
Well, there were bound to be misunderstandings.
You see, certain things happened... that neither of the girls knew anything about.
Do you recall these certain things?
As though it were yesterday.
As both girls said, it was Paris and it was spring and I had this act...
called Barry Nichols and Les Girls...
but even in a great cosmopolitan city like Paris, I was a lonely man.
Oh, around me were some of the most beautiful girls in the world, but...
I was no longer interested.
-Are you decent?
-Yes, come in.
Its a great audience tonight.
-They loved the act.
-Why not? Its a lovable act.
-You girls going out tonight?
-Just Sybil and I.
Joy would rather go home with an old book.
It wouldn't hurt you two girls to stay home once in a while....
Stay home once in a while and read a book because....
Well, in this business you need a lot of rest.
Dear old Dad forgets that his little girls have blossomed into womanhood.
-Good night.
-Good night, girls.
-Good night, Joy.
-I envy you, Joy.
Why?
Well, you're so self-sufficient.
You don't need a lot of friends or companionship or men hanging around.
Its a great gift.
You sound as though I were Hortense the Hermit, living down under a bridge.
I like companionship and I like men.
Only, the ones I meet, companionship is not what they're looking for.
I know how you feel.
Im kind of lonely myself tonight.
I thought, maybe we could do something together if....
Are you gonna start that again?
-Start what?
-Look, Barry, Im tired. this debate ended last night.
Joy, I wish you'd thought more of yourself.
Then maybe you'd realize that a man... can wanna be with you just to be with you.
For yourself.
For your mind.
For laughs.
You said all that last night.
There.
-Was I all right?
-You were a perfect little gentleman.
I promise not to tell.
I know what your reputation means to you.
-Thanks. Good night.
-Im coming up.
-I said "good night".
-I know. Its getting pretty monotonous.
Look, I told you,
I can't offer you any supper.
All I have is a few carrots and some milk.
Could you spare some salt?
What for?
I brought along my own supper.
Oh, Barry!
I wanna talk to you about something.
No kidding, it's important.
It better be.
There's a loose connection around here someplace.
Someday it's gonna blow us all up.
Light some place, will you please?
All right, Barry, what do you want to talk about?
Books, vegetables, cauliflower...
Shakespeare, Tolstoy, I don't care.
I come up here for a sociable visit, you act like a district attorney.
I told you I was tired.
Would it make any difference to you if I told you...
Im in love with you?
No.
When a man's really in love with me, he'll have more to say than that.
Well, what more can a man say that....
You mean marriage?
Im an old-fashioned girl, Barry.
I know, that's what I like about you.
But not marriage.
That's a serious step.
Not that I haven't thought about it.
But, Joy, if that's what you want, why not?
I mean Im all for it.
I really am, honest I am.
-Sweetheart.
-Yes, Barry?
Let's do it right away.
Let's get engaged.
I suppose you believe in long engagements?
Well, yes, to get to know each other better.
And really make sure.
You know what I mean?
Yes, I think I do.
First let me get comfortable, huh?
Joy!
What's in that green bottle?
Sauerkraut juice.
I like it.
Joy, what are you doing?
Slipping into something else.
Just a minute? I'll be right with you.
Nothing better for a dancer's feet.
Now we were talking about our engagement.
That's right, so we were.
Would you mind pouring a little more hot water in the basin for me, dear?
Not at all.
You know it's amazing....
Its just amazing how the average girl... looks like nothing at all without a lot of rouge... and elaborate hairdos and attractive clothes, but... you... you, especially in this light, you have a quality... a glow like a wonderful impressionist painting.
A painting of a dried-up old carrot.
Some day there's going to be a murder in this attic... and it won't be a mystery.
You brought help this time. lf you wanna make trouble--
No, we have enough trouble.
We're here to ask for your help.
Why didn't you say so? Here, have a drink.
-Oh, thank you very much.
-What's your problem?
Angele thinks that she has deceived me about her career.
But I know....
We have decided our only rival is the theatre.
Yes, of course. But what can I do?
-You could dismiss them, Nichols.
-You mean fire two of my best girls?
They will be much happier.
Would you promise to look after them... cherish and protect them when they can no longer dance?
Im sorry, boys, but it took me a long time to build up this act.
You don't actually need Sybil and Angele.
You and Joy could do superbly, just the two of you.
Do you know what a dirty trick you're asking me to pull?
-Contemptible.
-Unpardonable.
But have you ever been in love?
Have I ever....
Have I ever.... that iceberg... is sinking me in mid-ocean.
I still have the theatre, you know.
Its yours if you want it.
Joy might rather like being the most important girl in the show.
Then you will consider dismissing the girls?
Oh, no. that's too cruel. Its....
You have a plan?
Have I a plan?
It takes a rat to think like a rat.
Gentlemen, I give you Les Girls.
All but one.
Merci, madame.
-Hello, Barry.
-Hello, Joy.
Madame--
I don't know why you have to go, on sulking like a spoiled
10-year-old boy.
-Barry, what is it?
-Its nothing, please.
[In French] -Whats wrong?
-Its nothing.
-Twenty francs.
-Can I?
No, no. I'll see you at the theatre.
*I'm flipped for a chick that
I just can't forget
*It depends she's a blonde,
I like 'eh jet-brunette--
*Why?
*Oh, why am I so gone about that gal?
*Her body is a poem when she starts to dance
*But not for anybody seekin' plane romance
*-Oh, why...am I so gone about that gal?
-I don't know why.
*I take a rap and then I watch, you know real nice
*-I even try to wear a suit
-A suit? -Oh, a suit!
*But when I try a kiss, then what I get?
*What do you get?
*-An eye so bloated.
-You got it!
*Yet ev'ry time she's near me
I begin to ache
*"Espeshly" if she fells me when I'm on the make
*-Oh, why am I so gone about that gal?
-Oh, man!
-Barry?
-Will you get me a glass of water?
There is something wrong. Tell me.
If you just get me a glass of water
I'll be all right. Please.
-Here now. Drink this.
-Thanks.
Are you sick?
I'd rather not talk about it.
Make your change.
You're acting so strangely.
You frighten me.
Frightening you is the last thing
I wanna do, you know that.
Go on. Make your change, will you?
I guess I should've stopped dancing the first time this happened.
What is it, Barry?
What's happened before?
Please make your change,
I don't wanna bother--
Barry, you're not bothering me.
Have you seen a doctor?
-Dozens.
-What'd they say?
-The same thing.
-Barry.
Now look. I don't want you to worry.
Ive worried enough for all of us.
Go on, make your change.
Its kind of ironical for someone who likes to dance as much as I do.
Barry, is it your heart?
I don't wanna talk about it.
But if you've known about it, why haven't you stopped dancing?
Its my life, you know that.
Now don't get the idea it's because I don't want you girls... thrown out of work.
Naturally that does concern me.
Im not a heel.
It is your heart? Isn't it?
You've got to promise me you won't tell the other girls.
Swear you won't tell them. Swear it.
Oh, Barry. I swear it.
If you don't want anyone to know your secret, I'll keep it for you, Barry dear.
I swear it.
The awful part about it is... he's been working every night against the doctor's orders.
-Oh, no.
-Im sure it's so we won't be out of a job.
-Its too dreadful.
-Did he say what it was?
Heart, but he wouldn't admit it.
I wondered why he'd given up drinking a few weeks ago.
-And he's been so quiet lately.
-And his hands.
Joy, I noticed, they've been trembling.
Poor, dear Barry. No onions.
There aren't many men who'd do what he's doing.
Not one.
You should've seen his eyes, dark pools of suffering.
What are we going to do about it?
We can't let him kill himself just for us.
Joy, he's gotta believe he's got something to live for.
Don't say that, Sybil.
I feel so guilty.
I know what Im going to do.
Saturday I will quit.
Saturday. He's not gonna sacrifice himself for me.
Im proud of you.
Im so proud of you.
We were so happy together.
Listen, tomorrow night we'll have been together a year.
We'll give him a party and tell him then.
We'll have to make it a gay, happy party.
The last one, maybe, together.
And you must swear not to tell him the reason.
Well, really, Joy!
Well, it doesn't say "Barry Nichols".
You are dreadful. But we love you anyway.
Its been a happy, happy year.
Thank you.
Do I need to tell you?
-Let's have some champagne.
-Yes, let's do.
Champagne.
A man never had three finer kids.
You hear that.
A toast just for us.
-A toast.
-thank you.
Here, Joy. that's good luck. Good luck.
-To another year.
-I'll drink to that.
-Many, many happy years, Barry.
-Many.
To Les Girls.
My girls.
-Bonjour, Angele, you're very swell.
-No. that's enough.
No! "That's enough".
You bourgeois French!
Joy, Joy, don't be coy.
Hold up your glass.
Its all I can do to hold up my head.
Its all you can do to hold up your pretty little head.
Sybil!
Sybil, Sybil, let's not quibble. Sybil.
All Sybil wants is little old beddy-bye. Please.
So you're throwing me out.
You should, Barry. Angele?
Before you go, there is something
Sybil and l want to tell you.
-You're gonna hate us, Barry.
-Impossible.
The truth is... we want to give up the theatre.
-Are you kidding?
-No, Barry.
We've just lost the taste for a career, that's all.
And age isn't kind to dancers, you know.
Of course you're.... You're right, but...
I'd give up the act if you left me.
Barry, don't make us feel like deserters.
Let us go. Please.
How about you, Joy?
If Sybil and Angele are giving up,
I suppose I have to.
If that's what you want
I won't stand in your way.
-Oh, Barry, you're so dear to us.
-So understanding.
-So kind.
-So sweet.
-Can you forgive us?
-Any time.
You should go now.
Oh, Barry, you're so sweet.
-So dear.
-So adorable.
-So kind.
-So understanding.
That's where we came in, girls.
Come along, Barry dear.
We do love you.
You can go to your Gerald, but Im not so fortunate.
Pierre is cold to me.
My Gerald. I telephoned him this morning and he couldn't even remember my name.
Oh dear, Im depressed again.
You didn't tell them, did you?
Oh, Barry, l gave you my word.
Im sorry, Joy.
But one gets suspicious when time is running out.
You must get some rest now, dear.
Joy, I know this is a silly thing to ask but...
Would you mind seeing me home?
Im a little shaky over all this.
Of course, dear.
-Would you like to lean on me?
-No.
I'll go out on my own two feet.
All those pictures of me.
Yes, you're always with me.
Im touched.
-Barry, let me do that, please.
-Thank you.
May I get your robe for you? In here?
Please don't. I hate to be a bother.
You're such a sweet kid.
Get some sleep now, Barry.
Good night.
-Good night.
-Don't go. Just for a minute.
Well, just for a minute.
Where'd you get that dress?
I bought it for your party.
-How do you like that?
-I wanted to look especially nice for you.
-Its beautiful.
-Thank you.
What is it? Is it silk?
No. Peau d'ange.
Peau d'ange. Angel skin.
It sure feels like it.
-It cost a fortune.
-Not much back to it.
With this kind of a dress, you're paying for what they leave out.
You smell good.
Oh, no, we mustn't.
You mustn't get excited.
A little excitement's not gonna do me any harm.
No, Im responsible. Tell me, who cleans up for you here?
Who cares?
Remember what the doctor told you?
The doctor told me not to dance.
Im not gonna dance.
You mustn't exert yourself.
-You know that.
-then stand still!
Don't make me run around tables.
If you don't sit down and be calm,
Im going.
Okay. Let me die if I want to.
Now, that's better.
You really don't know what's good for you.
I know what's good for me.
You don't know what's good for me.
You're making a wreck out of me.
-Would you like some water?
-Why?
-You wanna soak your feet?
-Please don't be cross with me.
Im being strong for your sake.
Joy, I wanna confess something.
-Swear not to tell.
-Haven't I proved you can trust me?
All right, look, there's nothin' wrong with me.
Im putting on an act.
Nothing wrong with you?
You made all that up?
Joy, are you sorry Im not dying?
I only did it for Pierre and Gerald.
And the girls and ourselves, Joy.
And you swore me to secrecy knowing I'd tell.
-Don't get excited.
-Don't you tell me not to get excited!
Of all the low contemptible tricks....
Where's your sense of humour?
I was only playing cupid.
Cupid? You?
-You dirty old fake.
-Joy, remember my heart.
-Your heart? Ha, your heart!
-Joy, remember you're a lady.
When I think of what
I paid for this dress....
Joy, please.
Please, Joy, because if I....
Joy! Wait! Please.
Joy, I wanna tell you that I love you.
I can't live without you!
I love you.
I love you!
Joy, I love you! Do you hear me?
Everyone in Paris can hear you.
Go home.
I wanna see you. I wanna apologize.
Im gonna stay here all night until you answer me! I'll yell all night.
I love you.
You Americans. In the name of peace, go up and tell her quietly.
Let decent people sleep.
Joy, please.
Joy!
Angele!
Sybil!
That's what happened.
Both girls were lying on the floor unconscious, overcome by gas.
-Both of them?
-Both of them.
We got them to the hospital and they recovered.
But we never got together again.
That was the end of Les Girls.
Mr. Nichols do you mean to tell this court... that both of these ladies attempted suicide?
Why, no, sir.
Neither of them attempted suicide.
-Neither?
-Neither. It was an accident.
You see, the connection on that old heater was always coming loose.
When the girls recovered they never saw each other again so, naturally they each thought the other had turned on the gas.
And that is the truth?
Your Lordship, Im under oath.
Thank you, Mr. Nichols, that will be all.
In view of what we have just heard... the counsel may wish to reconsider their course of action.
Madam Ducros came into court to protect her reputation, not for monetary consideration.
I don't think that my learned friend can strenuously object... if I move for withdrawal of this case.
The Defense does not object, My Lord.
Members of the jury, it seems that you will no longer be troubled with this case.
Thank you. You are excused.
-What a beastly trick.
-But darling, I loved you.
-I wanted you.
-Look, now don't speak to me.
-You've ruined my career.
-But, Sybil--
Don't speak to me!
Forgive me, little angel.
I shall never deceive you again.
Sybil.
Now, we will be sued.
Oh, darling.
-I was a fool!
-I was the fool.
No, I hate myself.
-Darling, my darling.
-Oh, poor pussycat.
I was sitting in the back of the courtroom.
-You were very good.
-Well, thank you, Mrs. Nichols.
I did what anyone should do in a court of law.
I told the truth.
Don't you believe that?
Barry, we came to save their marriages, ours was fine.
What do you mean "was"?
Sybil and Angele couldn't have invented those stories completely.
There must've been some truth in what they had to say.
-I remember. I can think right now.
-Well, well. Here we go again.
Vtg
Here comes the sugar man.
This'll make the last payment on my car.
Yeah, but it's all worn out.
Where you been all this time?
Hartwell.
Donegan.
Yoo-hoo!
Man, give me that fortune.
What are you gonna do with all that money?
I'm gonna buy a herd of chorus girls and make 'em dance on my bed.
Ninety-five, a hundred... five, six... seven... a hundred and eight dollars.
Good week, Vince.
You ready?
Yeah.
Vince likes that kind of punishment.
Someday he's gonna learn.
Okay, drinks are on me.
That's the kind of athletic contest
I appreciate. He's game, that boy.
I'll get you next week.
You bet, Vince.
Buy me a drink, cowboy?
- You're buyin', aren't you?
- Jake, draw one for the lady.
- I'll take a shot, if you can afford it.
- I can afford it.
I saw you here last week cashing your check.
- Yes, ma'am.
- Hey, you got nice hair.
I get through work around 4:00.
- Why, you two-bit little tramp!
- Hey!
She didn't mean anything.
I bought a round for the house.
- Keep outta this.
- She wasn't outta line.
- I said, keep your mouth outta this.
- Leave her alone.
Look, buster. You want some teeth knocked out, just keep it up.
You scare me.
Woman beaters always scare me.
You scare me.
Woman beaters always scare me.
Why don't you run along, sonny, before I muss up your hair?
Vince, he's had enough!
He's had enough!
Hey, kid, you can hit.
Somebody call a doctor.
This guy's hurt bad.
You've been found guilty by a jury of your peers of the crime of manslaughter.
You're hereby remanded to the custody of the sheriff... and you'll be transported to the state penitentiary... to serve a term of not less than one, nor more than ten years of imprisonment.
Court dismissed.
A tough woodchuck, huh?
Well, that's what we're here for, to teach you hooligans.
It says here you killed a man with your bare hands.
We don't use hands here.
We use guns.
I'll tell you another thing we use for cons who don't toe the mark: The whip.
- Understand?
- Yes.
Sir!
Yes, sir.
I'm puttin' you in with
Hunk Houghton, an old-timer.
- All right, that's all.
- Thank you, sir.
When do I finish my processing?
No hurry.
You got plenty of time.
Hang it up.
- Put it up where you got it.
- Sure.
Didn't know you're touchy about it.
I live here.
I'm touchy about everything.
You're on my bunk.
Is this okay?
- My name's Vince Everett.
- You know my name.
Glad to know you.
Yeah.
- You're not through processing.
- Not yet.
- What about your haircut?
- What about it?
You want a good one or a fresh fish special?
- A fresh fish...
- A fresh fish special.
They hack it up. A good one will cost you three packs of cigarettes.
I haven't got three packs.
- You got any money?
- Nope. Spent it all on my lawyer.
I'll loan you three packs, you pay back four.
Kind of silly savin' up cigarettes like that.
You'll learn.
Okay, tell me about the cigarettes.
I run a business, sonny.
I'm what you might call one of the top cons in this stir.
I got representatives in the tailor shop, commissary, sick bay... kitchen and shoe shop, and they all work for me.
You want a good haircut? I fix it.
A good pair of shoes? You ask me.
Like everything else, you gotta pay for it.
This here is the coin of the realm.
Where do you get cigarettes?
You trade with guys who don't smoke, you buy 'em, you steal 'em... just like you did for money on the outside.
I'm broke. I'll never accumulate any cigarettes.
The state pays you 18 cents a day.
That's a start.
- Play ball with me, and I'll stake you.
- That's real nice of you.
I can't have my cell mate lookin' like a bum.
I got a reputation to live up to.
- You been assigned a job yet?
- Not yet.
You'll probably draw the coal yard.
It's hard and it's dirty.
Maybe I can get you out of it, get you assigned to the print shop where I am.
How many packs?
Five cartons of cigarettes.
I'll loan 'em to you.
At what interest rate?
You're learnin' fast.
The interest rate won't be too high.
You just do what I say when I say it.
That's the basis of my organization.
- No, thanks.
- Huh?
I'll take my chances.
Suit yourself.
- Thanks anyway, though.
- It's no skin off my behind.
Hey, guard, how about a water call?
One water call every two hours.
You oughta know the rules by now.
- In this heat?
- Get back to work.
That new warden, the jerk!
Ever since he come here, this can ain't fit to live in.
- Hey, Houghton!
- I hear you callin'.
What are we gonna do about conditions?
I've had a bellyful.
I got less than a deuce to go.
I'm gonna suffer my little heart out.
- Not me. I'm gonna do somethin'.
- What a lousy dump!
- Not me. I'm gonna do somethin'.
- What a lousy dump!
I'd better quiet those steers down.
I'm up in the mornin' with the risin' sun
I work like a slave
'til the day is done
Just workin' and sleepin' and nothin' more
And every day is just like the day before
One more day
One more day
One day older and nearer to my Lord
One more day
Listen to the prayer of a lonely man
Livin' day to day the best he can
Give me the strength to carry my load
Glory waits for me at the end of the road
One more day
One more day
One day older and nearer to my Lord
One more day
That's mighty pretty, Hunk.
Give us another.
Thanks a lot, neighbors.
Appearin' before you has given me a big hunk of pleasure.
I hope to be around pickin' and singin' for you again real soon.
Whereabouts did you learn to sing like that?
That used to be my trade, sonny buck.
I was singin' country music before the words were invented.
I was on the stage with the best of 'em:
Eddy Arnold, Roy Acuff.
Did you make good money?
I made two bills a week.
I was swimmin' in gravy in those days.
Get on to the sad part.
A woman and a bank did it.
She got used to bonded bourbon,
I robbed a bank.
I thought you were makin' 200 a week?
Booking's got a little thin.
- You made all that money just singin'?
- Why not?
Mind if I horse around with it?
Don't break any strings.
I can sing better than you.
Naturally.
I used to have an uncle that had one of these things.
I fooled around with it some.
Here's one of his songs.
Here's one of his songs.
You're so young
And beautiful
And I love you so
Your lips so red
Your eyes that shine
Shame the stars that glow
So feel
These lonely arms of mine
And kiss me tenderly
Then you'll be
Forever young
And beautiful to me
Like my singin'?
You don't know one thing about the guitar.
The boarders liked it.
They're what you might call a captive audience.
Here, let me show you a few chords.
That's a C-major chord.
That's a big one.
Now try the G.
You will never make a guitar player.
You got no rhythm in your bones.
Well, I never heard of anybody payin' money to hear a guitar player.
Don't pay any attention to me.
I was only in the business for ten years, that's all.
Yeah. I read you, loud and clear.
Try it again.
Vince, take a water break.
Hey, screw,
I'm gonna get some water.
We're gonna have a prisoners' show.
A committee from the state legislature is comin' to investigate.
The warden wants to throw up a smoke screen.
He's all heart, that warden.
- Who do you think's producin' the show?
- You.
Who told you?
I got a spot for you in the show.
I'll teach you a new tune.
I don't know. What's the percentage in singin' for a bunch of cons?
Experience, you lunkhead.
That's the percentage.
- I'll consider it.
- Fine. You do that.
While you're about it, consider the fact this show is goin' on national TV.
- You're kiddin'.
- No. It's called "Breadth of a Nation."
I guess they figure we got color.
I considered. I'm on.
What do you think's prettier?
Red or blue?
- Red or blue what?
- Color for a convertible.
Geez!
You guests of the state are gonna be mighty sorry... this next boy's a short-termer...
'cause he sure sings pretty.
Let's hear it for Vince Everett!
There's no joy in my heart
Only sorrow
And I'm sad as a man can be
I sit alone in the darkness
Of my lonely room
And this room is a prison to me
I look out my window
And what do I see
I see a bird
Way up in a tree
- I wanna be free
- Oh, yes
- Free
- Oh, yes
Free
I wanna be free
Like the bird in the tree
Wanna be free
Hurry up, fellas.
I gotta count my fan mail.
Vince Everett.
Hey, you birds, come here.
How'd you like to make five cartons apiece?
Five? Who do you want us to murder?
It's the easiest money you'll ever make.
Just keep your mouth shut.
I mean, about the mail.
I made a mistake. I gave the kid the best spot in the show.
If word gets out all this mail's for
Vince Everett, it makes me look bad.
Follow? I mean me, the professional singer.
I, uh... I see.
If within a week the word's not around, you get the cigarettes.
Yeah, but it's Everett's mail.
Who's gonna keep him quiet?
If I know the warden,
Everett will never get it.
We'd be a natural together.
Both ex-cons.
The publicity would be sensational.
Look.
You get out in six months.
I follow you 12 months later.
- What do you say, boy?
- You mean we sing together?
Together, alone, it makes no difference.
We hire a couple of other acts, we got our own show.
We play the circuit and we roll.
I don't know anything about gettin' bookings...
Let me worry about the business end.
Here.
I've made a contract for us.
We split everything down the middle.
Sit down here a minute.
Come on, boy, sit down here.
Sign right there.
How come you're willing to give me 50% of your earnings?
I mean, like you said, you're the one that's got the experience and the name.
One simple reason:
I got faith in your possibilities.
You're never gonna command the dough I can... but with training, you'll do all right.
Besides, I need a young man to appeal to the kids.
I'm levelin' with you, boy.
Alone, son... you'd be like a lamb in a pack of wolves.
Go ahead.
I wouldn't feed this garbage to a razorback hog.
I thought that investigatin' committee was gonna fix things up here.
Investigatin' committee.
What do those jerks see?
What the warden wants 'em to see!
Slop.
Slop!
Come on!
Let's get back to the cell!
Come on. Back to your cell!
All right.
One.
Two.
Three.
Four.
Five.
I didn't have money enough to buy the grease.
- The price was 300. I didn't have it.
- I wish you did.
It's a lesson to remember.
Without money, you may as well be dead.
That's all the sympathy I'll give you.
Pity's a commodity in here.
You buy it and sell it just like anything else.
What are you, man?
Some kind of an animal?
That's right, buddy.
I'm an animal in a jungle, and I got a motto:
"Do unto others as they would do unto you, only do it first."
That's right.
Do it first.
And it's just as bad on the outside.
Worse.
Remember that.
I don't aim to forget it.
Everett, you ready?
Drop in on us when you're in this part of the country.
- Glad to put you up for the night.
- Just go away, screw!
I wanna say good-bye to my friend.
See you in about ten months.
That's right, boy.
Together we'll knock 'em over.
The name of the joint is the Florita.
I wrote a letter to Sam Brewster, the owner, an old buddy of mine.
- I'm positive he'll give you a job.
- Okay. See you.
Take it easy.
Here's what the state owes you: $54.
Do I owe income taxes?
Don't give me any sass, bub, and get outta here.
I'll try not to break down.
Oh, wait a minute.
- Here's something belongs to you.
- What's this?
Letters you got after that television show.
You're a real star, Everett.
- How come I didn't see these before?
- 'Cause I didn't want you to.
That's against the law, keepin' mail from an inmate.
Have me arrested.
Now get out, and don't come back.
You've been just like a father to me, Warden.
Sir!
I'll send a woman up to make the bed directly.
What do you want?
It's custom to tip a man when he brings you to your room.
Well, I'm startin' a new custom: No tip.
No law against tryin'.
"Dear Vince, I saw you on television today singing from the jail...
"and I thought you looked real cool.
"My name is Marijane Hamilton, and
I'm 15 with blue eyes and brown hair.
"My measurements are 33-25-36.
"Do you think I should reduce?
Ha-ha.
"If you come to Riverport, how about giving me a blast on the phone?
"My number is Lockwood 4357."
Where's the nearest pawnshop?
Down the street to the right, a couple of blocks.
What you gonna do?
Buy yourself a diamond ring?
No. I'm gonna buy a guitar and sing love songs to you.
- Hi, Jerry.
- Hi, Peggy.
- Shorty.
- Hi, Peggy.
- How's your boy doin'?
- Large. He's on top.
"Crying to the Stars" got 84 plays.
Yeah? I'm sick of it.
Now watch your tongue, Shorty.
Tell me what you see.
About 5'4", weight 115, pretty well stacked.
- I'm glad you find me pleasing.
- I don't find you nothin'.
- Then why are you staring?
- I'm interested in the jukebox.
Well, I'm sorry.
I don't know about mechanics.
I don't either.
I'm a singer.
Indeed.
I saw you writin' down some figures in your little book... and I wondered what you were doing, so don't get fancy ideas about yourself.
Oh, I see.
- Well, I'm afraid I misunderstood.
- I'm afraid you did.
If you buy me a fresh drink,
I'll tell you about the figures.
Buy your own drink.
Is yours the approved manner with ladies in the backwoods?
- Just tell me about the figures.
- All right.
I'm an exploitation man in the record business.
I work for Mickey Alba.
You've heard of him?
Word sometimes gets to the backwoods, yeah.
Well, I plug his records with disc jockeys, jukeboxes, stores.
- Oh, hello, Sam.
- Hello, kid.
This is Sam Brewster, the cheerful owner.
Vince Everett.
Did you get Hunk Houghton's letter?
- So you want a job, huh?
- When do I go to work?
- Whenever you want.
- Tonight's good as any.
It's up to you.
Bring me a seltzer, will you?
Can those guys play with me when I sing?
What do you mean, "sing"?
Sing! You said
I could start tonight.
As bar boy.
- Make setups, bring ice.
- Hunk said you'd give me a job singing.
What do you think I am, a mental case?
This place is no hobby, you know.
All I want is a chance,
Mr. Brewster.
Look, kid,
I'll save you some grief.
So Hunk taught you a couple of songs? Swell.
Be the life of the next party you go to... but we don't have opportunity night here.
Do you want the job or don't you?
Bar boy.
I'll see you around, honey.
Hunk Houghton.
That name sounds familiar.
He's an old country music singer.
I met him in the penitentiary.
Make setups and bring ice.
Ladies and gentlemen...
I'm not a part of this show, so don't encourage me or pay me any mind at all.
But the man that owns this place thinks
I can't sing, so I gotta prove it.
So you just go ahead with whatever you're doin'.
It won't take long.
Do a chorus of "Young and Beautiful."
You're so young
And beautiful
And I love you so
Your lips are red
Your eyes that shine
Shame the stars that glow
Don't let me interrupt you, mister.
I won't.
So fill these lonely arms of mine
And kiss me tenderly
Then you'll be forever young
And beautiful to me
Hey! You forgot something!
- What?
- Me.
That was quite a temper tantrum back there.
That creep had it comin'.
Look. Why don't you get me off the streets, huh?
I'm bushed.
She'll do 80 on a straightaway.
Come on, huh?
Do you always bust guitars on talking customers?
- I wasn't that bad.
- Oh?
Do you think so?
Well, I didn't think you were very good, Vince.
After listening to
Mickey Alba all day...
All right.
You tell me.
Why didn't they listen to you?
I don't know.
I'm no worse than a lot of 'em.
And no better.
Okay, you're used to the top talent.
Why waste your time working me over?
I like the way you swing a guitar.
I guess I did get a lot of wrist action into it, didn't I?
Well, that's all she wrote.
My musical career started and ended with one song.
I don't know why... not until you've given yourself every chance.
But if they won't listen to me,
I can't hold a gun on 'em.
Did you ever listen to yourself?
How can I listen to myself when I'm singing?
Make a tape recording.
Maybe when you hear yourself, you can discover what's wrong.
How much does it cost?
About $20 for the recording studio, I think.
I haven't got a guitar.
I'll borrow one for you.
Can't hurt anything.
- I'm sorry I'm late, Vince.
- Just don't pay attention to my nerves.
- I brought you some background.
- Who's gonna pay 'em?
It's on the house.
Have you picked a tune?
Yeah. Sit down, fellas.
Let's see if you know this one.
Don't leave me now
Now that I need you
Okay, I'm ready as I'll ever be.
Stand by, please.
Everett demonstration number one, take one.
One, two, three.
Don't leave me now
Now that I need you
How blue and lonely I'd be
If you should say we're through
Don't break my heart
This heart that loves you
Man, it's awful.
Do I sound like that?
If you should leave me now
What good is dreamin'
I guess I owe that guy at the Florita a couple of drinks.
It's a nice tune, though.
There's nothing wrong with the tune.
It's the way I'm doing it.
How do you mean?
I sound like a million other singers.
- Then sing it differently.
- Like how?
Like how you feel it.
Put your own emotions into the song.
Make it fit you.
Make it fit you.
Well, the first thing is that guitar.
It's tough tryin' to find the chords.
- I just won't use it.
- Nobody cares.
- Okay, fellas, let's do it again.
- Good.
Burn me up this time. Let's see if we can get a little fire in it.
- Try it again, sir.
- All right. Stand by.
Everett demonstration number two, take one.
Everett demonstration number two, take one.
Don't leave me now
Don't leave me now
- Now that I need you
- Oooh
How blue and lonely I'd be
If you should say we're through
Don't say we're through
Don't break my heart
Don't break my heart
This heart that loves you
There'd just be nothin' for me
If you should leave me now
Don't leave me now
What good is dreamin'
If I must dream all alone
By myself
Without you, darlin'
- What do you think?
- I think it's wonderful.
- Good enough for a record?
- It sure is.
- Then let's go ahead.
- With a record?
Why not?
How do you go about it?
It isn't that easy, Vince.
You have to go to a record company and sell 'em on the idea.
Let's do it. You know the business, and I want to cash in on some loot.
Well, I don't know.
We might try Geneva Records.
What can they do?
Send me back to the pen?
- Thanks, Peg, for lettin' me hear it.
- I think he's got a distinctive style.
Everybody's got a distinctive style these days.
I'd like to hear someone sing a song straight for a change.
But you know they're going for the new sounds, Jack.
I wish I could help you with it, but you know our program this year.
No experiments.
We're sticking with the established record sellers.
Well, I guess we'll have to let MGM Records have it.
- I wish you luck.
- Thanks anyway, Jack.
Let's get outta here.
I'll tell you what.
Leave the tape with me. I'll play it over the phone to D.L. in New York.
That's the best I can do.
That'd be wonderful, Jack.
Thank you.
I don't promise you anything.
- It's nice to meet you, sonny.
- Likewise.
Pretty sharp cuff links.
I'm gonna have me some like that someday.
Mickey Alba made me a present of these when we gave him his eighth gold record.
Maybe someday you'll make me the same kind of present.
That'd be nice.
- Good-bye, Jack.
- Bye, Peg.
- Hello?
- Hello, Vince.
- I'm afraid I have bad news.
- You saw Lease, huh?
He said the man in New York didn't like the tape.
What do we do now?
- Keep on trying other labels, I guess.
- Okay, you do that.
I'll meet you at that same restaurant about 7:00.
Okay. Good-bye.
Hi.
You've kept me waiting
20 minutes.
- I've been sleepin'. You eat yet?
- Certainly not.
Don't you know the meaning of the word "courtesy"?
We don't use it much in the backwoods. Let's eat.
You might at least ask me what happened this afternoon.
- What happened this afternoon?
- I sold your record, that's all.
Swell. I could tear into a good steak.
Would it hurt you just to say that you're happy about it?
It wouldn't be easy.
When the money starts rolling in, then I'll say I'm happy.
Who'd you make the deal with?
- Deltona.
- Never heard of 'em.
It's fairly new.
They're crazy about it, Vince.
They say they're gonna push it hard.
Great.
Let's celebrate, huh, Vince?
We'll have a bottle of wine and a nice meal... and then after dinner we'll drive out and see my father and mother.
- I didn't know you had parents.
- They didn't win me on a quiz show.
You like burgundy?
Goes great with steak.
I like anything that goes with steak. I'm broke.
If it's all right with you,
I'll pay for the meal.
You will if we eat.
Hey, waitress.
It's a real crazy pad.
What does your old man do for a livin'?
He's a professor at Bertrand College.
- Hello, darling.
- Hello, daddy.
- I'd like you to meet Vince Everett.
- Welcome, young man.
Mother, this is Mr. Everett, the singer Peggy's been working with.
- How do you do?
- Can I fix you a drink?
- No, thank you.
- Scotch? Bourbon?
- You got any beer?
- Coming up.
We're very pleased to see you.
Peggy's told us about you.
She hasn't told me anything about you.
I hear you sold your first record today.
You seem to hear everything about me, huh?
How long have you been in the music business?
- About a week.
- I see.
There you are, sir.
And what did you do before that?
- Peggy didn't tell you?
- No.
- Mr. Everett was in the penitentiary.
- Is that so?
- What was the rap?
- One to ten. I did 14 months.
August, why don't you put on that new record by Stubby Rightmire?
I'm sure Mr. Everett's interested in jazz music.
- It's his profession.
- Righto.
Will you excuse me?
I have to fix the sandwiches.
That bomb kind of laid an egg, didn't it?
- What bomb?
- About the penitentiary.
I'm afraid the shock value isn't worth very much.
I think Stubby's gone overboard with those altered chords, don't you?
I think Brubeck and Desmond have gone as far with dissonance as I care to go.
Oh, nonsense. Have you heard
Lenny Tristano's latest recording?
He reached outer space.
Someday they'll make the cycle and get back to pure old Dixieland.
I say atonality is just a passing phase in jazz music.
What do you think,
Mr. Everett?
I don't know what the hell you're talkin' about.
You finally got your sensation.
I hope you're satisfied.
Get off my back.
You insulted my father, mother and me, and it's just unforgivable!
I have a little beer, first thing you know... some old broad's askin' me a stupid question.
They were trying to bring you into the conversation.
They can shove their conversation.
I'm not sure they were talkin' English.
- I'll drive you to your hotel.
- I'll walk.
I think I'm gonna just hate you.
You ain't gonna hate me.
I ain't gonna let you hate me.
How dare you think such cheap tactics would work with me.
That ain't tactics, honey.
That's just the beast in me.
Before we go in, there's something I'd better say.
About the other night...
I guess I did get out of line a foot or two.
I got a pretty big mouth sometimes... so if you'll just tell your old lady I said I'm...
Sorry?
Yeah. Come on.
May I help you?
Today's the release date for
"Don't Leave Me Now." Do you have it?
We sure do. The kids are all crazy about it.
It's the greatest.
- I think I'll take a half a dozen.
- Yes, sir.
Did you hear that?
They're crazy about it.
- I'm gonna start off with a red one.
- A red what?
Convertible.
That'll be six dollars plus tax.
May I see those records, please?
What's the matter, Peg?
"'Don't Leave Me Now' by Mickey Alba"?
Geneva Record Company.
- I'm afraid I don't get it.
- I do.
- Which booth can we use?
- Any of them.
Of all the low and filthy...
Peggy, tell me what's goin' on.
Don't leave me now
Don't leave me now
Now that I need you
How blue and lonely
That lousy thief.
He stole my style, my arrangement, my everything.
Lease copied your tape and gave it to him.
What about my record?
You can forget it.
It's gone.
- Miss...
- I'll see you later.
- Vince!
- I'll see you later, Peg.
Vince, where are you going?
Sonny, you don't own that song.
It's published. Anyone can record it.
You turned it down.
You said you didn't like it.
- We didn't want to record an unknown.
- What about my arrangement?
So see your lawyer.
You can't copyright an arrangement.
- You're a thievin' rat!
- Listen to me, sonny.
Don't "sonny" me, you louse!
Crawl back under your rock, you snake!
Come in.
- What did you do to him?
- Nothin'.
Just slapped him a couple of times.
Isn't that dangerous?
I mean, he might have you arrested or something.
Why are you scared?
It's not you.
I just don't want anything to happen to you, that's all.
I'm terribly sorry, Vince.
Old Hunk Houghton told me once back in the pen.
He said, "Watch out for the teeth, sonny. It's a jungle."
Yeah, he had it taped.
On the inside, they're Cub Scouts compared to Jack Lease.
If you make something, they might steal it from you... but they'd be too honorable to go around saying they made it themselves.
Yeah, it was a pretty rotten thing.
Now that the crying's over...
I wanna make another record.
The same thing might happen all over again.
You got no guts, Peggy.
So if they steal from you, there's only one thing to do:
- Start your own record company.
- Your own company?
Certainly.
What's the mystery?
We can find out the details from a lawyer or something.
You don't have to own a factory.
You contract for the pressings.
But you just don't go out and start your own record company, just like that!
Why not?
It's done every day.
We're just as smart as those other birds.
Look, I make the decisions now.
I can't louse things up any worse than you did.
Distribution.
Well, I know a little bit about it.
Sure you do. And exploitation.
That's your racket.
Look, we'll be partners.
We'll split things up 60-40.
- Sixty-forty?
- I'm the artist, don't forget.
Are you with me?
Yeah. Yeah, I guess I am.
Well, I'll quit my job tomorrow.
My own record company.
I can smell the money already.
This really calls for a celebration, doesn't it, Vince?
Do you know a lawyer?
Do you know how to dance?
We'll need a good one, a guy with an eye to a buck.
Do you know a lawyer?
Yeah, I know a lawyer.
Mr. Shores.
But he's a cold-blooded old fish.
Good. How's he fixed financially?
They say he's got the first dollar he ever earned.
Sounds like my man, interested only in money.
Is that all you're interested in, Vince?
Well, what else?
Nothing.
Hey, when can we see this Mr. Shores?
Tonight, if you want to.
Good.
And incorporation papers will cost you $100.
We'll raise it.
What else?
Registering your trademark, $25.
Are you interested in show business?
Not in the slightest.
How would you like to be my manager?
I should want to first ascertain what your earning potential will be.
We're real kinfolk, Mr. Shores.
Peggy and I are gonna earn some money, and when we do... we'll make another record, and then we'll be in business.
You know somethin'?
I'm gonna make you rich.
I'm already rich.
You'll be richer.
Good night.
- Thank you, Mr. Shores.
- You're welcome.
You got it?
- Okay, we're ready.
- Stand by, please.
- What's this new label of yours?
- Laurel Records.
Laurel number 101, take one.
When I walk through that door
Baby, be polite
You're gonna make me sore
If you don't greet me right
Don't you ever kiss me once
Kiss me twice
Treat me nice
I know that you've been told
It's not fair to tease
So if you come on cold
I'm really gonna freeze
If you don't want me to be cold as ice
Treat me nice
Make me feel at home
If you really care
Scratch my back and run your pretty fingers through my hair
You know I'd be your slave
If you asked me to
But if you don't behave
I'll walk right out on you
If you want my love then take my advice
Treat me nice
Make me feel at home
If you really care
Scratch my back and run your pretty fingers through my hair
You know I'd be your slave
If you asked me to
But if you don't behave
I'll walk right out on you
If you want my love then take my advice
Treat me nice
Treat me nice
Treat me nice
If you really want my lovin'
Treat me nice
- Hi, Ted.
- Hi, darlin'.
What's this I hear about you quitting
Alba and becoming a recording tycoon?
That's right.
Here's my first offering.
"'Treat Me Nice',
Vince Everett."
- How is it?
- Good enough to make me quit my job.
And you want me to give it a couple of shots?
If you only would, Teddy.
It would mean so much to us.
Well, we'll try, see how the cookie crumbles.
Thanks.
Peg, how long are you gonna be in town?
About a day or two.
Well, suppose we get together and split a herring?
- I'd like that.
- Good.
"Folks, does your dog turn up his nose at the same old canned dog foods?
"Then why don't you try fresh meat?
"Cy's Pet Shop will deliver fresh, red, juicy horse meat...
"wrapped in the size package you demand, right to your door.
"It's a bit more, but the treat for your dog will be worth dollars in health.
"Remember Cy's Pet Shop.
Telephone Mammoth-62480.
"That's Mammoth-62480."
Friends, I owe our listeners an apology.
Callers have complained they couldn't hear all of the Vince Everett record... because of the commercial, so we're going to play it again.
We're doing it for Betty,
Maryjo, Linda, Julie... the gang down at Ray's Auto Upholstery and... well, the list is too long.
Apparently, just about everybody wants to hear this new platter.
So here he is, Vince Everett singing "Treat Me Nice"... on the new Laurel label.
Mr. Shores.
I now have confidence in your earning potential, Mr. Everett.
You're in.
For 10% of the record company and 5% of your earnings.
Nine percent of the company.
That leaves me 51% and controlling interest.
Agreed.
- And 4% of my personal take.
- I have the papers already prepared.
With those figures?
I anticipated you, Mr. Everett.
How do you like that? He smelled the money from 400 miles away.
I think I got it made.
Vince. Come on in.
I just checked the record shop.
We sold 425 copies.
- That's great.
- We got a hit.
You stick with me, and I'll put diamonds in your teeth.
Oh, that's nice.
How do you like the cuff links?
A dollar a week.
Do you intend on using them for a landing strip?
It's the mark of a man's success.
You look sexy tonight.
You start the hammers to pounding in my skull.
You must have read my mind when you wore this dress.
- What's on your little mind?
- A celebration.
Tonight's the night for a real celebration.
- I like the idea.
- We'll send up rockets.
- But not with you.
- Soft music, loud champagne.
We'll charge it to
Laurel Records' ex...
- Not with me?
- No, not tonight.
- Who with?
- I have a date with Teddy Talbot.
- That record spinner? You're kiddin'.
- That record spinner made a hit for you.
But I've already got reservations at the local nightspot and everything.
Vince, you should have made reservations with me.
I still have a life of my own, you know.
I thought this was one night you wouldn't let me down.
Vince, I don't understand why you're so upset.
You told me yourself. I asked you if money was all you were interested in... and your answer was, and I quote, "What else?"
Ah, that was different then.
Was it?
Vince, I will not be subject to your beck and call.
Excuse me.
- Hi, Ted.
- Hi.
- You do look scrumptious.
- Thank you.
- Be right with you.
- Okay.
- Hi, Vince.
- What do you say?
- Seein' much of our little metropolis?
- Oh, I've seen enough.
Did you thank the man for all the help he's given us?
Oh, that's not necessary.
Thank the man, Vincent.
- Thank you.
- You're welcome.
Good night, Vince.
Good night, Vince.
After the success of his initial record...
Mr. Everett was enabled to command more advantageous contracts.
I was told the adolescents found
Mr. Everett's unique style of singing... quite titillating.
Our expenses, however, increased with gross income.
I found transportation costs to be particularly high.
This, however, was a deductible item.
Oh, his choice of color was white.
I doubted I could convince the Internal Revenue Department... that all of Mr. Everett's entertaining was for business purposes only.
On the other hand, my client felt extremely elated... over his latest good fortune.
He'd been invited by the National Broadcasting Company... to participate in a nationwide television extravaganza.
Hiya, pard.
How are you? Huh?
I guess you heard the news about the TV show.
Yes, Mr. Shores told me.
Come on.
I wanna introduce you to a new member of the troupe.
Laury Jackson, this is Peggy Van Alden.
- Pleased to make your acquaintance.
- How do you do?
Laury is a real cool little singer.
I'm takin' her to New York with me.
In that case,
I don't think I'll go.
Were you planning to go?
What for?
No reason I can think of now.
Got nothin' to do with the record business.
Of course not.
It's just like you said that night in Joplin:
"You and me, it's strictly business."
Let's keep it that way.
Let me know when you wanna cut another record, pard.
Okay, I'll see you.
You gonna wish me luck?
Luck.
Where's my Vince boy?
Hi, son.
Remember me?
Hunk, you old son of a gun.
How are you?
You must be Peggy Van Alden, the gal that started the record company.
- How do you do?
- I'm the bird got Vince started, right?
You'd better believe it. How'd you know about the record company?
I gotta keep up with the activities of my partner.
You've got more partners than a square dance.
Yep. I taught the boy plenty.
You'll find out just how well you taught him.
Good night.
That's a pretty little thing.
Well, boy, I'm rarin' to go.
How do you like it?
Thirty cartons of cigarettes.
You old stud.
How about a drink?
Sing it to me in the key of G.
Folks, meet Hunk Houghton, the toughest old con in cell block 21.
Howdy. Pleased to meet you.
- How 'bout that drink now?
- You can pour me a gourd full.
Uncle Matthew bonded bourbon.
Do you know how old this bourbon is?
- How old?
- Twelve years old.
Heavens above.
That's like an angel dancing over the tip of your tongue.
It seems a shame to even digest this bourbon.
You made it, huh? I've been readin' about it, and I feel proud of you.
- Yeah, I've been lucky so far.
- Lucky?
Talent. I knew you had it the minute you opened your mouth.
- Now you're goin' on TV.
- You know everythin', don't you?
I feel good.
What's your plans for me, boy?
Well, I ain't exactly got any, Hunk.
- No plans for Hunk, your old partner?
- What do you wanna do?
I want a spot in that TV show.
You're talkin' crazy, Hunk.
You better think it over.
I've been thinkin' about it for 18 years.
Yeah, I know, but... times have changed and styles have changed.
You might fall flat on your face, boy.
I might get lucky like you too.
I tried your style, like you taught me.
Boy, I laid a bomb.
But you ain't me.
I need one good break.
You can get it for me on that show.
I owe you that much, but I don't know how it's gonna work out.
Oh, you let me worry about that.
You're a good boy.
Ladies and gentlemen, a little while back...
I had kind of a vacation with a bunch of men in a big place out yonder.
While I was there, these men... kind of guests, you might say... we'd get together and horse around a little bit and sing...
'cause we were havin' such a good time... and we always had a lot of fun with this one, "The Jailhouse Rock."
And we always had a lot of fun with this one, "The Jailhouse Rock."
One, two
One, two, two
The warden threw a party in the county jail
The prison band was there and they began to wail
The band was jumpin' and the joint began to swing
You should've heard those knocked-out jailbirds sing
Let's rock
Everybody, let's rock
Everybody in the whole cell block
Was dancin' to the jailhouse rock
Spider Murphy played the tenor saxophone
Little Joe was blowin' on the slide trombone
The drummer boy from Illinois went crash, boom, bang
The whole rhythm section was a purple gang
Let's rock
Everybody, let's rock
Everybody in the whole cell block
Was dancin' to the jailhouse rock
Number 47 said to number 3
You're the cutest jailbird
I ever did see
I sure would be delighted with your company
Come on and do the jailhouse rock with me
- Let's rock
- Go, go, go
- Everybody, let's rock
- Lay it on me, daddy-o
Everybody in the whole cell block
Was dancin' to the jailhouse rock
Rock, rock
Rock, rock
Rock to the jailhouse rock
Rock, rock
Rock, rock
Rock to the jailhouse rock
Sad Sack was sitting on a block of stone
Way over in the corner weepin' all alone
The warden said, hey, buddy don't you be no square
If you can't find a partner use a wooden chair
- Let's rock
- Rock, rock
- Everybody, let's rock
- Rock, rock
Everybody in the whole cell block
Was dancin' to the jailhouse rock
Shifty Henry said to Bugs
For heaven's sake
No one's lookin'
Now's the chance to make a break
Bugsy turned to Shifty and he said, Nix, nix
I wanna stick around while I get my kicks
- Let's rock
- Rock
- Everybody, let's rock
- Rock
Everybody in the whole cell block
Was dancin' to the jailhouse rock
- Dancin' to the jailhouse rock
- Rock, rock, rock
- Dancin' to the jailhouse rock
- Rock, rock, rock
- Dancin' to the jailhouse rock
- Rock, rock, rock
Dancin' to the jailhouse rock
Thank you, Mr. Everett.
Very good, Jack... but a couple of your dancers missed their marks, and we lost them.
We'll go right into the hillbilly number.
What's his name? Houseman?
Hunk Houghton.
All right, Mr. Houghton.
Okay, cut to four.
Dolly in and hold.
Okay, cut to four.
Dolly in and hold.
I'm up in the mornin' with the risin' sun
I work like a slave
'til the day is done
Just workin' and sleepin'
- Where'd he come from?
- Some pal of Everett's.
- Say, what is this?
- Don't blame me, Mr. Barton.
It wasn't my idea.
He came as part of the Everett deal.
I'm sorry. Deal or no deal, he's off the show.
Okay, Mr. Barton.
Everett might bellyache.
Compared to the sponsor's pain, his would be nothing.
- I wonder what he ever did for Everett.
- I've got no money...
Freddie, we're way over length.
We're gonna have to trim four minutes.
Tell you what.
We'll go right from
"The Jailhouse Rock" to the film clip.
Cut the hillbilly number.
I get calls and wires from all over the world, but not little Peggy.
No, not little Peg. I'll bet she doesn't even tune me in tonight.
Okay, baby, you wait for me to call you?
Well, it'll be a cold day in...
Yeah, that's what it'll be.
- That ain't gonna help.
- It always has.
- I warned you, but you wouldn't listen.
- Don't rub it in.
And don't ask for pity.
You taught me that.
- Don't worry, I'll get along.
- How?
One flop ain't a man's whole life.
How'd you expect me to follow that three-ring circus you put on?
You couldn't have followed a juggler.
Naturally.
I haven't got your talent.
That's right, you haven't.
So what are you gonna do?
That's not your business.
Now look, Hunk...
I'm gonna be honest with you.
I'm not gonna put the brakes on my career now.
I don't want you as part of my troupe.
You're not good enough.
It's been a long time, Hunk.
Music changes every six months.
You gotta change with it.
I was in show business when you were in wet pants... and I'll be in it when they can't remember your name.
Fine, but not with me.
- Aren't you forgettin' somethin', sonny?
- I was wondering when you'd bring it up.
Right down the middle, 50-50.
It's a legal contract.
Uh-uh. I put Mr. Shores on that contract.
It's not worth the ink it took to write it.
You should've checked with a lawyer, dad.
I figured it was a contract in good faith, more than how legal it was.
Is that what you figured, Hunk?
Is that what you figured... even after the fan mail you knew about that I got in the can?
A contract is a contract.
Let's level, huh?
Okay, you did me a favor.
You started me out in music, and then you tried to rob me.
But I ain't forgettin' about the whippin' you tried to buy me out of.
So I'm gonna honor that contract, providing I don't hear... any more of that jazz about good faith.
I'm gonna honor it, Hunk, but not for no 50%.
- How much?
- Ten.
I wonder if Shorty checked those airline reservations. Will you find out for me?
- Ten percent, huh?
- Ten.
You know... a punk like you is liable to get lucky enough to make a million dollars a year.
That's just what
I intend to do.
And 10% of a million is 100,000.
There you go. You were always good at arithmetic.
You're gonna have the most expensive flunky in show business.
After the television show, the floodgates opened wide.
We had engagements in the best-paying recreation centers in America.
Receipts doubled and redoubled.
Our tax situation became acute.
The record business was neglected during this phase, much to my regret.
However, my hands were tied.
There seemed to be emotional problems between the two principal stockholders.
The 40% participant... refused to telephone the 60% partner.
It was an impasse, and highly unbusinesslike.
Finally, there was only one phase of the entertainment industry left... so we went there.
We signed a nonexclusive contract with Climax Studios.
We welcome you, Vince, with all our hearts.
You may find Hollywood to be a lonely town.
You're new here, and good friends are hard to find... just as in any other industry.
I want you to know that you may feel free to regard my home as your own.
Come to me anytime...
- Yes?
- The photographer's here.
Please send him in.
We want to get your publicity campaign started right away... so we're having a studio photographer come in.
Mr. Everett, meet Miss Sherry Wilson, your leading lady.
How do you do?
We thought some photographs together...
- Sure.
- If you'll just step in there.
Thank you very much.
Now smile pretty.
That's fine.
Now maybe an action shot... like you just signed your contract and you're shakin' hands.
Smile pretty now.
Thank you.
Now we have a little chore for you two young people.
We want you to be seen together.
I'm not doin' a thing for the next couple of days and nights.
And, Sherry? Remember that old cooperation, dear.
Of course. A job's a job
You'll find I grow on you.
Who's gonna see us here?
I got my eye on you every minute.
I thought we'd have lunch at Romanoff's.
You can only eat so much, you know.
On your left, across the street... you will see the mansion of Jack Benny.
Oh, brother!
- Sensational, huh?
- It's a smash.
Don't bother seeing me to the door.
I could make it.
I asked for nothing,
I expected nothing and I got nothing.
What'd you expect for nothin'?
Okay, everybody, let's get this show on the road.
Mr. Drummond, do we have to do the love scene the very first shot?
Oh, we can't change the schedule now, Sherry.
I wanted to sort of work myself up to it.
Making love to that rube won't be easy.
Oh, you'll be fine, dear.
You're a trooper.
- Let's rehearse it!
- On the set, everybody!
The situation is a simple one.
Vince, you've just come home with great news about your promotion... but your wife is lying on the couch with a bad headache.
You're bursting with happiness... but when you see she isn't well, you're concerned for her.
You kiss her tenderly, and then tell her. Got it?
- Got it.
- Let's run through it.
Quiet on the set!
All right, Vince, come in.
Hey, honey, guess what?
I finally got that promotion.
What's the matter?
I guess it's one of those miserable headaches again.
- Did you take any aspirin?
- It doesn't seem to do any good.
Let me rub your temples.
Good. Now kiss her.
Gently!
No, Vince!
Let's try it again!
- How's your headache?
- I'm coming all unglued.
- You know how to float?
- No.
Come on. I'll teach you.
Come on.
There you go.
Lay your head back.
Move your arms.
Kick your feet.
There you go.
Okay, you're on your own.
- I wanna throw a party.
- For what?
To celebrate.
You don't like crazy music
You don't like rockin' bands
You just wanna go to a movie show
And sit there holdin' hands
You're so square
Baby, I don't care
You don't like hot rod racin'
Or drivin' late at night
You just wanna park where it's nice and dark
You just wanna hold me tight
You're so square
Baby, I don't care
You don't know any dance steps that are new
But no one else can love me like you do
Do, do, do
I don't know why my heart flips
I only know it does
I wonder why I love you, babe
I guess it's just because you're so square
Baby, I don't care
Baby, I don't care
I don't know why my heart flips
I only know it does
I wonder why I love you, babe
I guess it's just because you're so square
Baby, I don't care
Baby, I don't care
Baby, I don't care, care, care
I don't care, care, care
Gee, Vince, when you sing, it's really gonesville.
- All for you, honey.
- 'Bye.
I didn't see you applauding.
You didn't like me?
You've come a long way since cell block 21.
Yeah, and it's been a tough road to hoe.
I don't know. You hardly haven't touched the ground at all.
What do you mean?
You walked most of the way on other people.
You're just gettin' bitter, old buddy.
- Doll, where've you been?
- Right in your little heart.
You didn't say a thing about my outfit.
Flippy.
Real flippy.
I thought you'd never come back, Peg.
Every time I see you, you're working a neck.
I just been waitin' and wonderin'... if you missed me like I missed you.
There was always the telephone.
It would've been nice if you'd called.
I been up to my ears in work, Peg.
No foolin'.
I understand.
The real reason I came was about the record company.
Isn't it about time you cut a few sides?
Records?
Is that why you came back?
Nobody gets so big that they can ignore the records, Vince.
Not even you.
Sure, I'll make records.
You set up a date, huh?
Now if you'll excuse me,
I'll see that my guests are happy.
How do you like our movie star, Peggy?
He has adapted very quickly.
There's not much oxygen up where he is, and a man gets lightheaded.
Most actors, when they become stars... go through a brief period of being modest.
Not our boy.
He became a heel overnight.
What are you doin' here today, Peg?
I guess I like punishment.
You don't have to take it, you know.
I'll learn.
Sure.
You're too smart a gal to let him cut you up.
Sure I am.
- Where's Mr. Everett?
- He's over there.
Mr. Everett, may I speak to you?
I have startling news.
Mr. Everett, may I speak to you?
I have startling news.
Did you hit uranium?
I've just received a most impressive proposition from Geneva Records.
Ah, don't mention that clip joint to me.
Even though it involves three-quarters of a million dollars in capital gains?
- Mention it.
- They want to buy Laurel Records.
In addition to sale price, they want you in an exclusive contract for recordings.
For which they'll pay?
Seven and one half percent of all the records you sell.
No artist has ever received an offer that big.
What about Peggy?
I haven't discussed it with her.
Good. Let me talk to her.
You're due at the studio in a half hour to shoot that last scene.
Order up some booze so I can pour a few drinks for the crew.
Yes, your majesty.
These dogs don't get enough exercise.
They're gettin' fat and lazy.
- Why don't you hunt 'em?
- I got a better idea.
Take 'em for a walk.
What's the matter?
My contract says nothing about walkin' dogs.
Contract?
What contract?
Okay, I'll walk your dogs.
You know I ain't askin' you to shine my shoes or nothin'.
A man just takes so much, sonny.
Keep that in mind.
It's been a wonderful party.
Let's do it again.
- Thank you very much.
- Good-bye.
Vince, see you.
Take it easy.
Where've you been?
Almost everybody's gone.
- I missed a streetcar.
- Let me fix you a blast, huh?
You missed a swell party.
What is it that you wanted to talk about, Vince?
Oh, yeah.
See you fellas later.
- It's about the record company, Peg.
- Mush, you coyotes!
Who's buyin' the drinks?
What have you been doin' to these dogs?
I almost walked the feet off 'em.
I covered eight miles and four saloons.
What are you tryin' to prove, dad?
Well, you said to exercise 'em.
I was afraid the Indians would cut us off at the pass.
I don't see nothin' funny!
Vince, what about Laurel Records?
What is it?
We got an offer for the label.
It's too good to turn down.
- What kind of an offer?
- To sell out to Geneva Records.
Wait a minute.
Wait'll you hear the deal.
Seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars, a capital gain.
That's 225,000 in cold cash for you, after taxes.
But, Vince,
I don't wanna sell out.
You got no choice, kid.
I own...
I know. Sixty percent.
That's the way the mop flops.
You'd think I was tryin' to rob you.
You're getting practically a quarter of a million dollars!
Dollars!
Is that the beginning and the end of the world for you?
Is there no emotion left in you but the lust for money?
Emotion?
What emotion?
It's strictly business between you and me. You said that.
I don't care what I said.
We started this thing together.
We nursed it and brought it up, you and I.
It may be just a ledger page to you and Mr. Shores... but to me it's part of my life!
Go ahead and sell it!
I don't care what you do!
Nothin' but a record company.
It's not just the record company that's botherin' her.
Trampin' on me is one thing, sonny.
Hurtin' a little girl like Peggy is another.
Just don't you go gettin' no ideas, Hunk.
There comes a time when you gotta take a hand in things, and that time is now.
- Don't push me, Hunk.
- I'm gonna beat hell outta you.
Don't try.
You're talkin' crazy, man.
- You know you got it comin', son.
- I said, don't try!
Man, what's the matter with you?
Now stop it, Hunk!
Just stop it!
Stop it!
Get up and fight, you yellow punk!
I don't wanna fight you, Hunk.
I told you I don't wanna fight you!
There's your contract.
What's the matter?
What's the matter?
Somebody get an ambulance!
Get an ambulance!
Hurry up!
Well, it was a close call.
The blow hit him in the larynx, or Adam's apple... causing it to swell and cutting off his windpipe.
- We had to do a tracheotomy.
- What's that?
Cut a hole in his windpipe down here so that he could breathe.
Now, the big thing is his voice.
A blow like that can change the whole structure of the voice box.
- You mean, he might not be able to sing?
- That's right.
We'll have to wait a few days until the swelling goes down.
We'll see.
You can visit him in about 24 hours, but please don't let him talk.
How do you feel?
Can I get you anything?
Bottle of whiskey or somethin'?
I want you to know
I feel terrible, son.
I can't find the words to tell you how bad I do feel.
It was an awful thing I did.
If I could only take it back, I'd cut off both my arms up to the elbow.
I can't ask you to forgive me.
I want you to know
I'll never forget it.
Hi.
You look fine.
We talked to the surgeon... and he thinks the operation was a success.
Hunk told me what happened in the fight... and the fact that you wouldn't hit him.
I think it was wonderful, Vince.
It was an act of true love.
Yes, it was.
Don't be afraid to love, Vince... because I love you.
How's it look, Doc?
It looks just like last week,
Mr. Everett: Completely healed.
Doesn't feel too good.
Well, the injury is healed and the surgery was successful.
Your larynx looks as good as it ever did.
Whether or not your voice is the same can only be determined by trying it.
Sure.
Try it. Sayin' it's easy, but what if it's not there?
Look, Mr. Everett... these morbid fancies of yours are doing you no good.
Unless you get hold of yourself, you'll be a mute, musically speaking.
Give it a try.
Gotta find out sometime.
I don't know, Peg.
Well, now is as good a time as any.
I got nobody to play for me.
Come on in, fellas.
Yo, Vince, how you doin'?
- Let's go to work.
- Hi.
Pretty big audience.
Give a man stage fright.
Now, Vince.
Okay, but just with the piano.
- The rest of you guys...
- We'll wait in the other room.
- Doc, you better stay here, okay?
- All right.
You're so young
And beautiful
And I love you so
Your lips so red
Your eyes that shine
Shame the stars that glow
So fill these lonely
Arms of mine
And kiss me tenderly
Then you'll be
Forever young
And beautiful to me
You're so young
And beautiful
You're everything I love
Your angel smile
Your gentle touch
Are all I'm dreaming of
Oh, take this heart
I offer you
And never set me free
Then you'll be
Forever young
And beautiful to me
 My royal day can be a royal bore 
 it leaves me colder than a basement floor 
 the only moment
I keep waiting for 
 is when the day will be through 
 I never notice if it's dark or clear 
 what people say to me
I hardly hear 
 the passing hours are an endless year 
 until at last
I'm alone with you 
 every night at 7:00 
 you walk in as fresh as clover 
 and I begin to sigh all over again 
 every night at 7:00 
 you come by like may returning 
 and me, oh, my,
I start in yearning again 
 you seem to bring 
 faraway spring 
 near me 
 I'm always in full bloom... 
 When you're in the room 
 for every night at 7:00 
 every time the same thing happens 
 I fall once again in love 
 but only with you 
 Every night at 7:00 
 every time the same thing happens 
 I fall once again in love 
 but only with you 
May I say your performance was a bit ragged?
You were so slow going around the throne,
I almost caught you.
Well, the audience seemed to like it.
Whew! It's so hot in New York in the summertime.
I'm glad we're closing tomorrow night.
Wonder what happened to the air conditioning.
Mr. Hiller probably turned it off to save money.
Oh, would you blot my face, too?
Up here.
It's trickling.
And who's Mr. Hiller?
The house manager.
You ought to know that.
You've been playing his theater for the past year and a half.
Oh, is that that evil little man who comes around and pinches?
That's your department, sister dear.
All I can say is let Mr. Hiller keep his air conditioning.
He can't take it with him, and where he's going, he'll need it.
Ha ha.
Oh, boy, it's hot.
Say, if ever I play a king again,
I'm going to be one of those
Asiatic boys who just wears earrings and a sheet.
Hey, what's your hurry?
Pete.
Hi, Ellen honey.
I'm sorry to keep you waiting.
You know my brother Tom, don't you?
No, I don't believe
I've had the pleasure.
How are you?
I'm fine, sir, and thank you for asking.
I'll be out in 5.
Oh, my, Pete, you look so nice and cool.
Make yourself at home, won't you?
Sit down anywhere.
Oh, how was it, sir?
Hot.
Oh, your agent stopped by to see you, sir.
Irving? What brought him out this clammy night?
He didn't say. He just told me to tell you it was imperative that you and miss Ellen meet him at McGuffy's bar next door right after the performance.
Oh. Ellen.
Yeah.
Irving wants us to meet him at McGuffy's.
Ok. How'd you like Pete?
Isn't he cute?
He's from the south.
No.
Why, Ellen honey,
I never would've guessed it.
He owns miles and miles of tobacco land in Virginia, and you ought to hear him chant.
I met him 2 days ago at Hilda swan's house, and I'm simply mad about him.
Is that all?
That's all.
Roger.
Miss Ellen seems quite taken, doesn't she?
This will probably be one of those long affairs that drags on a whole weekend.
- Shh.
- The big news overseas concerns the royal wedding in London.
The British capital is already festive and happy in anticipation of the wedding, which is still several weeks off.
Shh. Shh.
Towel.
As for the Princess, the most closely guarded secret since radar is her wedding gown.
The Princess herself will see it for the first time this weekend.
Please, Mr. Bowen.
Chester, I...
In other news, in Miami, Florida, a new tropical hurricane seems to be approaching...
Can I talk now?
Yes, sir.
You know, Mr. Bowen,
I danced in Trafalgar square the day her grandfather was married.
Oh.
I'd give anything to be there again this fall, wouldn't you?
Yes. I like weddings, provided, of course, they're not mine.
Oh, marriages are very healthy, sir.
They say married men live much longer than bachelors.
If that's true, they're only trying to outlive their wives so they can be bachelors again.
Haven't you ever thought of getting married, sir?
Once, as a matter of fact,
I did.
The young lady changed her mind at the last moment.
I've been deeply indebted to her ever since.
Good night, Chester.
Gee, I wonder what Irving wants.
I hope it's something that...
My gosh, what a muscle.
It's like cement.
Oh, it's nothing.
All us tobacco men get kind of strong.
What from?
Lifting money.
Come now, it wasn't that good.
Good night, Eddie.
Good night.
Good night, Eddie.
Good night.
He's the only stage door man
I know who isn't called pop.
Hello, will.
Gee, it's been a long time.
Hi, Irv.
Oh, I couldn't wait for you back stage tonight.
What is with that heat over there? Who needs it?
So how was the show?
Well, the first act was a little...
Doll boat, how are you, baby?
Fine. How are you?
You look so sweet tonight.
Ooh, I do, don't I?
Ok, come on, order.
I got news, big news.
Oh, Irving, can I present Pete Cumberly?
Let's have it.
Well, how do you do,
Mr. Cumberly?
It's a great pleasure.
Thank you, sir.
That's very nice.
Who is this square?
Friend.
Tom Collins, please.
Nothing for me, thank you.
Hit me with a rot.
Shall I give it to you?
Well, come on.
What is it?
This'll kill you.
My brother Edgar called tonight from England.
He's the head of our London office.
Been there for years.
The Mayfair theatre people want your whole show for London.
No.
But quick. They want you there during the wedding season.
England during the wedding.
I like that.
Oh, Tommy.
Ellen honey, does this mean you'll be leaving me?
Oh, yes, Pete.
Isn't it wonderful?
When do we open?
As soon as possible.
Of course, you got to rehearse the English cast first.
Hit me, son.
What about transportation?
There's some French boat leaving a week from next Monday.
Which one?
Who knows what the name?
It's in French.
Don't worry.
I'll get you on it.
Ellen, this means we'll be saying good-bye in 10 days.
Oh, yes, Pete, and I'm so happy.
Ellen.
Oh, hello, dick.
I was waiting for you back stage.
That's why I'm late.
Ellen, who is this fella?
Finish your drink, Pete.
Did you hear the good news?
We're going to England, and we're going to be there during the wedding.
What are you doing here, sir?
What do you mean?
Who's he?
A friend.
What are you doing here, sir?
I demand an answer.
Go peddle your papers, will you? When do you leave?
That's an insult.
What's an insult?
What's the matter with you?
This is terribly embarrassing.
I forgot all about dick.
Hope they don't hurt each other.
I think we ought to start packing.
I have to buy all my new clothes before I go over.
You'll have time.
I'll send the rest of the company over the week after you leave.
I wonder what they'll be wearing.
I don't know. Pay the man, will you, Irving?
Yeah, sure.
How much do we owe you?
May I?
Yes, you may.
And keep the change.
I have a little business to take care of.
I'll meet you on deck.
Ok, sister dear.
Hello, Billy.
This is good-bye.
Thanks for coming down to see me off.
It's hard saying good-bye like this after all we've been to each other.
Oh, I know. It's been a lovely 3 days, but I'll be back soon.
Oh, dear, I must go now.
May I walk you up the gangplank?
I'd rather you wouldn't.
You understand?
No.
Well, it's just better that way.
Write to me, Billy.
I will.
Good-bye, Ellen.
I'll miss you very much, Linda.
I can tell you that knowing you these past few weeks has been one of the most exciting things that's ever happened to me.
To me, too, John.
Pete!
Ellen honey,
I thought I went to the wrong deck.
You haven't much time.
Really? And I had so much to say.
What?
Well, you're gonna be away...
Yes, I know, Pete, but what?
And suddenly knowing you're gonna be away makes me realize my feelings for you, so I thought I'd...
I mean... Ellen honey...
Visitors ashore, please.
You'll have to go now.
Good-bye.
But,
Ellen honey...
You better hurry. Write me what you had to say, huh?
I will.
Bye.
I can tell you,
Barbara, that knowing you these past few weeks has been one of the most exciting things that's ever happened to me.
Oh, I'll miss you,
John.
Good-bye, baby.
Good-bye, Irv.
I know you'll be a smash.
Now, if you want anything, you ask my brother Edgar.
He's gonna meet you at the hotel.
So long, Irv.
Bye.
So, listen, have a good time.
So long, Ellen.
So long.
Bye, honey. Bye.
See you soon.
So long.
See you.
Hey, who you waving at up there?
That girl right there, see?
That's my girl.
Don't give me that.
That's my girl.
Hey, hey.
I'm betting 8 to 5 on Dixie boy.
Wait a minute.
Wait a minute. This is...
Fellas, now look...
Ohh.
Poor Irv.
Hold it. Now listen...
What a beautiful, beautiful day.
Isn't it wonderful?
We don't know a soul on the boat, and we can have fun together for a change.
Yeah.
Good day.
Good day.
Oh, well, I don't know him, Tom.
Oh, ho ho.
Honest, I don't.
I want to write a letter.
Ok, baby. Don't forget, we've got to rehearse.
What time shall I meet you?
2:00 sharp in the gym.
I won't keep you long.
I'll be there.
Don't worry.
Now don't be late.
Ok.
Good day.
Good day.
There's carbon paper in the middle drawer if you want to make duplicates.
I'm not writing a letter.
I was just doodling, waiting for an opportunity to introduce myself.
Uh, my name is Brindale,
Lord John Brindale.
And what's yours?
Bowen, duchess Agatha Bowen.
Oh, no, no.
Really, what is it?
Let's see, now.
"E.B."
"E." is that Ethel?
Wait a minute.
Bowen. Why, of course.
You're Ellen Bowen, aren't you?
You're doing fine.
It's very stupid of me.
I should've known.
Why,
I only saw your show a few weeks ago.
Please forgive me.
Oh, that's all right.
I know you have a lot on your mind.
Oh, I can explain those 2 little episodes that you witnessed yesterday.
Oh, you can?
Yes.
Then go ahead.
Go ahead.
Well, you see...
They're both terribly nice girls, and they're both so fond of me that I... well,
I couldn't bear depriving either one of them.
You know how it is.
In order to be kind to people, one has to be a very, very good liar.
T-tell me, why were you following me?
Following you?
I was doing no such thing.
I was only saying good-bye to a couple of...
The same?
Yes.
Does this sort of thing happen to you very often?
All the time. And you?
Constantly.
I guess we're both
2 kind people.
Yeah.
I have to get a stamp.
Do you live in New York?
No. I've been there on business for some time, but I'm just going home now for the wedding.
The royal wedding?
Yes.
You're going to the wedding?
I'm escorting someone, yes.
You really are a lord, aren't you?
I'm afraid so.
My, my.
Haven't you ever met anyone who held a title before?
Only Joe Louis.
Do you know
I'm very glad that you're Ellen Bowen?
Why?
Because that means that chap you're with is your brother and not your husband.
Do you know what I did last night?
No. What?
I surveyed this whole boat, and I discovered that you were the most attractive girl on board.
Well, thank you.
And I kept thinking that
"what a pity it is she's married, because that's going to make things terribly awkward."
But it isn't going to be awkward at all now.
Thanks for the use of the hall, purser.
Not at all.
If you see my sister on deck, will you tell her
I'm waiting for her, please?
I will.
I like your boat.
Thank you, monsieur.
Oh, monsieur Bowen,
I have a favor to ask.
On every crossing, you know, we have a gala benefit for disabled seamen, and I was wondering if you and your sister would dance for us on that night.
Oh, we'd love to.
Just tell us when.
Just one number would be sufficient.
We don't want to ask...
No trouble at all.
I know it's an imposition to ask you two, but I would feel...
We'd love to.
Don't worry.
We'll do it.
There's a fella that won't take yes for an answer.
Oh, fine.
Thanks for showing up at rehearsals.
Oh. Oh, John, this is my brother Tom.
Tom, this is John.
How do you do?
Glad to know you.
I just picked up John in the writing room.
So I gathered.
He's a real lord.
Oh, it's nothing at all.
Miss Bowen.
Yes?
Cable.
Oh, thank you.
Excuse me, please.
Oh, Tom... Tom, it's from Pete.
Says he's very blue, except for his eye, which is black.
Uh, let's forget Pete for this trip, shall we?
Excuse us.
Looks a little grim out there.
Yeah.
It does.
Monsieur Bowen,
I'm wondering if you and your sister will dance right away instead of waiting until 10:30.
We're a little afraid of the weather.
You mean, it might be a little... rocky?
Yes.
That won't bother us.
We can handle it.
Thank you, monsieur.
Any time you say.
I better change my dress.
 Open your eyes 
 there's a sapphire sky above us 
 high above us 
 made for you 
 when you open your eyes 
 open your eyes 
 there's a carpet of Jade around us 
 laid around us 
 all for you 
 when you open your eyes 
 let me show you the sights 
 take you 
 on a tour of this great, new 
 fabulous world we own 
 we alone 
 so open your eyes 
 and you'll see how this momentary 
 ordinary 
 night can seem 
 more unreal than a dream 
We can handle it, all right.
What do we do now?
Keep your balance.
Oh, sure.
Unh.
So sorry.
Pardon us.
What?
Isn't it wonderful,
Tommy?
It sure is.
Hello? Yes? Oh, sure.
Yes. Do come on up.
Room 211, 12, and 14.
Ok.
Who was that?
Edgar Klinger,
Irving's brother.
He's coming up.
I'm so happy, Tommy.
I wonder what the Princess is doing this morning.
Why don't you call her and ask her?
Wonder what I'd be doing a month before my wedding.
Probably trying to figure a way to get out of it.
Do you really think so?
You know you would, and so would I.
How do you do?
I'm Edgar Klinger.
Oh.
We didn't know...
That Irving and I were twins?
No, we didn't.
Oh, I must say, he should have told you, you know.
After all, this is a pretty box of pickles.
May I come in?
Well, of course.
I'm sorry.
How do you do?
So happy to meet you at long last.
My, it's amazing.
Yes, it is rather, isn't it?
I do hope the rooms are satisfactory.
Oh, they're fine.
It's a miracle you could get them.
Yes, quite. The wedding has packed things up a bit, but, uh, then there are ways.
How's everything in the theater?
Oh, seems to be humming.
The dancers are coming to audition this afternoon, the singers tomorrow.
Excuse me.
Hello.
Oh, hello, Johnny.
How are you?
- John Brindale.
- Do you know him?
Know the family.
Very old.
They do say that young John is a bit of a chaser.
Didn't have to chase very hard after Ellen.
She stood still and waited.
This afternoon?
No, they're auditioning all day.
Just a minute.
Tom, you don't need me this afternoon, do you?
John wants me to drive down and see his old country home.
I suppose it's all right, but I should think you'd want to come along and see who you're working with.
Well, I never notice anyone but you.
John, I...
I want you home for dinner.
And no dates at night until after we open.
You'll come strolling in at 4:00 in the morning and be all tired out next day.
Yes, papa. All set.
What time will you pick me up?
Ok. I'll be ready.
Bye, John.
Shall we?
Yeah. See you at 7:00.
And be back.
Oh, I will.
I will.
Cheerio.
Good-bye,
Edgar.
Oh, and if there's anything you need, do call.
Thank you.
After you.
Tell me, old boy, how are things in the colonies these days?
Oh, fine. Fine.
These English clothes are terrific.
Frightfully amusing tie, what?
Yeah.
Got a match?
Thanks. I hear that shaving lotion's great stuff.
Did you ever use it?
Oh, every day.
Sorry. I thought you were him.
How odd. Thank you.
Well, I must get back to the office.
You know where the theater is, don't you? Sure.
Well, I'll see you later.
Cheerio.
Ok.
Hello again.
I wish you'd stop following me.
Following you?
I'm not a bit flattered.
Mr. Bowen. I'm Charles Gordon, your stage manager.
Oh, it's nice to see you.
Everything's ready, sir.
Oh, good. See that girl in the green dress near the end, changing her shoes?
Yes, sir.
Let's begin with her.
They can each show me a few steps.
Very good, sir.
Your name, please?
Anne Ashmond.
Thank you. Will you begin, please?
Why, yes.
Miss Anne Ashmond.
Will you try a few steps with me, please?
Oh, dear.
Can't you dance with a partner?
Well, I could till a moment ago.
Well, try.
We'll take something easy to start.
May I have a pickup, please?
You should've seen the expression on your face when you saw me.
How did I look?
As if I were a dentist.
You dance very well.
Thank you.
I think you'll do fine.
Will I really?
Sure.
It's very nice of you not to hold what happened against me.
I do a little bit.
Well, what can I do?
You can have dinner with me some night.
Well, I should love to.
How about tonight?
Well, I don't know.
I, uh...
She'll do fine.
Pick you up at 8:00.
Thank you. Who's next?
Is it much further?
No. We're almost there.
My, you look pretty.
I know. What do you have to do at the house?
Get the wedding present.
We sold practically everything at auction, except for one set of China plates.
I was supposed to get those when I got married.
Seeing there's precious little chance of that, we decided to hand them on to the prince and Princess.
Why is there precious little chance?
Oh, I don't know.
I think you have to enjoy living with yourself before you have nerve to ask anyone else to.
Besides, you know how I am.
Oh, here we are.
John, it's beautiful.
Yes, it was.
I think they're in here.
Oh, what a wonderful floor to dance on.
Yes.
How long since anyone's lived here, John?
Oh, about 5 years.
No one can afford places like this today.
I imagine you miss it terribly.
No, I don't think
I do anymore.
I just don't have anything to replace it with.
I say, what time do you have to be back?
7:00 sharp.
Oh, I wish you could have dinner with me.
I don't know when I'll get another free evening.
There's some sort of party every night from now on.
Can't you?
I don't know.
You know how Tom is.
Will you try?
Yes, I'll try.
Good.
Hello.
Hi. Back on time.
How was the afternoon?
Oh, it was wonderful.
How were your dancers?
Dancers.
What do you want to do tonight?
Oh, I'm kind of tired,
Ellie.
I thought
I'd just skip dinner and go straight to bed.
Would you mind?
Oh, no, no.
It's a good idea.
That country air really knocks me out.
Yeah.
Sure you don't mind?
Oh, gosh, no.
As a matter of fact,
I think
I'll turn in right now, if it's all right with you?
It's a good idea.
Yeah.
It's been a kind of a rough day.
Yeah.
Good night, honey.
Good night, Tommy.
Sweet dreams.
Taxi, please.
Thank you.
Taxi.
Thank you.
Ha ha ha ha ha.
More coffee?
Thank you.
Yes, Ellie and I have done quite a few shows together.
Do you like to dance?
Yes, yes.
It's hard work, but it's fun.
What made you decide to dance?
Oh, a very silly reason.
How silly?
Well, when I was 11,
I fell in love for the first time with a boy much older.
Mm-mmm. 13.
His name was Alonzo, and I was so happy that suddenly all I wanted to do was to dance, so I figured that if I danced when I was happy,
I should be happy if I danced.
Is that silly enough?
I think so.
I felt so good about Alonzo
I used to close my eyes and pretend I could dance all over the floor, walls, even the ceiling.
If you ever learn to do that,
I can get you a very good booking.
You want anything else?
No.
Let's go.
You better not take me home.
Why not?
It's a long way, and besides, this is Friday.
And Friday I have to stop and see my father.
Oh, I'd like to meet him.
Cabby!
All right.
Uh, what's the address?
150 Mitchell street.
Cabby, could you take us to 150 Mitchell street?
Love to, governor.
Love to.
Wait, will you please, driver?
Love to, governor, love to.
See? That's my father.
He's the proprietor.
Oh?
Oh, dear. I do hope he won't offend you.
He's quite impossible, really.
He and my mum have been separated for 3 years, and I have to stop here every Friday and get her money.
Why doesn't your mother do it?
They're not speaking to each other.
So I says to him
"McBride, every time you get 4 drinks
"under that belt of yours,
"you become a bloomin' nuisance.
"And what's more, every time you fall down, you chip a piece out of the bar with your chin."
So I says,
"from now on..."
Annie! Well, my little girl, how are you, dear?
Hello, Jamie.
Tom, this is my father.
Father, this is Tom Bowen.
Glad to know you,
Mr. Ashmond.
Pleased to meet you, sir.
To the royal couple.
Bowen, eh?
I used to know a Willy Bowen.
Good old Willy.
Married a girl we used to know named Gladys Oxley.
I don't think you knew Gladys, Annie.
Very happy they were for years.
Then one night, good old Willy threw her right out of the window.
Nobody knows why.
But I always figured that they must've had an argument.
I don't suppose you'd be any relation.
Why, no. I don't believe I have any relatives over here.
Over here?
I'm from America.
America?!
Get out of my pub!
Leave the premises!
I'm not on speaking terms with the United States!
Jamie!
How dare you bring another yank to my tavern!
Out, do you hear?
Out!
Wait. What's the matter with the United States?
Matter? You owe me money, you do.
Where is it?
Here, look at this.
2.10 run up by your bloomin' soldiers, and what do they do?
Upped it!
Walked out without payin'!
I'll not serve you a drink, sir.
Now stop it,
Jamie.
To the royal couple.
Well, I can't allow
Anglo-American relations to be threatened like this.
I'd like to square that bill.
Tom, you shouldn't.
Oh, sure. How much is that? 2.10?
There you are, sir.
Now there's a gentleman for you.
Not at all like that other yank you're so fond of.
Yes. Now, you can just add
10 Bob to that and give it to me for mother.
Has she found out when we go to the palace yet?
Or is she keepin' it from me?
3.00, Jamie.
You see, we sent a little token to the Royal Highnesses for the weddin', and accordin' to the papers, anybody who did are allowed to see the weddin' presents.
That's a nice custom.
3.00, Jamie.
Oh, all right. Here.
What you countin' for?
Don't you trust me?
Just like her mother...
No faith.
You're 5 shillings short.
Oh? That's what you might call a typographical error.
Here.
Thank you.
We'd better go.
Good night, Jamie.
Good night, dearie.
Good night, pal.
Good night, buddy.
To the royal couple.
Thanks.
Looks like mother is still up.
Ever since she and
Jamie separated, she can never get to sleep till I get home.
Let's walk a minute and get some nice fresh fog.
Who, uh...
Who's the yank you're so fond of?
Hal Rayton.
He's my fianc.
You don't sound very happy about it.
Oh, I am, really.
Is it a secret?
No. Well, this is ridiculous.
He's in Chicago.
Illinois?
He lives there.
And you live here?
Yes.
If you keep that arrangement after your marriage, you'll be very happy.
How long since you've seen him?
Oh, about 2 years.
2 years?
And you're still in love with him?
Well, I've never thought of not being.
Do you hear from him very often?
Every few days, as a rule.
Oh?
Actually, I haven't heard from him for 2 months now, but he's probably been busy.
I wrote to him tonight and told him
I was in your show and asked him to call me opening night.
I assume you have some plans about getting together in the future.
Oh, yes.
Are you going over there, is he coming over here, or are you going to meet in the middle?
You see, he works in
Ogilvy's department store in Chicago.
Oh? Well?
As soon as he makes enough to send for me...
Or I make enough to go over there, we're going to be married.
That's fine.
You... you don't mind, do you?
Mind what?
My getting married,
I mean.
I should love to go out with you again.
I had an awfully good time.
So did I.
Of course,
I don't mind.
Actually, I'm kind of glad you're all tied up.
Now we can go out and have fun without any pressure, can't we?
Yes...
I guess so.
Good night, Anne.
Good night, Tom.
Yes, this is New York.
We have him on the line.
Mr. Irving Klinger, we're ready with
Mr. Edgar Klinger in London.
Go ahead, please.
Hello, ed?
This is Irv!
How are you, Twinsey?
Buzzing, old boy.
Simply buzzing.
I got a fast note by air mail from
Tombo this morning.
He says everything is terrif.
Oh, well, that is good news.
Tell me, have you heard from Tom?
No. How are things?
Oh, absolutely superb.
I think we shall have a fantastic opening night tomorrow night.
What about Ellen?
Tom having trouble keeping her caged up at night?
Oh, no. Quite the contrary.
She's been frightfully conscientious.
Goes straight home from the theater each night.
Tom's the one who's been romping about.
Tom? No kidding?
What'd he do, catch himself a chick?
No, no, no.
Tom's quite well.
He's taken a fancy to some girl in the show.
Pretty little thing she is, too.
Hey, Eddie, what
I called you about...
Call me after the opening, will you?
That light in the window's gonna be me sitting and waiting.
I will, old boy.
Don't give it a second thought.
Oh, by the by, how's the mater?
Oh, mom's fine.
Oh, splendid.
Do give her a peck on the cheek for me.
I got you.
Dig you tomorrow night.
Pip now.
"Pip now"?
"Dig you"?
What's all the commotion about down there?
It's some regiment that hasn't paraded its finery in years.
Gosh, you can just feel the excitement growing, can't you?
After all, the wedding's only a week off.
I wonder what the groom is doing this morning.
Why don't you call him and ask him?
Very funny.
I thought it was.
What time did you get in last night, lover boy?
Oh, around 11:00,
I guess.
I don't know.
I didn't pay much attention.
Well, I did.
It was around 2:00.
My, you're a busy little man these
P.M.S, aren't you?
We were just having a few laughs.
Just a few laughs.
That's all.
Ha.
Come in.
Morning.
Why, Johnny, what a pleasant surprise.
How are you?
Fine.
Hi, John.
Hello, Tom.
I thought this was as good a place as any to see the parade.
Oh, we have a sensational view.
Oh, before I forget...
Your ticket for the opening.
Second row, right on the aisle.
Wonderful.
Thanks very much.
What time is the parade?
It should pass here any minute.
I say, Ellen, wonderful seeing you again.
How's the show going?
Oh, just fine.
It's been a long time.
I know. 4 days.
Look, tomorrow night after the opening,
Edgar's giving a party.
You're going with me, ok?
Ok. It'll take a little doing, though.
Why?
There's a huge affair being given, and I'm supposed to take someone.
But you can get out of it, can't you?
This is my opening night.
Besides, if you don't take me, nobody will.
I haven't been out with a soul but you since I got here.
I'll get out of it.
You're looking so well these days.
Thank you.
I think about you so much.
I think about you, Ellen.
What?
I said, I think about you.
It's so different from anything I've ever felt before.
How?
Well, first of all,
I'm not interested in anybody or anything I do, and that's completely new for me.
Hmm?
I say, that's completely new for me.
Ellen, I think that this is getting very serious.
What a parade.
I've never seen anything like it in my life.
Parade?
Oh, is it over?
I'll tell them to come back.
Ignore him, Johnny.
I'm so excited about tomorrow night.
Come on, girl.
We're due at the theater
5 minutes ago.
In a minute.
Do you realize we've only been out at night together about 3 times since
I've been here?
Well...
Come on, come on.
Just a minute.
What's that you're playing, Tom?
The song she's supposed to be rehearsing at the theater now.
Well, why don't you rehearse it here?
Oh, that's a good idea.
Is that all right with you, Tommy?
All right.
 I wake up and sigh each morning 
 happy the night's gone by 
 I wake up and pray each morning 
 pray that the day will fly 
 and then I sit back and smile 
 and dream of that day 
 when I'll be standing by your side, my love 
 the happiest day of my life 
 how my heart will swell with pride, my love 
 the happiest day in a lifetime 
 then as the last words are spoken 
 the bells in the steeple will chime 
 and I will love you so 
 and you will see 
 it will be 
 for a lifetime 
Hold it.
Hold it, please.
Charlie, what time is it?
Uh, it's 4 A.M., sir.
Well, that's enough.
All right, everybody.
That'll be all for tonight.
I'm sorry to keep you working so late.
What about our last 2 numbers?
We don't have to rehearse those.
You were fine on them this afternoon.
Yeah,
I thought so, too.
Show looks pretty good, doesn't it?
Not bad.
Anne?
Yes?
Excuse me.
Don't forget tomorrow night.
The opening?
How could I?
Oh, yes, do try to make that.
We'd love to have you.
No, I meant afterwards.
Edgar's giving a party.
We'll go together.
Oh, Tom, I can't.
You can't?
Why not?
Hal is calling me.
That's right.
I forgot all about him.
Well, it doesn't matter.
I wouldn't bother, except I haven't heard from him in such a long time now, and I do have to talk to him.
Taking the bus home tonight, Anne?
I'll be right with you.
I'm sorry, Tom.
That's all right.
It's all right.
What time tomorrow, sir?
3:00 for the company.
Yes, sir.
What for, Tom?
I wanna take those 2 numbers we didn't do tonight.
I thought you were satisfied with them.
There's still a few rough spots.
Say, what happened to you?
Did you get stood up?
What are you talking about?
My, what a manic-depressive life you lead.
It's going to be a marvelous party tomorrow night.
I'm going with John.
Who are you taking?
 Every night at 7:00 
 dum bum bum Dee um... 
 Da da dum da Dee 
 dum de dum dum... 
Where's the key?
You have it.
I have not.
I gave it to you.
I suppose I'll have to go all the way down to the desk...
See? If you think nice things, all doors open to you.
Is that your message for the day?
Flowers! For me?
I wonder who they're from.
Not from me.
Well, that I know.
Who?
It's from John.
He can't make the opening.
He can't?
My, what a shame.
I had a feeling this morning he wasn't gonna be able to make it, but he just didn't know how to tell me.
Now, isn't that terrible?
Now, isn't that terrible?
He's weak, and I just hate weak people!
Yes, dear,
I know you do.
Up one minute, down the next.
What a manic-depressive life you lead.
Oh, all right, all right.
So we're even.
Who are you going with tomorrow night?
I don't know.
Well, why don't you take me?
I think we should go together anyway, don't you?
After all, we're the stars of the show.
Yes, I think we should.
Miss Bowen, may I escort you to Klinger's clambake tomorrow night?
Why, I'd be delighted!
And what a surprise you're askin' me!
Oh, Tommy, let's be terrific tomorrow night.
We'll be cosmic.
Stupendous!
A smash! We hope.
And, Ellen, don't forget...
That's still the most important thing.
Yes, Tommy...
I know it is.
Good night.
Good night.
Oh, yeah, yeah!
You listen to me just once!
Oh, sure, sure!
I told you a million times.
You never wanna listen to me.
So I said it, so you heard it, so you're mad.
So what?
So this...
It's the last time
I ever go to a party with you!
Will you put that in writin'?
You're always makin' cracks, makin' cracks!
Like what?
You always humilate me, humilate me.
Didn't your mother never teach ya no manners?
I ain't never had no mother.
We was too poor.
Say, what's the matter with you lately?
You used to tell me you loved me.
You used to treat me like a high-class dame.
Well, usen't ya?
So I used.
There. So you admit it.
I ain't admittin' nothin'!
I'll give ya one more chance.
Do you love me or don't ya?
No, I don't!
Quit stallin'!
I want a direct answer.
Oh...
Listen, kid, there's one thing about you
I can't understand...
 How could you believe me 
 when I said
I loved you 
 when you know
I've been a liar all my life? 
 You've had that reputation since you was a youth 
 you must've been insane 
 to think I'd tell you the truth 
 how could
I believe you 
 when you said we'd marry? 
 Why, you know
I'd rather hang than have a wife 
 I know I said
I'd make you mine 
 now wouldn't youse know that
I would go 
 for that old line 
 how could you believe me 
 when I said
I loved you 
 when you know
I've been a liar 
 you sure have been a liar 
 a double-crossin' liar 
 a double-crossin' liar 
 all my doggone cheatin' life? 
 You said you would love me long 
So what?
 And never would do me wrong 
Stop bending the suit!
 Faithful you'd always be 
Me?
 Why, baby, you must be loony 
 to trust a lower-than-low two-timer like me 
 you said I'd have everything 
Get her.
 A beautiful diamond ring 
Ha ha ha.
 A bungalow by the sea 
A bungalow yet.
 You're really naive to ever believe 
 a full-of-baloney phony like me 
Boy, I sure must've lost my head.
You ain't lost nothin' you never had.
 What about the time you went to Indiana? 
 I was lyin' 
 I was down in Ala... bam 
 you said you had some business 
 you had to complete 
 what I was doin' 
 I would be a cad to repeat 
 what about the evenin's you was with your mother? 
 I was rompin' with another honey lamb 
 to think you swore our love was real 
 baby, leave us not forget that
I'm a heel 
 how could I believe you when you said you loved me? 
 When you know
I've been a liar 
 a good-for-nothin' liar 
 all my good-for-nothin' life 
Hey!
Yee-hoo!
Hey!
Hey!
Ooh!
Ow! Ooh!
 You know you've been a liar 
 I know I've been a liar 
 a double-crossin' liar 
 a double-crossin' liar 
 all your good-for-nothin' life 
Johnny!
Darling,
I just had to come.
I just had to.
Who's that with Ellen?
Oh, I'm so glad.
The chap with the accent.
Who?
Yes.
Him?
Ah.
Brindale.
They've become very good friends.
Oh, yes.
Don't you think we should be getting over to Edgar's?
Later, Johnny.
Tonight's my night, and tonight I want to be alone with you.
When you didn't show up at the opening,
I didn't even feel like going on.
How'd you get away from your party?
Oh, I just walked out.
I couldn't stand not being with you tonight.
Ellen...
Ellen, I think we're in love.
Yes, darling.
I know.
Well, what are we going to do about it?
Nothing.
Well, we can't go on in this indefinite state.
Well, aren't you happy?
Oh, you know I am.
So am I.
Let's not kill it with improvements, huh?
But... something might happen.
Like what?
Well, someday you might look over my shoulder and see someone else.
Someone else?
Yes.
 Too late now to forget your smile 
 the way we cling when we've danced a while 
 too late now to forget and go on 
 to someone new 
 too late now to forget your voice 
 the way one word makes my heart rejoice 
 too late now to imagine myself 
 away from you 
 all the things we've done together 
 I relive when we're apart 
 all the tender fun together 
 stays on in my heart 
 how could I ever close the door 
 and be the same as I was before? 
 Darling, no, no,
I can't anymore 
 it's too 
 late 
 now 
Does Tom know how you feel?
Oh, goodness, no.
Do you think he'd mind?
Well, I imagine if he ever found out, he'd get us a booking someplace in South Africa just to get me away from you.
Would you forget about me in South Africa?
But how could I?
 All the things we've done together 
 I relive when we're apart 
 all the tender fun together 
 stays on in my heart 
 how could I ever close the door 
 and be the same as I was before? 
 Darling, no 
 no, I can't anymore 
 it's too late 
 now 
Who is it?
It's me, Jamie. Tom.
Tommy, me boy, come in.
Are you all closed up for the night?
Well, it's after 2:00.
But I'd never close for you, Tommy boy.
Thanks.
The show went well, eh?
Oh, fine, fine.
I didn't feel like going home straight after the party, so I thought
I'd stop by and say hello.
Well, you're just in time.
It was announced we go to see the presents on Monday.
I was just about to try on me suit for the palace.
I'll slip into it, you have a look, then you can tell me what you think, eh?
Sure.
Oh, uh, by the way, isn't this Anne's night to visit you?
Yeah, she was by about an hour ago, picked up her money, and stole away like a pickpocket.
Did her call come through from Chicago?
No, the bloomin' blighter never called.
She must be upset.
Well, I couldn't say.
I don't know how Annie feels about anything.
She's not an easy one to get to know.
Very quiet she is, but deep.
At least I hope she is deep.
Or else she's wasting a lot of her time being quiet.
Well, brace yourself.
What do you think?
Do I look like a gentleman?
Jamie, you look like a banker.
But do I look like a gentleman?
It's written all over you.
I got it this afternoon from Percy Monroe.
Last year when he got pneumonia, they bought it for him to be buried in.
But he recovered.
Well, my only advice is...
If you meet the royal family...
I wouldn't bow too low.
Remember, this is a wedding, not a coming-out party.
I see what you mean.
I'll watch it.
Are you excited?
Excited, no.
I'm just scared.
Why?
Nervous and scared.
It's meetin' the old crow again.
I haven't clapped eyes on her in 3 years.
I know.
It's funny, but if it wasn't for this royal wedding, probably I'd never have crossed her path again.
On Monday I'll call for you, take you down to meet her.
I'll give you moral support.
Now, that's nice of you,
Tommy.
Unusually nice of you.
You're a good man, you are.
I don't know what Annie is doing waiting for this knucklehead in Chicago when she knows a fella like you right here in town.
That's love, Jamie.
What about you?
Do I look like the settling-down kind?
Come on. Let me out.
Hup...
I'll do the bending.
I'm dressed for it.
Thank you, Tommy.
Good night, buddy.
Good night, fella.
 Everywhere that beauty goes you are 
 everywhere an orchid grows you are 
 everything that's young and gay 
 brighter than a holiday 
 everywhere the angels play 
 you are 
 you're like Paris in April and may 
 you're New York on a silvery day 
 a Swiss alp as the sun grows fainter 
 you're loch lomond when Autumn is the painter 
 you're moonlight on a night in Capri 
 and Cape Cod looking out at the sea 
 you're all places that leave me breathless 
 and no wonder 
 you're all the world to me 
 Every night at 7:00 
 dum-da-dum 
Come in!
Oh, morning.
Oh, hello,
Edgar.
Absolutely fantastic notices, every one!
You can stay on for years.
Have you seen the dailies?
Rather!
Oh, we're so thrilled.
There's been an 8-week call at the libraries.
There's been a what at the what?
The libraries, old boy.
That's what we call our ticket brokers.
They want blocks of seats,
8 weeks in advance.
Why didn't you say so?
Oh, Tom, do you see the one where they say we're brilliant?
Where?
Oh, Edgar, have you called Irving yet?
I'm off to the office now.
I'll take it in my room.
Edgar, sit down a second, will ya?
I want you to do a favor for me.
Oh, at your command, old boy.
Look, when you call Irving, ask him to find out what happened to a boy who used to work at
Ogilvy's department store in Chicago.
His name is, uh, Hal Rayton.
I've written it all down.
Oh, right you are.
Will you do that?
And, uh, don't say anything to anybody about it, will ya?
It shall be graveyard, old boy, graveyard.
Cheerio.
All right.
Thanks.
This is New York.
We're ready, London.
Mr. Irving Klinger is on the line.
Hello, hello!
Irving there?
Edgar here.
Hey, Eddie, so how are things?
Buzzing right along.
A smash, huh?
So how were the notices?
Wizard, old boy, wizard!
That bad, huh?
No, no, no, no.
Wizard.
Wiz-ard!
Oh, wiz...
Yes.
Now, look, Tom wants you to follow up on a chap named Hal Rayton.
R-a-y-t-o-n.
Hal Rayton, huh?
What does he do, a single?
No, Mr. Rayton is not in the theatrical profession.
He ain't in the theater, so who needs him?
Oh, it's a personal matter of Tom's.
Now, when last heard from,
Mr. Rayton was employed at Ogilvy's department store in Chicago.
Ogilvy's. Dig ya.
I'll throw the hassle to our Chicago branch, have the whole mess in your lap in a fast 2 days.
Oh, no, no. That won't be necessary.
Just follow up on the Rayton matter and let us know.
Natch. I just said...
Pip, now.
Oh, uh, yes, um...
Uh, dig... you!
Oh! There's Jamie for you.
Wouldn't you know he'd be late, even to the palace!
Now, take it easy, mother.
Maybe the traffic was heavy.
Oh, it's not the traffic.
It's Jamie.
Ever since I told him
I don't like to be kept waiting, he's been keeping me waiting.
You know, mother, there's an old Spanish proverb which goes,
"he who does not love the faults of his loved one does not love at all."
Hmm. That may be well and good for the Spanish, but I'm English.
You know what I think?
No, dearie.
I think he's all excited about seeing you.
You think so?
Mm-hmm.
How do I look?
As elegant as can be.
Tommy, tell him he's going too fast.
Driver, could you slow down a little?
Yes, sir.
What say we step off and have a quick one?
To the health of the royal couple, eh?
Sit back, Jamie. We're not stopping anywhere.
Well, tell him to go a little slower.
He can't go any slower.
Don't be so nervous.
And when you see her, be sure and act like the gentleman you look like.
I will, but if she says one word of criticism,
I'll hit her on the head with this cap.
You'll do nothing of the kind.
Here we are.
Stop here, driver.
We'll walk the rest of the way.
Come on now. Don't lose your nerve. Get in there.
Go on.
Hello, Jamie.
Good day, Sarah.
Jamie, your suit's handsome.
Handsome.
Thank you.
I'm, uh,
I'm sorry I'm late.
The traffic was heavy today.
I told the cabby to go as fast as he could.
Shall we go?
Ohh...
Allow me.
Jamie, don't.
I knew they'd hold.
There are some days when you can do nothing wrong.
Do you think they'll stay together?
Sure.
I hope so.
For them as well as for me.
I could never have left mother alone.
Now you can get married and forget about her.
Yes.
Yeah?
Good evening.
Edgar.
I have the information you requested regarding
Mr. Rayton.
Ohh, what?
Well, it's nothing terribly exciting.
Mr. Rayton still works at Ogilvy's.
He's still in the luggage department.
He used to live in Chicago proper, but not long ago he and his wife moved to Evanston.
His wife?!
Why, yes, he was married several months ago.
My, my, my.
I say, who is this chap anyway?
Oh, uh, he was engaged to a girl in the show.
I was just finding out about him for her.
Oh, I say, that's frightful!
Yes, isn't it?
Well, what are you so pleased about?
I always smile when I'm heartbroken.
I better tell her.
Oh, not now.
Don't you think you should wait till after the performance?
It would seem kinder.
Maybe you're right.
Edgar, you're a real pal.
I'd stick up for you anytime.
Well, thanks, old chap.
That's frightfully decent of you to say.
Well, if you'll excuse me.
Oh! I shall be around to pick you up early tomorrow morning.
What's tomorrow?
Ahh.
Why, the royal wedding.
And I shall take you someplace where you'll see all the pageantry.
Great.
- Second act, Mr. Bowen.
- Right.
 I left my hat 
 in Haiti 
 in some forgotten flat in Haiti 
 I couldn't tell you how I got there 
 I only know it was so 
 hot there 
 she took my hat 
 politely 
 and wound her arms around me tightly 
 but I remember nothing clearly 
 except the flame when she came near me 
 her eyes 
 had the fire of surrender 
 and her touch, it was tender 
 and I guess in a moment as that 
 you forget about your hat 
 so if you go to Haiti 
 there is a girl I know in Haiti 
 if you can find her 
 you'll adore her 
 just look around till you've found 
 someone who has a blue-gray fedora 
 I think of that gorgeous creature 
 when I'm all alone 
 whenever I do, from down inside there comes 
 a groan 
 that son of a gun in Haiti 
 has got the prettiest hat I own 
 and when it's bleak and chilly 
 and life is flat 
 I think of that Haitian dilly 
 and think
I better go get my hat 
 I left my hat 
 in Haiti 
 in some forgotten flat in Haiti 
 I couldn't tell you how I got there 
 I only know it was so 
 hot there 
 But I remember nothing clearly 
 except the flame when she came near me 
 her eyes 
 had the fire of surrender 
 and her touch, it was tender 
 and I guess in a moment as that 
 you forget about your hat 
 so if you go to Haiti 
 there is a girl I know in Haiti 
 if you can find her, you'll adore her 
 just look around till you've found 
 someone who has a blue-gray fedora 
Ellen.
Ellen.
Got anybody to take you home?
Good.
Good night,
Mr. Bowen.
Good night.
Anne, I've something to tell you.
Yes.
I hope you won't think
I've butted in where I shouldn't have, but...
Jamie told me your friend didn't call.
Oh.
I didn't ask.
He told me.
I don't quite know why I did it, but I decided to try and find out what happened to him.
Did you?
Yes, I did.
Well?
Anne.
He's married.
Married?
I'm sorry.
How wonderful.
How simply wonderful.
Oh, Tom, thank you.
Oh, it was nothing.
Anne...
Here I've been worrying myself to death over him on account of you, and he's been married all the time.
Isn't it wonderful?
What do you mean, on account of me?
Well, on account of me being in love with you and you being in love with me.
I'm in love with you?
Well, aren't you?
Yeah.
What a mess.
Why?
The next thing that happens, we'll be thinking about getting married.
I'm thinking about it right now.
There. You see?
Well, don't you want to marry me?
Yes, I do.
Anne, it isn't you.
It's marriage.
I'm afraid
I couldn't be married and make a go of it.
I've been living one way too long.
For me, it's always been work.
Everything else has just been a side issue.
It isn't because
I don't want to.
It's just that I...
I don't know if I could change.
Anne...
I know I'd be an awful flop as a husband.
Do you understand?
I think I do, Tom.
What do we do?
Perhaps you better take me home.
Tom...
I only disagree with one thing.
What's that?
I think you'd make a marvelous husband.
You do?
Yes, I do, Tom.
Hi.
Hi.
You're back early.
It isn't early.
I thought it was.
Well, it isn't.
It's late.
Is it?
Hmm?
I didn't say anything.
Tom, John wants to marry me.
He does?
That's funny.
Well, it might be to you, but it's terribly serious to him.
He's very much in love with me, and he said he's found a new faith in everything all on account of me.
How do you feel?
Well... very constructive.
I never thought
I'd live to see the day you'd inspire anybody to do anything but slug it out.
All right, go ahead, make fun of me.
I'm sorry, Ellie.
You really are involved this time, aren't you?
Up to here.
What are you gonna do?
I don't know.
I was rather hoping you'd make up my mind for me like you usually do.
It sure is funny.
Why do you keep saying that when it isn't funny at all?!
It's very important.
I know it is.
I only meant it's funny because...
Anne wants me to marry her.
She does?
My gosh.
It sure is funny, isn't it?
Why?
Well, I don't know.
It's just funny, that's all.
Now, what's so funny about someone wanting to marry me?
I have a few good points, you know.
Tommy, are you really in love with her?
Up to here.
Oh, my.
Well...
I wonder what would happen if we just threw over all our principles and went ahead and got married anyway.
You'd stay here in England with John...
Why would I stay here?
You can't go traipsing all over the world and leave your husband at home.
What kind of a marriage would that be?
No, I...
I suppose not.
Well...
Well, what would you do?
I'd marry Anne...
No, no, I mean who would you dance with?
Well, I never thought of that.
Not having you,
I might try Anne if she wants to.
She loves to dance and shows a lot of promise.
Do you really think so?
Yeah.
I thought she was a little awkward myself.
So were you when you started.
Well, I know it, but it takes years to build a good team.
You've always said that.
And there's a lot of excitement in doing it.
Well, it just isn't fair, Tom.
What isn't?
What?
I'm getting the short end of the stick.
You want me to settle back and get out of the way while you go off with someone else and have all the fun.
I think it's rotten of you, Tommy, simply rotten.
I didn't ask...
Everything's been so perfect.
We've had a wonderful life together.
We've been very successful.
How can you even consider breaking it up?
And breaking it up for what?
To get married.
Oh, no, Tom.
Marriage is a tough business.
You know, I've always thought marr...
Responsibilities, obligations, a home to take care of.
Maybe children to look after.
Imagine being married to someone you're dancing with.
If either the marriage or the dancing doesn't work out, both of them go kaplooey!
Oh, no. No, Thomas.
It's a terrible chance to take.
It is, isn't it?
We mustn't do it.
We've slaved too hard to get where we are.
Why should we give it up?
It does seem foolish, doesn't it?
We're a team, and a darn good one.
We ought to stay that way.
Maybe you're right.
Well, of course I'm right.
Oh, you do see it, don't you, Tommy?
Sure I see it.
It's you and me, just like it's always been.
I'm sure we're doing the right thing.
Thank you so much for deciding for me.
Forget it.
 what a lovely day for a wedding 
 happy are we to say 
 it's a lovely day for a wedding 
 lovely in every way 
 there's families out, without a doubt 
 to see what all the joy's about 
 for everywhere the world is merry and gay 
 what a lovely day for a wedding 
 over again we say 
 it's a lovely, lovely, lovely wedding day 
 what a lovely day for a wedding 
 happy are we to say 
 what a lovely day for a wedding 
 lovely in every way 
 the royal guard is off their guard 
 and drink is got at Scotland yard 
 big Ben has quite forgot the time of the day 
 what a lovely day for a wedding 
 over again we say 
 it's a lovely, lovely wedding 
 a lovely, lovely wedding 
 lovely 
 lovely 
 lovely 
 lovely 
 wedding day 
Hello.
Good morning, old chappy!
Hello, Edgar.
Good morning. I've come to take you to the wedding.
And what a wedding parade we shall see.
Are you ready?
As ready as
I'll ever be.
I say, what's the matter with you two this morning?
You're all at sixes and sevens.
Nothing's the matter.
Let's go.
Tom, I want...
Ellie, I've got to have her. I lose.
So what? I want to get married today.
Today?
Sure, before I change my mind.
Think we can do it?
We must do it. Edgar, we want to get married.
I thought you two were related.
No, no. And we want to get married today.
Why, it takes 3 weeks.
3 weeks? Anything can happen in 3 weeks.
Irving says you can do anything.
You can fix it for us.
I know, but one must have permission from the archbishop's office, and after all, he's busy today.
You've got to swing it for us, Edgar.
Well, I'll try.
You two meet me at the vicar general's in 2 hours, and if it's at all possible to get permission for a license, where?
You shall be married this afternoon.
Clyde street church.
I believe I know the minister there.
This is a pretty box of pickles. I beg your pardon, sir.
Now we...
Now we have to find
Anne and John.
In these crowds?
I know what corner she's standing on.
Where's John?
He should be leaving the Abbey for the reception any minute now.
Well, you better find him.
Ellie, I'm gonna miss you a lot from now on.
Oh, Tommy, you're a wonderful brother.
Good luck, darling.
Thanks.
Excuse me.
Will you excuse me?
John!
Ellen!
What's the matter?!
John, I wanna marry you!
What?!
I said I want to marry you!
You do?!
Yes!
Clyde street church at 4:00!
Right!
Here, here! What do you think you're doing?
Oh, officer,
I love you!
Anne!
Anne!
Tom!
Will ya marry me?!
What?!
Will ya marry me?!
Yes!
Good-bye.
Good-bye.
They didn't have to go to all this trouble.
A small wedding would've been all right.
Mr. Canfield, thank heavens you got here.
I'll kill myself, there's no other way out.
I could hardly play tonight.
- Why?
- I got another wire from Moscow.
Take a bow, Monsieur Boroff.
Excuse me.
I've got to kill myself.
Mr. Canfield, can you get me a knife, a gun, a tall building?
- You've had wires from Moscow before.
- Not like this one.
I told you they would not let me stay in Paris.
If they knew I was writing a score for your picture...
- They want you there, Monsieur Boroff.
- They want me in Moscow, too.
I'm lost.
Give me that wire. I'll take care of it.
Now, don't worry.
What? No more bows?
What am I talking about?
Soon I won't have a head to take a bow with.
They're sending three commissars to take me back to Moscow.
- Do you know what that means?
- Come, now.
Not one, not two, but three commissars.
Yes, I know.
But, Mr. Canfield...
Now look,
I'll go and see if there are any messages.
You wait for me in the Mirror Room.
Order two brandies... and stop worrying.
Come. We talk to him now.
Very casual. Don't frighten him. Smile.
- I haven't smiled in 30 years.
- Try.
Good evening, Comrade Boroff.
We are great admirers of your beautiful music.
My name is Brankov.
This is Comrade Bibinski, that's Comrade Ivanov.
You seem nervous, Comrade Boroff.
You have come after me?
It is true that the Commissar of Art suggested that we look you up... say hello and point out a few things.
He wanted us to tell you how much Russia loves you... how much she needs you.
And how nice it would be if you came back to Russia with us.
- Or else...
- Boroff, what's up?
These gentlemen, my Comrades from Moscow... say that I must come back to Russia with them.
That's impossible.
He's going to write the score for my picture.
That's impossible!
For a composer like Boroff to write the music for a capitalistic picture...
- is degrading.
- And very profitable.
He'll receive $50,000.
How much taxes will Russia get on $50,000?
Furthermore, Comrades... his name will become world famous.
This is no ordinary picture.
It stars that incomparable artist,
Peggy Dayton.
Look at her.
- Looks very intelligent.
- And very talented, Comrades.
And what lovely eyes.
It is no matter. Boroff must return with us.
It is the wish of the Soviet government.
- What about the French government?
- What do they have to do with a Russian?
First you must establish that he is a Russian citizen.
Of course he's a Russian citizen.
A product of pure Russian culture!
- And a French father.
- Do not talk nonsense.
- You never told me.
- Nor did your mother, apparently.
I have in my possession an affidavit from one Pierre Bouchard... a French traveling salesman who carried a line of farm machinery... through Russia in the 1920s.
That's right, isn't it?
- Please show us the affidavit.
- I'll produce it when necessary.
Also, in 20 minutes,
I'll have an injunction restraining you... from taking French citizen Boroff out of Paris.
The Russian government will fight this outrage!
Undoubtedly, but in courts it will take time.
Meanwhile, Boroff will stay in Paris.
We must communicate with Moscow at once.
Fifi, Suzette, Gabrielle!
What a surprise!
I'm so glad to see you.
I'd like to introduce my friend...
Mr. Boroff...
- and...
- Brankov.
- Bibinski.
- Ivanov.
The boys just got in from Russia.
We haven't been too hospitable to our dear Comrades, have we?
How about us having a little drink?
We can go back to business later.
Will you ladies join us?
- Yes.
- Yes, enchanted.
That's just wonderful.
You lads must be very thirsty, aren't you?
Are we thirsty, Comrades?
Waiter!
We'll get a larger table in here and then...
Comrades!
Comrades, you're too intelligent not to see it.
Here we have the leading Soviet composer, Boroff... lending his art to a Peggy Dayton picture which will circle the globe... in CinemaScope.
Just think, the Iron Curtain dissolved by music.
Why, it's absolutely sensational.
What a gesture of goodwill on the part of the Russians.
And... what propaganda!
- Propaganda.
- Propaganda.
You three will have to stay here and supervise and help.
You'll become national heroes.
Comrade Bibinski, he has a very strong point.
Propaganda.
Bibi, this may mean the Order of Lenin for you.
You can't throw away this opportunity for greatness.
Can we throw away this opportunity for greatness?
Comrades, perhaps we should stay here for a while.
We've got to sacrifice our own feelings for the good of the Party.
- I go and register.
- There's no need.
I've already made a reservation.
The Royal Suite.
- Royal?
- You deserve the best.
While you're in it, it will be called The Workers' Suite.
Then we stay.
Too bad... but for the sake of Russia...
In view of your counter-revolutionary activities... compounded by malfeasance in office... former Commissar of Art, you are hereby arrested.
You cannot do this to me.
I am the Commissar of Art.
Stop!
I am the new Commissar of Art.
- My name is Markovitch. Any questions?
- Comrade Commissar...
I'll ask the questions.
What are they doing?
Peter Boroff's tone poem,
Ode to a Tractor.
Peter Boroff!
Don't you know that Peter Boroff may not come back from Paris... and if he does not, he no longer has any talent.
Yes, Comrade Commissar.
I will audition everyone individually.
Starting with her.
- Take everybody else out.
- Come, ladies.
Start dancing.
- Vassili!
- Darling.
I have made it. Finally I am Commissar.
And now you can make me
Prima Ballerina.
Patience, little one.
But you promised me that as soon as you would become Commissar... you would make me Prima Ballerina and throw out this horrible Kranilovska.
Patience. Kranilovska has power.
She has nothing. She is fat and ugly and she cannot dance.
I know, but she is my wife.
Markovitch.
Yes, Comrade Minister.
Nice of you to...
What?
But how can I be in trouble already?
I just sat down.
The Boroff matter?
I wasn't the one who sent those three idiots after Boroff.
So why is it my fault?
That is true, there is no one else.
I will go to work on it immediately.
I will send a special envoy who...
You have a suggestion?
Comrade Yoschenko?
I had in mind...
But if you say Yoschenko, that's who it will be.
I will ask Yoschenko to come here and...
You have already arranged it.
Oh, thank you.
May I say that I think
Yoschenko is a splendid choice.
Who is Yoschenko?
I don't know.
I will look him up.
I want to look somebody up.
Does this office have a copy of Who's Still Who?
It's in the library, Comrade Commissar.
Good.
Comrade Yoschenko is here to see you.
Vera, you go look him up.
Report to me later.
Send in the Comrade.
Comrade Yoschenko reporting.
- You are Yoschenko?
- I am.
You are a woman.
I'm also Yoschenko. My credentials.
But you are a woman.
The Commissar has good powers of observation.
The Comrade Minister said, but he didn't tell me...
I'm not so sure if, for this job, a woman will...
Physically a woman is not equipped to...
When the Minister sent me he did not say it was for a discussion of biology.
- Please sit down.
- I will stand.
You are my superior.
I prefer to maintain revolutionary discipline.
Just what I have always maintained.
Let us get down to business.
You are familiar with
Peter Ilyitch Boroff's music?
You are a music lover?
- Music is essential for parades.
- Of course.
A couple of months ago, some idiot let Boroff get to Paris... and, naturally, he wants to stay there.
What do you mean "naturally"?
I mean, he is weak.
He is not strong like us.
Paris has seduced him.
And it also seems to have seduced the men that went after him.
They are weak fools.
You are too kind to them.
It seems to me that seduction can only take place when one is willing.
Yes.
I can see that you would think that.
- Have you ever been to Paris?
- No.
I have never been outside the Soviet Union.
I have spent many years in Paris.
I got very close to the French people.
In fact, they deported me three times.
Now... about this assignment.
It is not very simple.
To me, it is quite simple.
A Soviet artist has betrayed his trust.
He must be brought back here with no adverse publicity, at once.
Thus, I will leave at once.
Comrade Yoschenko!
Maybe I should send someone along with you.
Comrade Commissar... if you had looked at my credentials a little less casually... you would have noticed at the age of 16...
I formally rejected all bourgeois pleasure and indulgence... to become the head of an anti-aircraft gun crew.
At 18, I became the captain of a woman's tank corps.
And for the past five years...
I have been assigned to the job of rectifying the mistakes... made by foolish commissars.
Darling, I have looked it up!
Comrade Yoschenko is a woman.
That's your opinion.
We can go back to the Lido... or we can take in the Folies Bergre tonight.
What a cigar!
Maybe we should send a box to the Commissar of Art?
Sure. And maybe we should send him some postcards, too.
From the Ritz Bar and the Folies Bergre... all the places we could be shot for visiting.
But, Colette... you're not going to let your husband spoil our whole evening, are you?
All right.
Au revoir, my darling.
Colette has to spend the evening with her husband.
Then Gabrielle must be free.
She goes with Colette's husband.
We have plenty of time for Colette and all the girls.
These delicious legal delays may take weeks, months, maybe years.
Not that we're not working on our mission.
I am still prevailing upon Canfield... to show us the affidavit concerning Boroff's father.
Bibi, don't prevail too much.
Entrez!
Tlgramme, Monsieur.
Merci beaucoup.
Bibinski, for you.
"Former Commissar on extended leave of absence.
"Envoy Extraordinary arrives Friday, 7:00, with full power.
"Your authority cancelled herewith.
"Markovitch. "
Extended leave of absence.
That means he's dead!
Comrades, the Envoy will be here in 10 minutes.
We must meet him in the lobby.
But now we have to get the affidavit at once... from Canfield, immediately.
And warn him not to mention
Boroff is writing music for him.
Operator!
Mr. Canfield's suite. Yeah, hurry up.
Comrade?
Would you be
Bibinski, Brankov and Ivanov?
Yes.
I'm Nina Yoschenko,
Envoy Extraordinary... acting under direct orders of Comrade Commissar Markovitch.
Comrade.
What a charming idea for Moscow to surprise us with a lady Comrade.
If we would've known we would have greeted you with flowers.
What are we doing in a place like this?
This looks more like a palace than a hotel.
True, but that's Paris for you, actually it's very second rate.
Boroff is living here, we thought we'd stay close.
So that we can observe all his movements.
We're wasting time, where do we go?
- It's on the fourth floor. Porter!
- Madame?
- What do you want?
- May I have your bags?
- Why?
- He's a porter, he wants to carry them.
Why? Why should you carry other people's bags?
- It's my business, Madame.
- That's no business.
That's social injustice.
- Allow me, Comrade.
- No, thank you.
How can such a civilization survive... where women are permitted to wear things like these.
Here, Comrade.
I prefer the stairs.
- But it's on the fourth floor.
- I will walk.
You take the elevator.
Comrade.
Here, Comrade.
This is the apartment we reserved for you, Comrade Yoschenko.
I hope you like it.
Which part of the room is mine?
You see, it's different here.
They don't rent rooms in pieces.
- We had to take the whole suite.
- The whole suite.
On account of the prestige of the Soviet Union.
We, ourselves, we would be much happier... with a little room next to servants quarters.
Which we are now going to move into.
Comrades, your report was received with great disfavor in Moscow.
You have handled the situation very strangely.
- Comrade Bibinski?
- Yes, Comrade?
Do you spell Bibinski with two B's or three?
With two B's, if you please.
Well, here I am, boys.
Where's the big bad...
This is Comrade Nina Yoschenko,
Envoy Extraordinary of the Soviet Union.
Extraordinary is hardly the word.
And, this is the Mr. Canfield we mentioned in our report.
And that's the document.
May I see the affidavit, please?
By all means.
I'd like to meet this man... this Pierre Bouchard who claims to be Boroff's father.
As you see, he's a traveling salesman.
Unfortunately, he's still traveling.
And you are responsible for this paper?
What is your connection with Boroff?
Well, he's going to write...
I mean, I was just helping him because he wants to stay in Paris.
Anyone who wants to stay in Paris deserves help.
If you want to stay, I'll help you.
- I want to talk to this man alone. Leave us.
- Yes, Comrade.
- Do you think you might need help?
- No.
I will not need help.
Don't go too far. I might.
- Mr. Canfield, you are an American?
- Yes, ma'am.
Tell me, in America, are you one of the oppressors or one of the oppressed?
One of the oppressors, definitely.
Aren't you ashamed?
Come now, as one oppressor to the other... you know it's the best spot to be in.
- Let's get down to business.
- Yes.
Tell me... is it Miss Comrade Yoschenko or Mrs. Comrade Yoschenko?
Please don't make an issue of my womanhood.
Don't say that, I was looking forward to it.
I want to warn you.
Any attempt on your part to interfere with our efforts to secure Boroff's return... will be met with legal action from my government.
We'll hold you liable and accountable for all damages sustained by us.
You know something, you ought to play Portia.
I have. In Gorky's Merchant of Venice.
Let me tell you a few things about this affidavit.
I tell you what.
I won't make an issue of your womanhood if you won't make an issue of my affidavit.
Mr. Canfield...
I am here to represent the Soviet Union in a most urgent matter.
And I demand that you take this seriously.
I'll do that.
Monday morning, I will meet with attorneys at the Russian Embassy.
- We will obtain a writ of replevin.
- All right.
And I'll get a judiciary habeas of the Magna Carta.
- What's that?
- I don't know, but it scared you, didn't it?
Why can't you understand this is no laughing matter?
Comrade... we're in Paris, in the spring.
Why can't we make it a laughing matter?
Really, Mr. Canfield.
It's quite obvious what you have done to Bibinski, Brankov and Ivanov.
But if you think you will do the same thing to me... you had better stop right now.
I didn't do anything to the commissars.
Paris did.
It did it to them, it did it to me, it'll do it to you.
Let me show you something.
Come on, don't be afraid. Just look.
Comrade, face your enemy.
I resent being preached to about electricity.
You forget we invented it.
I wasn't talking about electricity.
I was talking about lights.
Your attitude is typical of the male in capitalistic society.
You will soon be extinct.
- How long have I got left?
- Do not misunderstand me.
As basic material, you might not be bad... but you are the unfortunate product of a doomed culture.
I feel sorry for you.
You must admit that this doomed old civilization of ours sparkles.
It glitters.
Later this evening, I will go for a walk and observe your lights.
If you go by yourself you won't see them.
Tell me.
How many watts of electricity are consumed by this pleasure city?
I haven't the slightest idea.
Why don't we go out on the town together and find out?
The things I want to see can be seen better in daylight.
The Municipal Works, the Renault automobile factory, the sewerage system.
- Will you show me those?
- I would hate to.
- Then I will go alone.
- What time shall I pick you up?
Meet me in the lobby tomorrow morning at 6:30.
Can't you make it a little later, say, 2:00?
All right, dawn it is.
Don't you ever have any desires to see the pleasures of Paris?
Pleasures. Paris.
How was it you said?
"The urge to merge with a splurge. "
That's right.
Hold it! Hold it, please.
Miss Dayton, is this your first trip to Paris?
Miss Dayton is going directly to the Studio De Paris.
Mr. Canfield has arranged a press conference there.
Reporters! And I tried to sneak in.
I tell you, I'm...
- Just a few questions.
- I'd love it.
How about you and Rock Northwood?
There's no truth to the rumors, we're just good friends.
How about Marlon Bancroft?
There's absolutely no truth to the rumors, we're just good friends.
Miss Dayton, I am Peter Boroff.
Yes, Mr. Canfield wired about you.
You're doing a few tunes for the picture.
- Where is Canfield?
- He will meet you at the studio.
Oh, swell.
If I can travel 6,000 miles for his picture, he could at least meet me at the airport.
Is there anything between you and Boroff?
Of course not. We're just good friends.
Let's pick it up at the conference.
Yes, I'd love it.
- Mr. Canfield, she's here.
- She's here.
Darling!
Thanks for nothing, why weren't you at the airport?
Ladies and gentlemen, Peggy Dayton.
The star of the picture
I'm about to produce in Paris.
This is Miss Dayton's first serious, non-swimming picture.
You're not swimming at all?
I'm going to play my first dramatic part.
I've always wanted to do one.
Besides, on account of my ears...
I'm not allowed to swim any more in pictures.
But you're
America's Swimming Sweetheart.
Boys, I've had it. I've really had it.
The Girl from the Sleepy Lagoon.
The Cowboy and the Mermaid.
Neptune's Mother.
I never got a chance to dry off.
No, from now on,
I'm just going to swim socially.
Hold it, Miss Dayton.
The point is this: for the first time we're going to use...
Miss Dayton's genuine and real ability as a dramatic actress.
What's this new picture you're doing?
I can't tell you much, but it's based on a book.
What book?
It wouldn't mean much in the newspapers.
I just heard about it myself.
- But it's terrific. A real sleeper.
- Not exactly a sleeper.
A novel long neglected but ever eternal, if you know what I mean.
- I don't, what's the name of it?
- War and Peace.
It will make a wonderful picture once it's boiled down.
Of course, that title will have to go.
How do you feel about Tolstoy?
- Who?
- Tolstoy.
- Who's that?
- He wrote War and Peace.
Oh, that Tolstoy.
There's absolutely no truth to the rumors, we're just good friends.
Actually, we're only using a segment of War and Peace.
A lighter moment and perfectly suited to Miss Dayton's personality.
Who is making the adaptation?
- Who is the director?
- Who is in the cast?
Boys, I haven't had a chance to think about all that.
Writing, directing, cast.
Those things don't mean a thing today.
Today there are many other things that are much more important.
Good morning.
- You didn't expect to see me, did you?
- Frankly, no.
Shall we begin with the Municipal Works?
I'd like to show you the Paris a woman ought to see.
I am here in the interest of my government.
If we are to spend the day together... forget I am a woman and forget you are a man.
That's right. I'm so sorry.
Let's go out there like a couple of steam shovels.
What would you like to do next?
I hear there's a stunning boiler room over at the cement factory.
- What in the world is that?
- A dog. A French poodle.
Incredible.
- Isn't he cute?
- So ridiculous and useless.
Can't you ever accept something because it's amusing or appealing?
Does everything have to further the interests of the State?
It is best that way.
I've never known anyone like you.
I've never known anyone to resist enjoyment the way you do.
Now, the way you picked at that dinner.
You know you never had food like that in Moscow.
In Russia, we eat for strength and nourishment.
Besides, the service in this cafe is abominable.
The waiters are much too slow.
Yes, I know.
I spoke to the manager, he says he can't do a thing with them.
- Why not?
- They're communists.
I don't think that's funny.
You're offended!
Be careful, you're behaving like a woman... and I might behave like a man.
What do you mean by that?
Now really, Ninotchka.
I want to ask you a serious question.
Are you flirting with me?
Of course. No question about it.
Suppress it.
It might be interesting for you, as a sociological study.
Come, let's go where we can be alone.
Here we are.
I'll work on this tonight.
You will have them in the morning.
- Worker! Brother.
- Madame.
Where is the little comrades' room?
Just at the end of the hall.
Pierre, about that paper you signed for the lawyer.
Oui, monsieur. Where I am the father of the young Russian composer?
That's right.
Be careful, this lady is trying to find out about you.
- Where you are.
- I'll be very discreet, monsieur.
But don't you think Papa could be paid a little more money?
Papa has been paid enough already.
But on the other hand, if Papa is not taken care of... there could be serious trouble.
It would be very sad.
What is the matter, little brother?
Are you unhappy?
Little brother is not at all unhappy.
Little brother will get everything he wishes if little brother will just blow.
Oui, monsieur.
Goodbye, little brother.
Why do you do that?
Because you're absurd and irresistible.
Ninotchka, don't you like me at all?
The arrangement of your features is not entirely repulsive to me.
Thank you.
Don't you think, in time, you might go a little further than that?
I have not seen the rest of you.
- Ninotchka, Ninotchka...
- You are repeating yourself.
Won't you sit down?
Why do you do that?
Don't you like music?
It does not interest me.
I suppose you use it to induce a more romantic mood.
Yes, by Heaven, I do.
- Should you not turn the lights down?
- Yes, I should.
Is this what is known as the courtship?
The build up. The pitch.
Then I shall get out my little black book and make notes.
I have disturbed you.
In a way, yes.
Because you have a schoolboy approach to life.
In Russia when someone wants someone, he says:
"You!
"Come here!"
You mad, romantic Russians.
If you had studied Kamichev, you would know what I'm talking about.
Who's Kamichev?
One of our greatest scientists.
He has proved beyond any question that physical attraction... is purely electro-chemical.
- You don't say.
- Kamichev has proven it.
For 30 years he worked.
I've worked on the same subject for the same amount of time... and I have very good reasons for believing otherwise.
Facts are facts.
- You don't believe in Kamichev?
- No, ma'am.
- Then what is your theory?
- My theory is: there is no theory.
But you are attracted to me, and obviously there must be scientific reasons.
There are reasons, but they have nothing to do with electro-magnets.
Kamichev once observed the behavior of 40 turtles... for three months and he discovered...
You just don't react, chemically or otherwise, do you?
Don't you ever let yourself go?
Go where?
I don't know, just go.
Don't you ever feel so happy you just want to dance around the room?
Happiness is the reward of industry and labor.
Dancing is a waste of time.
I like wasting time.
Well?
You go, go, go, but you don't get anywhere.
You're telling me.
So dancing is a waste of time?
You seem to know quite a bit about it.
- Once, a few years ago...
- Yes?
Look...
I know perfectly well the pleasures of music and dancing.
But pleasure itself is an indulgence.
Only by denying selfish interests can one properly serve the State.
You.
Come here.
That was restful.
Again.
Your tie, what is it made of?
Why? Silk.
Silk should be used for parachutes.
Well...
I certainly hope I'm intruding.
Naturally, but come in.
This is Peggy Dayton,
America's beloved swimming star.
Comrade Nina Yoschenko of the Soviet Union.
- Hello.
- We were having a business meeting.
Sure you were, on the floor?
Why should it bother you if we are on the floor?
Is there something between you?
Of course not, we're just good friends.
Doesn't anybody ever ask anything else around here?
And listen, you.
We may not even be good friends before this picture's finished.
About that Boroff, that creep's been following me around all day.
- Creep?
- He played me some of his music.
Honey, you have got to be kidding.
I think his music is lousy.
- Peggy.
- Miss Dayton.
Even Americans admit that Boroff is the greatest living composer.
When you insult him, you insult Russian culture.
If you will excuse me.
Wait a minute, I'm not through with you.
Ninotchka, please...
That was mighty tactful of you.
What do you want?
I read the script, I don't dig it.
Did you read all of it?
Did you read all of it?
You know I never read any part except my own.
Steve, it's just not right for me.
It's cute and all that, but I have to think about my following.
- Your what?
- My fans!
If I show up in a picture where I not only don't swim... but I don't even do one musical number, they're gonna clobber me.
I don't want to turn it into a musical, it's too expensive.
Steve, it'll be worth every penny.
We'll just use that stuff in the French court... and I'll play Josephine.
- It's a natural.
- Hold everything.
And I got a great title:
Not Tonight.
I'll give it some thought.
I wonder if we can use Boroff's music?
- No, he's too square.
- Don't be silly.
Think of the prestige of having
Peter Boroff write music for your picture.
- You know what prestige means.
- Pictures that don't make money.
- This'll make money.
- Steve, he's so longhair.
Peggy, Tchaikovsky wrote an overture for Romeo and Juliet.
And you know what it turned into?
Our Love Is Like A Melody.
Say, that was a great song.
You think we could get him?
He's not available.
Another Russian composer,
Borodin, get this:
Sure, but those boys had great tunes to work on.
With your quick musical ear,
I'm sure if you listen to...
Ode to a Tractor, you'll discover a wonderful theme in it.
Even better than Tchaikovsky.
With the right words and you singing it, we can't miss.
Of course, there is one catch.
Boroff may not want his music made into a popular song.
Why not?
Because he's a serious musician and doesn't know any better.
- So you may have to persuade him.
- How can I persuade him?
Because we're built differently.
Comrade, you said today's communication from Markovitch... ordered us to meet with the French officials immediately.
How can we pressurize them into revoking Boroff's visa?
Yes, how?
I think Moscow will extend our stay if we request it.
Perhaps you didn't understand the question, Comrade.
Everyday the management puts fresh flowers in the rooms.
- What a lovely gesture.
- Yes, it is.
If we prevail upon the French officials as representatives of...
Why don't you get a haircut?
You always look so wintry, Comrades.
And why do we always keep the windows closed?
Isn't it amazing?
At home, there is still snow and ice... and here, look at the birds.
I always felt a little hurt... when our swallows deserted us in winter for capitalistic countries.
Now I know why.
We have the high ideal... but they have the climate.
About meeting with the officials...
I won't need you any more, Comrades.
I will find Boroff and talk to him myself.
Would you like to go out?
- Yes, Comrade.
- Have you any money?
No, Comrade.
Here are 1,000 francs.
Thank you, Comrade.
Thank you very much.
Bring back 500 francs.
Naturally, Comrade.
Leopard print jersey.
Mad! I love them!
They'll be wonderful for barbecues.
- I'll take six.
- Merci, Mademoiselle.
I was to meet Miss Dayton.
Mr. Boroff, baby,
I'm so glad you could make it.
You come right in and sit down here, because I won't buy a thing you don't like.
Trousers to match...
I don't know very much about ladies.
Nonsense, an artist is an artist.
Speaking of artists, wait until you hear me sing some of your tunes.
Sing?
Archie Birch, the lyric writer, is in Paris.
I showed him your stuff.
Baby, you will not believe... what he dug up out of your Ode to a Tractor.
Commercial, but with class.
I flipped over the one he calls Josephine.
- But my music is not for singing.
- But, Mr. Boroff, baby... didn't you ever hear about Tchaikovsky and Borodin?
Tchaikovsky and Borodin are different.
As composers, they have what is in Russia, a great advantage.
- Oh, what's that?
- They are dead.
Mr. Boroff, baby, you see, music in America has to be sort of...
But my music is part of Russian culture.
I can't do it, Miss Dayton.
Please, ask me anything else.
Mr. Boroff, baby, you see, that's all I want. I've got everything else.
And, if you could do this little old thing for me... we could see a lot more of each other.
You know, dinners... and things like that.
- The fitting room is ready, mademoiselle.
- Oh, wonderful.
Come and watch me being fitted.
- I think I'd better wait here.
- All right. Well, I'll tell you what.
You just sit right down over here and I'll be right back.
- Comrade Boroff.
- Nina!
- How did you know I was here?
- I had the commissars track you down.
We must clear up this citizenship nonsense and you must return to Russia.
Nina, I want to tell you something.
I am not sure that
I wish to return to Russia.
Someone might be listening.
I've learned things in Paris.
Here you can be what you wish.
You can utter dissenting ideas in a very loud voice.
The views here are different.
Very different!
Tell me, Comrade... when a woman wears things like that... is it really so attractive to a man?
In a word: Da!
Nina, please, I would like to attend to some unfinished business here.
May I call you at your hotel at 4:00?
We can discuss my citizenship then.
- 4:00, without fail?
- Without fail.
No, I tell you, the light's better out here.
- But the fitting room...
- This is fine. I can see what I have on.
- How does it look?
- Perfect.
But we could alter the undergarments so the line would be smoother.
Good. It's what is under the dress that counts.
You know?
Yes?
Oh, Boroff.
Something urgent has come up, Boroff.
I must postpone our meeting.
Yes.
Oh, no.
It can't be.
- I don't look too foolish?
- Foolish?
Why, you're only the most beautiful girl in Paris.
I'll prove it to you. We'll cover the town.
Look here, it's 2:00 in the morning.
Stop telling me the time every five minutes.
We will wait here for Ninotchka.
Messieurs, I...
I just got your call.
- I was having a manicure.
- At 2:00 in the morning?
I cannot sleep with long fingernails.
What are we doing here anyway?
Our esteemed chairman insists on telling Comrade Yoschenko... all about Boroff's music being in Canfield's picture.
But why? She'll stop it.
It is her right as our superior.
But why don't you wait till the picture's finished?
Look, Bibi, if all goes well, you could be a hero.
Suppose all doesn't go well.
I don't want to be a hero.
I want to live simple and die natural.
We must tell her everything before she accuses us.
But how can she accuse us of something she knows nothing about?
Maybe Canfield told her.
Maybe she is now just waiting to see if we tell her.
Maybe. Don't be so Russian.
It might interest you to know... that Comrade Yoschenko got a telephone call from Moscow today.
- How do you know?
- From me.
I wish I'd never opened my big mouth.
- But how did you find out?
- This afternoon, in my room... when I was teaching Marxism to the telephone operator.
But we don't know what the call was about.
Steven, look who's here.
Is this what it's like in Russia?
You take a girl home to find three party members waiting?
We don't mean to intrude... but I have a very important piece of information for you.
And I have one for you, Bibinski.
I have made a discovery.
Champagne is more fun to drink...
- than goat's milk.
- She has a truly scientific mind.
Comrade Yoschenko, this is important.
I must tell you immediately.
I'd like to point out, I feel the same way.
I insist that you hear about this.
I wouldn't let Bibi sleep before he tells you.
Comrades, must we talk business on a night like this... when there are so many more... beautiful things?
I must tell you the truth about Boroff's music.
This is neither the time nor the place.
Let them settle their business... and we will get back to beautiful things.
Very well.
What is it?
Comrade Special Envoy Yoschenko,
I feel it is my duty... to tell you that Peter Boroff's composition,
Ode to a Tractor... is being used in Mr. Canfield's motion picture.
Wonderful. I think everything should have music.
Meeting adjourned.
- Comrade Yoschenko...
- It means we are dismissed.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Maybe we should stay awhile... just to be sociable.
Steven...
I am very happy.
As we walked down the Champs lysses...
I wasn't interested that it was three feet narrower than the Nevsky Prospect.
I just thought, "How beautiful. "
For the first time in my life
I looked at something... and thought, "How beautiful"... instead of, "How useful. "
Oh, Steven, all Paris is beautiful.
You're the most beautiful Commissar
I've ever met.
I love you dearly.
And you are beautiful.
What would Kamichev say to this?
- Who?
- Kamichev.
Your Russian authority on sex.
I will tell you something.
Kamichev did not know what he was talking about.
The great Kamichev?
Working all those years?
Kamichev. All you have to do is look at Mrs. Kamichev... and you will know he didn't know a thing about it.
I want to make a speech.
- Now?
- Now.
All right, go ahead.
No, I don't want to make a speech.
I want to confess.
Spend the entire day with me tomorrow.
I feel so much happiness it makes me miserable.
I feel so gay, I am forgetting I am Russian.
I am forgetting why I came to Paris.
You came to Paris to meet me.
Oh, I am too happy.
Nobody can be so happy without being punished.
I should be punished, I am a traitor.
I should be stood against the wall.
All right, we'll stand you against the wall.
Now.
Right here.
I have paid the penalty.
I feel better.
We can't have this.
Are you all right?
We've come to watch the filming of Peter Boroff's music.
- Mr. Canfield invited us.
- Your names, please?
- Bibinski.
- Brankov.
Ivanov.
Just a moment.
Comrades, this is a great day.
To see Boroff's music put on the screen.
If the picture's a success, we'll claim it's a Russian production.
Bibi, we all will be heroes of Soviet culture.
Imagine our reception when we return.
- Crowds cheering.
- Bands playing.
- Speeches.
- Applause.
Comrades!
There you are, boys. Where's Ninotchka?
- She said she'd meet us here.
- Go ahead in.
Stage Two, second building to your right.
- Hello.
- Steven.
Now, before we go to the stage, there's something I've got to say to you.
Somewhere we can be alone.
No. 18 ENTRE
You look so beautiful today.
- Champagne agrees with you.
- Suddenly everything agrees with me.
Well, we'll see. Right there.
So we make a nice clean start.
There's something I want to confess.
- You have a wife.
- Nothing like that.
It's this business about Boroff's father.
There never was a traveling salesman,
I invented it all to keep Boroff here.
Really?
You realize this means I no longer have any reason for staying in Paris?
You have the best reason in the world.
You're going to marry me.
Marry you?
Don't look so shocked.
This is the first proposition I ever had.
Proposal.
Steve, they will never let me marry you.
- Who are they?
- My government.
- Forget them.
- How can I?
Ninotchka, do you want to marry me?
- If it were only possible.
- Of course it's possible.
Nothing can stop us, you know why?
Watch out.
Cables and everything all over the place.
- Are we late, Al?
- We're just about ready for rehearsal.
Comrade Yoschenko.
Look.
Now, you sit here.
After this Josephine number we'll have some lunch.
- We've lots to talk about.
- Josephine number?
- Isn't this War and Peace?
- We've made a few changes.
We're using Boroff's music but the story's about Napoleon and Josephine.
What has that to do with Russia?
Who gave Napoleon his crushing defeat in 1812? Russia.
Yes, I know.
But this is an American picture.
- You're liable to have Napoleon win.
- I never change the past.
Only the future. Now, you sit right here.
I've got to check on something.
I'll be back after the number.
Grab a chair, fellas, will you?
All set, sir.
Quiet, please.
- Quiet!
- Silence!
This is a rehearsal.
We'll run through the whole number.
- Quiet!
- Silence!
- Take your positions, please.
- Playback.
No! They cannot do this to me.
It's an outrage.
Changing my music like that.
The tempo, the whole conception.
We'll make an official protest.
You can't have your name, your music...
There must be something we can do.
Yes, but what can we do?
Mr. Canfield, you cannot do this.
You just cannot do this to me.
Just a minute. Al, you better call lunch.
Lunch!
Mr. Canfield, I warn you... if you dare to present my music like this...
Comrade Yoschenko,
I would like to explain.
Never mind.
You were at fault, but so was I.
It's now my responsibility.
- No, I consider it my fault.
- Brankov and I feel the same way.
- It's Bibinski's fault.
- Let us not argue among ourselves.
- The situation is far too critical.
- What's so critical?
We just saw the most insulting travesty on Russian culture that ever existed.
Now, wait a minute.
Let's not have a big tragedy over a silly little musical number.
All we did was make a popular song out of Boroff's music.
That music belongs to the Russian people.
What right have you to distort it?
I'm afraid you don't understand.
In America, we do this all the time.
We make popular songs from classics, and millions of people enjoy them.
No one's offended, no one's insulted, no one's forced to listen, so...
- who cares?
- I care.
I care very much about something that is a part of the Russian heritage.
Will you excuse us just a minute?
Ninotchka, I want to...
Ninotchka, I refuse to argue with you over anything so unimportant.
The argument will be taken care of by our embassy.
I'll issue a detailed report of the entire incident.
Fine, do that. Let them take it up, it's nothing to do with you and me.
You're quite wrong, Mr. Canfield.
It has everything to do with you and me.
Darling, please don't call me Mr. Canfield.
Mr. Canfield, please don't call me darling.
I am guilty of neglecting my duty... and betraying my whole way of life because of an emotional attachment.
I'm surprised you don't say emotional deviation.
Leading, of course, from a chemical reaction.
If you like.
No, I don't like.
Of all the reasons for breaking up, this beats them all.
I thought you were all through with this twisted political thinking.
- Why, only a few moments ago...
- I know, you were kissing me.
But does every woman kissed by you change her politics?
I thought I saw a carefully trained robot turn into a woman.
Obviously, I was wrong.
You can love the masses, but loving one man scares the daylights out of you.
That, of course, is your opinion.
It's always your opinion.
It's what you want and what you think.
Everything I do is wrong and everything you do is right.
You leave me nothing of my own.
If that's your idea of love... yes, it scares the daylights out of me.
Comrades, there's no longer any reason for us to remain in Paris.
We leave for Russia tonight.
Boroff, come with me.
I will meet you at the hotel.
- Maybe South America?
- What?
Maybe we could go to a place like South America.
But you know how they work.
If we don't return to Russia, all our relatives will be in trouble.
My relatives...
I wouldn't mind so much.
Comrades, there's no use talking, we're in hot water.
There is no hot water in Siberia.
Siberia!
I don't know, maybe it isn't too bad, after all?
- There's no humidity.
- Plenty of winter sports.
There are places like that in Switzerland.
People pay money to go there.
Hello, operator?
Mademoiselle, will you please connect me with Miss Yoschenko?
Yoschenko. In the Royal Suite.
She can't have checked out.
Are you sure?
Thank you.
- Ninotchka!
- How are you, you scoundrels?
- How good it is to...
- Nini.
Hello.
- You have this whole section to yourself?
- Yes.
- They could put two more families in here.
- Come in. Sit down.
How good it is to see you.
How have you been?
Alive, thanks to your excellent report on us.
I've asked some friends to stop by.
I want you to hear something.
- What?
- Later, you'll see.
Now we must celebrate.
This is the first time we've all been together since Paris.
Oh, Paris.
You know, if we close our eyes and just listen to our voices... we could imagine we are in Paris.
I can see those enormous cigars in that shop near the hotel.
I can see the marble bathrooms at the Clarence.
And I can see the girls at the Folies Bergre.
And Peggy Dayton.
I see Paris at night time.
The glittering lights.
- The Arc de Triomphe.
- And Peggy Dayton.
- Champagne.
- And Peggy Dayton.
Why should you see Peggy Dayton?
Stick to the Folies Bergre,
I'll see Peggy Dayton.
No quarrels, please.
There are enough memories for all of us.
My friends.
Mail!
It's for you, Ninotchka, from Paris!
- From Paris?
- From Paris!
It's from Steve.
What is it, Ninotchka? Bad news?
It's all right, Ninotchka.
They can't censor our memories.
That must be my friends.
Come in.
- Comrade Boroff.
- Comrades, you're just in time.
May I present to you
Nina Yoschenko, Ivanov...
Brankov, Bibinski.
Sit down, Comrades.
How about over there, on the couch.
They are very fine musicians.
Comrades, will you get ready, please.
Ninotchka, you know how angry we were... when they turned my
Ode to a Tractor into Josephine?
Now, I've become fascinated with this form of music.
I'm going to play for you my latest and most decadent composition.
Listen to this with an open mind.
- Ready, Comrades?
- Yes, Comrade Boroff.
It's real cool.
When commercial capitalism occupies a position... of unquestioned ascendancy... it everywhere constitutes a system of plunder and decadence.
Of all the classes that stand face to face with the bourgeoisie... the proletariat alone is a really revolutionary class.
No, no, and no!
But I have got to get to Moscow!
Now, why can't I have a visa?
I've told you for weeks, Mr. Canfield, we do not let just anybody into Russia.
It is as hard to get in as it is to get out.
Just get me in, and I'll worry about getting out.
Do you really mean you want to go to Russia of your own free will?
- That's right.
- Nobody's forcing you?
No.
Very strange.
Why?
If you must know, because I'm in love with a Russian girl.
Why didn't you say so before?
No visa!
- Good morning, Comrade.
- Good morning, Comrade Commissar.
Here is my report on the public library situation in Bryansk.
You've finished the whole investigation?
That's marvelous.
You must have worked day and night.
Don't you ever sleep?
I need very little sleep.
I've already started an identical survey in Rostov.
I'm afraid you will have to turn over that work to someone else.
May I ask why?
It concerns your friends
Bibinski, Ivanov and Brankov.
You must share the blame, since on the strength of your report...
I sent them back to Paris.
What have they done?
We have sent them on a mission concerning the sale of our films.
They have been there for weeks and haven't sold one film.
This anonymous report was sent to me. Listen:
"They are dragging the name of your country...
"through every cafe and nightclub in Paris.
"How can you expect the Soviet cause to gain respect...
"when your envoys indulge in such decadent behavior?
"Last Thursday they got so drunk they entered a dance contest...
"and won. "
Something called the cha-cha-cha.
You say your report is anonymous.
How can you be sure that it is correct?
It has been confirmed.
I want you to go to Paris and bring them back.
They can dance the cha-cha-cha in Siberia!
Please, send somebody else.
You're the only one I can trust to put the State above personal feelings.
Please, send me any place else, but not to Paris.
Let me stay here. Please.
- Please, don't make me go to Paris.
- You are wasting my time, Comrade.
Do your duty.
Yes, Comrade.
La Vieille Russie
I must have the wrong address. I'm looking for Bibinski, Brankov and Ivanov.
- Comrade Yoschenko?
- Yes.
They're expecting you. Allow me.
Come with me, please.
In there, please.
I will take care of this.
Entrez!
Mademoiselle Ninotchka! Entrez!
We would have met the plane, but we simply had to be here.
Look how well she looks.
Magnifique! Let me have your coat.
Ninotchka, you are the only woman who can come out of Russia... looking like she's never been there.
Formidable!
Ninotchka, you arrived just in time.
In time for what? What is all this?
Why are you dressed this way?
And this place, what is it?
What are you doing here?
Darling, don't hold an inquisition the minute you come to Paris.
We'll answer all your questions later.
Right now the show is starting.
We should be out front.
- What show?
- We'll tell you later about everything.
- Now, let's get out of here.
- Hurry, hurry.
Mademoiselle.
Right here, Ninotchka, s'il vous plat.
Tell me what all this is about.
I don't want to see a show,
I want to talk to you.
Welcome to Paris.
Bravo!
Well, surprised?
Tell me, does Steve dance here now?
Has he given up films?
No, it's just for tonight.
It's the opening and he's protecting his financial interest in the cafe.
He'll tell you all about it.
He'll join us in a moment.
Speaking of Canfield's interests, do you know he's madly in love?
In fact, he's going to get married.
Married?
I would say at the earliest possible moment.
I would say even earlier.
Mr. Canfield's plans are no concern of mine.
My business is here with you.
Let us go where we can talk.
My mission is unpleasant.
Comrades, you have done it again.
Ninotchka, we are no longer comrades.
We're friends now.
Listen to me.
You are in a desperate position.
Last time I was able to save you with my report.
It won't work this time.
We must find another way to defeat Markovitch.
Good old Markovitch!
Is he still alive?
How does he manage?
I don't understand.
You're facing Siberia, and you stand here and make jokes.
Of course you don't understand.
Ninotchka, we are in no danger.
- We are not going back to Siberia.
- We're not going back to Russia.
- Not going back?
- Let's tell her.
We have settled here. We own this cafe.
- It is ours.
- We are now rotten capitalists.
And if all goes well, we'll be much more rotten than we ever dreamed.
You mean you've deserted Russia?
Deserted Russia.
Our restaurant, this here is Russia.
The Russia of goodwill and hospitality.
Happy people.
- Blinis with sour cream.
- And pirozhki.
We are not only serving good food, we are making friends for our people.
I see you have made your decision.
If this is what you want...
I'm happy for you.
There's nothing to keep me here.
No, Ninotchka, you must stay here.
- You can't go without seeing Steve.
- He'll be right here.
There's a midnight plane to Moscow.
I must leave now.
Ninotchka.
It was nice to see you, Steve.
- I'm sorry, I must catch a plane.
- Don't be angry with me.
I couldn't get into Russia, so I had to get you out.
Maybe I was a little devious about it, but at least you're here.
I am here because of an anonymous report on these three.
Anonymous! He wrote it.
And we helped him write it.
Why? It doesn't make sense.
Why did you go to so much trouble to get me out of Russia?
Certainly it makes sense.
We told you, he's in love.
Yes, I heard you were going to be married.
Congratulations.
Darling, we're going to be married.
- We?
- Yes. You and I. Us.
I wrote and wrote you about it.
Steven...
I only received one letter from you.
And that one they wouldn't let me read.
It began:
"Ninotchka, my darling," and ended:
"Yours, Steve. "
I'm not going to tell you what came between.
But I'll prove it to you.
But it'll take a long time, Ninotchka.
At least a lifetime.
You.
Come here.
Hurrah!
BLACK ORPHEUS
Adaptation and dialogues by
Jacques Viot and Marcel Camus
A film by
Marcel Camus
Serafina, look how beautiful!
No!
Sorry l am very sorry, but you really scared me
Oh, child... are you shaking?
Poor thing... l can feel your heart beating... right here... in your hand, like a trapped bird
Let me give you something that will help you forget
Here. lt's not very pretty lt is very pretty, indeed.
Thank you very much
Let me help you if you don't mind but l won't be able to guide you. l don't know Rio l'll manage. l know this city like the palm of my hand l may even point you in the right direction, if you wish
Let's go
Onions... onions
Would you like a steak?
Wonderful
Wonderful. Shall we stroll around? Shall we?
The biggest necklaces, here, the biggest necklaces
Hey, girl, let's go!
Are you done, Orpheus?
Go get your paycheck
Hey, you!
What are you doing here? l was told to go to the end of the line
-So? You're looking at it
-Thank you
-Are you from around here?
-No
-Where are you going?
-To my cousin's house
Well, then it's OK
Take care of this girl, Hermes.
She's looking for her cousin
He'll find your cousin for you. He finds everything l must go and get my paycheck
Another one for the collection.
Nice girl
-She is naive.
-Yeah, right. l know you
-Watch out, Mira is around.
-Orpheus!
-Didn't l tell you?
-Orpheus!
Sorry to break up your party.
Are you telling her fortune?
-Why not?
-No way!
With her looks, she'll only have bad luck
You're too much of a show-off to deserve good luck
Are you coming?
She is crazy
-Have you been to carnival?
-No, l have not
-ls that why you came?
-No
You'll end up going.
No one can resist the madness
See? There is no mistake
Just follow this path and you'll find the place
-Thank you very much.
-My name is Hermes lf you get lost again, please come back l'm always here, l am the station guard
Thanks. Some day l'll be back
You're loaded! Hand it over, let me see it
Did you get the directions?
Yes, thanks
-Do you know her?
-No
-Why so much fuss then?
-Because l am very kind
-Kind?!
-lsn't she cute?
-What about me? Let's go!
-Where to?
See, Hermes? He is cynical to the point of asking ''where to''
Don't you remember that we are getting married?
-Pay attention, man!
-What eyes she has!
And l have a good memory, you know? l know! Poor guy!
Enough!
-Where is the fifth forum?
-1 st floor, 2nd door, right side
Take your hat off!
Fix your tie. What a mess
Let me fix it, let me
-Give me a kiss.
-There's people coming
Come
Marriage license?
Sorry! lt's for tomorrow
No, for today.
We want a license
-We want to get married, right?
-Are you sure?
-Of course! Why do you ask?
-Sorry, l was just kidding l said that because everybody comes here to get married lt is quite funny
Names? What is your name?
-Orpheus.
-Orpheus
Obviously, the bride's name must be Eurydice
My name is not Eurydice.
Why do you say that?
Because everybody knows that
Orpheus loves Eurydice
Do you love some woman called Eurydice? l don't know any
Eurydice! What is this?
Nothing... nothing. That's an old story. Just kidding
That's not funny at all! l'm not interested in these old stories, Orpheus
My name is Mira
Let's go, Mira!
Are you happy now?
You got what you wanted
-Are you buying me a ring?
-What ring?
Now that we are engaged, you must give me a ring
-With what money?
-You did get your paycheck!
-You won't do it? -l've got to get my guitar out of hock
That's what interests me.
Tomorrow is carnival. A ring?
-Silly! Buy your own ring!
-No, you have to give it to me! l told you, l have no money!
-l can loan you some.
-All right!
But you're the one who has to get me a ring! Come on!
-What else do you want?
-First my guitar!
Orpheus... Orpheus
You will look beautiful as a king! l am the king!
Leave it here on the bench...
Enough
-What is this? -These crooks aren't interested...
-All right, all right.
-Hold it. Look, it works well!
This relic is worth much more than 1 00 cruzeiros...
Any museum would pay alot for this. And it plays well l just need the 1 00 cruzeiros l just want 1 00 cruzeiros for carnival. lt plays well l know. Here are the 1 00 cruzeiros, and take this away!
-1 00 cruzeiros! Great!
-Take this devil away!
No, now it belongs to you
You think that's funny, huh?
You made a good deal
-Hold this piece of junk!
-Hold on...
Hold this
Don't get mad, all right? lsn't it a beauty?
-lt is beautiful, indeed.
-Yes, but you owe me 1 1 0 bucks
-What?
-One hundred and ten!
Are you sad, birdy?
He didn't come
He will come.
Sing, bird. Sing!
-Bread! -l spent all my money on a costume
Chico! Chico!
Oh... lt's you!
-Good morning.
-Good morning. Come in
You're the last thing l expected. l thought it was him
-Him?
-Chico Boto! You don't know him
What a man.
He travels all the time
But he promised to be here for carnival
-Your husband?
-No, why?
We just like each other.
And l'm all his!
You should see what a chest he has lt doesn't mean that l'm not happy to see you!
Actually, since he's not here, it's quite convenient
Let me guess...
You came for carnival!
-l ran away.
-Ran away?
-l'm scared, Serafina!
-You? Scared?
Of what? Of whom?
A man who come to the farm and kept chasing after me
-Because you're beautiful, silly! -No
-l'm sure he wants to kill me.
-Are you crazy, girl?
He just wants to get into your pants, don't you see?
No... he wants to kill me. l know he does l know. Listen and answer me.
Does he know you're here?
-No.
-Then, forget about that! Come
You must be starving. All l have is onions. Do you have money?
Never mind. l'm asking because my costume was expensive
Forget it. The Portuguese grocer will do anything for a kiss
You are really very beautiful!
Good trick
Good morning, Benedito.
How are you?
-ls that amulet for me?
-No, it is for her
-You don't even know her!
-Now l will. Do you want...
-Thank you, Benedito.
-You already know my name?
My name is Eurydice. l'll keep this forever
-Even after l die?
-That's nonsense. Come on
That boy is full of strange ideas. Let's go, come on!
Give me a kiss
-Enough! Only one.
-And you?
-A fish.
-Fish... fish... fish
Something makes me think you came with no money
Exactly! l bring you customers like myself- bold ones
You'll be flexible, won't you?
My pretty little fatso...
One more, please
You are terrible! Always asking for credit, and now this!
No way! Nobody owes me money!
Here! This should hold you for a little while
That's much better.
What about her? lt looks like she's not used to this... poor thing!
-What about you? No kiss?
-No way! l rather pay!
That's too bad, since her man...
This woman is much smarter than you
-Forget it! That's just talk.
-Everybody knows that lf he's really getting married, poor thing! lt's time now.
They are arriving
Take anything you want! ls everybody crazy?
You're not going to see him?
Who?
She doesn't know him yet.
When she does, she'll run even faster than the others.
Are you taking that?
No way, that's green!
Green, green- of course!
Did you want a red chayote?
This can't be! Poor baby!
You're getting hitched?
She's really serious
Do you want me to get rid of your little fiance? May l?
-How did you do it?
-He insisted l'm so happy!
-You're suffocating me! -l'm happy for you! Give me a hug
-What's going on?
-Oh, it's you! Nothing
Sorry. l must tune the guitar for the rehearsal
-Orpheus! Orpheus!
-Later... later!
-He doesn't want it.
-Didn't l tell you?
-You're an idiot!
-My costume is cool
So beautiful
-Where is Orpheus?
-He left already?
Yes, he said we should meet at the rehearsal
He could at least have told me
You know, he is so shaken, poor thing
Let me see your ring again
-What a beauty! ls it real?
-Almost lt looks great, doesn't it?
Orpheus, will you dance with me?
Yes. Soon, at the rehearsal
How is everybody?
How are you, Caruso?
You two... always cuddling, huh?
-Would you ask him?
-No, you ask him l would like to ask you something ls it true that you make the sun rise by playing guitar?
-Of course l do!
-Didn't l tell you?
Could you make the sun rise tomorrow?
Sure! Even better, since tomorrow is carnival!
What do you play to do that?
-l make it up.
-And you? Could you? l could make up a melody! l'd love to make the sun rise
Give him the guitar.
Just to ckeck it out
This is a very old guitar...
-''Orpheus is my master''.
-Yes, that's true
There was an Orpheus before me.
And one may come after l'm gone but l'm the one ruling now.
Do you understand that?
Don't be sad.
Don't tell anybody, OK? l will play a new song l just wrote
Pretty, isn't it?
Morning, such a pretty morning
A new song is born
Singing of your eyes,
your laughter, your hands
There will be a day
when you come
From the strings of my guitar
That only your love sought
A voice comes
And talks about kisses
Kisses lost in your lips
Sing, my heart,
happiness is back
ln the dawn of this love
-What are you doing here?
-l have the right to...
Zeca, take the guitar!
You didn't see me!
-lsn't he here?
-Who?
Was that you playing?
Orpheus taught me
Where is he?
He just left with a woman
What?
Since you have the guitar, play something
He'll hear me
That's even better. Play
You again? What are you doing here?
Why didn't you tell me that
Serafina is your cousin?
So, we are close.
What's your name?
Don't you remember? l'm Eurydice
Wonderful! l like you already!
Of course! Orpheus likes
Eurydice, as the story goes
Are you Orpheus?
-Yes, l am. From head to toe.
-But l... l don't like you
Yes, you do! Try to remember.
This is really an old story
Thousands of years ago, Orpheus was sad and melancholic like the bird trapped in this cage
One day, from the strings of a guitar, sought by only one love, a voice spoke of lost kisses from the lips of Eurydice
And Eurydice's lips were trembling with anxiety... and the perfumed flower of her mouth opened slightly
No! You are too young to remember
Yes... l remember the words you sang...
-because they are the same!
-Exactly!
But it was the melody l liked best
Forgive me, Eurydice
Look l need to talk to him
No, leave them alone!
Orpheus, they're waiting for you at the rehearsal!
Yes!
Well... l need to go l know l'll sing and dance for you!
-Are you coming?
-Yes, l am
Take good care of her!
Let's go!
See you later
Thanks
Why aren't you paying any attention to me? l have no time now
-Answer me!
-Go back to your place! l'm sorry. He already saw you. He and the sun
Look at Serafina.
She is the Queen of Night
Look how happy she is
-And who is she?
-Her?
That's Mira. She plays the Queen of Day
-She is pretty, isn't she?
-Yes
She is Orpheus' fiance
Look, he's going to kiss her
-OK, that's enough!
-What's so funny?
-Nothing! That's enough!
-Why didn't you kiss me?
Leave me alone. Have you tried on your costumes?
Of course! Mira's costume is a beauty, isn't it? lt has embroidered sleeves.
Let's go see it
Come and dance, Eurydice, come
Come on!
-And who is that?
-Ask Orpheus!
-l want a costume for her, OK?
-OK, all right
When it comes to women, nobody is better than you!
Leave me alone!
She is pretty! Hot girl
-lsn't she better than Mira?
-Much better! A real beauty!
-She has good taste.
-Drop it!
-So what? So what?
-Where is the costume?
That's all we have. A woman like this doesn't need costumes
-Hold on, let me look next door.
-No
-That's right, you're with Mira.
-Why are you talking about her? lt's nothing... nothing
You don't waste any time, do you?
Shall l introduce my cousin?
Be good now. Take care of her. l want a pretty costume for her
-Oh, you!
-Seriously
You don't even know her!
Yes, l do
Look at me
Look at me!
Oh, boy!
Don't make faces! This is not tragic. l'll take care of it
People, leave the girl alone! l'll take care of her!
-l will help!
-lt's high time!
Don't just stand there!
Move! Go!
Quickly, quickly! l'll take care of her
-Orpheus, is Eurydice here?
-Yes. Why?
-Eurydice, someone's looking for you! -Who?
-A man.
-Who is he? l don't know.
He's not from around here
-Who is it?
-Don't be afraid
Tell him she's left.
She's gone
What are you waiting for?
No!
No!
Calm down. Calm down!
Calm down! There's nothing to be afraid of!
Take care of her!
What happened?
-Eurydice! She got scared!
-Eurydice? -My cousin
-Her name is Eurydice?
-She has the right
Orpheus!
What happened, Benedito? l tried to catch him, but he threw me on the ground
-Where did he go?
-l don't know. That way
That's impossible!
There is a cliff there!
-The man fled that way.
-That way?
What's wrong with him?
-Take care of him.
-Orpheus! What happened?
Who is this Eurydice woman?
Are you sleeping with her?
-No! Let me go!
-Stay here!
No! lf you go...
So, you chased him away?
Eurydice! ls that you? Serafina!
Answer me!
Eurydice!
Where are you? ldiot! You scared me!
You're the one hiding, and l scared you?
-Where is my cousin?
-Your cousin?
-Yes, my cousin!
-Ah, she was your cousin?
-You scared her too, right?
-Who, me?
Fine! l need to find her!
Hold it! l came from
Montevideo to see you!
She'll find her way
-Where is Eurydice?
-He saw her, but she ran off
Where to?
-Answer, man!
-Don't know! That way
He'll find her
Chico!
-Chico, my love!
-You're strangling me!
No!
No! He'll kill you!
He'll kill you!
Take care of her l am not in a hurry
We shall meet soon
So long
You are in my arms, Eurydice l will protect you forever... against everything l like you, Eurydice
You will never feel scared again... never
Chico Boto has arrived.
Do you want to stay here?
Yes
You won't be scared here.
They're great
He will protect you too.
He is a beast!
And then... then there is me
-Let go!
-Orpheus, is that you?
Orpheus! l swear l heard people talking. Didn't you?
-lt was the dog.
-Talking?
No. So what?
Gimme
-She is in good hands.
-Who?
-My cousin.
-Your cousin? Didn't she run off?
Dummy! Open your mouth and close your eyes
More! More!
The dog ripped one of the little animals
They're not animals, they're signs of the zodiac lt's beautiful
That's where l was born. lt's my house in heaven
A baby sheep? l'll rent the one right next to it, so l'll always be near you
Should l?
Good night
Good night l'll sleep outside. lt's closer to my house... and yours
Good night, Eurydice
One... two... three... four... five
-They're playing.
-l hope they will let us sleep
Come!
Come on!
Got you!
You haven't gotten me yet
l can't
l will catch you!
Did l hurt you?
Poor thing!
-ls it still hurting?
-No. lt's better
Wait!
Ah, Chico! l won, didn't l?
You always win
Zeca... Zeca!
Let's go... it's time.
Hurry! Hurry!
All right... l'm coming lt's too early to get up, boy.
Let us sleep in peace!
-Close that door!
-Yes, yes, gramma
Let's go, it's late already
What are these devils doing at this hour?
Quiet, Caruso!
He won't find it.
We better tell him
Yeah, right! Come on, let's see
What if he's asleep? l'll knock on the door
What did l tell you?
My happiness is dreaming
ln the eyes of my girlfriend
lt's like this night, passing
Seeking the dawn
Speak low, please
So she might wake up happy
Look... it's rising
Offering a kiss of love lt's true
Sadness has no end
Happiness does
Happiness is like a drop of dew
On a flower's petal
Brilliant and tranquil,
then quivering
Then falling like a tear of love
Serafina, where is your costume?
Chico is here!
He is always hungry!
-You look beautiful!
-Wait, let me get Orpheus!
No, l'm in a hurry. l will run ahead
Thanks
-Are you getting married today?
-Orpheus forgot
Why? Didn't he invite you?
Eurydice!
Ah, Eurydice
You were here? Quick!
Get your costume on, quick!
No. Quick. No, no... not there, no... that way
-ln a hurry, aren't we?
-Mira... she's coming
So what if she's coming?
Come, dear.
Aren't you ready?
-No... l'm in no hurry.
-ls he out of his mind?
-Orpheus, you promised me.
-l'll keep your scarf
God, he's silly! How did you get him to be like that?
You're awake already!
At least say good morning!
-Who is that?
-My cousin
Your cousin?
Let's not start with that again, OK? Go to sleep!
-l'm hungry.
-Wait!
Eat, eat, eat all the time!
Here, eat and shut up!
God Almighty!
What can l do? l like him lt happens to everybody.
Look at you
Wow! You look great!
What am l going to drink?
Here, but l don't want to see you again
-Nice costume.
-lt was Orpheus' idea
-Happy you.
-Me?
Carnival is very nice, child, but tomorrow Chico leaves again
Here, button this down
-l'd rather fool around with him.
-l'd rather dance with Orpheus
Orpheus, open the door! lncredible!
What if you were to dance in my place?
-No!
-Yes! That's it!
-Orpheus, open the door!
-l'm coming, l'm coming
What are you doing?
Can't you see? Look
Am l pretty?
-Yes.
-What's the matter?
You could at least look
Do you have a sore throat?
-Are you...
-Listen, Mira, l need to
New? Must be... What are these animals on the scarf?
They are not animals.
They are zodiac signs
Zodiac signs! You don't say!
And the girl next door took you to heaven last night, right?
Answer me!
Here! That's what l think of this bitch's dirty rag lt's her, isn't it?
-Shut up!
-You're afraid she will hear!
Listen, if l see her again with you, l will kill her!
We came to help you take the sun l will wait for you outside
Here. My tambourine
You look very pretty, you know?
Who was screaming next door?
-Nobody.
-Was that Mira?
-Since you already know...
-Orpheus told me everything
-He promised to talk to her.
-l understand
-Aren't you coming, Serafina?
-Yes, l'm coming!
She is going to be mad
-Quick, put your veil down.
-Now?
Now! Otherwise Mira will think l've been playing tricks on her
She is no good l'm coming! Chico, wake up and give my cousin a kiss, quick!
-Your cousin?
-Yes!
-That's her!
-You win the smart prize!
Now she is me, and you will kiss her as if she were me, OK?
-Kiss her?
-Yes, her!
No, not here. At the door! l'm coming! Soon! Soon!
Kiss her! Hard!
Enough!
Say something to her!
-Like what?
-What? How, what?
What... what... what
But l don't know your cousin!
-Look at Serafina's costume.
-Too much veil, not enough face!
For Serafina, that's an advantage, trust me!
Orpheus, are you going to stand there forever? Let's go!
Ask Serafina if Eurydice is coming. Run!
Serafina, Orpheus wants to know if Eurydice is coming
Why do you have her amulet?
-ls it a secret?
-Yes. Only Orpheus may know it l'll run and tell him to wait for you
Attention! Attention!
Here comes the best...
Portela Samba School!
Come, Zeca, let's help hold the rope
Didn't even notice it
-What?
-Don't know, look at Serafina
-l love you.
-And l love you, Orpheus
Let's go, it is our turn!
Here comes Babylon United
Samba School!
-Do you love me?
-Dance in your spot!
Answer me! l wanted to explain before.
Now it's too late. Go!
Zeca, look! Death!
That's nothing.
Just a masked man
Look!
My amulet!
Eurydice!
Watch out!
Catch it, Benedito!
Attention! The presence of
Orpheus, representative...
of United Babylon is
required at the Jury's stand!
Why did you choose Serafina to dance in my place?
Not now. The Jury is calling me! Come, Lourdes!
Orpheus, please, the
Jury's stand is this way!
Thank you, thanks... everybody deserves... look, look l will kill you!
No!
l'll kill you! l'll kill you! ldiot!
Attention! Here comes
''Estao Primeira''!
Eurydice, Eurydice
What happened, child?
Calm down, calm down
-He wants to kill me!
-Don't cry! Come on
He is going to kill me!
Go to my house.
You'll be safe there
-l'll tell Orpheus.
-No, l am so scared
Calm down, child.
Let me look for him
You know the way
Go, my child
Don't worry, go... l will tell
Orpheus right away. Go!
No!!
Eurydice! Where are you?
Eurydice!
Orpheus!
Orpheus!
Eurydice!
Now she is mine! lt's OK... it's nothing
No, it's
-lt's over, Orpheus!
-Eurydice!
She is dead, Orpheus!
-No! l want to see Eurydice!
-You can only see her dead
-No!
-She was sent to the morgue
No, she is alive! l'm going to find her! lt's true, Orpheus. Wait!
-May l go?
-Yes
Wait , Orpheus! Orpheus!
-They are all like that at first.
-No!
They really liked each other
Really... does that exist? lt does
Orpheus, wait for me! l'd like some information
Are you family? Then you can't stay here lt is forbidden.
You can't come in
Stop, stop!
You can't go up!
Go, go- Go away! lt went up
Stop!
What do you want?
What are you doing here?
-Nothing.
-Then, please leave lt's forbidden and we have no time to waste
Don't be sad, Orpheus lt's over... lt's all over
Hold this bitch!
-l know him.
-l know this guy
-Are you Orpheus, from Babylon?
-Yes, l am
He is incredible!
The best! Great singer!
Sing something for us! The one you sang for us... how was it?
Sing, man!
What's your problem?
-l'm looking for a lost person.
-That's not here
These are soccer fans.
Missing Persons, 1 2th floor
-Where is that?
-l'll show you. Come here
Show me that step
That thing... that one.
Something like that
OK, go... get out of here
Get out of here!
Go away!
Anybody there?
What are you looking for, brother?
Missing Persons
There is such a section... but l never saw any missing people there. Just paper
That's Missing Persons
See? Nobody there... but lots of paper, see?
The house is full.
1 5 floors of paper... for nothing
Can you read?
-Yes.
-l can't
Feel free to look around, if you wish... but you will not find missing people in papers
On the contrary, that's where they get lost
Are you suffering, my brother? l lost Eurydice lt's as if she were burning inside my heart
Keep calling... She will come l am calling
You alone... that's not strong enough... and these papers will not give you an answer
Do you think paper cares for anybody?
Let's go, my brother. l know where to take you
Let's go
Sweeping, or not sweeping, there is always more paper
Come, Orpheus
Quiet! Calm down,
Cerberus... calm down
Calm down, Cerberus
That's how it goes.
She received the spirit
Call her...
Sing, Orpheus!
Sing, Orpheus... go ahead!
Sing, Orpheus!
Orpheus, Orpheus
Eurydice!
Eurydice!
Don't look back, Orpheus.
You will never see me again
Where are you, Eurydice?
l'm close to you, Orpheus
Do you love me enough to accept
hearing me without seeing me? l love you, Eurydice, but l want to see you! My arms are empty! l want to see you, to hold you close to me
No! You will lose me, Orpheus
You are not there.
You are tricking me!
No! l want to see you!
Orpheus, you're killing me!
Farewell, Orpheus.
You'll never see me again
No! You lied to me!
Why did you do that to me?
-You lied to me.
-Calm down, Orpheus. Don't leave!
Hermes, that's him. lt is him! lt's me. Hermes also came l've nothing left in life l am poorer than the poorest of the black men
Seek mercy, my son.
We are all poor and... what's left to be said is the poor people's word- thanks l ask you for mercy, Hermes
All l can do is give you mercy
Here. l have already done everything that had to be done l think that you'll get true mercy there
Thank you, Hermes
No, my son. You are going to thank Eurydice
Yes
Are you going to take her yourself?
All right.
Come with me lf you don't want it, it's always interesting... having another cadaver for the doctors, for science
And it is also cheaper for you lt is my duty to ask that question, because of them... and, the truth is, when one is here...
Carnival is over, there is nothing one can do
Would you like to try and identify her?
Careful, you'll get a cold dressed like that
Death is cheap here, right?
Careful! You're shaking
The same thing happens to me
lt doesn't help to be careful.
l have a cold all year round
Everything is beautiful, Eurydice
My heart is a bird whose thirst is quenched by a drop of dew
Thank you, Eurydice.
Thank you for this new day
You are the one who carries me l am in your arms, like a sleeping child
The sweet breath of your chest l know you will take me where l must go
Thank you, Eurydice. The path you chose is full of flowers
The sun is rising to embrace us, my love
You are singing, Eurydice
The happiness of the poor is
the great illusion of carnival
We work all year long
Mira!
No! No! No!
Zeca!
Hurry! Hurry!
-Play and make the sun rise!
-l don't know how!
-Sure, you know.
-l don't know if l can!
Make it up!
-Come on, play!
-l don't know
You do know, come on!
He plays well, doesn't he?
What are you looking at?
Shut up!
He is making the sun rise!
He made the sun rise!
Wow! Just like Orpheus!
-Now you are Orpheus.
-No
Yes. Take this little flower
Play a song for me, please
Come on!
Subtitles proofread by
Pippi Longstocking
November 8, 2013
No rights reserved
(man)  I love your funny face
 Your sunny, funny face
 For you're a cutie
 With more than beauty
 You've got a lot of
 Personality-N-T
 You fill the air with smiles
 For miles and miles and miles
 Though you're no Mona Lisa
 For worlds I'd not replace
 Your sunny, funny face
 You've made my life so glamorous
 You can't blame me for feeling amorous
 Oh, s'wonderful
 S'marvelous
Good morning, Miss Prescott.
Good morning, Miss Prescott.
(Miss Prescott) Now hear this!
I simpIy cannot release this issue the way it is!
In the 60 years of Quality magazine, this hits rock bottom.
If I let this go through, I will have failed the American woman.
(all) No, Miss Prescott, don't say that!
The great American woman, who stands out there naked, waiting for me to tell her what to wear.
It doesn't speak.
And if it won't speak to me, it won't speak to anyone.
A magazine must be like a human being.
If it comes into the home it must contribute.
It just can't lie around.
A magazine must have...
..blood and brains and pizzazz.
This is just paper!
If I send paper to the American woman, I will have let her down.
(all) No, Miss Prescott, you mustn't say that.
Yes. D for down.
D for dreary.
D for dull and for depressing, dismal and deadly!
Ahh! Here it is!
Here is our theme.
Here is our answer. Pink!
Girls, girls, girls, girls.
Listen, take this to all the designers.
I want dresses made up in exactly this shade of pink.
Babs, take this to Kaiser Delmont.
I want shoes and stockings in exactly this colour.
Laura, everything goes pink!
I want the whole issue pink.
I want the whole country pink!
Lettie, take an editorial.
"To the women of America..."
No, make it
"To the women everywhere."
Banish the black, burn the blue, and bury the beige.
From now on, girls...
 Think pink! Think pink when you shop for summer clothes
 Think pink! Think pink if you want that quelque chose
 Red is dead, blue is through
 Green's obscene, brown's taboo
 And there is not the slightest excuse for plum or puce
 Or chartreuse
 Think pink!
Forget that Dior says black and rust
 Think pink! Who cares if the new look has no bust?
 Now, I wouldn't presume to tell a woman
 What a woman ought to think
 But tell her if she's gotta think, think pink
(women)  For bags, pink for shoes
 Razzle, dazzle and spread the news
 And pink's for the lady with joie de vivre
 Pink's for all the family
 Try pink shampoo
 Pink toothpaste too!
 Play in pink, all day in pink
 Pretty gayin' pink
 Drive in pink
 Come alive in pink
 Have a dive in pink
 Go out dancing but just remember one thing
 You can get a little wink
 If you got a little pink
 In your swing
 Think pink! Think pink, it's the latest word, you know
 Think pink! Think pink, and you're Michelangelo
 Feels so gay, feels so bright
 Makes your day, makes your night
 Pink is now the colour to which you gotta switch
 To which you gotta switch
 Every stitch
 Every stitch you switch
 Think pink! Think pink on the long, long road ahead
 On the road
 Think pink! Think pink, and the world is rosy red
 Everything's rosy
 Everything on the great horizon
 Everything that you can think
 And that includes the kitchen sink
 Think pink
 Think pink, think pink
 Think pink, think pink
 Think pink, think pink, think pink!
Maggie?
Dovitch! I want to see you.
Girls, back to work.
Gentlemen, that will do!
The Union Pacific railroad is going to paint a whole train pink and send it on a north west tour.
TWA will let me know this afternoon if we can have a pink plane.
I haven't seen a woman in two weeks in anything but pink.
- What about you?
- Me? I wouldn't be caught dead!
Dovitch, I can't wait to tell you about my feature for the next issue.
It's my newest project.
And when you hear it, you will drop!
- Now what?
- Just you listen.
Dick Avery started working on the pictures this morning.
He's more excited about it than any of us.
Here it is. Clothes for the woman who isn't interested in clothes.
(man) Marion, give me a long look.
Longer.
Longer!
Steve, eh, tip that back light down a bit, will you? OK.
Hold it, boys.
Beethoven isn't working. Try Brahms.
Ahm, look, Marion,
I'd like to try it again.
This time, let's see if we can't get with it.
Keep in mind that you're a woman who thinks.
Now, that is a piece of sculpture by Itsabuchi.
Look at it as if you understand it.
As if it understands you. See?
No Marion, I'm afraid that's not the way we look when we're thinking of Itsabuchi.
React to it. Just... say it.
Itsabuchi, hmm?
You haven't quite got it.
Now, listen carefully.
You are in the Museum of Modern Art,
Marion.
Deep, Marion. Profound, Marion.
You have come across this statue.
And it says something to you because you are intellectual, always thinking.
What are you thinking?
I'm thinking this is taking a long time, and I'll never be able to pick up Harold's laundry.
When Harold doesn't get his laundry, disaster!
If we don't get this fixed, you may never see Harold's laundry or Harold again. Let's go.
The woman who thinks must come to grips with fashionable attire.
A woman can be beautiful, as well as intellectual. See facing page.
And how is the facing page?
The facing page looks about as intellectual as a snake.
Nonsense. Marion can be very deep.
Look at her. She's reading.
Marion, dear, what are you reading?
Minute Men From Mars!
Are we all gonna hang around, or get somebody else?
- How about Lucy Brand?
- On her honeymoon.
- Betty Hayes?
- She's in jail.
Are there no models around who can think as well as they look?
Marion might look better in a different background.
We can go on location.
Some intellectual hang-out.
- Somewhere with books.
- A book store!
Of course! One of those sinister places in Greenwich Village. Come on, girls!
Let's hurry. We might have to stop and pick up Harold's laundry on the way.
There's one.
(Dick) Driver, stop here.
That's sinister enough.
Melissa, for heaven's sake, help me with this lamp! It's heavy.
I can't, Babs, I got my hands full.
It's movingly dismal. We couldn't have done better if we'd designed it ourselves.
Marion looks smarter already.
I'm sorry. I didn't see you up there.
Are you alright?
Yes, thank you. Can I help you?
Would you like a book?
- (Miss Prescott) Marion, over here.
- Who are those?
May I help you?
Thank you very much.
I think we have everything we need.
Please tell me what all this is about.
We're just going to take a few pictures.
Pictures? What sort of pictures?
- Are you the owner?
- No, Dr Post is.
I work here, and I'm in charge in her absence.
I'm Jo Stockton. Can you help me?
How do you do? I'm Dick Avery.
What about these pictures?
Well, we are using the shop as a background for some fashion pictures for Quality magazine.
I'm sorry. but I can't let you do this. Dr Post would never approve.
She doesn't approve of fashion magazines.
It's chi-chi and an unrealistic approach to self-impressions as well as economics.
- We're going to have trouble. She's a thinker.
- She's also a talker!
I must ask you to leave.
We throw ourselves at your mercy.
Haven't poor helpless people like us a right to make a living?
I have asked you to leave.
That is my right.
If the rights of the individual are not respected by the group, the group itself cannot exist for long.
What does that mean?
"Do unto others as you would have others do unto you."
We'll only do unto you for a moment, and it's no more than we would do unto ourselves.
Girls, I want all these books rearranged.
They look too much alike.
They're too pat. Mix them up.
No, you mustn't mix them up.
The books on this shelf pertain to empiricism, and on this shelf, materialism, and on this, psychopiscoparalysm.
Put them back. Oh, please talk to her.
It'll take me hours.
One never talks to Maggie Prescott.
One only listens.
Here. I think we ought to use her in the shot. Miss, come here, please.
- Me?
- You're selling a book to that girl.
Her?
It's very simple. Just pretend that Marion can read.
Say, listen!
Alright, Marion, let's go.
But this would be a violation of all my principles!
It would be hypocrisy for me to lend myself to this sort of idealism.
- I'm sorry, but...
- Shush.
Now, tell Marion about the books so that we can get out of here.
This book deals with epiphenomenalism, which has to do with consciousness as a mere accessory of physiological processes whose presence or absence makes no difference...
Whatever are you doing?
Alright, hold it!
- Good. Get her in another outfit.
- Put on the shebop.
None of you seems to realise you're trespassing on private property.
You run around, sublime ignorant of the fact that I can have you put in jail.
- For the last time...
- You're getting tiresome.
What are you doing?
Let go. Let go of my arm!
I know you don't mean any harm child, but you are in everyone's way.
Now, we won't be a moment.
Let me in!
The air will do her good.
She was very pale.
Alright, hit it.
Hold it. Ready?
Good. One more, please.
Alright. Hit it.
Hold it. Ready?
Very good, Marion.
One more, please. Last one.
Alright, here we go.
Hit it.
Hold it. Ready.
OK, that's it. That ought to do.
- Quite through?
- Thank you. You've been wonderful.
We'll mention the shop in the magazine.
Don't you dare!
(Miss Prescott) Taxi!
Oh, no!
Oh!
Hello there.
I stayed to help you put these things back.
I'm sorry, I didn't realise we made such a mess.
Which shelf for materialism?
Just hand them to me.
Oh, no.
You should be ashamed of yourself.
I'm sorry, we don't usually barge in that way.
I mean a man of your ability wasting his time photographing silly dresses on silly women.
Most people think they're beautiful dresses on beautiful women.
At most, a synthetic beauty.
Trees are beautiful.
Why don't you photograph trees?
I do what I do for a living.
It has to do with supply and demand.
You'd be amazed how small the demand is for pictures of trees.
My work is very pleasant, the pay is excellent, and I get a trip to Paris every year.
I certainly envy you that.
I'd be in Paris now if I could afford it.
You'd have a ball.
You'd go to a party every night, drink nothing but champagne, swim in perfume, and a new love affair every hour on the hour.
If I went to Paris, it would be to go to Emile Flostre's lectures.
Who goes to Paris for lectures?
Professor Flostre is the greatest living philosopher, and father of empathicalism.
Oh? What's empathicalism?
The most sensible approach to true understanding and peace of mind.
Sounds great, but what is it?
It's based on empathy.
Do you know what the word "empathy" means?
No, I'll have to have the beginner's course on that one.
Empathy.
Is it something like sympathy?
Oh, it goes beyond sympathy.
Sympathy is to understand what someone feels.
Empathy is to project your imagination so that you actually feel what the other person is feeling.
You put yourself in the other person's place.
Do I make myself clear?
- Why did you do that?
- Empathy.
I put myself in your place and
I felt that you wanted to be kissed.
I'm afraid you put yourself in the wrong place.
I have no desire to be kissed by you, or anyone else.
Don't be silly. Everybody wants to be kissed, even philosophers.
I'm sorry, Mr Avery, we don't stock what you're looking for.
I'll let you out.
Don't bother. I'll throw myself out.
Goodbye.
 I was taught that
I ought not expose my inner senses
 Had no plan for a man
 I was full of self-defences
 Now I feel that I really should face the consequences
 My philosophic search
 Has left me in the lurch
 I must find why my mind is behaving like a dancer
 What's the clue to pursue?
 For I have to have the answer
 I could cry salty tears
 Where have I been all these years?
 Is it fun?
 Or should I run?
 How long has this been going on?
 There were chills up my spine
 And some thrills I can't define
 Does it show?
 And who would know?
 How long has this been going on?
 Oh, I feel that I could melt
 Into heaven I'm hurled
 I know how Columbus felt
 Finding another world
 Can I trust how I feel?
 Is this my Achilles heel?
 Look at me, I'm all at sea
 How long has this been going on?
 This is grand
 This is great
 I'm in such a lovely state
 Can one kiss
 Do all of this?
(Miss Prescott) Well, Dovitch, what do you think?
(Dovitch) They're all good models.
What have you got in mind?
(Miss Prescott) A fantastic idea.
It staggers me that nobody's thought of it before.
I'm going to select a girl to be the Quality Woman.
This one girl will represent everything the magazine stands for.
It's a great gimmick. Well, any of these models would be alright.
She's got to be more than alright.
She's got to have pizzazz.
An entire collection is going to be designed for her by the greatest couturier in Paris.
- Paul Duval?
- Yes, Paul Duval.
And he's going to let us photograph the collection before the opening.
We'll scoop every other magazine!
- Staggers you, doesn't it?
- I can't believe it.
Why, he would be barred from Harper's Bazaar and
Vogue, and all the other fashion magazines!
Nonsense. If the project comes off, we'll all be heroes.
Wait till you see what I've got.
The girl. The Quality Woman.
Oh, Marion's...
Forget about Marion. This is the other girl
I'm talking about.
That thing from the book shop?
Maggie, she's new.
She's fresh.
You've gone out of your mind.
One can't deny that she is, ehm, unusual. Who is she?
Don't even ask. The thought of her makes me shudder. Dreadful, dreadful girl.
If this is some sort of joke...
It's no joke. If we do her over and fix her up, she'd be great for us.
She'd devour us all.
- Come on, Maggie.
- Well, look at her.
I think her face is perfectly funny.
The Quality Woman must have grace, elegance and pizzazz.
This is the first time
I've seen you lack imagination.
Every girl in Quality has grace, elegance and pizzazz.
What about a girl with character, spirit and intelligence?
That certainly would be novel in a fashion magazine.
Sir, I owe you a drink.
Can you make me some black and white enlargements?
- Yes.
- Use our darkroom.
- Let me study the possibilities.
- Now you are talking.
- I'm not promising anything.
- You don't have to.
Runs around here like he owns the magazine!
Lettie, remember that creature in the book shop?
Get her up here. Order some books.
- A large order, so she can't refuse.
- $50 worth?
Yes, $50 worth if necessary.
$50 to get her up here. We'll have to drug her to get her to Paris.
Er, Miss Prescott, please.
- Lettie, you'd better come out here.
- I've got the books she ordered.
Miss Prescott's secretary will deal with you.
Oh, it's you. Well, come on in.
Come on.
The books are here.
Come in.
That'll be $52 and 75 cents, and $1.20 for the taxi.
Drop the books.
Come on, drop the books.
- On the floor?
- Yes, drop them.
Straighten up, shoulders back.
If you girls only knew how important posture is.
Look, I didn't come here to enroll in a military school.
All I want is $53.95.
The Modigliani is $12.50, and the Braque and Hieronymus Bosch come to $22.75.
$7 for the post-impressionists and $10.50 for The Egyptians -
Fourth to Seventh Dynasties make it a total of $52.75, and there's $1.20 for the taxi.
- Talks incessantly.
- The body's good.
It'll be better when we get through with it.
- Through with what?
- She might do.
Might do what?
The bones are good.
Suppose we leave my bones alone and give me my $53.95?
The eyebrows up, a light powder.
I want a little rouge here.
She needs a marvelous mouth.
The hair is awful. It must come off.
Would you mind telling me what all this is about?
We may as well get started. Babs, get that dreadful thing off of her.
Now, wait a minute. Just a minute!
Don't! Stop!
This is my second and last encounter with you lunatics.
You just keep your hands off me, all of you.
I come here to make a simple delivery and I find myself being pillaged and plundered.
Well, I'll have no more of it.
I don't want my hair cut.
I don't want my eyebrows up or down.
I want them where they are.
And I see no functional advantage in a marvelous mouth.
I'm leaving now, and if anyone makes a move to stop me there'll be plenty of hair cut, and it won't be mine.
Bring her back, girls, alive!
(women) Hurry up.
Hurry. Over here.
Hey, didn't you see that light outside?
In desperation, one does not examine one's avenue of escape.
Oh, it's you.
I'm sorry if I spoiled a print.
That's alright.
What's all the desperation about?
Those people.
They don't care about anyone's feelings.
Pulling my clothes and cutting my hair.
- (knock at door)
- (woman) Is that girl in there?
(whispers) Please don't give me away!
Maybe you should give them a chance...
There was no one here when I came in.
If you see her, hang on to her.
I'll do that.
I'm afraid it's all my fault.
I thought you'd make a good model.
This is your idea?
Yeah, I'm the one you sue.
Oh, how could I be a model?
I have no illusions about my looks.
I think my face is funny.
That's what Maggie said.
I hate to admit it, but she's right.
What you call funny,
I call interesting.
It's too ridiculous even to think about.
- I couldn't do it.
- Let me be the judge of that.
I wouldn't take you to Paris if I didn't think you'd work out.
- Paris?
- Yeah. Look at it this way.
Modeling may not be as bad as you think.
If it is, you'll be in Paris.
You can see your friend Professor Whosis.
- Flostre?
- Yeah.
You can talk to him and go to his lectures.
That way it won't be a total loss.
A means to an end.
Or a means to a beginning, according to how it works out.
Now, let's see.
There we are.
- Oh, no.
- What's the matter?
How can you possibly make a model out of that?
You can't be serious.
When I'm done, you'll look like...
What do you call beautiful?
A tree. You'll look like a tree.
 Frankly, dear, your modesty reveals to me
 Self-appraisal often makes us sad
 And if I add, your funny face appeals to me
 Please don't think
I've suddenly gone mad
 You have all the qualities of Peter Pan
 I'd go far before I'd find a sweeter pan
 I love your funny face
 Your sunny, funny face
 For you're a cutie
 With more than beauty
 You've got a lot of personality for me
 You fill the air with smiles
 For miles and miles and miles
 Though you're no Mona Lisa
 For worlds I'd not replace
 Your sunny, funny face
 I love your funny face
 Your sunny, funny face
 You're not exotic
 But so hypnotic
 You're much too much
 If you can cook the way you look
 I'd swim the ocean wide
 Just to have you by my side
 Though you're no Queen of Sheba
 For worlds I'd not replace
 Your sunny
 funny
 face
Ladies, feast your eyes on our Quality Woman.
Marvelous!
I'm sorry about the trouble.
I didn't realise.
My dear, let me do the apologizing.
I behaved abominably.
She's agreed to go to Paris.
She can hardly wait.
Marvelous!
This is not a loss of integrity.
It is a means to an end, and...
There's no time for talking.
Tell us on the plane.
Alright, girls, we've got to get cracking. To work and to Paris.
- Would you like to take a guided tour of Paris?
- No no no, we're not tourists.
Do we look like those people who run around gaping all day?
I guess they can't understand anyone coming to Paris to work.
We should all go straight to our hotels and get some rest.
- I am exhausted.
- I know how you feel.
I'm so tired it's an effort for me to say I'm tired.
(Miss Prescott) Goodbye.
I'll be in touch.
 I want to step out
 Down the Champs lyses
 From the Arch of Triumph
 To the Petit Palais
 That's for me
 Bonjour, Paris
 I want to wander
 Through the Saint-Honor
 Do some window-shopping
 In the Rue de la Paix
 That's for me
 Bonjour, Paris
 I want to see the den of thinking men
 Like Jean-Paul Sartre
 I must philosophize with all the guys
 Around Montmartre and Montparnasse
(all)  I'm strictly tourist
 But I couldn't care less
 When they parlez-vous me
 Then I gotta confess
 That's for me
 Bonjour, Paris
 Light up the Louvre museum
 Jazz up the Latin quarter
 To show the richest and the poorest
 Here it comes
 The great American tourist
 This has got to be illegal
 What I feel
 Trs gai, trs chic, trs magnifique
 C'est moi, c'est vous, c'est grand, c'est tous tous
 It's too good to be true
 All the things we can do
 You do things to my point of view
 We can show you the north
 Or we can show you the south
 Then we can show you the west
 Come on and show me the best
 That's for me
 Bonjour, Paris
- (crowd) Bonjour!
- Bonjour!
 That's for me
 Bonjour, Paris
(crowd)  Bonjour!
 Living is easy
 The living is high
 All good Americans
 should come here to die
 Bonjour!
 Is it real?
 Am I here?
 Am I here?
 Is it real?
 There's something missing
 There's something missing, I know
(all)  There's something missing
 Something missing, I know
 There's still one place
I've got to go!
- Oh!
- Oh, no!
 I thought that you were tired
 I heard you say that you
 You said that you were so exhausted
 You said you needed sleep
 You told me that you had to rest
 You said you ought to rest
 Is this what you call rest?
 This fussing and fretting is getting my goat
 Let's all let our hair down
 We're in the same boat
(all)  We're strictly tourists
 You can titter and jeer
 All we want to say is
 Lafayette, we are here
 On a spree!
 Bonjour, Paris
- Bonjour.
- Bonjour.
Bonjour!
Well, how was that?
- Allo?
- (chatter)
Duval! I can't hear myself think, and I'm trying to think in French.
- Maggie!
- Ssh! I'm calling again.
I shouldn't design a collection for you.
I am jeopardizing my position with Harper's Bazaar and Vogue, all for a girl who does not appear.
You're too important for jeopardy.
Relax. She will be here without fail.
You said she would be here at ten this morning. It is now past five.
- She's not at the hotel.
- Forget about her.
We've started the campaign.
There isn't time to get someone else.
Well, where is she?
Maybe at the top of the Eiffel Tower, or the bottom of the Seine.
Maybe she's in a traffic jam.
How should I know?
Oh, c'est naturel.
(both)  Bonjour, Paris
Bonjour, bonjour.
I'm throwing a shindig to christen the Quality Woman.
Leave it to Dick to find a delicatessen in Paris.
Imported all the way from Napa Valley, CaIifornia.
Melons from Florida.
About the guest of honour.
Where is she? How does she look?
If she's here, she looks invisible.
- She didn't show?
- She did not.
These gentlemen are waiting to do her face, her hair.
Duval needs measurements.
Where is she?
I wouldn't like to swear in court, but I have a pretty good idea.
Do keep it to yourself!
I'll have her here tomorrow morning at ten o'clock without fail.
In the meantime, be my guests.
Strike.
Salaud! Dgueulasse!
Je vous dteste!
Oh, chrie!
This must be the place.
Thank you.
Monsieur, Gigi would like to dance.
- Who's Gigi?
- I am Gigi.
Some other time. I just stopped by to pick up the wife and kids.
All that is delicious is not nutritious.
Avaricious, av...
I feel a hostile vibration.
That'll be me. Sorry.
Has he been that way long?
Three hours.
It is the ultimate in concentration.
Feels so good when you stop.
I have no doubt in my mind that in less than ten years, people everywhere will know that only empathicalism can bring peace.
Peace through understanding is the only real...
Well, hello, how are you?
Just fine, thank you.
How are you?
How long have you been in Paris?
This is Mr Avery.
These are my friends.
How do you do, boys?
Would you mind if I had my own conversation with this lady?
- They don't understand English.
- You were talking English.
It's hard to explain, but it's all part of empathicalism.
We don't have to communicate with words.
They understand me through the way
I feel, and the tone of my voice.
- Sort of like a dog?
- Obviously, you don't understand!
Who's buying the wine?
- I am.
- I understand more than you think!
- If you're saying that the wine...
- Let me show you something.
Gentlemen, may I tell you that you look like a mess of worms?
And that you not only look like, but you are, a mess of worms.
I'll bet you've been here all these years because if you left, you'd be picked up for vagrancy.
- Bravo.
- Your defence rests.
This isn't funny.
You don't belong here.
Neither do you, which brings us to why I'm here.
Monsieur, you dance with Mimi?
No, thanks, I'm busy.
Didn't Gigi tell you?
That's very rude, refusing to dance with Mimi.
Where I come from, the man asks the girl to dance.
You must come from the Stone Age!
We think freely here. If a girl wants to dance with a man, she asks him.
We're not inhibited by outmoded sociaI conventions.
I can see that.
Do you ask men to dance with you?
Isn't it time you realised that dancing is nothing more than a form of expression or release?
There's no need to be formal or cute about it.
As a matter of fact, I rather feel like expressing myself now.
And I could certainly use a release.
- Bonsoir. Vous tiez formidable.
- Merci.
Well, you certainly made friends and influenced people.
They're empathicalists.
You talk a lot about this empathy.
Ever do anything about it yourself?
I don't know what you mean.
- Why not throw some empathy my way?
- I still don't know what you mean.
How do you think I feel when you don't show up for the job?
I'm responsible for you.
An empathicalist should feel me asking for unemployment insurance.
Show up where?
They've been waiting for you at Duval's all day.
I had no idea. Nobody told me.
We've been calling you on the telephone for hours.
I've been at the cafe all day.
I'm terribly sorry.
Now, I don't want to sound like the personnel department, but you ought to get to bed early.
The camera picks up everything.
I don't want to spend my entire life retouching your pictures.
When we're finished, you can spend all your time making small talk.
Small talk? I suppose you think the neckline of a dress makes for world-shaking conversation?
Anything you don't understand, you call small talk.
- What do you think of Flostre?
- Don't change the subject.
- It's the same subject.
- I haven't met Flostre.
You haven't? By now
I thought you two'd be buddies.
You don't find Flostre in cafes, except on special occasions.
Not everyone interested in empathicalism meets him, any more than every American meets the President.
An invitation to Flostre's home is a great honour, and as hard to get as an invitation to...
The White House.
I don't think jokes about professor Flostre are funny.
No more jokes. But let's be friendly.
We have to work together you know.
You don't have to be friendly to work together. Acquainted will do.
Am I supposed to go over to Duval's now?
I said you'd be there at 10:30 in the morning.
- I'll be there.
- Promise?
I said I'd be there, and I will.
- Alright.
- This is where I get off, good night.
Wait a minute. Don't go away mad.
Can't we walk and get friendly, or better acquainted, or something?
No, thanks. I've got to go to bed.
I don't want you spending your life retouching my pictures.
You are mad, aren't you?
No, I'm not mad, I...
I'm hurt, and disappointed, and...
..and mad.
 I didn't mean to start any scene to
 Make you sigh, or to die
 It's most immoral for us to quarrel
 Why can't we both agree?
 Don't you know Ben Franklin wrote about this thing at length?
 On the proposition that in union there is strength
 Why raise a storm up if we'll just warm up?
 We'll be much stronger and live much longer
 Let's kiss and make up
 Come on, let's wake up
 For I need you, and you need me
 Let's kiss and make up
 No use to break up
 When we can work in harmony
 I'll give you your way
 You'll give me my way
 And out the doorway
 Our cares will fly away
 If we'd be happy
 The way is clear
 Let's kiss and make up
 No use to break up
 We need each other, dear
What are they doing?
They've been in there for hours!
There was a lot to be done.
- They don't look happy.
- They don't look unhappy.
I can't tell. Do they look pleased?
- They don't look displeased.
- (Duval) Everyone.
- Maybe this is the grand finale.
- I'm getting nervous.
- You should.
- Sit down.
My friends, you saw enter here a waif, a gamin, a IowIy caterpillar.
We open the cocoon but it is not a butterfly that emerges.
- It's not?
- No, it is a bird of paradise.
Lights!
Curtain!
Oh...
- Beautiful! I don't believe it.
- Maggie, what did I tell you?
You look absolutely fabulous.
How does it feel?
It feels wonderful, but it's not me.
The hair, the dress. It's perfection.
You see how much we accomplish when you appear?
Try to stay with us for a while.
Duval shows the collection on Friday.
The night before, we'll introduce you to the press.
It is your great opportunity.
It will be your evening.
- You will be there?
- Yes, of course.
Dick, that gives you a week to photograph her.
I want marvelous pictures.
Give me a lot of pizzazz.
Take her, and whatever you do, don't let her out of your sight.
Now, just do what I tell you.
Don't worry about it.
Now here, hold these balloons high in the air, and when I say "run", run as fast as you can and don't let the balloons go.
Run as fast as I can and don't let the balloons go.
Right. Now, ready?
Head up a little. You're so happy.
Alright, run!
Run!
What? Oh, why did I ever...
- What's wrong?
- I don't know which way to go.
That way.
I'm sorry, I'm terribly nervous.
I've never done anything like this.
There's nothing to be nervous about.
You're in Paris, the Tuileries.
You've got balloons. There's a sudden shower. You're very happy.
- Why am I so happy?
- Because I say you are.
That's all you have to know.
You're happy. Now, run!
Great. That's great.
Now, stop!
Wonderful!
Now listen closely, today you're not happy.
- I'm hurt and...
- Right, now you're a creature of tragedy.
Heartbroken, suffering.
You're Anna Karenina.
Shall I throw myself under the train?
We'll see. For now, just wonderful, noble self-sacrifice.
Your lover has just kissed you goodbye.
You may never know that kiss again, or love again.
Marcel, put some tears in her eyes.
There are tears in her eyes.
Good. You're not only a model, you're an actress.
Jo, give me the works.
Heartbreak, longing, tragedy.
Wet your lips.
Good. Alright. Now, la steam!
La steam!
That's great. Just like the movie.
Poor Anna Karenina.
No, not too much steam.
Cut down the steam.
That's wonderful. That's it.
Good. Now give her some flowers.
Flowers. Arms full.
Alright. More. More. More!
Alright, Jo, it's spring.
You're in love.
Now, turn around. Fabulous!
Now, you're walking out of the opera, leaving to the lush passionate music of Tristan and Isolde.
- You're very unhappy.
- What happened now?
A rendezvous at the opera.
Two seats.
He didn't show up. You're furious.
When I say go, walk down with fire in your eyes and murder on your mind.
Wet your lips.
You're Isolde. You're a queen.
Now, go, go, go!
You're furious at Tristan.
That's great.
Today, you're just a simple little girl.
You live on the Seine river, and you're trying to catch a fish for your lunch.
Jo, fish! I want you to look like you're fishing.
I'm trying, but I've never fished before.
That's quite obvious. You might just as well be flying a kite.
Don't look like such an amateur.
You're just not fishing!
I am, but it's caught on something.
Well, give it a yank.
Pretend you caught a fish.
Pull it out.
Marvelous!
- Here's what I want you to be.
- I know. I'm a princess at a ball.
The bird is really Prince Charming, turned into a bird by a wicked sorcerer.
But we've decided not to let it spoil the ball and to go on dancing as if nothing had happened.
You've outgrown me.
Alright. Now, give him a kiss.
He's your Prince Charming, isn't he?
Well, get happy!
That's a killer.
Alright, Marcel, lights!
Jo! Jo, where are you?
Tell me when you're ready. Say "go".
I'm ready. What are you gonna do?
Never mind what I'm going to do.
Just say "go".
Alright. Go!
Holy Moses! You look fabulous!
Look, stop.
Stop!
- I can't stop. Take the picture.
- Stop!
I don't want to stop. I like it.
Take the picture.
Alright, this is your wedding day, the happiest day of your life.
Bells are ringing, flowers blooming, angels singing.
The man you love more than anyone is inside the church waiting for you.
What's the matter?
I just feel so dishonest standing here in this wedding dress.
It's not the happiest day of my life.
And there's no one's waiting for me anywhere.
But you weren't Anna Karenina.
The bird wasn't Prince Charming.
- Please, Dick.
- I don't understand.
Yes, I know.
Oh, mais quelle marie charmante!
On ne m'avaitpas dit qu'ily aurait un mariage aujourd'hui.
Mais entrez donc.
I'm afraid you got us wrong Padre, we're not here to get married.
- Such a beautiful bride.
- This is not my dress.
We're here to take some pictures.
Nous sommes ici pour photographie, pour la magazine de la fashion.
I'm sorry. Perhaps we should've asked your permission first.
No wedding? Aah, quel dommage!
Merci.
Jo!
Jo?
I'm terribly sorry. I don't know what's the matter with me.
Forget it and relax.
We've been working too hard.
I suppose we'll be going home soon?
That's it. You're probably homesick.
Well, just this last picture, then you'll be through.
- And then what happens?
- We go home.
And then?
What do you mean?
Will I see you any more?
And how! If you model, I can get you all the bookings you can handle
- We'd be working together every day.
- I'll model.
Good. We'll put you to work right now.
Stand here, please.
There's a good place. Fine.
Lovely.
Now, tip your head just a little bit.
Good. A little smile.
Jo.
Yes?
Something is wrong.
No. Why?
You're the saddest looking bride I've ever seen.
You look as if you've been jilted.
This is your wedding day.
The day you've dreamt of all your life.
You're marrying the man you love.
The man who loves you.
He's the only...
And you're...
Oh Dick, I thought it would never happen.
I never want to go home.
I love Paris!
I love these clothes and the little church. And I love you.
What did you say?
I love Paris.
That's not what I heard.
My, my, my...!
Well, what do you know!
 He loves
 And she loves
 And they love
 So why can't... you love
 And I love too?
 Birds love
 And bees love
 And whispering trees love
 And that's what
 We both should do
 I aIways knew someday
 You'd come along
 We'll make a twosome
 That just can't go wrong
 Darling
 He loves
 And she loves
 And they love
 So won't you love me
 As I love you?
Armande, let me see a breeze in the trees.
Not too much.
I don't want a cyclone.
Fountains.
It's thrilling!
It makes me cry for the Carolines.
The correspondent from Pakistan has just accepted.
The correspondent from
Madrid finally will be able to make it after all.
And the man from the Istanbul press will be at the presentation.
Good. Now, where on earth is Jo?
Here she is.
Thank heavens.
I thought you'd stand us up again.
- How did the wedding pictures go?
- Wonderfully.
Yes, he's a marvelous photographer.
All you have to do is sit there.
I make my speech to the press, the curtains will open and you dazzle 'em!
- Give 'em the old pizzazz.
- I'll try.
Afterward, I will introduce you to them personally.
Be charming and answer all of their questions.
- Well, what sort of questions?
- It's remarkably simple.
I've been written editorials on it for years.
As one lady to another...
We ought to look like one lady to another.
They'll want to know who does your hair, what you eat, drink, what sheets you sleep on.
You're the authority on how to be lovely.
What am I going to tell them?
Just listen and repeat after me.
 On how to be lovely
 You gotta be happy
 When you can feel light and gay
 Then you'll be lovely as a holiday
 On how to be charming
 You gotta be merry
 If only to weave a spell
 And you'll be lovely as a carousel, too
 I know you can show how
 It's all in the know-how
 And once you know, oh how
 The world looks good to you
 As it should to you
 On how to be lovely
 You gotta be jolly
 When you can be fancy-free
 And flash a smile that folks come flocking to see
 You'll be as lovely as can be
 Can't do it with make-up
 You just gotta wake up
 And starting to take up
 The life delirious
 Nothing serious
 On how to be lovely
 You gotta be cheery
 I'll give you a guarantee
 You don't need dough
 You don't need a college degree
 Make sorrow incidental
 Let joy be monumental
 And you'll be lovely
 You'll be as lovely as can be
Ah, beautiful!
Beautiful!
These are not my clothes.
They were Ient me for tonight.
I'm being presented to the press.
Alors! Your picture will be in all the newspapers?
Oh, yes.
And they'll ask me all sorts of questions.
Oh!
I think perhaps you had better stay here with me, huh?
Hello!
Don't you remember me?
Jo Stockton?
C'est Jo!
On vous a manque, mais on n'a pas le temps de s'arrter maintenant.
Flostre part au caf et on est dj en retard. Au revoir.
What were they saying about Flostre?
That he is speaking at the caf and that they are late.
Mr Avery will be by in five minutes.
Will you ask him to pick me up at the cafe?
Vous retrouverez tout cela
 travers tous mes crits sur l'empathicalisme.
La spiritualit inhrente  I'empathicalisme matrialise les plus nobles aspects de la nature humaine.
Consciemment ou inconsciemment, elle est perceptible dans tout ce qui nous touche.
Dans nos meilleures sculptures...
Et dans notre meilleure littrature.
Pardon, monsieur.
Je suis... terribly sorry.
- I...
- Quite alright, mademoiselle.
You're quite welcome.
Etudiez la statue un instant.
Je reviens tout de suite.
Now, mademoiselle.
I can't believe it.
I thought you'd be old!
Well, I mean, a philosopher and professor.
It all suggests age.
I mean, maturity.
I'm afraid I've disappointed you.
Not at all. There's no reason why someone brilliant shouldn't be young.
I find myself at an awkward disadvantage.
You know who I am.
But except that you are very charming, I don't know you.
I'm so excited about meeting you,
I forgot to introduce myself.
If only you knew how anxious
I am to talk to you.
I came from New York just to see you!
You couldn't have a more loyal disciple of empathicalism than I.
- Than whom?
- I'm sorry. I'm Jo Stockton.
I'm enchanted,... Miss Stockton.
And since you've come such a long way to talk with me, by all means, let's talk.
(Jo) ..there's so much you can teach us.
(Flostre) I may go next year.
You must see Greenwich Village.
It's our Left Bank.
People there think, and do things.
Useful things.
- Do you live in Greenwich Village?
- Of course.
Then I will certainly come. Perhaps we can do useful things together.
I'm sure that in all America there's no empathicalist as charming as you.
Well, I hate to throw a wet blanket...
Darling, guess who this is.
You'll never guess!
- Your brother?
- Professor Flostre.
- This is Dick Avery.
- Professor? I thought you'd be old.
- So did I. Aren't you surprised?
- I'm overcome.
For you, my dear,
I promise never to grow old.
- Come on, Jo.
- What's the matter?
We've got to get over to Duval's.
Must you go so soon?
I was just beginning to know you.
Couldn't I stay?
The professor wants to talk to me.
- You've heard it all before.
- Have you lost your mind?
- We'll talk about that later.
- What are you doing?
I've never been so humiliated in all my life!
What's got into you?
Have you any idea...
How could you be so rude?
Embarrassing me in front of Professor Flostre!
What am I going to tell him?
You're not gonna tell him anything.
You'll never see him again.
- Not going to see him again?
- That's what I said.
Now, just a moment...
I went through all this nonsense to meet this man.
So I could talk to him.
I worship everything he stands for.
The way he thinks.
You might as well tell me never to eat again.
The man from Herald Tribune has brought a correspondent from Sweden.
- The more the merrier.
- They are here, Miss Prescott.
Get them quiet, Duval.
I'll be right back.
When a man looks at a woman the way Flostre looks at you, it doesn't take any imagination...
If you weren't so serious, this would be terribly funny.
I'll check the lights, then I make my speech.
Everybody, ready!
Flostre may be the quiz kid of the centure, the greatest philosopher since Aristotle.
But he's also a man.
He's more man than philosopher!
Are you suggesting that
Flostre's interest in me is anything but intellectual?
He's as interested in your intellect as I am.
Ladies and gentlemen of the press, my friends.
I have asked you here to meet the woman selected to represent the most discriminating publication in the world, Quality.
Let's forget it and get this over with.
Forget it?
Attack Flostre and you attack the things I believe in.
We're fortunate to have found out these things now.
I'm certain you'll not be disappointed.
She is a rare creature... chosen from hundreds for her appearance, her grace, her poise... and her ineffable charm.
We can never reconcile our differences.
They are too basic and too elemental.
This is not the time or place to discuss our differences.
Please, let's get this show on.
Yes, the show! Our personal lives couldn't matter less, could they?
- Would you please sit down?
- Leave me alone!
May I present the Quality Woman!
What does that one say?
All of them say the same thing.
Everyone in Paris is laughing.
- I'm not.
- I should think you wouldn't be, this is all your fault.
I know. I said some things last night I shouldn't have said. She got upset.
- Just a lovers' quarrel.
- A what?
- You mean, you and that girl...
- Why not?
Impossible!
You're in the fashion world.
We're cold, artificial and without sentiment.
- How can you possibly be in love?
- I'm a black sheep.
What about my collection?
Without her I cannot show it.
- The gowns were sewn on her!
- I'm facing ruin!
Don't worry, she'll show up.
The girl has integrity.
She's filled with virtues.
Only she's not wasting them on us.
I went to the cafe, but she isn't there.
So where is she?
She's at her hotel, but she won't take messages.
So I bribed the desk clerk into letting me copy her phone messages.
"At 10:15, Dick Avery called."
"At 11:30, Dick Avery called."
"At 12:16, Professor Flostre called."
Lousy, rotten good-for-nothing!
"Having an evening of international philosophy, poetry, song and meditation tonight at my salon."
"Would be delighted if you would join us. Emile Flostre."
Obviously, that's where she'll be tonight.
Not showing my collection.
I'm ruined.
I'll go to Flostre's tonight and bring her back.
And take someone who isn't emotionally involved. Like me.
You'll never get in.
Empathicalists have a very firm way of dealing with what they call hostile vibrations.
Let's turn into a couple of friendly vibrations.
Until we get in. As they say, if you can't lick 'em, join 'em.
- Do I look grubby enough?
- Yeah. How's the beard?
- Full of pizzazz.
- Come on.
Oui? Qui est vous?
Nous sommes voyager ici pour la meditation.
Quels noms?
La.
Ah! Monsieur et Madame Barker de Florida.
- Florida.
- That's us. De Tallahassee.
Bon. Entrez.
- Come on, sugar.
- Alright, darlin'.
- O est Flostre?
- Pourquoi?
I don't know. I just asked.
 On me demande
- (woman sobs)
-  Pourquois l'ai tu
C'est triste!
- What's the matter?
- The song's a bundle of laughs.
 Un moment de passion engageante
Je le dtestais
She stabbed her lover because she hated him.
 Mais quande l'ai vu
 Mort, froid, et massacr
Now that the poor thing is dead...
 Tout d'un coup, je savais bien
Que je l'ai aim
Now that he's dead, she loves him.
 Ma tte clate
 Je suis compltement drange
This kid's a little confused.
 Et maintenant
 Il n'y a plus rien
 Il n'y a qu'un seul remde
Now she's gonna get even.
-  Je vais mejeter sur la rue
- She's gonna kill herself.
 Corbillard
(man) C'est tragique!
- C'est tragique!
- You can say that again.
Hey!
Look up the airstay.
We're on the wrong floor.
Un moment, s'il vous plat.
Suivez moi.
Il me semble qu'ily a une erreur.
Ily a un autre couple qui s'appelle Barker de Florida.
Oh-oh, the real Barkers.
Now what's this all about?
- They are not from Tallahassee!
- They ain't even from Miami.
I've never seen these people in Tallahassee, and I have been in every corner of Tallahassee.
- Is this some sort of a gag?
- I know who he is!
- Il est un photographer de fashion.
- Fashion?!
She's a fashion editor.
Get 'em out!
At once, or Mr Flostre will hear about this.
Now, wait, we're spiritual singers on a tour and...
Now the hostile vibrations have gone...
Attendez!
We are ready for your show.
- Command performance!
- Come on, Mama. We're on.
Let's give 'em the old pizzazz.
 Ring-a dem bells
 Ring-a dem bells
 We is goin'
 Don't know where-a
 All we know is
 It's up there-a
 Somehow we gotta
 Climb that stair-a
 Ring-a dem...
 Ring-a dem...
 Bells
 Come, all you children, gather around
 Gather around, you children!
 And we will lose that evil spirit called voodoo
 Nothing but trouble
If he's found you
 If he has found you, children
 But you can chase that hoodoo
 With the dance that you do
 Let us lead the way
 Jubilee today
 He'll never hound you, step on the ground you...
 Children!
 Clap your hands
 Slap your thighs
 Hallelujah! Hallelujah!
 Everybody come along
 And join the jubilee!
 Clap your hands
 Slap your thighs
 Don't you lose time, don't you lose time
 Come along
And shake your shoes time
 Now for you and me
 On the sands of time
 You're only a pebble
 Remember trouble must be treated just like a rebel
 Send it to the devil
 Clap your hands
 Slap your thighs
 Hallelujah! Hallelujah!
 Everybody come along and join the jubilee!
 So ring-a dem bells
 Ring-a dem bells out
 Ring-a them, ring-a them
Ring-a them, ring-a them
 Bells!
Well, Mr Tallahassee, how we doin'?
Why, we's the two most friendly vibrations you ever seen.
 Hey, diddle diddle, the cat and the fiddle.
 The dish ran away with the spoon.
Do you know why a chicken crosses the road?
No, why does a chicken cross the road?
- Why, to get to the second floor!
- You is a genius!
 Roses are red, the violets are blue,
 the dresses is gotta be showed.
Let's get this show on the road!
 Clap your hands, slap your thighs, gimme that beat, boy...
 Gimme that, gimme that crazy knocked-out beat!
 You gotta... if you wanna get to the promised Iand
 You gotta clap your hands
 Clap your hands, slap your thighs, gimme some heat, man!
 Gimme some, gimme some Dixieland beat!
 When you hear that Dixieland, you gotta clap your hands
 Clap-a your hands
 Clap-a your hands
 Hallelujah!
Hallelu... Hallelu...
 Hallelujah
 Come along and join our jubilee!
(Jo) Intellectual gratification is imperatively nonexistent.
- Only you can fulfill that potential.
- This is it.
- Flostre, there you are.
- Professor, we need you!
What are you doing here?
You look ridiculous!
We've come to see Flostre. Professor,
Maggie and I need guidance.
We realize what futile aimless lives we lead.
- When did you realize this?
- Today. At about two o'clock.
- Just after lunch.
- Professor, don't believe them!
We want to sit at your feet and learn.
We sit at your feet, humble and ignorant, but so willing.
You two just leave his feet alone.
Professor, they want to make a fool of you.
- Are you trying to make a fool out of Flostre?
- Who, me?
You're making things difficult.
You don't own empathicalism.
It's in the public domain, isn't it?
- Why don't you trust these people?
- Because I know them well.
I know what they're here for and it is not guidance.
Don't listen to her, master.
She is but a child.
They came to see me, not you.
To get me over to Duval's to model their collection.
- I should have known.
- You should've heard what he said last night!
If we'd come a few minutes later, you'd have found out for yourself.
You've said enough, Mr Avery.
Not yet. I haven't told you what a phony you are.
- Get out of my house.
- I'm not ready to leave.
I think I can change your mind.
- Catch!
- (Jo screams)
Oh! Oh, no!
Look what you've done!
Bursting in here like a hoodlum!
- I never touched him.
- Go away!
It's time your waking up to some of your responsibilities.
Will you please leave?
Duval can't show his collection without you, regardless what you feel about me!
You can't do this to him, or to all the other people involved!
Hundreds of people.
I'm not interested in your people, than you are in mine!
- Your empathy is a little one-sided.
- Get out!
Alright!
I assume you mean me, too?
On you it looks cute, sugar.
Well, you certainly fixed everything!
If you can't lick 'em, join 'em and if you can't join 'em, lick 'em!
- Tell Duval I'm sorry, we tried.
- Where are you going?
There's a plane to New York at 10:30pm and I'm going with it.
You can't do this to me! Come back!
How dare you leave me in the street like this! Taxi!
- Have they gone?
- They've gone.
- And you're still here?
- I'm still here.
Are you alright?
Well.
In fact, I feel wonderful.
I can't tell you how sorry I am.
I had no idea they were coming, or what got into Dick.
My dear, you mustn't assume guilt for something that was unavoidable.
They've gone.
You are here.
That's all that matters now.
Nice of you to say so, but if it hadn't been me...
You have the most penetrating eyes.
I can still see them when I close mine.
- Professor?
- Call me Emile.
Would there be any value in my contacting philosophers in cities like
Omaha and Detroit and... and acquainting them with empathicalism?
Your mouth suggests to me burgundy velvet.
Dr Post, who runs a shop I worked in, has contacts in several universities.
Please.
Don't say another word.
- But I came here to talk.
- We'll talk.
- Later.
- Why don't I come back later?
But I need you now.
Professor Flostre, I came here to talk with a philosopher.
You're talking like a man.
But I am a man. And you're a woman.
That's not what I came to talk about!
My dear.
There is a magical moment waiting for us.
- Don't come any closer.
- Why are you behaving like this?
- I thought you said you come from Greenwich Village?
- I'm moving uptown. Yonkers.
But before you move...
I cannot keep them waiting any longer.
I must make an announcement.
- What shall I say?
- Tell them it was all my fault.
Maggie, where's Dick?
You told him to go and he went.
He flies at 10:30pm.
Oh no, he mustn't!
I knew you would not let us down!
- You must do the collection!
- Later. I've got to get to Dick.
- Later? We are so late already.
- I want to help.
I know how you feel, even if you think I don't.
- I can put myself in your place.
- Maggie, that's empathy!
That's what you've been talking about! Why didn't you say?
Get to work. I'll take care of Dick. Leave it to me!
Lettie, what is the name of Dick Avery's hotel?
- Le Savoyard.
- Get me the number.
- Quick, how long before we can begin?
- We're ready.
Messieurs et mesdames.
We are proud to bring you a new collection by Paul Duval, inspired by the Quality Woman, chosen to represent a great American fashion magazine, Quality.
We begin with hors d'oeuvre.
Hotel Savoyard?
M. Dick Avery, s'il vous plat?
- Monsieur, your bill is ready.
- I know. 352,428 francs.
- Merci, monsieur. Come back soon.
- Thank you.
(woman) He doesn't answer, madame.
I will give you the desk.
Hello. Monsieur Avery?
He just left.
Well, run out and get him!
It's urgent!
Oui, madame.
I'm so sorry. It was too late.
- Did you get him?
- No. We'll get him at the airport.
- I can't find the number!
- How are you spelling it?
- A-U-L-Y.
- Orly. O-R-L-Y.
- You were there!
- I'm just so nervous.
- Are you ready?
- (Jo) Just about.
Monsieurs et mesdames, Jonquille.
(Jo) I'm ready.
You can board your plane now, monsieur. Pleasant flight.
Thanks.
Attention! Attention!
Monsieur Avery?
Monsieur Richard Avery?
Maggie, is there any news?
They promised they'd get my message to him before he got on the plane.
It's too late.
The clock must be fast.
He just hasn't got the message yet.
I'm sure he got it.
He didn't want to talk to me.
I don't blame him.
I hurt him too much.
And now, the finale of the collection. Wedding Day.
What a beautiful bride!
Yes. Pity it isn't her wedding.
Professor!
Keep away from me, you!
If you lay one finger on me,
I will call your embassy.
I want to apologize.
She wasn't worth fighting about.
- Don't tell me I did that!
- You?
You didn't even give me a headache.
She did this to me, with a statue that cost 200,000 francs.
- She did that?
- I have 18 stitches in my head.
- She gave you 18 stitches?
- And a gashed lip.
And six stitches in my ear.
Professor, I love every broken bone in your body!
Excuse me, Duval. Where is Jo?
She was magnificent!
You should've seen her!
- Where is she?
- I don't know, she was here...
Lettie! Have you seen Jo?
No, I...
Oh, Dick, she was just great!
Maggie, where's Jo?
Have you seen her?
She was here a while ago, but she's disappeared.
- Did she say where she was going?
- I understand now.
She put herself in your place, so put yourself in her place.
You'll meet each other in somebody's place.
That's it!
Maggie, you ought to be president.
I thought I was!
 I love your funny face
 Your sunny, funny...
-  'S wonderful
-  'S wonderful
-  'S marvelous
-  'S marvelous
 That you should care
 For me
-  'S awful nice
-  'S awful nice
 'S paradise
 'S paradise
 'S what I love
 To see
 You've made my life so glamorous
 You can't blame me for feeling amorous
 Oh, 's wonderful
 'S marvelous
 That you should care
 For me
Cotton Blossom
Cotton Blossom
Captain Andy's floating show
Cotton Blossom
Cotton Blossom
Hey, the show boat's coming.
Come on, mule. Git!
Show boat. Show boat.
Here comes the show boat.
Show boat.
See the show boat
It's old Captain Andy's Cotton Blossom
Will you go?
Are you coming to the show?
'Twill be delightful
And quite rightfully we say
There's not a better show
From New Orleans to St. Jo
Captain Andy has gathered a troupe
In the greatest of dramas
And jolly comedies
Stephen Baker
The handsomest leading man
And beautiful Julie La Verne as well
Cotton Blossom, Cotton Blossom
Captain Andy's floating show
Thrills and laughter, concert after
Everybody's sure to go
Leave the lumber in the sawmills
Leave the cotton on the stalks
Come and meet him
Come and greet him
Captain Andy Hawks
Ladies and gentlemen, it is with exhilarating gratification...
...that I bring once again my theatrical offering...
...to your fair community.
I want you to meet some of the greatest artists...
...that ever played the river towns.
Miss Ellie May Shipley!
The toast of Cairo, Illinois.
Next, I want y'all to meet Frank Schultz!
Mr. Schultz is the villain in our play.
But off-stage he wouldn't hurt a fly.
And he's stuck on Ellie.
That's the way they always are, folks.
Just one big happy family.
And I'm their father.
And Parthy here is their mother.
I worked in a new one, didn't I? We're the parents of one big happy family.
You're a big bellowing catfish.
Now get these handbills started.
Now I want you to meet the little sweetheart of the South.
Our songstress and leading lady...
...Miss Julie LaVerne!
Hiya, Miss Julie!
She gets prettier every year.
Just to know her is to love her, folks.
Here, I want you to know the handsomest leading man...
...in the Middle West.
The famous Mr. Stephen Baker!
A sample of soul-stirring emotion, folks.
No, Hamilton, I cannot accept you, for I am not worthy of your noble desires.
On my mother's name, tell me why.
Look into this room and view the secret of my downfall.
Have to see the play tonight, folks, to learn her secret.
Tempest and Sunshine.
Beautiful drama of tears and laughter.
And then after that, the grand concert.
Songs and dances beyond description.
Frank and Ellie, just a sample.
Just a sample, folks.
More! More!
Frank and Ellie. Frank and Ellie.
Just a little bit more.
Are you in business for your health?
Get finished and get these things started.
Go on. Take them. Go on.
Stephen, my boy. Pass those out among the adoring young ladies.
All right, captain.
Hey, where'd you get that?
Stole it, huh?
I ain't stole nothing.
Miss Julie give it to me out of the kindness of her big heart.
- What's the idea of giving my present...?
- Get away.
Something you don't understand, zebra gal.
I told you. Stay away from my wife.
She's nothing but a...
Here. Frank, take him aboard.
Well, folks, I guess we fooled you that time.
The boys just played you another little scene from one of our shows.
Well, folks, don't forget tonight.
Lucky puncher.
Yes, sir, get your tickets now.
Beautiful songs, beautiful people.
Come along, everybody.
Please, Mr. Pete, don't get yourself all riled up over it.
Mr. Steve and Miss Julie, they got to play performances here.
Yeah? I know a thing or two.
We'll see how many performances they play in this town.
Hey, where's the sheriff?
Down there.
Nineteen.
Stud.
That's over $2000 you've lost.
You're unlucky.
Only a temporary condition,
I assure you.
Here's a boat ticket to
New Orleans. Playable?
Suits me. Leave you sort of stranded, won't it?
You are presupposing a calamity, sir?
- I'll stand.
- Say 18.
You presupposed perfectly.
- Sorry.
- Good day.
A lot of water down there, eh, boy?
Yes, sir. From where he all come?
Same place it's going, son.
'Tis, huh?
Who cares if my boat goes upstream?
Or if the gale bids me go
With the river's flow
I drift along with my fancy
Sometimes I thank my lucky stars
My heart is free
And other times I wonder
Where's the mate for me?
Ticket for tonight, mister?
Possibly. Does this boat go to New Orleans?
Yep. Winds up there.
I'd like to speak to the owner.
They're all in town giving the street concert.
I'll wait for them.
The driftwood floating over the sea
Someday finds a sheltering lea
So somewhere there surely must be
A harbor meant for me
I drift along with my fancy
Sometimes I thank my lucky stars
My heart is free
And other times I wonder
Where's the mate...?
Is there no mercy in your evil soul?
No kindness in your ugly heart?
Oh, sir, what manner of foul jackal are you?
Coming into our humble home, rich as you are...
...yet reeking of the carrion of the fleshpots?
Oh, sir, I plead with you on bended knee...
...from the torn and wretched heart of a mother.
Stop giving my little daughter diamonds and go home to your wife.
Bravo. Bravo. Now that's just what the scoundrel needs.
Yes. Is there anything
I can do for you?
More of the same. Magnificent.
Well...
I'm afraid I just can't.
You see, I'm...
I really should be airing these clothes. Brushed and aired.
Isn't that menial work for a leading lady?
Oh, but I'm not the leading lady.
You're not? That's hard to believe.
You certainly look it.
I'm not even a member of the company.
- No?
- No. Well, I mean, not professionally.
I'd say that's a desire that your heart is set on.
At least you're right there.
- Why do you want to be an actress?
- Why?
Well...
Well, the ordinary person wouldn't understand.
I mean... That is, a person outside the profession.
No? Well...
You want to be an actress because it makes everything come true.
Every exciting thing you've ever dreamed about.
Even if it's make-believe.
Isn't that it?
Yes, that is it. How did you know?
For instance, right now, we could be Romeo and Juliet...
...or Elizabeth and Essex, or...
Or Lady Southwaite and Hamilton Barsdale.
Or Lady Southwaite... Who?
Oh, they're in the
Tempest and Sunshine.
Oh, yes, of course.
As a matter of fact, we couldn't be anybody talking like this.
We haven't been properly introduced.
Well, that makes no difference in make-believe.
Well, I suppose that's true.
So we could make-believe that we've just fallen in love at first sight.
Only make-believe I love you
Only make-believe that you love me
Others find peace of mind
In pretending
Couldn 't you, couldn 't I, couldn 't we?
Make-believe our lips
Are blending
In a phantom kiss
Or two or three
Might as well make-believe
I love you
For to tell the truth
I do
The game of just supposing
Is the sweetest game I know
Our dreams are more romantic
Than the world we see
And if the things we dream about
Don 't happen to be so
That's just an unimportant technicality
Though the cold and brutal fact is
You and I have never met
We need not mind conventions
P's and Q's
If we put our thoughts in practice
We can banish all regrets
Imagining most anything
We choose
We could make-believe
I love you
Only make-believe
That you love me
Others find peace of mind
In pretending
Couldn 't you?
Couldn 't I?
Couldn 't we?
Make-believe our lips
Are blending
In a phantom kiss
Or two or three
- Might as well make-believe
- Might as well make-believe
- I love you
- I love you
- For to tell the truth
- For to tell the truth
- I do
- I do
All right, everybody, hang up your costumes.
There's my father and mother.
Just the parties I wish to see.
To our next meeting.
And soon.
Captain and Mrs. Hawks, allow me.
Ravenal. Gaylord Ravenal of the Tennessee Ravenals.
You're heading for New Orleans?
- That's right, sir.
- We don't carry passengers, young man.
Naturally. But I'm an actor.
And I thought possibly there might be...
... an opening in your company for my services.
I don't have my notices here...
Sorry, Mr. Ravenal, we're full up.
Troupe's been with me all season, just doing fine.
I'm sorry, because I guess you cut quite a figure before the footlights.
It doesn't seem to be my day.
My thanks just the same, sir.
Magnolia? Magnolia.
Come help Queenie with these stores.
- Yes, Mama.
- Hawks.
Yes, Parthenia.
I've got to do it, Julie.
I've got to split his thick skull.
No, darling. It's all over now.
Let it lie.
- We can't risk any trouble in this town.
- But the scurvy, slimy...
There's still not enough room on this boat for the two of us.
Come in.
I stole a banana for him and l...
- I'm sorry.
- It's all right, give it to him.
You can't spoil him any more than you have already.
- Where to, Sir Lancelot?
- Get a cup of coffee.
Gonna be a good boy?
Sure. If that's what you want.
That rattle-brained mule.
Oh, golly, but he loves you.
Of course he does.
I'm the belle of the ball.
You know, I think it's wonderful.
Well, tell me about your handsome stranger.
I saw you talking to him.
That's what you came in for, isn't it?
I asked Papa about him.
He said he's an actor looking for work.
- An actor? Your ma would love that.
- But, Julie, he's so different.
River dandies are thick as locusts, angel.
Oh, I know. Oh, I know about men.
I've had them look at me, and, you know, flirt and all.
But when he stood there by the window and smiled...
Pulses began to pound right here, huh?
Why do you love Steve so much?
The way you were just now, for instance.
Oh, Steve. I love him because...
Well, I don't know.
He's not a very good actor on-stage.
You know, he's not a very good actor off-stage either.
But he's all mine.
And sometimes, his eyes are like a little boy's.
There. Could you ever think of loving anyone else?
Oh, listen, sister
I love my own Mister Man
And I can 't tell you why
There ain 't no reason
For me to love that man
It must be something
That the angels done plan
Fish gotta swim
Birds gotta fly
I gotta love one man till I die
Can 't help
Lovin ' that man of mine
Tell me he's lazy
Tell me he's slow
Tell me I'm crazy
Maybe I know
Can 't help
Lovin ' that man of mine
When he goes away
That's a rainy day
But when he comes back
That day is fine
The sun will shine
He can come home
As late as can be
Home without him
Ain 't no home to me
Can 't help
Lovin ' that man of mine
Oh, Julie, that's wonderful.
I could feel that way too.
I'll bet you will some day.
- Fish gotta swim
- Birds gotta fly.
- Birds gotta fly
- I gotta love.
I gotta love
One man till I die
Can 't help
Lovin ' that man of mine
Down on the levee the gals put a little shuffle in it.
Tell me he's lazy, tell me he's slow
Tell me I'm crazy, maybe I know
Can 't help
Lovin ' that man of mine
Now watch this one, honey.
- That's a rainy day
- Yeah, that's right.
But when he comes back
That day is fine
The sun will shine
He can come home
As late as can be
Home without him
Ain 't no home to me
Can 't help
Lovin ' that man of...
I thought you were gonna help Queenie with supper.
I will, Mama, I will.
Well, that's how it is, angel.
From now on, you have nothing to do with her.
- But, Ma, Julie's my friend.
- That stops right now.
But she's sweet and kind...
It's plain to me what's happening onboard this boat.
And I'll not have my daughter mixed up with any hussy who allows herself...
Mama, I'll not listen to another word against Julie!
Little girl, you are safe with me
I can protect what's mine
I am a sturdy maple tree
And you're my clinging vine
Woods are just full of maple trees
Cedar and oak and pine
Let me look them over, please
And then I'll let you know
If you have a show
After I have looked around the world
For a mate
Then, perhaps
I might fall back on you
When I am convinced that there is
No better fate
Then I might decide that you will do
I am just an average lad
Though no gift to womanhood
Some girls say I'm not so bad
Others say you're not so good
But if you are patient, dear
And willing to wait
There's a chance
I might fall back on you
Hawks. Come here.
Hawks. Come here.
What is it?
I knew there'd be trouble with her.
Trouble? With who? With Julie?
Steve. Steve, wait a minute.
What happened?
- Well, what is it?
- It's Pete, with the sheriff, captain.
The sheriff?
But our license is paid for.
We heard them talking something about Miss Julie.
The sheriff's gonna arrest Miss Julie.
Arrest Julie? But, Papa,
Julie's done nothing wrong.
Here, honey.
It won't hurt much.
Right in here, sheriff.
Hi, Windy.
Captain Hawks, I got some unpleasant news for you.
You got a miscegenation case aboard.
Why, why... I don't know what...
You know what I mean. A case of a
Negro woman married to a white man.
Criminal offense in this state.
Name of the white man is Steve Baker.
Name of the Negress, Julie LaVerne, born Julie Dozier.
- Julie!
- Julie, the record says you were born...
...in this county. Your pa was white and your ma black? That right?
Yes, that's right.
You two better get your things.
You wouldn't call a man white that's got Negro blood in him?
No. One drop of black blood makes you black in these parts.
Well, I got more than a drop in me.
Hear that.
You'll swear to that in a court of law?
Anyplace. Ask any one of these folks here.
Every one can swear that I've got
Negro blood in me this minute.
But how come this man who's been traveling with you comes and tells me...?
I'll tell you why. Because he's a no-account river rat...
...who's bothering Julie, and she had nothing to do with him.
- He's mean and he's ugly, that's why.
- Magnolia!
She's right, sheriff.
My daughter's telling the truth.
We all can swear to it.
You're fired.
Get on the wharf and wait for your pay.
- I was only doing my duty.
- Get off this vessel.
Take over, Julie, we're tuckered.
- We want Julie. Julie LaVerne.
- Julie.
Look, sheriff.
Can't she go on, just once more?
But...
- Look, it's the last number.
- No, captain. I can't be responsible...
...for the safety of this community if word gets out.
Now, you better close the show, right now.
We'll pack up and get out of here first thing in the morning.
- Come on, Julie.
- Julie.
- Where's our Julie LaVerne?
- We want Julie LaVerne.
Julie.
Be sailing soon?
Yes. Just as soon as...
Julie, I...
- Your ma wouldn't like this.
- She's asleep.
Julie, I had to.
I didn't have any wrapping.
I made it into a pincushion.
It was for Christmas.
Julie, nothing's changed.
Nolie, Nolie, always true.
You'll write to me.
Let me know how things go.
I'll never forget my Nolie.
Stay happy, now.
Julie.
Julie!
- Need any money?
- No, thanks.
Goodbye, Steve.
No, I said we didn't.
Pride is smaller than kindness.
Thanks, Julie.
Captain Andy.
- Mr. Steve, I wants to say l...
- Goodbye.
Well, ride the river, Joe.
- Miss Julie.
- Keep riding the old river, Joe, boy.
Miss Julie, I wish I could...
There's an ol' man called the Mississippi
That's the ol' man that I wants to be
What does he care
If the world's got troubles?
What does he care
If the land ain 't free?
OI' man river
That ol' man river
He must know something
But don 't say nothing
He just keeps rollin '
He keeps on rollin ' along
He don 't plant 'taters
He don 't plant cotton
And them that plants them
Is soon forgotten
But ol' man river
He just keeps rollin ' along
You and me, we sweat and strain
Body all achin ' and racked with pain
Tote that barge
And lift that bale
Get a little drunk
And you lands in jail
I get weary
And sick of tryin '
I'm tired of livin '
And scared of dyin '
But ol' man river
He just keeps rollin '
Along
Joe, cast off.
Windy, set your helm.
All right, boys, stand by with the plank. Cast off!
Don 't plant 'taters
He don 't plant cotton
And them...
Captain Andy. I just heard the news.
May I be of service to you, sir?
Yes. Yes, come aboard, young fellow.
Step lively.
Thank you.
But ol' man river
He just keeps rollin ' along
You and me, we sweat and strain
Body all achin ' and racked with pain
Tote that barge
Lift that bale
You get a little drunk
And you lands in jail
I gets weary
And sick of tryin '
I'm tired of livin '
And scared of dyin '
But ol' man river
He just keeps rollin '
Along
- Good morning, all.
- Good morning, Captain Andy.
Good to see everybody so chipper this morning.
That's the spirit.
High wind or high water...
...the show must go on.
- Good morning, darling.
- Good morning, Papa.
Fine talk. But with capacity business waiting at Boonville tonight...
...who are we gonna get for a leading man? Answer me that.
Patience, Parthy, patience. Didn't know
I used to have a magic act, did you?
Ladies and gentlemen,
Mr. Gaylord Ravenal.
The new leading man of the Cotton Blossom Troupe...
... and coming idol of the river, or I don't know my business. Which I do.
Thank you, Captain Andy.
Ladies and gentlemen...
- ...it is an honor.
- You've met my wife, I believe.
- A repeated pleasure, Mrs. Hawks.
- And my daughter, Magnolia?
Only in make-believe.
All right, magician. Who are we gonna get for a leading lady?
Your daughter.
- What are you talk...?
- Papa.
Listen, we can't get no leading lady till New Orleans.
Don't wanna give up all that box office, like you said.
Yes, Mama. All that cotton-crop money just fresh from being counted.
That's a lot to turn down.
Well, I still mean to say, I don't wanna go against principle. But...
- Just until New Orleans, at least.
- Oh, please, Mama.
Well, go on.
How wonderful.
Miss Hawks.
I see. And then I embrace her.
Is that correct?
That's right. Now, let's take it again, clean through.
Yes, Lady Southwaite, even though I know...
Nolie, remember your smile, your sweet smile here.
- That'll always get them.
- Yes, Papa.
Yes, Lady Southwaite, even though I know your secret...
...the child is one to which I should like to give my name.
Will you marry me?
Oh, Hamilton, my own.
Just a minute, young man.
We won't have that.
We'll have none of your tricks on or off the stage.
But, Parthy, I thought that was kind of natural.
Nature isn't necessary in play- acting,
Hawks. Especially that kind.
Play- acting is just make-believe.
Now. Now, hold her for a split second.
- I see.
- With no kissing.
- No kissing.
- And then, stand apart.
- Then I stand apart.
- At arm's length.
- Oh, at arm's length.
- Yes. You understand?
- Yes, ma'am.
- Very well, then.
Well, maybe.
Still don't make no difference.
Take it from me, I got a sixth sense about these things.
- You two are going over like floodwater.
- Sure are.
Magnolia Hawks and Gaylord Ravenal are gonna be the hit of the river!
But hit or not, remember now, no nonsense. It's just make-believe.
What's the meaning of this?
- Mama, Gay and l...
- Get yourself ashore, Mr. Ravenal.
Sir. Ma'am, I'm asking
Nolie to be my wife.
You? A no-account river gambler?
How dare you.
Gambler, yes, but hardly no account.
You know, Captain Andy...
...it's dead waste to stay cooped up here in this penny-ante existence.
Nolie's meant for the life and happiness of the world.
I love her.
And by heavens,
I'm gonna see that she gets them.
And you, standing there...
... are you proud and happy, looking forward to a life with such as him?
Yes, Mama, I am.
Then that's a sight
I never want to see again.
Oh, Mama.
Bless you, darling.
I love you always, no matter what you decide.
Son, I hope it's not just Saturday night with a cold Monday morning to follow.
Whatever happens, Nolie, always remember to smile.
Are you still sure?
Still sure this is what you want?
Maybe you are taking a 100-1 chance.
I want you more than anything in the world.
Mrs. Gaylord Ravenal.
You are love
Here in my arms
Where you belong
And here you will stay
I'll not let you away
I want day after day with you
You are spring
Bud of romance unfurled
You taught me to see
One truth forever true
- You are love
- You are love
- Wonder of all the world
- Wonder of all the world
- Where you go with me
- Where you go with me
- Heaven will always be
- Heaven will always be
- Mr. Ravenal. Is your team laid up?
- Yes?
- Well...
- No, had to sell them. Doctor's orders.
Mr. Ravenal will have to do a lot more walking from now on.
- Key, please.
- Mr. Ravenal.
- Yes?
- Your account is six weeks overdue.
I'd like to have immediate payment.
Well, isn't that rather a brusque way to inform us...
That's right.
But by tomorrow night, or...
We'll have our bill ready at that time.
Come, darling.
Sorry. Next car, please.
I suppose this sounds very dramatic...
...but they are all yours.
Very dramatic.
Stop giving me your diamonds, madam, and go home to your husband's arms.
- Will you listen to me?
- Even though I reek of the fleshpots...
...even though I cannot kiss the hem of your gown.
- I won't have you...
- Though I am unworthy as they say...
...I still have my pride, madam, me pride.
Gay, will you be sensible for once?
Come here, you.
- You love me?
- Yes, but I still...
I don't want your pretties, angel.
I don't need them.
Now, you wait. I'm a lucky boy.
Having you is proof enough, isn't it?
I'll get another stake, and we'll be walking on tall air again.
- You trust me?
- Always.
Just don't stop loving me, huh?
If I ever catch you batting your eyes at another fellow, I will...
I'm walking on the air, dear
For life is fair, dear, to lovers
I'm in the seventh heaven
There's more than seven
My heart discovered
In this sweet, improbable
And unreal world
Finding you has given me
My ideal world
Why do I love you?
Why do you love me?
Why should there be two
Happy as we?
Can you see the why or wherefore
I should be the one you care for
You're a lucky boy
I am lucky too
- All our dreams of joy
- All our dreams of joy
- Seem to come true
- Seem to come true
- Maybe that's because you love me
- Maybe that's because you love me
- Maybe that's why I love you
- Maybe that's why I love you
Sorry. That's too much money.
I'd like the cash.
Very well.
Tonight, Ravenal.
I'll be back in a half an hour.
Don't worry, darling.
It's only temporary.
I'll get them back for you.
Everything could be temporary, except us.
Get your things packed, honey.
I'll be right back.
Charlie.
Get me a cup of coffee, please.
Yes, sir.
- Get the coffee. I'll get the elevator.
- Okay, sir.
Hello, you.
You know, I've missed you.
Hot coffee. Now, that's a good bet.
- How were your others?
- How's that, honey?
Your other bets.
Yesterday's and last night's...
... and all of them "one last round before we break it up" bets.
Were they just as good?
You got a crystal ball, darling?
My luck's sure been running shallow lately.
That Loop crowd's tough, but I'll get to them.
A lot of money goes through there.
Listen, Nolie.
I nearly hit the bonanza last night.
Now, we're in jacks or better, and it goes to aces.
Now, I got two of them back to back.
Everybody drops out but Kirby.
My next two cards are queens.
I knew he was going into a flush, but I had to stay in. Only l...
I felt that third queen coming out of there just as sure as...
- ...well, just as sure...
- What does she look like?
- What, darling?
- The queen.
Does she look like
Cameo McQueen, for instance?
Nolie, if you think there's anything going on with Cameo or any other woman...
I know there's no other woman.
No flesh and blood woman.
I almost wish there were.
I'd know how to fight then.
But I can't fight this lady luck of yours.
This fancy queen in her green-felt dress.
When you talked about it just now...
...I can't put that look in your eyes.
She's whipped me.
For days and nights now, weeks and months, she's whipped me.
- I won't be whipped anymore. I won't!
- Nolie, hush, darling.
Nolie, look, tomorrow's Christmas...
... and I've still got a little bit left.
We could go...
Tomorrow isn't Christmas.
No, it isn't.
It's just like Papa said.
It's going to be Monday.
- It's all just like Papa said.
- Nolie.
You're a weak man, Gay.
You're weak. You're weak.
- You're weak...
- Nolie, I've stood enough of this.
Take your hands off me.
Well...
...we'll have to do something about this, won't we?
Thank you.
Frank, we can afford better than this.
Sorry, I thought you were out and l...
- Nolie!
- Ellie!
- Look at her. How are you?
- I don't know two people...
- Doesn't she look wonderful?
- ...I'd rather see.
- How have you been? What's happened?
- We're booked into the Trocadero.
- The Trocadero?
- We open New Year's Eve.
- Wonderful. I'm so happy for you.
- We haven't been over there yet.
Don't know who's on the bill.
But just as soon as we could, we were going to drop in on you over at the...
Andy said that you were living at the Sherman House.
Are you living here?
- Just temporarily. Leaving?
- But you'll be leaving today, won't you?
These folks are looking for a place.
- Your husband told me a little while...
- There must be some mistake.
Oh, Gay. Gay, darling, get up and come and see who's here.
Well, seeing as you all know each other...
...I'll drop back later.
Oh, no.
What is it, Nolie?
"My darling...
...by the time you read this...
...I will be on a train heading west.
What you said was true from the beginning.
This money will help you get back home to those who love you.
Not as I will always love you...
...but surely and safely.
Remember our good times and forget all the rest...
...so that at least you will never hate me.
Gay."
Oh, Nolie.
Nolie.
See? Look.
"Hooray," said Tiny Tim,
"and a Merry Christmas to you all."
Oh, Gay. Oh, Gay.
All right, come on. Take it back.
Now, look. Lift it just as high as it will go, so it's flush up against there.
- Mr. Green.
- Yeah, that's fine, kids.
- Is that the height you want it?
- Don't bother me now, Joe.
Julie, Julie.
Julie, come on. Let's get over there and hear the new song, will you?
Would you do that in her dressing room?
I'm trying to put on a show.
But, Jake, this is a holiday season.
It's over for you, kiddo. Work.
You promised, remember?
That's a good girl.
What's the matter with her?
- She starting in on a bust again?
- She better not.
These fool one-man girls.
Their fellow walks out, and they tear themselves apart till they hit bottom.
And I gotta suffer for it.
Along came Bill
Who 's not the type at all
You'd meet him on the street
And never notice him
His form and face
His manly grace
Is not the kind that you
Would find in a statue
Oh, I can 't explain
It's surely not his brain
That makes me thrill
I love him because he's wonderful
Because he's just my Bill
I used to dream that I would discover
The perfect lover, some day
I knew I'd recognize him
If ever he came round my way
I always used to fancy that
He'd be one of the God-like kind of men
With a giant brain and a noble head
Like the heroes bold
In the books I've read
But along came Bill
An ordinary guy
He hasn 't got a thing
That I can brag about
And yet to be
Upon his knee
So comfy and roomy
Feels natural to me
Oh, I can 't explain
It's surely not his brain
That makes me thrill
I love him
Because he's
I don 't know
Because he's just my Bill
Yeah, but can you keep her off a bottle?
I'll try.
- Will that do, Simon Legree?
- Fine, Julie.
Now let's see the costume for the finale, huh?
- Yes, massah.
- Attagirl.
- Yes, massah.
- That's right.
Yes, massah.
Come on, Julie. Come on, come on, you kept us waiting for you.
- Mr. Green, can we do our number now?
- Yeah?
- A little later.
- We hope you like it.
- I will. Yeah?
- Mr. Green?
Would you sign for these, please?
- Hello, Schultz.
- How are you? Say, is that Mr. Green?
- Yeah, that's him. Right there.
- Thank you.
- Say, Mr. Green?
- Yeah.
Hi, Mr. Green. I'm Frank Schultz.
Schultz and Schultz.
Schultz and... Oh, the dance act.
Fine, yeah.
I'll be with you in a minute.
- We got great new routines for you.
- Fine. Fine.
We brought somebody with us who we think has real talent.
- We'd like you to hear her.
- Yeah?
Nolie Ravenal. Nolie Hawks, that is.
- She sings. Like a nightingale.
- I already got a singer. Besides, l...
Take off your hat.
Yeah, I guess I got a few minutes.
What kind of songs do you sing?
Well, negro songs mostly, and spirituals.
- Jazzbo singer, huh?
- Well, no, l...
- Yes, yes.
- It won't do any harm...
...to listen to her, Joe.
All right, go ahead.
I wrote it out myself.
I hope you'll be able to read it.
I'll make out, sister.
Fish gotta swim
Birds gotta fly
I've gotta love
One man till I die
Go hurry her nibs with that costume, will you, Joe?
Can 't help
Lovin ' that man of mine
- Come on, Julie.
- I've been trying to get her to...
Yeah, Jake's getting all riled up about everything.
- Just a minute.
- Maybe I know
- Who's that singing?
- Some gal the dance act brought in.
Look, Julie,
Jake wants to see this dress...
She's a pretty good looker, but she needs the job bad, I guess.
- Needs a job? Why?
- Schultz said she was married...
...to some two-bit gambler and he walked off and left her flat.
Us boys are all no good, you know that.
Come on, Julie. Bring the dress.
That's a rainy day
Julie, dear, you've got to try this dress on.
But when he comes back
The day is fine
Come on, Julie.
Let's have the drink.
Shut up.
The sun will shine
He can come home
As late as can be
Home without him
Ain 't no home to me
Can 't help loving that man of mine
Well, how about it, Mr. Green?
Oh, not bad. Leave word where we can reach you, honey.
Something may show up later, see?
- Charlie.
- Keep trying, sister. You'll make it.
- Thank you.
- You were super.
Well, you two certainly did your best.
Mr. Green, Julie's gone.
- What?
- I ran after her, all the way to the street.
She just laughed at me, right over the top of a bottle. She's quitting.
- Well, what about my opening?
- She said if you don't hire...
...the little girl who just sang, you're crazy.
- Why, that trampy little...
- I'll go get her, boss.
Let her go, the dirty worthless...
Hey, you with the hat.
Take it off.
Let's hear that number again.
Happy New Year!
Yes, sir, that's what
I said to Parthy.
I said, "I'm going to Chicago to see
Nolie and Gay for New Year's...
...whether you come or not."
You wear the trousers, eh, buster?
I wouldn't look good in skirts, would I?
Happy New Year!
- Right this way, please.
- Right this way, he said.
Yes, sir, right this way.
Come on, ladies. Right here. Right now.
There we are.
- Champagne, sir?
- Champagne? Right.
Thank you. Fill the scuppers.
Happy New Year!
I guess your daughter has plenty of lucre to be staying at the Sherman Hotel.
As a matter of fact, they're not living there anymore.
Got a place of their own now.
Nolie never wrote me.
Figured she wanted to surprise me.
But I'm gonna surprise Nolie, because Ellie and Frank...
...they're the top liners on the bill here.
They'll know where she is, all right.
With the finish.
Happy New Year!
So you have a good excuse for a night out on the town, buster?
Don't need any excuse.
This is New Year's Eve.
Happy New Year!
And now, the new sensational dance duo, Schultz and Schultz.
That's Ellie. That's Ellie and Frank.
Wait'll you catch them.
I taught them everything they know myself. Yes, sir.
There they are.
Life upon the wicked stage
Ain 't ever what a girl supposes
Stage-door Johnnies
Aren 't raging over you
With gems and roses
When you let a feller hold your hand
Which means an extra beer or sandwich
Everybody whispers
"Ain 't her life a whirl"
Though you're warned against a rou
Ruining your reputation
When you've played around
The one-night trade
Around this great big nation
Wild old men
Who give you jewels and sables
Only live in Aesop 's fables
Life upon the wicked stage
Ain 't nothing for a girl
Though I've listened to you
Moan and grieve
You must pardon me
If I do not believe you
There is no doubt
You're crazy about
Your awful stage
I admit it's fun
To smear my face with paint
Causing everyone
To think I'm what I ain 't
And I like to play
A demimonde role
With soul
Ask the hero does he
Like the way I lure
When I play a hussy
Or a paramour
But when once the curtain 's down
My life is pure
And how I dread it
Life upon the wicked stage
Ain 't never what a girl supposes
Stage-door Johnnies
Aren 't raging over you
With gems and roses
I've got talent
But it ain 't been tested
No one's even interested
Life upon the wicked stage
Ain 't nothing for a girl
Hey, what did I tell you?
That's Ellie and Frank. More!
We want more of that, don't we?
Come on, boy.
Excuse me, girls.
If you don't mind, ladies...
...I'm going back and say hello to them.
Now, wait right here. Don't go away.
- But who will now charm you with a popular new ballad.
First time on a Chicago stage.
That sweetheart of the Mississippi,
Miss Magnolia Ravenal.
Nolie.
A little maiden
Climbed an old man 's knee
- Can't hear you.
- Begged for a story
- Do, uncle, please
- Nolie.
- Why are you single?
- My baby.
Why live alone?
- I had a sweetheart
- Nolie.
- Years and years ago
- Here.
- Nolie, here.
- Where she is now
Take it back to the river.
Quiet!
Quiet! Quiet!
I'll tell it all
I believed her faithless
Nolie, remember what I told you.
Smile.
After the ball is over
After the break of dawn
After the dancers leaving
After the stars are gone
Many a heart is aching
- lf you could read them all
- Smile.
Many the hopes that have vanished
After the ball
- Oh, Papa.
- After the ball is over
After the break of dawn
After the dancers leaving
After the stars are gone
Many a heart is aching
If you could read them all
Many the hopes that have vanished
After the ball
Happy New Year!
Should old acquaintance be forgot
And never brought to mind
Should old acquaintance be forgot
And days of auld lang syne
And that's the way it is, Papa.
Just like you said. It's Monday.
Well, you'll just wanna forget him,
Nolie, darling.
- He's a scoundrel. A no-account.
- No, Papa, no, he isn't.
He was only trying to think of me.
Well, from now on, you can just be thinking of yourself.
Why, after tonight, you're a big star.
You can go to New York.
No, I can't. No, I can't.
I can't just think of myself either.
I'm gonna have a baby.
Nolie.
Nolie.
You say he was thinking of you, and he knew about this?
No, Papa. No, Gay never knew.
You see I was...
He was so worried and so down that...
Well, I was waiting for things to get better before I told him.
But I...
Don't worry, Papa.
I wanna come home.
If you'll have me.
If we'll have you?
Happy New Year!
Happy New Year!
Let's celebrate, everybody.
Here's to a happy new year.
It will be a happy new year, won't it?
It will be.
And what name do we put down for the little lady?
Kim. That's her name. K-l-M.
Kim Hawks.
Kim Ravenal.
Kim Ravenal.
There she is.
That will be all of that.
- It seems to me, Hawks.
- Got a kiss for Grandpa?
Come to Grandma. Come on.
Your supper's ready.
You poor starved darling.
My goodness.
I think I'm gonna sing.
- Sit down. Sit down.
- Oh, quit it. Quit it.
Hey, lookit. You know this one?
Fish gotta swim
Birds gotta fly
I gotta love
One man till I die
- Can 't...
- Hey, Julie. Come on.
- Let's get out of here.
- Oh, leave me alone, Dan.
Say, listen. Who bought your ticket?
That's rather untidy conduct, my friend.
Oh, it is, huh?
Say, who do you think you're...?
No cause for worry, folks.
Just a little misunderstanding.
- You know what cabin he has?
- Two-eighteen.
- Thanks, mister.
- That's all right.
I don't know why... I mean, I don't know why it should matter to you.
Somebody used to sing that song.
Somebody who mattered to me very much.
Excuse me.
Thank you.
- Who is that fella?
- A fair-sized gambler.
He travels with us now and then.
- Say, he's got a fair-sized punch too.
- A gambler, huh?
- Name ain't Ravenal, is it?
- Yes. Gaylord Ravenal.
- So that's the no-good...
- Excuse me, ma'am?
- Give me a neat rye.
- Yes.
That's to get my courage up.
Natchez, 10 minutes.
Landing in Natchez in 10 minutes.
Ten minutes. Landing in Natchez.
Ten minutes. Natchez.
Nice place, Natchez.
- You getting off there?
- No. All the way to New Orleans.
Thought maybe Natchez, seeing as there's a show boat tied up there.
No, still New Orleans.
I thought maybe because you look like an actor.
Once I was. I admit to that.
I'm sorry.
- Is that all you're sorry about?
- You'd better turn in.
Maybe you're sorry because you're some kind of rat.
All right, all right, so I'm a rat.
Now, go to bed.
Oh, no. Please, mister.
I was talking about myself maybe.
Lots of rats come off show boats.
On-stage, under stage, sneaking off, kicked off.
Kicked off.
Taking things with them, taking nothing.
Me, mister, I was on one once too.
Forget about it, honey.
Get some sleep.
She was so pretty and sweet.
So open-out trusting sweet.
Who? What are you talking about?
And you know something, mister?
Some big, soft-talking card player...
...came along and took her right off the
Cotton Blossom, where she belonged.
Then left her broke and alone in Chicago when she was gonna have a baby.
What are you talking about?
Who are you?
Hey, Julie. For the love of...
Cut it, will you?
We gotta get off here.
Julie.
So you're...
- Look, what's that you said...?
- You wanna see what you left?
You wanna see them, mister?
I've kept track of them ever since she was born.
Kim.
Kim Ravenal.
- Oh, Nolie.
- Now you see why I wish...
...you'd never been nice to me?
You see why, mister?
Please, Julie. Take my oath.
I never knew.
Hey, Julie!
- You mean, honestly...?
- Please, Julie. Take my oath.
Last call, kid.
Look, I gotta go now.
I hope I did right.
I know there's always two sides to everything.
It's the whiskey maybe.
Look, mister, if you ever do get to see Nolie...
...not get together with her, I mean, but if you ever do get to talk to her...
...don't ever tell her you saw me.
I mean, don't ever tell her you saw me like this.
I won't, Julie.
We get away from these noisy people.
We go to sleep in the woods.
Hello.
They're going to sleep now.
She always goes to sleep first.
Is your name Kim?
That's a very pretty name.
- How did they call you Kim?
- It's a geographical name.
Geographical?
The stork dropped me plop in the middle of the river.
Right in the middle of the river?
Right between Kentucky,
Illinois and Missouri.
Oh, I see.
K-l-M. That's very pretty.
And did your mommy fish you out?
No. My grandpa did.
He swims more better.
Well, is your mommy here?
Of course.
And where's your daddy?
- Right here.
- Here?
- You mean...
- No, here.
That's Nolie and this is Gay.
Of course, he isn't my real daddy.
He's far away someplace, so I just play make-believe this is my daddy.
Make-believe.
Could you make-believe that I was your daddy?
You know how to play make-believe?
- Oh, sure.
- All right. You start.
Well...
...let's see.
First of all, I'd put you up on my knee like this.
And then
I'd put my arms around you.
And then I'd say:
Only make-believe
I'm near you
Only make-believe
That you're with me
Girls and boys
Find it fun in pretending
Couldn 't you?
Couldn 't I?
Couldn 't we?
Darling, look.
If your daddy really did come back...
...could you make-believe that...?
Look, could you pretend that he'd never been away?
- Could you, sweetheart?
- Of course.
Best of all
Make-believe I love you
For to tell...
Kim.
We were playing make-believe, Mommy.
This is my mommy.
Kim, your grandpa's getting ready to leave.
You'd better go back onboard now.
He plays it real wonderful.
- Bye.
- Goodbye.
She's lovely.
Yes. Yes, she is, isn't she?
You look fine too, Nolie.
Thank you, Gay.
- Have things gone well for you?
- Yes, yes.
I just happened to see the picture and I...
- Picture?
- Well, in the paper.
And the article. I...
Nolie, there's so much that I want to say to you.
- Nolie.
- Gay.
OI' man river
That ol' man river
He must know something
Parthy. Partheny.
Look! Look there.
- I still have my eyesight.
- He's back.
It's Saturday night again.
It's Wednesday night, and don't you strike me.
It's Saturday night forever.
Yes, and Fourth of July, and Christmas...
... and Happy New Year.
Parthy.
- Get the boat started. The people.
- Roll the wheel, Windy.
But ol' man river
Cast off the bow line.
All right, Joe. On the stern there.
You and me, we sweat and strain
Body all achin ' and racked with pain
Tote that barge and lift that bale
You get a little drunk
And you lands in jail
I get weary
And sick of tryin '
I'm tired of livin '
And scared of dyin '
But ol' man river
He just keeps rollin '
Along
Subtitles by
SDI Media Group
[SINGING ''(LOVE IS)
THE TENDER TRAP'']
[CLICKING ]
POPPY:
Mm.
Is that the best you've got to say?
Mm. . . .
You can do better than that.
What do you want, a testimoniaI?
That wouId be nice.
You know, I've been wanting to teII you something for months now.
What?
You are the softest girI.
Ha. Gee, thanks.
That's what every girI wants to hear.
[CHUCKLING ]
No, I mean it.
You're not fIabby or anything Iike that.
Just nice and soft.
You know what I mean.
[CHUCKLES]
Yes, I see what you mean.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
Who is that?
I'II be darned if I know.
But whoever it is, I don't want any.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
Uh-oh.
-Maybe I'd better. . . .
-Yeah.
I'II just be a minute.
Don't Iose the pIace.
Oh. . . .
-Joe!
-CharIie!
[LAUGHS]
[LAUGHING ]
CHARLIE:
WeII, I'II be.
How are you, Joe?
-How is EtheI?
-Whew.
Egads, it's good to see you, Joe.
How is everything in IndianapoIis?
Hey, how about a drink? StiII martinis?
-Same drink, same wife.
-You got it.
Why didn't you Iet a feIIow know you were coming?
-Didn't you get my teIegram?
-Nope. No wire.
That's funny, I sent one.
Anyway, I'm staying with you.
Good. WeIcome aboard, Joe.
-Wow. What a water hoIe.
-Yeah.
This is a far cry from the tree houses you used to faII out of as a kid.
[CHARLIE LAUGHS]
Do aII theatricaI agents in New York
Iive Iike this?
How much money you making anyhow?
AImost as much as I'm spending.
Hey, how is everything at the oId pIant?
The Indiana PharmaceuticaI Company is keeping its head above water.
Good. WeII, drink up, buddy boy.
-Joe.
-CharIie.
I'm gIad to see success has not changed you.
You stiII make a Iousy martini.
[LAUGHING ]
-Get out of there.
-Hey, did I ask you? How is EtheI?
EtheI? She's okay.
How about CharIie, my boy, how is he?
WeII, I don't know.
Last week, we were thinking we shouIdn't have named him after you.
Hmm?
He feII out of a tree house.
Oh, my gosh.
-Did he get hurt?
-No, feII on his sister.
Oh, my gosh.
It's aII right, CharIie.
It was a very Iow tree house.
Good. What are you doing in New York, business?
WeII, not reaIIy. I've Ieft EtheI.
You what?
You Ieft EtheI?
-But, Joe, you can't be serious.
-HeIIo.
-You waIked out on her?
-HeIIo.
The mother of your chiIdren? The woman who gave you the best years of her Iife?
Sweetie, I'm sorry to interrupt but it's aImost 6.
It is? Oh, gee, that's a shame.
Oh, uh, Poppy Matson, Joe McCaII.
-How do you do?
-How do you do?
Thanks for dropping by.
-You must be kidding.
-I'II just tidy up a bit.
-You don't have to do that, honey.
-Don't you--?
I'II take care of it.
I'II give you a beII soon.
-Tomorrow?
-Not tomorrow.
-You caII me.
-I wiII.
-On the phone.
-Phone.
-Soon?
-Yes, very soon. Bye.
Oh, CharIie, did I teII you?
-My uncIe caught the whitefish.
-What?
Don't you remember?
You toId me you Ioved whitefish.
He's sending one down.
Oh, yes, good, good.
-I'II caII when it arrives.
-You do that.
And we'II have a wonderfuI dinner with Burgundy and candIeIight. . .
-. . .and a damask tabIecIoth and Iemons.
-Mm.
I can hardIy wait.
-Bye.
-Bye.
Where the sam hiII did she come from?
Never mind.
Now, what's aII this stuff about you Ieaving EtheI?
EtheI? Oh, I Ieft her.
That gorgeous girI, are there any more Iike that?
Forget the gorgeous girI, Joe.
Let's settIe down and discuss this thing.
Why did you Ieave EtheI?
Oh, that was her suggestion.
It was nothing Iike you think.
ReaIIy?
What is it Iike, Joe?
-What's it Iike?
-Mm.
WeII, it's Iike this.
Last week, we ceIebrated our 1 1 th anniversary.
Oh, did you get my siIver tray?
-We got seven siIver trays, but thanks.
-Oh.
After everyone had gone,
EtheI and I Iooked at each other. . .
. . .and EtheI said,
''Joe, I Iove you very, very much.
Why don't we take a vacation from each other?''
So I said, ''There's business in New York
I couId take care of. ''
She said, ''You do that.
See some shows, sponge off oId CharIie.
Then you come running back here. . .
. . .and chase me aII over the house the way you used to. '' So. . . .
Doggone.
I toId you that EtheI was a smart girI.
We'II drink to her.
-CharIie.
-Joe.
-EtheI.
-EtheI.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
[CHARLIE WHISTLING ]
Hi, honey.
CHARLIE: Oh, hi, Jessica.
I'm a IittIe busy right now, I--
That's aII right. I happened to be down at the Washington Market today. . .
. . .and I ran right smack into this wonderfuI reaI Wisconsin CoIby. . .
. . .and I knew you Iiked it better than any other cheese. And so here it is.
I've got a friend at the market. . .
. . .who is gonna aIert me the very minute the first appIes appear. . .
. . .and I'm keeping you in mind for a whoIe busheI of. . . .
WeII, how can you Iive in a pIace that Iooks Iike this?
Jessica, this is Joe McCaII.
Jessica CoIIins.
-How do you do, Mr. McCaII?
-Miss CoIIins.
Have you ever seen anyone keep a pIace in such disorder?
WeII, I don't know what Mr. McCaII wiII think.
Now, you two go on about your business and don't you pay me no mind. . .
. . .and I'II have this pIace at Ieast Iooking tidy.
WeII, my goodness, here's a teIegram and it hasn't even been opened yet.
Somebody may have died or something.
Now, what this pIace needs is a reaI thorough oId-fashioned house cIeaning.
A Iick and a promise won't do. No, sir.
Thank you.
Now, have you seen those drapes?
WeII, those drapes need a reaI thorough, oId-fashioned fIogging. . .
. . .and I'm gonna do it.
And that couch.
What have you been doing on that couch?
Uh, I appreciate what you're doing, but not now. Some other time.
-You aIways say that.
-No, reaIIy. I'II caII you soon.
-WeII, don't forget now, hear?
-I hear.
-Promise?
-I promise.
-Goodbye now.
-Goodbye, Mr. McCaII.
Mm. Tiger.
-Bye.
-Bye.
Where am I?
Where do aII these tomatoes come from?
Tomatoes?
-How dare you caII these girIs tomatoes?
-WeII. . . .
For your information, Mr. McCaII, Poppy is an important editor at DoubIeday.
And Jessica happens to be the buyer. . .
. . .for the Iargest chain of women's stores in the South.
Tomatoes indeed.
[SCOFFS]
-CharIie, I'd Iike to ask you something.
-Hey, how about this?
My friend is coming to spend a coupIe of weeks with me.
I gotta shave, I got a date.
Tomatoes or no tomatoes, teII me one thing.
How come you rate with girIs Iike that?
Because I'm big and strong and fat.
Don't think you'II beat my time the way you did aII the others.
CharIie. . .
. . .you're 35 years oId. You're not stiII brooding about the junior prom?
You're darn right, I am.
Three hundred girIs in a Iine.
And right at the head of the Iine is this IoveIy, sweet. . .
. . .absoIute doII of a girI smiIing right at me.
AII I've got to do is take three simpIe paces forward and say:
''May I have the pIeasure of this dance?''
Not me.
Way down at the end of the Iine,
I spot this taII job. . .
. . .the goofy one with the hot eyes.
And even from where I stand,
I know this is troubIe.
So, what do I do?
Of course. I cut my way through a haIf miIe of organdy. . .
. . .whiIe you take the three simpIe paces forward.
You get EtheI and I get sIapped with a paternity suit.
At Ieast they cIeared you.
Why shouIdn't they?
-I never even Iaid a gIove on her.
-That's what EtheI said.
From the beginning, EtheI said,
''CharIie couIdn't have done it.
-That's right.
-He hasn't got the know-how. ''
[PHONE RINGS]
HeIIo.
Oh, hi, honey.
No, I can't tonight.
No, not tomorrow night either.
No, no, no, the pIace is very cIean, yeah.
Thanks for caIIing.
Yeah. Okay, I'II get back to you.
Bye.
Boy, what have you got?
It's not what I've got, Joe, it's what I haven't got. A wife.
-A wife?
-Mm-hm.
When I came to New York,
I figured it wouId be Iike back home.
You know, meet a girI, take her to the movie. . .
. . .send her some candy and fIowers, romance her a IittIe bit.
WeII?
Not the way it works in New York.
They got a kind of underground.
As soon as a bacheIor sets foot in this town, the signaIs go out.
And even before you get your bag unpacked, you're up to there in dames.
Look, it's wonderfuI.
PIain joker Iike me,
I've got dames I haven't even caIIed yet.
-And it goes on Iike this aII the time?
-AII the time.
-And aII you gotta be is a bacheIor?
-Mm-hm.
-PaI, you reaIIy got it taped.
-Mm-mm. Not me. It's New York, Joe.
City's teeming with dames.
To teII you the truth, every once in a whiIe, I get bored.
Oh, I feeI for you, paI.
You know what I mean.
Sure, it's fun, but Iet's face it.
You are the guy who's got it taped.
-Me?
-Mm-hm.
I wouId be happy to trade this rat race for your setup in two seconds.
You come home in the evening, a pretty IittIe house. . .
. . .three kids run down the path yeIIing, ''Daddy. ''
You go inside and there's EtheI in a cute IittIe apron. . .
. . .throws her arms around you, gives you a big smack, says, ''Joe--''
''Joe, we gotta have waII-to-waII carpeting. ''
-Oh, now, don't go knocking EtheI to me.
-I'm not knocking her.
If it weren't for EtheI, we wouIdn't have waII-to-waII carpeting today.
Can you imagine that?
PeopIe wouId be abIe to see the fIoor around the edge of the rug.
And the kids don't run down the path to greet me. . .
. . .when I come home at night.
They're too tired.
After a day of dancing Iessons and fencing Iessons. . .
. . .eIocution Iessons, eurhythmic Iessons.
Dramatic Iessons, finger-painting Iessons.
As a matter of fact,
EtheI isn't home either.
The dog is taking her to obedience schooI.
Oh, come on, Joe.
It can't aIways be Iike that.
No, no, it isn't aIways Iike that.
Sometimes at night after the kids are asIeep. . .
. . .it's nice and quiet, just the two of us aIone.
[WATER RUNNING ]
I start a fire in the firepIace. . .
. . .EtheI gets the good brandy out. . .
. . .we push a coupIe of chairs together.
I squeeze her hand, she squeezes mine.
''Honey,'' I say.
''DarIing,'' she says.
''Don't you think it's time Peter had braces on his teeth?''
One stinking kid Ieft in the house without braces, she can't stand it.
I'm not even Iistening to you.
I can't beIieve that EtheI,
IittIe starry-eyed EtheI. . .
. . .with that angeI's smiIe and the cutest
IittIe figure in the entire MiddIe West. . . .
Is it stiII?
Yup.
Now, don't teII me that doesn't pIease you anymore.
It deIights me.
After aII, married 1 1 years, I've never even Iooked at another woman.
-Are you thinking of Iooking now?
-CertainIy not. Why?
WeII, when guys start teIIing me how many years they didn't. . .
. . .I figure they're about ready to do.
And no matter what you say, I bet you were pIenty happy with your setup. . .
. . .untiI you came in here and saw what I had faIIen into.
Maybe you're right, paI.
After aII, 1 1 years.
Yeah, 1 1 wonderfuI years.
And don't forget that. Oh-oh.
What's the matter, night shift coming on?
No, no, she isn't just one of the girIs.
This is something speciaI.
What's she got, her own vacuum cIeaner?
No, this one hardIy cIeans up at aII.
AIthough she does straighten up a IittIe.
I see. What is it with her?
Oh, she's reaIIy speciaI.
You know she used to pIay with Stokowski?
You mean, as chiIdren?
How oId is she anyway?
Oh, shut up.
You'II see SyIvia in a--
Ah. Here we come now.
Which one of the gentIemen is SyIvia?
Oh, have you got a surprise coming.
SyIvia, Mr. Joe McCaII.
Joe, Miss Crewes.
Honored, Miss Crewes.
Poor dear, she can hardIy wait to get here.
I better hurry. It doesn't take SyIvia very Iong to get over here from NBC.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
What did they do?
Shoot her out of the cannon?
-HeIIo.
-HeIIo.
CHARLIE:
He's in the kitchen.
HELEN:
I know.
Hey, hey.
-Who is she?
-I'm sorry, I can't introduce you, Joe.
I forget her Iast name.
It's HeIen something-or-other, she. . . .
I'II take good care of Joe.
Come on, baby.
Thank you.
You named the dog after me.
I'm touched.
She comes in and waIks him twice a day.
One of these nights,
I'm gonna have to take her to dinner.
That wouId be nice of you, suItan.
-Good evening, Miss Crewes.
-HeIIo, George.
-AII moved in, Mr. Loughran?
-Yes.
Yes, everything except the piano and a coupIe of end tabIes.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
I got it.
Hi, baby.
This is a tuxedo?
-WeII, we were just unpacking a--
-Bye.
This one is different.
She'II be back.
Did he teII you I'd be back?
WeII, yes.
What's your name?
McCaII.
Do you have a tuxedo, Mr. McCaII?
Uh. . . . WeII, as a matter of fact,
I don't.
Go and change, boy.
Five minutes, so heIp me.
Can I fix you a drink, Mr. McCaII?
PIease aIIow me.
WeII, I've never heard such gaIIantry in this apartment.
-Scotch?
-Fine.
No tuxedo, hmm?
TeII me, have you got a bIue suit?
Yes, one right there on top, see?
-I see.
-Water?
PIease.
Oh, that's, uh, the wife and kids.
Oh, you're Joe McCaII.
I'm SyIvia Crewes.
HeIIo.
Thank you.
Uh. . . . That dressing gown that CharIie sent EtheI Iast Christmas, did it fit?
You bought that?
I didn't think CharIie had that much taste.
Which one is Peter?
The one without the braces.
Of course that was taken six months ago.
You know, CharIie makes very good use of your famiIy in his courtship.
I use the term IooseIy.
How do you mean?
WeII, whenever he gets a IittIe misty. . .
. . .he starts teIIing big Iies about how one day he'd Iike a nice IittIe house. . .
. . .and a nice IittIe wife and nice IittIe kids just Iike good oId Joe.
Did it ever occur to you that he might not be Iying?
Mr. McCaII, if it hadn't occurred to me,
I wouIdn't be here.
Forty-five seconds.
I'II be right there.
You better be.
Oh, I saw you on teIevision a IittIe whiIe ago.
Did you?
WeII, that's very sweet of you. . .
. . .considering that Range Rider was on the rivaI network.
I don't quite understand it. You're a musician with an NBC Orchestra?
How did you get together with tin-eared CharIie?
Oh, he's not such a tin ear.
I've been working on him, he's making fine progress.
-CharIie?
-Mm.
He just Ioves Peter and the Wolf.
Listen.
[WHISTLING ]
[CHARLIE HUMMING ]
Ha-ha-ha. See?
That wasn't easy for him.
You know, CharIie teIIs me that you go aII the way back to fourth grade together.
-Yeah, further than that. Kindergarten.
-Oh?
What was he Iike then?
-Mm. LittIe. Ha.
-Ha-ha.
-What did you do when you were a kid?
-Like when?
Oh, 5 to 1 0.
PIayed the fiddIe.
-Ten to 20?
-PIayed the fiddIe.
Twenty to--
-Say it.
-Twenty-eight?
Thank you very much.
PIayed the fiddIe.
I guess I'II just keep on fiddIing untiI I die or get married. . .
. . .whichever comes first.
[DOOR OPENS]
And there you are.
My, but don't you Iook pretty.
I'd ask you to go with us but I don't want you.
I don't bIame you.
If you get tired, that thing makes up into a bed.
If you can't sIeep, there's some SeconaI in the medicine cabinet.
If you have troubIe staying awake, there's some Benzedrine there.
If you can't make up your mind, take one of each.
Oh, if you get hungry, there's a nice new cheese in the refrigerator.
That's for getting ready so quick.
Who ever had it so good?
Not me.
Don't wait up for me. Bye.
Good night.
[DOOR OPENS]
[DOOR CLOSES]
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
Oh.
-Thank you.
-HeIIo, HeIen.
Uh, I'm sorry,
I don't know your Iast name.
CharIie forgot to introduce us, but I'm his best friend.
As a matter of fact, uh, he's named after me.
Joe McCaII's my name. Um. . . .
Hi, namesake.
In your bed, Joe.
What's your hurry?
Let's have a drink.
No, thanks.
I have dinner on the stove.
-Let it stay. We'II go out for dinner.
-No, thanks.
Oh, why not?
Mr. McCaII, you're a married man.
Oh, CharIie toId you, huh?
WeII, as a matter of fact, he didn't.
You mean, you couId teII just by Iooking at me?
Of course. Good night.
[PIANO PLAYING ]
I wouIdn't know. Is he any good?
He can't be.
He's not one of our cIients.
[CHUCKLING ]
Thank you very much. Who is next?
A Miss GiIIis.
Miss GiIIis, pIease.
Watch this kid, CharIie.
The office signed her Iast week.
SAYERS:
AII right, Miss GiIIis.
Do you mind teIIing something about yourseIf?
You know, your background, theatricaI experience and so forth.
Don't be nervous, Miss GiIIis.
Oh, weII, I'm not at aII nervous.
My name is JuIie GiIIis and I was born right here in New York City.
I'm 22 years oId.
That is, I was 21 and a haIf a week ago,
Wednesday.
But as soon as I pass the haIf-way mark,
I say I'm a year oIder.
I know most peopIe wait untiI the Iast minute to tack on another year, but I. . . .
WeII, maybe I am a IittIe bit nervous.
DIRECTOR:
You go right ahead, Miss GiIIis.
TeII us anything you want to.
WeII, there isn't very much more to teII.
My onIy theatricaI experience was this past June. . .
. . .at the senior cIass pIay at Briarwood.
We did The Pirates of Penzance.
There was an agent there and he gave me something to sign. . .
. . .and here I am.
Are you stiII there?
Ha. We're stiII here, Miss GiIIis.
Now you, uh, sing or dance or just keep on taIking.
I think I'd better sing. I taIk too much.
I think I better take my gIasses off.
She Iooks too good with these on.
Steady, buster.
I think this kid's got something, Eddie.
Bring her to Bergie's.
-I'd Iike to taIk to her.
-Okay.
You two won't mind, wiII you?
Why shouId we mind?
We'II be right there with you.
-CiaveIIi?
-Hmm?
How do you Iike that?
They hired CiaveIIi as conductor of the Summer Symphony.
CiaveIIi? How do you Iike that?
It's shocking.
I don't say he's a bad vioIinist, but conductor?
Why, it's ridicuIous.
The bum never hit .300 in his whoIe Iife.
Sucker for an inside curve.
He's good with the cIassics. . .
. . .but what are they gonna do when they get past Brahms?
ProbabIy have to put in a pinch hitter.
They wouIdn't take a woman for the job.
Oh, no, of course not.
Makes it too tough in the Iocker room.
Very funny.
What did you two do for Iaughs before I came aIong?
[GIBBERING ]
I'm sorry I asked.
JuIie, this is CharIie Reader, our top taIent man. Miss GiIIis.
-HeIIo.
-How do you do?
Miss Crewes, Mr. McCaII.
SyIvia and Joe.
-HeIIo.
-Two of my friends who have no taIent.
-I'II be seeing you Iater.
-Goodbye.
-Bye.
-Can I get you a drink?
-Just coffee.
-We have pIenty of that.
-Sugar and cream?
-Yes, pIease.
I can onIy stay a few minutes.
I just wanted to teII you how impressed we were.
-You were IoveIy.
-WonderfuI.
I had a word with the producer,
Sammy Sayers.
He says it Iooks as though you're about set for the part.
Oh, good. Thank you.
This is your first professionaI show, isn't it?
Yes.
Aren't you just a IittIe bit excited about breaking through for the first time?
Oh, the theater's aII right, but onIy temporariIy.
Are you thinking of taking up something eIse?
-WeII, yes. Marriage, I hope.
-Oh.
Did you have any particuIar young man in mind?
WeII, there are any number of young men, but I haven't found mine yet.
WeII, a pretty young thing Iike you shouIdn't have much troubIe.
WeII, I certainIy hope not.
I mean, a career is just fine but it's no substitute for marriage.
-Don't you think so, Miss Crewes?
-Miss GiIIis, I think so.
PassionateIy, I think so.
HonestIy, don't you think marriage is just the most important thing in the worId?
I mean, a woman isn't reaIIy a woman at aII. . .
. . .untiI she's been married and had chiIdren.
And why? Because she's fuIfiIIed.
Isn't that right?
Right.
You agree?
Of course I do.
What red-bIooded
American boy doesn't?
This red-bIooded
American boy doesn't.
Why not?
In order to be fuIfiIIed, you have to have a man.
And it might be just possibIe that what fuIfiIIs you might not fuIfiII him.
My man, it wiII.
You have his specifications?
WeII, yes,
I know everything except his bIood type.
Uh, teII us about him.
You mean it?
Because this is something
I couId taIk about aII day.
You're on, Miss GiIIis.
WeII, the first thing I want in a man, he's got to Iove chiIdren.
-How many you think you'd Iike?
-Three.
That's the magic number.
But not right away. The first two years, we're going to Iive in New York.
We'II be young and we'II wanna have Iots of fun.
There's no better pIace to have fun than New York, is there?
The chiIdren wiII come Iater.
-But not in New York?
-No, we'II move to the country for that.
Oh, probabIy, the first baby wiII be born in New York.
At what hospitaI?
At Doctor's. . . .
Oh, you're kidding me.
Never mind him. TeII us some more.
We reaIIy are interested.
Fascinated.
Look, I know this sounds crazy if you don't know me. . .
. . .but peopIe that know me think it's quite normaI.
I'm sure they do, Miss GiIIis.
You have a house in the country and the baby and now what do you do?
I have two more babies.
I didn't say a thing.
Yes?
When the kids get out of ScarsdaIe PubIic High SchooI--
Oh, ScarsdaIe?
WeII, certainIy.
Everyone knows they have the best schooI system in the country.
-Of course, everybody knows that.
-Now, Joe. . . .
I mean it. Everybody in IndianapoIis sends their kids to ScarsdaIe.
I've been kidded about this before but I do know what I want.
That's good.
Go on. TeII us more.
WeII, as I was saying, when the kids get out of high schooI and go to coIIege--
Miss GiIIis, don't you think you're just getting a IittIe ahead of yourseIf?
WeII, after aII, a person just can't go on ad-Iibbing his way through Iife.
WeII, some do.
Some have to.
JULIE: Sure, but that's because they made their pIans too Iate.
I wish I knew the answer to that one.
Now that I've toId you aII of my girIish dreams. . . .
-Do you reaIIy have to go?
-I reaIIy have to.
-Miss Crewes.
-Goodbye.
CHARLIE: I'II get you a taxi cab.
-No, don't bother. Mr. McCaII.
I couIdn't think of Ietting the mother of three chiIdren. . .
. . .waIk out on the streets aIone in the sinfuI oId city of New York.
-Goodbye.
JOE: Bye.
-See you Iater.
-Bye.
That is the most terrifying chiId
I ever met in my Iife.
I'm a IittIe shaky myseIf.
TeII me, Miss GiIIis, what are your pIans for the next 400 years?
Oh, weII, first I shaII have some chiIdren.
Oh, and how do you intend to have them?
The usuaI way.
No, I mean, in what order?
Oh, weII, first a boy, then a girI, then another boy. . .
. . .and then a chocoIate cream.
And, uh, what typicaI IittIe American community do you intend to Iive in?
Las Vegas. Where eIse?
[LAUGHING ]
And you know how it is with contracts.
It wiII be a week or two before we have anything for you.
How about you and I having dinner tomorrow night?
-Together?
-Of course.
Why?
Why?
WeII, I mean, for what reason?
Does there have to be a reason for a maIe and femaIe. . .
. . .to sit down and break bread together?
I mean, tomorrow night you'II probabIy be hungry and you'II want to eat.
But why with you?
WeII, it's a simpIe question, isn't it?
Yes. I wish I had a simpIe answer.
I wish I had any answer.
WeII, I'II put it the other way around.
Tomorrow night you'II be hungry and wanna have dinner.
But why with me?
Miss GiIIis, through the years. . .
. . .I've found that sitting across the tabIe with a beautifuI girI. . .
. . .is not onIy pIeasant but it's awfuIIy good for my digestion.
WeII, I've onIy known you a few minutes but you seem fairIy nice.
You're even attractive in an offbeat, beat-up sort of way.
Thanks a Iot.
But I can't have dinner with every nice attractive man I meet.
It's not part of my pIan.
How is that pIan again?
My marriage pIan.
When I meet somebody new. . .
. . .and I don't feeI an immediate chemistry between us. . .
. . .weII, I'm poIite but that's aII.
And you mean that you feeI nothing chemicaI between you and me?
ExactIy.
Thank you very much for the coffee.
You do understand why I can't have dinner with you?
-It's crystaI cIear, Miss GiIIis.
-Good.
Good night.
About time you got here.
Were you kidding with what you toId me?
I was not. There she sits.
You taIk to her.
DIRECTOR: EtheI Barrymore signed a contract Iike this.
HeIen Hayes, Sarah Bernhardt.
I'd Iike to have a minute with Miss GiIIis.
-Sure, she's aII yours.
-HeIIo, JuIie.
Are you gonna shout at me too,
Mr. Reader?
No, I'm not, JuIie.
I'm gonna be very quiet.
I wanna get right to the point.
You don't have to teII me how it's a tradition of the theater. . .
. . .for everybody to sign a run-of-the-pIay contract.
Good. Then we can skip that.
But do you think it's fair to Mr. Sayers and the investors. . .
. . .that you quit four and a haIf months after the show opens?
I'm sorry.
If I postpone my marriage once,
I may postpone it again.
I can't take the chance.
I'm afraid I can onIy sign a contract untiI March 1 2th.
What's so speciaI about March 1 2th?
WeII, that's when my mother and father were married. On March 1 2th.
And in my pIan, that's the absoIute deadIine.
It just doesn't make sense, JuIie.
Because the other day, you toId me that you hadn't even met your young man yet.
Oh, but I wiII.
If you have a pIan and you reaIIy beIieve in it. . .
. . .it'II work.
Um. . . . Why don't we go to Bergie's and taIk this over, huh?
No, thanks, I've aIready had Iunch.
We couId have dinner tonight--
Mr. Reader, I've aIready expIained to you how I feeI about dinner with you.
JuIie. . .
. . .this is not chemistry, it's business.
You promised me you wouIdn't shout.
I've gotta get some air.
-How did--?
-What happened?
Get her to sign?
Sam, the best thing to do is to sign her untiI March. . .
. . .and maybe I can get her to change her mind by then.
-Where are you going?
-The nearest bar.
Wait, I'II go with you.
HeIIo.
No, I'm sorry, he's not.
Yes.
Yes, I'II teII him. Thank you.
[PHONE RINGING ]
HeIIo.
No, I'm sorry, he isn't.
Miss Snr?
WouId you speII that, pIease?
S-N-R?
Yes, Miss Snr, United Nations,
Thursday night, curry dinner.
I shaII teII him. Bye.
Miss Snr?
What kind of a name is that?
[PHONE RINGS]
Just give me the facts, ma'am.
Oh, heIIo, Jessica. How are you?
[DOOR CLOSES]
No, I'm sorry, he hasn't come in yet.
Oh, reaIIy?
Yeah, I'II teII him as soon as he gets in.
-Hi, Joe.
-Hi, sheik.
What does Jessica want?
What they aII want.
To feed you, caress you, burp you.
Sew monograms on your stupid shirts.
Oh. Did CaroI get thread for the monograms?
-Yes, she did.
-Good girI.
And Jessica stumbIed across a brand-new cheese.
S-N-R?
Yeah, that's Miss Snr.
She wants you to come over
Thursday evening and curry her.
You're a good boy, Joe.
Look for something extra speciaI in your pay enveIope, Saturday.
I hope you don't mind. I tied up your phone for three minutes this afternoon. . .
. . .with a personaI caII.
EtheI phoned.
Oh, how is she?
WeII, she says she's restIess and bored and she's going to carpet the bathroom.
[PHONE RINGS]
You answer it.
I'm deveIoping a cauIifIower ear.
HeIIo?
Oh, hi, Sayers.
No. I don't know where she is.
[MUSIC PLAYING ON TV]
She didn't show for rehearsaI at aII?
AII I can suggest is you better caII the poIice station. . .
. . .or the nearest hospitaI.
Maybe you ought to try the morgue.
Oh, I know it's no joke, Sayers.
You're sorry she came into your Iife?
How about me?
She wouIdn't even have dinner with me.
Yeah, if I hear from her,
I'II caII you. Bye.
GiIIis didn't show for the rehearsaI.
What do you think of that?
I try not to think of her and I'm succeeding.
ANNOUNCER [ON TV] : And now NBC
takes you to the Knightsbridge Armory. . .
...and the American Home Show.
Before we show you the exciting
innovations in homemaking...
... we will turn our cameras
on the enthusiastic crowds...
... that have gathered here.
Hey, CharIie, come here.
What's up?
Look at that.
We come now to the feature
of Homemaker's Haven...
... the kitchen of tomorrow,
gadgetry that does away with drudgery.
-Is this what you hustIed me in for?
-Wait tiII they get the audience.
But if anyone has any questions,
that's what I'm here for.
I have a question. Excuse me.
Egads, it's GiIIis.
How big a family
was this kitchen designed for?
ANNOUNCER: Well, we've planned it
for what the experts say...
... will be the average American family
in a few years.
Husband, wife and three children.
Oh, that's perfect.
I gotta get there and get her down to rehearsaI.
-Why you?
-It's my responsibiIity. I'm her agent.
Oh, come on now. Don't give me that agent-responsibiIity bit.
The chick has you tied in knots because she won't have anything to do with you.
You don't know what you're taIking about.
Stay away from this girI.
She's a trap with the trigger aII set.
So what? Do you think
I'd kick away a setup Iike this?
I don't know. Why don't you keep faIIing out of the tree house?
I have not faIIen out of a tree house in years.
Don't you worry about oId CharIie.
Ha. That has a famiIiar ring.
''Don't worry about CharIie. ''
Isn't that what you screamed as you feII over?
That's funny.
Wait a minute.
You got a date with SyIvia.
You're supposed to pick her up at NBC.
You're a coIIege graduate.
You think of something.
[CHATTERING ]
No, Mr. WiIson. It just isn't--
May I point out again. . .
. . .that this house was pIanned by the worId's greatest modern architect--
WeII, I can't put my finger on it but I just know it. . . .
Oh, heIIo, Mr. Reader.
What are you doing here?
That's a funny thing. I was just gonna ask you the same question.
Seems I have a chiIdish idea that you were Iong overdue at rehearsaI.
Oh, my goodness.
I just stopped in for a few minutes.
-Oh, I must have been here for hours.
-Oh, in that case, Iet's go.
Wait. I wanna ask you one question, then we'II go.
Does the combination of this room and this furniture. . .
. . .and Mr. WiIson in that chair do anything for you?
I don't know. Is it supposed to?
WeII, yes.
You see, I Iove this styIe house and I Iove this dcor. . .
. . .but when a man sits in that chair, it just doesn't seem to jeII.
It sort of goes out of focus.
WeII, it isn't your fauIt, Mr. WiIson.
Four other men were good enough to sit in that chair for me, but I. . . .
You haven't any idea of what I'm taIking about, have you?
Have you?
WiII you pIease get up and Iet Mr. Reader sit down?
-You're two hours Iate.
-You'II understand.
BeIieve me, sir.
BIind obedience works out best.
What did I do?
It's amazing.
The room seems so different now, aII at once.
Do you see it, Mr. WiIson?
Okay, cIass is over. Let's go, JuIie.
Mr. WiIson, come and visit us sometime.
-Yes, but the chair.
-Thank you very much.
-Amazing.
-AII right, JuIie.
-Amazing.
-This way.
-HeIIo, SyIvia.
-Oh, Joe.
What brings you to this windswept corner?
Anything to do with CharIie not being here?
Uh, weII, as a matter of fact--
AII right, Iad. Let's have it.
WeII, it's just a matter of CharIie getting a caII from--
His draft board?
No, no, no. His boss caIIed an emergency staff meeting and, uh. . . .
WouId you care to Iook me in the eye,
Mr. McCaII?
Not particuIarIy.
You know,
I don't mind being Iied to. . .
. . .if I feIt that a IittIe work went into the Iie.
A IittIe imagination.
It was CharIie's idea that perhaps I couId fiII in for him.
Uh, that is, if it's aII right with you.
Let's have a Iook at you.
Pirouette sIowIy.
You'II do.
Then you're my date?
I see no way out of it.
I'm your date.
You're, uh. . .
. . .angry with CharIie and me, aren't you?
No, I'm not. ReaIIy, I'm not.
Why not? You shouId be.
WeII, I have a high IQ and a Iow boiIing point.
How wouId you Iike to buy me a maIted miIk. . .
. . .and a tuna-fish sandwich at the corner drugstore?
I'd be deIighted.
And maybe we couId have a drink somepIace afterwards?
Who knows? The night is young, we're middIe-aged, anything can happen.
ShaII we dance?
[SINGING ''(LOVE IS)
THE TENDER TRAP'']
AII right. Not bad for a first try. I Iiked it.
Had a Iot of schmaItz.
-Thank you.
-That's aII.
That's aII, everybody.
Tomorrow morning, 1 0:00 sharp.
IncIuding Miss GiIIis.
What did you think of it, Mr. Reader?
[SPEAKS IN FRENCH]
You heard what the director said.
He said it had a Iot of schmaItz.
That's surface schmaItz, JuIie.
The worst kind.
You can't throw a song
Iike that away.
It's gotta have more warmth.
Look, I'II show you what I mean.
[SINGING ''(LOVE IS)
THE TENDER TRAP'']
You see what I mean?
You just gotta Iet it settIe a IittIe bit.
[SINGING ]
Oh, gee, that was nice.
WeII, I'm starved. Let's go to dinner.
-Together?
-Of course, come on.
[SINGING ''(LOVE IS)
THE TENDER TRAP'']
[INAUDIBLE]
[PHONE RINGS]
HeIIo?
Oh, heIIo, Poppy.
No, he hasn't come in yet.
Sure, I'II teII him. I won't forget.
Bye.
Oh, hi, Joe.
-Your entire harem caIIed.
-Good girIs.
The Iast one was Poppy.
Her uncIe's whitefish is in town.
Her uncIe's what?
Oh, yeah. Yeah, I remember.
-JuIie caII?
-No.
WeII, she shouId be here any minute.
-Fix you a drink, Joe?
-No, thank you.
Why do you have to romance that IittIe girI?
Oh, reIax, wiII you, rover?
In the first pIace, she's made of cast iron.
Second pIace, she's too young for you.
Third pIace, you've got more dames than you know what to do with.
And in the fourth pIace, you have got a IittIe troubIe yourseIf, boy.
I've been watching it deveIop.
The symptoms are cIassic.
Short temper, jangIed nerves. . .
. . .and even rude to your friends and your Ioved ones.
What you need, son, is a IittIe femaIe companionship.
Thank you very much, doctor.
It's nothing.
Now, Joe, don't sit around by yourseIf again tonight, wiII you?
As a matter of fact, I'm not.
Aha. You have a date.
-Mm-hm.
-Who is she? Anybody I know?
Yes, SyIvia.
-Again?
-Again.
WeII, that's great, Joe. Just great.
-Did she caII you?
-No, I caIIed her.
Now, there's a switch.
Oh.
As a matter of fact,
I'm on my way to pick her up now.
Forgive me for setting a precedent.
As a matter of another fact,
I've got two dates with SyIvia tonight.
One for dinner and one for after her concert.
Good night, suItan.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
-Hi, honey.
-Hi, CharIie.
Hey.
Oh, wait a minute.
You can do better than that.
Yes, I can.
-HeIIo, HeIen.
-HeIIo, CharIie.
Uh, how did Joe behave today?
-Like an angeI.
-Like a--
-WiII you pIease teII me who that girI is?
-Shh.
Be good, Joe.
-So Iong, CharIie. See you tomorrow.
-Yup. Uh. . . .
Yeah, so Iong, HeIen. Ha.
Thanks a Iot.
WeII, just who is Miss Deadpan?
Oh, uh. . . .
She's a, um, professionaI dog waIker.
Yeah, that's what she is.
She waIks the dog every day.
I never heard of a professionaI dog waIker.
And why does she have to be so attractive?
I, uh. . . . Ha.
I never noticed that she was particuIarIy attractive.
What's the matter, JuIie?
Gee whiz, you came in here with a chip on your shouIder.
WeII. . . .
WeII, I'm getting sick and tired of it.
WeII, CharIie, I haven't compIained before, but do you think I Iike it?
Like what?
Look, I know this is the atomic age and we're two civiIized aduIts.
You made that cIear.
But a girI stiII doesn't Iike to caII for a man at his apartment. . .
. . .or meet him at a bar.
EspeciaIIy when the whoIe evening has been pIanned without any consuItation.
-ConsuItation?
-That's right.
Every date we've had has been aII figured out by you.
You've never asked me once, not once, what I wanted to do.
Oh, weII, honey, I'm sorry.
Honest, I'm sorry, baby.
You shouId have mentioned it to me.
Look, from here on in, there wiII be a change.
What do you wanna do tonight?
WeII, I don't know.
We've got the whoIe town.
Just name something.
WeII, gee, I don't know.
-What do you want?
-Oh, no.
-Oh, no, not I. This is your evening.
-Oh.
WeII. . . .
Just take your time.
Just think about it.
[WHISTLING ]
Of course I couId. . . .
I couId make a tiny suggestion.
Yes?
WeII, there's a wonderfuI restaurant down on Bank Street. . .
. . .where they serve the worId's greatest
PaeIIa VaIenciana.
Yeah?
After, we couId go up the street a few bIocks. . .
. . .where there's a Mexican joint
I haven't been to in a Iong time.
They've got a crazy five-piece rumba band, the best you've ever danced to.
Then we couId pad right across the street--
That is if you wanted to.
--to a IoveIy IittIe caf where they serve up the best coffee. . .
. . .and guitar music in the whoIe city.
-CharIie?
-Mm?
The next time I teII you
I wanna pIan an evening. . .
. . .just don't Iisten.
AII right, I won't.
Because you know more about how to pIease a Iady. . .
. . .than any other man on the Eastern Seaboard.
Thank you.
And there's no other Iady
I wouId rather pIease.
Thank you.
Thank you.
If you'II give me a few seconds,
I'II go in and change.
And we'II be on our way.
SweII.
-In the meantime, I'II just read your maiI.
-SweII.
Uh, JuIie.
-JuIie.
-What's the matter?
-Nothing, you're just so cute, that's aII.
-Ha-ha-ha.
WeII, so are you.
I'm gIad you think so.
We're going to a Spanish joint.
Why don't we tango through the door?
I'm with you.
[CHARLIE HUMMING ]
Ain't this joint the most?
I think it's duII.
Oh. We couId traipse across the street to another joint.
No, thanks. I've had enough entertainment for one evening.
I can't take you home now.
What wouId your mother say?
I don't know.
Mom's in Boston visiting my aunt.
Oh?
Is she gonna be there Iong?
I don't think she'II be back tiII tomorrow night.
And your father?
I guess he's at home, huh?
Papa goes where Mama goes and Papa won't be home tiII Monday night.
WeII, you know, this joint is a IittIe duII.
How couId you suggest it anyway?
-Me?
-Watch it. Stand back, buddy, here.
Move out. Thank you.
Excuse me. Bye.
I Iike this idea.
I don't know who I'm fonder of.
You or that aunt of yours up in Boston.
CharIie, I think you'd better go.
Why?
I'm a weII-brought-up girI.
That's a remark my parents wouId expect me to make.
Of course, you couId proIong things by asking for a nightcap.
Miss GiIIis, may I have a sIug of Scotch?
CertainIy. It'II take a minute.
Because Mom's a teetotaIer and Pop hides the stuff in my hat boxes.
[WHISTLING ]
[CHUCKLES]
-Is water aII right?
-Yeah, fine.
-Say, these the foIks?
-Uh-huh.
Hmm. They Iook evenIy matched.
Except perhaps I think Mom may have 40 pounds on him.
I know what you're thinking.
-Let me ask you something. Here.
-What?
Has your dad got his hair?
Oh, a wisp here and there.
AII right, we'II make a pact.
You won't get baId and I won't get fat.
I'II drink to that.
-Now, what's on the agenda?
-Mm.
Let's neck.
A very sound idea.
-Mm-mm.
-Mm.
You know, I've been meaning to teII you something for days.
-You are the softest girI.
-Hmm.
TeII me more.
I'd be deIighted.
One second.
Why did you do that?
WeII, because some words take on a different meaning. . .
. . .in the dark.
Oh.
-CharIie.
-Mm-hm?
You're not taIking, you're nibbIing.
I'm afraid your idea of necking and my idea of necking are a IittIe far apart.
So?
So in the meantime, we'II just sit quietIy and--
-And what?
-And, uh. . . .
And Iook at teIevision.
Oh, goody.
And perhaps Iater we can go out in the kitchen and make some fudge.
ANNOUNCER [ON TV] : Remember, this
six-cylinder, four-door, white-walled...
...dynathermic convertible, only 1 790.
Seventeen ninety?
Was that a good year for cars?
Oh, shh.
And now, back to our movie.
I'll see you again in a few minutes
with another fantastic offer.
[MUSIC PLAYING ON TV]
[CLEARS THROAT]
Oh. . . .
Watching teIevision wasn't such a good idea.
-No, it's not a good idea at aII.
-I think we better forget about. . .
-. . .that whoIe thing.
-Uh. . . .
Are you interested in art?
WeII, I couId pretend to be.
That's good. Because Daddy bought me the IoveIiest book for Christmas.
It's just fuII of wonderfuI reproductions of Renaissance masterpieces.
This is more than I had hoped for.
Now, before you scoff, just take a Iook at some of these.
-A Corot. Isn't the detaiI amazing?
-Mm-hm.
JULIE:
MicheIangeIo's Jeremiah.
How are you, Meyer?
Oh. . . . You're impossibIe.
Say, do you suppose her foIks are out of town?
-HonestIy.
-Bup, bup, bup.
HoId it. Just one second.
I wanna drink in aII this amazing detaiI.
-Oh. . . .
-Mm.
-CharIie.
-JuIie.
JuIie.
No, no, CharIie.
Oh, darIing, there's no use trying to fight it.
Everything is conspiring against us.
Science and the arts and the animaI kingdom.
You mustn't Iet them give you any ideas.
I swear to you, it's my own idea.
But they're the happiest married coupIe in the neighborhood.
They're entitIed.
What did I say? I didn't say anything.
CharIie.
How many girIs are there in your Iife?
What?
I said, how many other girIs are there in your Iife?
Oh. Ha.
CaroI. . .
. . .and Jayne. . .
. . .and that's about it.
''Poppy, Jessica, Miss Snr, HeIen. ''
What about them?
Oh, weII, they're second-stringers.
They practicaIIy never get in the game.
[CHUCKLING ]
You're not funny.
How many are there?
Now, baby, you know better than to ask that kind of a question.
WeII, I'm sorry.
This is a new game to me.
I don't know the ruIes.
JuIie, reIax.
How many?
Sweetie.
It's a beautifuI night, and your foIks are up in Boston. . .
. . .and there's nobody in the whoIe wide worId except you and me.
And tomorrow?
Tomorrow, same thing.
We couId go riding or--
And Monday?
What do you want, a contract?
No.
AII I want is a straight answer to a straight question.
How many other girIs are there in your Iife?
Four hundred and ninety-six.
There used to be 497.
UntiI one of them started asking questions. . .
. . .that were none of her darn business.
Thank you.
You are weIcome.
WeII, why don't you cry now?
Doesn't that come next?
First, the siIIy questions and then the siIIy answers and then the tears.
Go on. Do the whoIe bit.
You Iisten to me.
WiII you Iisten to me?
Listen to me, God's-gift-to-women.
And Iisten good.
From now on, you're going to caII for me at my house.
You're gonna ask me how I want to spend the evening.
You're gonna meet my foIks and be poIite to them.
And you're gonna bring me candy and fIowers.
-Candy?
-You're gonna drop every one. . .
. . .of those other girIs.
AII 496 of them.
Now, why wouId I wanna do a thing Iike that?
Because I Iove you.
Because you-- What?
That's right.
Because I Iove you.
Do you think that's such a wonderfuI thing?
Being in Iove with you?
I never wanted to.
I don't want to now.
You're seIfish, you're arrogant, you're spoiIed. . .
. . .you're much too oId for me.
-Now, see here--
-Too oId, I said. Too oId.
Too seIfish, too arrogant, too spoiIed.
Oh, Lord knows why I Iove you, but I do.
And that's why there's gonna be some changes made right now.
-Now, Iisten.
-You Iisten.
You're very big with your terrace and your fancy nightcIubs. . .
. . .and your professionaI dog waIkers.
But Iet me teII you something.
You've got a Iot to Iearn about women.
-Me?
-Yes, you.
And I'm gonna try to straighten you out if it's not too Iate.
I'm gonna try to make a man out of you.
Because that's what I want to marry, a man.
Marry?
WeII, who asked you?
WeII. . .
. . .what's this aII about?
If you don't intend to marry me, say so now.
Because that's what I want.
Not a terrace. . .
. . .not Pa-Ia-Ia VaIencia, whatever you caII it.
Just a pIain oId marriage and a house and kids. . .
. . .and a Iife that makes some sense.
Are you aII through now?
Yes.
I take it, then, this is an uItimatum.
-Yes.
-And you want me to marry you.
But first you want me to reform and mend my ways.
Yes.
AII right.
Now Iet a seIfish, spoiIed, arrogant oId man teII you a coupIe of things.
Before you propose to a man. . .
. . .wait untiI he shows you at Ieast a IittIe indication. . .
. . .that he's interested.
AIso, do not start by teIIing him he is a decrepit oId Iouse.
So much for generaIities.
Now Iet us get down to cases.
I have never said that I wanted to marry you. . .
. . .nor am I moved to do so right now.
Assuming I did wanna get married. . .
. . .I know a girI who comes a Iot cIoser to my idea. . .
-. . .of being a wife than you do.
-Oh--
In fact, there are many, many girIs.
Why. . . .
This is my apartment. You get out.
Oh--
''This is my apartment. You get out. ''
Okay, what happened?
If she thinks I wiII wait for her to caII me and apoIogize to me. . .
. . .she's sadIy mistaken, boy.
You and Miss StonewaII Jackson have words?
You're on your feet, it must have been a technicaI KO.
Oh, shut up.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
Get that, wiII you?
It's stiII the shank of the evening anyway.
Candy and fIowers.
[SCOFFS]
Any number of girIs who wiII have me.
Just as I am too.
It's HeIen. AII right, what happened?
She-- HeIen? HeIen.
HeIen.
-Oh, heIIo, CharIie.
-Uh, I just wanted to teII you. . .
. . .how I appreciate your waIking Joe.
Oh, it's nothing.
I thought it wouId be nice if tonight you and I went out and had a big dinner.
Oh, I'm sorry, CharIie. I can't.
Oh, why not?
WeII. . . .
It's reaIIy Joey's fauIt.
-What?
-WeII, two weeks ago Iast Monday. . .
. . .Joey met a IoveIy poodIe on the corner of 57th and 2nd Avenue. . .
. . .named FIorence.
FIorence has a IoveIy owner named Peter Carruthers.
WeII, as Joey got to know FIorence better, I got to know Pete better.
And, weII, Iast night we decided to get married.
Married?
-When?
-Wednesday.
Wednesday?
Oh, you can stiII go out with me tonight.
Oh, I'm sorry, CharIie, I can't.
But I'II be eternaIIy gratefuI to you and Joey.
Oh. Of course, after Wednesday, you'II have to waIk him by yourseIf.
Goodbye.
What's so funny?
Do you reaIize this poor girI is gonna marry a poodIe owner?
PoodIe owners make terribIe husbands.
You won't catch me sitting around here by myseIf tonight. Not this kid. No, sir.
Any number of girIs. . . .
Western Union?
I'd Iike to send a teIegram.
Saks Fifth Avenue. New York.
When a man comes in and pays $ 1 5 for a tie. . .
. . .is it too much to expect a stinking tie to tie?
Fifteen doIIars for this tie.
I used to buy a suit for $ 1 5.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
Not you. You're in no condition to answer anything.
Ah, I don't know why I don't wear bow ties anyway.
JOE: Oh, hi, Poppy.
POPPY: Joe.
Poppy.
Poppy, you doII.
How did you know that the onIy person
I wanted to see was beautifuI you?
Oh, darIing, Iook out. Oh, Iook out.
Oh, a present for me?
You shouIdn't have done it.
-I had to.
-Nonsense.
AII you had to do was bring your IittIe oId sweet seIf.
What the heck is it?
CharIie, you know how smaII my refrigerator is.
I can't freeze it in there.
WeII, Iook at your refrigerator.
Nine cubic feet and four pearI onions.
Oh. Oh, this is your uncIe's whitefish.
-No, CharIie, it's your whitefish.
-Oh.
WeII, I'm deIighted to have it.
WeII, you're a doII to bring it and I'II take very good care of it.
There's something I'd Iike to ask you,
Poppy, uh. . . .
Uh. . . .
You are, are you not, the girI. . .
. . .who Ioves PaeIIa VaIenciana better than anything in the worId?
That's me. I'm the girI.
And you are, are you not, the girI. . .
. . .who aIways shouts ''oI'' whenever you hear guitar music?
I'm the girI who does it. OI.
Then you must be the girI who's going with me right now. . .
. . .downtown to hear some Spanish music and eat some Spanish food, yes?
No.
No?
WeII, why not?
Because I have a date with somebody eIse.
He's waiting downstairs.
Oh? Is he going to take you downtown to buy you espadriIIes. . .
. . .and feed you PaeIIa VaIenciana?
No, he is going to take me to Radio City Music HaII. . .
. . .and afterwards, if it's not too Iate,
Schrafft's.
What's your probIem?
Get rid of the square. We'II go.
But he is going to caII me tomorrow.
Oh?
WeII, does that make him some sort of a hero?
It's poIite, CharIie. It's gentIemanIy.
Are you caIIing me a Iouse?
Oh, certainIy not.
I wouIdn't dream of caIIing you a Iouse.
-A stinker?
-A stinker. That's it.
Thanks a Iot.
[SPEAKS IN SPANISH]
WeII, then I guess it's goodbye.
Why?
-After what you just caIIed me?
-A stinker?
But, sweetie, I never thought you were anything eIse.
Now, you take good care of that whitefish.
Bye.
[DOOR CLOSES]
What are you doing tonight?
What's so amusing?
Retribution, CharIes.
Comeuppance.
You're being paid back.
For aII the phone caIIs you promised to return and didn't.
For aII the cheeses you didn't eat.
For aII the girIs you fondIed and forgot.
You're being paid back.
And aII in one day.
That's the beauty of it.
What's eating you, Joe?
I'm your best friend and I teII you you're a Iouse.
You're one of the few reaIIy indecent men I ever met.
Go ahead. Punch me in the nose.
Why shouId I? You'd punch back.
Besides, how indecent can I be if a girI Iike SyIvia thinks. . . .
-SyIvia.
-You don't have to caII SyIvia.
She'II be here in a few minutes.
She's coming to pick me up.
She said it wouId be nostaIgic.
Now, Iook, Joe.
I'm a pretty broad-minded feIIow.
-To put it miIdIy.
-And I'm not stuffy or anything Iike that.
But I don't want you to see SyIvia again.
-Why not?
-Because you are a married man.
That's why. And SyIvia is a girI who--
WeII, she's got marriage on her mind.
Have you?
-Have you?
-No, but I'm in a position to.
You're not.
You've got a wife and three kids.
Now, you keep away from SyIvia.
Listen, you jerk.
You want me to keep away from SyIvia?
Then do just one thing.
Marry her.
-Marry her?
-Yes. This is a Iady.
A first-cIass, tripIe-distiIIed,
A-number-one Iady.
This isn't a trophy you hang in your game room.
This is a girI you marry.
Why don't you Iay off me?
AII married guys are aIike.
Because you're hooked. . .
. . .you want everybody eIse to be hooked.
WeII, that's your probIem, buster.
[DOOR SLAMS]
Oh, heIIo.
-HeIIo.
-Look, I'm sorry.
I know we haven't met, it's just that I've seen you somepIace.
WeII, it's this face of mine.
It's what everybody's wearing this season. Ha-ha-ha.
Hi.
Hi.
-What's the matter?
-Nothing.
Look.
I haven't known you Iong, but I know you weII.
What is it?
WeII, CharIie and I have been at each other.
Oh?
What about?
About you.
-ReaIIy? I'm fIattered.
-He thinks I shouIdn't go out with you.
This from a man who hasn't even caIIed you in two weeks.
Oh, that's just CharIie's way.
I don't get it. Anything this guy does is okay with you.
Why do you Iet him shove you around?
You're a beautifuI woman, you're taIented, you're inteIIigent. . .
. . .you're everything a man dreams about.
Why do you stand for it?
Oh, Joe.
Dear Joe.
How can I teII you?
We come to this town from SpringfieId and Des Moines. . .
. . .and Fort Worth and SaIt Lake City.
We're young, we're pretty and we're taIented.
AII we have to do to get married is stay home.
But the boys back home don't have what we want.
We got our eyes on something eIse.
A career, gIamour, excitement. . .
. . .and this is the pIace to find it.
So we come to New York and we do pretty weII.
Not great, but pretty weII.
We make a career.
We find the excitement and the gIamour.
We go to first nights.
We buy IittIe mink stoIes.
Headwaiters caII us by name.
It's fun, it's wonderfuI.
TiII one fine day we Iook around and we're 33 years oId. . .
-. . .and we haven't got a man.
-Oh. . . .
-SureIy you can--
-Mm-mm.
Joe, do you have any idea what's avaiIabIe to a woman of 33?
Married men. . .
. . .drunks.
Pretty boys Iooking for someone to support them.
Lunatics Iooking for their fifth divorce.
Quite a Iist, isn't it?
So we set our cap for CharIie.
He's eIigibIe, he's attractive. . .
. . .he's empIoyed and reasonabIy sane.
But you don't Iove him, do you?
How did the word Iove ever creep into this conversation?
SyIvia, there are worse things for a girI than not getting married.
Name three.
Honey, I can't Iet you throw yourseIf away.
Do you have any other ideas, Joe?
SyIvia.
So here we are.
SaIaam, suItan.
SyIvia, darIing.
What's the matter?
I'm bIind and I'm stupid.
Joe, you were absoIuteIy right.
You've opened my eyes.
I know what I have to do.
CharIie, what's wrong?
Here you are, a first-cIass,
A-number-one, tripIe-distiIIed Iady.
What better thing in the worId couId happen to me?
What better favor couId I do for myseIf?
Oh, what is it?
SyIvia.
[STUTTERING ]
Marry me.
WeII, you--
You wiII, won't you?
I wiII.
Good. That's settIed.
Why are you crying?
Don't be aIarmed.
Just standard operationaI procedure.
Yes. This is the smartest thing
I've ever done.
-And you darn weII know it.
-Mm-hm.
What kind of a happy occasion is this?
She stands up there weeping bitter tears and you stand here grunting at me.
Where are aII the shoes and rice and the Roman candIes?
CharIie, I wanna wish you the best Iuck in the worId.
WeII, you shouId. This was your idea.
CHARLIE:
Are you aII right? No more crying?
If you think that was crying, wait tiII you catch me at the wedding. Ha-ha.
Yeah, I may be doing a good deaI of that myseIf.
WeII, this is a joIIy occasion.
Yeah, there's much too much gIoom here.
Let's get bIind.
A IittIe Iarge, isn't it?
Live a IittIe bit. How many times in your Iife do you get engaged?
Uh-uh. This isn't my party.
I'II pour my own.
Party. That's what we need.
We'II have the wingdingiest party anybody ever saw.
-Party?
-Yeah.
And we'II start by caIIing the Dunstocks.
WonderfuI peopIe, the Dunstocks.
She happens to be a IittIe stuffy, but he, uh-- WeII, I guess he is a IittIe too.
HeIIo, Harry, how are you, oId pirate?
This is CharIie Reader.
Yeah, I know, but I've been busy.
Grab that wife of yours and sIip her into something seductive and get over here.
Yup. We're gonna have the biggest brawI you ever saw.
Oh?
WeII, bring him aIong. We'II feed him.
I don't care how many. Eight?
Bring them over. Attaboy. Bye.
WeII, we got a start.
-You better get some more pearI onions.
-Now, Iet me see. Who eIse do we ask?
How about Danny Fitzpatrick?
Is he in or out of the cIink?
-In.
-Oh, that's a shame.
-He pIays great piano.
-You haven't got a piano.
That wouIdn't stop Danny.
We gotta get some musicians. They're more fun than Earth peopIe. Ha-ha-ha.
-SoI Steiner?
-You're a genius.
One thing about SoI is you know where to reach him.
And if he's not there, he's just not in town.
CurIey's Bar?
Hey, is SoI Steiner there?
Yeah, I'II wait.
SoI's taking the cure, he's trying to get back on Iiquor.
SoI, oId man, was machst du?
How wouId you Iike to come up and have some free drinks? My pIace.
I'm getting engaged, that's why.
To SyIvia, who eIse?
Listen, can you get in touch with Eddie and Louise?
I know they're with you, but can you get in touch with them?
Yeah, bring them aIong.
What?
Honey, Fitzpatrick is out.
There goes the Iease.
Yeah, bring him aIong too.
Attaboy. Bye. What?
''Who is this?'' It's CharIie Reader, you idiot. Hurry up.
If I know CurIey's, everybody in the joint wiII make a Ieft turn to foIIow SoI here.
Give me a gIass, wiII you, Joe?
[DOORBELL BUZZING ]
[HUMMING WAGNER'S
''BRIDAL CHORUS'']
Hi, honey. I just thought
I'd bring you up this IittIe oId cheese.
I caIIed you about it.
-Oh.
-Um. . . .
Jessica, this is my fiance.
-Miss CoIIins, Miss Crewes.
-How do you do?
-Your what?
-My fiance.
-You mean you're engaged?
-Yes.
-To be married?
-Yes.
-A wedding present.
-Thank you.
Uh. . . . We're gonna have a wingding brawI tonight and you're invited.
Thank you, CharIie. But I got a date with the girIs for dinner.
-Won't you bring the girIs with you?
-No.
We're aII gonna have Iaughs and aII get bIind.
WeII, on second thought, yes.
Tiger.
-Bye.
S YLVIA: Bye.
Bye.
[S YLVIA CLEARS THROAT]
[IN SOUTHERN ACCENT]
Friend of yours, honey?
We better get some food as Iong as we're gonna have a party.
With 34 peopIe coming for dinner?
What for?
[IN NORMAL VOICE]
I'II go get some things.
Yeah, that's it.
Go on up to the deIicatessen.
Joe and I wiII get the bottIes open.
Get some of the fancy stuff Iike caviar and sturgeon and turkey, and aII that jazz.
-And here. WiII a doIIar be enough?
-Ha-ha-ha.
-I'II be back in about an hour.
-I'II count the minutes.
Tiger.
[GROWLS]
[HUMMING ''BRIDAL CHORUS'']
Gosh, we'II never have enough stuff for aII those hoods.
I better go get some.
You wanna go with me, Joe?
-No.
-Okay, okay, Cupid. I'II go myseIf.
[HUMMING ''BRIDAL CHORUS'']
[CHUCKLES]
[WHISTLES]
-Oh, I Iove you so.
-Oh, I Iove you too.
I was just coming up to teII you
I Iove you.
And I was just coming to teII you so too, darIing.
Oh, baby, you were so right.
I need changing. I need reforming.
No, no.
I Iike you just Iike you are, aImost.
I'm the one who has to change.
Too stubborn, too headstrong, too--
And why is the meter stiII running?
I have arrived at my destination.
Too wiIIfuI, too unyieIding.
From now on, we'II compromise.
Oh, CharIie, darIing.
Pay the driver and Iet's go upstairs.
We have so much to taIk about.
AII right. I wiII.
[CHATTERING ]
No, no, no. You have an earIy rehearsaI tomorrow morning.
And I'm exhausted and I'm going right up to fIop right in bed. . .
. . .and aren't you? And I'II caII you the first thing in the morning.
-But, CharIie. . .
-Hmm?
. . .I Iove you.
Oh, I Iove you too.
-Bye. SIeep tight.
-Bye.
Go.
Hey, hey, CharIie.
Oh, boy.
CharIie, the bridegroom.
[SPEAKING INDISTINCTLY]
CongratuIations, Mr. Reader.
Understand you're engaged to a IoveIy girI.
Two IoveIy girIs. Two.
[DOOR OPENS]
[WHEEZES]
Whatever gave you the idea that Sue Dunstock was stuffy?
I can't think of many girIs who wouId Iet Danny Fitzpatrick. . .
. . .give them a crew haircut.
Who was the girI in the Turkish shoes?
Because I think I'm engaged to her.
[COUGHS]
SoI Steiner.
Man, I thought you'd never get here.
You aII right?
Crazy, daddy-o.
Crazy party.
Crazy.
Where's SyIvia?
-Home.
-What do you mean, home?
H-O-M-E. Home, her pIace.
I don't dig.
She's engaged to CharIie, ain't she?
-Yeah.
-And she stiII goes home?
Without cIeaning up?
Man, he must be crazy to Iet that chick go home.
And I don't mean crazy Iike cooI.
I'm with you.
She is the most.
The end.
What band are you with?
I'm with the Indiana PharmaceuticaI Company.
What's the matter, man? Lose your Iip?
You reaIIy Iet that SyIvia go home?
Oh, heIIo, SoI. Yeah.
WeII, you shouIdn't have.
This is a reaI gone doII.
How did she ever get on that Beethoven kick?
I don't know. Haven't you got a rehearsaI this morning?
Oh, yeah. Longine Symphonette, for that you gotta be on time.
They aII got watches.
[CACKLING ]
-Want one for the road?
-Yeah, thanks.
[CACKLING ]
[DOOR CLOSES]
Joe?
I, uh. . . .
There's something I have to teII you.
Yeah, weII, I got something to teII you too.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
-HeIIo, Joe.
-Hi.
Uh, hi, JuIie.
What's wrong? I've been trying to get you on the phone.
Oh, have you?
WeII, it hasn't rung, has it, Joe?
-Huh? No, no.
-I caIIed 20 times.
WeII, there must be something wrong with the phone.
Danny Fitzpatrick.
What's been going on here?
Aren't you due at rehearsaI now, dear?
What went on here Iast night?
[IN NASAL VOICE] Yeah, CharIie, what went on here Iast night?
Uh, not a thing. Nothing. WouIdn't you
Iike a cup of coffee? WouId you?
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
-HeIIo, darIing.
-Hi, SyIvia.
Hey. Ha-ha-ha.
WeII, how are you?
-Hi, Joe.
JOE [IN NORMAL VOICE] : Hi.
What's the matter with your phone?
I've been trying to caII you.
Danny Fitzpatrick.
-Oh. Ha-ha. I remember.
-SyIvia, you know JuIie, don't you?
Oh, yes. HeIIo.
-Honey--
-What brings you here so earIy?
Did you by chance find a diamond earring around here somepIace this morning?
-And pIease say yes.
-A diamond earring?
-Yeah.
-No.
Oh, that's terribIe.
Sue Dunstock is out of her mind.
She couIdn't reach you this morning, so she started caIIing me at 7:00.
And Harry screaming at her the whoIe time:
[IN DEEP VOICE] ''It isn't enough you Iet that idiot shave your head?
You had to Iet him steaI your diamond earring too?'' Ha-ha-ha.
Ha.
Must have been some party Iast night.
Oh. . . . The greatest.
I haven't pIayed Run, Sheep, Run in years.
What was it, an occasion of some kind?
Indeed it was.
JULIE:
What kind of an occasion?
S YLVIA:
A happy occasion.
Yeah. Hey, we better Iook for the earring.
What do you mean, a happy occasion?
Oh, what is this, Miss GiIIis?
A third degree?
JULIE:
I have a right to know.
S YLVIA: What right?
-The right of a fiance.
CharIie and I became engaged
Iast night.
-What?
-What?
[RATTLING ]
CHARLIE: I can't seem to find the earring back here.
You see, my chiId, shortIy after CharIie proposed to you Iast night. . .
. . .he threw a whacking big party to announce his engagement.
His engagement to SyIvia, that is, not to you.
Perhaps he's pIanning on another party for your engagement Iater.
CharIie.
Is that true?
Yes.
It's true.
You were engaged?
AII the time you were kissing me, teIIing me you Ioved me?
-You were engaged to somebody eIse?
-Yes.
No. I mean, no. I was and I wasn't.
Yes and no. Was and wasn't.
Of aII the contemptibIe--
You are the worst--
I never wanna see you again.
-Oh, you're a terribIe, terribIe man.
-JuIie.
[DOOR CLOSES]
I found your shoes.
Oh. Where were they?
In the icebox.
Oh, yeah. . . .
This has been, aII in aII, a memorabIe day.
If my Iuck hoIds out, I shouId get hit by a truck on the way home.
I couIdn't sIeep a wink Iast night.
ReaIIy?
You know, I kept thinking that--
Oh, thinking. . . .
WeII, I was struggIing with myseIf.
Who won?
Three things kept me up.
First, I couIdn't Iet you marry CharIie.
WeII, that's taken care of.
Two?
Remember when I toId you you shouIdn't marry CharIie?
You asked me if I had any other ideas?
-Yeah.
-WeII, I have.
I Iove you, SyIvia.
I think I Ioved you from the first moment I saw you.
I want you to marry me.
What was the third thing that kept you up?
How to teII EtheI.
I've gotta write her a Iong Ietter.
WouIdn't it be more manIy to teII her face to face?
That wouId be too manIy.
WeII, there's aIways the teIephone.
Right now?
What better time? Sunday.
Night rates appIy aII day.
Are you Iaughing at me?
No.
Not at aII.
AII right.
AII right. I'II caII her right now.
Oh. . . . Ha.
We forgot.
Danny Fitzpatrick cut it.
WeII, what about the drugstore on the corner?
Nothing but phones.
And if you haven't enough quarters you can aIso reverse the charges.
WeII, yeah, but, uh--
What's the matter, Joe?
You wanna marry me, but not enough to take that waIk to the drugstore?
No, it isn't that.
But a thing Iike this, right out of the bIue. . . .
I don't wanna shock EtheI.
You see. . .
. . .EtheI thinks I Iove her.
But you do.
Joe, darIing.
ShaII I teII you something?
You think you Iove me because I'm so much Iike EtheI.
You, Iike EtheI?
I want waII-to-waII carpeting and French provinciaI furniture. . .
. . .and a house fuII of kids, aII with good straight teeth.
What did you think?
Moonbeams? CandIeIight suppers?
CIoud number seven?
Joe, you know what you've got?
You've got the married man's dream.
You want a girI.
That's what you aII want, a girI.
And that's what you can never have. . .
. . .because the onIy way to have a girI is not to marry her.
Because then she becomes a wife.
That's something entireIy different.
No, SyIvia, you wouId be different.
Joe.
Ask me one more question.
Ask me if I Iove you.
I Iike you, Joe.
I Iike you very much.
But I don't Iove you.
On behaIf of the visiting fireman from Indiana, I thank you.
She sIammed the taxi door on my hand.
WeII, I guess it's your turn now, SyIvia.
CharIie.
There are some girIs who might say. . .
. . .that ours was not the most romantic engagement on record.
There are some girIs who might even say. . .
. . .that our entire courtship
Ieft something to be desired.
As a matter of fact,
I am one of those girIs.
What can I say, SyIvia?
To say I'm sorry wouId just mereIy be adding insuIt to injury.
So, what can I say?
That I'm the heeI of aII time?
WeII, it might make you happy to know. . .
. . .that, right now,
I'm the unhappiest heeI of aII time.
I know you are, CharIie.
And I'm sorry, not happy.
You're probabIy the most wonderfuI woman on this earth. . .
. . .or any other earth.
I agree.
It's just my tough Iuck that I didn't faII in Iove with you and marry you. . .
. . .and Iet you make me happy.
I had to faII in Iove with JuIie.
I Iove her.
She's nuts, but I Iove her.
Then don't you settIe for anyone but JuIie.
Don't you be satisfied with second best.
I know one thing.
There wiII be no second best for me anymore.
I'm gonna find me an honest-to-goodness guy. . .
. . .who's Iooking for an honest-to-goodness girI.
Somewhere in this great city, there must be one.
Oh.
Thank you for a IoveIy engagement.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
I'm sorry to bust in, but I think this beIongs to you.
Someone threw it up to my terrace Iast night.
Look, whoever you are,
I've got enough troubIe.
I'm not angry. I'd Iike to suggest that the next time you throw a party, invite me.
I Iove brawIs.
HeIIo.
WeII, you boys won't have to go out to dinner tonight. Bye, CharIie.
So Iong, fireman.
So Iong, SyIvia.
Thanks.
Where the bIazes were you
1 2 years ago?
-Excuse me.
-Oh.
I guess you can't expect too much service on Sunday.
Don't you pIay on NBC?
Oh, yes.
-That's where I remember you from.
-Oh?
I never miss a teIecast.
You mean you recognize me from the teIecasts?
Uh-huh. VioIin section.
But they onIy cut to us maybe three or four times during a program.
You forget you're the onIy woman in the section.
Oh.
And a most decorative one too, if I may say so.
Thank you.
I see no reason why you shouIdn't.
TeII me, the next concert is on Wednesday, isn't it?
-Yes.
-I think this time I'II buy a ticket.
Uh, do you know the question about bearded peopIe?
I mean, do they sIeep with it under or over the covers?
WeII, I've often wondered about musicians. Oh.
Uh, do they eat before or after a concert?
Because I was wondering if, after the concert on Wednesday. . . .
Where you going?
Home.
IndianapoIis. Gateway to the West.
Leave me here aIone?
AIone?
In the morning, your phone wiII be fixed.
And by sunset, you'II be knee-deep. . .
. . .in whitefish and rare Wisconsin cheeses.
I don't want whitefish.
I don't want rare Wisconsin cheeses.
Nor do I want Poppy or Jessica or Miss Snr.
I just want JuIie.
-Do you know my idea of heaven now?
-What?
To be so much in Iove with a girI, have her Iove you so much. . .
. . .that you wouIdn't think of taking a vacation from each other for 1 1 years.
EIeven years.
I've got a dog in there who's got the straightest teeth.
It doesn't need any wiring.
They don't even need brushing.
WouId you swap that for your kids, Joe?
No, not unIess you threw in Fort Knox or something.
WeII, you know what I mean.
I'm sorry, CharIie.
WeII.
I better rush if I'm gonna catch the 3:00.
Can't you at Ieast stay and have dinner with me?
I'd Iike to.
But that wouIdn't get me in tiII 1 :00.
I don't want EtheI driving out to the airport at that hour.
She wouIdn't have to.
You couId take a cab.
Yeah, but she Iikes picking me up.
Come to think of it,
I Iike being picked up.
Yeah, I guess you better make the 3:00.
So Iong, sport. Thanks for everything.
Goodbye, Joe.
Give my Iove to the famiIy.
Okay. You write, now. You hear?
How Iong do you figure it wiII be tiII I see you again, Joe?
Oh, about 1 1 years.
So Iong, paI.
Forgot EtheI and the kids.
Pierre HoteI. Quick as you can.
-I'm Iate for a wedding.
-Okay.
Drop this Iuggage at 600 East 57th Street, wiII you?
I now pronounce you man and wife.
Oh.
[GUESTS CHUCKLING ]
JuIie.
WiII you marry me?
Why?
Oh. . . .
Because I Iove you.
-Oh?
-Yes, I Iove you.
And--
WeII, tomorrow you couId pick me up at the apartment--
-I couId what?
-We couId go to the Iicense bureau.
Uh, that is, I mean. . .
. . .I'II pick you up and we couId go to the Iicense bureau. . .
. . .and be married and then have a baby. . .
. . .and have another baby in the country and--
Oh, JuIie.
[SINGING ''(LOVE IS)
THE TENDER TRAP'']
SubtitIes by
SDI Media Group
[ENGLISH SDH]
My name is Willie Willoughby, but they call me Smoke.
I play piano in a run-of-the-mill dance band.
Kind of monotonous.
But there were times when I got my kicks.
Not so long ago either.
Like when I palled around with Rick Martin, the famous trumpet player.
What a guy.
We were in the thankless business of piecing little notes...
...and phrases of music together into a mumbo jumbo...
...that somehow turned out to be jazz.
Strictly off-the-cuff, but a lot of fun.
Of course, Rick is practically a legend now.
People ask me about him and those times.
Ordinarily, I don't talk much about it.
But I think a lot about it.
He had a lot of friends.
In a way, he had no friends at all.
He was a lonely kind of guy.
Always, I guess from the time
he was a kid.
He never knew his father.
And his mother died
when he was 9 or 10.
So he went to live with his sister.
He did a lot of traveling
for a kid his age.
From Missouri...
... on through Texas...
... Oklahoma...
... and finally, California.
He never did get much out of school, and
he made very few friends along the way.
Why don't you go play with the other kids.
Hanging around the house day after day.
- You hungry?
- No.
After you eat, don't forget to put the bread back so the ants don't get it.
Yes.
- What's wrong with you?
- Nothing.
I haven't got time.
Joe will be here any minute.
But I'll tell you one thing, either you gotta go back to school or get a job.
You just can't do nothing.
Hey, Marge, that man's here.
Hiya, Rick. Let's go, honey, we're late.
- I told you I'd be ready, didn't I?
- Gee, you look like a million.
Don't forget, the bread in the box.
So long. There's a little Chinese place on the corner of 2nd and Flower...
...I was thinking of tonight.
And now, my friends...
...the good Lord has provided.
And there'll be a hot meal served in the next room.
The story goes that by the time it got dark,
he could play the piano.
He could play the whole song.
After that, he had a place to go to
and something he really wanted to do.
And for a while, he wasn't
quite so lonely anymore.
Hey, you've been banging that piano every night.
Now, get out of here.
Excuse me.
Hello, sir. Which one's the cheapest?
- You mean, the instruments?
- Yes, sir.
Well, let me see. I think the trumpet.
I can let you have this one for about $9.
- You play a trumpet?
- No, but I could learn.
I started to learn piano.
Well, the piano's a little different.
So you're a musician, eh?
If I had one, I could carry it with me and play it any time I wanted.
- You got the money?
- No, but I could get a job.
Well, now. I think maybe you are a musician.
Yes, sir.
And that kid out there...
... he had a perfect ear for it.
He could hear it, and he could feel it.
It hit that boy right where he lived.
Well, look at this.
- How about that.
- Hey, fellas.
Let's take a breather for a few.
What are you doing, boy?
- What do you want?
- Excuse me.
I was just listening to the music.
- Well, do you like the way we play?
- Oh, sure.
- Kind of late for you to be out, isn't it?
- No school tomorrow.
Well, you'd better come on in if you wanna hear some music.
- Thanks.
- Will you join us in a small collation?
- A ham sandwich, perhaps, Mr...
- Martin. No, thanks.
Oh, but you gotta.
You can't listen to music on an empty stomach.
Thanks.
You sure your folks won't care?
I don't have any real folks.
My sister wouldn't know if I came in or not.
Oh, I see.
Gentlemen, this is Mr. Martin.
He says he likes our music.
- Pleased to meet you.
- Hi.
- Mr. Martin, what would you like to hear?
- Would you wanna play...?
I don't know what you'd call it, but it goes like this:
You know, where you start off, and then the clarinet comes in, and then the others.
- But you finish alone.
- That's "Moanin' Low."
But how do you know who comes in where?
I can hardly remember myself most times.
You a musician, Mr. Martin?
Oh, I kind of play the piano a little.
Piano player, huh?
Yes, but what I really wanna learn is the trumpet, like you.
You hear that? Mr. Martin knows talent when he hears it.
What are we waiting for?
"Moanin' Low."
Have a chair, Mr. Martin. Sit down.
Thank you, Mr. Hazzard.
- Good luck, maestro.
- Thanks.
Have a cigar, Mr. Hazzard.
- It's a two-bit one.
- Well, shut me up if it isn't.
Thank you, Mr. Martin.
If he had to be a trumpet player,
he was pretty lucky...
... because he couldn't have bought
what he learned from Art Hazzard.
That's the way it started. There was no way
of stopping or changing it.
He couldn't see anything but notes and
couldn't hear anything but his trumpet.
He was cut out to be a jazzman the way
the righteous are chosen for the Church.
You're playing sharp on the high notes.
You're getting a roll.
Not bad yet, but on the way.
What do I do wrong?
You're dropping your mouthpiece too low on your lip.
Once you get that roll, it closes your lips, gives you a choked feeling in your throat.
And you get tired after a half-hour of steady playing. Try it again.
And it was about then that
he started playing two ways.
One way for money,
what there was of it...
... and one way for himself.
That was his way of talking.
Well, hello, Mr. Hazzard.
- How am I doing?
- Doing pretty good.
You don't sound as if you mean it.
What am I doing wrong?
Nothing.
What's the matter, pops?
- Did you know we're going on the road?
- No, I didn't.
How long will you be gone?
Booker's got a good deal for us in New York.
We've been figuring on staying there, maybe for good.
- Hey, swell. I'll go with you.
- You can't.
- Even if you could, you shouldn't.
- Why not?
You've got to think about what you're going to do.
- What you're going to be.
- That's easy.
I'm gonna be a trumpet man like you, get me a job with a good band...
You think that's all there is to it?
Well, you... You taught me to play a pretty good trumpet, didn't you?
You play a fine trumpet.
- Well, then...
- But what's it worth?
Look at me.
What have I got after 20 years of it?
A wife, kids, money in the bank?
- No.
- Why, you got the best band in the country.
I guess I'm playing with a heavy mute.
Look, boy.
You've got music in you.
You've got it here.
And you've got it here.
But the way things are, very few people will ever know what you're saying.
- Or what you're trying to do.
- Who cares? I don't play for people.
I play for myself.
Look, boy.
A man's got a lot of living to do in this world.
But you, you're kind of locked up inside yourself.
You're like a... Like a bird trying to fly on one wing.
You'll stay up for a while.
Then you're going to fall.
Have a drink of milk.
I'm gonna miss you, pops.
Oh, I almost forgot.
Thank you, Mr. Martin.
- Take care of yourself.
- I will.
Finally, he got his first good job.
And that was when I met him.
I've never seen such an intense...
... searching expression on anybody else.
Even then, he looked like a guy
very few people would understand.
Hello.
- Better get your skates sharpened.
- Yeah.
- Here, let me help you with that thing.
- Thanks.
Thanks a lot.
- What kind of hotel towels you got in here?
- Oh, that's my record collection.
Mostly Art Hazzard.
I got just about every one he made, I guess.
- Really?
- Yeah.
- Taught me how to play.
- Is that so?
Yeah.
Oh, my name's Martin. Rick Martin.
I'm Willie Willoughby.
They call me Smoke.
Never could figure out why.
Me neither.
You know Art Hazzard?
Boy, he's the greatest trumpet player in the world.
Glad to know you.
- Hi.
- Hello, boys.
- Hi, Smoke.
- Hello.
Honey, will you hand out the arrangements?
- How are you, Mr. Chandler?
- Fine. Glad to have you aboard.
Oh, you're over there. All right, let's get down to business.
Kenny, hand those out, please.
Johnny, this is for you.
- Graham.
- Rick Martin. How are you?
- Jack Flanagan. This is Tommy.
- This is Bill.
- Tommy.
- Thank you.
Hello, my name's Jo Jordan.
I sing in the band.
How do you do?
All right, boys, let's get with it.
As you know, we open here Saturday night.
First, I want you to remember...
...we're a dance orchestra. Our job is to play a tempo they can dance to.
No blues and no low-down jive.
The public likes novelty stuff.
And that's what we're gonna give them.
I guess that's all. Now let's get started.
Number three in the new books, everybody.
We'll take yours first, Josie, so you can get back to the hotel.
One, two...
Wait a minute. Wait a minute.
Hold it. Hold it.
What's the matter, Martin, can't you read music?
- Sure.
- Then why don't you?
You want every number played how it's written?
Exactly. What do you think
I bought these arrangements for?
I don't know.
I mean, do we have to play every number the same way every time?
That's right. This is no jam session, it's a dance orchestra.
- I was just asking.
- Well, now you know.
All right, let's take it again from where it got torn.
One, two...
That was very good.
Thanks.
You must like it here to stay so late.
It's a good place to play.
No leaders and customers.
Nobody in the next room to tell me to shut up.
Oh, I'm sorry about the mix-up at that rehearsal.
If I hadn't stopped singing, maybe Jack wouldn't have been so hard on you.
It was your number. I didn't have any business butting in anyway.
It seemed kind of right.
Incidentally, you're about the best
I've heard.
Well, thanks. You know something?
There's a guy on records who has a style very much like yours. Name is Hazzard.
- Art Hazzard.
- Do you know him?
Since I was a kid.
He taught me to play.
He had a lot of trouble with me once.
I was starting to get a roll.
A what?
When you drop your mouthpiece low on your lip.
Keep playing that way, you get so you can't bring it up where it belongs.
Worst thing can happen to a trumpet man.
It gets you tired awful easy.
But he straightened me out. He gave me an exercise and made me work on it.
Boy, it did the trick.
Yeah, he knows. He really knows.
I guess it's his fault I switched to a trumpet. I always liked the piano before...
...but the trumpet...
I don't know.
Maybe because it's so close to you, huh?
It's like it's a part of you.
The music doesn't have so far to go.
How about it? This is a dance hall, not a hotel.
- I gotta lock up.
- Sorry, Bill.
I was wrong.
There's always somebody in the next room to tell me to shut up.
Well, good night.
Oh, Rick.
- Aren't you going to the party?
- What party?
Well, Jack's buying drinks for all the boys.
No, thanks, I'm not much for parties.
Oh, excuse me.
Oh, sorry.
Thanks.
You know, it's lucky you switched from the piano.
The way you baby that thing, you'd think it was alive.
Well, it's awful good company.
Whatever you tell it to do, it does.
Only better than you told it.
Never lets you down.
You're kind of sold on it, aren't you?
You gotta be sold, or you got no business playing the kind of music I wanna play.
You gotta love it.
Can't just like it and understand it the way the longhaired boys understand their music.
You can't write it down and keep it.
There aren't any notes.
You can only hear it right while you're playing it...
...and you feel it.
Someday, when I'm really good...
...I wanna do things with this trumpet nobody's ever thought of.
I'm gonna hit a note that nobody ever heard before.
You've got to have some other interest, or you'll go off your rocker. I know.
You need a hobby, like collecting stamps, or a dog or...
How about a girl?
Don't pick on me, Rick.
You're a married man.
Married?
You're married to that trumpet.
I certainly wouldn't wanna come between it.
Sorry.
Well, I guess you wanna get to Chandler's party.
I think I'd rather breathe some fresh air.
Chandler wouldn't like this, would he?
No. I guess he wouldn't.
- Hey, Smoke, take over the rest of the set.
- lf you say so, boss.
What do you say we grab a quick drink?
- No, thanks.
- You trying to brush me off?
- No.
- I never see you, except when we work.
- It's just that I've been busy lately.
- I know, with that trumpet player.
Why do you have to say things like that?
Hey, Smoke.
How about playing something our way?
- You're kidding.
- Oh, come on.
Let's have a little change of pace.
You, me and a couple of the boys, huh?
- Well, I've been fired before.
- Great.
Everybody take five, except Frank,
Jack, Ralph and you, Jim, down front.
- What's up?
- Oh, a little fun, maybe.
- Play a little jazz?
- Could be.
- Chandler won't like this.
- We can do it before he gets back.
- What will we play?
- How about "Get Happy"?
- Okay, but I ain't.
- You start it and see what happens.
Well, your answer won't be far off.
Here comes your answer.
I'm used to it. Well...
...it's been nice, fellas.
Thanks very much. See you around, Smoke.
I know, it's a dance band.
- You're through, Martin.
- I had a hunch I was.
You better watch your second trumpet.
He's starting to get a roll.
If the rest of you wanna keep your jobs, don't let that happen again.
Door's open.
Hi, Rick. I just talked with Chandler, and everything's all right.
I know he'll take you back, if you just ask him.
- lf I'm a good boy, you mean?
- Yeah.
All right, he doesn't like you.
But he knows you're the best lead in the band.
Not in this band. I just couldn't take it.
What made you do it, Rick?
I had to.
Was it that much fun?
- Guess so.
- Rick, what's the matter with you?
- Why do you live in left field all the time?
- I don't know.
If you keep on, you're gonna work in dives all your life.
Look, Jo, l...
You like what you're doing. You got a good job here, and you're gonna go places.
I don't know where I'm going. Well, like you said, some dive, I guess. But...
All right, Rick, you've made your point.
- Thanks a lot anyway.
- Forget it.
All the baggage you really need is right here.
- Your trumpet.
- Oh, thanks.
Can I lend you some money?
Wouldn't know what to do with it.
- You're probably broke.
- Probably.
Young man with a horn.
Crazy young man with a horn.
I'm sorry, Jo, I...
It's all right.
We'll keep in touch, huh?
Sure.
So long, Jo.
So long, Rick.
You know, that piano of mine's been out of tune since the day I got here.
How much can an artist take?
Smoke, you'll never amount to anything.
You know that, don't you?
You coming?
Boy.
Maxie.
- Tell them to play something with pep.
- Sure. Deal me out.
Hey, professor, how about something louder and funnier?
Mike wants something with more pep.
We're all through for the night.
We'll be leaving pretty soon.
- Hey, you hard of hearing or something?
- He told you, we're through for the night.
Maxie!
Max.
Hey, you. Trumpet player. Come here.
You're a handy guy.
Handy with the trumpet and the fist.
He didn't have to do that.
Sit down.
Play me something snappy.
- You know "Ain't She Sweet"?
- Yeah.
Well, play it.
Don't stop. Keep playing.
What? Don't you like my beer?
No.
Try some more, you might develop a taste for it.
Mike!
- Come on, let's have a drink.
- I'll have another beer.
- Deal me in, I feel lucky tonight.
- All right, what will it be?
Maybe I'm getting too old for this music racket.
It's not much fun anymore, and you can't sell it for a bag of peanuts.
Sure you won't come with me?
- Indiana's awful nice this time of year.
- You mean out to old Aunt Mary's?
Oh, stop kidding. You'd like my folks.
We got plenty of room.
No, thanks, I'd only be in the way.
I ought to go see my own folks.
I think I will, honest.
Where do they live?
Texas.
Thought you said you were from Missouri.
I haven't any folks.
You just got one love, that little tin baby of yours.
How you fixed for dough?
Oh, loaded. Oh, this is it.
Here.
- Oh, no, Smoke, l...
- Take it.
Well, remember, it's only a loan.
- Will you write?
- Sure.
- So long, kid.
- So long, Smoke.
Board!
See you soon, Smoke.
- Thanks for waiting.
- I wouldn't have missed it.
I'm impressed. You're better than I thought, and I always thought you were good.
- Say, you look fine.
- You too.
- Oh, sure.
- You gonna buy me a sandwich?
I'd like to, but I'm anxious to find
Art Hazzard. You know where he's playing?
Yeah.
He's at a place called Galba's in the Village.
You haven't heard from him in a long time, have you?
Why?
Well, he doesn't play the way he used to, Rick. He's been sick.
Oh, but he's better now.
Mind if I go with you?
- It'll just take me a minute to change.
- Sure.
Hello. I'd like you to meet my friend
Rick Martin. This is Louis Galba.
- Trumpet player?
- Never heard such a trumpet.
I hear lots of trumpets.
- Glad to see you anyway.
- Thank you.
Eddie, table for Miss Jordan.
- Hello, Jo.
- Hello, Phil, Bridget.
- Hello, Jo.
- Good to see you.
I see what you mean.
He was the greatest.
Hi, pops.
- Is this really you?
- Nobody else.
Well, here.
Don't smoke it all at once.
Brought it all the way from Wheeling,
West Virginia. It's a two-bit one.
Shut me up if it isn't.
- Hello, Art.
- Hello, Miss Jo.
I've been hearing some things about you here and there.
- I hear you're pretty good now.
- Well, I haven't got a roll, that's for sure.
- I'd like to hear you.
- Sure, sometime I'd...
- Come on.
- Oh, not now, Art.
- Now is as good a time as any.
- I don't...
Back this gentleman up, will you, boys?
- Why, sure.
- Hiya, fellas.
- It's all yours.
- What's it gonna be?
I'll think of something, but you'll have to carry me.
- Oh, go right ahead.
- Fine.
- What do you think?
- Who is he?
- Rick Martin.
- Who's he with?
He just came in from Chicago.
He's told me about offers. I don't know if he's made up his mind.
Boy's good. I could use him.
- I'll bring him over later to meet you.
- It's a deal.
Ladies and gentleman, this is Rick Martin.
I've known him from the time he was a little boy.
I...
I taught him how to hold that trumpet he just played for you.
But I didn't teach him how to play it.
Not the way he does.
That's something that you can't learn.
You've got to have it.
Oh, Rick. I just wanted to tell you you were great tonight.
Oh, thanks. Thanks a lot.
How you live is your business, but I've been around a long time. You know what I mean?
- No. What's the matter, Mr. Morrison?
- Why do you go to Galba's?
Don't you get enough trumpet playing here?
Well, not my kind of playing.
I pay you good money.
At Galba's, you play for free.
You're a big draw there, just so old Hazzard keeps his job.
- That may be nice...
- Mr. Hazzard's a friend.
Okay, okay. It's just that you're not doing yourself any good, Rick.
- Staying up all night.
- I thought you were satisfied with me.
I am, I am. I'm just telling you for your own good.
Why bother with a bunch of...?
Wait a minute. Where are you going?
Galba's.
Violets, mister?
- Good evening.
- Hello, Louis.
There's no need to ask about business.
It's packed like this every night.
But I got a table for you.
- Good.
- Come on, follow me, please.
This is that crazy musician
I talk about all the time.
Come on, let's sit down.
- Hi, Jo.
- Hello, Rick.
- Great.
- Thanks, Louis.
I want you to meet Amy North.
This is Rick Martin.
- Hello.
- It isn't there anymore.
- Well, what?
- The expression on your face.
Your whole mood.
When you were playing that trumpet, you were exalted, sure of yourself.
You've undergone a startling transition, Richard.
I'd rather call you Richard.
You don't mind?
People try to find security in a lot of strange ways.
You've solved your problems. At least while you're playing that trumpet.
I don't understand a word, but I love your voice.
- It's got a rough spot in it.
- I should've warned you.
She talks like a medical book and likes to analyze everything.
She's studying to be a psychiatrist.
Oh, well, how do I stack up?
My interest isn't purely professional.
When I meet a great talent,
I want to know him.
You don't mind, do you?
Not at all. Go on.
Tell me about jazz.
Do you think it's purely African?
I don't do much thinking about it. I just play it.
- lf you listen to it...
- I didn't come here to listen to it.
I came to study the people, watch their faces. They're interesting.
Something about jazz releases inhibitions.
It's a sort of cheap, mass-produced narcotic.
I gather you don't like jazz.
Not particularly.
I know it's supposed to be our native art.
Cotton fields, the levees,
New Orleans and blues in the night.
Excuse me, please.
Would you do a number, please, Jo?
- I don't like to ask, but...
- All right, Louis.
If you're a singer, they never let you talk.
Sure, knock them dead.
- Can I buy you a drink?
- No, thanks.
You don't like me, do you?
I think you're very charming, Miss North.
You can call me Amy.
I bet I could.
Only if I wanted you to, Mr. Martin.
For just that long.
I know what you're really thinking, and I don't blame you. I talk too much.
Jo's interesting, isn't she?
So simple and uncomplicated.
Must be wonderful to wake up and know which door you're going to walk through.
She's so terribly normal.
She's a good singer too.
Don't get out.
Jo, you're breaking up the party.
You go through with this mad plan,
I'll never speak to you.
I've got an early show tomorrow.
Come on, Jo, you can sleep till noon.
I will anyway.
Good night, you night owls.
I love your car.
Oh, it's not mine. I just rent it.
Wouldn't it be simpler to buy one?
Don't tell me you can't afford it.
I don't wanna own a car or anything else.
Gives you too many things to worry about.
We should get along beautifully.
We're completely different.
I envy you, Richard, but I don't quite understand you.
As far as you're concerned, doc, that goes double for me.
Come in.
Say, it's quite a deal you have here.
Hey, who's this?
Her name's Louise.
She's my best friend.
You ought to teach her to cough or stomp her feet.
Kind of takes you by surprise.
That's why I love her.
We'll put your alter ego away.
- My what?
- Latin.
A dead language that ideally suits me.
It simply means "your other self."
Scotch or bourbon?
Oh, anything.
- This is strong enough, I hope.
- Oh, fine, thanks.
Do you play?
That's a silly question, I guess.
No, I play, but the piano doesn't like me.
It stiffens up every time I come near it.
I know how to play one piece.
Only one. A Chopin nocturne.
I used to love it, so I hired a piano teacher once just to teach it to me.
I paid her double rates and kept her here for three weeks. I learned it.
How long have you been playing the trumpet?
Since I was a kid.
- Ever want to do anything else?
- No.
- Even when you were a kid?
- No.
Because even then you knew you'd play better than anyone else. That's it, isn't it?
Me, I've been an intellectual mountain goat, leaping from crag to crag, trying everything.
You don't know how lucky you are.
First, I wanted to be a writer.
Then I took a course in interior decorating.
Then I had an idea I'd fly a plane.
I even tried singing in one of those smart bars.
I was bad in all of them.
Now you're gonna get into people's heads and find out what makes them tick?
Yes.
Please don't be angry, but it's late, and I've got early classes tomorrow.
Oh, sure. I'm sorry.
Don't run away. Finish your drink.
Stay as long as you like. Only, please don't forget to turn the lights out when you go.
You do forgive me, don't you?
And you'll call me?
Sure.
What are you looking at?
Hey. Smoke.
Jo.
- Oh, it's so good to see you.
- Yeah. Where's Rick?
Oh, he couldn't come. He's sorry,
Smoke. He asked me to meet you.
It's wonderful seeing you.
I've been hearing your records.
- I'm real proud of you.
- Thank you, Smoke.
- Rick has done all right too.
- We always knew he'd hit it.
It's gonna be like old times.
Let's go to Galba's.
Rick will meet us.
- Good. Can we get a drink?
- Yeah.
You know what?
This New York's a big town.
Oh, come on, Jo. Stop worrying.
Rick's a grown boy. If he gets lost, he knows enough to go to a police station.
That mother instinct comes out in me at the most unlikely times.
You know, I think we've been stood up.
He hasn't changed a bit.
I'm glad about your new job.
Goes to show you, if you work hard and have friends in high places...
Yes, it was swell of Rick to get me in Morrison's band.
We'd better get home before they throw a tablecloth over us.
It's no use kidding ourselves,
Rick won't be here.
He hasn't been here in a long time.
You see, Smoke, he has changed.
Who is she?
A friend of mine.
And I introduced them.
Boy, this is the closest I've ever been to a college.
Is that why you insisted we stop by here?
Maybe. Maybe it's because I want to know...
...where you spend your time when you're not with me.
Hey, it's pretty impressive.
Maybe I could smuggle you into class with me.
I bet they'd toss a mug like me right down those steps.
There's certainly plenty of them.
I think we'd better rest up before descending the Alps.
Mustn't keep you out too late. You've got a 9:15 class in the morning, doctor.
Please don't call me "doctor" anymore.
I've got my reasons for hating it.
Well, I won't, then, but...
Well, psychiatrists are doctors, aren't they?
Why do you want to be one?
Maybe because my father's a doctor.
That makes sense, I guess.
No, it doesn't.
You see, I have no use for my father.
He's very well thought of in the profession, as thoughts go in the profession.
My mother was something else again.
Something pretty wonderful.
I used to go to pieces when she told me my handwriting was improving.
I thought so highly of that lady.
I can hardly remember my mother.
She died when I was a kid.
Yes, but you see, you've got something to take her place.
My mother, when I was 12, started having headaches that nearly drove her mad.
My father, who was a doctor, gave her aspirins for them.
When it was too late, he stumbled on the idea that it was a brain tumor.
But he never did anything about it.
One night, that lovely lady didn't want any more of it.
She fell out of a window.
Only four stories, but it did the trick.
Gee, I'm... I'm sorry.
Thanks. You're very kind.
Anyway, I've been in one school or another ever since...
...memorizing all the wrong answers.
He pays the bills, but I don't see him any oftener than I have to.
He's married again.
What he got serves him right.
I don't know how you feel, but I'd like a drink.
Okay.
Good idea, putting a tip on a cigarette.
Tells you where you are.
You know where you are, Richard?
I was starting to wonder.
Nonsense. You'll always know where you are.
So steady.
You and that trumpet of yours, your devotion to it.
Gives you faith in yourself.
Yes, you know where you are.
Do I?
Where do you live?
Oh, at some high-class creep joint.
Musician's hangout. You wouldn't like it.
I'd like to see it.
Look, Amy, I think I'm in love with you.
Finish your drink.
I told you you wouldn't like it.
I think it's lovely.
It doesn't pretend to be anything but what it is.
You mean it's crummy.
Knowing you, I'd say these are collector's items.
Oh, the records.
Yeah, some of them are scarce.
I've had them a long time.
They've been shipped across the country lots of times.
I thought you didn't want to own anything.
Sure, but that's music.
That's different.
I suppose it is.
How about a drink?
No.
What is it? Have l...?
It's not you.
Are you talking in riddles again, Amy?
I don't get you.
I didn't expect you to.
Is this that stuff you learn at school?
Am I some kind of an experiment?
- You ought to be grateful.
- For what?
You caught me off-guard for a moment.
- I may never be as honest again.
- Oh, stop this crazy talk.
You keep away, Richard.
You and your fine frenzy.
This is my first and last warning.
You think you're falling in love with me.
Well, don't.
Don't take any chances with me.
Only people who respect themselves can ever love fully, freely.
I don't happen to respect myself.
You sound like something out of a book.
I only know what I feel.
You're lucky. I feel half a dozen things at the same time.
Will you take me home?
What's the matter?
Isn't this fancy enough for you?
Please don't make me say something dull.
I wouldn't try to make you do anything.
- Then take me home.
- But let's get this straight.
People either like you or they don't.
They don't act one way and then change the next minute.
- They're rather dull, aren't they?
- Well, at least you know where you stand.
You know, I thought you were something wonderful, Amy. Something fine and...
- Well, you're acting like a cheap...
- Oh, don't stop now, Richard.
You're just beginning to be interesting.
You'd better go home, Amy.
It's getting late.
Aren't you taking me?
Well, you like riding in cars so much, take a taxi.
Thanks.
Call me sometime.
Call you what?
Come in.
Just about finished.
I hope you don't mind my barging in like this.
- Hi, Jo.
- You moving?
Yeah.
I can't say that I blame you, but I'm quite surprised.
I thought you were married to this place.
- Sit down, won't you?
- Thanks.
- It's been a long time, hasn't it?
- Well, I've been busy.
- I went out of town for a couple of days.
- You must be busy.
They've been worried about you down at Galba's.
Gee, maybe I can get there tonight.
Boy, I've sure missed it.
- Oh, cigarette?
- No, thanks.
- I've been meaning...
- I know it's none of my business...
...but you've been seeing a lot of Amy, haven't you?
I guess so. You see, Jo, l...
If I can make you believe I'm not here because I'm hurt or jealous.
- Don't say that...
- Amy isn't a stage-door pickup.
I know her better than you do.
She's a strange girl, and you've never known anyone like her before.
I can understand all that.
But inside, way inside, she's all mixed-up.
She's wrong for you, Rick.
She'll hurt you.
Precisely what I told him myself.
But he wouldn't take no for an answer.
Jo, you didn't give me a chance to tell you, but Amy and I were married yesterday.
Thanks for your good wishes.
I don't suppose you'll ever forget what I've said, but please try.
Amy stopped going to her classes
in medical school...
... and they played all night
and slept all day.
But they never really
got to know each other.
Maybe they were afraid of that.
I don't know.
Oh, here's one that Art cut about 10 years ago.
Did I have trouble finding it.
I hit Seattle once. There was this secondhand store.
Not only had this one, but two more.
Boy, I grabbed them quick.
Wait till you hear what Art does.
He's got a break that'll knock you out.
You never heard such playing.
Oh, get a...
Amy.
- What's the idea of walking out on me?
- Nothing, it's late.
- Not for you.
- I'm afraid it will be from now on.
Hand me my robe, will you, Richard?
Have I done anything to upset you?
Whenever I make a decision you can't understand, you always blame yourself.
This has nothing to do with you. It's me.
I was off the track for a while.
I'm back on again.
Hey, I don't get it.
I'm going back to school, if they'll have me.
I wanna finish something I started a long time ago.
So from now on, it's going to be early to bed and early to rise.
- Hey, aren't you happy?
- Of course I'm happy.
The world, as it's presently constituted, needs doctors.
Who cares? If you go to school all day, and I work all night, we'll never see each other.
- It'll only be for a few months.
- Sure.
What do you wanna be a doctor for?
You don't like it, and we're married.
I want exactly what you want.
The only difference is, you have it.
You're not being at all understanding or generous, Richard.
Not even friendly.
Maybe it's because I'm not your friend.
I'm your husband.
So you are.
I guess that does rather complicate it.
Rick, don't you see?
You've got music, but I...
I've simply got to amount to something.
I've got to stay with it this time.
I guess you do.
You better take that record off, Richard.
Amy.
Going somewhere?
I wanted to talk to you before you got out.
It's been a long time.
Can't, Richard, I'm 12 minutes late now.
Besides, talk is vastly overrated.
- It's action that counts.
- I know it is.
And don't think I haven't wanted to crack you on the jaw before this.
I don't know why I haven't done it.
- Probably because I'm still in love with you.
- That's very sweet.
But that sort of conflict can lead straight to an ulcer.
My prescription for you is a double Bromo Seltzer.
- I am late.
- I've gotta talk to you, Amy.
- We've gotta get things straight.
- Don't be silly, this is no time.
I can't stand it any longer, Amy.
All right, look...
...I'll come home tonight as soon as I can.
Let's have supper together, talk this thing out, find out where we stand.
Very well, Richard.
- You got changed pretty quick.
- I'm in a hurry.
A bunch of the guys are going to Galba's tonight.
- Not tonight.
- You haven't been there for months.
- I know, but...
- Art keeps asking about you.
- How is he?
- Not so good.
He's liable to lose the spot.
Well, I can't make it tonight, Smoke.
I told you.
Good morning, Mr. Martin.
Hi there, Mr. Martin.
Kind of early, even for you, ain't it?
- Who asked you?
- Yes, sir.
- The usual?
- Yeah.
Hello, Rick.
Hi.
- What will it be, Mac?
- Oh, a glass of milk, please.
It's been a long time.
Yeah.
- I've been busy.
- Sure.
Listen, I didn't sign a contract with Galba's.
Of course not.
A man's gotta live his own life.
He's gotta live it his way.
You gotta take the breaks the way they come.
That's right.
Yeah. I know what you think.
All right, we've been friends.
You did a lot for me.
I tried to pay you back, but...
If you're through, you're through. I can't do anything. I can't hold you up forever.
I know.
A trumpet man, he plays his little tune, and...
...then he's done.
I didn't come here to ask for anything.
But people talk.
I heard you had the misery.
And I thought maybe I could help you.
I don't need any help.
What am I, a kid that can't wipe his nose?
Everybody has to stick his two cents worth into my life?
Telling me what to do, how to do it and how to live. I'm sick and tired of it!
You're right.
People get old, they see things wrong mostly.
A man's got to live his own life...
...just like you said.
I'd have felt the same way about it when I was your age.
Everything's gonna turn out all right.
Don't let anybody worry you.
Just...
...take care of yourself.
What do you know, somebody got hit.
Somebody got hit.
Let's have some service.
- Tough about Art Hazzard, huh?
- Yeah, I saw him this morning.
Think he's got much of a chance?
- What are you talking about?
- You mean, you don't know?
He got hit by a car. He's in Bellevue in a pretty bad way, they tell me.
- Yes?
- A man named Hazzard. He got run over.
- Where is he?
- Hazzard, huh?
Hazzard.
I'm sorry, no visitors.
- I've gotta see him. Just for a minute.
- You heard me. No visitors.
- I wanna see him. Where is he?
- It's 344.
But you can't go up there.
Don't you understand?
You're not allowed up there.
- How is he?
- I'm sorry.
I know it's against the rules, but I gotta see him.
I gotta tell him something. It's important to him too. Just for a minute.
It's too late. I'm sorry.
Sorry about our date.
I got tied up and couldn't get home.
It's all right.
How's school?
Fine.
To tell the truth, I don't know.
I haven't been there lately.
I had a hunch you hadn't.
Didn't I tell you?
I flunked my finals.
No, you didn't tell me.
- But I'm sorry.
- Don't be.
Maybe I'll try again.
Maybe I won't.
Or maybe I'll go to Europe and try becoming a painter.
I met a girl the other day, an artist.
Maybe we'll go to Paris together.
I used to paint when I was a child.
Very well too.
I can do a lot of things very well but not well enough.
Nothing that really matters.
You're tired, Amy.
Why don't you go to bed.
I think I will.
I almost forgot.
I'm having some people over for cocktails tomorrow.
Have to celebrate my glorious defeat.
You'll be here, won't you?
I want to show off my wonderful husband.
Your husband.
That's a laugh.
Amy, why did you ever marry me?
It was wonderful experience for both of us.
Besides...
...how do you know about anything until you try it?
I don't mean to hurt you, Richard. It's...
It's only that I'm jealous of you.
Jealous?
I'd give anything to have what you've got...
...to be able to do one thing well and know it's worth something.
It's the only real security in the world.
Maybe that's really why I married you.
I thought some of it would rub off on me.
But it hasn't.
Amy. I'm sorry, Amy.
Don't you dare pity me!
We are gathered here not only to pay homage to a great musician...
...but to remind ourselves of the goodness in the soul of this man...
...Art Hazzard...
...and to meditate upon the unselfish spirit of generosity...
...which was his.
For he was truly a man's friend.
And now a hymn will be given by his friends.
I've never seen so many characters.
Amy collects characters like some collect antiques.
What happened to that trumpet player?
Why, you're Amy's husband, aren't you?
Rick Martin. You're unforgivably late.
- You certainly are.
- Amy promised us tunes. Now it's over.
Yes, it is.
I'm dying to see the rest of your sketches.
We'll have dinner out and then go back to my place.
How nice of you to come to the party, Richard.
This is my husband. Miss Carson.
I told you about her.
The girl who paints so well.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
- See you at 9, then, Amy.
- Fine.
It's been a wonderful party.
You certainly made a fool of me.
- Didn't you get my note?
- It's in the fire.
Well, I'm sorry.
I told everyone you were going to be here.
You make it a point not to show up.
You know why I couldn't.
What could you do for him?
He's dead, isn't he?
So there's one less trumpet player.
So what?
Look, you're drunk, Amy.
And you're sick.
Maybe a trumpet player isn't much to be...
...but it's what Art Hazzard was, and that's what I am.
- You and your alter ego, that cheap brass.
- You can do a lot of things, Amy...
...so you don't do any of them.
I can only do one.
That trumpet's part of me.
It's the best part.
You almost made me forget that.
You're so confused yourself, you got me confused.
I'm not confused any longer.
I'm fed up with you.
I'm sick of you trying to touch me.
I'm sick of the sound of brass.
I never want to hear a trumpet again.
Get these records out of here.
I don't wanna listen to them again!
You dirty...
What a dope I was.
I thought you were class, like a real high note you hit once in a lifetime.
I couldn't understand what you said half the time.
Well, you're like those carnival joints.
Big flash on the outside, but on the inside, nothing but filth.
- I hate you.
- You've always hated me.
What a swell combination we were.
You said you wanted experiences, Amy.
Well, here's one for you:
- I'm leaving you.
- I'd like to kill you.
You almost did.
You're a sick girl, Amy.
You'd better see a doctor.
Wrap it up, boys.
That was a fine exhibition you put on out there, Rick.
What you do on your own is your business, but my boys don't drink while working.
- I can't sit sober listening to your music.
- It seems you've done all right with it.
Whoever heard of you until I gave you a break?
- Lay off me tonight, please, Mr. Morrison.
- I won't stand for a lush.
What do you think this is, a spasm band like Hazzard's?
Why, you stupid...
Talking that way about him.
If your tin ear could really hear the music he played, you'd go shoot yourself.
- Watch it, Rick.
- I know what I'm doing!
You're looking for a new trumpet man.
I'm through.
You sure are.
Little off beat, aren't you?
I don't think he wants to split up any more than you.
But I do. I don't wanna work with anybody.
I'm not gonna be tied down.
From now on, I'm playing it my way.
- You want company?
- You got a good job. Keep it.
I don't care if I never get another cent out of it.
Music's not a business to me.
Hey, Smoke, how about getting together tonight with the guys?
- Go over to one of the Jersey joints?
- Sure.
You get the car, and I'll get the potato salad.
- What time is it anyway?
- What's the difference?
Hey!
What's everybody quitting for?
Oh, come on, Johnny.
We got lots of time.
But I got a recording date at 10:00, and I'm dead before I'll begin.
I'm so tired I can't hold on to my horn.
I got just the other trouble.
This keeps sticking to my hand.
I can't shake it off.
- Let's cut out. I'm beat.
- See you at the studio.
- Yeah.
- Oh, come on. Let's kick it around.
Hey, just once more, fellas, what do you say?
Don't you ever sleep?
Hey, Smoke, you stick by me, huh?
Just a few more licks.
Just a few...
Hey, Rick, what's the matter?
Hey, what's the matter?
- Are you all right? Well, get up.
- I'm okay, I...
- Where's my?
- Right there. Sit down.
And don't do that again.
You really scared me.
It felt like I fell a long, long way.
- Here.
- No, no, that's...
Hey, Smoke.
Hey, you know what we ought to do?
We ought to make our own records.
Make them the way we want.
Boy, we could make records that'd really split them wide open.
Make them sit up.
Do some of the old ones Art used to do, like...
..."Dinah" and "Twelfth Street Rag" and "Louisiana Blues."
They won't buy them.
- Who won't?
- People.
You know who buys records?
High school girls.
You know why?
To learn the words. They only buy the new songs to learn the words.
I never thought of it that way.
Nobody knows what we're doing except us, the guys that do it.
They don't hear us.
They just hear the words.
We could drop dead tomorrow, and nobody would know the difference.
Are you really okay?
- Sure.
- Sure, you are.
You're gonna stay okay.
You come along with me.
I got a little fixer-upper for you.
- I'm all right.
- Come on.
After this, you better get some sleep.
We got a recording session, remember?
Down again.
Hey. Like giving a dog a bath, trying to fix you up.
Only you could've told me you were going to shake.
You're my pal, Smoke.
You're the only guy left who cares what happens to me.
Rick!
That's all, boys.
Man, he's really washed-up.
All you need is some sleep.
Get out of here, won't you?
Leave me alone.
All right, Rick.
Rick, it was wonderful up to the finish.
We'll get it right.
Come on, we'll try it again.
We'll work till we get it. Here.
I don't want it.
I don't want to ever see it again.
Give it away.
Give it to some kid who wants to play an instrument.
Only tell him not to fall in love with it.
That's what you told me once, wasn't it?
But the record's fine, Rick.
They only buy records to learn the words.
Nobody cares about the music.
- All we have to do is cut off the last part.
- Why don't you leave me alone?
- I won't let you do this to...
- Leave me alone.
What are you trying to do, Rick?
Kill yourself?
Because you tried for something that didn't exist?
That's what you've done all your life.
What do you think a trumpet will do?
That note you were going for.
That thing you were trying for.
There is no such thing, Rick.
Not on the trumpet.
He dropped out of sight after that,
and word got around he was washed-up.
The truth is, the only thing in the world
he felt safe with was his trumpet.
And when that let him down too,
he just couldn't take it.
He went to pieces,
but not in any small way.
Habit is a remarkable thing.
It escapes no one.
Not even Rick, as sick as he was.
Because, at this point,
he did a very strange thing.
I'd like to see a trumpet you got in the window.
No, not that one.
That one. On the end there, see?
Oh, on the end.
- This one?
- There.
But it's no good, the valves are busted.
It can't play.
- That's the one I want.
- I'll be honest with you.
It's junk. I've been meaning to throw it out.
- You don't want this one, mister.
- How much?
Seventy-five cents. It hasn't got a case.
- That's all right.
- I'll put it in a paper bag for you.
Remember, I told you it was no good.
Now, don't come back and complain.
Thank you.
Hey. You're drunk.
Hello?
Yeah.
I'll be right down.
A taxi driver brought him in.
I assumed it was voluntary.
It's no fault of ours, obviously.
This is an alcoholic cure. We're not expected to handle medical cases.
It's pneumonia.
You should get him to a hospital.
- Why didn't you send him to one?
- We didn't have authorization.
You've got it now.
Get an ambulance.
I'm taking him out of here.
Call these numbers.
Tell them to get here right away.
- Mrs. Martin, is that his wife?
- Yes.
- And the other one?
- She's not his wife.
- Hi, Smoke.
- Hi, Rick. It's good to see you.
I don't feel so good.
A funny thing happened to me yesterday.
I got lost.
I'm getting you out of here, kid.
It's gonna be all right too.
He's fine. He's doing fine.
The ambulance will be here in just a minute.
Jo's here.
It's Jo.
Used to work for him.
We couldn't get along.
Never could get along with a band.
You're gonna be all right, Rick.
We have a lot of dates to play.
Sure, we... We can play some of the old ones.
The good ones we used to play.
You and Smoke and me and Art.
Hey, where is it?
They don't have to listen to us.
We can play for ourselves.
We got no words. We...
We can't say what we mean, we...
...just gotta feel it.
Hear it?
Jo, hear it?
You said I tried for something that didn't exist.
There's no such note.
Hear that note, Jo?
It's clean and sweet.
Gee, that's a good note.
You see, Rick was a pretty hard guy to understand.
And for a long time, he didn't understand himself.
But the desire to live is a great teacher, and I think it taught Rick a lot of things.
He learned you can't say everything through a trumpet.
A man doesn't destroy himself...
...just because he can't hit some high note that he dreamed up.
Maybe that's why Rick went on to be a success as a human being first...
...and an artist second.
And what an artist.
[ENGLISH]
Today I may not have
A thing at all
Except for just a dream or two
But I've got lots of plans for tomorrow
And all my tomorrows
Belong to you
Right now it may not seem
Like spring at all
We're drifting
And the laughs are few
But I've got rainbows planned for tomorrow
And all my tomorrows
Belong to you
No one knows better than I
That luck keeps passing me by
That's fate
But with you there at my side
I'll soon be turning the tide
Just wait
As long as I've got arms that cling at all
It's you that I'll be clinging to
And all the dreams I dream, beg or borrow
On some bright tomorrow
They'll all come true
And all my bright tomorrows
Belong to you
Once upon a time, there were... hm... three handsome hitchhikers.
Jerry Marks on the right,
Mendy Yales on the left,
and that's me in the middle, Tony Manetta.
We came down from the Bronx to make our fortune here in Florida.
First thing in Miami, we finagled a cab and we're in business.
That's me in the middle.
Today, 20 years later, Jerry Marks is one of the biggest promoters in the country.
Last year, Mr Fabulous, as the papers call him,
he paid over $5 million in taxes.
Mendy? Well, Mendy's still pushing a cab.
As for me, I'm still in the middle.
I'm in the hotel business in Miami Beach, working on my first million.
That's my hotel right there,
The Garden Of Eden.
But like good old Adam, my weakness is Eves.
My current Eve is a Lulu. She would've made the serpent eat the apple.
Yahoo!
Miami Beach!
If anyone thinks
I'm a well-heeled big shot out on a spree,
they've got a hole in their head.
Truth is, I'm busted.
He would like to own it, but I wouldn't give you a quarter for the whole stinkin' beach.
All right, tiger, down. The cops.
- You wanna fight, huh?
- Come on, now. Come on.
Oh, I forgot. I've got a son.
How about that?
Knock it off. You wanna get us pinched?
- You're just chicken, landlord. Whee...
- What a kook. Out, kook, out.
I feel like swimming.
Let's go swimming, huh, landlord?
Out, out. You're going to bed.
Go to bed, Ally.
- I'm a nose cone. And I want music.
- You're a kook nose cone.
- You'll wake up the kid. Get your key.
- Lookee, let's play fireman.
- Whoops, I'm decelerating.
- Andy, get her key right away.
I love you, landlord.
You love me?
- Any law against loving a landlord?
- There's a law against killing a landlord.
- Lookee, there goes Mars.
- Hurry up. Open her door wide.
The ride's getting bumpy.
Aren't we going to land?
Any minute now.
- No, no!
- Oh, keep quiet.
No, no!
Oh... Oh, no.
- Turn this radio off.
- I don't love you.
Who are you that I should love you?
I'm going swimming. Bye.
Yahoo!
What a kooky broad.
Pop...
- Pop.
- What's the matter? What happened?
We are being evicted.
- What, are you kidding?
- I was trying to reach you all afternoon.
How do you like that?
A guy misses one lousy payment...
- Five payments.
- Oh, OK, five payments.
And Abe Diamond throws us out on the street.
He must think I'm a jerk from Jerkville.
- Mr Diamond's right, you know.
- Right? What do you mean, right?
If we can't meet our payments...
He's a big lawyer now.
Pshew, corporation lawyer.
What do we care what it says in the lease?
Who needs this crummy, beat-up hotel, anyways? Fleabag.
You know these architect drawings?
I didn't tell you about my brainchild.
It'll make me bigger than Jerry.
See this South Beach area?
We could buy it for a song.
About three, four million dollars.
Maybe five million.
We take the buildings down and we build a Disneyland.
Pretty big blockbuster idea, huh?
I got three or four guys who want to put in...
Abe Diamond. Now he picks to throw me out.
If the word gets around, my credit will be worth about two cents.
Don't worry about it.
I'll figure something out.
Hey!
- Sleepy? I'll run you a little gin.
- It's four o'clock in the morning.
So it's four o'clock. What, are you sleepy?
Come on, we'll play cards.
In 1931, when Mickey Walker gave up the middleweight crown, who fought for it?
- What are we gonna do?
- Answer the question.
- Ben Jeby and Gorilla Jones.
- Right for $1 million.
- What are we gonna do, Pop?
- Stop worrying about it.
- Maybe if we sell the car.
- I'm gonna have to flatten you.
If you're gonna play cards, play.
Tomorrow I'll go see Mr Diamond and ask him to tear up the eviction notice.
- What if he don't?
- Then I'll go to a bank.
You think Marty Elkins is gonna turn me down?
- He'd give me the money in two minutes.
- I thought you went to him last month.
Don't go getting smart with me, Ally.
And if worst comes to worst,
I'll call up your Uncle Mario.
- Uncle Mario?
- Now that's very nice.
- Nice respect to show for your relatives.
- Gee whiz, Pop.
Don't you remember after Mama died how they started all that stuff about you can't take care of me, and all?
- So?
- I wanna stay here with you.
Look, in the first place, I'm not going to call up Uncle Mario unless it's desperate.
In the second place, I'm not gonna let anybody take you away from me.
What am I gonna do?
Sell you for a few dollars for money?
- Play cards and answer the question.
- James J Corbett.
I didn't ask the question yet.
- Five points.
- What five points?
Go to bed. A kid playing gin at four in the morning.
Next thing you know, you'll be smoking and drinking.
OK, once more.
Who's the greatest champ of all times?
- For $1 million?
- For $1 million.
That's easy... you are.
I ought to punch you in your funny nose.
Except it looks like your mother's.
You know how you look like her?
Look how look like her.
Little Millie. She was so good.
Pop, please don't let me go live with Uncle Mario.
- What are you talking?
- I know if you call him for money...
I never saw such a worrypuss. Come here.
You know what I'm gonna do for you when I'm on Easy Street?
I used to dream about it when I was in the Bronx.
I'm gonna buy you the biggest house you ever saw. Big as a castle.
We're gonna have flowers and dogs, and beautiful horses with their tails way up in the air.
And maybe a big white yacht. Hm?
I used to watch those boats go up and down the Hudson.
I used to say to myself "Yes, sirree, boy, one of these days, all of that is for my little Ally."
Me too, you.
"Me too, you?" What kind of talk is that?
When I grow up and be a famous scientist,
I'm gonna buy things for you.
- Hotels.
- Shut up.
I'll do all the buying in this family.
That gives me a good idea.
Cos right next to that big house,
I'll build a very big scientific building.
Every afternoon, I can watch the professors shoot rockets to the moon.
Hm?
Nah.
First, we've got to get you a bank, something solid, you know?
Real solid. We'll have your name in gold letters that high.
President Ally, banker.
Boy, we sure could use that bank right now.
Oh, go to bed. Go on, beat it.
It's four o'clock in the morning.
- Good night, Pop.
- Knock off.
Don't let him call Uncle Mario.
I don't wanna live with Uncle Mario.
Please, God, I want to stay here with Pop.
How do you like that?
He's gonna take care of me.
And he could too, the way I'm going.
Some father.
Put in a good word for me, Millie.
Cos if I lose this hotel right now, I'm dead.
Cha-cha-cha to the right
The night is young
Cha-cha-cha to the left
Oh, don't be chicken
Play me something
The cha-cha-cha
We'll cha-cha
You'll cha-cha
The night is young
Oh, don't be chicken
Knock off, will you?
And the landlord is a goof
Abe, you're my friend.
You can't throw me out now.
I got a deal here that's stupendous.
If you want a piece, you can have a piece.
This is a $10 million deal.
Millions schmillions.
Don't make me out a mean man.
I told you I'd meet you for a coffee.
We couldn't meet at Dubrow's Cafeteria.
No, it has to be here.
The coffee is a dollar and a quarter.
Money to you is... I don't know what.
Are you scared? This kid from the Bronx is gonna wind up owning half this town.
Look me in the face.
You know that, don't you?
In the face?
I hope you wind up owning the state.
Then get off my back and don't give me pressure.
Tony.
You wanna play marbles, play marbles.
You wanna do business, don't play marbles.
You've got 48 hours and that's the end of it.
Dollar and a quarter, a cup of coffee.
They could throw in a schnickel.
All right, let go, Ally. Let go.
- Then how about half the towels?
- I said no money, no towels.
No.
You can leave about ten towels.
The guests are all leaving.
No money, no towels.
And no cheques... not after the last one.
- You can't take that.
- Get out of here.
Get my brother Mario person-to-person in New York.
Yes, sir.
Pop. Pop.
Pop.
- Hi. How'd you make out with Diamond?
- Outside. I'm expecting a call.
The laundry man wouldn't leave the towels.
All right. I'm trying to think.
Give those towels to Sally.
- What towels?
- The ones in the bedroom.
Hey, Fred.
Pop. Pop.
These are Fontainebleau towels.
Aren't they good enough for you?
What about that call to my brother?
- Uncle Mario?
- Out. Outside.
- Oh, please, Pop, don't call him.
- Outside.
Hey, Pa, the phone's ringing.
Hey, Pa, the phone.
- Answer it.
- It's not for me.
Go, Mario.
Don't give yourself a heart attack.
Excuse me a minute, please.
Would it break your arm to pick up the phone?
- It's for you.
- What are you, a mind-reader?
- Mario.
- Everything he knows, our brilliant son.
- No-one would call me here.
- Nobody should call you anywhere.
- Hello?
- Hello, Mario. How are you? This is Tony.
- Tony. Sophie, it's Tony.
- He must be broke again. Ha-ha.
Shut up, you, with your ha-has.
- How do you feel? How's Sophie?
- Terrible. What do you want?
That's too bad. What's the matter with her? What has she got, a virus?
What do you mean? She don't feel good.
That's good.
Listen, I'll tell you why I called.
Why, I know. How much?
How much? That's rich. I guess you know me pretty good, don't you?
- Can you hear me pretty good?
- The whole trouble is I hear you too good.
- Mario.
- How much do you want?
Hello?
- Ten to one he doesn't get it.
- You shouldn't listen in.
I can't explain it now, Mario, but I have to have $5,300.
Hello?
Hello?
Mario?
- How about...? Hello?
- $5,300?
- I got nervous. I thought you hung up.
- Listen...
- Don't get excited.
- Make that 50 to one.
Do you know how many garter belts
I gotta sell to make $5,300?
- 10,000 what?
- Garter belts.
- Shut up, will you?
- No, positively no.
- They'll throw me out on the street.
- So what?
- What about the kid? What will I do?
- The kid?
- I can't move him in the condition he's in.
Beautiful. Five to one.
- What do you mean? Is he sick?
- Is Ally sick?
Forget it. Should I give you a hard-luck story about my problems? How's Sophie?
- Don't tell her about this.
- Never mind.
Now, Tony, I'm your brother.
If the boy is sick, I wanna know.
Look, I don't wanna talk about it.
Anyway, I think we caught it in time.
- Tony, what's the matter?
- What's he got?
He's got stomach trouble.
Are you telling me the truth?
You're making me mad.
Did I ever lie to you?
- Yes.
- Mario.
- Yeah? When did I ever lie to you?
- When?
Aw, skip the whole thing.
Forget the whole thing, you hear?
Even if you sent me the cheque,
I'd tear the thing up.
I should drop dead right on the spot.
He hung up.
Ever see such a man?
Calls me for a loan, then hangs up on me.
What did he say about Ally?
What's the difference?
Even when he's lying, he's lying.
- Call him right back.
- No, no, no.
It's a Tony trick. He wants the money for something crazy.
See, Pa?
I told you the call wasn't for me.
Play, Julius, play.
Listen to that Mario calling me a liar.
Boy.
- What boy? What are you boying?
- You really get me.
- Who's got stomach trouble?
- Are you calling me a liar too?
- You never had a bellyache in your life?
- One time, that's all. Fried salami.
That doesn't mean I got stomach trouble.
What are you, a regular George
Washington? You can't tell one teeny lie?
You're getting fresh, kid. Watch it.
I don't like that attitude.
- You talk too much. You hear me?
- I hear you.
What's the matter? You mad?
The crazy books he reads.
What kind of book is this?
It's a zoology book.
Oh, yeah.
- They've got them dinosauruses.
- Dinosaurs.
Big deal.
- Come on, will you? I told you I'm sorry.
- When?
- Didn't I tell you?
- I talk too much.
- Who said that?
- You did.
Aw, you mustn't pay any attention.
You want to talk, boy, you go right ahead and talk. I don't care what anybody says.
- They ever make a picture of this book?
- It's a zoology book.
So what? I don't care.
Yeah, they made a picture.
About those guys with the big clubs.
The actor with the black hair.
He lived on the side of a hill.
Like a caveman, like.
Pop.
Would you promise me something?
Sure, Ally.
No matter what, you'll let me stay here with you?
Of course.
Who's here, the president?
Let's go see who's here.
Hey, Jerry. Hey, Geronimo.
Geronimo!
- Jerry, it's Tony. Hey!
- Hey, Tony, you old meatball!
Hey, that's Jerry Marks. How about that?
- Hey, you be sure to call me now.
- Sweetie.
I'm sorry, but you don't know how long I've...
Jerry Marks, of all people.
This may be just the thing I needed.
Ten million dollars worth of hotels he bought. What a man.
Hey! Every hour, call the Fontainebleau and keep trying to get Mr Marks.
- You bet.
- Sally? Don't give up.
- We may come up with a little money yet.
- About time.
Today I may not have a thing at all
Except perhaps a dream or two...
Did you hear what he said?
"Call me up," he says, "Tony".
Disneyland.
Why didn't I think about that before?
That's his kind of an idea.
He'll love the idea.
Well, why don't you ask Mr Marks to lend you the money instead of Uncle Mario?
Oh, don't be ridiculous. Let me give you a few pointers about the world.
The first thing you gotta learn is to put up a big front.
Now take me for instance. I jump in my Cadillac, I drive down to see him.
I say "Hello, Jerry."
He says "Hello, Tony."
He says "What's doing?"
"I got a big hotel." Big shot.
I say "I got a proposition for you."
He says "Tell me."
Now suppose I go down there,
I sell the Cadillac, and I go by jitney bus.
I walk in and say "Jerry."
He says "What's doing, Tony?"
"I'm being evicted. Lend me some money." "Scram, bum, who needs you?"
The same person, the same nothing in my pocket, except that if I put up a front, he listens to me.
If I don't put up a front, out.
You remember that.
Well, Pop, where are we gonna get the money then?
Why don't you get off my...
- Victor Mature.
- What?
The guy in the picture.
The caveman. He lived in a cave.
- Boy.
- It was a beautiful picture.
Didn't I have this shirt on before?
You trick me into wearing dirty shirts.
- Will you tell me something?
- Sure, what?
The first lightweight champion to hold three crowns.
- For $1 million?
- For $1 million.
Greta Garbo.
Nobody's ever gonna take you away from me. Never, never, never.
Let's go for a drive. The speedometer's all nines and it's ready to go to zero.
What are we gonna do? Leave the boy in that place till he gets sick, maybe dies?
What's he got, bellyache?
Such a big tragedy!
Are you disappointed he hasn't got a hernia?
If anything happens to that child, you know who I'll hold responsible? You.
All right, today he's got a stomachache, tomorrow appendicitis.
Pa, look. I got it.
Genius.
I'll bring him here. I'll love taking care of a little boy again.
You out of your mind? "I'm gonna walk out." Who'll watch the store?
- The store won't run away. Julius is here.
- Julius?
Very nice. You talk about him like he's an l-don't-know-what.
In the house he's my son.
In the store he's a tumour.
We're going down there.
We'll take an airplane.
Will you stop that?
Look, I never was in an airplane.
- Hi.
- Hey!
- You gorgeous or are you gorgeous?
- I am gorgeous.
I'll be with you in a minute, soon as I finish my exercises.
Baby, I'm not going to be able to see you tonight.
Thanks a lump.
Now's a fine time to tell me.
A wire from my brother.
I have to meet him at the airport.
- Fine, introduce me. I won't bite him.
- Don't be funny, will you?
Doesn't he think you're old enough to go out with girls?
He thinks any girl who's 21 and unmarried is no good.
He'll love me.
I was married when I was fifteen.
No, I'm not kidding. This is serious.
He's the marines coming to bail me out.
I don't want to make him mad.
What am I, some Frankenstein,
I'm gonna scare him off?
You know, you're making me very mad.
No, look, I mean it.
- Are you ashamed to be seen with me?
- Pop!
I've been here a month, I haven't met your kid yet. Now your very square brother.
Understand, it's only a couple of days until I get my hands on some money.
I'm not ashamed of the way I live and if you are, goodbye, Charlie.
I gotta go now, but later on when my brother's gone to bed, I'll give you a buzz.
- What did you do that for?
- Guess why.
- Pop, it's late!
- I'll see you later.
Don't hold your breath, Charles. You rat.
- What are you hollering?
- It takes half an hour to get to the airport.
Stop nagging me. What a nag.
Garden of Eden.
- Hello, Mrs Wexler.
- Good evening.
- Pop.
- Leave me alone for two minutes.
Don't you think it's funny Uncle Mario gets on an airplane and comes down here?
Look, have you had your supper?
Look what time it is... half past ten.
I'm supposed to be practically dying with stomach trouble.
- I'm gonna have to flatten you.
- OK, I'm going.
- You got that big room?
- For the man with the moolah?
No cracks, now. He doesn't laugh easily.
I'm going out to the airport.
- What's the matter with you?
- I'm checking out.
Are you trying to drain the blood out of me? Get in the car.
- Will you please leave me alone?
- You're a kook.
- I'm a kook? You're a fine one to talk.
- Let's take a ride.
- I don't wanna take a ride.
- Get in the car.
Why do you needle me? Is that your hobby?
Nobody's turning me into a kiwi bird.
I'm a wild bird.
- So?
- Free, with no tomorrow.
I go where the kicks are, and when the kicks stop coming, I take off.
- Suppose I clip your wings?
- Ha!
Ha!
What a kook. Free as a bird, wild.
No tomorrow.
You know you're a kook like a cuckoo?
I thought you had to meet
Brother Sourpuss.
Don't remind me.
Well, have laughs.
You can catch me on the ninth wave.
My brother. What a character.
He'd like me to live in a cave someplace like a monk.
His idea of a big night is sitting around the kitchen playing penny ante.
You should've known my husband.
The same way. They're all alike.
All they do is sit around in a deep, dark hole someplace.
You talk about fun and they yell bloody murder.
- That's him. That's my brother.
- That's all of them.
Hey!
What do you say we leave the stinking fun killers behind and go shoosh?
- We got the car.
- Shirl...
Honey, you want me, don't you?
That's what bothers me.
Look, I want to ask you a question.
Would you like to marry me?
Marriage?
I thought that word was poison to you.
Just answer the question.
What are you, a gypsy?
Every two minutes you change your mind.
- Now you want to get married?
- Who, me? No.
There are two kinds of women.
And I'm the other kind.
Then what's the problem?
We don't want to get married.
The problem is this.
I'm a wild bird and you're a kiwi.
And one of us has got to change or goodbye, Charlie.
- I'm a what?
- A kiwi.
Haven't you ever seen one? Stupid things.
They want to fly, but they just sit around all day long, flapping their wings.
- That's what I am?
- Oh, you talk big. Very, very big.
Big deal, big man. Let's get in the big car, let's go off through the woods.
But inside, not you. Not you, landlord.
You want to be respectable.
There's a little fun-killer in you.
For a crazy minute I say to myself,
I'll be respectable if that's what he wants.
Cos I have to admit it,
I like it there in your back pocket.
But I'm not gonna do it.
I just got started.
Do you think I want to settle down with a 12-year-old kid?
Why do you think I left my husband?
Him and his family kept bugging me day after day, "Have a baby, have a baby."
Who needs a baby? I'm a baby myself.
I want to be free.
- Have fun.
- Who don't?
- You don't. You're not selfish enough.
- I'm the most selfish man in the world.
Would you leave your kid?
Boy, I sure would like to pick up and take off. You and me. Any place.
Just take off. Africa, maybe.
And let the wind blow.
You go meet your square brother.
Have a good swim, Esther.
- Kiwi.
- Kook.
So how come he's not here to meet us?
If I could give you a reason, would I give you a reason?
- The boy's in hospital.
- He said the boy had a stomachache.
What am I doing here? All of a sudden, you got me on an airplane.
- Mario, call up all the hospitals.
- I'm not gonna call the hospitals.
You're making me crazy, you know that?
Come on, we'll go by ourselves.
Taxi. Come on.
Yahoo!
Yahoo!
- Peewee the kiwi.
- Oh, shut up, you kook.
- You taste good.
- You're salty.
Here you are.
Pardon me, sir. Do you have a snapshot of yourself?
- What?
- I haven't gotten a dime tip since 1932.
I'd just love to frame it along with a picture of the sport that gave it to me.
You got so much money you don't need a dime?
Well, I need a dime and I got more money than you.
- For heaven's sake, come on...
- I don't know about that.
A nice how-do-you-do, isn't it?
What am I doing in Florida?
Airplane...
- Very nice pictures for a little boy.
- Where is everybody?
They're all at the hospital.
Look in the phone book.
You and your hospital.
Who's here?
- Anybody here?
- Mario.
- Mario, will you stop it?
- What do you want me to do, stand here?
- Geronimo!
- Geronimo!
- Geronimo!
- I got it, Fred. Geronimo!
Geronimo!
I'm so happy.
Excelsior!
Garden of Eden...
May I help you, sir? Uncle Mario!
- Ally!
- When did you get out of the hospital?
- Hospital?
- What are you doing up? You all right?
- You had me worried to death.
- I'm OK.
- I won't say nothing.
- Where's Pop? He went to meet you.
Look how pale he looks. You got a fever?
I think he's got a fever.
You know how much it costs to go on the airplane? Over 200...
- Who are you?
- I'm...
$200. I gotta leave my store.
But I won't say nothing.
You should thank God the boy's all right. $200?
Are you mad because he's not sick?
Ally, you had me worried to death.
Well, come on inside.
I think Pop will be here in a minute.
- He went out to meet you.
- Well, he did it again.
I swore I'd never live to see the day
I'd believe a word he told me.
But look at me.
I'm standing here in Florida.
It's a good thing we came.
At least we know.
I tell you, it's a miracle we didn't get here dead. Airplanes.
No more. You could pay me money.
You could kill me first.
You don't have a kitchen?
- There's so many restaurants near here.
- Restaurants...
You sit there.
A woman says "Put the belt on."
I look out, fire is coming out of the motor.
I told her "Look at the fire there."
She gives me a piece of chewing gum.
The motor is on fire.
She expects you to sit there like a dope, chewing.
What kind of crazy chair to have around the place?
- You have a maid cleans up for you?
- Oh, sure. It's very comfortable here.
I tell you the truth, though... it's very nice when you come to think of it.
Six o'clock I'm sitting in my own kitchen, now I can look around, see a coconut.
Four hours, would you believe it?
Now, on the train, we're in Baltimore and my underwear is just beginning to crawl up on me.
- Mario!
- What did I say? Underwear?
Would somebody like a hot dog, or something?
- Is that your supper?
- No, I had a good supper.
I just bought these. I thought you might be hungry, getting off the plane, and all.
- What are you crying about?
- He thought we might be hungry.
- Ally, you're a dear.
- Everything, she cries.
Ally, your poor, dear mama, may she rest in peace, she used to worry about you. Are you warm enough? Did you eat enough?
Now, when I find you here in the middle of who knows what kind of people... drunken bums, dope fiends, gamblers...
Ally, you're gonna like living with us.
You'll have three meals a day.
- Make friends in a nice neighbourhood.
- Sophie.
I'll see you later.
- No, no, no. You go up the back.
- No.
Wait up for me.
There you are. I went out to the airport.
I looked all over for you.
You couldn't wait?
- Sophie, how's your virus?
- Don't do that.
Mario, it's good to see you.
How are you feeling?
What's the matter?
What are you thinking? Come on, already.
At the airport I ran into a little old lady
I know, I know a hundred years.
Well, Tony, you haven't changed. Eh, Tony?
You. Did you take your stomach medicine? He's got stomach trouble.
- Stomach trouble...
- Yeah...
You're looking good, Tony. Like a doctor.
- Look how he looks like a doctor.
- Hm. Like a doctor...
Go ahead, go to bed.
- Look at all those suits.
- You like 'em?
How much did they cost you?
Big hotel man, huh?
Look at these two people. Are you kidding?
These don't belong to me, they belong to Ally.
Since he had the stomach trouble he lost a little weight, you know.
We owe the rent, we can't pay the phone bill, we gotta pay the laundryman, he buys $100 suits!
Ally in those suits.
- You're a funny guy.
- Yeah, that's some Tony.
I've got a suggestion.
You must be tired...
- Garden of Eden. Didn't I tell you?
- Tell me what?
Remember the last time I was here?
I looked around the place.
They got hotels in the best neighbourhoods for the same money.
Why should they stop here?
I told you then, get rid of the place.
If you're not giving me the money, forget it.
You want me to throw good money in the ash can?
- If that's the way you want to be, fine.
- What?
- You're my brother.
- No more. I'm not your brother.
- Mario.
- You want him, take him.
From now on, she's your brother.
- Come on, in the other room.
- Forget it.
- What do I owe you? Do I owe you?
- Skip it.
Look, go. Go in your big car. Big shot.
- Now I'm running away with his money.
- Big shot.
I don't have a Cadillac car.
I don't run around with tramps.
- What tramps?
- That's who you go around with.
I've got a Chevrolet, ten years. It runs good. Takes me where I want to go.
- I don't have a Cadillac car, you bum.
- Bum?
You know why it runs good?
I take care of it.
- Who's talking about cars?
- $100 suits.
- Oh, don't be crazy.
- In your whole life, you ever sat still?
Running here, there. How many times did you come to me for help?
It's time you stood on your own two feet.
All you do is run around with girls, who knows what?
You need money, your brother Mario.
Only no more. Nothing. Not a penny.
All right. Who needs you?
Goodbye, good luck.
- You got a disease.
- What disease?
You're happiness-crazy. You're a bum.
- Bum?
- Bum. That's what you are, a bum.
Do you want to wake up the neighbourhood?
We've got things to talk about.
There's no reason we can't sit down and talk about it.
Now sit down, Mario.
Serves you right. Sit down, Ton...
Tony, I want you to think about this before you say no.
Don't say what you're gonna say, Sophie.
We'll let the boy live here like a bum with hot dogs?
- You're not gonna take my kid.
- What are you gonna do?
This hotel you can forget about.
- Can you hammer a nail, plant a seed?
- Oh, wait a minute...
If you'd watch your business instead of tramps...
- Tramps?
- Bum. Did you meet us?
Will you stop it, both of you?
Sit down, Mario.
The point is this, Tony.
You don't wanna go back to driving a cab.
All you can be is a salesman again.
Again?
Once he was a salesman for two weeks.
- Three weeks.
- Three weeks. Big career.
And who's gonna look after the boy?
Who's gonna cook his meals, wash his clothes, see he don't get sick?
You want him to grow up to be a bum like you?
- Bum?
- Yes, bum.
- Don't call me a bum.
- You know it.
A bum who never made a living in his life.
He's not a bum!
He's my pop and he's a champ!
- Don't let him call you that, Pop.
- You think I like calling him a bum?
Go, Ally. Go. They're just brothers.
I mean it, Mario, sit down.
Will you never learn?
- Sit down, Tony.
- I'm sitting.
If you'd get married, if you'd get a decent home for Ally and get on your feet, nobody'd be happier than us.
- Am I right, Mario?
- Bum.
I'd like that. I'd like nothing better.
I'd marry tomorrow if I could find the right woman.
- You mean that, Tony?
- Of course I mean it, Sophie.
Mario, if he got married again, would you start him in a store like the rest of the family?
He won't get married.
- If?
- If...
- Maybe.
- Then you would?
Maybe. But just a living, that's all.
No big deals in Florida.
You got to understand that, Tony.
You know your trouble? I'll tell you.
You're not satisfied to just get along like everybody else.
You want to be a millionaire.
You want to live on Easy Street.
I'll tell you who lives on Easy Street.
Nobody.
You want to make a million overnight.
It don't happen.
I worked hard all my life,
14 hours a day and I made a good living.
I never took a vacation in my whole life.
I'm proud of it.
Is that so? You think
I worry about what you say?
Let me tell you something.
How do you know how I operate?
Take Jerry Marks.
Everybody said he'd be a bum.
He's a big man. Why?
Imagination. I got imagination.
- You got no imagination.
- You have?
I haven't got it?
You got it and you're poor.
No, no. Broke many times, but never poor.
- You would never understand that.
- All right. You're both great, but sit down.
I've never seen a man could get me so mad.
Everybody sit down again, another act is coming on.
Do you know anybody, Tony?
- What?
- Mario?
Can you think of anybody he could marry?
If you'll settle down, with a nice little store, and you find a nice little woman and live in a nice little town and...
Don't you think that's all I think about every minute of the day, every day?
So help me, I should drop dead right here.
If he'd dropped dead all the times he's supposed to,
I'd go into the cemetery business.
You know who'd be perfect, Mario?
Mrs Rogers.
Who?
Her husband died a couple of years ago and left her quite a few dollars.
- Believe me, she'd be perfect for you.
- Say, you know what?
What's the matter with Louie Bendi's second cousin?
- Why do you say that?
- She's a nice, quiet little woman.
- She's old enough to be his mother.
- She's a nice little woman.
Every time I mention a woman's name, you bring up Louie Bendi's second cousin.
Don't you know any other women?
Well, she's a nice, quiet, little woman.
Believe me, Tony,
Mrs Rogers would be perfect for you.
We used to go to their house.
You could eat a meal right off the floor.
Sophie, I don't like to eat my meals off the floor.
All right, if you want Mrs Rogers...
Are you two crazy? You're picking out a wife like it's a slave market or someplace.
She's living right here in Miami and I'm supposed to call her up and say hello.
- Please, Sophie.
- What's it gonna cost you to meet her?
- He won't get married.
- You call her up, you take her out.
- It won't hurt you.
- He wants a young girl. A tramp.
- What tramp?
- Bum! Did you meet us at the airport?
All I ask you to do, Tony, is think about it.
If you want to meet the woman,
I'll call her up. What harm's it gonna do?
- Sophie, let's you and me run off.
- Oh, Tony, stop it. I'm serious.
- Will you think about it?
- I promise I'll think about it.
Now come on, I'll show you to your room.
Come on.
Come on, tiger.
Bum.
Fred, give me the key to the Presidential Suite.
- I just want you to be happy, that's all.
- All right.
Now what are you crying about?
- Good night, Ally.
- She cries.
Ally, I want you to know, both of us, we'd like very much for you to come and live with us.
Well, your Aunt Sophie, even at hockey games she cries.
You're a good boy, Ally.
Bum.
Ally?
What are you doing out here?
Here, blow.
Oh, come on, Ally.
Listen, I'm not an old man yet.
I'm pretty young.
It's not bad for me to go out with a girl.
Do you want me to go with Uncle Mario?
Oh, what are you talking so crazy?
So I kissed a girl.
What's that got to do with me and you, with us?
If you do, just tell me, that's all.
I tell you one thing... they're right, you're a skinny kid. I keep telling you to eat.
No. Fried salami and hot dogs.
What kind of food is that to serve a kid?
I'm not a kid.
I wish you'd stop calling me a kid.
- No, you're an old man with a long beard.
- A kid is a goat.
Goat, tomorrow morning we'll buy one of those fancy refrigerators with the two-colour jobs we saw on television that night?
They're wild things.
Press a button and get ice cubes.
- Boy!
- No kidding.
We'll have milk in it. Tell me how to take care of my kid? I'll show 'em.
You really get me.
We'll have vegetables and we'll have three meals a day in our own room over there.
- Who's gonna cook?
- Hey, nag.
Stop nagging me. Who's gonna cook?
We'll get a hot plate.
Buy some frozen foods, they dump 'em in the water, three minutes, you got a meal.
Any dumb slob can cook today.
We'll have vegetables.
- What kind of vegetables you like?
- Spinach?
What do I need you for spinach? Name me something fancy, like broccoli or zucchini.
Pop, don't make me go with them.
I don't want to go with them.
You've had some luck, Ally. Lucky Ally.
You must have been hiding behind a pole the afternoon they gave away the daddies.
I don't know, lately...
You know, I could be walking right past a solid block of gold and if I touch it, spaghetti right on my hand.
I could get a job someplace.
I believe you could.
I got an idea. I think I'll go over and tell them I'm ready to meet that woman.
- What woman?
- The one they want to marry me off to.
Marry a woman you don't even know?
Who said marry her? Meet her.
If she turns out to be a dog, final.
At least I met her.
They'll stop calling me a bum.
- What if she turns out to be nice?
- Wonderful. I'll make a deal with you.
If I don't like her and you like her, you marry her and you can take care of me.
- Pop, you got a hole in the head.
- I know.
I like you looking better. You look much better without the tears and your chin on...
Remember that song we used to sing about the chin on the ground?
The Ant Song.
Next time you're found with your chin on the ground
There's a lot to be learned, so look around
Just what makes that little old ant
Think he'll move a big rubber plant?
Anyone knows an ant can't... move a rubber tree plant
But he's got high hopes
He's got high hopes
He's got high-in-the-sky apple-pie hopes
So anytime you're feeling low
Instead of letting go,
Just remember the ant
Oops, there goes another rubber tree plant
Oops, there goes another rubber tree plant
Oops, there goes another rubber tree plant
When troubles call and your back's to the wall, there's a lot to be learned
That wall could fall
Once there was a silly old ram
Thought he'd punch a hole in a dam
No one could make that ram scram
He kept butting that dam
Cos he had high hopes
He had high hopes
He had high apple-pie-in-the-sky hopes
- So anytime you're feeling low
- Never let go
Just remember that ram
Oops, there goes a billion-kilowatt dam
Oops, there goes a billion-kilowatt dam
Oops, there goes a billion-kilowatt dam
You better have high hopes
Keep your high hopes
Keep those high apple-pie-in-the-sky hopes
- A problem's just a toy balloon
- They'll be bursting soon
They're just bound to go pop
Oops, there goes another problem
Kerplop!
Oops, there goes another problem
Kerplop!
Oops, there goes another problem
Kerplop!
Kerplop!
Tell you what.
I'll tell them to bring over the broad.
We'll take a look at her and if we both like her, maybe she'll have herself a deal.
- What if she don't like you?
- Why, you!
- Whoops!
- Why, you!
- Oh, hi.
- Hi.
Well, have to go now.
- Goodbye.
- Bye.
Tell me the truth, you think I look too fat in this?
- I don't know.
- Never mind.
Why are you so nervous?
Who's marrying the woman, you or him?
- Tony.
- Sophie.
- Mario, where did you find the pastry?
- Pastry?
- Sophie, you're a Gasser.
- Don't, Tony!
- You hear that, Mario?
- Gasser.
Look, Tony, I want you to put on a suit.
- Something quiet.
- A quiet suit.
- Something borrowed? Something blue?
- Tony, and a plain-cut tie.
I'll be right with you.
I gotta make one call.
- Get me Sid Schwartz.
- Come on, let's go outside and wait.
- Tell the truth, think Tony will like her?
- No.
Why do you say that?
How do you know so much?
Did you ask me?
I'm warning you.
Mrs Rogers is a very sensitive woman.
If you say one word to hurt her feelings...
You're making such a big thing here.
A woman meets a man and gets married.
A simple business proposition.
Marriage isn't simple, it isn't a business and it isn't a proposition.
You're getting crazy in your old age.
First you're lonesome, so you want to come down here and take the little boy.
Well, fine.
So we get down here... on an airplane.
Now you drag some woman over by her hair and, boom, you're a matchmaker.
Why? So the little boy can have a home here, not back with us.
What do you want? Do you want to take the boy or leave the boy?
- I just want everybody to be happy.
- Good. Now you're crying.
You're making me crazy.
If you can deliver me those beat-up hotels for a price like not over five million, cash, by the way, for tax reasons, you've got yourself a deal.
What do you think about that, you real-estate thief?
What?
Who said I'm getting thrown out of the Garden of Eden?
The bank? Don't be ridiculous, my fair-feathered friend.
My brother's backing me and he's here at the hotel right now.
Furthermore, he can buy you and the bank and the ground it's built on.
- How do you like that?
- Who's the woman?
- A rumour like that spreads, I'm dead.
- Who's the woman?
- What are you talking? What woman?
- The woman you're meeting.
Oh, some hatchet-face my brother wants me to meet.
- If Abe Diamond is talking...
- Who's the woman?
Knock it off, will you?
My brother's out there.
- Well, good. Maybe I better ask him.
- Hey.
It's nothing, really.
My brother, before he gives me money he makes me take castor oil.
- He wants you to marry the castor oil.
- Come off it. Don't go getting dramatic.
Now, look, we can go to dinner.
We'll go to the Boom-Boom Room.
- You have to meet this woman.
- So what?
Ten, fifteen minutes,
I'll brush her off, then I'll meet you.
I got a beautiful idea.
We go to the airport, jump on a plane, we go to Cuba, 59 minutes.
Fly now, pay later. You got it?
Go down there, a few cha-cha-chas...
I'll buy you a Cuban breakfast and home before the morning papers. That a date?
Oh, Tony.
- Tony, do you want me?
- Oh, you know it.
Baby, when we get to Cuba, let's keep right on going. Let the wind blow.
- Let the... What?
- They'll make a prisoner out of you here.
Those squares out on that porch, they'll chain you down.
Wait a minute. All I gotta do is hold onto this hotel for a while, get my idea to Jerry Marks and I'll be on Easy Street.
Honey, you've got wings.
You don't have to be a kiwi bird.
- Don't call me that.
- This is our tailor-made opportunity.
- Look, leave the kid with your brother.
- Ally?
Of course. He's better off with them, Tony.
You know that.
No, Shirley. No, I couldn't.
You know he's better off with them.
Why fight me?
- Oh, excuse me.
- Do you ever think of knocking, Fred?
- What do you want?
- Sheriff's out there, chief.
- OK, tell him I'll be right out.
- Yes, sir.
Baby.
Trust me, honey.
Don't throw rocks at me, not now.
Let me get this eviction notice off my back and we'll talk about it. Will you? OK?
Well, I don't know.
If I had one brain in working condition...
I'll see you at dinner? A date?
- If you stand me up, I'll flatten you.
- Scout's honour.
Wear something flashy, hm?
- Sheriff. How's things in Dodge City?
- How are you, Tony?
I know. Tomorrow morning I'm dead, right?
- I just wanted to tell you I'm sorry.
- You can save yourself a trip.
- I got the money. Everything's settled.
- Good thing. I hope so.
- Me, too.
- Knock it off, will you?
- If Jerry Marks calls, I'll be in my room.
- By the way, chief, congratulations.
For what?
- May all your troubles be little ones.
- What are you talking about?
- Ally told me.
- He told you what?
- You're getting married.
- He told you that I'm...
He didn't just come right out and say it...
- Hi, Pop.
- All right, wiseguy, start talking.
- Got you a present.
- Never mind that.
- Why tell everybody I'm getting married?
- I didn't tell anybody.
No, you didn't tell anybody.
- You got flowers, even.
- 29 cents.
I think you and I better have a little talk. Come here.
What are you making such a big deal for?
What do you expect,
Marilyn Monroe to walk in that door?
Some old dried-up tomato, friend of your aunt's.
I mean, what can she look like? Why are you making such a big production?
You said that if you liked her and if I liked her...
I did say that. But you keep acting like Monroe is going to come in the door.
Let me tell you something...
What's so great about Marilyn Monroe?
You're always talking about Marilyn
Monroe. What's so great about her?
Ask me the same question in five or six years, I'll tell you what's great about her.
Oh, that. I know.
- You know what?
- Well, you know.
Listen, I think you know too much.
You're still a little kid, you know.
I'll tell you when to know.
- What is that jazz you got on your head?
- Don't you like it?
- It's terrible. Wash your hair.
- Pop, it's not that bad.
It's pretty bad. Go in and wash your hair.
Thanks, Pop. And be nice to the lady.
Lady!
I always say that...
Yoo-hoo, Mrs Rogers!
I was thinking you couldn't make it.
Hey, Sophie! Please!
Sophie. Sophie. Sophie...
Mario, look who's here.
- I hope she's got insurance.
- Yes, hello.
- She's here. Our paycheck.
- Well, glory be!
Hey, chief. She's here.
Some of them have television sets. He doesn't allow any cooking in the rooms.
He's very strict about that.
It's very nice. So is he.
Tony?
Guess who's here.
- Oh, for goodness sake. Here, take this.
- What'll I do with it?
- Put it someplace.
- Tony? Ally?
You take a look at her and let me know how you like her.
Well, come on. Go on.
Hi.
Come on in, honey, I want you to meet Mrs Rogers. My nephew Ally.
That's his son.
- How do you do, Ally?
- How do you do?
- Well, what are we standing for?
- Yes, let's sit down.
Have a seat. Make yourself comfortable.
Don't sit in that chair.
You'll never get up.
- Here's a nice chair.
- You like this chair?
- This will be fine, thank you.
- Good.
- Somebody interested in science here?
- Yes, that's my book.
- Well, you must be pretty smart.
- Aw...
Pop will be here in a minute.
He's dressing.
- All right.
- I'll take the crazy chair.
Don't be a hero.
You want to break your back?
She's got a terrible back as it is.
Now she wants another doctor bill.
Our son Robert says...
He's a doctor, did you know that?
- Oh, no.
- He finished last year.
Mario set him up in a nice place on Park Avenue.
There's so much sickness in the family he could make a living on that alone.
You know, myself, I got terrible feet.
They hurt me.
My high-class son, you know what he tells me? It's psychofomatic.
My feet are in my head.
Our our other son, Julius, he's in the store with us.
- He's married.
- Julius.
- Mario.
- He's in the store. He sits there.
A customer comes in, he runs in the toilet.
What are you looking?
Big secret, I got a stupid son.
The woman will know anyway, she'll be in the family.
- Mrs Rogers, do you like living here?
- Yes. Yes, I do.
- Pop, it's her.
- Who?
Marilyn Monroe. Hurry up.
I'm gonna flatten you.
What have you got up there, cannibals?
- Where's Tony?
- He's coming.
- Can I get somebody a soda?
- Oh, good, Ally. Come here.
You know, I was just going to ask you.
I've got a bad taste in my mouth.
Must've been that pastrami this morning.
- I had pastrami and eggs.
- You don't need any soda.
Ever seen a woman in your life?
She's in love with plain water.
You got some water?
Oh, sure.
Can I get you something, Mrs Rogers?
All right, then.
You can bring me some water, too.
OK.
Here, wait a minute.
It's all right. Go ahead, Ally.
- Mario. Sophie.
- Hello, Tony.
- I'm sorry I'm late. Is this Mrs Roberts?
- It's Mrs Rogers.
- I'm sorry I'm late. How do you do?
- That's all right. How do you do?
- Tony, I...
- Not now, Mario. Not now.
- Did you meet him yet? My son, Alvin.
- Alvin?!
Oh, come on. He hates that name, Alvin.
What do you got there? Water?
Why didn't you open a bottle of wine?
- They wanted water.
- Is that what you wanted, water?
OK, that's a good idea.
Go get me a water. It's a good idea.
Water's good for you, you know?
Cleans out the blood.
Mrs Rogers. Sophie. There you go, Mario.
Thank you.
- Huh?
- What's the matter?
Well, I don't know...
- Did you go to the beach today?
- Oh, sure, right away.
In 20 years he hasn't been in the water.
Not once.
For me it's no fun. You sit there, get hot.
You go in the water, you get cold.
You call this pleasure?
You used to be so crazy about the Turkish baths.
That's different. You go to the bath, you take your clothes off, meet people.
- Hi.
- Hi.
Hi.
Hi.
He's the oldest member of the family.
Whatever he says goes. Right, Mario?
There we are. Ah, this is fine water.
For $1 million, who did Tommy Burns win the heavyweight championship from?
Pop, not now.
Come on, this is no time to be bashful.
I tell you, Mrs Rogers, this boy is amazing.
If he was on a quiz show, he'd win before the first commercial.
Come on, who did Burns beat for the championship?
- Pop.
- It was Marvin Hart, 20 rounds, wasn't it?
Correct, for one mill... You know boxing?
Tony, you gonna keep talking about fights?
It's late.
Let's get down to business, all right?
- What are you talking about?
- Now, sit down here.
I've got some good news for you.
I called the whole family this morning.
We had a talk.
- Good. Tell me about it later.
- Everybody's gonna chip in a few dollars.
I got this very nice little property in Marion. Very nice little town.
I wouldn't lie to you.
This store is a 100 percent location.
The people in it, a chain store, built a place across the street. My store is empty.
Tell him, Sophie.
Is that a beautiful store?
- For heaven's sakes!
- 30-foot front. Three windows.
Well, anyway, we all decided.
Now, you'll open up a nice little five-and-ten there.
Only one junky little place in the town.
For years, I've been talking about it myself, opening up a five-and-ten there.
Now, you'll both work in the store, you'll watch the pennies and you'll make a very nice living.
You'll love this town very much.
You'll find a nice little house there.
You'll never have to worry.
Now, on our side, we're all gonna chip in and give you $5,000.
And I understand your husband left you a few dollars?
Well...
If you will excuse me, please.
What's the matter? What's the matter?
What'd I do? What'd I say? I don't know.
- Are you crazy? Out of your mind?
- Dummy, what's the matter with you?
Hi.
Hi.
He hasn't got the sense he was born with.
You're old enough to have more...
Me, you call a bum? Me, he calls a bum!
Uncle Mario's a good man, really he is.
He's so good he hurts.
- Like when he pinches my arm.
- You talk about Julius!
Mrs Rogers. Mario, get up out of there.
Go on out and apologise to Mrs Rogers.
I'll handle it myself. Never mind.
Believe me, they all look at me like I did something terrible.
I'm a plain man.
Maybe I said it wrong. Sorry.
- I'm sorry too...
- If I hurt your feelings, I apologise.
Would you like to get a cup of coffee?
- All right, if you want to.
- One second.
If Jerry Marks calls, I'll be at Hoffman's.
He's a nice fella.
He'd make you a very good...
All right, diplomat, knock it off.
Let's get some coffee.
I hope, I hope, I hope.
Well, you're right, Sophie.
She is a nice, quiet little woman.
- What'd I tell you?
- I still think Louie Bendi's cousin...
Sophie.
- Did you think I'd be an old man maybe?
- Oh, no. They told me your age.
- And what else?
- That you have a wonderful son.
- No, no. I mean, you know, how I look.
- She said you're very handsome.
- Like a doctor.
- Some doctor!
Any guy who wears a clean shirt every day is a doctor to my sister-in-law.
What I don't understand though, is... you don't look like a man who would have any trouble meeting a woman.
- What'd you expect, a mouse?
- In a way. If you want to call it that.
Well, how come you showed up, a real looker like you? You like a mouse?
- I mean, I thought you'd be very timid.
- Oh, you like that kind? Timid?
Does there have to be only one type a person likes?
- What, do you like 'em all?
- What's that supposed to mean?
Nothing. I was making conversation.
- Why?
- What do you mean, why?
Just, you know, when you walk, you talk.
Wait a minute!
What are you so touchy about?
- What is it you want from me?
- Did I give you a handful of worms?
- Look, why did you want to meet me?
- Hi, Mrs Rogers.
- Oh, hello, Mendy.
- Hey, Mendy!
- Tony!
- You know him?
Look out for him, Mrs Rogers, he's a tiger.
- Come on in, I'll buy you a coffee.
- I can't. I'm working.
Big deal, so you blow a quarter fare.
Hey, Jerry's in town, you know?
Yeah, I read about it in the papers.
That's the tightest man on the beach.
- Good evening, Fred.
- Mrs Wexler.
- Hi, Miss Wexler.
- Hi, Ally.
- Your mom OK?
- She's fine. I just put her to bed.
- Take it easy. Geronimo.
- I beg your pardon?
- Have a good time.
- Thank you.
- Bye.
- Bye.
- Hi.
- Hi.
Hi, Miss Shirl. You look beautiful.
Big night tonight?
- I don't know. It could be the biggest.
- Oh, how come?
Oh, the monkeys tell no tales in Zamboanga
Oh, the monkeys tell no tales in Zamboanga
Oh, the monkeys tell no tales cos the monkeys, they're all males
And this monkey's on her way to Zamboanga
- Where's Zamboanga?
- Well, who cares?
Ally, Ally, ain't love rotten?
You're too young and I've forgotten
Fly now, pay later!
- Where's his brother Mario?
- Brother Mario, huh?
- Ally, where's Uncle Mario?
- Uh, he's out. They went to dinner, I think.
You call me the minute he comes in.
You hear me?
Yes, ma'am.
Hi.
I just...
This is the kind of weather that drives everybody to California.
Well, come in.
Hey, that's pretty nice, isn't it?
I'm glad you like it.
Two people are a crowd in here.
Well, if we walk sideways like a crab we'll make it.
If you like martinis, there's some in the icebox. I'll just put on an apron.
- Excuse me.
- You want a drink?
Not right now, thanks.
Hey, I ought to get one of these for Ally.
Yeah. Oh, he's a darling boy, but I guess you know that.
Who, the nagger? Oh, what a nag.
He sure is a nice boy.
- You're very lucky.
- Yeah, that's what I am. Some lucky.
Oh, wait. Maybe you'd like an olive.
Here they are.
Hey, your hair is almost the same colour as Ally's.
Oh, yes.
You know what that silly kid does?
Every day, right after school, wham, he's right into the hotel working.
And the funny part of it is he hates the hotel business.
When his mother was still alive, I couldn't get him in the lobby if I dragged him in.
He was out playing ball with the kids in the street, looking as brown as a berry.
Now, I don't know, lately he's beginning to look like he lives under a rock.
He doesn't play any more.
He worries about me.
He's a funny kid, though, you know.
I could beat him up, anything, leave him someplace, and I bet he'd still love me.
- It's kind of scary, huh?
- And you say you're not lucky. Hm.
Excuse me.
You may walk like a crab, but you're sure a lot prettier.
Would you open that bottle?
How do they expect you to do that, use dynamite?
Here.
- What's your system?
- Plenty of hot water.
You ought to patent that.
There we are. Oh!
Oh, I'm sorry. Oh, I'm so sorry.
- I'm so clumsy. I'm sorry.
- It'll dry. It'll dry.
Thanks.
Do you mind if I...?
Oh, of course not.
Oh, you'll have to excuse me.
I may as well tell you, you're the first man in this apartment and I'm as nervous as a schoolgirl.
So silly.
Why don't you bust out once in a while, let off steam?
- I can't.
- Why?
It's so funny.
Last year I decided I'd go someplace where nobody would know me and I'd do just that, so I took one of those cruises, those tours, you know.
There were a lot of men.
They paid a great deal of attention to me.
Oh, it's so silly.
I just got tighter and tenser.
I finally got off and flew home. Oh!
It seems to me you have an acute case of lonelyitis. Ja?
That's what you have. That's from eating alone and from living alone.
The worst part of your day is eating alone. Tell the doctor.
No. You know what the worst part of my day is?
- Nein. What is the worst part?
- Having to order one lamb chop.
Oh, it's so simple.
Order two lamb chops and eat with a man.
Maybe I should tell you the truth.
Should I tell you the truth?
Why not? I'm the doctor.
Well, Doctor...
When Sophie called and said her brother-in-law wanted to marry someone, that's why I went to meet you.
- Why?
- I was so tired of buying one lamb chop.
Wouldn't you think after living alone for two years, I'd be used to it?
But I just can't believe it.
I wake up in the morning.
There's one moment before I'm fully awake when I feel everything is fine.
I know my husband's here and my son and they need me.
Then I realise of course there's nobody here and, worst of all, nobody needs me.
So, anyway, if you would happen to run across anybody who needs me...
- I'll give them your number.
- Thanks, Doctor.
- How about that drink now?
- Oh, I'd love it.
Coming right up.
- They didn't tell me you had a son.
- Yes.
That's him right there.
He'd be just a little older than Ally.
That's his father with him.
That picture was taken just a couple of days before the accident.
- What accident?
- We were camping.
I was in the tent and they were in swimming.
All of a sudden,
I heard a lot of commotion.
I went out to see what was happening. My husband was in deep water with a cramp.
My son swam out to him.
Well, the cold water and the altitude...
Both of them right there in front of my eyes. My whole family.
So, I moved down to Florida and have been walking around in a daze ever since.
I know. It takes a long time.
Did you know my wife was four feet
11 inches? She was the littlest thing.
If she ever saw this apartment, she would flip.
She used to say
"Little nests for little people."
She always said that, may she rest in peace.
She was very religious. Are you religious?
I think so.
I wish I was religious.
She was the sweetest thing you've ever seen.
We used to have a store.
A store! We had a gang of them.
We went bankrupt the first of every month, like clockwork.
That poor girl, she worked like a dog.
It was pretty tough, 12 hours a day.
And what could you hope for?
A car. A little house. A couple of kids.
- Nothing.
- Nothing?
What else is there?
You're a very fine person, Mrs Rogers.
Thank you. You're kind of nice yourself.
There's something I should tell you.
It's one thing to kid some jerk along, but, well, with you it's different.
I couldn't do it to you.
You see, I have a piece of paper in my coat pocket called an eviction notice.
It means they'll kick me out of business unless I can come up with $5,000.
So that's the reason why I said OK to my brother Mario, he should bring you over to meet me, so I could borrow the money off of him.
I don't quite follow you.
Well, I can't blame you, but I'll try to make it clearer.
He wanted me to meet you and I said OK.
Now we've met, I'll tell him that we got along pretty well and we like each other and we're probably gonna get married.
And that he should get the five-and-ten ready.
In the meantime, I have to have a couple of thousand dollars to get along on.
After he gives it to me,
I'll give it to my landlord so he shouldn't kick me out of the hotel.
That way, I'm back in action again.
See what I mean?
That's the kind of guy I am.
I don't want to get married. I never had any intention of getting married.
I had to tell you that because I didn't want to hurt you or kid you along.
I really enjoyed meeting you, Mrs Rogers.
It's really been a pleasure.
Well, where are you going?
I figure I better take a powder.
You don't want me around after that.
Who's going to eat all the groceries?
Mrs Rogers, maybe you didn't understand me, but I needed you for a stooge.
Well, I'm glad somebody finally needs me for something.
You have to stay anyway, because...
You prescribed my medicine, remember?
Eat with man.
I can't understand why some guy didn't snap you up a long time ago, Mrs Rogers.
Eloise.
- Eloise?
- Yes.
- Awful, isn't it?
- Oh, that's a doozy.
We've got to do something about that.
What do you think they're doing now?
Having coffee?
- Oh, thank you, Ally.
- Thanks, Ally.
- Good. That's enough.
- I bet they're having coffee.
- Not Pop.
- Yeah, coffee.
Who's talking to you?
Piece of ice.
The whole world, a piece of ice is a piece of ice.
In Miami it isn't good enough for them.
They gotta make it fancy, put a hole in the middle like a doughnut.
You want a doughnut, buy a doughnut.
You want ice...
How come they make it look like a doughnut?
- That's the trouble with the whole world.
- Don't give yourself a heart attack.
Why don't they leave things alone?
Tony? What happened? Did you have a fight?
- What fight?
- What are you home so early for?
I had a wonderful time.
How can you eat a meal and leave?
Didn't you talk on the sofa?
Look at how these two watch me like a hawk. Can I get out of here, Sophie?
You. I got a surprise for you.
Close your eyes and hold out your hands.
Mm-hm.
- What's your favourite kind of cake?
- Coconut.
- Not coconut. Your favourite.
- That is my favourite.
Are you trying to be funny?
What's your favourite cake?
- Coconut.
- Oh, I'm gonna flatten you.
- What do you want me to say?
- Layer cake.
She asked me what your favourite was.
I said it was layer cake.
- Where'd you get that idea?
- Ever see such a kid?
Did you like her?
Are you gonna see her again?
Please, tell me what happened.
Did you like her? Are you gonna see her again? What happened?
- Life is just a bowl of cherries.
- Why?
- I don't know. I'm no philosopher.
- Please tell me. Do you like her?
First, taste something delicious.
Break off a piece. Go ahead.
Break off a piece, Mario. Taste that.
I never saw anything like it.
She got a little bowl, put a couple things in it. Two minutes, she had a cake.
- Delicious?
- She likes it very sweet.
- It's delicious.
- I don't make it quite so sweet.
Is that delicious?
You, I'm through with altogether.
Coconut cake. You Benedict Arnold.
- Very good, though.
- It's delicious.
I've never felt so good.
I'm proud of myself.
I wanna tell you about her place. A pretty little room about half the size of my car, but the way she's got it fixed up... like a palace.
- I can't tell, Mario. Does he mean it?
- I should drop dead on this spot.
- Now I'm worried.
- Look, I really mean it.
I don't know what's gonna happen, but maybe if I see her some more
I think maybe we'll get married.
- Tony! Oh, Tony!
- Pop!
- How about that?
- I'm very happy.
For the first time in my life,
I'm proud of you.
- Look, he's crying. Look who's crying.
- All of a sudden I cry.
- I appreciate this.
- Who's crying? You're a good boy, Ally.
Tony, this is what I prayed for... a good wife for you and a nice home for Ally.
She talked about you.
For an hour she talked.
But I told her, I said
"Wait till you meet that nag."
Listen, let's dress up and celebrate, huh?
You go change clothes.
Wait, you're going the wrong way.
- I gotta do something.
- What do you gotta do?
I sorta promised I'd light a candle if you and Mrs Ro... Well, you know.
I'll be right back.
Oh, Mario, a candle.
Light a candle. How about this kid?
How can anything go wrong with me with him around?
Come on, Sophie, doll up.
We'll light a million candles.
- Tony!
- You're my sister-in-law.
- Stick around while I change, eh?
- Yeah, I will.
It sounds good to me, for the first time in my life, the idea of having a nice little five-and-ten and a nice little home in a nice little town.
- How long to get the store ready?
- It's ready now.
That's wonderful. We'll take a trip to look the place over. Maybe tomorrow.
Good.
I'll have to ask you to lend me a couple of dollars for, well, transportation and incidentals.
- What do you mean, a couple of dollars?
- A couple of thousand to tide me over.
I gotta have a little petty cash.
Why? So you can give it to Diamond and he won't throw you out of this hotel?
- What are you talking?
- Not this time, Mr Big Shot.
The day you walk into that five-and-ten with your wife, I'll give you a nice cheque.
Mario.
I need the money now.
They're throwing me out tomorrow.
No. No. No.
I knew it. I know him like a book.
Why do I believe him?
- Listen, Mario, let's talk. I need you.
- "Light a candle," the boy says.
- You came down to help me, didn't you?
- For me, no feelings, but for his own son?
- Mario, you're my brother. Help me.
- I believed you.
If I lose the hotel, how am I gonna help the kid?
How? Help him like I helped my children.
Like two billion others have helped their children. They worked.
- Sally, give me ten bucks.
- Five.
- Ten.
- But I ain't been paid in five weeks.
- Life is just a bowl of cherries.
- Well, why do we always get the pits?
Chief, I had 60 bucks stashed away and Sally put five up, and she kicked in ten before she checked out... you know, for the laundry.
What are you doing, taking up a collection for me now?
She? What she?
Miss Shirl. She left a couple of hours ago.
Shirley checked...?
What did she say? Did she leave a message?
Chief! Chief!
What do you want from me, my blood?
Do you want me to crawl on my hands and knees?
I ask you to lend me a couple of bucks.
You expect me to become a five-and-dime character like you?
You expect me to change my way of life?
Be you instead of me?
Not a chance.
Take your big-brother sanctimonious act back to New York and turn blue.
Everybody dressed, Pop?
Be with you in a minute.
- Ally, I want to talk to you.
- Chief! Chief!
I can't go through with it, Ally.
I mean, you think I'm a champ?
Think a champ would marry Mrs Rogers to get a few lousy bucks from your Uncle Mario?
You mean you're not going to get married?
I like her very much. I'm sure she'd make a good mother for you.
But I couldn't do that to this nice woman.
You'd hate me for it.
Ally, pack your things.
Tomorrow, you're coming with us.
- Pop?
- He's not going nowhere.
Don't try to stop me.
I'll go to court if I have to.
You have no money, no home. That's the end of it. Ally's going to live with us.
Excuse me, chief.
Jerry Marks's secretary called.
Jer... What'd he say?
He's having a party at the Fontainebleau and wants you to come over now.
You see that? Did you hear what he said?
Jerry Marks phoned me and wants me to go to his party at the Fontainebleau Hotel.
You wouldn't understand. My kind of people. You'll never even understand me.
You know why?
Because I go on hunches. That's why.
I guarantee I'm gonna have all the money
I need by morning, and without your help.
Wait till he gets a load of my plan here, with the Disney thing.
You know something else? You know that Easy Street that nobody lives on?
I'm gonna wind up owning it, brother Mario.
And you, don't look so unhappy.
Nobody's gonna take you away from me.
Ally...
I know you love your daddy, and that's good.
Listen. You should love him.
But you've got to understand what's best for you.
Aunt Sophie, I like you an awful lot, but, please, I don't want to leave him.
If I had to leave him, I don't know.
I think I'd jump in the ocean, Aunt Sophie.
Good luck, champ!
Oh, Mario, maybe we shouldn't.
He loves him so much.
What do I care, love? Tomorrow he's out on the street, that's what he is.
What's love, anyway? Is it gonna put a roof over his head? Fill up his belly?
- Suppose Tony gets the money tonight?
- Suppose! Suppose it snows in this lobby.
He's a bum. In his life, he never raised a dime except from me.
All right. Don't have a heart attack.
He'll come to me running on his hands and knees. Turn blue?
Hey, Fred. Geronimo!
Geronimo!
Geronimo!
Geronimo!
Geronimo!
I made it.
Cheer up, toots.
Geronimo!
Garden of Eden!
Toots.
They come from everywhere for a Jerry Marks party.
The moniker Mr Fabulous really fits him.
Now, who's that distinguished couple?
It's our mayor and his lovely wife.
Let's give them a big hello.
Howdy, Mayor. And let's see, who's that gentleman following the mayor?
Sorry, I don't recognise him.
- Everybody happy?
- Yes!
Aw, you ain't seen nothing yet.
And now, if you have weak hearts, don't look.
The most beautiful, the most gorgeous, ravishing woman in the whole world.
And here she is, Miss Body Beautiful.
Oh, no.
- Hey, that's Jerry. How about that?
- That's our boss.
- How'd you get in here?
- What do you mean?
I came to see Jerry.
Hey, Jerry, it's Tony. Geronimo!
- Geronimo. Hey, it's Geron...
- It's Tony.
Tony. My pal. Hey, let him in, that's my boy. Come on, let him in.
- Jerry.
- You bubblehead. How are you?
- You're still skinny as a rail, huh?
- I should be fat, like a fat pig like you.
- You musta made that first million.
- No, but it's near.
- Sweetie, you better get dressed.
- Take care of this.
- Mr Marks...
- This is number-five secretary.
Honey, I don't want any calls.
I haven't seen this guy in 100 years.
Hey, you caught me just in time. I gotta go out to the dog track, pictures, publicity.
- What are you doing, vacationing here?
- Jerry!
- Hey, Charlie, how are you?
- All right. Wonderful.
He's a creep.
I can always tell. Sweaty hands.
- What are you doing here?
- I've been living here 11-12 years now.
- What's your racket? Bootlegging?
- Hotel business.
- I just bought a couple of joints myself.
- I read about it. Ten million dollars worth.
I need 'em like I need another foot.
I was broke, so I had to buy something.
- What about Mendy?
- Mendy? He's here, pushing a hack.
You're kidding. Still here?
Well, it's what he always loved.
Hey, you know what we gotta do?
Get together, the three of us.
- I got a picture of the three of us, doing...
- Doing the bit? I gotta have one.
- Sweetie, it's getting late.
- Honey, meet my oldest friend.
We used to sell newspapers together.
Tony, Doreen.
Charmed. We're very late.
You told me to remind you.
- You didn't want to be late and we're late.
- Number one, Hollywood, huh?
- Mr Kelly's still waiting out there.
- I never get five minutes!
Will you do me a favour? Here.
Give him 50 bucks, tell him to buy a cigar.
Happens all the time. I can't turn around, somebody won't knock me up for $50.
Can't keep it from 'em. It's only money. I bet you get the same thing.
- Oh, yeah, sure.
- It's been wonderful. Give me a call...
Jerry, I came over to see you about an idea I got. I think you'll be interested.
Come on, fine.
Tell me about it while I change clothes.
Come on, boys, let's get going here.
Remember all the property south of the beach here?
For years, they did all the business there.
Now all the action's up here.
So here's what I figure.
We buy that property for a song.
- You don't have this trouble, do you?
- No, I don't have that kind of trouble.
I got the figures here.
We could buy for it for a song.
You know what we do after we buy it?
We knock down all the buildings.
We build a Disneyland.
Is that a beautiful idea?
Disney...
- You don't like it?
- Yeah, yeah, I like it. Come on.
We build a Disneyland. Now,
I can't handle it by myself, it's a big tab.
But you, me and a couple of guys put a syndicate together and it's a boat race.
- What do you think?
- What do I think?
Alice, get Walt Disney on the phone for me right away.
- You know Walt...?
- Sweetie, you promised all those people...
You know what happens when we get behind. The whole schedule is tangled.
- Look, tell Alice to cancel the phone call...
- I did.
I don't know what I'd do without her.
Listen, come to the track with me in the car and explain the whole thing to me.
- To the track?
- I haven't seen you in 100 years.
What's so important it can't wait?
You come down to the track, we have a drink, lose a little money, it'll relax you.
I got a couple of things to do.
Suppose I can whip 'em right away.
- Maybe an hour or so?
- Wonderful. That'll be great.
- Sweetie!
- I haven't got any pants on, do you mind?
- It's wonderful. It's been a gas, kid.
- Yeah, me too, Jerry.
In an hour.
- That's great.
- I'll see you later.
A wonderful guy. You weren't listening.
- 500. Take it or leave it.
- Six.
- Five.
- Louse.
These are the entries and the weights of the greyhounds.
- Number one, Princess...
- Hey, Tony!
Hey, buddy. Come on over here.
I'm glad you could make it.
It's good you didn't come with me.
I lost two races.
I think my dog is still running. The rabbit's chasing him. Move over one, honey.
You know all these people? I want you meet my oldest and best buddy, Tony.
Sit down. Take a load off your feet.
I'd introduce you to them, but I don't know one name. Police chiefs, mayors...
What about the next race? Do you know anything about these miserable beasts?
- What do you want to bet on?
- The red one.
- She's got a thing about red dogs. Hey!
- Yes, sir?
- How much you wanna bet, honey?
- Here, $500 on the red one, number...?
- Six.
And here's 500 for me.
Same deal. How about you, Tone?
- Oh, yeah. I'll go 500.
- Attaboy.
It's a gas seeing you. I didn't know you're alive, suddenly here you are.
Hey, Peanuts. Give my buddy a drink.
What are you doing here, vacationing?
- I told you, I'm in the hotel business.
- What's the matter with me?
- You were gonna talk to me about...
- Disneyland.
Right. That sounded like a real good idea.
Here comes Phoebe.
This property down here can be bought for dirt cheap.
- How cheap is dirt cheap?
- About five million.
- Is the race over? Who won?
- Number six!
- What have we got?
- Number six? That's us! That's our dog!
We had her, number six.
- Here is the result of this race.
- Look at the price she's gonna pay!
I bet you it's over 4,000 bucks apiece.
That's a lucky start.
That's what I like, a lucky partner.
- Shall I cash them in for you, sir?
- Yes, please.
- I gotta make a phone call. Be right back.
- If she's a blonde, tell her to come over.
- Hey, boss, is he bothering you?
- Oh, no, no, no. He's my buddy.
Here, go make a bet. Be happy.
Thanks, boss.
- Garden of Eden.
- That you, Ally? I got the money.
You got the money? Where?
From who? How'd you get it?
Never mind. Tell Uncle Mario. Call Abe and tell him he can come and get it.
- Oh, boy, Pop.
- I told you our luck would change.
And that ain't all, kid.
When I get home, I'll give you the big one.
You're a doll.
- Yahoo!
- Hey, Sally. Hey, Sally.
- Uncle Mario. Uncle Mario.
- Come in.
- Pop just called. He's got the money.
- He's got the money?
- Didn't I tell you he was a champ?
- How could he get it? From a stranger?
I don't know. He just said for me to tell you and to call Mr Diamond to come over.
Boy, we're gonna celebrate. Fred!
Hurry up, we're gonna give a party.
- Give a party? Yippee.
- Buy some food.
- I'll use the laundry money.
- Invite all the guests.
I'll call Mr Diamond.
Boy, I'll invite Mrs Rogers. Hurry up.
The decorations are in the basement.
How can he do this to me? I came down here to help him. I'm his brother.
- I should think you'd be glad he got it.
- What, from a stranger?
Oh, for heaven's sakes, Mario.
Take your bicarbonate. Honestly!
They'll build their own exhibits.
You got a thousand angles going.
Here you are, sir.
Look at all that cabbage.
There must be 5,000 bucks apiece here.
- What's the next race there, kid?
- Look at this dog. Lucky Ally.
I got a kid named Ally. I got a little boy.
- No kidding?
- What a hunch bet this is! Lucky Ally.
I tell you, when I get hot, I really get hot.
I'm red hot. Everything's coming my way.
- What do you say, kid? Let it ride?
- Sure, let it ride.
OK, take the bundle and let it ride on number five. Lucky Ally, right?
The whole bundle, here you are.
Wait a minute. Tony, is that OK with you?
- OK, sure.
- Are you sure you can afford it?
- You kidding? It's only money.
- That's what I like to hear.
- Sweetie, we have to leave after this race.
- Is that all you can say, "We gotta leave"?
Can we go someplace to discuss this proposition?
Yeah, sure. Let's go in the bar, over a couple of drinks...
Spend a little time with your other guests.
You're supposed to arrange with Mr Courtney about Acapulco.
Just give me a minute. I'll be right back.
Mr Courtney, sorry I haven't had a chance...
Here you are, sir.
Let me have one more and I'll never ask for anything again.
Here comes Speedy.
Come on, Ally. Stay up there, boy.
Don't quit now. Stay up there.
Don't run out of gas. Go for it.
We need you. Stay up there, boy.
Keep going, boy. Come on, Ally.
Stay up there.
Don't quit. Keep going, boy.
Come on, Ally, stay up there.
Don't quit. Don't quit...
It's only money, huh, meatball?
All right, honey, all right. Folks,
I gotta run, never have a minute to myself.
Lou, if you get to London, give me a call.
I'll leave it up to you, right?
Tony, it's been swell.
Wonderful to see you.
I'll be back this time next year.
We'll spend an evening together.
- Sweetie, come on.
- Wait a minute.
Listen, give Mendy my best, will you?
Here is the result of this race...
- What about the deal?
- What deal?
The Disneyland.
Oh, I wish you luck on that.
That's a real interesting idea.
- Wait a minute.
- Easy, boy.
- What, were you kidding me?
- The car is waiting.
- What's your problem?
- We were gonna go in this together.
First of all, take your sweaty hands off my sleeve.
Thank you. Now, what were we talking about? Disneyland?
Oh, yeah, that's a great idea. For Disney.
Wait a minute. What was all that baloney about getting Disney on the telephone?
- Sweetie, are you coming or not?
- Just a minute.
Listen, kiddie, never try to promote a promoter. You haven't got the knack for it.
But what am I gonna do? Throw you out?
You're my buddy. I like you.
I want you to level with me. You need some dough? Go buy yourself a cigar.
Easy, easy. That's my buddy there.
See you around, buddy.
Get ready, everybody. He's coming.
That's enough, Mario.
You know how sick you get.
We gotta to celebrate. The champ!
He doesn't need his brother any more.
For he's a jolly good fellow
For he's a jolly good fellow
For he's a jolly good fellow
Which nobody can deny
Which nobody can deny
Which nobody can deny
For he's a jolly good fellow...
What's the matter, Pop?
Nothing, Ally. Where's Uncle Mario?
Jolly good fellow? Jolly good bum.
Come in.
Well, come in, come in. The champ.
Blow the bugle. He wants to brag how he got it. He wants us to turn blue again.
- Oh, Mario.
- All your life I took care of you.
Paid your loans, your operations, your debts. Now you go to somebody else?
A perfect stranger.
You do this to your brother?
You know what Mama and Papa would say?
Who do you think you are? God?
Look at him.
Come on, Tony, sit down.
Tell us. What's the matter?
I lost the money and I lost the car.
I haven't got a dime.
Same old Tony.
Did you meet up with a tramp?
Oh, Mario, stop it.
Tony, what is it?
Sophie, Mario, I was wondering if...
Well, would you take Ally to live with you?
Ally? But he don't want to go with us.
I don't care what he wants.
And don't put me through a wringer,
Sophie. Not you.
You're absolutely right, Mario.
I'm nothing but a bum.
Never have been anything but a bum.
I had the money right in my hand.
Then I blew it to impress a guy who knows me like a book.
Like you know me. Like everybody else knows me, except me.
A cheap, chiselling, conniving bum.
I don't want Ally to be like that.
So take him with you.
What do you mean, you're a bum?
How can you be? You're my brother.
I can call you a bum. I can kill you.
You're so crazy, you're dri...
All right, so I make conditions when I help you. Why? So you can be somebody.
But I always help you, don't I? You're not a bum. Nobody in the family is a bum.
Mama and Papa, when they came here, what did they have?
Rags on their backs.
But they worked hard. They made good.
You're part of them.
You're part of me, you no-good...
Why don't you stop being so crazy?
Mario, my foot is down. You go right out there and pay Diamond the rent.
- Just throwing money down the drain.
- Well, what are you saving it for?
- Who you gonna leave it to? Julius?
- Julius...?
I said never again.
All right.
A little boy belongs with his papa.
You'll keep this place here.
You didn't hear me. I don't want handouts.
You need money, don't you? But a cheque, not to you, only to Diamond.
Maybe he'll come down a little.
If you mention money again, I swear I'll...
I'm sorry, Mario.
Listen, I know what you've been to me.
Like a father, since I was a kid.
- Just do me one more favour.
- I got the chequebook in my hand.
Not that.
I want you to take Ally to live with you.
He's not like me. He's a good kid.
He needs a chance.
I won't go. I won't go.
You can't make me go.
Come here, son.
I think we better talk this over like a couple of men.
I'm broke. I lost all the money.
- I can't even feed you.
- I don't care.
But tomorrow we may not even have a place to sleep.
I don't care where we sleep.
Listen, I'm going on the road anyway.
You know me, I'm the champ.
I bounce back like that, right?
So go to New York and live with them.
If you don't like it, I'll put you in a military school where you can wear those hats with a strap under the chin and look like a big general.
No, Pop, I don't wanna be a general.
I wanna be with you. You promised.
Please, Pop, don't send me away.
They don't need me. You need me.
Where'd you get the idea I need you?
I need you like I need a hole in the head.
How can I operate with you around?
I lost Shirl. I lost the hotel. I'm broke.
Only because I had you on my back all the time.
That's why I couldn't operate.
So you go in there and pack your clothes.
I don't want you around anymore.
- Did you hear what I said?
- OK, I'll go.
But not with them.
Champ.
- Wait a minute, where you going?
- What do you care?
You listen to me. Do as I say.
Go with Uncle Mario.
No.
Ally, he's a little boy at 41 years old and you're a grown man at 11.
But he loves you, Ally.
He really, truly loves you.
I'll never speak to him again as long as I live.
You crazy roughneck bum.
Fred, I'll miss you.
- Geronimo.
- Geronimo.
It was sweet of you to come and say goodbye, Mrs Rogers. I really mean it.
Goodbye, Mrs Rogers.
It was very nice meeting you.
Goodbye, Ally.
You cry if you want to.
Come on, now, Ally. Get in the cab.
Mario! Where is he?
You're gonna like it in New York.
We'll give you everything.
Ally, please don't worry.
Yeah, don't worry, Ally.
We'll give you everything.
Fine. Great.
Who's worried about my brother?
- He didn't even say goodbye.
- Goodbye to what? Did you see him?
Tony, my big-shot brother, standing behind the tree, watching his son leave him.
What's gonna happen to him?
Pop! Pop!
Pop! Pop!
Pop!
Pop! No, Pop. Pop!
Pop, no! Pop!
Pop!
Pop!
No, Pop, please!
Please, Pop, don't make me go.
I won't be a nag.
You won't even know I'm around.
Please, Pop, don't make me go, please.
Please, Pop.
For $1 million. First light heavyweight to hold three crowns?
- For $1 million?
- For $1 million.
- Greta Garbo.
- That's corr... Why, you!
- What are they doing?
- How would you know?
Did you play with your sons one day in your life?
Play with who, Julius?
Save me, Mrs Rogers, save me.
Hey, I've got an idea. I just happen to have three lamb chops at home.
- How about it?
- You got yourself a deal, Eloise.
- Eloise?
- Oh, shut up, nag.
You know that property for a Disneyland?
It's right there. Buy it for a song.
- For he's got...
- High hopes...
The poor things, they're so happy and so poor.
No, Sophie. Broke, yes, but they're not poor. We're poor.
Come on, you'll cry later.
The meter's running.
The meter's running, so what?
What do I care?
I could buy you and a hundred meters.
- Let's take a vacation.
- A vacation? What about the store?
Julius is in the store.
- We haven't had a vacation for ten years!
- Oh, Tony! Wait for us, will you?
Geronimo! Tony!
Oops, there goes another problem
Kerplop
Oops, there goes another problem, kerplop
Oops, there goes another problem
Kerplop
Kerplop!
We were sailing along
On Moonlight Bay
We could hear the voices ringing
They seemed to say
Wish we could stay
You have stolen her heart
What a romance it's going to be
Now don't go away
Nobody here but you and me
As We sang love's old sweet song
On Moonlight Bay
We were sailing along
On Moonlight Bay
We could hear the voices ringing
They seemed to say
You have stolen her heart
Now don't go away
As We sang love's old sweet song
On Moonlight Bay
As We sang love's old sweet song
On Moonlight Bay
On Moonlight Bay
Hello. What's your name?
I guess we're going to be neighbors.
Hello, Max.
How do you like our new house?
Alice?
- Alice?
- Here I am.
Where?
I'm in here, George.
Oh, hello. Well, how you getting along?
George Wadsworth Winfield, how could you do this to us?
- Do what?
- Well, it's too big.
There are too many rooms. Nothing fits.
Now, Alice, that's no tone of voice for the fortunate wife of the man who just bought this mansion.
Please, George, it's been a very trying day.
The drapes are too short.
The rugs are too small.
I can't find a place for the piano anywhere.
You're just tired. Believe me, honey, once everything is arranged, this will be just the kind of a house we've always dreamed of.
You've always dreamed of.
- Well...
- And, as far as I'm concerned, you can stick that sign back on the lawn and sell the house.
Now, honey, you're just upset. it's all very simple.
When you get the carpets down, put the piano over there, a few pictures on the wall...
Who is that boy?
A neighbor's child.
He lives across the street.
Well, he makes me nervous.
We were all so happy and comfortable in the other place.
You have to move us here where we're practically foreigners.
Well, it's only a mile and a half from the old house, and I didn't notice us crossing any frontiers on the way.
A mile and a half closer to your bank.
Of course, I don't mind for myself leaving behind the friends
I made over 20 years, but I don't see how you could do this to your own children.
I'm doing it for the children.
I thought if we moved to a refined neighborhood, some of it might rub off on them.
- George!
- Well, it's true.
I'd like my daughter to become a wife, not a second baseman.
Where is she?
Marjie? Marjie?
There, you see what I mean?
Marjie, put that chair down!
Good gracious, haven't you got enough muscles?
I was just trying to keep busy, so I wouldn't have to think about what you've done to us.
You, too?
Well, all the kids I know live all the way on the other side of town, Papa.
- See?
- Yeah, kids.
I thought if we moved here, you might meet some nice, refined young man. Maybe get married.
Papa, you're so old-fashioned.
- What's the matter with him?
- Max don't like this house.
Well, you don't say.
He's been hunting all morning and he can't find any rats.
Well, we'll have some installed.
George, don't be so obstinate.
Why can't we move back?
I'm dead.
Mr. Winfield, that kitchen's too big.
Another country heard from.
I'm telling you, it must be 30 feet from the stove to the cupboard.
I'm being paid to be a cook, not a cross-country runner.
Stella, bring me some hot coffee.
Okay, but it'll be cold by the time I hike back.
That youngster is certainly curious.
Wesley, did you notice the neighbor's boy?
He's just your age.
I hate him.
You haven't even met him.
Now, go on out and be friendly.
No.
Wesley. Be friendly!
Come on, Max.
My old man has a real gun.
- He has not.
- He has, too.
Anyways, I bet it's a popgun.
It's only the gun that Jesse James used to hold up a train with, that's all.
- Jesse James?
- Yeah.
- You're fooling me.
- I am not.
Has he really got it?
He keeps it in a trunk in the attic. it's got a kick like a cannon.
It'll knock you flat on your back.
Well, how about getting it and letting me shoot it, huh?
Well, come on, how about it?
Well...
- All right. Come on.
- Come on, Max.
Well, that's fine.
Everything's off to a good start.
Strike!
- Strike!
- Hey, fellas, he's hurt!
- Hey, help me get him up!
- Well, that ends the game, I guess.
Hey, you need somebody to take his place?
- Hey, it's a girl!
- No girls in the game.
Oh, let her play. We'll have some fun.
We don't want any girls.
The game's ruined anyway.
We might as well, I guess. Here!
- Thanks, sport.
- Let's see you hit something now.
Come on, gang!
Let's see you slug it out.
Here's the one.
That's it!
Hey! That's it!
Grab your second!
- Come on!
- Come on, get over to second.
All right, now, come on, boys! Come on!
Let's go for it, boys! Bring her in!
Shorten the windup, sonny,
I'm going home.
Safe!
- Hey, that was good!
- Great!
Let's see her.
Oh, I'm up.
I dare you to shoot her.
Not out here. it'll make too much noise.
- Well, let's go in the barn.
- Okay.
She won't pull.
- Bet I can pull it.
- Well, all right, you try her, then.
Well...
Wesley! What are you doing with that gun?
Why, you could kill somebody with this thing.
Watch it! it's cocked.
You don't have to tell me.
I'm going to fix that right now!
Jim, Mother wants you!
All right, all right. Come on.
I know you're around here somewhere.
Imagine leaving a thing like this around where children can get their hands on it.
Marjie, be careful!
Wesley! You keep your hands off of this gun!
Jim!
Look.
It's my brother. He's dead.
It might be better for you if I were.
I'm gonna teach you kids a lesson.
Run, Marjorie! Come on!
Give me that gun, you little brat.
Come here!
- Mr. Winfield?
- Yes?
- I'm William Sherman.
- Who?
I met your daughter in the barn.
Oh, yes, yes.
We've been expecting you. Come in.
Thank you, sir.
Wesley, will you tell Marjorie she has a visitor?
I guess she knows it.
She's been watching out the window for the last half-hour.
Won't you step into the living room?
She'll be right down.
Thank you.
Not bad.
- Marjie, will you stop fidgeting?
- I can't wait, Mother.
You want that young man to know that you've never had on a party dress before?
And, another thing, try not to walk like a first baseman.
- I won't. Can I look now?
- Yes, now.
Oh, Mother! Mother, I'm beautiful!
I know, dear.
Isn't it pretty?
- What's the matter?
- Sometimes, nature needs a little help.
- Oh, Mother.
- All's fair in love and war.
Hello, William.
Good evening, Marjorie.
- Mother, this is Mr. Sherman.
- Good evening, Mr. Sherman.
How do you do, Mrs. Winfield?
These are for you.
Oh, they're lovely.
Thank you very much.
Well?
Well, I guess, we'd better be going.
- Yes, have a good time.
- We will.
Thank you.
Oh, your hat.
- Thank you.
- Night.
- I'll just put these in water.
- Thanks. Good night.
- Good night.
- Good night, sir.
Is that our daughter?
It's amazing what a little paint and powder will do.
Yes, isn't it?
It's no use. I've told her 1,000 times, a gentleman always walks on the outside.
I hope he doesn't try to dance with her.
He's liable to get spiked.
The University of Indiana. I'm a senior.
It must be wonderful.
It's a farce.
All the fellas are interested in is playing football and baseball.
And women.
Women and more women.
Can you think of a bigger waste of time?
What's wrong with baseball?
Baseball? it's the national insanity.
At a time like this, when civilization is crumbling beneath our feet, our generation is playing baseball and singing songs like...
"We were sailing along
"on Moonlight Bay." isn't that silly?
I rather liked it.
You heard the rest of it?
You have stolen her heart
"Now, don't go away."
As We sang love's old sweet song
On Moonlight Bay
That must have been written by a man with a glass of beer in one hand and a rhyming dictionary in the other.
I think it's beautiful.
- Maybe we'd better dance, huh?
- Dance?
All right.
Tickets, five cents each, please.
Five cents each?
You have to buy happiness these days.
Shall we dance?
William, that's one of these new dances that I don't know.
- Well, this is just a two-step.
- That's the one.
You leave everything to me.
I guess I thought you were a southpaw.
I mean left-handed.
Excuse me, miss. I think you dropped this.
- I did?
- Yes.
Would you excuse me?
Pardon me, your girl dropped this.
...even better with your eyesight.
Flyball is a game of accuracy.
Hiya! Hiya! Hiya! Step right up, folks.
Everyone wins at Sunny Jim's, the most popular game on the midway!
Won't you come back for just one more dance, please?
William, I just want to go home.
I shouldn't have come in the first place.
It was all a horrible mistake.
Step right up, folks. it's an honest game.
You hear that? Come on, I'll win you a doll.
I love to lose, folks.
I'm really a retired millionaire.
And this is how I wile away the idle hours.
Here you are, son. Three balls for a nickel.
All I have to do is knock the bottles down?
Knock them off the shelf, you win a coupon.
A coupon? Well, how do you win the doll?
Three coupons and it's all yours.
So simple a child could do it.
People win it everyday.
Can't keep them on the shelves.
Well, here goes.
That's one coupon.
I'm sorry, son.
You weren't paying attention.
I said, "Off the table."
All right.
Well, well, well, the first loser today.
You've got lead in the bottom of those bottles.
Twenty-twenty vision, eh, son?
Step right up, folks.
Everybody wins at Sunny Jim's.
He's a fake. Just like everything else in this world.
- Let's go.
- Just a minute, friend.
Just to show you my heart's in the right place,
I'll tell you what I'm going to do.
I'll give three chances, absolutely free, to the young lady.
- Oh, no, I...
- it's free.
Free! Free to the young lady!
Go ahead, Marjorie, it's probably the first thing he has ever given away.
It's an honest game.
- It is an honest game!
- I won the doll.
Well, the young lady proved it can be done.
Too bad she wasn't paying for her turn.
Now, wait a minute, what about that doll?
Come on, William, let's go home.
No! I'm not leaving here till I get that doll.
Now, listen, move along, son.
You had your turn and you lost.
The young lady had a couple of practice shots. That's all.
All right, here they are, folks.
Step right up there. Three for...
I don't like grafters or cheats in high places or low.
Look, there's a soapbox around the corner, kid. Beat it, will you?
We let men like you get away with little things.
And before we know it, you've taken away our lives, our liberty and our property.
Why, in you runs the blood of Genghis Khan and Attila the Hun!
When did they let you out, kid?
Here you are, friends, three for five.
Who's gonna have...
I'm not a man who believes in force, but your type should be strung up to the nearest lamppost by the free men of the world before it's too late!
Here, take the doll and leave me alone!
All right, step right up, folks!
You hear? Everybody wins at Sunny Jim's!
I tell you...
William, I had a wonderful time.
So did I, Marjorie, and to think we might never have met if you hadn't taken a shot at me.
Don't joke about that.
Why, I might have killed you.
What's one life more or less when all of Europe's bathed in blood?
Won't you come in and have a nice cool glass of buttermilk?
Yeah. I guess I'd like that.
- Marjorie?
- Yes, William?
In all fairness,
I've got to tell you something.
What?
I don't believe in marriage.
But I just asked you in for some buttermilk.
Well, I didn't want to drink it under false pretenses.
Well, my goodness!
Maybe I don't believe in marriage, either.
Now, please, don't be angry, Marjorie. it's nothing personal. it's just that...
Well, I think that marriage is slavery for the woman and prison for the man.
I think that if two people are truly in love, they needn't be bound by convention.
Well, my goodness! So do I.
- Marjorie, I...
- Yes, William?
What happened?
That's the new power plant.
It breaks down regularly. Every night.
Oh, my. How long do the lights stay off?
Sometimes for hours.
Maybe I better light a match.
Well, I guess you better show me to the door.
Yes. I guess I better.
Marjorie, I'd like to call on you again.
- When?
- Would tomorrow morning be too soon?
Oh, no.
I guess you better light another match.
Marjorie, I think you're the most beautiful and the most feminine girl I've ever met.
Thank you, William. Thank you very much.
Well, good night.
Good night.
I guess you better light another match.
I don't have any more.
We don't really have any buttermilk, either.
Doesn't he ever go home?
Alice, can't you get her in here to finish her lunch?
Let her be, George.
I never thought I'd see the day.
She's sitting cow-eyed in the swing and he's playing records for her.
I'll have to ask that young man his intentions.
Oh, George.
I'll do it very discreetly, but it has to be done.
Marjorie's young and very inexperienced.
All she knows about men is their batting averages.
In case you're interested, this one's batting a thousand.
- Let's play the other side, huh, William?
- All right, Marjorie.
- Cuddle Up a Little Closer?
- Yeah, I like that.
It's Wesley. The lattice at the front of the porch is loose and he crawls under and comes out all bugs.
Wesley, you come out of there right now!
I said come out of there!
What are you trying to do?
Choke a person to death?
I may have to sit here for the next half-hour just trying to catch my breath.
Here, Wesley, maybe this'll make you breathe a little easier.
Gee, thanks! I feel fine now!
I'm not interrupting anything, am I?
Why, Father,
I thought you'd gone back to town.
No, I thought I'd like to have a little talk with William before he leaves for college and his studies of... Law?
- No, sir, not law.
- Then it must be medicine.
Well, a doctor these days can support a wife and a family very nicely.
Father.
- I major in English literature.
- Oh, I see.
Well, we can find something else for you.
What do you think of banking?
Well, frankly, sir, I feel that every bank in the country should be blown up.
Tea? Would anyone care for some tea?
Iced tea, Father?
What did you say, young man?
Well, I didn't mean it literally, sir.
It's just that every thinking person knows that banks are completely unproductive and unnecessary.
Why, they're parasites on society.
I'd like some tea. Wouldn't you, William?
Unnecessary and unproductive?
- And, I can prove it.
- Oh, you can?
- Yes, sir, I can.
- Lemon or cream?
Do you have some money?
Yes.
Fine. A five-dollar bill.
This is the commodity in which the banks deal. Money, the root of all evil.
Now, suppose it were all destroyed.
Has anything really been lost?
Is there any less clothing, less food, less love in the world now?
Young man...
William, Father is vice president of the First National Bank!
Holy cow! Did I do this?
Marjorie, get in the house!
Father, it's nothing serious. it's just something they teach William at college.
Well, until they teach him how to support a wife,
I suggest you find yourself another young man.
Seems to me a person wouldn't sing so loud in the morning when they know another person's got a sick headache.
Seems to me a person always gets a sick headache on school days.
Well, you wouldn't care if I went to the hospital and had to be operated on, I suppose.
How many times do I have to call you?
Miss Marjorie, your breakfast is ready.
All right, Stella.
I just want to finish this letter.
Finish it later.
We're not serving  Ia carte, you know.
All right.
You, too. You're gonna be late for school.
You eat every bit of that cereal.
You're a growing boy and you need it.
I hate it!
Stella, dust off the piano.
Hubert Wakely is coming to call again.
Men have been buzzing around here like flies ever since you gave up baseball.
This place is beginning to look like the YMCA on a rainy afternoon.
Your father seems to think very highly of Mr. Wakely.
Why wouldn't he?
Hubert is steady, reliable, has a fine job teaching music and he's just as stuffy as Father.
- Marjie!
- Well, he is.
Hey, Wesley!
- I got to go.
- You haven't finished your breakfast.
You wouldn't want me to be late for school, would you?
Excuse me.
I wonder what you get for manslaughter in this state.
Hi, Jim.
- You got your letter?
- What letter's that?
You know what old Miss Stevens said.
"A model letter to a friend on a subject of general interest."
Oh, no.
Well, she'll only keep you in after school two or three hours, I guess.
Oh, no, she won't. I just remembered.
I got a letter all written out!
Wait for me, Jim! I'll be right out.
Excuse me.
Stella!
Now, children, it is time for English composition.
I know how hard you all must have worked on your letters for this morning, so I have a little surprise for you.
I'm going to let you read some of them aloud before you hand them in.
Now, won't that be nice?
- Cora Claypool, you may read yours.
- Yes, ma'am!
"Dear Cousin Sadie,
I thought I would write you today
"on some subject of general interest, and so I thought
"l would tell you about the subject of our courthouse.
"it is a very fine building situated in the center of the city,
"and a visit to the building after school well repays for the visit.
"Upon entrance, we find upon our left the office of the county clerk,
"and upon our right, a number of windows affording a view of the street.
"And so we proceed, finding on both sides much of general interest.
"The building was begun in 1886 A.D.,
"and it was through in 1887 A.D.
"it is four stories high and made of stone, pressed brick, wood and tiles
"with a tower, or cupola,
127' 7" from the ground.
"Among subjects of general interest told by the janitor,
"we learned that this architect of the building was a man named Flanner
"and the foundation..."
Wesley Winfield, you may read your letter.
- Ma'am?
- You may read your letter.
Yes, ma'am.
- Have you prepared one?
- Yes, ma'am.
But you're going to find out that you forgot to bring it, aren't you?
No, ma'am, I got it.
Well! We'll listen to what you found time to prepare.
For once.
"Dear friend, you call me beautiful but I am really not beautiful,
"and, at times, I doubt if I am even pretty.
Though my hair may be beautiful
"and even if it is true that my eyes are like the blue stars in heaven..."
Go on.
Oh, no.
Proceed.
"A tremor thrills my being when I recall
"your last words to me that last...
"That last..."
Go on.
"That last evening in the moonlight
"when you... You..."
Wesley, you will go on.
And you will stop that stammering.
"You kissed my shoulder
"and said that you would like to love me forever and ever and..."
Wesley.
"And that if you believed in marriage,
"you would want me to.
Yours Respectfully, Wesley Winfield."
May I leave the room?
Bring me that letter.
You will sit there until no more
"treemors" thrill your being.
That was wonderful, Hubert!
Just wonderful!
You must come again soon.
I'm in no hurry, princess.
As Shakespeare once said,
"if music be the food of love, play on."
Did Shakespeare say that?
Yes, princess. I have an idea.
Let's sing something together.
I would like to very much, Hubert, but I have an appointment at the dentist.
Hey, Wesley! How's your beautiful hair?
Wesley.
You stay out of the living room.
Your sister is entertaining a caller.
Is he telling her her eyes are like the blue stars in heaven?
Now, where did you pick that up?
I've been around.
Well, just the same, you stay out of that living room.
I'll get even on that Marjorie.
Well, why don't you get even on her, then?
All right, I will get even on her.
Miss Winfield, would you care for another apple?
No, thanks. Hubert, really, I...
Miss Winfield, when I look into your eyes,
I recall those immortal words of Tennyson...
Anybody seen Max?
- Who?
- Max, my dog.
You seen him around here anywhere?
We haven't seen him.
That's funny. Well, I guess, there's no use looking for him.
He isn't anywheres around.
Guess I'll sit down.
Kind of tired of standing up anyway.
Wesley, I just remembered,
I was looking out of the window a minute ago, and I saw a dog run across the street and turn the corner.
Little or big?
Max is a little dog. Of course, if it was a little dog, it must have been Max.
It was little. It was a little bit of a dog.
No, couldn't have been Max.
Max, he's kind of a middle-sized dog.
- By George!
- Do you have to go, Hubert?
No, no, it isn't that, but, by the way, it seems a pity to be missing the fine weather.
I wonder if I could persuade you to take a little walk.
No, Hubert, really, I...
One can talk better out in the open, don't you think?
All right. I have to get my hat.
I'll get mine, too.
Ready, Hubert?
Yes, but better hurry.
I think We've given him the slip.
What kept you?
Oh, no.
My, it's a brisk day, isn't it?
It's lovely.
I believe this is our first walk together.
Oh, is it?
Do you like walking fast?
Oh, yes. You set the pace.
I think I can keep up with you.
Say, what's the rush?
We going to a fire or something?
Your dog is going home.
Don't you think you should look after him?
Why worry about him?
He's smarter than we are.
Miss Winfield, keep your head up and breathe through your nose.
Is that how it's done?
Hubert, I really enjoyed that little Walk, didn't you?
Won't you come in?
No, I think I'd better go home.
Home? What's the matter?
You tired or something?
Come on!
Let's go around the block again, huh?
Would you like to, Hubert?
- Good night.
- Good night.
Middle-sized.
You're an angel.
One, two, three. Waltz, two, three.
One, two, three. Waltz, two, three.
Dip, two, three. Dip, two, three.
Dip, two, three. Dip, two, three.
One, two, glide. One, two, glide.
One, two, glide. One, two, glide.
One, two, three. Waltz, two, three.
One, two, three. Waltz, two, three.
One, two, three. One, two...
My dear Mr. Winfield, young gentlemen in society do not scratch their backs when they are dancing with a young lady.
Nobody else is itching. I do not itch.
I cannot continue with the dance if you must itch.
In heaven's name, why must you always itch?
Piano, please.
Now, everybody, take a deep breath. Inhale.
One, two, three. One, two, three.
One, two, three. One, two, three.
One, two, three.
One, two, three. One, two, three.
One, two, three. One, two, three.
One, two, three. One, two, three.
One, two, three. One, two, three.
One, two, three. One, two, three.
Class dismissed.
- Come on, Marjorie.
- Wesley, you hurry on home now.
Why? Aren't you coming?
Wesley, I have to stay here and talk to Professor Barson about something.
Again?
Now, you go on. I'll be home later.
Professor, I'm all ready now.
Marjie, you must love that boy very much to come here every Friday for a month to dance with an old man.
- Am I doing any better?
- Much better.
- Well, what's left for today?
- The turkey trot!
The turkey trot.
Such a dance I don't blame you for wanting to learn in secret.
Better I teach you a beautiful schottische or Viennese waltz.
But, Professor, nobody waltzes anymore.
And if I'm asking a young man to come all the way from college to take me to the charity ball,
I want to be sure that I can dance whatever the orchestra plays.
Such dances they play now.
The grizzly bear! The bunny hug!
The kangaroo dip!
Am I a dance teacher or an animal trainer?
Oh, all right!
Adolf, you should excuse the expression, the turkey trot.
You start with your right foot.
Glide.
Glide.
Yay, Marjorie! One, two, three, glide.
One, two, three, glide.
Old Marjie can't find no dancing partner.
Come on, hit her.
Yay, Marjorie! One, two, three, glide.
One, two, three, glide.
My leg. Oh, my leg.
But, Marjorie, you haven't given me one sensible reason.
Quiet, fellas. Long distance.
But why don't you want me to come?
You're not going with anybody else, are you?
Oh, no, William.
It's just that I don't feel like dancing with anyone while all of Europe is in flames.
W/1at's Europe got to do with us?
Anyway, it's a charity ball.
It's for war relief, so you don't have to feel guilty.
I'll be there Christmas Eve.
Gosh, Marjorie, after all the trouble I went to to square things with your father.
But I just don't think it's right, William, with poor little Belgium and all, and...
So you might as well stay where you are, because I'm not going to dance with anybody. Goodbye.
- Give me your arm.
- Will you please hold still?
- Now, where's his head?
- Give me your arm.
- You're not trying, Wesley.
- I am!
Will you please hold still and put your arm through here?
Tie it up nice and tight, Marjie.
Just wait one second.
It's going to belong enough.
Hey, you're choking me.
I will in a minute if you don't hold still.
Now, turn around for Mother.
What are you trying to do?
Stab a person to death?
Just stand still, Wesley.
Well, hurry up.
I want to go to the picture show.
You wait until we get this fitted, and then you can take it off and go to your picture show.
What kind of thing you got on me?
Exactly what all the other children in Hubert Wakely's group of little Christmas carolers will be wearing.
Well, let old Wakely stand out in the snow and sing Christmas carols, not me.
- Here's Mr. Wesley's wings.
- Oh, they're fine, Stella.
Yeah. Careful, the gluing's still wet.
Look. They just fit.
There.
Now, hold real still.
I don't know.
Seems almost a sacrilege, dressing Wesley as an angel.
Somehow, I think he'd look more natural with horns and a tail.
Stella. He looks wonderful in this.
There's something almost spiritual about him.
Oh, it is. it's a beautiful costume.
Look, Mother.
You'd never know it was our Wesley.
Darling, you're the picture of angelic beauty.
Come on. Take a look at yourself.
Marjorie's old petticoat!
You've got me in Marjorie's old petticoat!
No one will recognize...
Well, everybody in town will know it's Marjorie's old petticoat.
- You can't make me wear it.
- Oh, Wesley.
Stop yelling, "Marjorie's old petticoat."
Do you want all the neighbors to hear it?
Marjorie's old petticoat! I won't wear it!
- Wait. Your wings!
- Grab him.
Close the door.
- Throw some water on him! Get him!
- I'll get him. I'll get him.
- I'll get him! I'll get him! I got him!
- No!
I wouldn't be an angel if you kill me.
Wesley, you've broken your wings.
Stella, see if you can find his halo.
Halo? How about a straightjacket?
Now do you know the difference between a proper and an improper fraction?
Sometimes.
Wesley, if you don't pay attention, you'll never learn.
Wesley Winfield, you come down here this instant.
You hear me?
Come down here. Come down here right...
If you don't come down, I'll get you down.
Wesley! Wesley. Wesley Winfield.
Wesley. Wesley Winfield.
Wesley Winfield!
Oh, my goodness. Can't you keep still for a minute, you old crow?
What did you say?
What did you say?
What did I say?
You know very well what you said.
Now, stand up.
March.
Wesley, what excuse do you have to offer before I report your case to the principal?
Well, I was just thinking.
That won't do, Wesley Winfield.
If that is your only excuse,
I shall report your case this instant.
- Now, come with me.
- Well, I have got an excuse.
Well, what is it?
Well, it's 'cause
I didn't get any sleep last night.
Were you ill?
No, ma'am. It wasn't illness.
It was lots worse than being sick.
- It was... It was just awful.
- What was?
- It's about Father.
- Your father?
And Mother, but the trouble was mainly Father.
Now, Wesley, I've never heard any such rumors about your family.
I've heard them about plenty of others, but, well, your father has always struck me as a quiet and charming man.
Well, he was until last year, when he took to running with them traveling men.
What? I don't want to hear another word of this.
Continue.
Yes, ma'am. That was what started it.
At first, he was a good, kind husband, but those traveling men, they coaxed him into a saloon on his way home from work, and they started him drinking beer, and then ales, and wines, and liquors, and cigars...
- Wesley.
- Ma'am?
I don't want to hear any further about your family's private affairs.
Now, I'm asking you if you have anything to say that could possibly excuse...
That's just what I'm trying to tell you,
Miss Stevens, if you'd just only let me.
- You see, after we bandaged Marjorie...
- Bandaged Marjorie?
Yes, ma'am. You see, her leg was all bruised up and mauled where he'd been hitting her with his cane.
I knew Marjorie had hurt her ankle, but I didn't know your father had...
Yes, ma'am. So I had to sit up with her.
And Mother.
She had some pretty big bruises, too.
But why didn't you send for the doctor?
Oh, they didn't want any doctor.
We don't want anybody to hear about it.
You see, Father might reform, and then where would he be if everybody knew he'd been a drunkard and whipped his wife and daughter?
You see, he used to be as upright as anyone. It all begun...
- "it began," Wesley.
- Yes, ma'am.
It all commenced from the first day he let them traveling men coax him into that saloon.
I said, "Why, Mother, what's the use in taking on so about it?"
And I said, "All the crying in the world won't help matters any."
And she'd catch hold of me and kind of sob and holler and...
And I'd say to her, "Mother, don't cry.
Please don't cry."
Wesley, now I understand.
And you were thinking of all those dreadful things so hard that you forgot where you were.
I was thinking how to save Father.
You brave little boy.
I know how upset you are.
Why don't you take the afternoon off and forget about the whole thing?
Thank you, ma'am.
All right, Hubert, I'll tell him. Bye.
That was Hubert Wakely on the phone.
The carolers are waiting for Wesley.
Let them wait.
I wouldn't put on that old petticoat if you paid me.
Well, since it's most unlikely you'd be paid for such a performance, you'll go to bed right after dinner.
Eat your soup. it's good.
Marjorie, have you talked to Mary Stevens lately?
You mean Wesley's teacher?
Yes. Do you think she's a little queer these days?
No. What makes you say that?
Well, she's acquired a very odd manner.
At least, she seemed odd to me.
I met her in the store this afternoon, and after we'd said,
"How do you do?" to each other, she kept hold of my hand and looked as though she were going to cry.
- Are you all right?
- Fine.
I don't think it's so odd, Mother.
I think she's just very emotional.
You know, she has relations living in England and what with the war and everything going on...
Wait. She stood there squeezing my hand and struggling to get her voice.
Really, I was embarrassed.
And then finally she said, in a kind of a tearful whisper,
"Be of good cheer. This trial will pass."
- How queer.
- Maybe she'd been drinking.
Wait. After that, she said something even queerer and put her handkerchief to her eyes and hurried away.
Well? What was the other thing she said?
She said, "l know that Wesley is a great, great comfort to you."
- I'm afraid she's a goner.
- Crazy as a bedbug.
- Did she say anything else?
- No, that's all she said. Every word.
Stella, more soup.
- William Sherman!
- How do you do, Miss Stevens?
Well, what are you doing in town?
Jim said you were staying at the university this Christmas.
Well, I came down to take Marjorie to the charity ball. it's a surprise.
- Marjorie Winfield?
- Yes.
- You poor, poor boy.
- What's the matter, Miss Stevens?
You mean she didn't write you about her father?
No. What about her father?
You come with me. Come on. Come on.
Stella, that's cold.
Nothing like an alcohol rub.
Keeps the circulation going.
George.
George!
He's sleeping like a baby.
- He's been Working too hard lately.
- ls the light shining in his eyes, Mother?
Oh? Oh, I'll fix that.
Isn't this cozy? A perfect Christmas Eve.
Somebody wants in.
Merry Christmas.
- Marjorie!
- Bill!
Oh, Bill, I'm so glad to see you.
- It's true.
- What?
Look what he's done to you. That monster.
Who?
Marjorie, I'll take you away from all this.
William, will you please be quiet?
Don't you worry, Mrs. Winfield.
I'm not afraid of him.
William!
So this is what the institution of marriage has done.
Forced you to live with that drunken beast.
What?
Why, this place reeks with alcohol.
That's rubbing alcohol.
Oh, no. How low can a man sink?
What's the matter with you?
Look at him.
Lying there in a drunken stupor.
- I'll sober him up.
- William, no!
And if you ever lay a little finger on either of them again, I'll...
- What finger? Take your hands off of me!
- Have you gone crazy?
- You don't deserve a family like this!
- How did he get in here?
- Get him out of here!
- Are you out of your mind?
- Stella? Stella?
- Get this madman out of this house.
William Sherman, I never want to see you again as long as I live.
I'm sorry, Marjie, but they said he'd taken to drink and was beating you.
Who's they?
Miss Stevens, Wesley's teacher.
I met her at the station.
How could you believe for one minute that my father...
Young man, never step foot inside this door again.
But, sir, she said that Wesley said that...
I knew it was a mistake moving into this neighborhood.
Papa, I've never seen him like this before.
Maybe, he's been studying too hard.
His mind must have snapped.
What was that he was saying about Mr. Wesley?
Wesley!
Oh, my goodness.
William! William!
- William!
- Wesley?
Wesley.
Oh, William, I'm awfully sorry.
If only I had told you how I sprained my ankle.
- I'm not interested.
- William, please listen to me.
I was throwing snowballs and I fell, and I didn't want to tell you because...
'Cause you think I'm so feminine.
There's nothing I wanted more than to go to the dance with you.
I even practiced the grizzly bear and the crab step and all those dances.
Won't you please come back?
I only make a fool of myself once a night.
Why, you pompous old...
Well, your little son is not in his room or anyplace else in the house.
- I hope he's all right.
- So do I, because I want him to be in good condition when I catch up with him.
Wesley.
Wesley!
Mother, I need a drink.
I'll have one with you.
- Merry Christmas, Marjorie.
- Merry Christmas, Bill.
You know, it just occurred to me that, after today, I won't belong here anymore.
Why, William Sherman, I didn't know that college meant so much to you.
You used to laugh at it, you know.
I was just going through a phase.
Were you going through one about me, too?
No, that wasn't a phase.
Oh, Bill, we're going to have a wonderful time this summer.
What's wrong?
Marjie, there's something very important
I've got to tell you.
What's wrong?
Come on, Bill.
You want to graduate, don't you?
Or do you want to wait till next year?
Holy smokes, I've got to make a speech.
Come on.
- But what were you going to tell me?
- You'll know soon enough.
During our four years at college, many of us have changed our ideas as often as our wardrobes, and I think it's a wise thing.
A good student should have an open and inquiring mind.
As freshmen, we were radicals.
As sophomores, we were freethinkers.
As juniors, we were intellectuals.
In those years past, it had become fashionable for us to sneer at established institutions.
But now, we must outgrow our callow philosophies and face the realities of a troubled and changing world.
Doesn't William look distinguished in his cap and gown?
Someday, Wesley will look just as distinguished.
Yeah, but it'll take more than a cap and gown.
I say to you that we must awaken to our responsibilities as students and citizens, and remember that we are men and women, not dreamers in an ivory tower.
"These are the times that try men's souls."
The summer soldier and the sunshine patriot must do everything in their power.
Well, we are not summer soldiers or sunshine patriots.
Many of you have come to think of college students as frivolous young men and women.
A fine boy. A little erratic, but he's straightening out.
Now that he's graduating,
I suppose you've made your plans.
Plans for what, Father?
- Well, marriage. What else is there?
- Bill doesn't believe in marriage.
Something else they've taught him at college, but you'll bring him around.
- He's convinced me that he's right.
- What?
...are also mature enough to recognize our responsibility...
Bill says that marriage is a remnant of a decadent civilization.
Well, this decadent family has...
Has believed in it for a good many years, and I've never seen any cause to regret it until today.
I am taking you away from him before it's too late.
...recognize our responsibility to our generation.
It may come as a surprise to many and a shock to some, but we realized individually and collectively that we had no other course but to face reality and our duty to our country.
I am very proud to be a member of this graduating class.
Bill.
I told you it was too hot for soup.
Why, at least you'd think it would cool off in the evening.
George, why don't you take off your jacket?
I think I will.
It seems to be getting warmer every year.
It's 7:30.
She's probably mooning around somewhere.
She has been since you-know-What.
Someday, Marjorie's going to thank me for what I've done.
I was talking to Hubert Wakely.
She doesn't like him, George.
And Why not? I'd like to know.
He's reliable, settled, makes a good living, and he won't have to go into the Army.
This morning he told me he had a punctured eardrum.
I punctured it last night.
Stella.
Hey, Wesley! Wesley!
- You coming?
- Be right there.
- Mom, I'm not hungry. Can I go with Jim?
- Where you going, dear?
Well, there's a troop train coming in, and we thought we'd go down to the station
'cause Bill's going to be on it.
Sit down and eat your dinner, young man.
You're not going anywhere.
Seems to me if Marjie can go,
I ought to be able to.
Marjie knows better than to do anything like that.
Well, she was packing her bag.
And when I asked her where she was going, she said...
Packing her bag? George!
Well! I'll take care of this.
Well, it's a little too hot for dessert, wasn't it?
Hey! What are they handing out on this side of the train?
You gotta help me get on.
Wouldn't it be simpler if I got off?
Please. I'm looking for a soldier.
- You came to the right store.
- Thanks.
Hey, how do I know you're not a German spy?
I'm not.
Well, maybe I'd better search you for secret papers.
Hey, Joe, wait till I tell you about the dream I just had.
Bill!
- Marjorie! What are you doing here?
- I'm going with you.
But this is a troop train.
I don't care what it is or where it's going, just so we can be together.
It's going to be mighty crowded in that pup tent.
We're pulling out any minute.
You've got to get off.
I'm not leaving you.
Until you ship out, I'm never going to be any farther away from you than this.
Hey, maybe this is that bonus that Congress has been promising us.
You've got to get out of here.
Say, Bill, see if she's got a friend, will you, kid?
That's the way I figure.
Got it all figured out. You get off...
But I may never see you again, and if there's any way that I can...
Young lady, will you listen to me?
Please, William, I know what I'm doing.
- I've thought about this for a long...
- Will you marry me?
I can get a place to stay near the camp and...
I'm asking you to be my wife.
Your married wife? Oh, Bill.
Oh, Bill.
But you don't believe in marriage.
Right this minute,
I don't know anything I believe in more.
Now, look, Marjie, you get the next train.
I'll meet you in Chicago.
We'll be married as soon as you get there.
Marjorie Winfield, you get off of this train.
Father.
And, as for you, young man,
I ought to have you thrown in prison.
- Oh, Father...
- But, Mr. Winfield...
But, Mr. Winfield,
I just asked Marjie to marry me.
Yes, I expected you to say that.
Now, you're coming home to grow up.
- But Father!
- Running away with a soldier.
How you could let him influence you into doing such a thing.
- But it was all my idea.
- Why didn't you stick to baseball?
Marjie?
Marjie?
Yes, Wesley?
I'm sorry.
It was a secret about you going to the train, and I told.
- it's all right.
- Well, no, it isn't.
I'm going to be 12 years old tomorrow, and I'm acting like I was a child.
We all act like we're children sometimes, Wesley.
Gee, it must be tough being a girl.
- Hello, Miss Robertson.
- Hello, Stella.
Well, it's good to see you.
Here, let me help you.
If I needed any help, I wouldn't have come.
Aunt Martha.
Wesley, Aunt Martha's here!
It's good to see you.
You're looking younger every day.
Well, I feel younger every day.
- Hello, Aunt Martha.
- Wesley! My, how you've grown.
Why, I hardly know you with your face all washed and your hair combed.
Yes, ma'am.
- Well, can't we all go inside?
- No, I'll only stay a few minutes.
I just came to bring Wesley some cookies and give him his birthday present.
I guess that's all you're interested in, isn't it, Wesley?
Yes, ma'am.
Well, I hear that George really made a spectacle of himself last night at the railway station.
Oh, shush yourself, Alice.
One prude in the family is enough.
Marjorie wants to get married.
Why doesn't he let her?
Well, George feels the boy isn't sincere.
You see, William doesn't believe in the institution of marriage.
Fiddlesticks.
No man believes in marriage, until a woman traps him into it.
Remember how you got George?
- Well, Wesley, how you making out?
- Just fine.
- Happy birthday.
- Gee, thanks, Aunt Martha.
Oh, no, Aunt Martha, not that.
Oh, let him keep it.
I suppose he will do something horrible with it.
- I'd be disappointed if he didn't.
- Wesley, be careful. You'll cut yourself.
- And here's something else.
- Gee, thanks again.
That isn't for you, but go ahead and open it.
I want you to give it back to your father.
I think it's time.
You tell him I sent it to him because
I believe I can trust him with it now.
I took that contraption away from your father 35 years ago, one day after he'd killed my best hen with it, accidentally.
Father?
I think, if you give him that from me, he'll remember.
You look like your father, Wesley.
He was anything but a handsome boy.
He'll grow out of it, Aunt Martha.
There's one more cookie left.
Aren't you going to eat it?
Well, I guess, I'd better.
Go ahead and stuff yourself.
You're 12 years old today and you ought to be happy, if you're nothing else.
It's taken over 1,900 years of Christianity and some hundreds of thousands of years of other things to produce you, and there you sit.
Ma'am?
It'll be your turn to struggle and muss things up for the betterment of posterity soon enough.
Eat your cookie.
Yes, ma'am.
- Stella.
- Behind you.
We're not ready for the cake yet.
Mr. Wakely's still singing.
Thought if I took it in, he'd stop.
Thank you. Thank you.
I know you would like me to go on and on, but I really must stop.
And now, if the little gentlemen will take the little ladies by the hand, we shall put a record on the phonograph and you may all trip the light fantastic.
Wesley, why are you sitting here?
Why aren't you dancing?
I don't want to dance. it's my birthday, so I don't have to.
Wesley.
Well, whose party is this?
Hubert Wakely's or mine?
Why, it's yours, dear.
Well, then why doesn't he stop singing and go home?
- May I have this dance?
- No, thank you, Hubert. Really, I...
Oh, come, come now, this is no time to be coy.
Look, he's trying to make Marjie dance with him.
Why doesn't he leave her alone?
Don't worry about it.
Your father and I had along talk last night, and, with your approval, it's full steam ahead.
Excuse me, but Marjorie promised this dance to me.
- I did?
- Sure.
Guess I can dance with my own sister at my own birthday party, can't I?
But, princess...
Well, I guess I can dance with my own brother.
Would you excuse us, Hubert?
Stella, you should be more careful.
Careful.
Well, it looks like
I'm not such a bad father after all.
Wesley's behaving like a perfect little gentleman.
Even Marjorie seems to be enjoying herself.
Everything is calm once more.
Cyclone weather.
Stella, answer that.
I hope it's the ice cream.
Pretty.
It ain't the ice cream.
- Come right in.
- Mr. Winfield, I've got to talk to you.
I thought we were well rid of you.
I have a 24-hour pass, and the only train back leaves in a half an hour.
Sir, I'm in love with your daughter and I want to marry her.
And how long would that last?
Until you get some other crackpot ideas?
- Bill.
- Marjorie.
Hold me tight. Don't let me go this time.
I don't want to. But it's up to your father.
You're making it very difficult for me, young man, but I am sure in the long run you'll realize I'm right.
- Now, I'll thank you to leave my house.
- George.
Father, Bill and I are going to be married right now, and you couldn't stop us with an act of Congress.
I'll get my things.
Wait a minute, Marjorie.
Let's be sensible about this.
I couldn't ask you to give up your family for one Week with a soldier who's shipping out.
It wouldn't be fair to you.
But how can you be sensible at a time like this?
One of us has to be.
It may be along time before I get back.
You're gonna have to live with them, not with me.
Sol guess we'd better wait.
- ls it all right if I walk him to the gate?
- Certainly you can, darling.
You go right ahead.
Sometimes I don't understand you.
Well, what did you want me to do?
Let my daughter become a camp follower?
George Wadsworth Winfield, you listen to me.
And I'll Write you every day I'm gone.
And I'll knit you some socks.
I can't knit, but I'll knit you some socks.
Well, if I can get my shoes on over them,
I'll wear them.
I know I'm supposed to be brave, William, but you're gonna be so far away.
Oh, come on, it's not as bad as all that.
You know the song all the doughboys are singing.
- "Smile the while I kiss you fond adieu."
- "Sad adieu."
- "When the clouds roll by..."
- "I'll come to you."
Marjie?
Don't take it so seriously.
She'll get over it.
George, were you ever a young man?
I can't even remember.
Alice!
After all, no man really wants to get married.
William is just more honest than most.
Now, I suppose
I didn't want to get married to you.
Of course you didn't.
If you had any idea of the lengths
I had to go to force you to propose...
What do you mean?
You know, it's hard to realize you once were exactly like William Sherman.
I was not.
Oh, George.
You remember the day we got engaged?
You took me for a walk in the woods near Aunt Martha's farm. We got lost.
It was hours before we got back.
You knew the way home all the time.
How can you say such a thing?
Because I knew it, too.
I don't recall the incident at all.
Of course you don't.
Because you refuse to remember anything that indicates you might have human failings.
But they're the reasons I married you.
Wesley!
See what you did to that window?
You incorrigible brat.
I don't know what we're going to do with you. What do you mean?
Just 10 minutes ago, I was telling your mother how proud I was of you, and you had to go throw a rock at me through the window.
I didn't. I was shooting at a bird, and, well, the sun got in my eyes and the sling broke.
What sling?
This one.
Where did you get this devilish thing?
Haven't I told you a thousand times...
It isn't mine. it's yours.
- What?
- Yes, sir.
Aunt Martha gave it to me.
She told me to give it back to you.
She said she took it away from you
35 years ago.
You killed her best hen with it, she said.
She told me some more to tell you, but I forgot.
Sorry, Pop.
It's all right, Son. Forget all about it.
A broken window isn't too important, anyway.
Hello, operator?
Would you please get me the Shermans in the 400 block on Elm Street?
Thank you.
Hello. Is Bill there?
Tell him it's the neighbor across the street who just remembered he was young once, too.
Here's your hat.
Keep your head up and breathe through your nose.
English
Good morning, schoolmaster.
See the kite?
Tell us a story!
Wait for me, Hans! Please wait.
Well, hurry up. Faster!
Thank you.
Next time, don't be late.
Now, yesterday, Matilda was the wicked mermaid - the princess of the frozen sea.
- Remember that?
- Yes.
Today, as I promised - we always keep our promises, don't we?
Yes!
- Today, as I promised, she will be the...
- Queen of China!
Did anybody remember to bring a dress for the queen of China?
You said you would!
All right.
Please, ladies and gentlemen.
If we can't have a queen, then we'll have a king.
It's very simple. We just take the crown and put it over on the side.
He was a very jaunty little king - wore his crown like that. Now, we'll just...
Ah... No peeping.
There we are.
Long live the king!
Long live the king!
That's not a king.
It's only a queen with a moustache.
Well, a lot of kings are only a queen with a moustache.
- We all believe it's a king, don't we?
- Yes!
Since we have no clothes for the king, this is a story about a king who had no clothes, and about a little boy who only believed what he saw.
That's you!
Well, one day, two swindlers came to see the king to sell him what they said was a magic suit of clothes.
Now, the king was very fond of new clothes, so he said, "Let me see it."
But there wasn't any suit of clothes.
The swindlers held up their hands like this and said,
"Your Majesty, this is a magic suit.
"You, being very wise and intelligent, can see how beautiful it is,
"but to a fool, it is absolutely invisible."
Well, he said, "I see."
Not wanting to appear a fool, he added,
"Yes, indeed. I see it perfectly.
"It's beautiful.
"Isn't it grand? Isn't it fine?
Look at the cut, the style, the line!
"The suit of clothes is altogether but altogether, it's altogether
"The most remarkable suit of clothes that I have ever seen
"These eyes of mine at once determine the sleeves are velvet, the cape is ermine
"The hose are blue and the doublet is a lovely shade of green!"
A lovely shade of green!
"Somebody send for the queen!"
The queen came and she was told how all the wise people could see the...
- Magic suit!
- That's right.
Naturally, not wanting to appear a fool, she said,
"Oh! Isn't it grand?
"Isn't it rich?
Look at the charm of every stitch!
"The suit of clothes is altogether, it's altogether
"The most remarkable suit of clothes that I have ever seen
"These eyes of mine at once determine the sleeves are velvet, the cape is ermine
"The hose are blue and the doublet is a lovely shade of green!"
- A lovely shade of green!
- "Summon the court to convene!"
All the court came, the ministers and ambassadors came.
Not wanting to seem like fools, they agreed with the...
- King and queen.
- The king issued a proclamation.
The suit of clothes is altogether but altogether, it's altogether
The most remarkable suit of clothes a tailor ever made
Now quickly put it altogether with gloves of leather and hat and feather
It's altogether the thing to wear at Saturday's parade
- Saturday's parade!
- Leading the royal brigade!
By this time, everybody had heard about the king's new clothes that he would wear at the parade.
The people lined the streets as the artillery came by, the infantry came by, and the cavalry came by and the fife and drum corps and the royal guard, and finally the king.
Everybody cheered "Hurray"...
...because nobody wanted to appear a fool.
Nobody that is except one little boy who, for some strange reason, hadn't heard about the king's new magic suit, and didn't know what he was supposed to see.
He took one look at the king, turned a little pale and said,
"Look at the king! Look at the king!
"The king is in the altogether, but altogether, the altogether
"He's altogether as naked as the day that he was born
"The king is in the altogether, but altogether, the altogether
"It's altogether the very least the king has ever worn
"Call the court physician, call an intermission
"His majesty is wide open to ridicule and scorn
"The king is in the altogether, but altogether, the altogether
"He's altogether as naked as the day that he was born
"And it's altogether too chilly a morn!"
- Hans!
- Hurry, Peter.
We're going to hear another story.
Hans, the schoolmaster went to the Burgomaster and the...
Peter, don't worry so much on a beautiful day like this.
They're coming here - the schoolmaster, the Burgomaster, the council. Look!
Good morning, Burgomaster.
Look, Burgomaster.
The books - on the dirty ground!
Here. The History of Denmark used to tie the string of a dirty kite!
The history of any country can always stand a little fresh air.
Did you hear about the history book that took a vacation and came back a much better history?
You see? That's the stuff he fills the children's heads with!
Look at this.
"Arithmetic. A two met a four one day.
"They liked each other immediately and got married,
"and all the other numbers came to their wedding."
- It's impossible!
- There are different ways of learning.
A cobbler belongs in his shop, and children belong in school.
- Tend to your shoes. I'll tend to my school!
- To be sure.
But is the world made up of nothing else but shoes and schoolrooms, and...?
There's a story of a piece of chalk and a blackboard.
The piece of chalk had written so many things on the blackboard that it believed it knew all about everything.
The blackboard was angry.
She felt that without her to write upon, nobody would know anything, and she was the one who really knew it all.
One day, quite by accident, the schoolmaster broke the piece of chalk and tossed it out of the window.
It fell beside a pencil that the piece of chalk had always admired.
A pencil to a piece of chalk is something very special.
- And what do you suppose happened?
- What happened?
What is this? Have we all lost our senses?
Are you going listen to him with the children? What is this?
That will be enough, Hans.
Children, pick up your schoolbooks and go back to school. Hurry now.
Follow the schoolmaster.
Not another word from anyone.
I advise you, Hans, to stay in your shop from now on. Come, gentlemen.
Stop shaking your head at me like an old woman, Peter.
- I can feel it in the back of my neck.
- Hans, turn around. I've got to talk to you.
Did you ever hear the story of the old woman who shook her head at the family so much that it fell off, right on the table?
Hans, why do you keep on making trouble for us?
Trouble? There's no trouble that a good story can't get us out of - like the one just now about the piece of chalk and the blackboard.
I didn't know what I was going to say until after I'd said it.
In fact, I'd like to know how the story ends myself.
Please stay in the shop. Don't tell the children stories all the time.
I never saw such a worrier like you, Peter.
You want to really worry about something? Here's something.
Two years ago, I took you out of the orphanage and promised them I'd make you into a good cobbler. Two whole years.
Look at that shoe - glue all smeared and nails in crooked.
Two years an apprentice, and still the nails go in crooked.
I'm not that bad, am I? You're not going to send me back to the orphanage, are you?
Aha! A new worry appears in the sky.
Never mind, Peter. Let's go home.
Two and two are four
Four and four are eight
Eight and eight are sixteen
Sixteen and sixteen are thirty-two
Two and two are four
Four and four are eight
Eight and eight are sixteen
Sixteen and sixteen are thirty-two...
An inchworm. The first one of the year!
Four and four are eight
Eight and eight are sixteen
Sixteen and sixteen are thirty-two...
Inchworm
Inchworm
Measuring the marigolds
You and your arithmetic
You'll probably go far
Inchworm
Inchworm
Measuring the marigolds
Seems to me
You stop and see
How beautiful they are
Two and two are four
Four and four are eight
Eight and eight are sixteen
Sixteen and sixteen are thirty-two
Good morning, schoolmaster.
Oh, Hans.
- Let me explain...
- Out of my way!
I am talking sense, and that is exactly what I want.
Either Hans Christian Andersen leaves this town or I do.
Surely, schoolmaster, a little story now and then - not during school hours.
It is not just now and then, it is all the time.
When they are late, he gives them excuses.
"The snow queen took me to see the king of the mountain!"
That is true.
I asked my Gerda what time it was.
She said the minute hand and the hour hand were not speaking to each other.
They were both in love with the second hand.
They wouldn't meet till 12 o'clock, and no one could tell the time until then.
- I like that.
- Like it?
We pay our taxes for the school, not for
Hans to fill their heads with foolishness.
But Hans's stories are good.
The children learn from them.
- They are not foolish stories.
- I would like to know now.
I would like to pack up tonight.
Tomorrow, you'll be looking for a new cobbler or a new teacher.
Gentlemen...
It is decided. The cobbler must leave.
- But...
- Quiet!
I'll tell Hans myself. It will not be pleasant, but I see it has to be done.
Perhaps it's all for the best.
Tell Hans to wait in the shop for me.
I'll talk to him before supper.
Come, gentlemen.
- Hello, Hans.
- Hello, Peter.
- Was it nice by the river?
- Just perfect.
Did we have any customers today?
Not one. It just gets slower and slower.
Don't you think we should go to a larger city where shoes wear out faster?
And be stuck in the shop all day?
No, sir. I like business to be a little slow.
There's time enough for everything here.
That's what I mean, Hans. No shoes wear out. No one ever leaves.
Not one person in this village has ever been to Copenhagen, have they?
That's true, but why should they?
I never think about Copenhagen - do you?
Do I? What do you suppose
Copenhagen is really like?
It's a funny thing, now that you mention it.
I used to think about Copenhagen a lot.
I used to make up the most wonderful stories about going there.
I used to think about Copenhagen a lot when I was your age.
My husband says the shoes hurt.
- They squeak and the left one doesn't fit.
- That's all? That's not too bad, Mrs Burda.
I sometimes think that shoes have a life of their own.
The ones that squeak don't like to leave the shop, and the ones that hurt don't like whoever's wearing them.
Please, Hans, just fix the shoes.
I've got my own life to worry about.
When Mr Burda's feet hurt, he drives the whole house crazy.
Hans, tell me. What kind of stories did you make up about Copenhagen?
Oh... I used to dream about having the finest cobbler shop in Copenhagen.
I wasn't just an ordinary cobbler.
I only saw people by appointment.
First I looked at them before I even looked at their shoes, and if I didn't like them, no shoes.
Do you know that peop...?
Where are you going?
Don't you want to hear the rest of it?
- What's that?
- Your bag. It's all packed, Hans.
- My bag?
- Go to Copenhagen now. Right now.
Are you crazy, Peter?
That was a story I was telling.
Didn't you understand that?
Of course I understood, but part of it must be like you imagined, and maybe even great carriages with fine horses, beautiful houses three storeys high.
Don't you want to see it for yourself? It's not so far from here - your bag's packed.
All you have to do is walk out of that door.
Quick! Before you change your mind.
Before I change my mind? Who said
I was going? Just like that, this afternoon?
What's got into you, Peter, anyway?
You forgot about Copenhagen all these years.
You may forget about it again until you're too old to go.
No, some day I'm really going to Copenhagen.
- That's the one thing I'm sure of.
- Who knows?
Has anyone from this village gone to Copenhagen before? Of course not.
They keep putting it off.
Imagine, Hans, you'll be the first.
What a to-do there'll be tomorrow.
They'll talk of nothing else for days.
"Hans has gone to Copenhagen!"
"Hans has gone to Copenhagen."
Yes!
What a sign it would make! "Hans
Christian Andersen, gone to Copenhagen" with little shoes pointing the way out of town!
I'll make the sign tonight. I see it exactly as you do - the little shoes, everything!
Goodbye, Hans. Aren't you excited?
Excited? You mean
I really should go, Peter?
Why not? It's only a few days away.
You stay a little while and then come back, but you've been to Copenhagen.
But it's a big step, Peter.
Still, what's to stop me?
My goodness, I am getting excited!
Hans!
If anyone had told me this morning that I'd decide to go to Copenhagen...
- Start walking!
- Imagine, Peter.
I've decided to go to Copenhagen, just like I made it up in a story.
- Goodbye, Hans.
- Goodbye, Peter.
Goodbye, Peter, and take care of yourself.
I'll only be gone a few days.
- Tell the children goodbye for me.
- I will.
Imagine, Peter - Copenhagen!
Goodbye, Peter.
Hello.
Oh, my goodness. My feet hurt.
I cannot understand why these shoes hurt me so.
I made them myself. You're lucky.
You don't have to wear shoes.
I can never understand why people use that expression "A dog's life".
Every dog I ever knew seemed to have a very nice life indeed.
You've no idea, and maybe it's just as good you don't.
Back in the village, if people saw me talking to you like this, do you know what would happen?
Every head would shake for a week, and yet how pleasant this is!
I can say anything I want to, and there's no sound except the wag of your tail.
And people do the strangest things, too.
Oh, yes, my friend.
Even me. Myself included.
For instance, if you were to ask me what I was doing on the road to Copenhagen, do you know something?
I couldn't tell you.
I was trying to figure it out a little while ago - what Peter said, what I said.
All of a sudden, I find myself on the road to Copenhagen.
Do you know something else, my friend?
I'm a little bit frightened.
Copenhagen is a very big place.
Still, what can happen, huh?
People are nice.
That's the nice thing about the world, my friend - people.
So, what can happen?
I'll walk through the gates of the city, go up to someone and say,
"How do you do?
I'm Hans Christian Andersen."
I'll walk through the gates of the city, and
I'll say, "I'm Hans Christian Andersen".
I'm Hans Christian Andersen
I've many a tale to tell
And though I'm a cobbler,
I'd say I tell them rather well
I'll mend your shoes and I'll fix your boots when I have a moment free
When I'm not otherwise occupied
As a purple duck or a mountain side or a quarter after three
I'm Hans Christian Andersen, that's me!
I'm Hans Christian Andersen and this is an April day
It's full of the magic I need to speed me on my way
My pocketbook has an empty look
I limp on a lumpy shoe
So I turn into a flying fish
Or a millionaire with a rocking chair and a dumpling in my stew
I'm Hans Christian Andersen
Andersen, that's who!
Hans!
Hans!
Peter!
Peter, what are you doing here?
What's this? You've got the whole shop on wheels.
Copenhagen sounded so wonderful, Hans,
I got to thinking maybe you wouldn't come back for a while.
Maybe for a long while, so I thought maybe you'd need the shop.
Peter, sometimes I think you put ideas into my head that aren't even there.
Me? Oh, no, Hans.
I'm not at all sure I shouldn't send you back right now.
- But, Hans...
- Still...
...as long as you've come this far...
I sail up the Skagerrak
And sail down the Kattegatt
Through the harbour and up to the quay
And there she stands
Waiting for me
With a welcome so warm and so gay
Wonderful, wonderful Copenhagen
Friendly old girl of a town
'Neath her tavern light
On this merry night
Let us clink and drink one down
To wonderful, wonderful Copenhagen
Salty old queen of the sea
Once I sailed away
But I'm home today
Singing Copenhagen
Wonderful, wonderful Copenhagen for me!
There she is!
Wonderful, wonderful Copenhagen
Friendly old girl of a town
'Neath her tavern light
On this merry night
Let us clink and drink one down
To wonderful, wonderful Copenhagen
Salty old queen of the sea
Once I sailed away
But I'm home today
Singing Copenhagen
Wonderful, wonderful
Copenhagen for me!
Copenhagen Weekly Gazette!
Get your Copenhagen Weekly Gazette!
Get your Copenhagen Weekly Gazette!
Get your Copenhagen Weekly Gazette!
Matches! Matches! Matches!
Please buy my matches
Matches! Matches!
Bric-a-brac! Bric-a-brac!
Nice red roses
Nice red roses
Pots and pans! Pots and pans!
Chimney sweep!
Sweep your chimney!
Bass! Bass! Buy a bass!
Nice fresh clams!
Fish!
Fresh fish!
- Buy rhubarb! Rhubarb! Buy rhubarb!
- Sausages! Sausages!
Sausages! Sausages!
Sausages! Sausages!
Pretty flowers!
Cheese, butter and eggs here!
- Cheese, butter and eggs here!
- Buy your bread from Bertha!
May I have a half loaf, please?
- Five skillings.
- Thank you.
Hans, why don't we set up shop here?
Here? Well, what are we waiting for?
I'm Hans Christian Andersen, the pride of the cobbler's trade
Permit me to show you a great discovery I've made
A shoe goes squeak and a shoe goes squawk, a squeak-iddy-squawk all day
Though you'd figure a shoe can't talk, if you listen close to the squeak and squawk
You can plainly hear it say
"Let Hans Christian Andersen fix me right away!"
In Hans Christian Andersen your feet have a loyal friend
The sort of a doctor, I'm sure, your toes would recommend
I work all night if a shoe's too tight to see where the pinch comes from
I raise my hammer and shut one eye and I sometimes hit on the reason why
And I sometimes hit my thumb. Oh!
- What's your name?
- I'm Hans Christian Andersen!
- You're under arrest.
- Under arrest?
Disrespect for the King's statue.
Get that boy!
Run, Peter! Run!
Do you want the new ballet ready for the tour, Otto? Then do as I say - now!
- You heard what we said.
- Niels, be sensible.
All right, don't do it. Stand here and argue.
I'll get a cobbler while you go and teach them the ballet.
Why is it a matter of life and death to have a cobbler right now?
Because you have a ballerina who is so pig-headed that I must make an example of her in front of the entire company.
That's awful perfume.
- Sir, I know where...
- Go away!
She won't get away with this.
I know her far better than you do.
- Very well. You know her...
- Otto, the ballet is only half finished.
No cobbler, no ballet. I guarantee it, Otto!
- I know where you can get a cobbler, sir.
- What's that?
I said I know where you can get a cobbler, sir.
Where?
- You'll have to use a little influence.
- Influence?
With the police. We should hurry, sir.
I know where one is sitting right now!
- Hello.
- Hello.
- Hello!
- Hello!
Are you all alone in there?
Well, in a way, yes.
- Are you scared?
- Hmm?
- Are you scared?
- Scared? No.
Nobody's ever really alone.
Did you know that?
As a matter of fact,
I'm expecting company right now.
Would you like me to introduce you?
Are you sure?
Absolutely sure?
Don't go away.
- There.
- Oh!
Isn't she pretty? Her name is Thumbelina.
Say hello, Thumbelina.
Now you say hello to her.
Hello.
She's very unhappy.
What's the matter, Thumbelina?
Are you unhappy because you're so little?
That's nothing to make such a sad face about, is it?
Here. Come on.
Though you're no bigger than my thumb
Than my thumb, than my thumb
Sweet Thumbelina, don't be glum
Now, now, now, ah, ah, ah, come, come, come
Thumbelina, Thumbelina tiny little thing
Thumbelina dance, Thumbelina sing
Oh, Thumbelina, what's the difference if you're very small?
When your heart is full of love, you're nine feet tall!
Oh, she's still unhappy. What's the matter,
Thumbie? Would you like a playmate?
You would? Here.
There. Say how do you do.
Want a kiss?
Would you like to dance?
You would? Well, here we go.
Thumbelina, Thumbelina, tiny little thing
Thumbelina dance, Thumbelina sing
Thumbelina, what's the difference if you're very small?
When your heart is full of love, you're nine feet tall!
Open up.
- Hans!
- Peter!
- What are you doing here?
- You're a cobbler?
- Yes.
- Hurry.
You are in the custody of the Royal Danish Ballet. Come along!
- What am I in the custody of?
- Shh! You're out - that's the main thing.
- They didn't treat you badly, Hans?
- No.
- Where's your coat?
- Here.
- Where are we going? Who is that man?
- What are you doing? Come along!
Come on, Hans. We've got our first job!
Straight! Straight!
Straight!
Keep the line straight!
Up! Up!
Good.
- This is the most...
- Shh! Dress rehearsal.
All right.
We'll do it all over again.
Ladies, the pirouettes were impossible.
Gentlemen, the lifts have to be higher.
The ballerina's performance
I won't begin to discuss.
That would take till tomorrow morning.
We'll do it again.
Not with these shoes, darling.
I told you before, remember?
Stop! Everything stop.
Is the cobbler here yet?
- Here I am.
- Come up here, cobbler.
Come on. Hurry up!
Cobbler, this lady will explain to you what she wants you to do.
It's a trifle complicated, but she's no ordinary dancer. She's something special.
Of all the dancers in Denmark, she is the only one who cannot follow my steps without special shoes that exist only in her mind.
All this she will make clear to you, perhaps.
We cannot understand so great a ballerina
We must only bow to her every wish.
Not quite low enough, my dear!
Come, sir. We can talk more quietly over there, I think.
Lunch, everybody.
You've seen the ballet when I make a jet?
You know - when I jump.
I want to rise and then remain motionless, as though I were standing on nothing but air.
It is impossible with these shoes, but if you could put something in the tip of each one, I could do it, I'm sure I could, in spite of that unkind man.
I would so love to show him it is not impossible.
It is possible, isn't it?
Could you do it?
Yes.
Yes, I can do it.
I'll find something.
Something soft and silent.
I'm sure I can do it.
- You could really seem to stand on air.
- You have it!
I can see you have the idea perfectly.
I shall be so grateful to you.
There, can you do it now - quickly?
It would be such a service.
I would be forever grateful. Thank you.
Louise, my slippers!
You have to go out this way.
Hans!
Goodness, you were a long time!
Have we got a job?
- What are you holding?
- Slippers.
Slippers? I never saw slippers like that before. Who wears a thing like that?
- The loveliest lady I've ever seen.
- Why does she wear these?
She dances - no, she floats.
When she smiles, your heart skips a beat and then melts.
She smiled and stood close to me.
She even touched me.
Where's the barrow?
- I promised these to her quickly.
- Right over here.
I hid it here in the theatre storeroom.
She wants shoes that will walk on air,
Peter. This afternoon.
Well, she'll have them.
I wish she had asked me something really impossible.
Doro...
Are you hungry?
Do you love me?
Yes, even half-starved, I love you.
Come.
Sit down. Let me feed you.
Here. A sip of this to put you in a better temper.
And, look.
I asked Helga to make this especially for you today.
My darling, was I cruel today?
Oh, you were, my friend. You were indeed.
I was almost in tears.
- Doro, I'm sorry.
- Niels, don't be sorry.
It's just as it should be.
Don't you see that, my angel?
Professionally, we fight like two tigers, but afterwards...
That's what makes it so good afterwards.
Isn't it good now?
It's wonderful. Why do I forget that the minute you start to dance?
Then I see only my mortal enemy - the ballerina - in front of me.
Because the ballet is your life, just as it is mine.
Don't you think I sometimes forget you are my husband when I am dancing, and want to kill you for some of the things you say?
You really want to kill me?
Of course I do. Isn't that as it should be?
I would hate it any other way, wouldn't you?
Oh, Niels, we are lucky, and I do love you so.
I'm sorry about the shoes. I will behave beautifully this afternoon, you will see.
- Sorry about the shoes?
- There was nothing wrong with them.
I just did that to torment you.
Oh, you did?
I know exactly how to torment you, don't I, darling?
And you look so wonderfully poetic when you are in a rage, my dear.
Never mind how I look. So you just made up that little bit about the shoes, huh?
But you were being terrible.
You deserved it.
You let everyone sit around while you took your petty revenge?
You forget what you said in front of the entire company about my dancing?
No, I don't. I remember every word of it.
- I was right!
- Oh, you were?
Yes, and if you've finished stuffing yourself, I can say it again because we're going back to the rehearsal.
You danced the waltz like an elephant in a snowdrift!
What did you say?
I said you danced the waltz like an elephant in a snowdrift!
No, like an elephant who fell down and was trying to get up!
Can you hear me? Is that loud enough?
How dare you! I slave to make each step you give me just right.
I make your foolish little dance steps acceptable to an audience.
You don't slave hard enough.
Move in time to the music once in a while!
You are not just cruel, you are heartless.
Completely heartless.
You love to say cruel things to me! You would like to see me grovel at your feet!
- You'd see those steps clearer that way!
- How can I stand it?
How do I bear it?
Come - you can cry harder than that.
I've heard you cry much harder.
That, my girl, is for thinking up those shoes.
On stage, everybody!
Let's see what you can think up for this afternoon's rehearsal.
You've fixed the shoes? Good.
- Do you see what he's doing to her?
- Of course.
Never interfere between a husband and wife. It's the best rule I ever heard of.
You mean she's married to him?
- To that man?
- Very much married. Outside, please.
No one is allowed in the theatre during rehearsal. That's another very good rule.
How much do we owe you for the shoes, my boy?
How could you do it?
How could a girl like you marry a man like that?
How can I help you?
Dance! Dance!
Dance! Dance!
Dance!
Help me!
Help me!
Help me!
Help me!
Cobbler?
Cobbler! Thank you for the shoes. You left before I had a chance to thank you.
They were wonderful.
I really floated on air. Thank you.
Thank you.
Don't tell me what to do!
They'll work tomorrow.
They'll work till they get it right.
I'll see them drop in their tracks.
And you have my coat ready for me when I'm ready to leave!
Home!
What funny people they are over there.
They laugh and kiss, then they scream and beat each other. Kind of crazy.
What are you doing, Hans?
- Writing.
- A letter? To the children?
- Say something for me to them.
- It's not to the children.
What? Who are you writing to, Hans?
The ballerina.
Stop bothering me, Peter.
Why are you writing to the ballerina, Hans?
I heard him talk to her.
I saw him slap her face.
But, Hans, they're married.
I know that.
I heard them talking before you came in, Hans.
It was different.
Look, Peter, you're a child.
You don't understand.
I saw him make her cry with my own eyes.
- But, Hans, they...
- Don't bother me.
I must finish this tonight.
"The Little Mermaid.
A story for Mademoiselle Doro.
"And so, gradually, the little mermaid began to understand.
"She had sought love from the wrong man."
Come in.
I'm sorry, sir, but he insisted on seeing you immediately.
Shh. She's asleep. What's the trouble, doorman? Who's this little boy?
This is addressed to Mademoiselle Doro.
He was in the theatre trying to take it.
It seems to be a story, and it is addressed to her.
Why were you trying to take it?
- I wasn't trying to steal it. It's mine.
- Then why is it addressed to my wife?
- Niels, what is all this?
- It's mine! Please give it to me. It's mine!
Now, who wrote this?
I did.
You did?
Suppose you tell me why you happened to write this story to my wife?
It's nothing to do with you or her.
It's just a story.
He made up a story, that's all.
He's always making up stories, and he made up this one.
Now would you mind telling me just who he is?
We know you didn't write it, so you might just as well stop lying. Who is he?
A friend of mine.
What's his name?
Hans... Christian Andersen. The cobbler.
Darling, it's the cobbler.
The cobbler who fixed my shoes so beautifully yesterday.
He's written me a story for a ballet.
- I don't believe it!
- Tell the cobbler I am delighted to have it.
What was his name - Hans?
I will read it carefully.
- The Little Mermaid
- Stop it.
It is all very innocent and quite touching.
I haven't said good morning yet.
Good morning, darling.
Where have you been?
I've lost it. I can't find it any place.
Help me look, will you, Peter?
Just when I need you most, you disappear.
I'll have to write it all over again.
- You don't have to write it again.
- Don't stand there. Start looking.
- You don't have to write it over again.
- What?
She's got it.
What did you say?
She has it, Hans. Right now.
She has?
But how? How did she get it?
I was reading it and it blew out of my hands.
You took it?
But why? Never mind that, Peter. Go on.
It blew into the window of the theatre, and...
That's how she got it.
A wind took it to her.
It's an omen, Peter. An omen.
She's reading it now.
Don't go over there, Hans, don't.
I must, Peter. I've got to talk to her.
I can help her.
That chair and this sofa.
Let's get 'em on the wagon.
What's going on here?
What are you doing?
The ballet's moving out.
Moving out?
Excuse me.
- Is it true the ballet's moving out?
- That's right. Their yearly tour.
Where to? How long will they be gone?
There's the school bell.
Off to school. Hurry up.
Off with you now. Tomorrow's another day and another story.
I don't want any trouble with the schoolmaster. Hurry, children. Hurry.
What's the matter? Are you unhappy?
Would you like me to tell you a special story?
Come on up here.
Come on.
I'm not going to hurt you.
Go up a little faster.
Now, let me see...
There once was an ugly duckling
With feathers all stubby and brown
And the other birds, in so many words said, "Ptt! Get out of town!
"Ptt! Get out!
"Ptt! Ptt! Get out!
Ptt! Ptt! Get out of town!"
And he went with a quack and a waddle and a quack
In a flurry of eiderdown
Shall I tell you the rest of the story?
All right.
That poor little ugly duckling
Went wandering far and near
But at every place, they said to his face
"Now, ptt! Get out of here
"Ptt! Get out! Ptt! Ptt! Get out!
"Ptt! Ptt! Get out of here!"
And he went with a quack and a waddle and a quack
And a very unhappy tear
All through the wintertime, he hid himself away
Ashamed to show his face, afraid of what others might say
All through the winter, in his lonely clump of weed
Till a flock of swans spied him there and very soon agreed
"You're a very fine swan indeed!"
"A swan?
"Me a swan? Nah, go on."
They said, "Yes, you're a swan.
Look at yourself in the lake. You'll see."
And he looked and he saw and he said, "I am a swan!
"Whee!"
I'm not such an ugly duckling
No feathers all stubby and brown
For, in fact, these birds, in so many words said, "Tsk!
"The best in town!
"Tsk! The best! Tsk! Tsk! The best!
"Tsk! Tsk! The best in town!"
Not a quack, not a quack, not a waddle or a quack
But a glide and a whistle and a snowy white back
And a head so noble and high
Say who's an ugly duckling?
Not I!
Not I!
So, Lars, it shouldn't make any difference if they won't play with you.
But it does. I want to play with them, but they make fun of me because I was sick and the doctor shaved my head.
Yes, but look at what happened to the ugly duckling.
One day soon, you'll look in the mirror - much sooner than you think - and your hair will be grown out, and you'll be just like the ugly duckling.
You'll be better than any of them,
I promise.
- Are you sure, Hans?
- Very sure.
You'd better run off to school.
You're late now.
- Bye, Hans.
- Goodbye.
Cobbler, are my shoes ready?
Yes, ma'am. I have them here.
One mark, please.
- One mark? As much as that?
- Yes, ma'am. They're practically new.
How beautiful!
What kind of shoes are they?
Ballet slippers. I made them myself.
Every inch of them.
How lovely they are!
Please, ma'am. They might soil.
You understand.
Who wears such lovely things?
A lady who dances.
Her feet twinkle like little stars.
I assure you, the slippers won't even be noticed - she's so beautiful herself.
Thank you.
Thank you. Please come again.
Her arms were warm as they welcomed me
Her eyes were fire-bright
And then I knew that my path must be
Through the ever haunted night
For anywhere I wander
Anywhere I roam
Till I'm in the arms of my darling again
My heart will find no home
Anywhere I wander
Anywhere I roam
Anywhere I wander
Anywhere I roam
- You're Hans the cobbler?
- Yes, sir.
- I'm pleased to know you.
- How do you do?
You've no idea what this is all about, have you?
- No, sir.
- Well, I'm the father of the ugly duckling.
- Does that mean anything to you?
- Oh, you're Lars' father. I see.
That little story helped him over a bad time. I'm very grateful to you.
When I made inquiries, I found you had a lot more of these stories.
The children are full of them these days.
Do you ever write any of them?
- No, sir.
- Well, I've a little surprise for you. Come.
Give me a small sheet of paper.
Oh!
Oh!
Thank you very much.
- It's the finest present I've ever had.
- I'm delighted. Lars will be, too.
Could I say something, sir?
You wouldn't mind?
Of course not. Say anything you want to.
Well, instead of "Hans the cobbler", could it say "Hans Christian
Andersen", like a real writer?
Certainly!
If you write some of those stories down, just the way you tell them to the children,
I'll print them, and pay you for them.
I can hardly believe it!
- When will this be in the paper?
- Tomorrow.
It'll say "Hans Christian Andersen" all day tomorrow.
All day?
- Well, goodbye, sir.
- Goodbye.
All day?
- Thank you, sir.
- Thank you.
"The Ugly Duckling by Hans Christian Andersen."
I'm Hans Christian Andersen
That fortune has smiled upon
Although I'm a duckling today, tomorrow I'm a swan
A tale I told and it turned to gold, as gold as a tale can be
I laugh, ha ha, but I blush a bit for I realise while I'm reading it
That it's also reading me
"By Hans Christian Andersen"!
I am a swan!
I write myself a note each day and I place it in my hat
The wind comes by, the hat blows high but that's not the end of that
For round and round the world it goes
It lands here right behind myself
I pick it up and I read the note which is merely to remind myself
I'm Hans Christian Andersen
Andersen...
Peter!
I'm Hans Christian Andersen
I bring you a fable rare
There once was a table who said,
"How I'd love a chair"
And then and there came a sweet young chair
All dressed in a bridal gown
He said to her in a voice so true
"Now I did not say I would marry you, but I would like to sit down"
I'm Hans Christian Andersen
Andersen's in town!
"The Ugly Duckling by... Hans the Cobbler"!
You're looking at a writer. A real writer.
Tomorrow, the newspaper will say,
"Hans Christian Andersen" all day!
- Was that what the newspaper wanted?
- Yes.
They've printed one of your stories!
And the way it happened is like a story in itself. Wait till you hear.
Peter, from now on, if anybody asks you who you're working for, you can say a writer.
You are working for a real writer!
"The Ugly Duckling by Hans the Cobbler."
I can hardly believe it!
Peter...
Can you imagine...
Can you imagine the schoolmaster's face?
One day, a newspaper arrives from Copenhagen.
He opens it up and he looks, and suddenly...
He can't believe his eyes!
"Hans Christian Andersen?" he says.
"Hans the cobbler?
"A story by Hans Christian Andersen?
"Hmm. Fine story." Have a bite.
- There's something on your hand.
- That must be from the printing machine.
Peter...
Look.
- "Royal Danish Ballet returns from tour."
- Yes, Peter.
She's back!
Peter, she's back!
What a day!
Everything is happening at once!
Hans, we promised some shoes for today.
I'll do it later. I couldn't possibly sit still.
She's back! I've got to walk! She's back!
Never before and never again
Never before and never again
No two people have ever been so in love
Been so in love
Been so in love - it's incredible
No two people have ever been so in love
As my lovey dove and I
This is unique, the positive peak
We are the most unusual couple on earth
No two people have ever mooned such a moon, juned such a June
Spooned such a spoon
What he means is that no two people have ever been so in tune
As my macaroon and I
And when we kiss
- And when we kiss - what verse is this?
- It's hysterical, it's historical
- Let me tell it
- Certainly, darling.
No two people have ever been so in love
Been so in love
It's impossible. No two people have ever been so in love
As my lovey dove and I
This is the cream, the very extreme
The sort of a dream you couldn't imagine at all
No two people have ever been so in love as my lovey dove and I
No two people have ever been so in love
Been so in love, been so in love
No two people have ever been so in love
As you and Mrs Hans Christian
Andersen!
Mrs Andersen.
Mr Andersen.
Mrs Andersen.
Mr Andersen.
Mr Andersen?
Mr Andersen?
Mr Andersen?
Mr Andersen?
Mr Andersen!
How sweet of you to be here the very moment we return.
How did you know we were going to do your ballet?
Never mind. Your real reward will come tomorrow night when I dance it for you.
You will come, won't you?
Perhaps you will have words for me by tomorrow night?
Come, Louise.
What would they say back in the village?
You and me getting ready to go to the opera house in Copenhagen.
To see my ballet!
Would they believe it? Never.
"One of the cobbler's stories", they'd say.
"How can the children believe them?"
But even I wouldn't dare make up a story like this - and it happens to be true.
Is it all right if I don't go with you?
What?
- I said is it all right if I don't go with you?
- No!
It's not all right if you don't go with me.
What's the matter with you anyway?
Something's wrong with you.
Come inside.
Now, what's the matter, Peter?
Come on. Out with it.
I've been trying to tell you something, Hans, all day.
All right, Peter. Tell me now.
It's hard for me, Hans.
I don't know how to say it.
Never mind. Just say it.
I tried once to tell you, but you wouldn't listen.
Then they went away, and I thought you'd forget about it.
- They?
- I don't like people who laugh at you.
It hurts me when people laugh at you.
Back in the village when they made fun of you, I wanted to kill them.
Laugh at me? What are you talking about, Peter?
Her and him. You don't understand them.
What don't I understand?
You're making up a story about them, like you do about everything else, only this time it's about them, not clocks and flowers and stars.
- She'll laugh at you, Hans!
- So that's it.
I thought so.
Is she laughing at me when she does my ballet?
Was she laughing at me when she kissed me?
- She kissed you?
- Yes.
You didn't know that, did you?
- I don't care. It's true what I'm saying.
- I'm sorry you said that, Peter.
You never lied to me before.
You don't have to come with me tonight.
Maybe you'd better see if you can find work with somebody else.
You're old enough now to be by yourself, and...
...I think we'd better part company altogether because...
...because I don't think we like each other any more.
I beg your pardon.
No one's allowed in before the performance.
I am Hans Christian Andersen.
- The author of the ballet they're doing.
- Oh, good evening.
Don't you read the posters outside your own theatre?
Make it lower.
Up, down again, around - that's it.
That's it.
Stay together.
Around...
Good. That's much better. Keep it up.
That's it. Now go around.
Come around this way.
Who are you? Get out of here at once.
Don't deliver shoes before a performance!
Leave them with the doorman.
- Try the arabesque again.
- The name is Andersen.
- Hans Christian Andersen.
- Andersen? The ballet writer!
I'd like to deliver these shoes to Mademoiselle Doro.
Be a good fellow and get out now.
- Will you move the big shell upstage?
- Yes, sir.
Go out front and watch your ballet.
- I'll give her the shoes myself.
- No! Don't you touch them.
You can't give them to her now.
No one sees her before an opening.
Can you show us where you want the shell?
I can't be everywhere at once.
Just move it on stage.
Will you please escort Mr Andersen to the stage door? Quietly but firmly.
But I have these...
If you please, I'd like to leave alone.
Not you again! Don't you understand this is no time to bother anybody?
Mademoiselle Doro would not agree with you.
Why am I plagued with authors on opening nights? Why?
- Overture in three minutes.
- In three minutes, we begin!
Ladies, take your places!
Open that door! Let me out of here!
I can see it.
I don't have to see her with my eyes.
I can see it all.
Come in!
- Good morning, madame.
- Good morning, Cline.
- It's not a very nice day, I'm afraid.
- It looks lovely to me, Cline.
And how good it feels to be back in my own room. It seems years.
That it does, and what a wonderful success last night!
I can hardly ever remember the audience being so excited.
It was the new ballet.
They were enchanted with it.
And it is enchanting. I love to dance it.
What a curious fellow he is.
- He never turned up at all.
- Who, madame?
Hans, the cobbler. You know?
I wonder if he was even there. Do you suppose he was there and was too shy...
- Good heavens!
- I thought you were fast asleep.
- The cobbler's locked in the prop room!
- What are you talking about?
I locked him up last night, just before the performance. I had to.
He insisted on giving you some shoes five minutes before the ballet began.
He never saw the ballet?
You kept him locked up?
- I forgot, I tell you.
- You big fool!
I had other things to think about just then!
Quickly, Cline. Go to the theatre and bring him back here.
That poor dear man!
And you, you monster, you'd better stay under there.
Try popping your head out and see what you get.
The lamp over it, I promise you!
Oh, Hans.
I shall call you Hans. What a dreadful thing to have happened! Are you all right?
It's just like him to have done such a thing. Come.
Sit down.
- Would you like a cup of chocolate?
- No, thank you.
You missed seeing the ballet.
We will do it again two nights from now, and you will see it then.
- But I did see the ballet.
- You did?
- Yes.
- How?
- I thought you were...
- I was, but I could hear the music.
I knew the story the music was telling.
I didn't have to see you dance with my eyes.
Oh, Hans, how very dear you are, and how I love to dance it.
I don't know quite why. It's very strange.
Even when we rehearsed it,
I felt something sad and tender.
- I don't know why.
- I know why.
You do? Tell me.
- I think it was your answer.
- My answer?
I let my heart speak to you with the story, and...
...last night, you answered me with yours.
Hans, tell me something. How did you come to write that story for me?
How else could I tell you how I felt?
That I knew how miserable you were with him?
Miserable? With my husband?
Yes, I don't think you knew I was there, but I saw the way he treated you.
I saw him slap you.
I heard you cry.
Oh, Hans...
- How else could a cobbler speak to you?
- It's arrived, my darling. It's here!
Good morning, Andersen. Your present, angel. My apologies for last night.
You must forgive me. It was your ballet
I was thinking of, not you.
Did you tell him what a great success it was? For a great lady of the ballet.
Open it! We shall be poor for the next year, but I had to have it for you.
The best part's on the other side.
Turn it over and read it.
Read it aloud. I'm not a poet like you,
Andersen, but once in a while, even a fool like me can speak of love.
Are you pleased, my darling?
Read it for me.
Not now, Niels. Later.
You're not shy suddenly? Never mind.
You can do anything you wish.
She danced like an angel.
I could cover you with kisses.
Please don't, Niels.
Haven't you forgiven me?
Andersen has, I'm sure.
She was furious at me for locking you up, but no harm has been done.
It's even rather amusing.
Don't you look so stern, my dear.
You were laughing about it yourself.
Don't tell me I didn't hear you laughing -
I did. Even under the covers.
- Be quiet.
- What's the matter with you, Doro?
Hans, it doesn't matter why you wrote the story for me.
It's a beautiful story, whatever the reason.
It's a lovely and tender story by itself, but I shall remember what you told me every time I dance it.
- Andersen, we haven't paid you for it.
- Niels, do be quiet.
We want to pay him, don't we?
We'd like you to write more for us.
- Have you any other stories we can use?
- No. That one was just an accident.
I don't think I'll be writing any more.
I guess it's all right to deliver these now.
Some shoes from the cobbler.
Thank you, Hans.
- But, Andersen, I...
- Niels, let him go. Goodbye, Hans.
Doro...
Doro, what is it, my darling?
Peter!
Peter! Peter!
Peter!
Hello, Peter.
Do you mind if I walk along beside you?
I don't see how I can help it.
We both seem to be going in the same direction, and there's only one road.
Are you going back to the village?
I'm going back to the village, too.
Bread and butter!
And you know something, Peter?
I'm never telling another story - not even to myself.
I've told my last story, Peter.
Especially to myself.
Cobbler, stick to your last.
If any man ever learned his lesson and learned it good, it's me.
- I think you'll go on telling stories.
- No, I won't.
- Yes, you will.
- No, I won't.
Why do you keep on saying that?
Why? Because you're Hans Christian Andersen.
That's why!
Peter!
You'll tell stories.
You'll write stories.
You'll even sing stories.
Over and over and over again.
I'm not such an ugly duckling
No feathers all stubby and brown
For, in fact, these birds, in so many words
Said, "Tsk! The best in town!
"Tsk! The best! Tsk! Tsk! The best!"
Remember your trip to Copenhagen? Tell us about it!
Wonderful, wonderful Copenhagen
Friendly old girl of a town
'Neath her tavern light
On this merry night, let us clink and drink one down
To wonderful, wonderful
Copenhagen...
- Tell us about the king! The king!
- Yes, the king!
The king is in the altogether, but altogether, the altogether
He's altogether as naked as the day that he was born
The king is in the altogether, but altogether, the altogether
It's altogether the very least the king has ever worn
Call the court physician, call an intermission...
Hans! My favourite, huh?
Thumbelina!
Though you're no bigger than my thumb
- Than my thumb
- Than my thumb
- Sweet Thumbelina, don't be glum
- Don't be glum
- Now, now, now
- Ah, ah, ah, come along
Everybody!
Thumbelina, Thumbelina, tiny little thing
Thumbelina dance, Thumbelina sing
Thumbelina, what's the difference if you're very small?
When your heart is full of love, you're nine feet tall!
Hans Christian Andersen!
Subtitles by SDI Media Group
Hello, Mr Kranz.
- I'd like to redeem my...
- I know! The trombone.
I always keep her hanging in the window so when you walk by you can see she is still there.
I keep my eyes on her.
Say, Mr Miller, where'd you got the money this time?
- Working in a gas station.
- And now you've got another band job?
Yep. I'm with Minton at the Sunset
Hotel. Chummy's gonna pick me up.
Your friend Chummy, why don't he hock something?
- He plays the piano.
- I see!
That's all we need! To schlep a piano in and out every once in a while.
That string of pearls, how much did you say that was?
I'd like to give my girl a birthday present.
Isn't it wonderful to be young?
He just got his trombone out of hock and he wants to buy a $100 necklace.
I'd like to give her this. Haven't seen her for a few years.
- You are engaged?
- No, not exactly.
We went around together when we were in college. University of Colorado.
$100. That's a lot of money, isn't it?
For a regular customer,
I make a special price.
- (CAR HORN)
- I guess that's Chummy.
A hundred dollars.
Here's for the horn.
- Thanks. Goodbye.
- Goodbye, Mr Miller.
- Where'd you get this one, Chummy?
- Made a deal on my Briscoe.
She's a beaut. 45 horsepower.
Only four years old.
- 45 horse...
- Come on, hop in. We gotta get goin'.
- Isn't this a darb, kid?
- Yeah, gee whiz!
- You bring my arrangement?
- You're sittin' on it.
But this is the Sunset Hotel, potted palms and marble stairs.
- Minton's band plays sweet.
- I know that.
Don't try to slip in that arrangement of yours tonight.
- We don't wanna lose this job.
- Stop worryin'. This is a classic.
I Dreamt I Dwelt In Marble
Halls, it's a classic!
When Minton hears this arrangement, he'll give us a job for life. Let's go.
Too bad you can't keep the trombone and hock the arrangement.
- You know where there's Venice?
- Italy.
No! Venice here. By the pier, with that big wheel.
- Oh, yeah.
- You boys go out there next Monday.
- This fellow Pollack, he has tryouts.
- Ben Pollack?
Ben Pollack. He gets together a new band.
They go for a long, long trip.
- How do you know?
- A fellow told me this morning.
- You boys go out there.
- Sure. Thanks a lot.
Next Monday?
That gives you a week to get your trombone out.
- You could work in a gas station.
- Not me.
I'm gonna work on arrangements.
For me, I'm glad for your business, Mr Miller, but why don't you give up this arranging and stick with the trombone?
That's a good question.
I wish I knew the answer.
But I have one idea up here in my head.
To me, music is more than just one instrument.
It's a whole orchestra playing together. See?
The only way I can express myself is to work out an arrangement.
See? Thanks for the tip.
Come on.
Great!
- Thanks, Ben.
- You're in. You're in.
- Who's next?
- I am.
I've done some arrangements...
I'm full up on arrangements.
I need more musicians.
I've been working on 'em all week.
They're in your style.
I appreciate that. Lay them on the piano, I'll try 'em some other time.
Uh-huh.
- My name's on the cover.
- Swell.
OK, who's next?
I am. My name's Schwartz.
Wilbur Schwartz.
Clarinet, eh? Sit down at the first chair and blow a little bit.
- What tune do you want me to play?
- Do you read at sight?
- Try me.
- Chummy, get him something to read.
One, two.
Hey, Glenn! Come on back.
Mr Pollack wants to talk to you.
He says your arrangement is a pip! Your arrangement!
I'm playing in the band and working on arrangements.
I got a two-week advance.
You are a regular Rockefeller!
- I want to thank you for everything.
- Don't mention about it.
I'm only glad it worked so good out.
About that string of pearls for my girl's birthday.
You said something about a special price for those.
For you it's $80. You pay me 40 down and $5 a week.
- Good enough.
- Shall I mail it for you?
I better take 'em with me.
I'm not sure of her address.
We're booked into Denver.
She lives right near there.
Ten, 20, 30, 40. There's the 40.
- And here is for the trombone.
- All right.
- Thank you very much.
- Same to you, and good luck.
I hope you stay out of pawnshops for a while.
- So do I! Goodbye.
- Goodbye, Mr Miller.
- Glenn, come on!
- A Pierce-Arrow?
Yeah! I got it for the old car and 100 bucks.
Much heavier. It'll hold the road better on a long trip.
If the band folds up, we can sell it to an undertaker.
Get in the back, I'll give you a ride in style.
Hurry, Glenn. We're due at the
Denver Palace in ten minutes.
- How much, sir?
- Oh, give us five.
Hello. I want Boulder 6-1-7-0.
How many?
I'll get it, Mother.
Hello?
Hello? Helen? How's my girl?
Your girl? Who is this?
Who is this? Is this Helen Burger?
Yes, but there must be some...
- Well, it's Glenn!
- Glenn? Glenn who?
It's Glenn Miller!
Glenn Miller?
Oh, Glenn Miller.
Well, now, honestly. After two years and not a word.
Didn't you get my card?
The one you wrote a year ago last Christmas?
Well, I haven't heard from you either.
I didn't know where you were.
I don't even know where you are now.
I'm down here in Denver. I want to see you. How about tonight?
Oh, I'm sorry. I have a date.
Couldn't you break it? I'm with
Pollack and we're leavin' tomorrow.
Now, honestly, I...
Glenn, come on, hurry it up.
I'll see you later, then. Gee, there's a lot I want to tell you.
- Glenn, wait a minute...
- I'll be out right after I finish work. Bye.
Glenn? Hello?
Well, honestly.
- Hi, Dad.
- Going out, Helen?
This is a new wrinkle, isn't it?
Ed keeping you waiting.
It isn't Ed tonight. It's a man I haven't seen for years.
Not Ed? What's happened?
It must be serious for you to break a date with Ed.
No, Mother. Glenn isn't my type.
I guess I'm just too practical or unromantic or something.
I want a man like Ed who's got a factory or a store or something solid.
I certainly don't want a wandering nomad like Glenn Miller.
What's he do, this Glenn Miller?
I don't really know except he said he was in Denver for overnight.
He's gonna pick me up after work.
He must be a hard worker.
It's nearly 9:00 now.
It is?
Well.
Oh! There's really no excuse for this!
The least he could've done was phone.
- Unless he was in an accident.
- Call him.
How can I? I don't know where he is.
If I'm going hunting in the morning, I've gotta get to bed.
Sam's picking me up at the crack of dawn.
- Doesn't look as if he's coming tonight.
- It certainly doesn't!
Even if he did come,
I wouldn't see him.
Then we can all go to bed?
Well, so much for Mr Glenn Miller.
I'll never see him again.
(GLENN, CALLING SOFTLY) Helen?
Helen?
Helen?
Helen!
Helen! (WHISTLES)
- Oh, there you are.
- Glenn Miller, you go away.
I don't want to go away. I came to see you. We have a date.
- Shh! You'll wake up the neighbourhood.
- How can I talk to you?
You keep quiet. I'll be right down.
Hello, Helen.
What's the matter with you, coming at this hour?
I told you I'd come out after work.
I got here as quick as I could.
- Shh. Be quiet.
- You haven't changed a bit, have you?
Just as feisty as ever, and just as pretty too.
I must be pretty! Wearing this kimono and my hair up in curlers.
Is that what they are?
Come on, sit down.
- It's cold out here.
- Come on. It's a beautiful night.
Gee.
There. I bought you a present for your birthday.
My birthday? That isn't until next November.
This is for your last birthday.
Why, they're beautiful! But I can't accept a present like this.
Why not? They're not real.
I wish they were.
I got 'em out in Los Angeles in a pa... In a, uh... A, uh...
I'll get you some real ones someday.
Honestly.
Two years and not a word and then a present like this.
You know, with some people you don't have to write. You just know.
- I knew you'd be here.
- Oh, you did?
Sure. I knew you'd be just the same.
Just sitting around waiting for you to show up, I suppose?
"How is my girl?" you said.
Well, you happen to be wrong!
I've been engaged to Ed
Healey for nearly a year.
Did it occur to you that I might not care if I ever saw you again?
No, it never did.
Never.
- Never.
- Why can't I ever stay mad at you?
You had me worried there for a minute.
Honestly!
If you were anybody else,
I would never speak to you again.
Look at me. Sitting here in this kimono and my hair all...
- Those curlers.
- Terrible, isn't it?
Helen, now look, I've got an idea.
Come with me to Fort Morgan.
I'm gonna introduce you to my folks.
- Now?
- Right now.
People do sleep between 3am and 6am.
They'll be crazy about you.
- And they'll give us breakfast.
- How do we get there?
- I'll get a taxi.
- A taxi to Fort Morgan?
- Sure.
- That's so extravagant.
- It isn't far.
- Maybe I can get the family car.
Wonderful. Wait a minute.
Let me try these on for size, hm?
There.
Uh-oh.
- Mr Burger, I...
- Take it easy, son.
I'm just going hunting, for jackrabbits.
- Glenn!
- It's Glenn!
Hi, Herb. How are you?
Glad to see you. Hello, Irene.
- What a surprise! I had no idea.
- Hello, Mother.
Glad to see you. Mother, this is...
You don't need to tell me.
You're Helen!
We've been hearing about you for years.
Why, yes. I'm very happy to meet you.
- Daddy'll be down in a minute.
- Dean and Velna?
They're fine! I'll show you a picture of the baby.
- Sure.
- She your girl, Glenn?
That's right, Herb.
Are you and Glenn gonna get married?
Don't ask that! We just take such things for granted.
- How are you, son?
- Fine.
- And you're Helen. Welcome to the family.
- Thank you.
- You gonna get these kids some breakfast?
- I certainly am!
You might've let us know where you are and what your plans are.
We have to ask Helen, eh?
I'll bet he tells you everything.
Oh, no, Mr Miller. I seem to be the last person he tells.
- Yeah.
- Well, come on.
- You like hotcakes, Helen?
- Yes.
Mom makes pretty good ones...
 Little brown jug, how I love thee
 Ha-ha-ha, you and me
 Little brown jug, how I love thee... 
Good old Colorado U.
It hasn't changed a bit.
No, it's just as pretty as ever.
We still have time. Let's walk across the campus for old times' sake.
- I'd love to.
- Come on.
- Wish I didn't have to leave so soon.
- I do too.
Listen. It's the Glee
Club rehearsing.
- I love that song.
- What, Little Brown Jug?
That's sort of a tin-eared tune.
Why, that's one of my favourites.
My dad used to sing it to me when I was a little girl. I guess that's why.
- They sing it pretty well.
- Mm-hm.
When something's really wonderful like that, I know it.
I get kind of a funny feeling up the back of my neck.
That's how I can tell. Sort of makes my hair stand on end.
- Is that so?
- Yeah.
Looks pretty normal from here.
It just feels that way!
- Remember that lake?
- Yes, I do.
- Where do you go from here?
- We're heading east.
Chicago, New York. We're booked into the Club Fifty there.
- Ever been to New York?
- No.
Neither have I. I hear it's quite a town.
You're certainly seeing
America, aren't you?
You think I'm kinda rudderless, don't you?
Wandering over the country with the band.
- Yes, I guess I do.
- But I'm not, though.
I know exactly where I'm going.
I know exactly what I want to do.
You do?
I'm not gonna be a sideman all my life, a trombone player.
I'm gonna have a band all of my own.
I'm gonna play my own kind of music.
I... It's hard to explain, but a band...
A band oughta have a sound all of its own, oughta have a personality.
- Sort of like a person.
- Uh-huh.
How do you get this different sound?
You see, the arrangements, the way you score each one of the individual instruments.
Some bands have that sound already, like Pollack, but it's not the right sound, not for me.
- What is?
- I don't know.
I don't know.
I haven't found it yet.
But someday I'm gonna find it and when I do...
You'll find it. I'm sure you will.
- You are?
- Hey, Glenn!
There's Chummy. He found it all right. Goodbye.
It's been wonderful seeing you.
Goodbye. I'm comin'!
You'll be hearing from me.
Wait and see.
- Come on, boy, let's go.
- All right, all right.
Bye.
Honestly.
( MELLOW VERSION OF
GOOD NIGHT LADIES)
How about one more?
One more number?
We can't, kids. We're leaving for Atlantic City.
We'll be back in a couple of months.
Thanks a lot. Swell.
Fellas, listen just a minute before you start packing up.
The bus leaves from the hotel for
Atlantic City tomorrow morning at 10:30.
Everybody be on time.
Don't be late, will ya? OK.
Ben, like I told you,
I guess this is where I get off.
I want to thank you for everything.
- You know what you're doin'?
- Yeah.
I wanna stick around New York for a while. I want to do some studying.
Just when the band's really startin' to take on.
I know all that. I appreciate everything you've done for me and I wish you all the luck in the world.
If there's... Any time you want me to do an arrangement for you, just let me know.
That's an idea. Well, so long, kid. A lotta luck.
- Thanks for everything.
- Goodbye.
- You're really serious about this?
- Yeah.
Still got that crazy idea in your head, that sound?
Hey, Don?
This is Chummy MacGregor.
This is Don Haynes.
- Hi.
- Glad to meet ya. You're the band booker.
Gonna try and get Glenn some work arranging.
- It's an awful lonely town.
- I know.
I wish we could stick together, but
I've been eating for two years now.
It's gotten to be a habit.
I don't think I can break it.
I know.
Well, good luck, kid. Hope you find a friendly pawn shop.
- Yeah, bye, Chummy.
- So long.
- Glenn!
- Hi, Don. How are you?
- What are you doin'?
- Not much.
Listen, Red Nichols is getting together a pit band for a new musical, Girl Crazy.
I know you're still looking for that sound but it's been two years.
- You won't find it on an empty stomach.
- I sure can't.
A lot of your friends are in the band -
Benny Goodman, Babe Russin.
- It's a great chance. It'll run all season.
- I guess I better take it.
I'll call you tomorrow.
I gotta run.
Thanks a lot.
 My wife and I live all alone in a little log hut we call our own
 She loves gin and I love rum,
I tell you, we have lots of fun
 Ha-ha-ha, you and me, little brown jug, don't I love thee?
 Ha-ha-ha, you and me, little brown jug, don't I love thee?
If I'd a cow that gave such milk,
I'd clothe her in the finest silk
 I'd feed her on the choicest hay and milk her forty times a day
 Ha-ha-ha, you and me, little brown jug, don't I love thee?
 Ha-ha-ha, you and me, little brown jug, don't I love thee? 
Helen, it's for you.
- Who is it?
- Don't forget to turn off the roast.
Who is it?
Hello.
Helen, can you come to
New York right away?
Glenn! I don't know whether I can or not.
But for heaven's sake, why?
So we can get married.
I need you, Helen. I can't wait any longer.
Glenn, I'm engaged!
That's right. It'll be a very short engagement.
No, you don't understand.
I'm engaged to Ed. Ed Healey.
Ed Healey? The fellow you told me about two years ago?
- Yes.
- If you haven't gotten married in two years...
People just don't rush into getting married!
Nonsense, Helen. You come to New York, marry me and get this thing settled.
I can't just walk out on him!
There's a train leaving Denver at 11:30 tomorrow night. Can you get that?
Glenn, you just wait a minute.
We can talk everything over when you get here.
Honestly!
Call me from Denver so I can meet the train. My number is Pennsylvania 6-5000.
Pennsylvania 6-5000.
Pennsylvania 6-5-0-0-0.
And, Helen, bring a warm coat.
It gets kinda chilly here this time of year. Goodbye.
Glenn!
What beats me is how she got
Ed to drive her into Denver.
Helen!
- Hi. You look wonderful.
- I've only come to talk things over.
We can talk it over on the way.
I'm not going to let you rush me into getting married.
Of course not. But there isn't much time.
We have to pick up the licence, then be uptown at the church by 7:00.
- I have to be in the theatre by eight.
- Wait a minute, Glenn.
Gee, I'm so glad you're here.
- Where are we going?
- The theatre.
You're gonna see a wonderful show,
Girl Crazy. I got you a box seat.
- No, I mean, on our honeymoon.
- The Pennsylvania Hotel.
Don's arranged for a big suite.
He's sending up the baggage.
The Pennsylvania Hotel?
Isn't that extravagant?
If we'd been married in Boulder and come to New York on our honeymoon, we'd be staying at a hotel.
- I suppose.
- Of course we would. Here's the ticket.
I'll meet you after the show.
I wanna check if it's...
- What? What are you looking at?
- The man I just married.
The first time I even suspected anything was when I found myself packing.
And then when you met me at the station and kissed me.
It was that kiss that convinced you.
I kinda figured that'd do the trick.
And if you don't mind, I'd like to be convinced all over again.
 I'm bidin' my time
 Cos that's the kind of guy I'm
 Beginnin' on a Monday, right through Sunday
 Bidin' my time
 Next year
 This year
 I'm bidin' my time
 Cos that's the kind of guy I'm
 Stranger, so long
 I'll just go 'long
 Bidin', bidin'
 Bidin' my time 
Sixth floor.
I'm sorry about the rice.
It was kinda embarrassing, though.
I had a feeling people were staring at us.
- Nonsense.
- No. Here.
I'm gonna carry you over the threshold.
 Here comes the bride
 All dressed in white
 And there's the groom standing right by her side 
Everybody, this is Helen.
Ben! This is the fella that gave me my first job.
This is Helen. You remember
Gene Krupa from the show.
Here's Babe Russin, the tenor saxophone.
You remember Chummy.
There's Polly and Don.
We decided to celebrate.
We're gonna have a party.
- Here?
- No, Harlem. Connie's Inn.
Oh. Well, that's awful nice of you.
Helen just arrived. We've had the wedding and the show
- and Helen's a little tired.
- I'm not.
You've been on the train for three days.
If your friends are nice enough to give us a party, we should go!
- Wonderful!
- We've already got reservations.
 Yes, Basin Street
 Is the street
 Where the folks really meet... 
Who's he?
Who? Louis Armstrong!
 Yeah, yeah, yeah, really, yeah
 Yeah, this is a treat
 A-swingin' on Basin
Street, yeah 
Hey, Gene! Gene Krupa there!
What'd you say? Come here, man. Gimme some skin.
- How you doin'?
- Won't you join us?
Babe Russin! Don't you wanna swing with the boys?
- Is that gin?
- Yeah.
Glenn, come here, daddy. Beat out one like you did with Ben Pollack.
Be right back.
- Nice goin', Glenn.
- You were wonderful!
It's fun but I don't kid myself.
When I start playing jazz with
Louis Armstrong and Gene Krupa,
I'm lucky if I come in third, isn't that right?
- Where have you been, Mr Miller?
- Dr Schillinger!
- It must be over a year.
- Glad to see you. This is my wife.
- Very pleased to meet you.
- You remember Chummy.
I missed you but I can see you had a very charming distraction.
Yeah, well, glad to see you, Doctor.
- Who's Dr Schillinger? Were you sick?
- No, he's a musician.
He worked out a new method of composition. I studied with him.
- Why did you stop?
- I got busy and it was expensive.
Want something else to eat?
- Maybe we'd better call it a day.
- No, I'm having a...
- No, I really had a wonderful time.
- Yes, dear.
- Bye.
- Good night.
 Ooh-ooh, Basin Street
 Boo-boo boo-boo-boo 
Well, get you!
Here.
Let's try it again.
Helen?
Helen?
- Good morning.
- Honey, what are you doing up at this hour?
This hour? I've been up since seven.
Well, come here.
- Good morning.
- Good morning.
7:00? It must be dark outside.
No, it is not. I've been getting up at this hour all of my life.
But you haven't been staying up until 4:00 in the morning.
Well, no, that's true.
Only when you were around.
That's right. Your father on the porch with his shotgun.
- What have you been doing?
- The ironing.
The ironing? Honey, this is a hotel.
All you have to do is pick up the phone.
They have people to do that.
- But did you see what they charge?
- No.
- It's just terrible.
- Is that so?
I don't think we should waste our money like that.
- Nobody can say I married a spendthrift.
- No, sir.
I'm a penny-pinching miser.
I'm the kind of wife that steals money out of your pockets and puts it in the bank.
- Would you really do that?
- Sure. I've already started.
- Hi, dear.
- Hi.
It's a long movie. We have two hours before the next stage show.
- Have a good time?
- I like the show. But the music!
Well, you know the music.
- That isn't the way you want to play, is it?
- No, but I like pit work.
It pays well. You get to stay in one place.
Glenn, I've been thinking. How much does that Dr Schillinger charge?
He's pretty expensive.
I don't know exactly.
I haven't worked with him for years.
That's just exactly what I mean. Why not?
I don't know. I...
What happened to that dream of yours? What about that sound?
Well, I've been working on that, Helen.
It's an uphill grind. My chance will come one of these days.
To tell you the truth, Glenn,
I've been sort of disappointed.
You mean that?
If I started to study again, we'd have to make all sorts of sacrifices.
I'd have to give up those record dates.
Darling, I don't want to live in a fancy hotel.
We could get an awfully cute little apartment.
I just want you to keep on trying.
I've sort of let you down, haven't I?
A little.
I'm sorry, Helen.
You're right. I should start to study again. I...
Why don't I call Schillinger right now?
See if he'll take me back.
I have his phone number here...
It's Trafalgar 7-5-0-9-8.
- Eight.
Well... Well...
- Helen?
- Yes?
- Where are my glasses?
- Right here! Why don't you put them on?
I'll have to get some glasses to find my glasses.
What were you playing? It's lovely.
A little exercise I'm working out for Schillinger. I hope he likes it.
Does that mean you won't be able to use it?
No, that doesn't make any difference.
It's not that good, though.
I think it is.
- You like it as good as Little Brown Jug?
- No.
But I think you should do something with it.
I suppose you could make a song out of it.
Get somebody to write lyrics.
Have to get a title.
What's a good title?
Well, it should be soft and romantic. Sort of like moonlight.
Moonlight. Young lover under his sweetheart's window.
You wouldn't be thinking of a certain night in Boulder?
There wasn't any moonlight.
Just a shotgun!
I know. And you didn't serenade me either.
I didn't have a chance.
Serenade. There's a title.
- Serenade in the Moonlight.
- How about Moonlight Serenade?
Moonlight Serenade? Not bad.
- It's kinda pretty.
- Moonlight Serenade.
(UP-TEMPO)  I stand at your gate
 And the song that I sing is of moonlight
 I stand and I wait
 For the touch of your hand in the June night
 The roses are sighin'
 A moonlight serenade
 Let us stray till the break of day
 In love's valley of dreams
 Just you and I
 The summer sky
 A heavenly breeze kissing the trees
 So don't let me wait
 Come to me tenderly in the June night
 I stand at your gate
 And I sing you a song in the moonlight
 A love song, my darling
 A moonlight serenade 
- What have they done to my tune?
- It wasn't very good.
The song is supposed to be a ballad, not a hootchy-kootchy dance!
They made a production number out of it.
And that arrangement, Holy Moses!
Why wouldn't he use yours?
Every band leader wants his own arrangement.
So do you! If you had your own band, this sort of thing wouldn't happen.
- Of course.
- Let's go. We have a lot to do.
We need an instrument truck, and a car.
That's two down payments.
If we use Chummy's car...
Wait till you see what I got now.
Snappiest job on the road.
It's a big Phaeton. Even got a separate windshield for the back seat.
You can always be the first one to arrive in town.
We'll need music stands and a copyist.
We can do the copying. Like the old days, no food but plenty of manuscript paper.
What do you mean, no food?
- We'll need at least 1,800.
- Then we're all set.
Honey, he means we need
$1,800 to start the band.
Yes.
- We don't need anything but good luck.
- What's this?
"The Glenn Miller Band Account"?
Now eat your dinner.
Hey. Did you get all that money out of my pockets?
Mm-hm.
We're late for the job now.
I better go on ahead.
- You fellas get there as quick as you can.
- All right, Glenn.
Practically a new tyre too.
Helen, you don't look very well.
I'm just fine.
I'm just a little tired.
And poor Glenn is up all night working on the arrangements and I have to sort of take care of the bookkeeping.
Has the business manager given you the big financial statement yet?
No, but I will. We left New
York with $42 in the bank.
After six months, we've paid for the truck and the car.
That leaves a balance of 48.
In short, we're making exactly $1 a month.
So in ten years we'll have made $120.
It takes time for a new band to catch on.
It sure does.
I don't know. One night we pack 'em in and they love us.
The next six dates we die.
We don't seem to be getting anywhere, and we don't deserve to!
I just haven't been able to hit the right combination.
I just still haven't got that sound.
Glenn, maybe if you stop playing.
- Touch!
- I'm sorry. I didn't mean...
I know what you mean. Get a baton and start leading. No.
Once you step out in front of the boys, you can never be a sideman again.
I'll stick to my trombone.
I've got some good news for a change.
I talked to Si Schribman. He runs the State Ballroom in Boston.
He's booked you in for the week of the 22nd.
That means six half-hour air spots. That's what counts.
- It sure does!
- Imagine! A whole week in one town.
I could even get the washing and the mending done.
- Let's all drink to Boston!
- I think we should.
Good ol' Boston.
Glenn, why don't you ever use Moonlight Serenade?
Don't we have enough trouble without resurrecting that?
- Well, I liked it.
- So did I.
That's two of us. Now, if we can just find a third.
- How's she look?
- Could be worse. Don't know how.
You need a new axle housing, an axle shaft, ring gear and pinion, differential gear case.
- How long'll it take?
- A few days once I get the parts.
- You don't have 'em here?
- Don't have many calls for ring gears.
Might have to go to Woodstock soon as it stops snowing.
- It could be worse.
- Yeah.
There's Helen. Get a hold of Schribman?
No, I couldn't get Boston.
The telephone lines are down.
Chummy, you and Helen better try and make Boston.
Tell Schribman we'll be there as soon as we can.
He's probably guessed what happened.
- He wouldn't cancel on us.
- No, we'll get there all right.
We can't lose that week in Boston.
Go ahead. Bye, dear.
- Take care.
- Yeah.
- You Mr Miller?
- Yeah.
Man left a message. Your wife's sick.
They got her to the hospital.
- What hospital?
- Boston Memorial.
Mr Miller, she's a very sick girl.
We gave her a transfusion but we're lucky this happened when it did.
A few months further along and we might've lost the mother as well as the child.
I had no idea that she was...
- All right, Doctor.
- Thank you.
Just for a minute.
Helen.
The truck all right?
Five and a quarter, cash on the barrel head. Take it or leave it, boys.
Better than the others.
I guess we'll have to take it.
Kinda leaves us in a spot. It's
$900 to pay the boys in the band.
With my car? How much'll you give us?
- You're not gonna do it.
- I can sell my own car if I want to.
Four hundred. That makes nine and a quarter for all three of 'em.
- This isn't your problem.
- Why isn't it? I wanna get paid off, too.
You got a deal. Just one condition.
I need the car long enough to drive the boys to the station.
Yes, that can be arranged.
Fellas, pile in. I'll drive you to the station.
Thank you, Chummy.
- Hi, dear. How do you feel?
- Fine.
- You look much better.
- Good.
The doctor said if I behave myself, I'll be up in a few days.
Good.
I've made up my mind about something, young lady.
If I ever go on the road again, you're gonna stay in that nice apartment of ours on East 57th Street.
You just listen to me, Glenn Miller.
You enticed a little country girl to run away and marry you and now you're hooked with her.
And I'm not gonna let you go gallivanting around the country without me.
You're hooked with a no-good itinerant musician.
- I'm not complaining.
- I know. You never do.
But I know how you wanted kids.
I want to tell you something else
I've made up my mind about.
We're not gonna have just one child. We're gonna have two!
We're gonna have a boy and a girl.
- Glenn, I can't.
- I know.
The doctor told me, but I mean it.
There'll be two kids meant for us.
Somewhere we're gonna find them.
I hope so.
Who sent these flowers?
- The boys in the band.
- Wasn't that nice?
They're sweet.
What's happened? Any dates?
No. No dates.
There's no band.
We had to sell the cars and pay off the boys.
Chummy had to sell his Phaeton.
Isn't that a shame?
Poor Chummy really loved that car.
Glenn, you had a good band.
It was getting better all the time. It wasn't your fault.
It's my fault all right!
I'm broke, I'm in debt,
I don't even have a job.
I told you before, you've gotten mixed up with a no-good itinerant musician.
- And I love him.
- And I love you.
It's almost worth it.
It's the first time you've told me that since the day we were married.
Come in.
- Mrs Miller?
- Yes.
I thought so. I can come in?
Well, yes, of course.
I brought you some flowers.
Oh. Well, thank you very much.
- They're all right?
- They're lovely.
I'm a bachelor, I got no wife to tell me these things.
- Well, they're very pretty.
- Yeah.
I heard all about the band and how you were sick.
Such a shame. I can sit down a minute?
Yes, please.
"Compliments of the
State Ballroom."
- Is this a joke?
- I shoulda said so right away.
No, that's me. Si Schribman.
Si Schribman! If I'd known who you were...
I know. Don Haynes said you wanted to give me a piece of your mind.
That's why I came here.
Maybe we can exchange pieces of mind.
I'm not really such an ogre.
I didn't like cancelling you out.
But an old widow lady, 75, she owns that ballroom.
If I don't have a band,
I don't pay the rent.
If I don't pay the rent, that old lady don't eat.
It's a bad situation.
If she would only die, God forbid, then I could run it like I like.
- It finished us. You know that.
- Yeah.
- We had to break up the band.
- I know.
I heard the band. It was good.
Not great, mind you, but good, very good.
We were just getting started. Well, now I don't know what we'll do.
Just don't you worry, young lady. Get well, and don't worry about the band.
That's easy to say.
I believe in Glenn and I believe what he's trying to do, so naturally I worry.
I tell you, you send him over, he should see me.
With my own money that don't go to the widow,
- I sometimes invest in bands.
- Do you mean that?
Would I make myself so much trouble if I didn't?
But there's a problem.
I know Glenn.
He's down right now and he won't accept help.
I don't think he'd risk somebody else's money.
I never even met your husband and I like him already.
You just leave it to me.
I'll cook up something.
Thank you very much for coming.
And I'm sorry I was so ungracious.
Who was ungracious? We got along fine exchanging pieces of mind.
- Goodbye.
- Bye.
I know you don't want a band but I'm stuck.
But this Charley Firman sneaks a band right out from under my nose.
- I don't have any men. No money.
- I'll give you the money. Here.
Five hundred. Six hundred.
A thousand.
There. You got the money.
Now, go get the men.
I've tried all sorts of combinations.
I never found out what I was looking for.
If I start again, I've got to have an entirely different kind of a band.
Different tunes. I wanna try something radical.
Fine. Go get radical, but just get going!
I gotta have something in here making a noise the kids can dance to.
OK.
- Let's have the five saxes right in there.
- Five saxes?
And the trombones over there.
And the four trumpets right behind them.
Four trombones and four trumpets!
When they play, what's gonna hold the roof on?
Five saxes and a trumpet lead.
Maybe it's good and maybe it ain't, but it's radical.
Let's try this.
Remember this is a ballad, so take it nice and easy, don't bruise it.
Joe, you stand up so I can get a balance between you and the saxophones.
All right, here we go.
One, two.
What's the matter?
- He cut his lip.
- Let's see.
Oh, no. You really split it open.
You better have it looked at.
- I'm sorry, Glenn.
- Go on, Joe. Take care of it.
Oh, no.
All right, take five, boys.
- Is it bad?
- He'll be out for weeks.
- You get more tough breaks...
- Just when you got a good sound.
It isn't what I want but if we could've worked on it...
- You can't find another trumpet blower?
- Not with Joe's range.
All the arrangements have a trumpet lead?
He had to hurt his lip the day before you open.
What are we gonna do?
Postpone the opening?
- Poor old widow lady.
- We're not gonna postpone anything.
We'll open tomorrow if I have to stay up all night and rewrite the arrangement.
- You can't. It's impossible.
- Wait a minute!
Just a minute. I have an idea.
Willie Schwartz could play those parts on clarinet. Why not?
You see? Clarinet lead. Why not?
Get me lots of manuscript paper.
Can I use your office?
Sure.
Clarinet lead. Why not? And, Don, call Helen, tell her not to worry.
Tell her I'll be here all night.
Clarinet lead.
And I can harmonise it real tight, all in the same octave.
Four saxes and a clarinet.
He better stay up all night.
He looks like he's got it, maybe.
Listen to those kids!
There's no maybe about it.
That's it, that's the sound.
Thank you.
Here's a brand-new number by Jerry Gray.
I hope you like it as much as we do.
I, uh, bought you a present for your birthday.
My birthday? That isn't till next November.
This is for your last birthday.
- Oh, Glenn!
- They're just real.
Here, let me try 'em on for size.
There.
Hm. Not bad.
I forgot to tell you the name of that tune.
We call it String Of Pearls.
- Hi, Mother, Dad!
- Hi, Glenn.
You rested up ready for the big night?
We've had a wonderful time with little Stevie.
- Quite a boy. Big for his age.
- Isn't he?
I can't tell you how much it's meant to us to have him.
- Is everything all set?
- Yes, dear.
- Did you get Helen out of the house?
- Oh, yes.
- Where'd she go?
- I suppose she's shopping.
A girl doesn't have a tenth wedding anniversary every day!
- You sure she doesn't suspect anything?
- Oh, no.
- Is everything all set back here?
- Oh, yes.
I think Helen'll get a big kick out of this.
She certainly will, Glenn.
I've been lookin' about.
Quite a place you got here.
It's beautiful, Glenn.
- Paid for, is it?
- Yes, it's paid for.
- Must be doin' pretty well.
- We hear him every night on that radio!
That's only 15 minutes.
Don't suppose it pays much.
Then there's the records. And he's playing at the Hotel Pennsylvania.
How much do they pay for playing on one of those records?
- We get three cents a record.
- Three cents?
Have to sell a heap of records to make it worthwhile.
But they do, dear!
- Let's go see Stevie.
- No, Helen wants us to wait.
Why? Come on. Sure, we can go on up there.
- Hi. Stevie and I have a surprise for you.
- You do?
- Let's go up to the nursery.
- Come on.
How many copies of a record do they sell, son?
Moonlight Serenade, we sold about 800,000 copies.
- Did you say 800,000?
- That's right.
What's...
Look what just arrived.
This is Stevie's new baby sister.
- Can I pick her up?
- I think so. She's your daughter.
Well, well, well.
So you're Jonnie Dee! Look, she's beautiful! Isn't she?
Look at those red cheeks.
Stevie, look at your baby sister.
Isn't she beautiful?
- You sure surprised him!
- I've been planning it for months.
- I told 'em I just had to have her today.
- How old is she?
- Six weeks today.
- Old lady.
- She's a hungry old woman.
- This is gonna take some expert action.
Her young father's gonna feed her.
Let's have the bottle.
Here, now. Here we go.
All right, Jonnie Dee.
There we are.
How's your appetite?
There! Is this hot enough?
That's a good girl.
The kid's starved.
- Helen, we'll be late for the theatre.
- Coming.
- I'll get the car.
- All right, dear.
Glenn, I've been figuring. 800,000 records at three cents apiece, that's $24,000.
- That's right.
- Just for one record?
Well, you certainly are doing well at that!
All right, boys, right over here.
You all set? All right.
Helen, come on!
I'm coming!
(ALL) Congratulations!
What a surprise!
- Oh, Mother!
- Darling!
Oh, I'm glad to see you!
- Polly, Don. How are you?
- It's a wonderful surprise!
- We sort of surprised each other.
- Yes, we did!
I've got another surprise.
The band has a number, and that's exactly what it is, a number.
This is based on a telephone number that was kind of important to you and me, Helen, about ten years ago.
Here we go. One. Two.
Now, listen to this. Now, watch.
Pennsylvania 6-5000!
- Remember?
- Yes!
Pennsylvania 6-5000!
Would you like to make this a really memorable evening?
- Dance with me.
- In front of all these people?
In all the years we've been married you've never danced with me.
- And I may never get another chance.
- Here we go.
- Now.
- (RINGING)
- Pennsylvania 6-5000!
- Good.
- Hi, Joe.
- Hi, Glenn.
Glad to see ya.
That's good.
Come on, don't stand around.
Come on! Dance it up!
Come on, let's try something.
- That's pretty good. Let's try that again.
- All right.
I think I better go back to the trombone.
You sit down there.
All right, you.
- (RINGING)
- Pennsylvania 6-5-0-0-0!
I'm kinda glad you called me that night.
So am I. All right, let's have something to eat.
Come on. Come on, dear.
- We're cutting a record of that.
- A record?
- Three cents?
- Right.
That's my boy!
You oughta use that number in your picture.
Picture?
Glenn and the boys are gonna do a movie in the fall.
- Are you gonna be a movie star?
- Yes, Mother.
I'm gonna play Tarzan and swing from the trees playing my trombone.
I'd like to propose a toast.
To Glenn and Helen, who serve the best food in town.
Besides, the price is right. We can remember when it wasn't like this.
May you be as happy together always as you are tonight.
Thank you, Chummy.
That was a very nice speech.
It oughta be,
I worked on it all day!
- You did?
- (LAUGHTER)
I thought your special number was gonna be Helen's favourite, Little Brown Jug.
He'd never do that. He hates it.
I knew this would come up sooner or later.
So I have an anniversary present for my good wife and on the card it says,
"Ha-ha-ha, you and me
"We hardly ever disagree
"So here you are, this will be
"The one brown jug you'll get from me."
- Roll 'em for a take.
- M3-45, take one.
Here we go.
One, two, three, four.
All right. Save it.
- Hello, everybody.
- Hi, Helen.
Well, hi, dear.
- I thought you'd like lunch.
- I sure would.
I brought the mail.
Chummy, we still have a little time.
Why don't you go over At Last?
Let's go up to the control booth.
- Anything wrong?
- No, no.
Come on, sit down, honey.
Helen, I wanted to talk to you about...
With this picture deal and the record sales and everything,
- we're pretty well fixed.
- Yes.
And, no matter what happens, you and the kids,
- you're in good shape.
- Yes, I know.
Can you come to Men's
Wardrobe at two?
- Yeah.
- Thank you.
So, I thought that...
What I'm trying to get at...
I've been thinking... Yeah?
On Tuxedo Junction, we'll have a wax right after lunch.
Fine. Thanks very much.
- So...
- Open the letter from the War Department.
- I'm sure it's your commission.
- How do you know?
I've known it for months. I knew it was only a question of time.
I just put in for it two weeks ago. I guess you found out about it before I did.
Go on, open it. I want to know what to call you.
Let's see.
This is it all right.
Captain. Captain Alton G Miller.
Serial number 0-4-5-0-5-2-7-3.
How soon will you be leaving, Captain Miller?
I don't know. It usually takes about a month.
Don wants to go with me, so do some of the boys.
- Are you gonna have your own band?
- I hope so.
You know, all the kids that liked our music are in the service.
- That's the reason I...
- I understand.
I think you'll look very handsome in uniform.
What do you think about it?
Are you upset?
Of course I'm upset.
I don't want you to go but I guess I'd be even more upset if you didn't.
- They sound good.
- Do we have to play this kind of music?
We've marched to this music for a hundred years.
- That's what I mean.
- We're not gonna change now, Captain.
We gotta do better than this for General Arnold.
In all my 27 years in the Army
I have never witnessed a more flagrant breach of military decorum.
- Sorry, Colonel.
- And walking through a reviewing column!
- I had to get to the band, sir.
- Then playing blues!
You made a laughing stock of this entire unit, and in front of General Arnold!
- I had no such intentions.
- What was your intention?
Blasting out right in the General's face!
The men seemed tired, sir.
- The men's condition is my responsibility.
- Yes, sir.
I must warn you that your conduct calls for disciplinary action.
- Yes, sir.
- (KNOCK ON DOOR)
Come in.
Just wanted to say goodbye, we're due in Washington tonight.
General Arnold, it's been a pleasure.
- I'm sorry that...
- Aren't you Captain Glenn Miller?
- Yes, sir.
- I want to congratulate you on your band.
- Thank you, sir.
- Great morale builder.
The effect was astonishing!
Keep up the good work.
- Yes, sir.
- I like your music myself.
Makes me think of home.
My children play your records day and night.
- May I make a suggestion, sir?
- Certainly.
I'd like to suggest that I be given the authority to form my own band.
Play my kind of music.
Most of my men are in the service.
If we can be sent overseas,
I know we can be of value.
As you say, I think we can give the boys a piece of home.
I must say I agree with you, Miller.
- I'll see what I can do.
- Thank you, sir.
Glenn!
Well, gee, I didn't expect this!
General Arnold brought us.
General, thank you. I appreciate everything you've done.
A pleasure. I'll probably get court-martialled but I brought 'em anyway.
- Good luck.
- Thank you.
- Goodbye and thank you.
- I enjoyed it.
- Goodbye, General.
- Goodbye.
Well, Jonnie Dee.
You got a hug for your daddy?
Got a hug for your daddy?
That's a girl!
How about you, young man?
How about you?
- Can I fly in your airplane?
- I'm afraid not.
You have to stay and take care of your mother.
You be good and don't cause him any trouble.
- I'll try not to. You take care of yourself.
- Don't worry.
You show 'em a picture of me every once in a while.
I promise. And I'll read them your letters, if you write.
I'm gonna write.
Gee, I'm gettin' homesick already.
It's funny how you can miss a person even before he's gone.
Hurry it up, Glenn.
Goodbye, dear.
Goodbye, Stevie. Bye.
This is Glenn Miller and the
American Band of the AEF. coming to you from Buzz Bomb Alley through the courtesy of the BBC.
And to all you GI boys and girls a long, long way from home, and to all our British friends as well, we hope to give you a little lift.
That's why we're here.
We'll start right out by seeing if we can put you In The Mood.
Thank you. A little while ago an airplane landed out here and out stepped a singing group that you all know.
They sang with me back in the States.
Let's give 'em a good, warm welcome. The Modernaires!
The Modernaires!
And somebody else stepped out of that same airplane. A big surprise, boys.
Here's a girl you all know.
She's flown across the ocean just to sing for you.
Let's give her a good, big ETO welcome. Frances Langford!
Hi, Frances.
- Thank you, Glenn.
- Thank you.
- That's from Helen.
- Bless your heart.
I'll start out by taking you on a trip south of the Mason-Dixon line.
Let's all get aboard that old Chattanooga Choo Choo.
 Hi there, Fran, what you say?
 Step aside, partner, it's my day
 Lend an ear and listen to my version
 Of a really solid
Tennessee excursion
 Pardon me, boy, is this the Chattanooga Choo Choo?
 Yes, yes
 Track 29
 Boy, you can give me a shine
 I can afford to board the Chattanooga Choo Choo
 Yes, yes
 I've got my fare
 And just a trifle to spare
 You leave the Pennsylvania
Station 'bout a quarter to four
 Read a magazine and then you're in Baltimore
 Dinner in the diner
 Nothing could be finer
 Than to have your ham and eggs in Carolina
 When you hear the whistle blowin' eight to the bar
 Then you know that
Tennessee is not very far
 Shovel all the coal in
 Gotta keep it rollin'
 Woo-woo, Chattanooga there you are
 There's gonna be
 A certain party at the station
 Waitin' for me
 How very happy we'll be
 He's gonna sigh
 Until I tell him that I'll never roam
 So, Chattanooga Choo Choo, won't you choo-choo me home?
 Chattanooga, Chattanooga
 All aboard
 Chattanooga, Chattanooga
 All aboard
 Chattanooga, Chattanooga
 Chattanooga Choo Choo, won't you choo-choo me home? 
- ( MUSIC PLAYING ON RADIO)
- Remember that?
Seems a million years since we made that.
I wrote Glenn what you asked.
I want to read you his answer. He says...
"Tell Chummy not to take the job.
"As long as there's a Glenn Miller
Band, he'll be a part of it.
"Don and I have been making plans for after the war.
"I have a lot of ideas for new arrangements,
"so tell Chummy to start looking for a friendly pawn shop."
Friendly pawn shop.
He hasn't changed, has he?
Yes, he has! He's been promoted.
He's Major Glenn Miller now.
Major? That's wonderful.
I wish I could've gone with him.
You'd have made a fine soldier with your heart and ulcers!
I've got two eyes and ten fingers.
That's all you need to play the piano.
They're going to Paris.
I told you that.
And he says, "We're doing a special programme on Christmas Day."
It's gonna be broadcast over here.
"Be sure and listen cos I'm sending you an extra special Christmas present."
And I'll know what it is if
I listen to the programme.
- I wonder what he's gonna do.
- I don't know. But I'm sure gonna listen.
- Morning, Glenn.
- Morning, Colonel.
- I sure appreciate the lift.
- Not at all.
- You coming too?
- No. Tomorrow.
I got some work to do in Paris.
They're gonna let us do some shows at the advance bases.
It's kinda soupy, isn't it?
It's always this way in
December. Shall we hop in?
Don, I don't know where I'll be, so as soon as you land at Orly, get in touch with the dispatcher.
Be sure the band goes over that new arrangement.
- I want to use it.
- Right. See you tomorrow.
Pick up my mail. I'm expecting a letter from Helen. Bye.
All right, hurry it up, you guys.
This is Paris. You wanted to see it. Now's your chance.
I'm Lieutenant Haynes. Did Major Glenn
Miller leave a message here for me?
Nothing here, sir. Did you try Flight Control?
No, he said he'd leave it here. He came with Colonel Baessell on the Norseman.
The flight wasn't logged in.
No Norseman has landed here in two or three days.
Thanks.
- General! I thought you were in Europe.
- Just arrived.
- May I congratulate you on your promotion?
- Thank you.
Five Star final.
Sounds like a late evening paper.
- Have you heard about Glenn Miller?
- Yes, this morning.
Notified his family yet?
We've been ordered to withhold notifications until after Christmas.
His band is broadcasting tomorrow.
We can't let Mrs Miller find out that way.
- Do you mind if I call her personally?
- Of course not.
- Use my telephone.
- Thank you.
It's still a couple of minutes before the broadcast, Helen.
You know, I never realised how wonderful friends could be.
Even General Arnold, he called me himself.
That's why he's where he is, maybe, because he's that kind of a guy.
Last night when I couldn't sleep, I got to thinking.
It come to me about this broadcast.
You know, Helen, this is a test.
A test? How do you mean?
You remember how much we talked, all of us, about how Glenn's band was something different?
Something permanent?
An institution, like!
Yeah, Glenn and I talked about it often.
Don't you see what Si's getting at?
If the band goes on, even if Glenn's not with it, that's the proof.
It means that Glenn's band, Glenn's music, keeps right on going, and the kids'll be dancing to it for years and years.
That's what he wanted.
(ANNOUNCER) 'We take you now to
Paris for a special programme.'
'As some of you might know,
Major Glenn Miller is not with us today.
'But in his absence, we shall do this programme exactly as he had planned it.
'Our first number is a new arrangement
'which Major Miller himself made especially for this performance.
'This tune should be a familiar one,
'especially to the members of Major Miller's family across the ocean who are listening.'

By the light of the silvery moon
I want to spoon
To my honey I'll croon love's tune
Honeymoon, keep a-shining in June
Your silvery beams
will bring love's dreams
We'll be cuddling soon
By the silvery moon
- By the light
- By the light, by the light
- Of the silvery moon
- Of the silvery moon
- I want to spoon
- I want to sit and spoon
To my honey, I'll croon
Love's tune
- Honeymoon
- Honeymoon, honeymoon
- Keep a-shining in June
- In June
Your silvery beams
will bring love's dreams
We'll be cuddling soon
By the silvery moon
- Hello, Mr. Winfield.
- Good afternoon.
That's Mr. Winfield,
Vice-President of our First National Bank,
Chairman of the Civic Betterment League, and twice winner of the Elks' picnic potato-sack race.
- Hello, George.
- Hello, darling.
See that woman he just kissed?
That's Mrs. Winfield.
They've been married for 20 years, and she knows how to handle him, in spite of all of his faults.
Know what his biggest fault is?
He doesn't think he has any.
The Winfields have two children, a boy and girl.
That's the girl!
Her name is Marjorie.
She's fixin' to marry the boy across the street, Bill Sherman.
Now that the war has ended, he'll be home soon.
This is the Winfield boy, Wesley, and, Max, the dog.
Okay, Max, now you're all fingerprinted.
Okay, Gregory, you're next.
This is Gregory, the turkey.
Wesley is their second child.
If he'd been the first, there never would have been a second.
Oh, you're probably wondering who I am.
Well, don't be so nosy.
Alice! Alice! Look.
And on the front page, too.
"Private William Sherman, of the 161st Infantry,
"has received his honorable discharge and will soon be in our midst again."
Oh, isn't that wonderful, George?
Stella, go call Marjorie.
Well, we'll be having a man around the house again.
A young man.
Well, Mother, the next time William Sherman's picture is in the paper,
Marjorie's will be right along beside it.
I guess I've looked forward to this wedding as much as they have.
More.
Well, don't make it sound like I'm trying to get rid of Margie.
Being a responsible father,
I happen to be old-fashioned enough to want to see our grown daughter take her rightful position
- in the institution of marriage.
- I know, George, but Marjorie's awfully young.
She's only 18.
Darling, you were only 18 when you were married.
But that's different. I'm her mother.
Yes, dear.
I just heard the news that Bill's coming home!
Isn't it wonderful?
It might be more wonderful if he were coming home to a charming, feminine young lady instead of a grease monkey.
Father, somebody in this family has to know about mechanics.
This is the Machine Age!
I would appreciate it if you would confine your genius to a sewing machine.
- Does it need fixing?
- That's not what your father meant.
When I patriotically consented for you to work around Ike Hickey's Garage during the emergency, I didn't intend for you to make a career out of it.
Father...
- Oh, that must be Mr. Finley.
- I'll answer it, Stella. You get Wesley.
Tell him it's time for his piano lesson.
That's not the way to get him.
- Good afternoon, Chester.
- Good afternoon, Marjorie.
- Sweets for the sweet.
- Oh, Chester.
Cream centers.
Really, you mustn't bring me gifts all the time.
But, Marjorie, we have been seeing a lot of each other.
Yes, I know, Chester, and you've been such a good friend, acting as my escort and taking me to the church socials and everything.
Oh, and there's so much more I could do for you, if you'd only let me.
Now, Chester, you promised.
I promised not to take advantage of the situation while my rival was overseas.
But now that he is coming home, well, it's every man for himself.
- Isn't it time for Wesley's lesson?
- Oh...
Oh, Wesley!
- Wesley!
- I'm coming, I'm coming.
Wesley Winfield, how many times have you been told...
Well, I got to keep my eye on him.
He's a suspect.
I know. I'll keep him in solitary for you till you finish your piano lesson.
Come on, Gregory. You stay out of the kitchen until Thanksgiving.
Come on.
- Wesley, Mr. Finley is here.
- I hate him.
Now, Wesley, you must learn to be friendly with Mr. Finley.
Please, I prefer to keep it on this basis.
If you behave yourself, you can have some chocolate.
Oh! After your lesson.
Remember this, George?
Mother!
Oh, Mother, it's beautiful.
Stella!
Alice, I dare say,
I'll be as thrilled seeing Marjorie in that dress as I was you.
Oh, Mother.
I only hope I look as pretty as you did.
Miss Marjorie, if you'll come upstairs and wash that grime off of you,
- we'll have a fitting.
- In a minute, Stella.
Oh, Mother, I want Bill and his family to be so proud of me.
They will be, dear.
You know, I was talking to Mrs. Sherman only this morning about our children getting married, and she said, "You know, we don't feel like we're losing a son,
"we feel like we're gaining a daughter."
- Isn't that sweet?
- Marjorie!
I'm coming, Stella!
Well, I feel like I'm losing a son.
My hometown is a one-horse town
But it's big enough for me
The population is scattered and small
You can't find the town on any map at all
But just the same
it means the world to me
To be with Mother and my family
My hometown is a one-horse town
But it's big enough for me
Everybody!
My hometown is a one-horse town
But it's big enough for me
The population is scattered and small
You can't find the town on any map at all
But just the same
it means the world to me
To be with Mother and my family
My hometown is a one-horse town
But it's big enough for
Big enough for
Big enough for me
That's a boy, Bill!
Hey, there's Miller's Pond.
We're almost home.
- Your girl meeting you at the station?
- No.
- No, I'm gonna surprise her.
- Mine's gonna be there.
- We're all set to get married.
- Married?
- You know, I'm supposed to get married.
- Supposed to?
Well, I mean, she thinks that we're gonna get married right away.
Oh.
But this hitch in the Army has given me a more mature outlook on life.
I realize now that there's more to marriage than just two people being in love.
Why, there's responsibility.
A man should be established in a career, secure, prepared to meet his financial obligations.
Do you know how many marriages have gone on the rocks just because two impulsive people have set out on the sea of matrimony in nothing more than a leaky rowboat?
I know that Marjorie and her folks will understand.
- Hey, what's going on?
- It's 5:00.
- Wesley, what are you doing?
- It's 5:00.
Well, you might have at least finished the piece.
- Wesley, give me that candy...
- Marjorie said.
- Cream centers.
- I know.
- Bill!
- Wesley! How are you?
- Bill, are we glad to see you.
- Hello, Mr. Winfield, Mrs. Winfield.
- How ya been?
- Gee, it's good to be home.
Your picture was in the paper, right on the front page.
- I want to surprise Marjorie.
- Oh, yeah, come on in.
You go on in the living room.
I'll call Marjorie.
- Marjorie!
- Yes, Mother?
Come on down!
We want you to hear Wesley play his new piece.
In a minute, Mother.
William, this is Fester Chinley.
Chester Finley.
- I'm glad to meet you, Chester.
- How do you do?
Chester's been dating Marjorie ever since you left.
Yes, I know.
Marjorie told me in her letters.
And you don't know what a comfort it is to a man overseas, Chester, not to have to worry about his girl.
- Aren't you gonna bump him one?
- Wesley...
- Candy?
- Thank you, Mrs. Winfield.
Boy, this is one thing we missed overseas.
- Have one? Cream centers.
- I know.
I guess he doesn't like cream centers.
Chester's been giving Wesley piano lessons.
He's coming along, slow but sure.
We'd hoped by now he progressed far enough to play at your wedding.
Well, he'll still have time to learn.
Oh, we wouldn't want to postpone your happiness just because Wesley happens to have two left hands. Not by a long shot, son.
Oh, Mother, it's beautiful.
Bill!
- Marjorie.
- This is a surprise.
Yeah.
- Marjorie, you look beautiful.
- Do I?
You know, the groom's not supposed to see the bride like this
- until the day of the wedding.
- Yeah.
Well, I guess I better be getting home.
I haven't even seen the folks yet.
Will I see you tonight, Bill?
Well, there's a dance at the club.
Oh, fine. Fine.
And we've got a lot to talk about, haven't we?
Yeah, lots.
Well...
Bill, you're all right, aren't you?
All right?
Well, you're acting so strange.
You weren't hurt or wounded or anything?
Oh, no. As a matter of fact, the Germans surrendered the day I landed in Paris.
I guess they knew you were coming.
- See you tonight.
- Yeah.
I saw your eyes
Your wonderful eyes
With love light and tenderness beaming
They thrilled me through
They filled me, too
With wonderful dreams I am dreaming
No need to speak
No more shall I seek
For my heart has taught me their meaning
And love has come at last, I know
- Your eyes have told me so
- Your eyes have told me so
Bill, would you like to go someplace where we can talk?
- We haven't talked yet.
- Later.
It sure feels good dancing with my girl like this.
Do you think you'll feel the same way after?
- After?
- After we're married.
- You'll always be my girl.
- And you'll always be my husband.
No need to speak
No more shall I seek
For my heart has taught me their meaning
And love has come at last, I know
- Your eyes have told me so
- Your eyes have told me so
Bill and Marjorie are sure making up for lost time.
Hey, Bill, when are you two gonna get hitched?
- Yeah, when is it gonna be?
- You set the date yet?
Come on, Bill, tell us about it.
Well, now, folks, friends, as you can tell by just looking at us, we can hardly wait.
I'm a mighty lucky fellow to be getting a girl like Marjorie.
Not only because she is beautiful and wonderful, but because she is, well, so understanding, so practical and so intelligent.
How would you know, Bill?
Well, the thing of it is, that we've decided to wait a while.
What are you gonna wait for, Bill?
What's the matter?
Well, after all,
I'm just a soldier back from the war.
And we've decided to be a little patient, so I can get a job and maybe save a little nest egg and...
Well, as soon as we set the date, why, you'll be the first to know.
- Marjorie, you're not angry, are you?
- I'm too intelligent to be angry.
- Marjorie, wait!
- We've decided to leave!
I understand. No leaky rowboat for us.
You know, once I get a job, why, in no time at all we'll have that nest egg.
- Bill, how big an egg are you planning on?
- Just enough to give us a start.
A down payment on a house.
- Our own little home.
- Isn't that better than rushing things?
A little cottage, a picket fence, a yard for the children.
Now who's rushing things?
- Must be out of gas.
- There is plenty of gas.
- We had a full tank when we left.
- Yeah. Probably a flat.
- Lf we had a flat, you'd feel it.
- Yeah.
Say, I've got a hunch the valve under the gas tank is jammed.
Yeah, I'd better have a look at it.
William, it's not in there.
Underneath the car.
Yeah.
Here you are.
- That about does it.
- Yeah.
Push her off the jack.
- Wait till I get out from under!
- Yeah. Here, I'll help you.
- There we go.
- Oh, dear.
Oh, my. Okay.
Push her off.
Start the motor, huh?
- We're okay now. I got her going.
- Yeah.
- Oh, here, let me help you.
- It's getting cold.
Gee, Marjorie, you ruined your favorite dress.
My favorite dress is the one you saw me in this afternoon.
Now, Marjorie,
I thought we settled all that.
You even said you'd be happy to wait until I got a job.
I'm only teasing.
But you know something,
I was just thinking.
We'd only have to wait half as long if I had a job and was saving along with you.
The business world's a man's world, Marjorie.
And women have no right forsaking their sacred heritage to meddle in it.
Now they're even meddling in politics.
- I was just offering to help, that's all.
- Thank you, Marjorie.
But I intend becoming a capable provider, a good husband and a father, without any help from you!
I mean... Well, you know what I mean.
With your egotism, I'm not so sure.
You just don't believe in progress.
Why, you're getting to be an old fuddy-duddy.
Fuddy-duddy?
Come on, Marjorie. get in and we'll go home.
- I wouldn't ride in the same car with you.
- Now stop acting childish.
We're a mile from home, and it's getting cold.
Well, isn't that just too bad?
Marjorie! guess the children will be home late tonight.
Well, Alice, after all, the boy's been overseas, and this is the first time he's been out with his girl in a long time.
Didn't they look cute tonight when they left?
William is a fine boy, a fine boy.
Marjorie.
- Marjorie?
- Bill and I had a fight.
- You won?
- George.
Darling, what did you quarrel about?
Mother, William Sherman doesn't believe in women.
What?
Well, the next time his gas valve gets jammed, he can fix it himself.
All I did was offer to go to work and help so that we could get married real soon.
Oh, you discussed your wedding plans?
I've already talked to the Palmer Printing Company about turning out the invitations.
Are you and Bill planning on a large wedding or a small one?
A small one. I won't be there.
Miss Marjorie is having one of her moods.
I'm going to have a talk with that Sherman boy and find out just how serious his intentions are.
Marjorie told me all about Bill's plans, and I think it's admirable of him to be so conscientious about their future, I mean.
Well, I'll speak to Harris today.
See if we can find a spot for the boy at the bank.
I don't like this waiting business.
Oh, George, this little spat is nothing.
Then why is Marjorie having a mood?
Because she's at the age when girls are very emotional, easily depressed, given to fits of tears and despair.
It's the happiest time in a woman's life.
- get him!
- Wesley!
- It's only Gregory.
- Gregory?
You've been told to stop running the flesh off of that turkey!
It's a good thing tomorrow is Thanksgiving.
There'd be nothing left but feathers.
For the last time, that turkey does not belong in the house.
If he's good enough to be on the table, he's good enough to walk around it.
George, I'm afraid this is another crisis.
Wesley has become very attached to our Thanksgiving dinner.
So it seems.
I think I'll send him to the movies this afternoon, and while he's gone I'll take the turkey to the butcher to be prepared.
No, Alice. I don't believe in sparing the boy with deceit.
When he does find out, he'll only resent being tricked.
Wesley can take the turkey to the butcher.
- It's part of his growing up.
- Oh, but, George...
After all, it's my duty as a father to make Wesley understand that sentiment has its proper place.
Fish and fowl and most animals are mainly created for the sustenance of mankind.
A turkey is a turkey and meant to be eaten.
- And you tell him that, Alice.
- George Winfield.
All right, I'll tell him.
I'll get it, Mother!
- Good morning, Marjorie.
- Good morning, Chester.
I realize it's rather early to be calling, but ever since I heard the good news,
I could hardly wait to see you.
What news?
Well, some people who were at the dance last night told me about you and Bill.
The postponement.
Really, Chester, aren't you jumping to conclusions?
Well. Nevertheless, it's all the encouragement I needed.
Look, I've written a song.
I've taken everything I ever felt in my heart for you and set it to music.
Wait till you hear it!
- Chester, isn't it kind of early?
- Not for me. I've been up all night.
Be my little baby bumblebee
Bring home all the honey, love, to me
Let me spend the...
Excuse me, Chester.
- Morning, Marjorie.
- Good morning, William.
I've been thinking about our silly little quarrel last night, and, well, I feel an apology is in order.
- Well, I should say it is.
- Well, go ahead and apologize.
Me?
Well, you called me an old fuddy-duddy.
I'm certainly not old, and I'm neither a fuddy nor a duddy.
Now am I?
William, honestly.
- Who's that?
- It's Chester.
- He's been up all night.
- Here?
Of course not, silly. He's been working.
He's written a song.
Chester, would you play your song again?
Chester!
- I'd like to sing it now.
- Oh, of course.
- Marjorie...
- Chester, play your song.
Be my little baby bumblebee
Buzz around, buzz around
keep a-buzzin'round
Bring home all the honey, love, to me
Little bee, little bee, little bumblebee
Let me spend the happy hours
Roving with you 'mongst the flowers
And when we get
where no one else can see
Cuddle up, cuddle up, come and cuddle up
Be my little baby bumblebee
Buzz around, buzz around
keep a-buzzin'round
- We'll be just as happy as can be
- Happy as can be
You and me, you and me, you and me
Honey, keep a-buzzin'please
I've got a dozen buzzin'bees
But I want you
To be my baby bumblebee
Buzz, buzz.
- Chester, you know Bill?
- Good morning, Chester.
Yes, we've met.
Say, that's a wonderful song.
I wondered if you'd do me a favor and play it again?
- Oh, won't you, Chester?
- Oh, yes.
Be my little baby bumblebee
Buzz around, buzz around
keep a-buzzin'round
Bring home all the honey love to me
- Little bee, little bee, little bumblebee
- Little bee, little bee, little bumblebee
Let me spend the happy hours
Roving with you 'mongst the flowers
And when we get where no one else
can see...
Cuddle up, cuddle up
Come and cuddle up
- We're forgetting Chester.
- That's a good idea.
- Chester, are you leaving?
- I'm not made of wood.
He's not?
- Oh, Wesley.
- Yes, sir?
- How would you like to earn $1?
- A dollar!
- Yes, I'd like you to run an errand for me.
- Can I take Gregory with me?
Yes, you can take Gregory with you.
I want you to go into town.
Sounds like a pretty long walk for a turkey.
But if he gets tired,
I guess I can carry him back.
- Yes, you can carry Gregory back.
- Where do you want me to go, Pop?
- Wesley, you remember Grandpa?
- Yes, sir.
He was with us a long time, and then he went away.
Son, we all have to go sometime.
Wesley, I've always tried to be a good father.
You're not going anywhere, are you, Pop?
No.
But tomorrow is Thanksgiving and... And...
You want Gregorys head chopped off and his insides taken out so you can eat him, don't you?
Now, please, Wesley, you're making this very difficult.
Now you know perfectly well that all your little chums and their families all get turkeys and fatten them for Thanksgiving.
Why, we even picked Gregory because you said he had the biggest drumsticks.
I bet he'd be good and fat by next Thanksgiving.
- Please, Wesley.
- I'll bet we'd have the biggest, fattest turkey in the whole country!
Now, we'll have no more talk.
I intend to be firm.
Yes, sir.
Now, you take that turkey to Mr. Schultz, and you tell Mr. Schultz to...
- To...
- Yes, sir?
Now, you know perfectly well what to tell him.
You couldn't have phrased it more descriptively.
Wesley, some day, when you're a father, you'll understand these things.
I'm never gonna be a father. I hate fathers.
At the moment,
I have no great love for them myself.
Come on, Max.
- Hey, Wesley, want to play with me?
- No, Pee Wee. I'm busy.
- And besides, you're too little.
- Can I play with Max?
- No.
- I'm bigger than him.
- Max has to go with me.
- Why?
'Cause tomorrow is Thanksgiving.
I'm taking him with me to Mr. Schultz, the butcher.
- We're having turkey.
- So are we, stupid.
- Our turkey is all ready to cook.
- Go home, Pee Wee.
He's outside in our storeroom.
Want to see him?
No, Pee Wee, I...
Your turkey is outside in your storeroom?
- Yeah, want to see him?
- No, but...
- You want me to let you play with Max?
- Yeah.
Come here, Max. Here.
But you got to keep him in here and stay here with him till I get back.
- Lf he tries to get out, I'll bite him.
- Good boy, Pee Wee.
Here are the signatures on that Foley Lumber Mill loan.
The final escrow papers on the Jackson deal.
And here's a letter from Indianapolis.
Some theatrical company would like to rent the Grand Street opera house.
Good. We haven't realized a cent from that theater since we were appointed trustees.
That's true, but since the church owns that property, it's our obligation to investigate the show and see if it's morally fit for Milburn.
This was enclosed in the letter.
Well, who says banking is a dull business?
Yes, well, perhaps we'd better investigate this.
When Miss La Rue arrives in town,
I'll discuss the play with her
- before granting a lease on the theater.
- Fine.
- Hello?
- Hello, John.
- Oh, Emily.
- Somebody stole our turkey.
- Somebody what?
- Stole our turkey.
- Stole our turkey?
- I can't stand any more of this.
- I'm at the end of my rope!
- Emily, you must try to control yourself.
You don't seem to be very upset
about this.
- Yes, of course I'm upset, but...
- But what?
Well, the thing to do is call the butcher and order another...
- He hasn't got any left.
- Oh, he hasn't?
- Well...
- Well, what?
- Well, let me call you back later.
- I don't see any need to calling me back.
- Lf you can't talk about it now...
- Yes, dear.
Have you ever heard of anything so outrageous?
Never in my life.
- Say, how about having dinner with us?
- That'll settle everything.
- Sure we're not imposing?
- Not at all.
- We'll have enough for everyone.
- Fine.
I can't get over anyone low enough to steal a Thanksgiving turkey.
Positively shocking.
Why, the way things are getting,
I sometimes wonder if this town is a fit place for Wesley to grow up in.
Every morning, every evening
Ain't we got fun?
Every summer
I'm sorry
Ain't we got fun?
When I first saw you
I had but one thought
And then you chased me
Until you were caught
From the day I whispered
'"May I please hold your hand? '"
You progressed and I'm impressed
And I think you're grand
We're really living
We've got a fat turkey
for a fine Thanksgiving
Shut the door, please
Don't get sore, please
Ain't we got fun?
- Let's all have fun
- Let's all have fun
I got a yearning to tango with you
Casanova, please come over
if you have time
You know you're my one and only
That doesn't rhyme!
I'm not too clever
But I'd like to say those words forever
Thank you, kind sir, I don't mind, sir
- Ain't we got fun?
- Ain't we got fun?
Fun.
That's enough. I'm dizzy!
I shall get you some water, madam.
I think I should shell some more peas.
With the Harrises coming, that's three more people.
More people, more dishes.
Oh, Stella.
Well, this is quite a picture.
You know, sometimes I think the preparation is actually more fun than the dinner itself.
Say, I'm baking the pies.
- Wanna taste the filling?
- Sure.
- Fine cook, Marjorie.
- Yeah.
It looks good. When will it be ready?
I don't know. I've never cooked one with the door open before.
I only hope Wesley doesn't make a scene.
Oh, he's been wonderful about the turkey so far.
He hasn't said a word since he came home from the butcher.
I'm glad he's taking it so well.
Of course, the real test will come when he sees Gregory in this condition.
- Well, everything looks good.
- Smells good, too.
Where's the turkey?
- Ronald!
- Pee Wee!
Oh, yes, the turkey. I...
- Turkey ready, Stella?
- There it is.
Well, I think they're waiting.
I'm not gonna be the pallbearer.
Oh, put it down here, Bill.
My, what a delicious-looking bird!
I want a drumstick!
Now, Ronald, it isn't polite to ask.
After all, this isn't our turkey.
That's right, Son.
You might, at least, wait for the bird to be carved.
I want a drumstick, too.
Certainly, dear!
I'll take care of this myself.
- It's a pleasure, sir.
- Stella, everythings fine.
You boys are both gonna get a drumstick.
I want mine first!
Ronald!
- The pie is delicious, Stella.
- It certainly is.
There's plenty more.
I think it's just wonderful of you,
Mr. Harris, to give Bill a job at the bank.
I haven't had any banking experience, sir, but I hope I can make good.
Of course, you can.
All you have to do is be able to add and look real honest.
I mean, the banking business offers a fine opportunity for a young man.
Yes, it certainly does.
Remember, Winfield, we were about young Sherman's age when we started out at the old Olive Street branch.
Yes, that's right. I was chief teller and remember, J.H., you were my assistant.
Your assistant?
Yes, and Mrs. Harris was the daughter of V.A. Stonan, the founder of our First...
- More dessert, anyone?
- Yes.
- No, thank you.
- I'm full.
This dinner's so good, I'm almost glad that someone stole our turkey.
Anyone who'd commit a crime like that should be tarred and feathered.
You're right.
If you ask me, he should be strung-up like a common horse thief.
You know, I'll bet Wesley could tell us who stole that turkey.
Quite a detective, our Wesley.
This is one Thanksgiving
I'll always remember.
Not only for the joy and comfort
I found in the company of my friends and family but...
Come here, Son.
But because of the strength in character
I found in my son.
Somebody help me.
What's the matter? Come here, now!
Go on! get!
Wesley!
Wesley!
May I be excused?
What can you do?
George, don't be upset about it, please.
Alice, this is one time
I wish you wouldn't interfere.
George, don't get yourself all worked up.
You've said 100 times,
"Boys will be boys."
I know, but does he have to be one of the James boys?
He was only trying to protect the life of his pet.
Try to have a little understanding.
Why, when you were Wesley's age, you ran away from home.
And I'm thinking of doing it again.
Perhaps you can take this lightly, Alice, but I can't.
George, he's been punished enough already.
The humiliation and the fright...
Let's be happy everything turned out so well.
Let's be happy I have a boss with a sense of humor.
I once married a man with a sense of humor.
I'll bet you by next Thanksgiving we'll have the fattest turkey in the whole country.
I'll bet you.
My father used to sing this song to my mother when he was courting her.
I'm glad they got together.
By the light of the silvery moon
I want to spoon
To my honey I'll croon love's tune
- Honeymoon
- Honeymoon, honeymoon
- Keep a-shining in June
- Keep a-shining in June
- Your silvery beams
- Your silvery beams
- Will bring love's dreams
- Will bring love's dreams
We'll be cuddling soon
- By the silvery moon
- By the silvery moon
Place, park
Scene, dark
Silvery moon is shining through the trees
Cast, two
Me, you
Sound of kisses floating on the breeze
Act one
Begun!
Dialogue
'"Where would you like to spoon? '"
My cue, with you
- Underneath the silvery moon
- Underneath the silvery moon
- By the light
- Not the dark but the light
- of the silvery moon
- Not the sun but the moon
- I want to spoon
- Not croon but spoon
To my honey I'll croon love's tune
- Honeymoon
- Honeymoon, honeymoon
- Keep a-shining in June
- Keep a-shining in June
- Your silvery beams
- Your silvery beams
- Will bring love's dreams
- Will bring love's dreams
- We'll be cuddling soon
- We'll be cuddling soon
- By the silvery moon
- By the silvery moon
Hasn't this been a wonderful day?
It's been more like Christmas than Thanksgiving.
Me being home, you, getting started at the bank.
You know,
I think we have more to be thankful for this Thanksgiving than anybody.
Yeah. Except Gregory.
- Honeymoon
- Honeymoon, honeymoon
- Keep a-shining in June
- Keep a-shining in June
- Your silvery beams
- Your silvery beams
- Will bring love's dreams
- Will bring love's dreams
- We'll be cuddling soon
- We'll be cuddling soon
- By the silvery moon
- By the silvery moon
There's so many faces in this mirror,
I can hardly find my own.
Oh, Father, you look positively handsome!
What's Pop getting all spruced up for?
Your father has a date with a beautiful actress.
Your father happens to have a business appointment with a prospective client who wishes to lease some property held by the First National Bank.
I wish you'd all stop staring at me as though I were a gay old dog.
Be on guard, Banker Winfield.
Perhaps this beautiful temptress will use her charms to learn the secret combination of the First National vault.
Fear not, fair damsel,
I've toyed with these jezebels before!
Shall I wait up for you, George?
If you wish. I won't be late.
If you are, we'll all be waiting up for you.
Well, good night, all.
"The beautiful bank crook and her gang of robbers
"were hiding in their hideout."
"They were very scared
"because they knew
"that Fearless Flanagan, badge 79,
"was on their trail."
'"Dangerous Dora tells her men
not to be scared, that she has a plan.
'"While the men are hiding
in the next room,
'"she'll get Flanagan to drink some
of the whisky
'"with the poison in it.
'"After he's lying helpless on the floor,
'"they can come out and hit him
and stab him and shoot him!
'"There's a knock on the door!
'"Even Dangerous Dora 's a-scared,
'"because she knows that behind that door
'"is that tall, handsome, broad-shouldered,
square-jawed Fearless Flanagan.
'"Badge 79.
'"He checks to see no villain lurks
behind the door.
'"The beautiful Dangerous Dora
may be clever,
'"but this time she's met her match,
'"for the ever-alert Fearless Flanagan
even has eyes in the back of his head.
'"The great detective looks around,
hoping to find a clue.
'"As he sits down, his great brain tells him
that he's not alone in this cabin.
'"'She's trying to poison me, '
thinks Fearless Flanagan.
'"Although he doesn't drink,
he takes the whisky
'"because he has a plan of his own.
'"Fearless walks away
to set a trap for her. Trapped.
'"Now he puts his plan to work.
'"He must play the part of a man
who is poisoned.
'"Fearless plays his part so good
that even Dangerous Dora is fooled.
'"As Dora gets her gang to kill him,
'"Fearless Flanagan swings into action!
'"Dangerous Dora pleads for mercy,
'"and although she's very beautiful,
'"Fearless Flanagan knows that
duty comes first and crime does not pay. '"
Wesley!
It's late, darling, and there's school tomorrow.
Yes, Ma.
- Ma, will you leave it on till I get to sleep?
- All right.
Very enjoyable.
Oh, I am so delighted.
And I am sure on the stage it'll be even more exciting with you in the role of Marlene.
Merci, monsieur.
And you will approve the lease?
Well, I only found one speech in the play that might be objectionable.
However, I've copied it here and I'll discuss it with Mr. Harris.
Objectionable speech?
Yes, at the end of the first act, when the American soldier says to Marlene,
'"Ma cherie, I shall forever cherish the memory of last night.
"The thrill of your response to my admiration
"made me realize that we belong together always.
"The thought of one of us being married to another is most agonizing,
"but perhaps soon love will find a way."
And this is objectionable?
Well, in the first act, we learn the American soldier is married.
Therefore, when he speaks of spending the rest of his life with Marlene, it hints of the most controversial subject of this postwar period, divorce.
But, Monsieur Winfield, we have toured most of the big cities and...
Well, unfortunately,
Milburn is not a big city.
Not that I personally have a small-town attitude about things.
Then perhaps you can persuade Mr. Harris to leave this little speech in the play.
Well, I will see what I can do.
Merci.
Well, it's been a pleasure meeting you,
Miss La Rue.
Well, for me, it has been a pleasant surprise.
I have never met so charming a banker.
Oh, I just drifted into banking.
Merci.
Au revoir, Monsieur.
Aren't you gonna tell us about Miss La Rue, Father?
A very fascinating woman.
And she never met so charming a banker.
Of course, that's because she hasn't seen Bill yet.
Oh, I don't know.
By the way, how is William doing at the bank?
Quite competent, and lots of ideas.
In fact, since he's been there, our suggestion box has been jammed.
See that?
- Merci.
- Merci?
French toast.
Say, listen to this.
"This year's annual charity dance,
"sponsored by the local chapter of the Y.M.C.A.,
"promises to be one of the gayest social events of the year.
"Highlighting the evenings entertainment will be the musical offerings of
- "Miss Marjorie Winfield...
- I thank you.
"...accompanied by Chester Finley, musical director."
Wesley!
- Bye, Mom.
- Bye, dear.
Listen, there's some clothes to go to the cleaners upstairs in our room.
Would you drop them off on your way to school?
Yes, ma'am.
I have a dress to go, too. Excuse me!
Isn't it exciting,
Marjorie entertaining at the Y?
Talented girl, Marjorie.
Going to make a wonderful bride, a wonderful bride.
They're on the chair.
Here, Wesley.
Hey, Sis, what's this mean? '"Ma cherie'"?
- Wesley, where did you get this?
- Father's suit.
Father's suit?
Wesley! Oh, Wesley!
Yes, sir.
I forgot something.
Bank business.
Stella, I can't believe it.
I'll bet she's a bank crook, just like you said!
Wesley, you mustn't mention this to a soul, do you hear?
Especially not to Mother.
In fact, you mustn't even think about it.
Do you promise me?
- I promise.
- All right, now get going.
And remember, Stella, this is a secret!
Stella, this is terrible.
Poor Father, and that awful woman!
Well, I've been cleaning up around here for years.
I guess I can handle this mess.
But this is positively scandalous!
Why, if this ever gets out...
Oh, dear.
I just hope and pray we can keep it in the family.
Our biggest job is to keep the family in the family.
Marjorie, Stella.
I could hardly wait for your father to leave this morning.
Can you two keep a secret?
- Secret?
- Secret?
Tomorrow is our anniversary, and I bought this for your father.
Isn't that a lovely watch!
Look at the back.
"To George, with love, Alice."
Oh, my.
Twenty years, and it seems like yesterday.
Mother, are you sure you did the right thing marrying Father?
What? Why, Marjorie!
Well, what I mean is, well, I'll bet you had a lot of beaus.
Oh, yeah, there were a few young men interested in me.
What about Father?
- Was he popular with the girls?
- Oh, quite.
Oh, you'd be surprised at the number of times I'd be out with your father and I'd catch some girl giving him a wink.
You sure she wasn't just winking back?
Why, Stella, how can you say that?
I assure you
Mr. Winfield was not flirtatious.
- Was he romantic?
- Oh, when he set his mind to it.
I'll never forget the night he proposed.
I knew it was gonna be a special occasion because when he came to call, he'd rented a horse-drawn sleigh from Hickey's stable.
And Ike Hickey himself was our driver.
Our own driver, mind you.
We drove to Miller's Pond.
It was beautiful, a full moon shining on the ice, people skating, bonfires.
- Was that when he proposed?
- Oh, he tried to, several times.
But finally, when we were leaving and he was helping me off with my skates, he looked up kind of sheepishly and he said,
"Alice, as long as I'm down here on my knees,
"would you accept this as a proposal?"
Your father was never one for flowery speeches or pretty words.
Mr. Hickey!
There you are, folks, she's all ready to see!
Oh, isn't it picturesque?
Yep, with a little polish and elbow grease and she'll look as good as new.
Oh, thanks, Mr. Hickey.
Come on, Bill, get in.
Would you mind telling me what this is all about?
- Well, can you keep a secret?
- Sure.
Mother and Father are celebrating their 20th anniversary tomorrow.
And we've planned a big surprise,
- haven't we, Mr. Hickey?
- Yes.
Bill, this sleigh is the same one that Father took Mother out in the night he proposed.
So we're taking them out in it tomorrow night.
And we're gonna have the very same driver, too, aren't we, Mr. Hickey?
Yep. Never will forget that night on the way home from Miller's Pond.
I could hear every word they were saying.
They was making plans for the wedding.
Your ma was sitting right where you are, and your pa was sitting right there.
Don't be self-conscious.
He's discussing Mother and Father, not us.
Well, pretty soon, we'll be able to discuss us.
And maybe a lot sooner than you think.
Look, you don't have to humor me,
William Sherman.
Goodness gracious, you'd think you were the only boy in the whole world.
Say, that's not a bad idea, especially if you were the only girl.
We wouldn't even have to get married.
I mean, there'd be nobody here to marry us.
If you were the only girl
In the world
And you were the only boy
Nothing else would matter
In the world today
We could go on loving
In the same old way
A Garden of Eden
Just made for two
With nothing to mar our joy
I would say
Such wonderful things to you
And there would be
Such wonderful things to do
If you were the only girl
In the world
And you were
The only boy
Say, I better get back to the bank.
It's way past my lunch hour.
Oh, Bill. Remember, not one word about this to Father.
I hope he doesn't forget about that anniversary.
You know how men are!
I'm sure he hasn't.
You should have seen him this morning.
Here he is celebrating his 20th wedding anniversary, and to look at him you'd think he was a man just fallen in love!
Well, what's the matter? Come on.
- What did we do that for?
- I can't tell you.
- Why?
- You're too little.
Bet you I'm bigger than you was when you was little!
- Hello, Marjorie.
- Hello.
- Where's your mother?
- Your wife is upstairs.
- Hello, Wesley.
- Hello.
- Good evening, Stella.
- Good evening.
Marjorie, William has some rather exciting news, but he can tell you himself.
It wouldn't be fair of me to take the edge off of his surprise.
- Evening, George.
- Alice!
My!
- Don't we look lovely!
- Mother looks lovely!
Mother, I'll set the table.
George, the children have been spoiling me.
Marjorie's been fussing with my hair all afternoon, keeping me out of the kitchen, and Wesley insisted on doing the marketing and polishing the silver.
I'm being treated as though I were a queen.
You are a queen, and that's straight from the king.
Henry VIII!
Mother, sometimes I overlook our children's peculiar behavior.
But considering Stella's in our employ, don't you think, at times, she's a little outspoken?
Oh, she's been with us so long, she feels like one of the family.
I wish I felt like that.
Oh, George.
Mom, have you seen the key to my handcuffs?
- Oh, my word.
- Did you look in your pockets?
I can't.
It's only rubber.
- The top of a fountain pen?
- I can trade it for something.
Oh.
- Is this...
- That's it. Put it in my teeth.
Well, I think this will do it.
Oh, George, why don't you leave your work at the bank?
Miss La Rue wants to take over the theater for rehearsal tomorrow.
I have to get these papers to her tonight for her signature.
- You're going to that actress lady?
- I have to deliver these papers.
I won't be long, dear.
I think I'll run next door to Mrs. Gaston.
She wants to copy these patterns.
I'll probably be gone when you get back.
All right, dear, but I think it's a shame you have to go out after working so hard all day.
Father, if you have some papers you want delivered,
I can drop them off on my way to the dance.
I wouldn't think of it.
The Y is way on the other side of town.
I could run them over for you in a few minutes in the machine.
- Stella, you can't even drive a machine.
- You know how quick I pick up things.
I'm overwhelmed at all this attention, but I think...
Can I go, Pop?
I like to run errands, really do.
Well, that's very considerate of you,
Wesley...
Please, Pop?
Well, all right.
Now, let's see.
These papers are for the lease, and there was something else.
But I have a note that'll take care of that. get your hat and coat.
Well, go on, Wesley, get your hat and coat.
Yes, sir.
Hey, Ma.
- What does "delete" mean?
- "Delete" means "to take out."
- "Take out," huh?
- Yes, why?
Oh, nothing.
Hey, Marjorie! You remember that note we found this morning?
What about it?
Well, Pop wants me to bring that to her, too!
Stella, I've been worried about that note all day.
It's bad enough Father wrote it, but I still had hopes he'd never send it.
He even put some more on it, something about taking her out.
- What?
- What did you say?
Wesley, that woman must never get that note!
You take it and you burn it, you understand?
Okay, Sis.
Now, remember this, you can take the papers, but not one word about that note.
He told me to get her signature, but I'll get her fingerprints, too.
I still think she's a bank crook!
Now, Miss Marjorie, don't get yourself all shook up.
- Bill's coming over.
- I'd better get dressed.
He's got a big surprise for you.
Remember, your father said so.
Probably about your wedding.
The only wedding I'm interested in is the one that took place 20 years ago.
Now, have Miss La Rue sign these and bring them back.
And give her this.
Tell her it's very important.
Yes, sir.
Now, remember, you're to come straight home.
We don't wanna give Mother anything to worry about.
Just one girl, only just one girl
There are others, I know
But they're not my pearl
Sun or rain, she is just the same
I'll be happy forever
With just one little girl
To be married, we're old enough plenty
She and I, she and I
She is 18 and I will be 20
By and by, by and by
Although we are short as to money
What care we? What care we?
There are only two flies in the honey
Just one little girl and me
Just one girl, only just one girl
There are others, I know
But they're not my pearl
Sun or rain, she is just the same
I'll be happy forever with just one girl
One girl
One girl
Well, my girl.
- You're early, Bill.
- Yes.
- I'll get dressed right away.
- I could hardly wait to get here.
Marjorie Winfield, come here!
- William!
- Just rehearsing.
There's big news tonight, Mother.
- There you are!
- William, what in the world?
Allow me, madam, to explain this enthusiasm.
My first day in our loan department, and already I've endorsed three important loans!
One for $2,500 to the Central Furniture Company.
A $1,000 personal loan to a Jack Sprawling.
He wanted to get married.
And do you know to whom
I endorsed the third loan?
No.
William Francis Sherman.
- You mean, you made a loan at the bank?
- Sure.
I sort of got the idea from this Sprawling fellow.
You see, instead of putting away a little each week and saving toward a nest egg,
I borrow the nest egg.
Now, I pay a little back each week.
Marjorie, do you realize what this means?
Instead of waiting, why, we can be married right away!
- Right away?
- Sure.
- Oh, Marjorie, aren't you excited?
- Oh, yes, I am, Bill.
But... Well, this is so sudden.
Sudden? You told me you couldn't wait.
Oh, yes, I know I did, Bill, but, well, things are different now.
What I mean is, I must have time to think.
Think? You mean, you don't want to...
- Marjorie, is there somebody else?
- No.
Another man?
Say, you don't know a Jack Sprawling, do you?
Oh, no. Of course not.
Bill, it's so difficult for me to ask you to understand, but I can't possibly think of marrying you right now.
And I can't tell you why.
What do you mean, you can't tell me?
Why, I'm almost your husband!
- At least I thought I was.
- You will be someday.
But for now, Bill, couldn't you please be sweet and understanding?
But I don't wanna be sweet and understanding!
I want to be a husband!
Bill.
It never entered my mind, Marjorie, that you ever had any doubt about your feelings toward me.
But now everythings quite obvious.
You're not even sure
I'm the man you want to marry.
Oh, William, I've been working on Marjorie's wedding invitations,
- and I thought...
- Be sure and send me one, sir.
I'd like to find out who she ends up with.
The Palmer Printing Company must think I'm an idiot!
You want to tell Mother about it?
Mother, Bill wants to get married right away.
- Well, isn't that what you wanted?
- Well, yes, I did, but...
- Mother, I don't want to leave you.
- Oh, darling.
What I mean is, it's so strange leaving the family and everything.
I feel so at home here.
We've gotten used to you, too.
And this is where you belong until you're good and ready to leave.
- Got it pressed.
- Oh, good.
- Well, what was the big surprise?
- Bill wants to get married right away.
Oh!
Stella, you know
I can't leave my mother now, not with this situation with Father.
Does Bill know?
No. It's so awful I couldn't tell him.
I just acted vague about not wanting to get married.
Poor Bill, he didn't know what to think.
Maybe I should have a talk with my father right now.
Oh, no, that would never do.
Why, when this blows over, he'd be embarrassed for life to know you children knew about his foolishness.
I hope it's just foolishness.
Now you listen to me, Miss Marjorie.
There's no fool like an old fool.
Especially an old fool who isn't too old to act like a young fool again.
Now, come on, you're supposed to be the belle of the ball tonight.
Some belle. I don't even have an escort.
Now, Miss Marjorie, you have to go.
You're on the plate tonight.
Now come on, get into your dress.
All right.
But my heart isn't in it.
Well, as long as you get the rest of you in it, you won't have to worry about escorts.
Yes?
I'm Wesley Winfield.
My father sent these papers to be signed by you from the bank.
- Oh, you're Mr. Winfield's little boy?
- Yes, ma'am.
Well, you are a fine-looking boy.
Handsome like your father.
My father isn't handsome.
He looks real funny in the morning.
Oh, I guess we all look funny in the morning.
My mother doesn't. She's real beautiful!
Well, I'm sure she is.
Won't you come in?
- May I take your hat?
- Don't bother.
- I'm sorry...
- Don't worry about it.
Sit down while I look at these papers.
Would you like an apple?
- Yes, ma'am.
- All right, help yourself.
You hand it to me.
- I'm gonna eat it later.
- Oh.
Wesley,
I thought perhaps you might like some cream soda.
Here are all the papers signed and everything is magnifique.
Magnifique means wonderful.
That is French.
Were you ever a spy?
Oh, in my profession,
I have been many things, a spy, a wicked gypsy.
- Once I was even a lady bandit.
- A lady bandit?
But that venture only lasted two weeks, so I prefer to keep it a secret.
- Who's that?
- My associates.
Your gang?
You may come in.
- I hope we're not intruding.
- It's quite all right.
Well, we've got everything set.
Gentlemen, this is Wesley Winfield, the banker's little boy.
How are you, Wesley?
- Hello.
- Hello, there.
Oh, I see you're wearing your badge.
Hey, fellows, did you know this man's a detective?
- A detective?
- Well...
What's the matter, Wesley?
Stand back!
- Hello, Wesley.
- Oh, Bill.
I'm sorry I frightened you.
I had a little quarrel with your sister, and I was just waiting for her to get home from the dance.
What are you doing?
- Marjorie told me to burn this letter.
- Oh.
Hey, what are you doing? Give me it.
"The thrill of your response to my admiration..."
Don't, please.
Well, this explains a lot of things.
- Wesley, who sent this letter?
- I can't tell you. It's a secret.
Well, it's not fair of me to pump you.
I'll get my information direct from '"ma cherie. '"
Oh, Bill.
It's a full house.
Come on, get in your places.
When the sun begins to rise
And there's a light in the eastern skies
You'll hear a rooster crow
All the animals appear
When they hear that cry of Chanticleer
They're up and on the go
Howdy there, folks.
Say, how you been?
Good morning, lady. My, aren't we thin?
Hey, there, fella, let me see that grin.
It's time for the jubilee
Round the barnyard
Goes the mighty cavalcade
Gorgeously arrayed
See them on parade
All the animals assemble there
As the break of day draws near
Then the crickets
Birds and bees upon the wing
Soon begin to sing
Hear the chorus ring
Though they often try
They never beat the cry of Chanticleer
See the turkey chicken reel without a care
And the chicken there
Do the grizzly bear
While the goat begins to castle rock
Till you want to stand and cheer
When the ducks
begin to do the turkey trot
And they get plenty hot
Give it all they've got
But they can't compete
With the strutting feet of Chanticleer
Life is fine when you rise and shine
With the king of the barnyard
King Chanticleer
Hello, Marjorie. You were wonderful.
You were wonderful.
You were wonderful.
Marjorie! You're not leaving?
Oh, Chester, please forgive me, but I'm not in the best of spirits tonight.
Bill!
Marjorie, there's no need to be mysterious any longer, Marjorie.
I happen to know now why you can't marry me.
Huh?
A fine thing.
A soldier overseas and his sweetheart carrying on with another man.
What are you saying?
Why, you know perfectly well the only man I saw while you were away
- was Chester Finley.
- I thought it was you.
There I was fighting for democracy, and you were supposed to keep the home fires burning.
Well, apparently, you two didn't even need a fire.
- Why, I ought to...
- Bill.
Now, Marjorie, you don't have to defend me.
If you're worth having, you're worth fighting for.
Well, I'm glad you feel that way because you and I are going in the locker room.
Please. I'm not worth it.
Would you hold these, please? Thank you.
Go ahead, Finley, you'd better start it, because I'm gonna finish it.
Very well.
I don't know.
Chester, you hit Bill?
Well, I hope it was him.
I didn't have my glasses on.
Bill, are you hurt?
Really, Bill, aren't you being childish about Chester?
Well, you know very well
I've always considered him a bore.
He must have been very boring that night you responded to his admiration.
What are you saying?
The reason you didn't want to get married.
"The thought of one of us being married to another is most agonizing."
Where did you get this?
You ought to know.
You gave it to Wesley to burn.
Bill. Bill.
- Chester didn't write that note.
- What?
I was hoping
I'd never have to tell you this, but...
Well, it was written by somebody else.
- Somebody else? Who?
- My father.
Your father?
Yes. My father sent that note to that French actress, Miss La Rue.
Marjorie Winfield, you ought to be ashamed of yourself.
What a fantastic story, besmirching the good name of your father.
Of all the cheap contemptible tricks!
Well, if that's all the trust you have in me,
William Sherman,
I'm glad I found you out!
You old fuddy-duddy!
For heaven's sake, Miss Marjorie, where have you been all morning?
I've been down at Ike Hickey's cleaning up the sleigh for tonight.
It's better than sitting around, moping about Bill.
The idea of Wesley letting Bill get ahold of that note.
I gave him the piano for this morning.
It wasn't Wesley's fault.
And as for William Sherman,
I wouldn't marry him if he were the last...
If he were the only boy in the world,
I wouldn't.
Hello, George.
Hello, Alice.
What's the matter? Is anything wrong?
No. Everythings wonderful, just wonderful.
This morning, our daughters fianc canceled his loan at the bank, quit his job, and announced he was leaving town.
- Leaving town?
- What did you say? Bill's gone?
Taking the 11:30.
- That's what I said.
Well, then he's already gone.
Oh, Marjorie, you poor dear child.
Poor dear child? Look at her.
No wonder men leave town.
A fine picture of Grace, beauty and femininity.
George.
Well, I may be getting on in years, but I still know what a man looks for in a woman.
I imagine you do!
And as for William Sherman leaving, all I can say is, "Good riddance!"
It seems to me, a young lady of your age, from a good home, blessed with such fine parents...
Marjorie, I've been passive about a lot of queer things going on around here, but now I would like to know what happened between you and Bill.
Bill's jealous of Chester.
He made a big scene and then he accused me of being untrue to him.
Well, you've been very open and above-board about your relationships with...
How dare he accuse my daughter, a Winfield, of being untrue.
Why, the impulsive fool, suspecting Chester. He must be an idiot.
Pardon me, Chester.
If I ever see that William Sherman again...
Please, Father, I'm trying to forget him.
I'd like to help, Marjorie.
Would you care to go to the nickelodeon tonight?
I can't tonight, Chester.
I'm taking the family out.
You can come along if you want to.
My mother and father are celebrating their anniversary.
- Alice, we nearly forgot.
- So we did.
Let's see, he left at 11:30.
The telegram would be delivered to him when the train reach Muncie at 3:00.
Now, if he gets the westbound train, it'll get him back here in Milburn at 7:15.
- That's fine.
- Good.
- Here is your lunch, Homer.
- Thanks, Toby.
You better keep your message down to 10 words, son.
Ten words?
Maybe I can help you.
You just tell me what you wanna say.
Well, it's kind of a secret.
Oh, all telegrams are confidential.
Well...
Bill left town because he thought a love letter that Marjorie gave me to burn was from Chester Finley.
But it wasn't.
It was a letter that Father was sending to that actress lady, Miss La Rue.
I never would have believed it of George Winfield.
I'd believe it about any man.
Your poor mother.
Oh, she doesn't know.
But Marjorie and Bill were supposed to get married.
I'll write the telegram for you, son.
And remember, Toby, company business is confidential.
Strictly confidential!
And if this gets out,
I'll know where it came from.
Did you hear the news?
That George Winfield is running around with that actress.
- Hello.
- Did you hear the news?
That George Winfield is running around
with that actress.
You don't say.
My word, who'd have ever thought it?
Homer, you'll never believe.
Did you know that that George Winfield has been carrying on with that actress?
Remember this?
Mother, am I a little eccentric in thinking ice skating is a peculiar way to celebrate one's 20th anniversary?
Well, I told Marjorie about a certain evening at Miller's Pond, and I guess she is like her mother, sentimental.
I'll forget you
When I can live without the sunshine
I'll forget you
When I can live without the rain
When summer roses
Forget their fragrance
And the songbird
His sweet refrain
I'll forget you
When I can live without the moonlight
I'll forget you
When I can live without the sun
Though Heaven's gladness
May turn to sadness
I'll never forget you
Sweetheart
Gee, Sis, I'm sorry about letting
Bill get ahold of that note.
It's all right, Wesley. You couldn't help it.
It's all my fault. I ought to kill myself.
- Wesley.
- It's only rubber.
See you, Sis. I'm working on a case.
- I hope you get your man.
- So do I.
Honestly, Marjorie, I feel ridiculous.
I just hope this whole idea of yours works.
Stella, we know that Father's still in love with Mother.
This is just the thing to rekindle the flame.
- Hello, Chester.
- Hello, Marjorie.
- You see, I've accepted your invitation.
- I'm awfully glad.
Marjorie!
Excuse me, Stella.
- What are you waiting for?
- We'll be out in just a minute.
- Stella, Wesley and Mr. Hickey are here.
- Oh.
Come on, Mother, let's go.
George, the skates.
- We forgot Chester.
- Oh.
- Chester!
- Oh, here I am.
Come on.
Come on. Hurry up.
Hey, your mustache is off.
- How do I look?
- They'll never know you, Bill.
My pipe.
Quiet.
Be careful.
Marjorie, a horse and sleigh.
And Ike Hickey driving.
Alice, do you remember?
Oh, yes.
Hello, Ike.
Mr. Hickey!
Marjorie, this is wonderful!
Hello, Marjorie, the back seat, just for us.
Thank you, Chester.
Oh, excuse me, Mr. Finley.
Stella...
Mercy, I haven't been skating since I was knee-high to a duck.
Isn't it beautiful?
It was very nice of you to ask me along tonight, Marjorie.
I realize this is sort of a family occasion, but, who knows, pretty soon I may be one of the family.
Giddyap, there.
Giddyap, there.
Giddyap, there.
Mr. Hickey, be careful.
You nearly broke Chester's glasses.
- Isn't it pretty?
- It's just beautiful.
My goodness, Alice, it's almost just like we left it.
Yeah. The pavilion's new, but they cut down the old sycamore.
Oh, yeah, the one we used to race to.
Well, anyway, the most important thing hasn't changed.
What's that?
Twenty years ago, you were the prettiest girl here and you still are.
- George.
- I'll help you, Marjorie.
Everybody out.
Come on, Stella, old girl.
Out with his wife tonight, just to throw us off the track.
- He doesn't fool me.
- Me, neither.
Keep still.
Now, that's not too tight, is it, Marjorie?
Oh, no, that's fine, Chester. Thanks.
Thanks, honey.
You know, it's kind of tough bending over, all bundled up like this.
I understand, dear.
- Good evening, Mrs. Winfield.
- Good evening.
Hello, Alice.
Hello, George.
My goodness, Alice, the way
I'm being treated you'd think I was poison.
They do act a little queer.
Wonder who Harris foreclosed on today.
Careful, Mr. Winfield.
Mercy.
Very good.
Come on, honey.
Be careful.
Isn't it exhilarating?
Yeah, let's not wait 20 years to try this again.
Let's not overdo it.
You know, we're 20 years older.
Oh, I'm just getting warmed up.
Alice.
Look at your father.
- I'm all right, Alice.
- George, come off the ice!
The second time.
Mercy, Mr. Winfield, you all right?
Stella!
Attention, everyone.
Hey, attention, everyone, please.
All right, all you figure skaters,
Grab your favorite girl and let's everybody skate to our favorite song.
Here we go.
Come on, Alice, this is my speed.
Oh, I think you need a rest.
Well, our favorite resting place is behind Spooners' Rock.
Or had you forgotten?
It's working.
The man said, "your favorite girl."
Hey, Marjorie, Mr. Hickey's all alone, and he said he'd like to skate with you.
- Come on.
- Mr. Hickey?
Here she is.
- Mr. Hickey, you want to skate with me?
- That's right.
Now, that's very sweet.
- But, Marjorie, I'm your escort.
- Now, Chester, be a good sport.
Come on, Mr. Hickey.
Mr. Hickey. Really.
Real...
Bill!
Bill...
Marjorie...
Oh, pardon me,
I am looking for Mr. George Winfield.
- He's over on the other side of the pond.
- With his wife.
Thank you.
Mother and Father are behind Spooners' Rock.
Good.
- By the light
- By the light
- Of the silvery moon
- Of the silvery moon
- I want to spoon
- I want to spoon
- To my honey I'll croon love's tune
- To my honey I'll croon love's tune
- Honeymoon
- Honeymoon
- Keep a-shining in June
- Keep a-shining in June
Your silvery beams
Will bring love's dreams
- We'll be cuddling soon
- We'll be cuddling soon
- By the silvery moon
- By the silvery moon
- Honeymoon
- Honeymoon
- Keep a-shining in June
- Keep a-shining in June
Your silvery beams
Will bring love's dreams
- We'll be cuddling soon
- We'll be cuddling soon
- By the silvery moon
- By the silvery moon
The silvery moon
Mr. Winfield! Oh, Mr. Winfield!
Good evening, Miss La Rue.
I have been searching for you frantically.
My show opens tomorrow, and we must reach some kind of an understanding.
Well, I thought that was all settled.
I still did not get an answer from you on the divorce matter.
Divorce? Oh, Mother! Oh, Mother.
But, Miss La Rue, my note settled all that.
Note?
Yes, the speech I copied from the play, the one dealing with divorce.
I sent it back to you with a notation requesting that it be deleted from the show.
Father, you mean that note was just something out of the play?
Yes. I gave it to Wesley to deliver.
Here. This must be it.
- What are you doing with that?
- Well, sir, I...
He thought Chester sent the letter to me.
You couldn't blame me. When Wesley said
Marjorie told him to burn it.
- Burn it?
- It wasn't her fault.
We thought it was a love letter you were sending to Miss La Rue.
- Yes.
- A love letter?
You thought that I...
That this woman and I...
You all thought...
- Alice, what did you think?
- I didn't know.
They didn't let me in on the fun.
Fun? Well, I don't think this is so funny.
And I beg you to remember that Miss La Rue and I weren't having any fun, either.
And as for you, young man, when we get home, you're gonna get a taste of my razor strap.
Father.
Don't worry, Sis, I threw it away.
- You what?
- You won't need it anymore.
I got you one of these new safety razors for your anniversary.
Oh...
Well, really, I don't think this is a laughing matter.
My own family, my friends and neighbors distrusted me.
And what about this lady's feelings?
- Miss La Rue, you must think that this is...
- Very funny.
Oh, that's wonderful, Miss La Rue.
- Honeymoon
- Honeymoon
- Keep a-shining in June
- Keep a-shining in June
Your silvery beams
Will bring love's dreams
- We'll be cuddling soon
- We'll be cuddling soon
- By the silvery moon
- By the silvery moon
Your silvery beams
Will bring love's dreams
- We'll be cuddling soon
- We'll be cuddling soon
- By the silvery moon
- By the silvery moon
{{{ the end }}} 
[TRAIN WHISTLE TOOTING]
NARRATOR:
The 1920s...
... a wild, restless decade that spawned
the speakeasy and the bootlegger.
There was flaming youth
with hip flasks...
... flappers with bobbed hair,
spit curls and rolled stockings.
Young America was drawn by the lure
of the big city, bright lights and jazz.
In the heart of it,
the toddling town, Chicago...
... and its get-rich-quick rackets.
LARRY: Get rich, get healthy, get set for a happy old age...
...in sunny Florida, where the palm trees sway...
...and the girls all wiggle and dance.
Sunny Acre City, folks.
All right, all right.
Step... I beg your pardon. Young fellow, this is the only piece of land...
...I ever saw with sex appeal.
Now, what?
[HAWAIIAN MUSIC PLAYING
ON PHONOGRAPH]
[THUNDER CRACKING]
Looks like this property is gonna be underwater in about eight seconds.
Just like those lots he's selling.
- Let's get out of here.
- Don't go away, folks.
Don't go away.
Like I said, I've only got a few lots left.
Buy now in time for the season of fiesta...
...where love, good fellowship and merrymaking prevail.
You'd better get out of here, Helen.
[MUSIC STOPS]
HELEN:
Oh, boy, that's cold.
You're messing things up for the rest of us, Morgan.
Punching every minute.
Where do you think you're playing, the palace?
I'm just excited, I guess.
I'm still not used to being in show business.
Show business?
You know, all I wanted to do...
...was get away from them fields of cotton, but they don't look so bad now.
To Alabama, here I come.
I thought five-a-dime burlecue was bad.
But at least we didn't have to work out in the rain.
I don't think it's gonna let up.
You wanna go?
- Got everything? Umbrella?
SUE: Mm-hm.
- Okay. Bye, Morgan.
- Bye.
[THUNDER CRACKING]
Wait a minute.
Well, girls,
I just kissed off the real-estate business.
I'm branching out into a new racket.
What a blow to show business.
Here you are, less 2 bucks for the grass skirt.
Gee, thanks, sport.
Do you see what I mean, Morgan?
The smaller they are, the tighter they squeeze.
- Bye.
- Bye-bye.
Bye, honey.
Be careful.
Would you hand me my dress, please?
Over there.
Thanks.
You look pretty worn-out.
I guess I was rough on you, huh?
I didn't mind.
I'm grateful to you for giving me my first real chance.
Grateful for what? This phony pitch?
Quit kidding yourself.
This isn't show business.
It's been better than the other jobs I've had.
Guess there's no sense telling you to go back...
...to Paducah or Walla Walla or wherever your folks are.
It's Danville, Illinois.
And there are no folks.
It's funny. People there used to look down their noses at me...
...like I was something the cat dragged in.
You don't know how mean the gossips in a small town can be.
Double that in spades for the big city.
Oh, but you know,
I'm not scared anymore.
I've taken the first step.
And I know I'll get there.
I'll make it somehow.
Sure you will.
I sure do wanna thank you for all your help.
Goodbye, Larry.
I hope it isn't forever.
No, we'll run into each other.
Thanks. Oh, I owe you $2 for the grass skirt.
Forget it.
Only cost me a buck anyway.
Remember, if there's anything
I can do for you...
I'll remember.
Well, goodbye, Larry.
Wait a minute.
It's raining cats and dogs out there.
Oh, the bus stop isn't far.
Why don't you stay here?
- No, Larry.
- Where are you gonna go?
- I'll find a place.
- Stay.
- Larry, I can't.
- Come on. Why not? Don't be scared.
- Please, Larry.
- Don't you see? I'm stuck on you.
Larry...
[SOBBING]
KLINGMAN: That's right.
I wanna play Snowshoes in the fourth.
[HELEN SINGING "SILENT NIGHT"]
Yeah. Two to win it. That's right.
That's enough.
Last time, he didn't even figure.
Mr. Klingman, I know I can do it better.
Give me another chance.
- I'm going to lunch, boss.
- Okay, okay.
Tell you what, leave your name with Miss Jensen, just in case.
Now, in the seventh,
I wanna go across the border on Firefly.
Yeah, two, four and four.
That's right.
He doesn't really want me to leave my name, does he?
No use lying to you, honey.
It'll just be filed and forgotten.
Where did you get that song you did for Klingman?
I used to sing it at church socials.
Look, honey, you've got a sweet voice.
I hate to tell you how many girls have been through that door.
If they don't get a job, they ask for a handout.
So first piece of advice, get yourself some different songs.
Second piece of advice, forget the first and go home.
I'm not going to quit and I'm not going home.
Why should you? I didn't either.
Here, take this to Jim Finney's.
- Maybe he can use you.
- Thanks a lot.
[GIRL LAUGHING]
KLINGMAN:
You're a real cutie.
See what I mean, honey? Go home.
HELEN [SINGING]:
If I were the only girl
In the world
And you were the only boy
[DOORBELL BUZZING]
Nothing else would matter
Keep on going. That ain't the law.
In the world today
We could go on loving
LARRY: Come on, open up.
It's your favorite bootlegger.
HELEN [SINGING]:
In the same old...
Hey, Larry. Ben.
- Finney, we got the good stuff.
- Oh, imported?
And how.
I've been up all night printing the labels.
Just made for two
Larry, come here.
With...
Hey, take it easy, now, will you, fellas?
Ben, you know where it is.
- Show them, huh?
MAN: I've been here before.
What's the matter now, kid?
Nothing.
Would you start again, please?
If I were the only girl in the world
- You got six cases of rye coming, right?
- Right.
Kid's got talent.
Not enough brass in her voice.
Finney, you got a tin ear.
Okay, next week, what kind of gin you want?
Since you've been hustling for
Whitey Krause, the gin's getting weaker.
When I start hustling for myself, you start getting the good stuff from Canada.
- What kind of gin you want?
- Imported.
- Three cases.
- Two.
Two cases of regular gin.
Regular, imported, it's all from the same bathtub.
That kid's good. She's really got it.
How about Scotch?
You got it in real Scotch bottles this time?
Two cases of regular Scotch.
Do yourself a favor. Hire the kid.
I hope your hooch is better than your suggestions.
Besides, I don't go for that sad stuff.
What do you mean? The customers drink more when they cry.
Six hundred and forty dollars.
HELEN:
Wonderful things to you
There would be
Such wonderful things to do
If I were the only...
Tell you what.
I'll get Whitey to knock a fin off every case of booze, you give her the job.
What's the canary to you?
Nothing. I'm just a music lover.
HELEN:
And you were the only boy
Well, you get the job, girly.
I do?
I didn't even think you were listening.
You'll be here at 8:00 tonight.
I'll supply the hostess dress.
You get $ 15 a week and 10 percent of all the liquor you sell.
But I don't drink. I'm a singer.
Sing people into buying drinks.
Did Mr. Maddux have anything to do with this?
Maddux? Who's Maddux?
You want this job or don't you want it?
Yes, yes.
Thank you very much, Mr. Finney.
- I'll be here at 8.
- On time.
Glad you made it, honey.
Thanks.
GIRLS [SINGING]:
I found my love in Avalon
- Beside the bay
- Beside the bay
I left my love in Avalon
- And sailed away
- And sailed away
I dream of him and Avalon
From dusk till dawn
And so I think I'll travel on
To Avalon
There she is, the one in the middle.
Don't they have tomatoes in Canada?
You need her along on this junket like you need two heads.
You handle your end of the deal.
She's a good front for me.
The deal's cinched. I got it all set with the stage manager up there.
I'll travel on to Avalon
FINNEY:
Hey, girly. Come here.
Come on, pick yourself out a chump and get busy ordering drinks.
Yes, sir.
Hey, honey, honey.
When you order, you want booze or cold tea?
Cold tea.
MAN 1:
Come here, baby. Let's make whoopee.
- Let go of me.
- Wow, you are the cat's pajamas.
You know, they ought to have a picture of you in front of this joint. You're a re...
MAN 1:
Hey, what is this he...?
Get out of...
MAN 2:
Knock it off.
- Take out the garbage.
MAN 2: Get out of here, you bum.
Happy to.
Relax, kid.
- What's with hitting my customers?
- He was insulting her.
If she can't be insulted,
I don't want her.
- So fire her.
- Oh, no, please...
Broads with baby faces spell nothing but trouble. Give me my dress back.
It ain't gonna look so good on you, Finney.
WHITEY:
Larry?
BEN: Whitey, why don't we see the show and have two laps?
Finney, a table for the boys.
Sit down.
You don't wanna work in a joint like this.
You need someone to look after you.
You'll look after me? That's funny.
Larry, where'd you go?
How could you just leave a note?
My back was up against the wall.
I wrote you I was sorry.
Not half as sorry as I am.
You wanna sing for a pack of muzzlers like this?
I told you, I'm sorry.
I wanna help you. I already got an idea.
You ever been to Canada?
What are you talking about?
What about us?
This is for you, just for you, a hundred percent for you.
It can lead to New York City, the big time.
This is my pal Ben. Ben, Helen Morgan.
How are you?
You tell her.
This idea is a lollapalooza.
There's this beauty contest in Montreal to pick Miss Canada.
Larry and I are sort of the publicity agents for the thing.
The winner gets a thousand bucks...
...and a two-week contract in Broadway with a big musical.
And it's all arranged.
You're gonna win it.
I'm not a Canadian.
They don't stamp "made in Canada" on the behinds of little girls.
What do you say?
I don't know.
[APPLAUSE]
ANNOUNCER:
Miss Claudine Latour of Montreal...
...from the great province of Quebec.
[APPLAUSE]
Miss Helen Morgan from Whitewood, Saskatchewan.
[APPLAUSE]
Miss Dolly Delaney from Kenora, Ontario.
One of our local girls.
REPORTER:
Boy.
ANNOUNCER: Last but not least,
Miss Denise Rubiano...
Get this on the wire and ask for an answer.
Yes, sir.
Well, there they are, folks.
A corsage of Canadian cuties.
One of them is going to walk out of here Miss Canada.
In a few moments, the judges will give us their decision.
But in order to maintain complete impartiality in selecting Miss Canada...
...we have asked an American to be the chairman of our judges' committee.
You all know him.
He's a well-known New York attorney and a frequent visitor to our fair land.
Mr. Russell Wade.
Bring it over here.
Aren't you through yet?
What's taking so long?
What are you worried about?
You're in the clear.
All you know is we bought scenery from an American show that flopped.
- We're shipping it back to the States.
- Okay, but hurry up.
I think it would be better to truck the stuff through.
I know what I'm doing.
It looks more legit on the train.
Ladies and gentlemen, the judges have reached a decision.
I present Her Royal Highness,
Miss Canada...
...Helen Morgan of Whitewood, Saskatchewan.
[APPLAUSE]
Ladies and gentlemen, there's great, great excitement in Montreal tonight...
...where an unknown young lady from Whitewood, Saskatchewan...
...has been crowned Miss Canada.
Here you are, honey. It's a little bit nicer than that hula skirt I gave you once.
It's all so exciting.
I can't believe what's happening to me.
- You're wanted in the judges' room.
- Thank you.
Probably wanna give you a check for $ 1000 and sign your contract.
Do you think so?
- Good luck.
- Thanks.
Miss Morgan, this is rather embarrassing for me.
One of the reporters checked by Teletype...
...and he claims they never heard of you in Whitewood.
Is that true, Miss Morgan?
I'm not even a Canadian.
I'm from Illinois.
Well, as one American to another, now we're both in a spot.
What's going to happen?
Well, you'll be automatically disqualified.
You'll have to return all the prizes.
Yes. Yes, of course I...
I'm very sorry.
Well, not about the prizes, but about all the trouble I've caused.
What baffles me is why you ever attempted a hoax like this.
I wanted a chance at that New York musical.
Oh.
In my business, it's always refreshing to hear someone who tells the truth.
Are they going to prosecute or anything?
Well, I think I can quash this for you.
No, I think we can safely consider the matter closed.
Thank you very much, Mr. Wade.
I'm more ashamed than ever now.
Well, don't be.
There's one thing you'll never have to be ashamed about.
Your looks. You're a very pretty girl.
Thank you.
- Is this Car 90?
- This is it, right here.
- Ben.
- Dolly.
Funny, I don't care what I kiss anymore.
How are you?
Sue, Ben Weaver, the guy I was telling you about.
- My pleasure.
- How are you?
We just died in every vaudeville house in Canada.
We're crawling our way back to New York. What are you doing?
When you wrote, I made a deal to buy up scenery in a show.
What kind of shenanigans are you up to?
- A little enterprise we're interested in.
SUE: Helen.
- Helen Morgan, how are you?
- Sue.
- Fellow troupers, Helen Morgan.
HELEN: How do you do?
Helen, meet the late Songbird Trio.
Snappy patter, golden notes and flat on our...
How have you been? I read about you being Miss Canada, almost.
- What happened?
- She was rooked out of the title.
CONDUCTOR:
Board. All aboard.
DOLLY: You getting on?
CONDUCTOR: Watch your step.
DOLLY: We'll talk all the way.
SUE: I'm so glad to see you.
Let's go.
Everything's jade, boy, a lead-pipe cinch.
- Great.
- Here.
I got it, I got it.
[TRAIN BELL RINGING]
We'll be stopping at the border soon, near Niagara Falls.
That give you any ideas?
Yeah. If you got a barrel.
You're a riot.
Dolly, I'm asking you to be my ball and chain.
You keep hanging around with a crook like Larry, you'll wind up with a real one.
Ben, I told you, you show me a ring and a good, honest job and I'll get serious.
Maybe.
I must have written a hundred times.
I just wrote and wrote and he never even answered me.
Why is it men never appreciate pretty young girls weeping over them...
...until they are too old?
It is a young man, isn't it?
Yes.
The way he treats me...
There's an old proverb that says:
"These are the worst things:
To be in bed and sleep not...
...to wait for someone who comes not...
...to try to please and please not."
Okay, so you're not Miss Canada.
So it won't mean anything in your life.
You really did win.
That ought to make you feel good.
- They took it away from me.
- Who needs it?
Look, I'll make it up to you some other way, I promise you.
You made those other babes look like they were hanging out to dry.
- Is something wrong?
- No, no, nothing.
BEN: Is this the border?
LARRY: Yeah.
- Everything okay?
- I don't know.
- What's going on?
- Will you be a nice girl and keep quiet?
- Wait a minute. What's going on?
- Everything's great. Just stay in there.
- Oh, you're up to something.
- Will you shut up?
You're a hoodlum just like him.
I'm nuts about you, but I'm gonna slug you.
Come on, please.
Slug me, I dare you, just once.
Get inside. Everything's fine, Helen.
She's just a little nervous.
Why do we need dames on a job like this?
There they are.
AGENT: See you gentlemen a minute?
U.S. Customs.
- One of you Larry Maddux?
- Yes, me.
You're on the manifest as manager of this show, right?
- That's right.
- Come with me.
Well, now, what's the matter?
Yeah, what's wrong, officer?
Smell it. And don't tell me it's a new kind of bonded makeup.
Let's go.
Come on, don't be bashful.
SUE: Of course he knows...
- Hi.
- Hi, Dolly.
...who I am.
What kind of party is this?
You bring your own booze and they ask you for dough besides.
It's a rent party, silly.
The girls are broke, so we're all chipping in to keep them from being evicted.
Which reminds me, I ought to give a mink-coat party sometime.
HELEN:
Eat up, everybody.
Compass Delicatessen has another special on herring.
Have a piece, Joe. It's good.
How about you, Stanislaus?
I can't live on herrings forever.
The Eskimos do.
WOMAN 1:
What's this? Scotch or rye?
MAN: What's it taste like?
- Cleaning fluid.
Must be rye.
Scotch tastes like camphor.
Fourteen, 10, 20...
- Fourteen-forty?
- Would you like some?
- Hey, what's going on here? I had $25.
- Shh.
I just gave that boy over there $ 10.
He's trying out for a part in The Green Hat tomorrow.
His suit's in hock.
He needs it for the audition.
This party is to raise our rent, not his wardrobe.
Don't worry about it.
- Hello, everybody.
WOMAN 2: How old is the baby?
Take it easy.
Two years.
Bottled in bond.
[ALL LAUGHING]
- Hello.
- Hello.
Hi.
Let's go.
SUE:
Eddie. Then you did get my letter.
- Well, l...
- Tell this one you're with me, sugar.
ED:
Forget it. It's not important.
[MAN & WOMAN LAUGHING]
It's a wonderful party, darling.
Just wonderful.
MAN:
Wonderful.
I'd prefer she didn't sit on our good couch.
She's liable to dirty up the cushion.
- Why, you...
- Just a minute.
- She can't get away with that.
- Take it easy.
Give me that. That stuff is potent.
We're not both gonna be little stuffed shirties, are we?
We're gonna have a party.
Come on, Sue, you've had enough.
Let me have it.
[SUE SOBBING]
Sue.
- Keep an eye on her tonight, will you?
- Why? What's the matter?
Good old Ed showed up complete with new girl.
Poor kid.
What we gotta go through for a few bucks.
- Benny's back in town.
- Hey, Benny.
Just happened to be passing by with an armful of groceries.
Which you probably stole.
Say, you're not still sore about that Canadian caper, are you?
Larry took the rap, didn't he?
They roughed him up pretty good.
They crowded me out so fast
I didn't know what hit me.
- I couldn't do a thing for poor Larry.
- How is he?
They worked him over something awful.
Face, ribs...
- And when the ambulance finally came...
- Ambulance?
- Where is he?
- Where I belong, in your heart, gorgeous.
- Oh, Larry, are you all right?
- Never been better.
Here, take care of this, Ben.
But there's nothing the matter with your face.
What kind of tricks are you pulling now?
What'd you come for?
To stick up the place?
Hold your horses.
You're blackening my character.
You and your lies.
Last time I listened to you it was about the beauty contest in Canada.
All you wanted was to use me to smuggle liquor.
Now, wait a minute, wait a minute.
Who needed you?
Whitey didn't want me to take you along.
I was trying to help you.
This town is ready.
I'm gonna open it for you like an oyster.
I don't like oysters.
I don't want you.
I don't want anything to do with you.
Just leave me alone.
That girl's crazy about you.
Ben, Ben, listen.
This is my subway symphony.
It's very modern, no tune.
For weeks, I'm riding the subway,
I listen to the rails.
I study the faces, listen to the clink and clank.
I write the music,
I ride again, I write the music.
This is the ride of the subway. Listen.
[HUMMING]
Next time, take a bus.
I got a bus symphony too.
[HUMMING]
Sue.
Sue?
Ah!
Helen.
[CRYING]
BEN:
What happened?
- Oh, dear God, no, no.
- Come on, Helen.
Let's get out of here.
WOMAN: I wouldn't have come if...
- Hello, operator.
- Get me the police.
HANK: Come on, everybody get out.
- Come on, downstairs. Let's go.
- Hello, police.
Hello, police.
There's been an accident. Hurry.
[AMBULACE SIREN WAILING]
Me and Ben straightened everything out.
There won't be any trouble.
Drink it.
Come on, it will make you feel better.
You're still crying?
When are you gonna grow up?
- What kind of a person are you?
- I'm a live one.
That's the only kind that counts.
She's dead, so I'm sorry, but she wasn't going anyplace anyway.
She's probably glad the struggle's over.
But me, I'm not dead.
All my life, I've been one jump ahead of a police whistle.
You see that down there?
Nothing but a sewer filled with a bunch of rats.
They live by the double-cross.
I'm gonna shove my fist down their throats and tear them.
Is that what you want out of life?
Now, wait a minute.
I crawled through a lot of mud in France.
I got myself a lot of medals.
I can't cash them in.
From now on, I'm looking out for myself,
Larry Maddux.
Look, Helen, you got talent.
You got a good voice, you know how to deliver a song. And me?
I got a new business.
It's bought me a raft of new friends.
Some of them own clubs.
I case them pretty good.
The best place to start is the
Blue Dragon. You ever heard of it?
Pack up your things, get out of here. Come on with me.
- Where?
- Wherever I go.
You asking me to marry you, Larry?
That's what I thought.
- Larry, don't you believe in anything?
- Me and you.
- But I come second.
- That's right.
I know what's eating you.
You wanna see your name in lights.
Well, I got a hunch you're gonna be a big star.
But I'm gonna be along.
What kind of life is mine?
Sometimes I feel like I'm in a hole that only gets deeper.
In Danville. Now with you.
Everything's built on sand.
Oh, Larry, hold me.
Tell me you love me, that you want me, please. Please.
I feel haunted.
Not just because of what Sue did tonight.
It's been like that ever since I was a kid.
MEN [SINGING]:
Isn 't she cute? Isn 't she sweet?
She's gentle
And mentally nearly complete
She's knockout, she's regal
Her beauty is illegal
MEN & WOMEN [SINGING]:
She's the girl friend
Take her to dance, take her to tea
It's stunning how cunning
This lady can be
A look at this vision
Will cause a collision
She's the girl friend
She is smart, she's refined
How can she be real?
She has heart, she has mind
Gosh, the girl's ideal
Isn 't she cute? Isn 't she sweet?
An eyeful you'd die full
Of pleasure to meet
In my funny fashion
I'm cursed with a passion
For the girl friend
- We're warming them up.
- lf I don't stop shaking...
...you won't see anything but a bad imitation of Gilda Gray doing a shimmy.
- Are you nervous?
- Yeah.
Wait a minute. Here, use this.
Give you something to do with your hands.
And be good, Helen, will you?
This is the first decent job we've had.
Come on, kids, let's line up.
Remember, Tony, one hand washes the other, don't forget.
- I'm the guy who brought you the dame.
- Look, Larry, I told you once before.
Hit or not,
I cannot buy any whiskey from you.
I gotta buy from Whitey.
This is his territory.
I'm setting up an independent organization.
I sell it cheaper, deliver faster.
This is the real stuff.
I run it in from a three-mile limit off the Jersey coast.
It's the real McCoy.
Whitey don't like his boys going independent.
Why don't you tell him your proposition?
You missed an appointment with me uptown.
I had a more important one downtown.
I'm quitting you.
- I gotta be top man.
- So you're setting up a deal with Tony?
Oh, no, no, I told him no deal.
I'm not sure I'll be able to stand having you walk out on me, Larry.
You're what's called an indispensable man. At least, for the moment.
- Tony wouldn't buy whiskey from you.
- Oh, no, no, not at all.
Tony wouldn't do anything to offend me.
And that would offend me a lot.
You know, I've seen a lot of guys get big ideas because of some broad.
The smart ones wake up sooner or later...
...and go back to their trade of making a fast buck.
Now, you be smart.
I don't want you in competition with me.
Just to show you I'm a big man,
I'm gonna forget you even tried to quit.
Far as I'm concerned, you're still with me.
[APPLAUSE]
Maybe I didn't make myself clear,
Whitey.
I'm not working for you anymore.
WHITEY:
Go on now, beat it, both of you.
[SINGING]
The one I love
Belongs to somebody else
He sings his tender songs
To somebody else
I'm sorry. Whitey and I...
HELEN:
And even when I have
My arms around him
I know his thoughts are strong
For somebody else
The hands I hold
Belong to somebody else
I'll bet they're not so cold
To somebody else
Oh, it's tough to be alone
On a shelf
It's worse to fall in love
By yourself
The one I love
Belongs to somebody else
The one I love
Belongs to somebody else
[APPLAUSE]
Did Larry come back for the second show, Dolly?
- No, why?
- I'm worried about him.
Helen, will you quit worrying about him and think about yourself?
They loved you.
Come on, there's your music.
[BAND PLAYING SOFT MELOD Y]
No, on the piano. That was great.
[APPLAUSE]
[SINGING]
Just a love nest
Cozy and warm
Like a dove breast
Down on a farm
[WHISTLES]
We're federal agents. You're all under arrest for violation of the Volstead Act.
MAN 1: Hold on, no.
MAN 2: Get out of here. Listen, my...
- Hey, you can't do this.
- That's what they keep telling us.
Come on, go ahead.
Don't worry about a thing.
I'll take care of you.
- You'll be okay when I get you outside.
- Thanks.
All right, just a minute.
She's got nothing to do with selling booze.
- She's just a singer.
- Okay, singer, back with the others.
Come on, girls, let's go.
Come on, in here.
Wanna know who put the finger on us?
Your boyfriend, Maddux.
- That's a lie.
- You sure can pick them.
He will shoot his own grandmother in the back...
...and lay bets on which way she's falling.
Hey, kiddo. First time in, huh?
Listen, honey, you can get bail.
- All the others did.
- Bail? How do I get that?
Why don't you phone your lawyer?
He should be able to spring you out easy.
- Hey, Jimmy.
JIMMY: Oh, what's the matter now?
- This kid wants her legal rights.
- Oh, pipe down, flossy.
She's allowed one phone call.
That's the law.
I don't even know a lawyer.
I've never had use for one.
You sure got use for one now.
Judge Fowler is pretty hard on those speakeasy cases.
Speakeasy cases. Yeah.
- Wait a minute.
WOMAN: Wait a minute.
I do know a lawyer.
- Wade, Mr. Russell Wade.
- Mr. Russell Wade.
- You know Mr. Wade?
- Yes.
- Yes.
- Do you really know him?
- Yes.
- Yes.
Well, the phone is all yours, princess.
Oh, she's gone. Goodbye. Whoo!
[HUMMING]
Well, there it is, gentlemen.
The new project of the
Metropolitan Coordinating Commission.
I don't think that any project that's been put before you...
...will do more toward beautifying our city.
Or provide so many jobs for the faithful members of our party.
- Beg your pardon, sir.
- Yes, Johnson.
There's a Miss Morgan on the phone.
She says it's an urgent legal business.
I don't know any Miss Morgan.
Tell her to contact my office downtown.
- Very well, sir.
- Now...
Morgan.
- Oh, Johnson.
- Yes, sir?
Excuse me, gentlemen.
I'll take that call in here.
Yes, indeed.
This will be a great achievement.
- Hello, Miss Morgan.
HELEN: Remember me?
- Of course I remember you.
- I'm in jail.
- Jail?
- That's right.
- What beauty contest was it this time?
- It was a raid.
Now, now, don't you worry about it.
- Which jail are you in?
- Center Street.
I'll be down to take care of it immediately.
Thank you.
HELEN [SINGING]: Oh, do, do, do
What you've done, done, done
Before, baby
Do, do, do
What I do, do, do adore, baby
Let's try again, sigh again
Fly again to heaven
Baby, see, it's ABC
I love you and you love me
I'm just breezing along
With the breeze
Trailing the rails
Roaming the seas
Like the birdies that sing in the trees
Pleasing to live
Living to please
The sky is the only roof I have
Over my head
And when I'm weary
Mother Nature makes me a bed
I'm just going along as I please
Breezing along
With the breeze
I'm known here if you'd like a drink.
No, that will be all.
You always take me to such unusual places.
Oh, Russell, in all my life,
I've never had anyone like you.
Someone I can look up to, lean on.
You changed my whole life for me.
You've changed mine too.
Helen, for this afternoon,
I've got a wonderful idea.
I have a recording day till 3.
Helen, you've been working too hard.
What are you trying to prove?
Work doesn't bother me.
It's being without it that does.
Yeah, I know the feeling.
[BAND PLAYING
"BREEZIN' ALONG WITH THE BREEZE"]
While it lasts, it's nice being somebody besides your real self.
The shiny name on the marquee, the picture on the song sheet.
You are that person, Helen.
That's why you're a success.
Even if you're right, it hasn't given me the security I get from knowing you.
That's the most important thing
I've ever known.
- Russell, you aren't listening.
- What?
- Oh, yes, I am, I...
- Is something wrong?
Helen, excuse me just a minute.
I'll be right back.
[WADE SPEAKING INAUDIBLY]
She's lovely. Who is she?
She's my wife.
She's beautiful.
I won't give you any of the usual alibis...
...as to why I haven't told you about her before.
The real reason is the obvious one.
I was afraid of losing you.
Now, it's better that you know.
- Does she know?
- Oh, yes.
For some years, we've been good friends to each other, that's all.
We'll find a way to work it out, Helen.
After you've had a chance to order things in your own mind.
Don't feel badly, Russell.
I always get involved with men who are wrong for me.
[SINGING]
My time is your time
Your time is my time
We just seem to synchronize
And sympathize
We're harmonizing old songs
And the new songs
Gay songs and blue songs
There's no time like our time
And no one like you
He's pretty good. I think
I'll hire him to sing for the wedding.
Well, now, if you two don't look like a couple of honeybees in a pastry shop.
- What's on?
- This.
- An engagement ring.
- Only 30 payments to go.
Oh, that's wonderful for you, Dolly.
Ben finally gave up the racket, so I decided to give in and said yes.
You know,
I wish you both every happiness.
- Alfredo, bring us some champagne.
- Yes, ma'am.
- I have some coming up, their very best.
- Good.
Keep it coming.
We'll make it a real celebration.
Take a look at who just crawled in.
Wait a minute.
- Well, well, hello, Dolly, hello, Ben.
- Hi, Larry.
- Hello, Helen.
- Hello, Larry.
You two are really living it up, aren't you?
There's a difference between this joint and downtown speaks.
One thing's the same, the phone's in the lobby in case you wanna tip off the cops.
Congratulations, you two.
No, I just got the news.
You're gonna be living in a cottage with a picket fence...
...just like the title page on a song sheet.
Yeah, Dolly wants us to save up for a chicken farm.
Sit down, Larry, have a drink.
No, thanks. Come on over to the bar, I wanna talk to you.
- Sure, Larry.
- Sit down.
You're not interested in anything he has to say.
You put a ring on their finger, they put a ring through your nose.
- Sure.
- I'd like to go.
But, you know,
I'm in the used-truck business now.
- Strictly legit.
- Okay.
But anytime you need any extra capital, why, just look me up.
Oh, nice to have seen you again, Helen.
Well, here's to you both.
Lots of happiness.
It's your turn next, Helen.
I've been watching the way Wade looks at you. You could pour it on a waffle.
Now, Helen, huh?
It's still that angle promoter, isn't it, that Larry?
Ouch.
- You've got big feet.
- You've got a big mouth.
HELEN: Alfredo.
ALFREDO: Yes, ma'am.
- More champagne.
- Of course, ma'am.
- What are you drinking, babe?
- Anything expensive.
- What?
- Champagne.
Champagne.
RUD Y: Most of you are aware we are honored tonight...
...by the presence of one of Broadway's greatest singing stars.
Ordinarily, I wouldn't impose upon her, but tonight...
...I'm going to ask Helen Morgan to favor us with a song.
You keep the champagne nice and cool because I'll be right back.
Thank you very much, Rudy.
I'd like to sing this song for a very happy couple...
...my closest friends who became engaged tonight.
Someday he'll come along
The man I love
And he'll be big and strong
The man I love
And when he comes my way
I'll do my best
To make him stay
He'll look at me and smile
I'll understand
And in a little while
He'll take my hand
And though it seems absurd
I know we both won 't say a word
Maybe I shall meet him Sunday
Maybe Monday
Maybe not
Still I'm sure to meet him one day
Maybe Tuesday
Will be my good news day
He'll build a little home
Just meant for two
From which I'll never roam
Who would? Would you?
And so all else above
I'm waiting for
The man I love
[KEY JIGGLING IN DOOR LOCK]
[CLINGING]
How did you get in?
I got friends.
Always stacking the deck, aren't you?
If I could stack the deck,
I wouldn't be here now.
What's the matter, Larry?
Did the redhead tell you to get lost?
- Or is your conscience bothering you?
- No, neither one.
Look, I can't let you alone.
I put your face on every dame.
Doesn't that mean something?
After I saw you, I couldn't sleep.
I was out there walking the pavement.
All you have to do is show your face.
You think it's easy, don't you?
I don't know, you tell me.
Don't touch me, I don't wanna feel your hands. You're hurting me.
But I was the first, good, bad or iindifferent, and I'm still stuck on you.
No, Larry, it's no good. I wanna forget.
Do you?
I watched you tonight.
You couldn't take your eyes off me.
You wanted me the same way I wanted to be close to you. That's why I'm here.
If I'm wrong, just say the word, and I'll go.
Go ahead, say it.
Tell me to get out of here.
Why does it always have to be you?
- Because I want you.
- Let go of me.
- Any way I can get you.
- Even asking me to marry you?
Did Wade ask you to marry him?
Come on, now get off it.
We're hooked. You're inside me.
You claw your way out like an alley cat, but nothing's changed.
You're still the same Ionely kid
I picked up in Chicago...
...and I'm the same guy from the tent.
I hate you.
I hate you, Larry.
So when I was investigating this building on 52nd Street...
...I discovered that you owned it.
What interests you about that property?
Between you and me, it's a perfect location for a nightclub, not a speak.
It is small, the best.
Intimate, that's the word.
Everything in good taste.
Carpet's so thick that you need snowshoes to get across.
And you intend to sell your liquor there?
Of course not. You're a lawyer, you know that's breaking the law.
We'd hike up the prices, though.
Slap on a steep cover charge to keep out the riffraff.
And what benefit would you get from this, Mr. Maddux?
I'll be the front. I manage the place.
I got the know-how, you got the dough-how.
Naturally, I'd want a piece of the club for my favorite charity, Larry Maddux.
Oh, I surmised as much.
I beg your pardon?
Mr. Maddux, in my law practice,
I've had occasion to help men like you.
Men who are engaged in questionable enterprises.
I'd be pretty stupid to go into business with one, wouldn't I?
You'd be stupid not to listen to a good deal...
...because a guy don't belong to the same clubs.
I've been listening.
- No offense if I keep my eyes open too?
- Why don't you let me finish?
I mean, this place would pay big dividends.
I'll get you a star to work there permanently.
The biggest name in the business.
You know who?
Personal friend of ours, Helen Morgan.
Helen know about this?
There's nothing to know yet.
Is there, Mr. Wade?
See, I think we both agree that Helen deserves a break.
To tell the truth, she's not much for these smash and grab rackets.
This place would give her security.
Be the first thing she ever owned a percentage of.
Seems to me, she's doing pretty well.
Working all the best clubs.
Don't kid yourself, Mr. Wade.
I mean, a fancy velvet rope don't mean nothing when you're still hired help.
Mr. Maddux, how good are you at keeping your mouth shut?
Because anything I do for Miss Morgan has got to be done very quietly.
That's what I was saying.
You talk about silent partners...
...in this setup, you'd be invisible.
Are we in business?
All right, you bring me a contract with
Helen Morgan's name, we're in business.
On one condition.
That my name is never associated with the enterprise in any way.
I like the way you talk.
[WHISTLE BLOWING]
Excuse me. Cigarette girl.
I just happen to be out of butts.
Oh, wait a minute. When did you start smoking cigarettes, huh?
[CIGARETTE GIRL LAUGHS]
[DOLLY FAKES LAUGH]
WAITER:
Nice evening, mademoiselle.
Hi, Larry.
Place has gone over real big.
It's a high-class bunch.
- How are you, Dolly?
- Fine.
What a lot of blood money there must be in the room, huh?
- Very funny.
- Oh, you and your friends, come on.
- Fred.
- I'll see you later, Larry.
Don't get carried away by any big tips.
Mr. Wade has table number one.
He's supposed to bring Ziegfeld.
The number one table will be reserved,
Mr. Maddux.
- Sir?
- It's Mark Hellinger.
- Oh, really?
- See that he has plenty of cigarettes.
I read his column every day.
Honey, in that outfit, you don't have to be able to read. Come on.
Hello, Mr. Hellinger.
Compliments of the house.
- I'm pleased you could come, Mr. Wade.
- Well.
- Miss Herbert, Mr. Maddux.
- How do you do?
- Mr. Ziegfeld.
- Pleased to meet you.
And Mr. Kirk, he's associated with Mr. Ziegfeld.
Ted?
Thank you.
Well, what do you think of my club?
You're a remarkable young man,
Mr. Maddux.
A child of the times, Mr. Wade.
- Sammy, table number one for Mr. Wade.
- Yes, sir.
- Hello, Mr. Ziegfeld, how are you?
- Hello, Jimmy.
Jimmy McHugh,
Miss Morgan's accompanist.
- Hello.
- How do you do?
I hear you wrote some new songs.
You'll hear them tonight, Mr. Ziegfeld.
I hope you enjoy yourself.
- Thank you.
- This way, Mr. Ziegfeld.
Thank you.
Hello, Whitey.
Come over to mingle with a better class of people?
You're doing all right in my racket...
...with my customers, but not for long, Larry.
There's a new federal agent in town who's a real tough customer.
So?
He's anxious to make a big impression on Washington.
Don't worry. Every time a new fed comes to town, he's met with an envelope.
Larry, this revenuer is different.
He don't take.
And he can do more than just padlock a joint.
It'd be bad if he started with your place.
- Why would he do a thing like that?
- Who knows?
All he needs is a warrant and a little birdie...
...to whisper encouragement in his ear.
- Sammy.
- Yes, sir.
Get Mr. Krause a very nice table and give him all the birdseed he can eat.
[WOMAN LAUGHS]
Right this way, Mr. Krause.
- Thanks.
- Play it right.
Larry, I'll do my best.
Boy, it's going great, just great.
There's not room for another false eyelash.
Oh, the way I feel now
I'm gonna break into dollar signs.
I got a big surprise for you, baby.
My old pal Ziegfeld is out front.
You never told me you knew Ziegfeld.
No, Ziggy and I were brought up in the same elevator.
- Come on, are you ready?
- I think so.
Wish me luck.
Baby, with what you got, you don't need luck.
Oh, Larry, the people are waiting.
So let them wait.
It builds up character.
Here's a... Larry.
They're ready for you, Miss Morgan.
I'll take this up with you later.
With your kind permission...
...the Helen Morgan Club proudly presents Miss Helen Morgan.
[SINGING]
Grab your coat
And get your hat
Leave your worry on the doorstep
Just direct your feet
To the sunny side of the street
Can 't you hear a pitter-pat?
And that happy tune is your step
Life can be so sweet
On the sunny side of the street
I used to walk in the shade
With those blues on parade
But I'm not afraid
This rover crossed over
If I never have a cent
I'll be rich as Rockefeller
Gold dust at my feet
On the sunny side of the street
I used to walk in the shade
With those blues on parade
But I'm not afraid
This rover crossed over
If I never have a cent
I'll be rich as Rockefeller
Gold dust at my feet
I'm out of the shade
No more blues on parade
On the sunny side
Of the street
- Oh, honey, I told you, you'd be great.
- Thanks, Dolly.
- You were just wonderful, wonderful.
- Thank you, Ben.
- Miss Morgan, Mr. Ziegfeld.
- How do you do?
You were splendid.
And I wish you every success in your beautiful new place.
- Thank you.
- Helen, you really outshone yourself.
I built the place to show her off.
You ought to be congratulated,
Mr. Maddux.
Must be a thrill having your own nightclub.
Oh, it is, but I don't fool myself.
It's not like being in a Broadway show.
That's the real thing.
That reminds me.
There's something
I'd like to discuss with you.
Mr. Maddux, why don't you show me around the rest of your club.
May I?
Miss Morgan, have you read
Edna Ferber's new book, Show Boat?
Yes, I have.
Well, as you might have heard...
...Oscar Hammerstein has adapted it into a musical play.
And Jerry Kern has written a brilliant score for it.
All his music is wonderful.
I've been looking at hundreds of girls to play the part of Julie in Show Boat.
We've even had to put off production until I find her.
But after hearing you tonight,
I'm convinced I found Julie.
What?
We go into rehearsals in a week and open in February.
What do you say, Miss Morgan?
- Mr. Ziegfeld, hold me very tight.
- What?
I think I'm going to faint.
[ZIGFIELD CHUCKLES]
[APPLAUSE]
- You murdered them.
- You were marvelous, Helen.
- I hope the critics think so.
- You better hurry up and change.
Ziggy's giving a party at his penthouse.
We'll wait for the reviews up there.
Oh, tonight has made her a star.
A big Broadway star.
Yeah, but I feel sorry for poor old Ziggy.
He's only got her for a run of the play.
Me? I got her signed to my club permanently.
Listen to what Burns Mantle says.
"I consider myself still a young man...
...but Helen Morgan has made me run out of superlatives before my time."
Hello, Mr. Wade.
The Graphic doesn't have much to say about the show.
They sum it all up in two words.
- Well, what are they, love?
- Superb.
The way you made me feel tonight...
...I wish every one of those lights were spelling out your name.
Mademoiselle, you sang comme flamboyer.
Like a heart in flames, like the burning of a torch.
Merci beaucoup.
I know that's right.
I tell her.
In Europe, she would be idolized.
For them, she would be the heartbroken waif...
...singing of a lost love.
I beg you. Let me arrange a tour.
I need only send a cable.
Dubois, are you trying to hijack my star?
Hijack? I'm sorry,
I do not know this word.
- I'm sorry.
- Excuse me.
GROUP [SINGING]:
I wanna be happy
But I won 't be happy
Till I make you happy too
Say, mister, life's really worth living
When we are mirth-giving
WOMAN: Will you cut it out, Dawn?
Don't make trouble.
DAWN:
Oh, why not?
Just because Helen got her breaks by playing cozy-cozy with some big shot.
What's that make her, sacred or something?
Oh, everybody knows Russell Wade's behind her. And what's more...
...Whitey Krause says Wade's the guy who really built that nightclub for her.
- Dawn, shh.
- No, don't stop her.
Go on. What were you saying about Russell Wade?
I was only saying what everybody else in town knows.
That Russell Wade's your landlord.
You must be drunk.
Oh, don't give me those big baby eyes.
Who do you think put up the loot for the ritzy Helen Morgan Club?
- Larry Maddux.
- Larry?
[DAWN LAUGHS]
That's a hot one.
This is the Larry that couldn't get two nickels to rub together.
Oh, give her a break, Dawn.
Oh, it's about time somebody put her straight.
Russell Wade owns your joint, honey.
And Larry is just along for the ride.
Helen, wait.
Oh, Dawn, you shouldn't have said that.
Believe me, Mark. There's no gossip item in Helen's and my friendship.
Helen, you were great.
- They loved you, they really did.
- Thank you, Mark.
Would you mind?
I'd like to talk with Russell alone.
Of course. Excuse me.
See you later.
Well, is there something wrong?
Is it true?
About your putting up the money for the club?
Yeah, it's true. I won't lie to you.
It's you who put up the money.
Please believe me, if I'd known,
I never for one...
No one was supposed to know ever.
I should've realized...
...when you deal with people like that, somebody is gonna get hurt.
What he's done to me, that's my own fault.
But this, to be able to use you because of me...
...to drag you into one of his dirty selfish schemes...
...I'll never forgive myself.
Please don't feel like that.
I'm sorry it turned out this way, but at least I got what I wanted out of Larry.
A chance to help you.
The great thing about these Show Boat reviews...
...is what they're gonna do for our nightclub, baby.
I'll put in smaller tables.
Let customers knock their knees, makes them feel chummy.
- Good night, Helen.
- Wait a minute, Russell.
Mr. Maddux has business to discuss with you.
What do you see in him?
Okay, come on. Give it to me straight.
All that sweet talk, it was just to get me to sign a contract.
Is that what he said?
There'd always be an angle to everything you do.
The club you with Russell's money...
...which you couldn't have gotten if you didn't have me.
So what?
We got a club, you're a star,
Wade's got a good investment.
- All we gotta do is lick the platter clean.
- No, you're not licking any platter.
You're out of the deal.
You made your last buck out of me.
Well, you picked a good time to walk out.
Right at the top where I put you.
Come on, level with me.
You're in love with him?
- That's got nothing to do with it.
- Yes or no?
Look, I want an answer to my question.
Yes or no?
What if I am?
You can't knock him off like a rival bootlegger.
- Yes or no?
- Yes.
You dirty little tramp, you.
You're no better than me.
You know he's married. What are you trying to get your hooks into him for?
Now, look, answer me.
I love him.
I love him.
Remember one thing about me.
I never begged a dame for anything in my life.
You've had enough, Miss Morgan.
You're 5-foot tall, you can't hide in a 1 -foot bottle.
How about skipping this round, huh?
For Sammy?
A quarter in time saves nine.
Okay.
Okay, Miss Morgan, but make this your last.
Oh, Miss Morgan, you know, there's a lot of sour notes in that stuff.
They're waiting for you out there,
Miss Morgan.
[SINGING]
Why was I born?
Why am I living?
What do I get?
What am I giving?
Why do I want a thing
I daren 't hope for?
What can I hope for?
I wish I knew
Why do I try
To draw you near me?
Why do I cry?
You never hear me
I'm a poor fool
But what can I do?
Why was I born
To love you?
Why do I try
To draw you near me?
Why, why do I cry?
You never hear me
I'm a poor fool
But what can I do?
Why was I born
To love you?
Now, come on, you don't need this.
It's funny.
I hated this stuff when I took my first drink.
You ought to lay off it for a while,
Helen. You're getting thin.
I don't wanna preach, but I hate to see you drinking yourself into the grave.
I took the last of the sleeping pills.
Did you get any more?
Yeah, I got them.
You ought to get some sleep.
You look tired.
I think I'll give a champagne party...
...after the hundredth performance tomorrow night.
Helen, you gotta start saving your money.
You're spending it faster than you make it.
You can't go around giving hundred-dollar tips, blank checks.
I know, I've got to stop.
You realize how many people owe you money?
You have about $ 10,000 to collect.
You wanna know something?
I don't think it's gonna be paid.
You spend a lot on my account.
Oh, you're welcome to all I have.
I only wish I had more.
I know, I know.
You wanna get a laugh?
What?
I was reading something here in the book.
It reminded me of myself.
My candle burns at both its ends
It will not last the night
But, ah, my foes, and, oh, my friends
It gives a lovely light
The thing is, it doesn't give a lovely light. It's not lovely at all.
But I'm going to pull myself together,
Dolly. I will, you'll see, I've got to.
I know you will.
I can't go on this way any longer.
Always feeling so scared, so alone.
Helen, why don't you get some rest, come on.
Lie down now.
And promise me you won't worry, will you?
[APPLAUSE]
Someone's waiting for you,
Miss Morgan.
Yes, I know.
I won't need you for a while, June.
I'm sorry you had to wait, Mrs. Wade.
The curtain went up late tonight.
I thought it best we talk to each other here...
...because I know how busy you must be between the show and your nightclub.
I'll come directly to the point,
Miss Morgan.
Russell and I have had an understanding for some time.
And I've overlooked many things.
But I want you to know that I've been
Mrs. Russell Wade for a number of years.
And I intend to remain Mrs. Russell Wade for a good many more.
I think you're jumping to conclusions...
I think it best we have this out now.
My husband has a brilliant career ahead of him.
And your relationship with him is becoming public gossip.
If there should be any scandal, it would reflect upon me.
But it would ruin Russell.
Both socially and politically.
I hope I make myself clear.
I have no intention of hurting Russell or you.
Then I suggest you stop seeing him because I'll never give him a divorce.
I guess it would sound funny if I told you...
...that Russell is one of the only friends
I've ever had.
Married men don't have women like you merely as a friend, Miss Morgan.
Good night.
MAN:
Get your hands off my wife.
[CLAMORING]
COP 1:
Get in.
COP 2:
Come on, hurry it up a little, all right?
Stop it.
Stop it!
Ah!
Stop it!
Simmer down, sister.
It's the only way Uncle Sam has of keeping these places permanently closed.
COP 3:
All right, men, let's go.
LARRY:
Whitey.
It's a tough break.
Hey, hey, hey.
Come on, it's not the end of the world, is it?
Look, this morning, honest...
...I was thinking of a name of a new club for you.
Helen Morgan's Summer House.
That sounds pretty good, huh?
We'll open up this summer, make this place look like kids' play.
Come on, what do you say?
Give me the green light.
It's no good.
Everything I touch turns bad.
It's no good.
I have to get away. I have to get away.
REPORTER 1: Hold it, please.
REPORTER 2: When will you come back?
- When I'm ready to settle down.
- Who is the lucky man?
No statement.
REPORTER 1:
Hold it, Miss Morgan.
REPORTER 2: Have a good trip.
REPORTER 3: Bon voyage.
REPORTER 2: Bon voyage.
MAN: All ashore that's going ashore.
[SINGING]
There's a somebody I'm longing to see
I hope that he turns out to be
Someone to watch
Over me
Deep night
Stars in the sky above
Moonlight
Lighting our place of love
April in Paris
Whom can I run to?
What have you done
To my heart?
[APPLAUSE]
- Helen.
- Helen.
- Dolly.
- Hello, honey.
How are you, Ben?
- She looks great.
- You look great.
Let me look at you.
Marriage seems to agree with you.
If we can only agree, everything would be jake.
May I see your declaration,
Miss Morgan?
The only thing I'll need right now is this one bag.
The rest can go later to my hotel.
Hotel? What do you mean, hotel?
Aren't you staying with us?
Why do you wanna stay in that dingy, miserable hotel...
...when you can stay in our dingy apartment?
- Oh, stop it.
- I'm clowning.
Dolly fixed up a nice place.
She stuffed your mattress with petals.
It's sweet of you to want me, but I better stay at the hotel.
- I have so much to do.
- lf that's the way you wanna do it.
But be sure to come around and see our club.
You better hurry, we may fold any minute.
- Isn't it doing well?
- No.
There's a depression on.
And the Gold Spoon is one of the depressed areas.
Okay, Miss Morgan. Just sign here.
- Was it a nice trip, everything great?
- Wonderful.
- Wait a minute, what's she signing?
- An autograph.
Mr. Inspector, huh?
You gotta ask questions.
Oh, it's so good to have you home.
Excuse me, Miss Morgan. A gentleman's been waiting in the breakfast room.
Thank you.
Hello, Larry.
You look great, just great.
You haven't changed.
Neither have you. A year and a half and not a word from you.
- Well, you were on the go a lot.
- Yeah.
At first I didn't believe it when I heard you were checking into a dump like this.
I must say you don't seem at all affected by hard times.
I wasn't like those other suckers.
Jumping out of windows with ticker tape around their neck. Not me.
You know Larry.
Sink or swim. Do or die.
Don't and live is what I'm trying to learn.
Meaning me?
Meaning a lot of things.
Come on, let's sit down.
We gotta make up for lost time.
I can only stay a minute. I'm supposed to sign my contract this afternoon.
Just like old times.
I followed you across Europe in the papers.
It's a long way from Miss Saskatchewan to the toast of the Continent.
Burned toast.
The tour was successful but the market broke me.
Everything's gonna be hunky-dory, you're opening a show.
And like I always said, you're gonna be great.
- Do you want to order now?
- Nothing to eat, thanks.
Would it be possible for me to get a double brandy?
I'm sorry, but this hotel observes the law.
Oh, now, hasn't that law been repealed yet?
Well, bring us a couple of cups of coffee, then, please.
Without coffee.
[SINGING] Fellows she can 't get
Are fellows she just ain 't met
Georgia claimed her, Georgia named her
You guessed it, Georgia Brown
I gotta have more time to think it over, Larry.
Benny, it's like taking candy from a baby.
Well, there's $25,000 worth of booze in Whitey's warehouse...
...waiting to be grabbed. Right, Red?
I'm already in, you don't have to convince me.
You make it sound so easy, like knocking off a candy store.
Candy stores are dangerous.
This is a lead-pipe cinch.
- You know Willie Abb, the bookmaker?
- Yeah.
Willie's in to the night watchman for 1100 clams...
...and Willie's got part of our action.
So he tells the watchman to take a powder...
...or go out and get a cup of coffee and leave the door open.
Suppose he goes to Whitey for $ 1200?
How are you gonna trust a stumblebum like that?
Well, are you gonna trust me?
Have I ever given you a bum steer?
- It's not that, Larry, but...
- But what?
You're a married man now.
You got responsibilities, right?
You know what your cut on a job like this would be? About 5 grand.
You have to work for a year in a sewer like this for that kind of dough.
Come on now, what do you say?
All right, but if Dolly finds out about it...
If Dolly finds out. Someday those apron strings are gonna choke him.
DOLLY [SINGING]:
You guessed it, Georgia Brown
Oh, boys, tip your hats
Oh, joy, she's the cat
Who 's that, mister?
Well, it ain 't her sister
It's Georgia, her name's Georgia
Sweet Georgia Brown
[CLACK]
[TRAIN HORN BLOWING]
WHITEY:
Right on time.
BEN: Get out of here.
LARRY: Come on, Red.
Red!
- Run for it, Larry.
- Red.
[PIANO MUSIC PLAYING]
[SINGING]
Somebody loves me
I wonder who
I wonder who he can be
Somebody loves me I wonder who
What's the matter with Morgan?
She's only running on four cylinders.
It's the gasoline she's using.
HELEN: For every boy that passes by
I shout
Hey, maybe you were meant to be
My loving baby
Somebody loves me
I wonder who
Maybe it's you
MAN 1: Okay, everyone, take a 10-minute break.
MAN 2:
Okay, take 10. That's it.
- You're wanted on the phone.
- Thanks.
- Hello, Miss Morgan.
- Hello, Johnny.
- Looks like a hit.
- I hope so.
After 20 years on this beat
I can smell them like a beagle.
I'm looking for Larry Maddux.
Have you seen him tonight?
Why? What's happened?
It's business.
Look, if he's in trouble,
I wanna know.
You're a good guy, Johnny. Tell me.
Sometimes it's hard to be a good guy and a cop at the same time.
This guy is waiting for you on the phone, Miss Morgan.
Wait a minute.
Hello?
Helen? Ben.
Listen, Larry's been shot to pieces.
I just managed to get him back to the club.
You better get over here fast.
I don't think he'll make it.
I'd forgotten all about it.
Tell him I'm very sorry and I'll be there right away.
Is somebody there? A cop?
Yes, that's right.
I'll sing a couple of numbers from the show.
Shake the law fast.
Please get over here.
I'll do my best.
I'd forgotten that I promised to go over to the Gold Spoon...
...and sing a couple of songs tonight.
Swell, I'll go with you.
I'm a fan of yours.
Well, I'll probably only sing one song, if that.
Suits me, my car's right outside.
All right, it will only take me a second to change.
Yes, sir? Oh, hello, Mr. Haggerty.
Just a minute, I'll get the boss.
It's the law.
Never mind.
And don't bother to hide the booze.
This is strictly pleasure tonight.
Sure, pleasure.
How do you do, ma'am?
Strictly pleasure.
I'll take care of that coat.
- Thank you.
NICK: No check.
- Hello, Dolly.
- Hi, hello, Johnny.
This is a surprise.
Well, I better get ready for my number.
Just make yourself at home.
Take good care of him, Nick.
NICK: Yes, ma'am.
This is the best table in the house.
Sit right down,
I'll take good care of you.
- Coffee, please.
- Straight?
I mean black or with sugar and cream?
- Black is fine.
- Sure, black coffee, what else?
- How bad is he?
- Bad.
He won't let us call a doctor.
They gotta report all bullet wounds to the police.
- He's in there.
- I'll stall Haggerty but don't be long.
[LARRY GRUNTING]
Larry.
Larry.
Helen's here.
- How did you find out?
- Ben told me.
Ben, get her out of here.
I don't wannna get her mixed up in this.
- Let me call a doctor.
- I don't want a doctor.
Just get me out of here, Ben.
Let me help you, Larry.
I don't want any help.
Look, just get out of here.
Please, get me out of here.
I don't need anybody,
I don't want anybody.
Dolly says to come up right now before Haggerty catches wise.
- She's gonna introduce you.
- Please, get me...
[LARRY GRUNTING]
Come on, Helen. We better go.
I'm sorry.
Even like this, he never lets up.
Ben, get me out of here.
- Give me a nickel, Ben.
- Wait a minute, Helen.
You know what you're doing?
You call a doctor now, they'll lock Larry up for a long time.
- You can't do it.
- I'm not gonna let him die, Ben.
WOMAN [ON PHONE]: Operator.
- Operator.
It's an emergency. A man's been shot.
Send an ambulance to the
Gold Spoon on East 51 st Street.
And hurry.
Tonight we have a real treat.
That great star Miss Helen Morgan...
...has come over from the rehearsals of her new show.
And she's gonna sing for us.
And it's for love, folks, pure love.
Miss Helen Morgan.
I used to dream
That I would discover
The perfect lover someday
I knew I'd recognize him
If ever he came around my way
I always used to fancy then
He'd be one
Of the godlike kind of man
With a giant brain
And a noble head
Like the heroes bold
In the books
I read
But along came Bill
Who 's not the type at all
You'd meet him on the street
And never notice him
His form and face
His manly grace
Are not the kind that you would find
In a statue
And I can 't explain
Oh, it's surely not his brain
That makes me thrill
I love him
Because he's...
I don 't know
Because he's just
My Bill
[AMBULANCE SIREN WAILING]
MAID:
You'd better drink some of this, honey.
You'll be going on any minute now.
Going on where?
The show, Miss Morgan. You're the star.
Twinkle, twinkle, little star.
[KNOCKING ON DOOR]
MAN:
On-stage, Miss Morgan.
Honey, you just can't go on like this.
What's all the fuss?
I can sing sitting or standing...
...dry or wet, dead or alive.
Where's my butterfly net?
Now, everything is jake.
Please, Miss Morgan.
[APPLAUSE]
[SINGING]
You do
Something to me
Something that simply mystifies me
Tell me
Why should it be
You have the power
To hypnotize me
Let me
Live beneath your spell
You do...
[CLAMORING]
My paper will pay plenty for the real inside story...
...of Helen Morgan, you and Russell Wade.
I don't know whether
I can fit it into my social calendar.
Don't be a sucker.
She put you in here, didn't she?
How about it, Maddux?
The money will come in handy when you get out.
One thousand bucks. Why, it's as easy as finding it in the gutter.
I must be getting old. I don't think
I can bend over that far to pick it up.
Okay, Charlie, let's go.
[PLAYING A JAZZY TUNE]
Helen?
Hello, Russell. How was Washington?
I've been looking for you since I got back.
Please let me take you home.
Why don't you just go away so we can stop torturing each other?
Because I can't just go away.
What do you want from me?
I can't explain. I just can't help myself.
Listen to me, darling.
I don't care what you've done,
I don't care what happened with Larry.
I can't leave you.
It isn't you or Larry, it's me.
Only me. Something terrible happening inside me.
It's like the night my father was killed.
I was 11 and I had scarlet fever.
It left me blind for over a year and my father used to say:
"I'll be my little girl's eyes until she gets better."
When they told me he was dead
I began to scream:
"Help me. Somebody help me."
And last night, I was all alone again.
There was this voice inside me...
...screaming,
"Help me, somebody help me."
I do love you.
Yes, I know.
You know, I read a story once about a woman who was married to a drunk.
He was a great guy, and she was nuts about him.
He couldn't help being a drunk.
She couldn't help loving him.
It's kind of that way with Larry and me.
We're stuck with what we've got.
Is there anything I can do?
Pour me another drink.
Mr. and Mrs. North and South America and all the ships at sea, let's go to press.
Your reporter regrets he hasn't better news about Helen Morgan...
...the sensational star who went down before the curtain did...
...in her show last spring.
Worried friends now fear she has disappeared.
A flash from Paris...
MAN [ON RADIO]:
Patter Boy, 2.40 to show.
Now, for the music. And some
great, great hits of yesterday.
[HELEN SINGING
"WHY WAS I BORN" ON RADIO]
- Listen, that's me singing.
- What?
That's me. I made that song famous.
It stopped the show for 10 minutes.
Sold half a million records.
[PATRONS LAUGHING]
[SINGING]
Why do I want a thing
I daren 't hope for
Hey, how about doing a little shimmy for us?
[PATRON LAUGHING]
I'm Helen Morgan, I tell you.
- Helen Morgan, the star.
WOMAN: Yeah, sure.
And I'm the Queen of Romania.
[PATRONS LAUGHING]
You remember me in Show Boat don't you?
And my nightclub, the biggest thing in town.
And when I went to Europe...
...princes fell all over themselves trying to open my car door.
I was the toast of the Continent.
Listen.
[SINGING ALONG TO RADIO, BADLY]
You never hear me
I'm a poor fool
But what can I do?
- Hey, it's not a bad imitation.
- She stinks.
Shut up, you old runny.
You bother me.
They don't believe me.
They don't recognize a great star when they see one.
What would a lot of stumblebums know about applause?
"Bravo, bravo," that's what they used to say.
Here, take out for what I spilled from the bottle.
That's okay, Miss Morgan.
It's on the house.
I caught you at the Palace once.
WOMAN: Who does she think she is?
Helen Morgan?
[WHISTLING]
[SCREAMING]
A drink. Where's the bottle?
I want a drink!
Please.
[SCREAMING]
Please, a drink.
Let me have a drink, please.
Larry. Larry!
In a while. Larry!
Larry's shot. Help me!
Somebody help me!
No, no, no!
- Here, madam.
- Thank you.
The gentleman who sent this is waiting outside.
Will you see him, Helen?
How are you?
I never thought I'd see you again, Larry.
Well, you ought to know by now you can't get rid of a joker like me.
You're gonna lick this thing in no time. I'll make book on it.
It's a funny thing, you know?
All those songs I sang about Ioneliness, they were the truth.
What are you talking about?
Look at me. I end up flat on my back without a friend in the world.
Okay, okay, so you lost a round.
Now, who hasn't?
But the big thing is get up and fight back.
What for?
Well, now, I don't know.
I'd say for a million people that came running...
...every time your name went up in lights.
Don't kid me, Larry.
Ah, no. I always say what I think.
I got the lumps to prove it.
Even the crummiest joints, you...
Well, they were beautiful when you sang there.
You made a lot of guys forget this cockeyed world.
And I don't know what it was that you had, baby...
...but I just wouldn't let it go down the drain.
- I don't know.
- I do.
But make up your own mind.
You gotta live with yourself.
Yes. One way or another.
What about you, Larry?
Still in trouble?
- Well, no, no, I'm doing fine.
- I hope so.
I just stopped by for, well, a second because there's something...
...I've been wanting to tell you for a long time but I don't...
I just couldn't figure out the words.
And, it's like this, I guess...
Well, there are guys that walk a crooked line, like me for instance.
But in my own way, Helen, I love you.
I thought maybe, you know, you'd be able to figure it out...
...even if I never said it.
Do you believe that?
- Will I see you tomorrow?
- Well, I don't know.
I may be tied up for a while.
Thanks, Haggerty.
GUARD:
So long, Maddux.
- Be seeing you.
LARRY: Don't hold your breath.
- Hey, Benny.
BEN: Hi, Larry.
It's good to see you.
- You look great, just great.
- A little bit older.
Yeah, me too.
- What is this, your car?
- Yeah, things have been pretty good.
Let's go someplace and burn these rags.
You're the only guy I saw who added class to those Sing Sing drapes.
How's Helen?
Not too bad, Larry. They're letting her out of the hospital next week.
I think you ought to know it's not the same Helen.
She's blue all the time, mopes around.
Well, I guess
I just made it under the wire.
Come on, let's go into town in style.
LARRY:
Well, this is very... What is this?
"Florenz Ziegfeld." Well, well, well.
Who is this?
Rudy Vallee, what do you know?
The Duncan sisters.
Miss Morgan's been getting them right along.
Two months ago, Mayor Walker sent a beautiful bouquet.
- And Walter Winchell sent tulips.
LARRY: Hm.
What have we got here?
Al Jolson. You know, they never forget a star like you.
Larry, why didn't you save your money?
- I beg your pardon?
- You didn't fool me.
All from the same florist.
The card is in the same handwriting.
Still a promoter.
I don't know, they smell good.
I bet those people meant to sent you flowers.
- But, you know, they get busy.
- Yeah, I know.
It's funny.
The one guy I should have crossed off the list years ago.
You show up.
Look, you better not cross me off now, because it took me a long time...
...and I finally found out you come first.
- Nice try, Larry.
- No, really, I...
Look, I got a taxi waiting downstairs.
You just say the word, we'll dig up a justice of the peace.
Now, what do you say?
If you'd only said that 10 years ago.
It's too late now.
Say, you know what you need?
You need a nice long ride and a breath of fresh air.
- All set?
- Sure.
I practiced my coming-out smile this morning.
Wait here and keep the meter running, will you?
- Why did you bring me here?
- They're gonna tear down the place.
- I thought you might like to see it again.
- What for?
As far as I'm concerned, it never existed.
Stop running, will you, Helen?
It did exist, it was yours.
Come on.
Come on, I've still got a key.
What ever made you think
I'd want to come here again?
I don't know, old times' sake maybe.
It scares me.
Maybe it's because
I've never seen it quite so empty before.
[APPLAUSE & CHEERING]
I told you they'd tear down the place.
From now on, you come first.
A friend is one who knows all about you but loves you just the same.
They told me that Helen thinks she doesn't have any friends.
And that the heart of Broadway has stopped beating for her.
That's why we are here tonight.
For a gal whose love songs made so many of us forget the bad booze...
...the bamboozlers and the tinsel-tarnished years...
...of the Roaring Twenties.
It was an era of mistakes.
And Helen Morgan made some of the biggest of them all.
But her heart and her pocketbook were always open...
...for an awful lot of people who needed a friend.
I don't know how many lights it takes to spell out the name Helen Morgan.
But the number must be very great.
Because even now that they have stopped shining for her...
...they still leave a bright glow over The Great White Way.
For me, and for all of us who love the songs she sang...
...the thunder of the '20s will rumble down Broadway history.
And somewhere above it all will be heard the sad, sweet notes...
...of a grand gal on a grand piano.
Helen Morgan.
[SOBS]
There are no words to tell you how I feel.
Helen, you always did your best talking seated on top of a piano, come on.
[SINGING]
Fish gotta swim
Birds gotta fly
I gotta love one man
Till I die
Can 't help loving
That man of mine
Tell me he's lazy
Tell me he's slow
Tell me I'm crazy
Well, maybe I know
Can 't help loving
That man of mine
When he goes away
That's a rainy day
But when he comes back
That day is fine
The sun will shine
He can come home
Late as can be
Home without him
Is no home to me
Can 't help
Loving that man
Of mine
[ENGLISH SDH]
End of song, beginning of story.
Man, dig that crazy rehearsal hall.
What a powerful pile of rock.
I can't go in there.
- Why can't you go in there?
- I ain't got my library card.
Dig you.
- Are you the musicians?
- That's what the man said.
- What name shall I say?
- Tell Dex old Satchelmouth.
Will you please follow me,
Mr. Satchelmouth?
Wipe your feet, boys. Something tells me we've got a long walk ahead.
Hey, pops! How's the chops?
Good to see you, boy!
Hey, fellas!
How's everything?
You've been all over
Europe since I saw you.
- Did you go to Sweden?
- Yes.
- Skol.
- I was the skol- est cat ever.
I bet you were. Here it is, fellas.
Just lay it out here.
I never thought you lived in a big house.
Shows what happens when your grandfather's a robber baron.
- You can play football in here.
- But can you rehearse?
- Is the chandelier tied tight?
- If it swings, put a mute in your horn.
Pardon me.
The ladies are waiting in the library.
Vamp a little, will you?
- Okay, Dex.
- All right.
Ladies?
- Dexter.
- Hello, Ruth.
Thanks for letting the musicians rehearse here.
- Tickled to death.
- You saved the festival.
As long as I can save you.
- Hello, Helen.
- Save us?
You know you might lose your billing in the blue book?
Jazz is considered very unchic.
Oh, I'm sure we'll love it.
Let us know if we can help.
I will. Thanks a lot for coming by.
- Thank you.
- We'll keep in touch.
- You bet. Bye.
- Bye.
- Hello?
- Hello, Dexter?
- This is Caroline.
- Hello, beautiful.
Any time now.
Where's Tracy?
I've been yelling for her.
You don't yell, Caroline.
You call a person.
You yell if you're in pain.
Well, this wedding gives me a pain.
I think Tracy was awful mean to divorce Dexter.
Can I have this?
Oh, and take those presents over to the other table.
Mother, Tracy's sort of hard, isn't she?
Not hard. None of my children are that, I hope. The goblets too.
Tracy's just exceptionally strong-minded.
And very wonderful always.
I wish something would happen around here.
Nothing definitely ever happens here.
Out of the way, angel.
You'll get stepped on.
So far, I've received 24 nut dishes and 16 silver ice picks.
That should give you an idea of what people think of your next husband.
Mother, don't you think Caroline's old enough to go to a good military school?
- What's this?
- I haven't the faintest idea.
- It stinks.
- Don't say stinks, darling.
If absolutely necessary, "smells," but only if absolutely necessary.
If you put this picture in my wedding presents once more...
...I'm going to personally chain you to your bed.
Why, what is it, dear?
- He was handsome.
- Don't talk of him as if he were dead.
Well, he is dead to me.
And if that picture turns up once more, it's going right in the ashcan.
Well, look at this.
- Wow. Jewels.
- From Father.
Isn't it pretty?
His girlfriend probably turned it down.
- That's not fair to your father.
- How can you defend him?
A common chorus girl.
She's not a chorus girl.
She's quite a talented ballet dancer.
Isn't it stinking of Tracy not to invite Father to the wedding?
Yes, Caroline. Just between us, it's good and stinking.
Me too.
Oh, darling, why don't you face facts squarely as I did?
We might face the fact that neither of us has been a great success as a wife.
We both took the only stand a woman could take and keep her self-respect.
- Yes, dear.
- The Hammonds.
And now I have my self-respect and no husband.
- Oh, we're both better off. Believe me.
- Yes, dear.
- And we're both happier.
- Yes, dear.
- Oh, isn't George an angel?
- Yes, George is an angel.
- Now, is he handsome, or is he not?
- George is handsome.
Golly Moses, I'm a lucky girl.
Tracy, that's your song.
Dexter must be home.
Mother, has Dexter come back?
Well, we knew Dexter was giving his house over to this festival.
I suppose he might have come back.
He's back. No one but Dexter would play that song.
That wretched, cheap, vulgar song.
That beautiful, wonderful song he wrote especially for her.
That's gratitude.
He's gonna get nowhere with that kind of music.
Good for the feet, nothing for the heart.
Hello, Sam.
I'd like to talk to you privately.
Well, now, I consider that right neighborly.
You lost a little weight, haven't you, Sam?
Oh, no, you're slipping.
That used to scare me.
The withering glance of the goddess.
I just want to know what you are doing here the day before my wedding.
Business. I've become a distinguished composer...
Oh, distinguished.
They needed help here, so I heeded the call of duty.
Don't pretend with me, Dexter.
You deliberately planned this festival to conflict with my wedding.
It's a shabby, vindictive gesture.
Harsh words. Well, let's be honest.
I'll admit it. I'm still in love with you.
I don't want you to get married.
You can still be a wonderful woman.
- I haven't the same high hopes for you.
- I don't wanna be a wonderful woman.
Isn't it enough you almost spoiled my life without spoiling my wedding?
- I didn't try to spoil your life, Sam.
- And stop calling me Sam.
I know you didn't try to spoil mine, but you called the shots.
You were dictating the fellow you wanted me to be.
With your background and taste and intelligence...
...you could have become a serious composer, or a diplomat...
...or anything you wanted to be.
And what have you become?
A jukebox hero?
Well, is that bad?
Dexter, be satisfied and let me alone.
Go away. Go away and stay away.
I tried to. I even wanted to.
But I guess I'm just a weak character.
I'm still in love with you.
Dexter?
Oh, hello, honey.
- I don't think your sister likes me.
- I do.
Thanks, sweetie.
What do you suppose she sees in George anyway?
I don't know. Tracy just likes character, I guess.
I don't think George has so much character.
Now, I hate to admit it, but I think she's made a pretty good choice.
I expect some day to see George Kittredge president of Redfern Coal.
That's not hard.
Father's president of Redfern Coal.
Let's be fair now, honey.
Takes a lot of character to start at the bottom and work your way up.
If you start at the bottom of a coal mine...
...and worked your way to the top...
...you'd still only be on the ground.
Little one, you've brought up an interesting point.
Why does he always have to walk like he owned the world?
And the way he stiffs the air?
Like he was looking for breakfast.
For a minute there, I thought you were George Kittredge himself.
No, you're Caroline.
Hi.
- Hello, beautiful.
- Hello, handsome.
- Did you miss me?
- Miserably.
- You happy now?
- Ecstatic.
Didn't expect to find you coming from the garden.
Dexter's back. He's turned his house over to those musicians.
Yes, I know.
The posters are all over town.
George? You don't really mind him, do you?
Dexter? Well, how do you mean?
Well, I mean, the fact of him.
I still don't understand, dear.
You know, that he was...
Well, my lord and master.
No one has ever been your lord and master.
Until now.
Poor Dexter is the sort of man whose inheritance robbed him of his heritage.
He never earned you, so how could he be expected to appreciate you?
- George, you're so good for me.
- I hope so.
Dexter?
Are you ever gonna get married again?
Sure I am. But I'm waiting for you to grow up.
- Dexter, for you I'll hurry.
- Yes, you're gonna have to.
I wouldn't have acted the way Tracy did when you published your song about her.
- I wish you'd write a song about me.
- Would you like that? Really?
Well, we ought to be able to whip something up here.
Dexter, that was beautiful.
I consider us engaged.
Right song, but the wrong girl.
Hello? Oh, hello,
Willie, I'm glad you called.
Cousin Martha just phoned.
She wants me to give you lunch.
She wants you out of the house.
Well, where are you?
I'm in the office of the editor of SPY magazine.
No, no, no.
Spy. It rhymes with lie.
Right. Now, he wants to send a couple of reporters up to cover Tracy's wedding.
Now, don't explode, my dear.
I have just read an article right here on the editor's desk...
...about your husband and that dancer.
You know.
But it's blackmail.
Beside, Tracy would never allow it.
Now, if you will allow a reporter and a photographer...
...into your home to cover Tracy's wedding...
...I have the editor's word as a gentleman...
...that he will withhold the article on your husband.
All right, Willie,
I suppose we have no choice.
Tracy'll hit the ceiling.
Goodbye.
Mother!
George came early. I'll tell Edward to set another place for lunch.
- I'm pooped.
- No, dear, you're enervated.
I'm pooped too.
There is one thing
I want understood right now.
No member of my family is to invite Dexter-Haven into this house...
...until after I am married and gone.
I will not have my wedding spoiled by intruders.
- Tracy.
- Yes?
I'm afraid we'll have to endure a couple of intruders.
I've just talked to Uncle Willie.
Uncle Willie's an evil old man.
Did he invite a couple painted ladies?
Please, Caroline. Run along, dear.
And roll down your trousers.
Your Uncle Willie wants us to have a photographer and reporter...
...from SPY magazine cover your wedding.
Is he out of his mind?
Intimate pictures of my wedding in that barbershop magazine?
He can't be serious.
He's quite serious.
If we don't allow them...
...this magazine will publish a rather unsavory article about your father.
Good. I couldn't be happier.
It serves him right.
You mustn't be vindictive.
As Uncle Willie points out, you'll only make George suffer.
You owe it to him to suppress this if you possibly can.
And I'm to be examined, undressed and generally humiliated at 15 cents a copy?
- No.
- Have some compassion, Tracy.
But this is intolerable. The idea of letting Father off scot-free.
No, I won't do it. And in our house, watching every move.
Why, jotting down notes on how we sit and talk and eat and move...
...just to save Father's face, no.
- Tracy...
- No!
For me, please?
Mother, I really think you're sorry you ever let Father go.
For George and for me, Tracy.
Oh, all right.
I can't stand seeing you hurt.
Thank you, dear.
All right. Let them send their spies.
- I'll give them a story.
- Now, Tracy.
I'll give them a slant on Newport home life that will stand their hair on end.
Tracy, promise me you'll behave like a lady in front of these creatures.
I promise.
Looks like the sort of place where treaties are signed.
Or wars declared.
Maybe we should have gone to the service entrance.
Maybe this is the service entrance.
I don't understand how the Lords ever got talked into letting us come down here.
It's publicity, they love it.
It's a wonder they didn't roll out the red carpet.
- Mike, I don't like this assignment.
- Neither do I, Liz, but I like to eat.
How do you do?
I think we're expected.
Mike Connor and Miss Imbrie.
We're from SPY magazine.
I'll tell Mrs. Lord you're here.
Please wait in the south parlor.
- "The south parlor."
- But of course.
The family will be here directly to welcome you.
I wonder what with.
- The south parlor.
- That's right.
Would you have four footmen bring me a large ashtray, please?
Mike, be careful what you say.
We may be wired for sound.
They couldn't pay me to live in a joint like this.
You know, they won't.
I'd have more respect for this dame if she'd throw us out.
Don't make snap judgments.
You were wrong about me, remember?
Yeah.
Hey, Liz.
Look at that loot that they collected.
Wow. They must run a hockshop on the side.
What's the matter?
The joint's full of spies.
That ought to make us feel at home.
Move over.
Thank you.
Look at this, Liz. All the comforts.
Lousy with phones. South parlor, sunroom, terrace, pool, stables. Stables?
I always knew horses could talk.
Mike, don't!
- Yes?
- This is the voice of doom.
What?
This is to tell you your days are numbered.
Hello? Oh, dear.
One of the servants has been at the sherry again.
Look, Huckleberry, you'll get us tossed out of here before we get a story.
Stop worrying.
You just watch the old master put them through the loops.
I'll watch, professor.
I assume these are the Seth Lord ancestors.
There certainly can be no other reason for hanging them.
Can't say they look very bright.
Inbreeding. Always produces idiots.
Here. Open this.
How do you do? I believe you're the lady and gentleman from the press.
I am Caroline Lord.
Well, I'm Elizabeth Imbrie and this is Mr. Macaulay Connor.
I spoke French before I spoke English.
My early childhood was spent in Paris, where my father worked in a bank.
The House of Morgan.
- You don't say.
- Yes, I do say.
Can you play the piano?
I can.
I shall play and sing at the same time.
How do you do?
I'm Tracy Lord.
You must be... Oh, of course, you are.
I adore strangers.
Do sit down, please.
That sister of yours...
Isn't she a dear? And so talented. But we're afraid she has a homicidal streak.
- Did you get lost finding us?
- No. We had good directions.
I hope you don't mind our being here.
Oh, but I'm delighted.
We have so much cake.
- What is your name, dear?
- No, thank you.
I'm so sensitive to names.
My name is Elizabeth Imbrie.
Elizabeth Imbrie.
It sounds like a medieval saint who was burned to death. And you?
I'm Mike Connor.
Michael. What a lovely musical name.
Now, you mustn't be ashamed of it.
I'm not. Mike is for Macaulay.
And what's the Macaulay for?
My father taught English history.
My friends call me Mike.
Of whom you have many, I'm sure.
English history has always fascinated me.
Cromwell and Robin Hood.
And Jack the Ripper. Where did he teach?
- Your father, I mean.
- South Bend, Indiana.
South Bend. It sounds like dancing, doesn't it?
You must have had a most happy childhood there.
- It was screams.
- I'm so glad.
- I didn't mean it that way.
- Sorry.
It's a natural mistake.
- Are you the photographer or the...?
- I take pictures.
Great art. Did you bring your Brownie?
You must be sort of a writer, Mr. Connor.
- Sort of, yes.
- Have I read your novels?
I doubt it.
- I haven't written any.
- But you must.
Why, Mozart composed at 13.
You must be at least 30.
Time is flying. Where were you born,
Miss Imbrie?
- Duluth.
- Duluth.
- That's west of here, isn't it?
- Sort of.
But we occasionally get the eastern breezes.
- Are you two going together?
- Now, look, Miss Lord.
- That's an odd question, I must say.
- I don't see why. I think it's fascinating.
Like birds in spring. It's...
Well, it's the sort of intimate detail you like to write about, isn't it, Mr. Connor?
But if you'd rather not have your privacy invaded...
...I will certainly respect your wishes.
Please.
If you'll excuse me, I'll see what's keeping Mama.
Mama is so eager to see you.
Mama?
You know, professor, I think you dropped a loop.
- She can't be for real.
- Who was doing the interviewing?
- Do you think she was born that way?
- No. Takes years.
I know we're being taken for a ride.
Well, if we are, let's enjoy the scenery.
I'm scared. I wanna go home.
Mama. Mama, this is
Miss Imbrie of Duluth...
...and the young man she goes with at
SPY magazine, Mr. Mike Macaulay Connor.
- He's the son of an English teacher.
- How do you do?
- Sorry to keep you waiting.
- Not at all.
- We enjoyed the floor show.
- You must mean Caroline.
Well, then, you've met us all, haven't you?
Except Mr. Lord.
Look at the pretty way she does her hair.
- It's lovely. Is it lacquered?
- No.
- Will Mr. Lord be here for the wedding?
- We're about to have lunch. Join us.
- Thank you.
- Good. I'll tell Edward.
We wondered about Mr. Lord because I was hoping to be able to get...
- We wondered about Mr. Lord...
- We usually have box lunches on the lawn.
But today it's sit-down.
Come to the garden.
- Do you like your sherry dry or sweet?
- Scotch on the rocks.
George, Mr. Connor of SPY magazine.
He's going to cover our wedding.
How do you do?
- And Miss Imbrie of Duluth.
- How do you do?
Splendid. I'm a great admirer of your magazine, Mr. Connor.
Really? Why?
It has its finger on the pulse of the public and its ear to the ground.
That's a vulnerable position, don't you think?
I asked Edward to set two extra places.
Make it three. Hello, sweetheart!
- Who he?
- This is Miss Imbrie and Mr. Connor...
...from SPY magazine.
- SPY?
Your tastes have changed a little, haven't they, Sam?
- Sam?
- Her middle name's Samantha.
- She hates it. Hi.
- Hi.
Isn't it time for your milk and arsenic, darling?
Are you the same Dexter-Haven that wrote a song called "Samantha"?
And unless I'm mistaken, weren't you once married to Miss Lord?
- Guilty on both counts.
- I remember. Two years ago.
Elopement, headlines, divorce, headlines...
...and now you're back for the wedding?
- I'm here for this jazz festival...
...but I expect to pitch a little rice on the side.
Mr. Haven has become quite famous since our divorce.
Undoubtedly you know of his piano concerto "Choo Choo Mama."
Yes, I know it very well.
Tell me, how did you and Mr. Kittredge meet?
Heaven brought them together.
My father took me to inspect one of his mines...
...and Mr. Kittredge was there to guide us.
- How romantic.
- Yes, they met in a hole in the ground.
We're all very friendly.
It's the only civilized way to behave.
Could I have a picture of the bride between her first and second husband?
Really, I don't... Darling...
Is something like this thrilling?
May the two gentlemen look at each other?
You don't look as well as the last time I saw you.
Ready?
You've got a lot on your mind.
But it's too late to back out, old boy.
- They grew up together.
- Miss Lord...
...would you look at your first husband in this one, please?
You don't look old enough to marry anybody. You never did.
Ready?
- One more, please.
- Naturally.
She needs trouble to mature, Kittredge.
Give her a lot of it.
- I'm afraid she can't count on me for that.
- That's a pity. I gave her plenty.
Ready?
Mr. Kittredge, could you smile?
You're the groom, you know.
- There. Thank you.
- Good.
Miss Lord, please lift your chin.
I thought I was sticking it out.
Say, that's some rock you got there, Sam.
Did you mine that yourself, George?
Father sent her a diamond necklace.
Yes, when will I be able to get a picture of the family united with Mr. Lord?
- My husband loathes publicity.
- He will be here a little later, won't he?
Papa!
Papa. It's Papa!
- Oh, capital, it's Papa!
- Dear Papa, you came at last.
Papa? Have you by any chance slipped a cog?
Uncle Willie, for the time being, you have to be Father.
- Why?
- I shall explain later.
- Look, it's Papa!
- It's Papa!
- It's Papa.
- Yes.
Tell Edward to set another place for lunch.
- You're looking clever today, Papa.
- Thank you.
- Papa, this is Miss Imbrie and Mr. Connor.
- They're from SPY.
Spy? Yes, of course, the magazine.
I believe I know your editor.
- Dreadful fellow.
- He's wretched.
Papa, these two charming people were beginning to doubt your existence.
Well, imagine that.
Father of the bride.
We'll use it to head the article.
I'm afraid you got my bad side.
- I'm sure you have no bad side, Mr. Lord.
- I like her.
Now, I'll have a drink, if I may.
How clumsy of me. I could die.
- I'll bet it's ruined.
- I'd like a piece of your bet.
- Is it broken?
- Probably.
- Whatever will you do?
- I carry a spare.
- Luncheon is served.
- Thank you, Edward.
Shall we go in?
We're all famished, I'm sure.
- Bring your drinks.
- Sweetie.
- I haven't got a drink.
- Have some schnapps, Pops.
When you look at this wonderful family...
...do you wonder what you've done to deserve it?
I do indeed, my boy.
Every morning I look into the mirror and I say to myself:
"Seth Lord, what in the world have you done to deserve this?"
- And what have you done?
- I beg your pardon? Oh, not a thing.
It's a fine place you have.
Build it yourself?
Of course. Brick by brick.
Quite an undertaking, you know. L...
And it would appear that each brick is about to fall upon me.
- Tracy, your Uncle Willie is here.
- My what?
Aren't you gonna greet Uncle Willie?
Uncle Willie!
Uncle Willie!
- Father, what are you doing here?
- I have a right to be here.
- You're Uncle Willie, understand?
- No. I don't.
- I'll explain later.
- Look, everybody...
...isn't it nice of Uncle Willie to surprise us?
Miss Imbrie, Mr. Connor, this is my Uncle Willie.
Were you, by any chance, playing footsie with me at lunch?
From where I sat?
I didn't think your reach was that good.
Seth Lord has a roving eye. And foot.
- Elegant junk.
- It's shiny.
Would I trade places with Miss Tracy Lord for all her wealth and beauty?
- Just ask me.
- All right, I will.
Would you trade places with Miss Tracy
Lord for all of her wealth and beauty?
You know, I can't help thinking about it.
Cold?
And what little mission of mischief brings you out of the bushes?
A wedding present.
Wouldn't it have been simpler to have it sent over?
Oh, no.
Whoever brought it could never say what I want to say.
Well?
Lovely and unrelenting.
- You said you had something to say.
- I'd hoped you'd changed a little, Tracy...
...maybe softened some.
Well, not for my sake entirely, but for yours.
- You'd stand a better chance at happiness.
- Thank you. I'll manage.
Oh, yeah. I bet you will.
You'll manage all right.
You'll manage George too.
But heaven help him if he shows any signs of weakness or rebellion.
I see you haven't changed either, Dexter.
I tried hard to figure it out.
Your father hurt you deeply when he hurt your mother.
- Please.
- So you started demanding perfection.
Nobody was gonna hurt you.
You felt I tricked you.
I didn't know you wanted a husband who'd be high priest to a virgin goddess.
- Stop using those foul words.
- It's a real pity too, Tracy.
You'd be a wonderful woman if you'd just let your tiara slip a little.
But you'll never be a wonderful woman, or even a wonderful human being...
...until you learn to have some regard for human frailty.
There's a lot more of you goddesses around than people realize.
- Is that all you have to say?
- No.
Those first weeks we spent together were the most wonderful I've ever known.
Good luck, Sam, and good sailing.
Hey skipper, when do we eat?
Now.
- Well, you've been at it long enough.
- It's the bride's prerogative.
I don't like you out of my sight so long.
That's nice.
I'll have that fixed in the morning.
First course.
You'll never be able to follow it.
Second course.
- What is it?
- Tomato juice.
It's brilliant.
What did you do?
- Opened the can and poured it out.
- It's so piquant.
Good.
- Invented by the Earl of Sandwich?
- With something special added.
- You hussy!
- You said you'd eat anything.
It's for you.
Tracy?
Tracy?
Hey.
You all right?
- Yes. L... I was just...
- I know. Half asleep.
Say, aren't you a pretty big girl to be playing with boats?
It's a model of the True Love.
A wedding present from Dexter.
We spent our honeymoon on her.
Oh my, she was yare.
Yare? What's yare?
Sleek, quick to the helm, everything a boat should be.
It seems hardly in good taste as a wedding present.
George, the true love never really existed with Dexter.
I want you to know that.
I do know.
That's the wonderful thing about you.
You're untouched by this foolish first marriage.
There's a beautiful purity about you...
...like a statue to be worshipped.
But I don't want to be worshipped.
I want to be loved.
That goes without saying. But I also want you up on a pedestal where you belong.
Where I can look up and adore you.
Never mind.
Tracy, aren't you going in, dear?
- I've changed my mind.
- Mr. Lord...
...I haven't had a chance to thank you yet for coming back for the wedding.
It was very decent of you and we both appreciate it.
Well, thank you, George.
I felt my wife would not object.
George, we moved your things to make room for those magazine people.
- You don't mind, do you?
- Anything you do is all right with me.
We're having cocktails here before going to Uncle Willie's.
I'd better dash off and change.
I'll see you later, Tracy.
Excuse me.
I have a feeling George is going to take that ring tomorrow...
...and go right through center with it.
That's very amusing.
Almost as amusing as the sight of you with your arm around Mother.
Well, I find it most unamusing to be passed off as your Uncle Willie.
And do take that tone out of your voice.
It is most unattractive.
Oh, really?
And your dancer friend, how does she speak to you, dulcet and intoxicating?
Heady enough to make you forget family responsibilities?
- Stop it instantly!
- Mother, I can't help it. It's sickening.
A magnificent right he's got to come back in his best head-of-the-family manner...
...and start taking charge as if he'd done nothing at all.
Well, it's not really your affair.
If it concerns anyone...
Actually, I don't know who it concerns except your father.
That is very wise of you, Margaret.
What most wives don't seem to realize...
...is that a husband's philandering, even as innocuous as my own...
...has nothing whatever to do with them.
And pray, just what has it to do with, then?
A reluctance to grow old, I think.
I suppose the best mainstay a man can have as he gets along in years...
...is a daughter.
The right kind of daughter, one who's full of warmth and affection...
...a kind of foolish, unquestioning, uncritical affection.
None of which I've got, of course.
I'm a cold goddess.
If your vanity thinks in terms of goddesses.
You have a good mind, Tracy.
You have a pretty face, a fine, disciplined body that does what you tell it.
You have everything it takes to make a lovely woman, except the one essential:
An understanding heart.
Without it, you might just as well be made of bronze.
That's an awful thing to say to anyone.
- It's an awful thing to have to say.
- Seth, that's too much.
I'm afraid it isn't enough.
Darling, your father doesn't mean that.
Neither one of you means it.
Both of you seem to forget that in striking out at each other...
...you hurt others besides yourself.
What's the matter with everyone all of a sudden?
Get in.
Are you learning anything about the idle rich?
Yeah, they drive too fast.
Where we headed anyway?
- The graveyard.
- I'm not ready.
I thought I'd show you the playground of the rich, the graveyard of wealth.
Well, for that I'm ready.
Beautiful, isn't it?
The grass needs cutting.
It's been boarded up for 15 years.
- Why?
- The high cost of being rich.
Most of the homes here are closed up or sold for taxes.
Why don't you write about that?
You've got a chip on your shoulder about me. Why?
Because you came here with your mind already made up.
The time to make up your mind about people is never.
- I had an opinion.
- Unfavorable and unfair.
Really? What exactly do you do around here that's so worthwhile?
Do you consider what you do worthwhile?
Making a living off people's personal lives and misfortunes?
- I cannot pick and choose.
- You could be anything you wanted to be.
But you'll never be a first-class writer or human being...
...until you learn to have some compassion or regard for human...
- You were saying?
- Nothing.
This is the second time you've taken me for a ride. I don't like it.
- Really?
- Really, Miss Tracy Samantha.
Samantha. What a lovely, musical name.
Reminds me of an Indian cure for snakebite.
- What's it stand for? The name, I mean.
- It stands for no nonsense.
What do you do beside collect husbands?
- I mind my own business.
- This happens to be my business.
For instance, how old are you,
Miss Lord? 26?
No children?
Time is flying.
What do you do in your spare time?
I sometimes endure arrogant reporters.
Arrogant, indeed.
Shall we keep this on an impersonal basis?
- Shall we continue with the full tour?
- Gladly, Miss Lord.
But without the full treatment.
- Another show place, Mr. Connor.
- Yeah, that's quite a shack.
- Who owns that?
- My Uncle Willie.
It's being turned into a boys' school next year.
He wanted to sell it for taxes. When he couldn't, he decided to give it away.
It was cheaper. Would you like to see it?
Sure.
- Good afternoon, Lawrence.
- I didn't hear you ring.
We barged in. Is Uncle Willie around?
- No, he hasn't returned from lunch yet.
- That's right. I forgot.
- We'll be at the bar, if you don't mind.
- Not at all, Miss Tracy.
- Good afternoon, John.
- Good afternoon, Miss Tracy.
- Your Uncle Willie's getting kicked out?
- They're getting ready for a party.
- A last fling?
- Sort of. It's my bachelor party.
- Hello, Tommy.
- Good afternoon.
- Girls only?
- We're democratic. We're allowing men.
The only bachelor parties I attended were with girls who came out of cakes.
Please, Mr. Connor. This is Newport.
This is a bar?
Uncle Willie's the kind of man who doesn't like to go far when he's thirsty.
I'm gonna have to buddy it up with Uncle Willie.
I had a bed that did that once.
Are you getting an interesting story on us,
Mr. Connor?
Why can't you break down and call me Mike?
I couldn't possibly break down.
I was raised on a pedestal. Would you?
I sense something's bothering you and I'm getting clobbered for it.
You're a darned attractive girl.
But instead of an orchid on your shoulder, you're wearing a chip.
You think I'm attractive? A high priestess?
You're awful tough to figure.
When you write your story about us, compare me to one of these homes...
...boarded up, a thing of the past, a relic to be sold for taxes.
Miss Lord, you've got rocks in your head.
No. The truth is that I don't fit into the landscape either.
- The house has been boarded up too long.
- There's an answer for that too.
Tear the boards down.
Throw open the windows...
...and let the wind blow through.
That's better.
What goes on here?
There's a dark horse in this race and my boy's running a slow third.
What we need is a little change-of-pace music, Junior.
Now we're getting warm.
That's quite a brawl.
Yes. One of the prettiest sights in this pretty world...
...is the sight of the privileged class enjoying its privileges.
They're really not a bad bunch when you get to know them.
- You getting to know them?
- Slowly.
"With the rich and mighty, it takes a little patience." That's an old Spanish proverb.
Yes. Well, I come from a long line of Swedes.
We have an old saying too:
"When the cat's away, why should the mouse act like a rat?"
Liz! Liz, I've been looking for you.
Really? Well, I've been right here all the time, Mr. Lord.
- I beg your pardon? Oh, no, call me Seth.
- Seth.
Your daughter doesn't resemble you.
In fact, there's an amazing difference.
Well, naturally. She's a girl, you know, and I'm a wicked old man.
Willie!
Dexter's looking for you.
Mrs. Lord, you called him Willie.
Miss Imbrie, there's a misunderstanding which I'd like to clear up.
- In the first place, I'm Seth Lord.
- Yes. Yes.
- Well, that makes you...
- Available.
- I don't get it.
- Don't go away.
- I'll be right back.
- Oh, dear.
You are here in exchange for repressing an article about me.
However, you should know that I'll sue your editor...
...if anything derogatory to any of us is published. Okay?
- I hope you do.
- Mr. Lord, Mrs. Lord, you must know...
...that Mike and I weren't told anything about this.
- Why, of course.
- Mother!
Mother, I'm so glad to see you.
- Mike.
- Hello, Mr. Kittredge.
Hello, Father.
- Miss Imbrie, you having a wonderful time?
- Wonderful.
- Mike, are you having a wonderful time?
- It's a gasser.
Isn't that wonderful? George?
- Shall we dance?
- We were.
Goodbye.
George?
Are you having a wonderful time?
- Isn't it a beautiful party?
- Yes, a very nice party.
Wouldn't you like to sit down, dear?
Here? Don't be silly. We'll get stepped on.
I thought perhaps you were tired.
I see that Dexter's here.
Everybody's here.
Everybody's having a wonderful time.
That's nice, isn't it, George?
Yes, it's very nice, Tracy, very nice.
Very nice.
Thank you very much.
That was splendid. Very nice indeed.
We are honored in Newport to have visiting us several famous orchestras...
...for the jazz festival tomorrow night.
Among them, the greatest of them all...
...Mr. Louis Armstrong. Yeah.
We also have with us one of the sponsors of the festival, Mr. Dexter-Haven.
- So I'll ask Dexter to explain.
- Thank you.
Dear gentle folk of Newport...
Or maybe I should say, "hats and cats"?
I want you to lend an ear because...
Well, I want you to hear some really shimmering sharps and flats.
- Look here, I want to dance with Tracy.
- Do you, Uncle Willie? That's nice.
You two can dance the rest of your life.
- Let's the three of us dance together.
- No, no, no, my dear.
That just isn't done, you know.
- Are you having a wonderful time?
- I most certainly am.
You know, you're my very favorite uncle.
I'd be highly complimented if it weren't for the fact...
...that I'm the only uncle you have.
I think that's sad. You're the only uncle
I have in the whole world.
- May I?
- May you what?
- Dance with the bride.
- You may dance with the bride.
- Are you coming to my wedding, Dexter?
- No.
- What's the matter, don't like weddings?
- Depends on who's getting married.
- It's gonna be a nice wedding.
- I'm sure it will.
That's a very cute song you sang.
Why don't you write cute songs like that?
- I wrote that one.
- Well, I still like it.
- You're really floating tonight, aren't you?
- Really floating, aren't I?
I'm sensational, everybody said so.
It got dark all of a sudden.
- Very dark.
- It's too dark.
Since I won't be at the wedding, don't I get to kiss the bride?
Everybody kisses the bride. I want everybody to be happy, even you, Dexter.
You may kiss the bride.
Oh, Sam, all the happiness in the world.
Oh, Dex.
Tracy!
- Hello, George.
- Just kissing the bride.
You know, the old custom.
Yes, just kissing the bride.
It's a very old custom.
You're not fooling anybody, Dexter.
The wedding is tomorrow...
...and you're not gonna block it.
Come on, dear.
- Are we gonna dance, George?
- No, dear.
- What are we going to do?
- I think you ought to lie down.
But I feel fine. I'm sensational.
Behave yourself.
You're sensational, all right.
Now, I want you to lie down and rest.
I'll see that you're not disturbed.
- George, lie down with me.
- Tracy!
You'll find it under Harvard Classics.
Give Darwin a little nudge there.
I thought I'd pour a little champagne.
It's a great leveler.
- It makes you my equal.
- I wouldn't say that.
Well, it almost makes you my equal.
C.K. Dexter-Haven...
...didn't you once know a girl named Tracy Samantha Lord?
- Sounds familiar.
- No, you didn't.
If you had known her, you'd never let her get away.
- You got hiccups.
- Excuse.
It's all right.
Tracy's no ordinary woman.
So I understand.
You are still in love with her.
- Don't deny it, buddy.
- I wasn't going to.
- Does she know this?
- Yeah, she knows it.
- No, that ain't the way I get it.
- What's that?
I'm gonna have a drink.
I may have some bubbly myself.
- I'm gonna dance.
- Don't get hurt.
Hands up!
I hate you.
- Where do you think you're going?
- Someplace and dance.
But they're dancing in there.
I know, but George is frowning at me.
I can't dance when anyone frowns at me.
We'll go over the wall.
- Whose car shall we use?
- Anyone's.
- Let's use the blue one.
- No, that's mine.
- Hello, George. Where's Tracy?
- Powdering her nose.
- Hello.
- Hello. You look fine.
I feel fine.
Do you hear a telephone ringing?
It's my bedroom telephone.
It's probably George.
- You can't marry him.
- No? Well, I'm going to.
- He's not in your class.
- Snob.
George comes from the so-called
"lower class," Dexter from the upper.
Well, I'll take the lower every time.
Sure, as long as you can't get a drawing room.
- You're insulting.
- I'm sorry.
- Don't apologize.
- Who's apologizing?
You are.
If you don't think I'll marry George, you come around tomorrow morning.
It's already tomorrow morning.
So it is.
Oh, let's not quarrel, Mike.
- What you need is another drink.
- That's right.
I can't find Liz.
I just saw someone wander out into the garden. Alone.
Oh, you don't tell me.
The little vixen.
Ollie ollie oxen free.
- Uncle Willie giving you a little trouble?
- He's gonna end up a juvenile delinquent.
- Have you seen Mike anywhere?
- No.
No? That's funny.
He disappeared over an hour ago.
Where's Tracy?
This party's turning into a game of hide-and-seek.
- She's disappeared.
- Phone her at home.
- I did. There was no answer.
- Try again.
All right, I will.
Well, since Mike's disappeared too,
I may as well go home.
How about me taking you home?
Then everybody'd come look for us.
That's the nicest thing I've heard tonight.
You know, the strangest thing.
I keep thinking I hear bells.
That's the champagne for you.
They're now putting bells in the bubbles.
You're quite a fellow.
That's what they say.
- Let's go for a swim in the moonlight.
- But you wanted to dance.
- Tonight I want to do everything.
- Rumba.
Oh, Tracy, Tracy.
Darling, you're lit from within.
Bright, so bright.
- I don't seem made of bronze, then?
- No, you're made of flesh and blood.
- That's the blank, unholy surprise of it all.
- Oh, Mike, keep talking.
- All of a sudden I've got the shakes.
- Yeah, me too.
- What is it?
- It couldn't be love, could it?
Oh, no, no, no, it mustn't.
- Why? Would it be inconvenient?
- Terribly.
Oh, Tracy. You're tremendous!
That's funny, because I feel very small.
Put me in your pocket, Mike.
Golly. Golly Moses.
We're out of our minds.
And into our hearts, though.
What are we going to do?
I don't know about you, but I'm gonna go into the water.
Liz, you're in love with Connor, aren't you?
People ask the darndest questions.
Why don't you marry him?
I didn't hear you.
I'm going to bed.
Thank you, Mr. C.K. Dexter-Haven.
I said, why don't you marry him?
I think he's still got a lot to learn.
I don't wanna get in his way for a while.
Suppose some other dame comes along in the meantime?
I'd scratch her eyes out. Unless she were marrying someone else the next day.
You're quite a gal, Liz.
Oh, I don't know.
I take nice pictures, though.
- Night.
- Night.
- Oh, it's you, Mr. Haven.
- Hey, Mac.
There's so much loot for the wedding,
I keep checking.
I won't take anything. I'm not getting married this time, you know.
- I wish it were, sir. Good night.
- Good night.
- That you, Haven?
- Oh, yeah.
- What are you doing here?
- I just brought Liz home. Why?
I still haven't found Tracy.
Well, she's asleep, I should say.
She's getting married tomorrow.
Don't be funny. I telephoned her.
Her phone didn't answer.
When we were married, that phone would always ring and she'd never bat an eye.
She's a very remarkable girl.
I recall...
I prefer not to discuss Tracy with you, if you don't mind.
You've got a very big day tomorrow.
Let me walk you to the gatehouse.
- That sounds like Tracy.
- No, that's the night watchman.
- It's a woman's voice.
- Well, he's a lyric tenor, you see.
That's right.
- George, honestly, I think you should go.
- Beautiful.
Okay, but you're never gonna understand.
That's nice. That's nice.
You can sing for me anytime, Tracy.
- Take me upstairs, Mike.
- Tracy!
Oh, hello, Georgie Porgie.
She sprained her ankle?
Not wounded, sire, but dead.
She dove in the pool. And when she hit the water, the wine hit her.
- You expect me to believe that, Connor?
- I don't give a...
It's right up at the top of the stairs.
Second door to the right.
- Fairies are at the bottom of my garden.
- I know.
- They're all ringing little bells.
- Congratulations.
I wouldn't go jumping at conclusions.
This isn't all that meets the eye here.
Tracy, of all people.
Yes, Tracy, of all people.
But you don't believe...
The implications aren't exactly what they seem.
- I suppose you think it's innocent.
- I'm sure the intention was innocent.
You don't know women as well as I thought you did.
How could she do this to me?
In the morning, Tracy won't remember a thing that happened tonight.
- I think you ought to forget about it too.
- Oh, you and your sophisticated ideas!
It all comes from having things too easy all your life.
Oh, yes, it's terrible, isn't it?
- If you fellas will listen to me...
- You filthy...
I'm sorry, but she isn't your wife yet, and she was mine, you know.
You okay, Connor?
I thought I'd better hit you before he did.
He's in much better shape.
You'll do.
Say, pal, just what did happen here tonight?
Well, see, I...
Well, I guess we're really gonna have a wedding after all.
For a while last night, it seemed to be touch-and-go.
Shouldn't you be out front taking pictures of the guests as they arrive?
Am I in your way?
I haven't noticed.
Look, Mike. If I ever am in your way, don't honk.
Just run over me.
You're quite a girl, Liz.
That's the second time in the last
24 hours that a man has said that to me.
I guess I must be getting either booky, hippy or toothy.
I'll get my Brownie and go to work.
Shut up, you fool!
Good morning, sir.
Don't scream at the top of your lungs.
I had champagne last night.
Sorry, sir.
- Could I get you anything, sir?
- You might give me a glass of that water.
And a new head, if you've got one.
What's going on here anyway?
I expected to find the police and at least two hacked-up bodies.
The police, sir?
Has anything happened to Caroline?
Good morning, Willie.
- Good morning.
- Don't get up, dear.
Thank you. Thank you.
What is the matter with Caroline?
She's been telephoning all morning, urging me to get here before the wedding.
She's been screaming that it's a matter of life and death.
I don't know what's the matter with her.
She dashed in this morning, screaming that Tracy can't marry George.
That she must marry that newspaperman.
- You don't say! Why?
- Yes, why?
What's Caroline's reason?
Hi, Willie. Sweetheart.
- Can I have a little jam?
- Yes, dear. I don't know.
Caroline must've had a nightmare about something she thought she saw.
I'll have to keep her in her room until after the wedding.
- It must've been a bad dream.
- It must've been a whizzer.
Uncle Willie, may I tell you something?
This morning you look like a tree full of owls.
This is the sort of day that history teaches us is better spent in bed.
Hello, everybody!
Isn't it a fine day, though?
Is everybody fine?
That's fine.
Oh, good morning, Uncle Willie.
Where is everybody?
- Do you like my dress?
- Oh, yes, it's quite beautiful, my dear.
It's awfully heavy.
I can't seem to get my eyes open.
Oh, Dexter! What are you doing here?
Caroline called me to come over.
She's been telephoning everybody in the county.
- Now, go home! Please do!
- Oh, no, not until we get those eyes open.
And how do you feel otherwise?
Oh, I don't know what's the matter with me. L...
I don't seem to remember last night at all.
- I must've had too much sun yesterday.
- Yes, the sun will do it every time.
You left the party and came right home to bed.
I did? Thank you.
It's nice to have things accounted for.
Only, I wonder what this might be?
It appears to be a gentleman's wristwatch.
But whose? I nearly stepped on it.
- Getting out of bed?
- Yes, why?
Oh, nothing.
There's another mystery.
I think I was robbed last night.
Oh, really?
Yes. My engagement ring and earrings and bracelets are missing everywhere.
Somebody's houseguest from New York, no doubt.
- Nobody's here from New York.
- I have a few little baubles here.
- Where did you find them?
- Don't tell me you don't remember.
- Did I give them to you?
- I just stumbled across them.
Sam, if you're gonna drink champagne, you ought to take a swim.
Nothing like a swim, you know, to open the eyes.
Now they're open.
What do you say we slip into the pantry and have a little toddy for the body?
Medicinal.
If it gets dull around here, have Caroline tell you about her dream. It's a dilly.
Morning.
You... You all right?
Me? Of course.
Why shouldn't I be?
- You put away a gang of wine last night.
- I had a simply wonderful evening.
- I hope you enjoyed it too.
- Oh, yes, I sure did. Indeed I did.
Especially the last part of it.
Why especially the last?
You're asking me?
Oh, you mean the swim?
We did swim and so forth, didn't we?
Yeah, we swam and so forth.
- What can I say, darling?
- Oh, not anything. Don't say anything.
And especially not darling.
You mean you're going through with it?
The wedding?
Why shouldn't I?
No regrets about last night?
Why should I have?
That's the stuff, Tracy.
You're wonderful!
No, Mike, you don't know what I mean.
I'm asking you. Tell me the reason why I shouldn't have.
No, don't. Just tell me what time it is.
I'd love to, but I seem to have lost my watch.
You don't know how extremely sorry I am to hear you say that.
Oh, there it is.
I ought to give you a reward.
Where'd you find it?
Let's just say I stumbled over it.
Hey, Mike.
How are you this bright and festive morning?
- That for me?
- No, it's for Tracy. Would you like one?
I'd sell my grandmother for a drink.
Uncle Willie's in the pantry...
...doing weird and wonderful things with various healing waters.
- Can I ask for two?
- Go till you run out of grandmothers.
I'll be drinking a long time.
Doctor's orders, Sam.
- What is it?
- Just the juice of a few fresh flowers.
- It's called a stinger. Removes the sting.
- Don't say that.
Why not?
Nothing can. Nothing ever will.
I've done the most terrible thing to you.
Oh, I doubt that. I doubt that very much.
I've always been so hard on people who weren't perfect.
- What am I going to do?
- Well, why to me, darling?
I don't see where I figure in this anymore.
Aren't you confusing me with a fella named George Kittredge?
George! I've got to tell him!
- He knows. He was here too.
- Good grief, why didn't you sell tickets?
You better finish your drink.
What did George say last night?
Well, he was a little shaken, but I guess he'll rally.
Oh, I'm such an unholy mess of a girl.
Oh, now, come on.
That's not even good conversation.
How'd you like my wedding present?
I'm not used to having my gifts go unacknowledged.
Oh, it was beautiful and sweet.
- She was quite a boat, the True Love.
- Was and is.
Boy, she was yare.
But I wasn't, was I?
No, you were.
You were very good at the bright work.
I can still see you out there on the deck.
Down on your knees with your little cake of polish.
I made her shine.
- Where is she now?
- She's in the yards being gone over.
I thought I'd sell her to this fella,
Rufe Watries, at Oyster Bay.
- For money?
- Why not?
- To that fat old rum pot?
- I'm gonna design another.
Thought I'd call it the True Love II.
What do you think?
I'll tell you what you could call her:
The Easy Virtue.
Oh, now, come on, Sam.
I won't have you thinking such things about yourself. Cut it out.
But it's true.
A little slip now and then is good for people.
Especially if they learn something.
On, I don't know anything anymore.
Now, that sounds hopeful.
That's just fine.
Well, there's one consoling thought, Dexter.
- You're well rid of me.
- No, nobody can say that but me.
I hope we're not interrupting anything.
As if we didn't know we were.
Tracy, Liz and I think we're gonna resign from SPY magazine.
We're not turning in the story.
We're gonna burn it to keep warm this winter.
- You can have it as a wedding present.
- Oh, thank you. Thank you both.
You're dear and sweet, and I don't deserve your kindness.
- Easy come, easy go.
- Oh, but you'll stay for the wedding?
Oh, well, l...
Oh, here comes the groom!
Why, it's George.
Tracy, please get rid of these people. I want to talk to you.
There's no need for them to go.
Everybody seems to know about last night.
- Just collecting expressions.
- It's a lovely day for a wedding.
It rained for us.
I'm not sure yet that there'll be a wedding.
I've been up all night. I cannot decide what is the best thing to do.
I'm entitled to a full explanation before I'm asked to make a decision.
Unfortunately, George,
I have no explanation.
I wish for your sake, as well as mine, I had.
- You'll grant I have the right to be angry.
- You certainly have.
- On the very eve of your wedding.
- I told you I agreed.
Better hurry up and decide.
- The guests are all settled.
- This doesn't concern you.
- Nor you.
- No, don't go. Please stay.
- On the eve of your wedding.
- You've said that.
You keep out of this. And you too.
Mr. Kittredge, it might interest you to know that our so-called affair...
...consisted of exactly two kisses and one rather late swim.
All of which I enjoyed and the memory of which I wouldn't part with for anything.
It's no use, Mike.
After which I accompanied her to her room, deposited her on the bed...
...and returned to you two on the porch, which you will doubtless remember.
You mean to say that was all there was to it?
I do.
Why? Was I so unattractive, so distant...
...so forbidding or cold or something?
- Well, this is fine talk, Tracy.
- I'm asking a question.
You were extremely attractive, Tracy.
And as for distant and forbidding, on the contrary.
However, you were a little worse, or the better, for the wine.
And there are rules about things like that.
Oh, thank you, Mike.
- Oh, I think men are wonderful.
- The little dears.
Well, this is a fine time to be telling me.
Why? Where's the difference?
If my wonderful, beautiful, marvelous virtue is still intact, it's no thanks to me.
It's purely by courtesy of the gentleman from South Bend.
Local papers, please copy.
Well, since nothing really happened...
...perhaps we just better drop the whole subject.
George, I don't want you to marry me because you think I'm now worthy of you.
It would've meant much more if you had married me because I was unworthy.
- But a man expects his wife to...
- I know, to behave herself. Naturally.
To behave herself naturally.
Well, what's done is done.
We can't turn back the clock.
Oh, I wished I'd have said that.
You're at liberty to leave at any time.
I don't relish having you at my wedding.
Is there going to be a wedding, George?
Yes, Tracy.
In spite of the circumstances, I'm big enough to overlook a single indiscretion.
No, you're too good for me, George.
I couldn't bear a perfect man.
I'd make you most unhappy.
Most.
I know I'd try my best to.
She would too.
All right, if that's the way you feel.
That's that.
I have never begged in my life.
I've got a feeling you had more to do with this than anyone.
- I hope you're right.
- You and your whole rotten class.
- Oh, class my...
- Grandmother!
Well, there goes George.
- Oh, my sainted aunt!
- You're on.
- What am I gonna do?
- Say a few words.
- Put your hat on.
- Put it on.
You'll think of something.
You're gonna look lovely.
- What am I gonna do? What'll I say?
- Your father will make an announcement.
- Anything special you want me to say?
- Oh, thank you. No.
- I got myself into it, I'll get myself out.
- As you wish.
Go, go!
Hello, everybody.
I just want to say that...
Oh, will you stop that racket, please?
Thank you.
Good morning.
I'd like to say...
Well, there's been a little hitch.
I've made a terrible fool of myself, which isn't at all unusual.
Well, my fianc that was...
Well, he thinks we ought to call it a day, and I quite agree with him.
- Help me.
- Tell them two years ago I did you...
...out of a wedding by eloping in Maryland.
Two years ago I did you out of a wedding in this house by eloping to Maryland.
I hope to make it up now by going through with it.
But I hope to make it up now by going through with it...
As originally and most beautifully planned.
- So if you'll just keep your seats.
- So if you'll just keep your lovely seats.
- That's all.
- That's all.
- Oh, Dexter, are you sure?
- No, but I'll risk it if you will.
- You're not just doing it to save my face?
- It's such a nice face.
- Come on, Dexter, we've no time to lose.
- See you in a minute.
Oh, Father, I'm so glad you came back.
- I'm glad you're here.
- Thank you, Tracy.
And I'm sorry, I'm truly sorry,
I've been a disappointment to you.
I never said that, darling, and I never will.
I love you, Father.
And I love you, my daughter.
Help me off the pedestal.
Watch out for that first step.
It's quite a tumble.
Pretty contagious idea, isn't it?
Well, I must confess
I'm not exactly immune.
Liz, I know I'm not destiny's dream man...
...but I thought maybe...
Oh, Mike, I think I better grab you before somebody else does.
You're liable to get in trouble one of these days.
Come on, we'll develop this later.
End of story.
Subtitles by
SDI Media Group
- Hi.
- Here he is.
Very large tonight.
What took you so long?
I was scraping off my makeup, tons of it.
Say, you two all right up there?
You know the problem, honey.
Any time you want a little of mine...
- Excuse me, darlings.
- Hello, Victor, how are you?
All right, Vic, it's a nice party. Hiya, Lottie.
- Hi, Mr. Benson.
- Check the billing!
Man, you went the full route, didn't you?
You know there's nothing I wouldn't do for you, Bill.
- You hungry?
- No.
Thirsty?
-I can wait a little bit.
Want a girl to...
- No, I'm too fired.
- Can I carry you?
- Victor, put your pen away, will you?
- Good evening, Bill.
Hi, Fritzi.
I told you I wasn't going to sign a contract... till I know who's going to play the other fellow.
- We'll find somebody.
- It's not as simple as that.
We gotta have a fellow who's young, who can sing, dance, act.
Leave it to me. It's easy.
It's easy, huh, Victor?
I don't know anybody like that.
Neither do I.
That's what's so exciting about it.
There's this unknown genius waiting to be discovered somewhere...
-and we have no idea where he is.
- That's very exciting.
- What's that?
- Sounds like a raid.
Look who's here!
It's nobody, just Ted Adams.
Otto!
Give them a break.
Here you are. Aren't they wonderful?
Thank you.
They really love me.
Thank you very much. Thank you.
Hey, that was some reception, huh?
A year ago, nobody ever heard of him.
Fastest rise of anyone in television.
- Did you ever see him work?
- No, I live in a fringe area.
What kind of guest of honor are you?
They're all screaming for you.
- Come on!
- Why didn't you tell me?
Teddy, baby! Look here.
Hello, Victor.
I'm glad you didn't wait for me.
Do you hear that? Ad lib.
You know the boys.
Yes. Otto. Marty. Make yourself at home.
We can't stay very long. Tallulah's waiting.
Right.
Did you tell Bill that I've decided to do the show with him?
- Yes.
- What did he say?
What did he say? What could he say?
He's crazy about the idea.
This is it.
It'll open the second act.
Why don't you try it?
Bill!
Excuse me, darlings.
- Ted, you know Bill Benson.
- Sure.
- How do you do? Nice to see you, Ted.
- Thank you.
- See, I can't tell you how excited I am--
- He's a great fan of yours.
Oh, yes, ever since I was a kid.
Really, you don't know how excited
I was when Victor told me--
Yes, sir, a great fan.
How about the number?
Well, I've only just seen the verse, but I'll take a hack at it.
They should erect a statue to the guy
Who first thought of hitting someone with a pie
Call it hokum, hoke, or what you will
It sure got a laugh and they're laughing still
And nothing sounds quite as glorious
As a laugh that's real uproarious.
Cut, here. Time. This calls for two fellows.
I need another guy.
You do? Why don't you run through it with him?
Thank you, darling.
Got it.
Give them elegant prose
Noel Coward bon mots
Yeah, and trs gay.
You'll get notices
But you'll go broke
If the hero's flustered
Hit him with a custard
You gotta give the people hoke.
Do your best tour jet
From a classic ballet
And they'll rush to the lobby and smoke
Add a tiny pratfall
And you'll be running that ball
You gotta give the people hoke
Now the critics may say it's trash
But trash or not, it's a smash
We've done it again
And the crowds are standing in line
'Cause Winchell thinks it's just fine
Every year at the Met
They go deeper in debt
You would think that it's time they awoke
They don't want Pagliacci
Give them Liberace
That would be a master stroke
You gotta give the people
The ticket-buyin' people
You gotta give the people hokum, hokum
You gotta give 'em hokum
We doubt if you'll get a laugh
By quoting all of Falstaff
But you'll get the loudest guffaws
By rapping all your in-laws
Though they can't tell you why
They just laugh till they cry
At the physical kind of a joke
Go ahead, son, take your best shot. Live!
Keep it good and corny
Maine or Californy
Idaho or Roanoke
You gotta give the people
The ticket-buyin' people
You gotta give the people hoke
- Hey, come on. Come on, let's go.
- Wait, wait, wait.
Let them cry a little. Milk it.
Here we go.
If someone's hit with a fish
You can think what you wish
But you'll probably laugh till you choke
You gotta give the people
The ticket-buyin' people
You gotta give the people hoke.
You gotta give the people
The ticket-buyin' people
You gotta give the people
hoke
- Listen to that, will you?
- Where did you dig them bits, anyhow, man?
- You were great!
- Was [ really?
Oh, yeah.
How were you breaking them falls?
- With my veins.
- Bravo. Bravissimo.
Hey, wait a minute. Wait for me. Wait...
That's a pretty funny kid.
He's got a lot of talent, you know it?
He's not bad.
- Not bad? How's it, Eddie?
- Hi, Bill.
Had enough turkey?
Excuse me, darling.
Hey, I just got an idea, there.
What about this kid for the show?
- You mean Ted and you?
- Why not?
He sings, dances, acts, takes a beautiful fall.
He's never done a Broadway show before.
He's starring in his own television show.
- It's certainly an interesting idea, isn't it?
- Why, certainly.
- Am I interrupting?
- Why, no. Not at all.
I just wanted to tell you how excited I am about our doing a show together.
I knew you would like him.
Of course, I'd love to do the show with you.
Well, I'd really be doing it with you.
Let's say you'll be doing it with each other.
We'll all be partners.
'Course, there are certain points to be ironed out. Billing--
Get him. He's always thinking about business.
I don't care about the billing.
The important thing is
I'm gonna get to work with Ted.
Fine, Bill. Fine.
We'll work out a division of songs.
The customers will be coming to hear Bill sing.
I'll take the songs that are left.
Fine, Ted. Fine.
I don't suppose... Not having had a cast up until a couple of minutes ago...
I don't suppose you've got any rehearsal dates set yet, huh?
August I.
That's only eight weeks away!
- Have you got a leading lady?
- Not yet. But we'll find one.
It's a good part.
It's a great part.
A fresh, young American girl... who searches for love.
- And sings and dances.
- Yeah.
If you run across the right girl, sign her.
Anyone you like is fine with me.
Me too. I'll let you fellows handle the problems.
- I'm on my way to France.
- What's in France?
What, are you kidding?
I'm going to Europe myself, you know.
- Are you really?
- Honestly.
- We could be there together.
- Where are you going to be?
- Teddy boy.
- I'll tell you, we...
You'd better adios those kids in the alley.
- Excuse me.
- Sure.
What a combination.
Yeah. You know, I think we got a chance
{0 come up with a pretty good show here.
About the billing, you'll see that Teddy's taken care of, huh?
- Sure. You said--
- You know, nothing fancy... just "with Ted Adams" sort of down under the name of the show...
-in through there somewhere, like.
- Sure. You said--
And see that he has a couple of songs to sing, huh?
- But Bill--
-I know, I know... you think the people are coming in to see me... but we can't just have him standing around.
- You owe me this dance.
- Daphne, is this our dance?
Well, come... Pardon me.
Would you hold these for after?
- Thank you.
- Bill, listen. Bill!
Bill.
Yeah.
Those crazy kids, they can't get enough of me.
- Where's Bill?
- Dancing.
- He's a great talent.
- Yes, he--
As long as you're careful what songs he sings.
- His range isn't too good, you know.
- His range?
Yeah. But don't misunderstand me,
I think he's amazing... for someone who's been around as long as he has.
You know, I think his name should be right below mine.
- But you said that--
- Oh, it's not that [ care... but you know how sensitive a million fans can be.
- But you said--
- And you'll probably want me... to sing all the ballads for you.
But I know that you'll take care of Pops with something.
He's a great talent.
We'd better be taking off. Tallulah.
Yeah, right.
Let's be careful about our leading lady, huh?
We mustn't get anyone who clashes with my personality.
This show is going to be great fun.
- Good night, Victor.
- Good night.
Good night!
You all set with Junior?
- Perfect.
- Great.
Thank you.
Really, at this hour. Disgusting!
Really!
Evening, stranger.
Good evening.
I'm sorry.
In olden days a glimpse of stocking
Was looked on as something shocking
Now, heaven knows
Anything goes
Good authors, too
Who once knew better words
Now only use three letter words
Writing prose
Anything goes
The world has gone mad today
And good's bad today
And black's white today
And day's night today
When most guys today
That women prize today
Are just silly gigolos
So if romance is what you're cravin'
Don't sit on your hands behavin'
Like Eskimos
Anything goes
When wrestlers go to drama classes
To learn how to please the masses
On TV shows
Anything goes
And when the craze for dancing's spreadin'
Until even Grandpa's treadin'
On Grandma's toes
Anything goes
Consider the books we got
The new looks we got
The fool fads we got
The mad ads we got
The crazy games we've got
The ladies' names we've got
For each hurricane that blows
Hey, all you Jills and you Joes
Get yourself up on your toes
It's apropos
So anything goes
This kid great or is she great?
She's great. Who is she, anyhow?
I don't know. Patsy somebody or other.
"Patsy Blair."
Come in, Sybil.
I have a confession: I'm not Sybil.
My name is Bill Benson.
Yes, I know.
Imagine meeting you here.
In a spot like this, some people like to say,
"It's a small world."
Won't you sit...
- Take this.
- No, no thanks, I've been sitting out front.
I want to tell you something:
You were just wonderful.
Coming from you, that's...
It is a small world, isn't it?
Yeah, and I'd like to make it smaller, too, because...
I'd like to talk you into doing a show with me.
I think Tl sit down.
How come you've never been on Broadway?
I've been living abroad for quite a while.
That's good for their side, but it's bad for ours.
You're going to do your show in New York?
Sure.
Tm afraid I couldn't, then.
Maybe I didn't make myself quite clear or something. This is the lead in the show.
It's a wonderful part.
I can't go home.
I mean--
Oh, hi, darling.
Full house tonight, honey. Great audience.
Thanks, honey. Mr. Benson, this is my father.
Evening, stranger.
- How are you?
- Fine.
Out in the audience there tonight, he couldn't even remember your name.
What do you mean?
Funny coincidence, but your father had the seat right next to me.
Yeah. Yes, [ did.
Honey, you were never better.
When you made that turn, when you come in--
Dad.
How did you happen to be sitting next to Mr. Benson?
Just one of those crazy, mixed-up things.
Tt certainly was. Gee, I had no idea
I was coming here tonight.
I was supposed to go to this dinner party... and then I got a call that the hostess is ill... and the dinner party is off, and then... a messenger showed up... with a ticket for the show.
Just one of those crazy, mixed-up things, huh?
I hope they're not still waiting dinner for me.
Man, that soup's gonna be rigid.
Thanks. I knew you were a regular.
- How could you do this?
- I'm your father, ain't I?
When I heard that Bill Benson was in town and needed a leading lady...
I thought I'd do him a favor and let him look at you.
The lady says no.
He's doing the show in America.
-I know he is, honey.
- You do?
I decided it's time we go back home.
Dad.
You see, my steel interests have kept me pretty well tied up here in Europe.
But now I figure that they can run alone.
I got everything all straightened out.
If you still want me, Mr. Benson, you have yourself a leading lady.
- Do I? How soon do you close here?
- Day after tomorrow.
Wonderful, just wonderful.
Now we're in business, huh?
So long, you stranger.
Cheerio, Bill.
Say, look, I've got to fly to Paris to meet Ted Adams.
Why don't you join us at I. Havre, and then we'll catch the boat for the States?
Who is Ted Adams?
Thank you. Thank you, you are a doll!
I'll see you on the boat.
Thank you very much, Mr. Benson.
Good luck, Patsy.
Nice fellow. He's gonna get us back home.
Oh, Dad.
Are you sure it's safe for you to go home?
Of course, it is.
Honey, you're dealing with a genius.
Why, I've got everything worked out, too.
It's going to be just fine.
Thank you, darling.
Bill's gonna flip when he learns
I signed you for the lead in our show.
- Flip?
- Jump for joy.
Yes.
I'm sure glad I came to Paris.
And I'm so excited about going to America.
You have promised to take me to so many wonderful places.
It will take us years.
I'm in no hurry.
You know, it's funny, when I look at you, I...
I think I'd better get out to my table.
I left word at the hotel to bring Bill over as soon as he arrived.
He should be here now.
You Americans are so funny.
- Why?
- Life is for to enjoy.
You always think of business, business, business.
Yeah.
You're all set to do the number in English, aren't you?
- All set.
- Good.
'Cause I want Pops
10 understand everything.
He will.
Well, kill the people, honey.
Kill the people? What have they done?
Well...
Bye.
- WellI
Welcome aboard, partner.
Did you have a nice trip?
Fine. Say, what's this nightclub bit anyhow?
They didn't give me a chance to unpack or anything.
- Practically shanghaied me down here.
- You'll see.
This way, Monsieur Adams.
Sl vous plait, Monsieur.
You seem to have been this route before.
Yeah, well, it's a relief from the museums.
How was London?
Simply wizard.
I found a big surprise over there.
You're going to find a big surprise here.
1f I do say so myself,
I think I turned a tricky bit of business.
Never mind that now.
Why, you just arrived in Paris.
You funny Americans.
That's all you think about:
Business, business, business!
Life is for to enjoy.
Well! I can see I didn't get here a minute too soon, huh?
Her story is much too sad to be told
'Cause practically everything leaves her totally
Cold
Cold
Cold
Cold
Cold
Cold
I get no kick from champagne
Mere alcohol doesn't thrill me at all
So, tell me, why should it be true
That I get a kick out of you?
Some like their perfume from Spain
I'm sure that if I took even one whiff
That would bore me terrifically, too
Yet I get a kick out of you
I get a kick every time
I see you standing there
Before me
I get a kick
Though it's clear to me
You obviously don't adore me
I get no kick in a plane
Flying too high with some guy in the sky
Is my idea of nothing to do.
Yet I get a kick
Out of you
Cold, cold, cold, cold, cold
Cold, cold, cold, cold, cold
Cool, cool, cool, cool, cool
Cold, cold, cold, cold, cold
I get no kick in a plane
Flying too high with some guy in the sky
Is my idea of nothing to do
But I get a
kick
Out of you
- Isn't she formidable?
- She's quite good. I'd say--
Yeah, and the way she moves.
You know, there aren't many voices like that around anymore.
Oh, man. You've got it bad, haven't you?
It's nothing personal. I'm just looking at her as a talent.
- A fellow artist.
- Yeah, that's the idea.
She's...
- She's quite a fellow, all right.
-I knew you'd be surprised.
I got a surprise for you, too. Wait till you see what's coming over from London.
- You got an antique?
- No, she still has a few years to go.
- She?
- Yeah, I signed a leading lady.
You know, for a minute, I thought you said--
You signed our leading lady?
Yeah, she'll be here tomorrow.
Her name is Patsy Blair.
You couldn't have signed anybody.
Why not? We all agreed, if I found a girl I like, sign her.
I know, but I...
Hello, it's nice of you to drop by.
I know you must be very busy.
Bill, did I ever tell you the first...
I'm sorry, this is...
Anyway, this is...
You must be "Pops."
Yeah.
Certainly mighty nice to make your acquaintance, madam.
Like American?
Look, I can straighten out the whole thing.
But it shouldn't be straightened out.
- His accent is charming.
- Yeah, but I...
Oh, his accent! It's charming? Well.
- Why don't we sit down?
- As a matter of fact... we were just going.
You see, it's an emergency--
An emergency. What are you talking about?
We're in Paris. Let's relax a little.
Life is for to enjoy.
Bravo.
I always tell Teddy, life is for to enjoy.
He's always so nervous.
Me? No, you see-- Oh, I'm sorry. I'm very...
- It's all right.
- Excuse me.
I loved your performance.
Thank you.
Doing a big stage show, that I am excited about.
You're so right. The theater gives one an opportunity for self-expression.
Tm terribly sorry. I took this...
Very shaky glasses.
Speaking of shaky glasses, reminds me of a summer in Cincinnati--
People must like to do a show with you.
I don't know, some people like escargots.
Speaking of escargots...
-you remind me, I had a bunch of snails...
-I hope you agree...
I hope you agree with Ted that my English is good enough for Broadway.
It's catching, isn't it?
I seem to be running out of tobacco.
You can get tobacco here.
No, this is a special English blend.
I can't even get it in New York.
Speaking of New York, did Ted tell you about the part you're playing in our show?
All about it.
The sizzling French girl who searches for love.
And sings and dances.
French girl. That's very interesting.
- Yes.
-I think it is fascinating.
I will be wonderful in it.
I hope Ted didn't make too difficult a business deal with you?
He was most generous.
And it is an ironclad contract.
Yes, that's a handy kind.
It's hard to believe that tomorrow morning we will all be on the boat together.
Yes. One never knows what tomorrow will bring.
Well, this calls for a celebration!
Shall we show Bill what the real Paris looks like?
I will get my bag. Excuse me.
- He liked you!
- I hope so!
Tell me, how did you happen to sign a French girl?
Last time I looked at our play, the girl was an American.
Gaby showed me how to fix that.
She's very clever.
I could see that. And she likes you.
I suppose so.
I was watching the way you handled her,
SO unctuous and suave.
You seem to just... say the right thing at the right time, you know?
Instinct, I guess.
Tell me something. Did you have much trouble charming her into doing our show?
No, not a bit. No, she'd do anything for me.
Good. Then you won't have any trouble charming her out of the show.
Yeah.
- What?
- You'll love Patsy.
She's great.
Since she's doing the lead in our show,
I don't suppose there's any sense... in having an extra French girl hanging around, is there?
- Now, but look--
- You'll handle it beautifully, I know.
You can tell me all about it tomorrow morning at breakfast on the boat.
Now, wait a minute. I--
Nice to have you aboard, partner.
Yeah, but now... You...
Where is Bill going?
He's tired. He's going back to the hotel.
Too bad. Such a waste.
What?
Nothing.
What did he say about me doing the show?
What did he say? What did he say? Well... what could he say?
He said without you, this show is not going on.
I am so happy.
I wouldn't change places with anyone in the world.
Thank you.
Thank you, Mr. Blair.
Ladies and gentlemen, all visitors ashore.
- Bill.
- Ahoy there, or whatever it is you say.
"Ahoy" plays pretty good. I was getting a little worried about you two.
Relax. Nothing could have kept us from catching this boat.
- Hey, Teddy. Ted.
- Bill!
Good. I see you're alone. Nice going, boy.
Say, allow me to present Ted Adams.
This is Patsy Blair...
-and her father, Steve Blair.
- Hello.
- Hi.
- How do you do?
I thought maybe I'd see you on the boat train in Paris.
It was such a nice day, I decided to walk.
Man, I'm proud of you, you're right in there.
This is the Rock of Gibraltar, this fellow.
If you ever need a kid to depend on, there's your boy.
That's nice to know. I'll remember.
And I'll remind you.
I thought we might do a little rehearsing on board.
- You know, kind of routine some numbers?
- Good idea.
I got a couple of rooms reserved.
Matter of fact, we got one at 3:00.
Fine.
Luggage! I got to see about my luggage.
Well, here we go.
Excuse me.
There's a wonderful thing about going away on a boat.
What's that?
You know you're leaving all your troubles on shore.
Thanks. No, he's not there, either.
Seems to have disappeared.
You don't think anything could have happened to him, do you?
- To Ted? No.
- Then I wonder why he isn't here.
Maybe the traffic was heavy.
-I call his cabin.
- Oh, no, no, I wouldn't do that.
- Come on, let's get started.
- All right, I'm ready.
Now, when the orchestra commences,
I think I'll have you standing center stage.
You'll be seated.
No, I think you'll be standing.
On second thought, I think I'll have you seated while I sing the verse.
At words poetic
I'm so pathetic
That I always have found it best
Instead of getting 'em off my chest
To Jet "em rest, oh babe, unexpressed.
I hate parading my serenading
As I'll probably skip a bar
But if this ditty is not so pretty
At least it'll tell you how great you are
You're the top!
You're the Coliseum
You're the top!
You're the Louvre Museum
You're a melody
From a symphony by Strauss
You're a Bendel bonnet
A Shakespeare sonnet
You're Mickey Mouse
You're the Nile
Tell me, tell me.
You're the Tower of Pisa
You're the smile
Of the Mona Lisa
I'm a worthless check
A total wreck, a flop
But if, baby, I'm the bottom
You're the top!
You're the top!
Come to me, come to me.
You're the Eiffel Tower
You're the top!
You're an April shower
You're the leading men in the season's ten best plays
You're the voice of Dinah
You're Dresden China
You're bouillabaisse.
You're the top!
You are the apple strudel
You're the top!
You're a Yankee Doodle
I'm a case of gout
A "be without a "hop"
But, if baby, I'm the bottom
You're the top!
You're sublime
You're a turkey dinner
You're the time
Of the derby winner
I'm a shaky show
About to go kerplop
But if, baby, I'm the bottom
But if, baby, I'm the bottom
But if, baby, I'm the bottom
You're the top!
No, the last time you crossed with us was five years ago, Mr. Benson.
That's right.
They don't make ships the way they used to, Captain.
I beg your pardon?
Father means he hasn't been on a ship in some time.
What business is your father in?
- Steel.
- Timber.
- Steel.
- Timber.
I'm a tycoon.
Oh, no.
The Rock of Gibraltar wouldn't do that to me.
Good evening, Captain.
- Good evening.
- Good evening.
- Good evening, Captain.
- But we have just arrived.
- Hello, Bill.
- Hello, Gaby. Hello, Rock.
You shall sit right here, next to me.
Baroness de Rombourt.
Fraulein von Wirbelstein.
I was hoping to see you this afternoon.
The rehearsal went on wonderfully.
- Orf, our!
- Are you in the theater, Miss Duval?
Yes, I--
The theater! Oh, there's nothing like the good old theater. Nothing.
I'm rehearsing for a play, too.
- How interesting. Which one?
- Ibsen.
Now, there's a fellow who could write a play. I'll never forget his Doll's House.
- Nora--
- It's called--
- Nora Bayes. A great singer.
- Who is in your--
Singer's Midgets.
Oh, the carnival and the tattooed man.
I was going to tell you about--
- Rose tattoo.
- Rose Bernstein.
Who's Rose Bernstein?
She was married to a teacher in Scranton. Great gal.
Excuse me.
Would you care to freshen up, Miss Duval?
- Yes.
I mean, you look fresh.
I like you just the way you are.
Thank you, Bill.
Anyway, he can't miss the first dance.
It's bad luck.
Terrible luck!
Would you like to dance with me?
Sure, I'd love to. Will you excuse us?
As long as this seems to be
Sadie Hawkins Night... would you care to dance, Mr. Adams?
- I'd love to. Excuse us.
- Please.
Ted should have been there this afternoon, shouldn't he?
It was so exciting, and we had...
Did you guess we would be dancing together tonight?
To tell you the truth, no.
-I did.
- You did?
When I am with a man,
I want to be all with him.
I do not want just a piece of his attention.
T'm sorry. I guess I was preoccupied.
When you are with a girl like me and you are preoccupied... it means that you do not know much about a girl like me.
I want to get something.
Ted.
Would you excuse me a moment?
I have to see Bill about something.
- Why, certainly.
- Thanks. I'll see you around.
All right. Around the port side of the sports deck in 15 minutes?
Fine.
If I don't show up, don't worry. It just means that I've been thrown overboard.
Boy, are you in trouble.
I'm in trouble?
Don't you remember in New York when you and Victor agreed... that I should find a girl for our show?
I meant if, but I never expected
{0 run into a talent like Gaby.
She's French, partner.
I told you how easy it is to make it a French girl, partner.
- That's not our play.
- Why don't we write in an extra part?
This story is about two men and one girl.
Couldn't we squeeze another girl in?
The only other woman in the story is a 62-year-old Swedish pastry cook.
Look, why don't we switch it around so Gaby plays my part... and I play the part of the...
No, I guess not.
Well, It looks like we have two girls for one part.
- I'm glad you caught up.
- What are we going to do?
Pay Gaby off.
Just tell her it was an honest mistake.
She's not doing this show for money.
She's doing it because she's in love with me.
- Did she tell you that?
- She didn't have to.
Besides, I know a little bit about women.
And you can't mistake a French girl in love.
Why, she's always doing things for you, giving you little surprises.
- Why--
- Do I interrupt?
No, as a matter of fact, we were just talking about you.
Good. I hope you will like this.
- You shouldn't have, dear.
- But I wanted to.
But I don't smoke a pipe.
It is your favorite brand.
The kind that is hard to get.
Thanks, but really, you shouldn't have.
I have some homework to do. Good night.
Now, don't...
It's not going to be easy.
Thank heavens I am French.
- Hi.
- Hi. I was getting worried.
I got lost. I can never tell port from starboard.
Port is left and starboard's right.
- Yeah, but I can never remember it.
- It's easy.
You only have to remember, on the left side, the running lights are red.
On the right side they're green.
Port wine is red, so that means port is...
- What's the matter?
-I forgot which side is port!
Good evening, Mademoiselle.
Your Miss Duval is very attractive.
Yes. Yes, she is.
- She's not mine, exactly.
-I didn't mean it that way.
I had no right to even mention it.
Gaby's a...
- She's a--
- Please.
Let's not talk about her, huh?
Now I'm embarrassed.
Al right. I--
It's just that when I saw you bring her to dinner, I... wondered about her.
Gaby is--
You don't have to explain her to me, you know.
I'd like to.
All right.
It's very simple. You see,
Gaby's a girl that I just...
Well, she's a friend of a friend of mine.
Bill?
"Beel"? Oh, Billl That's it.
- Yeah, they're great friends.
- I'm glad.
-I mean, Bill's so very nice.
- Oh, yes. He's one of the great old-timers.
Yes.
I'm so lucky to be doing the show with you both.
I wish you were.
I mean, I wish you were doing it sooner.
You have no idea how much this show means to me.
But, now, you mustn't let it.
I mean, a show is a show.
There's always another one along.
But this is the kind of a show you dream about doing.
Yeah, but that's wrong.
- Why?
- Why?
I'll tell you why. Patsy, do you...
Do you like salmon fishing?
I don't know. I've never tried.
Neither have I. What I'm getting at is that... there are other things in life besides this show. All kinds of things.
I like trout fishing.
That's what I mean. So do I.
I think my favorite sport is swimming.
Mine, too. In a cold ocean.
No, warm pool.
We used to go on beach picnics all the time when we lived home.
- Do you like picnics?
- I could learn to.
Can you... cook?
Ouj. I studied in Paris.
I burn toast. But I can make crepes suzettes.
Who wants toast?
It's amazing how much we have in common.
Neither of us likes burned toast.
-I bet you love music.
-I love jazz.
Do you really? I've got a wonderful collection of records at home.
We'll sit in front of the fireplace and listen to them.
I've got hundreds of them.
It'll take us years.
I don't mind.
This is a funny conversation for us to be having.
Yeah. It's like it's happening to somebody else.
- I'm kind of scared.
- So am I.
We're a perfect match.
Two cowards.
No, Ted, we'd better not.
This is only our first night out.
Yeah, I know.
Let's take a walk.
- If I can control myself.
- Please do.
All right.
-I can't.
- You can't?
No.
I feel a sudden urge to sing
The kind of ditty that invokes the spring
So control your desire to curse
While I crucify the verse
This verse I've started seems to me
The tin-pan-tithesis of melody
So to spare you all the pain
I'll skip the darn thing
And sing the refrain
Take it away
The night is young
The skies are clear
And if you want to go walking, dear
It's delightful
It's delicious
It's de-lovely
I understand the reason why
You're sentimental
'Cause so am I
It's delightful
It's delicious
It's de-lovely
You can tell at a glance
What a swell night
This is for romance
You can hear dear Mother Nature
Murmuring low
"Let yourself go
So please be sweet, my chickadee
And when I kiss you, just say to me
It's delightful
It's delicious
It's delectable
It's delirious
It's dilemma
It's delimit
It's deluxe, it's de-lovely.
- Patsy?
- Yes, Ted?
You won't go away, will you?
No, Ted, I won't go away.
- Ted?
- Yes, Patsy?
- Won't Bill be getting worried?
- Bill who?
Let yourself go
So please be sweet
My chickadee
And when I kiss you just say to me
It's delightful
It's delicious
It's delectable.
It's delirious
It's dilemma
It's delimit
It's deluxe
It's de-lovely.
Honey?
Back up.
Good night, Ted.
Or rather, good morning.
Good morning, Patsy.
You should... not.
You're right. I'll take it back.
Are we rehearsing later?
Let's rehearse now.
I mean the show, silly.
Oh, the show.
The show.
- Patsy?
- Yes?
You are the most wonderful girl
I've ever met.
Remember that, even if you never speak to me again.
- Are you coming or going?
-I wish I knew.
What, have you been up all night?
Yeah, I couldn't sleep.
I've got us in an awful mess. [ should've listened to you in the first place.
Patsy's perfect for the part.
- She's just great!
- So is Gaby.
Yeah, but this play is just not about a French girl.
I should never have signed her.
- What did you say?
-I said I should never have signed Gaby.
You have just solved our whole problem.
-I did?
- Sure!
Tell Gaby what you just told me.
Tell her you signed another girl for the part.
- You're right. I'll send her a cable.
- Cable? She's on the boat.
- Make a date to meet her.
- Yeah.
- I'll do it this evening.
- Oh, no. Now.
In the cold, gray light of the morning.
- I'll go to her cabin, then.
- No, no. Cabin's too cozy.
- Up on deck, then. I'll go, I'll take her to--
- An office. Take an office.
- Whose office?
- Anybody's office.
Just get a good cold, bare room.
The setting's half the battle, you know.
Sort of a reverse on the moonlight-and-soft-music routine.
You get them in a cold room, you know, it throws them off balance a little.
They can't dim the lights on you... and slip you that invitation to sit next to them on a soft sofa.
You've got it down to a science.
I've been practicing a little longer than you.
Another important point to remember is that... you got to give her a good breakfast before you start explaining.
It will mellow her.
- Feed her.
- Don't beat around the bush, either.
This thing's got to be settled today, or it's going to be too late.
Well, there you are. It's as simple as that.
Look, I'll never make it.
You wrote the book. Why don't you do it?
It'd be a cinch for a master like yourself.
No. You signed her.
It'd be better coming from you.
Yeah, but she likes you.
You could soften the blow better than I could.
Sorry.
This is something you are just going to have to settle yourself.
Remember everything I told you, now.
I can't do it, Bill, because...
I've come to pick up Miss Duval for breakfast.
Breakfast? We are asleep.
- Will you tell her I'll pick her up for lunch?
- Lunch?
I do not think we will be awake, Monsieur.
Tea?
We are skeptical, Monsieur.
- How do you all feel about dinner?
- Dinner!
I am sure we will love
10 have dinner with you, Monsieur.
- Fine. Our name is
- Monsieur Billy Benson.
We have been expecting you.
Au revoir, Monsieur.
- You're Steve Blair, aren't you?
- Yeah.
I seldom forget a face. Now, let me see.
- Pimlico. You were--
- No.
I don't think you've ever seen mine before.
My name's Todd.
- Nice to know you, Todd.
- Thank you.
- Have a drink.
- Not while on duty.
Well, I'm not on...
United States Treasury Department.
Glad to see I rate an escort home.
We've had quite a time catching up with you.
- I've been traveling a lot.
- Yes, I know.
I've handled a lot of income tax cases in my time, but yours is driving me crazy.
- Mind if I ask you a question?
- Be my guest.
- We know you are a gambler.
- Mathematical consultant.
Yeah.
We followed your career as a mathematical consultant... all the way from Saratoga to Santa Anita.
- Santa Anita.
- You had five straight bad years.
That's not my fault. Arrest the horses.
On the sixth year, you reported no income.
That's right.
The government can prove that you won over a $100,000 that year.
Sure, but that wasn't mine.
I had to take care of the guys that took care of me during the five bad years.
You had the money.
Why didn't you pay your taxes?
- What do you think I am, a crook?
- Now, look--
What have we got, a government full of welchers?
It's not ethical to let your friends down.
They let me have the money, so [ paid them back.
And I would have paid you, too, but I had nothing left.
So I figured, why declare it and put you to a lot of trouble?
What do you suppose would happen if everybody felt the way you do?
The country would be loaded with racetracks.
I'm sorry. Mr. Blair, it's my duty to--
Look, Todd, I ain't gonna run out on you.
Do me a favor, will you?
Just lay off until after the boat lands.
Please!
- Hi, Dad.
- Hello, honey. This is Mr. Todd.
This is Patsy, my daughter.
- Hello, Mr. Todd.
- How do you do, Miss Blair?
Patsy's going in a Broadway show.
Are you in the theater, Mr. Todd?
No, I'm with a printing outfit.
I'm afraid I don't know much about business.
There's a lot of money in this business.
- Very nice meeting you, Miss Blair.
- Thank you, Mr. Todd.
- And I will be seeing you before we dock.
- I'll be around.
- Isn't there something you want to tell me?
- What?
- I heard about you winning the ship's pool.
- Oh, that! Yes. Today is my lucky day.
How about taking a walk around the deck with your old man?
I'd love to, honey, but I'm meeting Ted in a minute.
- Why don't you come with us?
- No, you run along.
- All right.
- Ted's...
What?
Ted's a nice boy.
He likes you, too.
- I'll see you at dinner. Bye.
- Bye.
Duck was delicious.
- You haven't eaten a bite there.
- I'm not hungry.
- You've got to eat.
- Why?
Because everybody eats.
I enjoy it that you worry about me.
You have a good appetite.
It will be fun to cook for you in New York.
I don't eat much in New York.
I can also sew for you, and wash, and clean.
I'm very handy around the house.
You will see when we get to New York.
That's what I want to talk to you about.
There's something I have to tell you.
You have something to tell me?
Tell me!
- No, not here.
- We can talk in my cabin.
No, I think I have a better idea.
- In your cabin? Good.
- No.
- Ready?
- Ready.
- Here we are.
- Gymnasium?
Everything is ready, Mr. Benson.
- The room is yours.
- Thank you, Henry.
It's kind of dreary.
- It isn't at all.
- It isn't?
No.
- Thanks.
- It's for you.
You can't go around giving me gifts like this.
- You think I stole it?
- Well, no, of course not, but...
- Then keep it.
- But...
Thanks.
I brought you here to talk to you about the show, Gaby.
- Say "Gaby" again.
- Gaby.
I know how much this all means to you and everything, but--
You say it so cute.
- When Ted told me that he'd signed you--
- It tickles me when you say it.
When Ted told me that he'd signed you for the show, Gaby, why, I thought--
You said you wouldn't do it without me.
- He told me.
- He shouldn't have! What Ted...
What Ted didn't tell you is that...
What are you thinking?
How much I love you.
Hey.
You shouldn't go around saying things like that.
You think I go around saying things like that?
That's not what I meant. I...
- You don't even know me.
- That's not my fault.
What I know, I love.
You are the most honest girl I ever met.
We are making progress.
You have just insulted me.
- You amaze me.
- You amaze me.
Why did you never marry?
I don't know, I guess...
I just never wanted to before.
You're right. It's a beautiful room.
It's a beautiful night.
Isn't it amazing how the world changes at night?
In France we say,
"Night is the lovers' blanket."
All through the night
I delight
In your Jove
All through the night
You're so close to me
All through the night
From a height
Far above
You and your Jove
Bring me ecstasy
When dawn comes to waken me
You're never there at all
I know you've forsaken me
Till the shadows fall
But then
Once again
I can dream
I've the right
To be close to you
All through
the night
That's beautiful.
-I meant it.
- Sing it in French for me.
- In French?
It's the language of love.
-I don't know if I can.
-I will help you.
Go ahead.
Gaby.
Did you really know all the time?
Of course. I am French.
I am so happy I am going fo America with you.
Now we can be together. Always.
- They are going to love you in America.
-I hope so, for your sake.
You'll be a sensation.
All you have to do is stand in Times Square at high noon... and you'll stop traffic.
I will?
I can see everything so clearly.
It will be very exciting.
What will, chrie?
When I get up on that stage.
Stage!
Boy, has Ted got a problem.
Pardon.
- Good morning.
- Good morning.
- How do you feel?
- Wonderful.
- You do?
- Shouldn't I?
Well, sure, only...
Didn't Bill upset you last night?
Terribly. I loved every minute of it.
- He must be a real master.
- He's wonderful.
Now, what happened last night was Bill's idea, you know.
I should hope so.
Bill didn't really want to buy you off, it's just...
Well, like he said...
Patsy was signed for the show first... and it shouldn't have been a French girl, anyhow.
Billy came last night to buy me off?
Didn't he tell you?
Pardon me.
Good morning. You look beautiful this morning.
As beautiful as I looked last night?
I can't decide. I think T'll just have
{0 see you again tonight.
You must have enjoyed yourself last night.
I did.
Look, why don't we go on an Easter egg hunt?
- We can all scatter, and...
- No more games, thank you.
-I have had enough.
- What do you mean?
The master made a big mistake.
Nothing could get me out of this show now.
I have an ironclad contract, remember?
It's the handy kind.
I'm sorry, Bill.
I thought you settled the whole thing last night. I told her about Patsy.
- Then that's why she--
- Me and my fat mouth.
I was going to explain everything this morning.
- Got yourself a case of moonburn, huh?
- Bad.
Well, you'll work it out.
I don't know.
She's a pretty strong-headed girl.
Yeah.
Well, I'd better go.
I've got a date to propose to Patsy.
- Good luck to you.
- Thanks.
I'm sorry about Gaby.
If you want to have me lashed to the mast or anything, I'll...
We'll be landing tomorrow morning.
I'll have to pick you up early.
I'll be ready.
- Dad?
- Hi, honey.
- Hi. Did you and Mr. Todd have a nice walk?
- Yeah, fine.
- Good.
- We'll...
- We'll be pulling in, in the morning.
-I know. Isn't it exciting?
What's the first thing you're going to do when we land?
No plans, huh?
Not exactly.
Tomorrow night, I am going to put on my prettiest dress... and you and Ted can take me out on the town.
Unless you're ashamed of me?
- Is anything wrong?
- No!
What's up, Doc?
Come on.
As a matter of fact, I...
To tell you the truth...
Look...
I got some unfinished business.
I gotta go away for a while.
- Oh, no!
- Come on, now.
You told me everything was all right, you had it all worked out!
But you've got to figure the odds.
It's the only right way to work it out.
- Oh, Dad!
- Oh, dear.
We can't go on living like criminals, honey.
I made a mistake.
I can't let you pay for it.
- But we were getting along just fine!
- Sure, except we couldn't go home.
Now, you are starring in a Broadway show.
Do you think I would have taken it if I'd known you had to go to prison?
That wasn't forever. It's 10-to-I that in a year I'd be running that joint.
I'm going to get the best lawyers there are.
As many as we need.
We can afford it now that I've got the show.
Don't worry about me. I want you to start living your own life.
Don't you worry about me.
I'm going to be fine.
As long as you can use a good housekeeper...
- I'll be waiting.
- But that's not what I want.
-I want you and Ted--
- No, no.
I'm not going to let this be Ted's problem, too.
- I'm going to take a walk.
- Sure.
- Good morning, darling.
- Good morning, Ted.
I couldn't sleep a wink last night.
I kept making plans about us.
You know the first place we are going when we arrive in New York?
No.
I'll give you a hint:
The place where my mother proposed to my father.
I'm afraid I'm going to be too busy to go anywhere with you.
- Sure, you must have a million things to do.
- You don't understand.
I'm going to be too busy from now on.
What do you mean? Too busy for me?
That's right.
- What did I do? I thought after last night--
- Last...
Last night was for laughs.
It's funny, I don't feel like laughing.
Sorry.
I had us all married.
We had three kids, and...
Patsy...
This is a business relationship.
It says so in my contract.
Tm sorry. I didn't mean
10 break any clauses.
Oh, I'm sorry.
- Mister, can I have my ball?
- Here.
I can't come out.
I'm a prisoner.
- Here.
- Thank you.
- Hey!
- Come on, give it to me. Come on, give...
Here. Thank you.
Come on, now! Your life isn't over just because of one unhappy love affair.
Here.
I suppose that what you want is sympathy
Well, you won't get sympathy from me
'Cause I'm willing to bet
Tomorrow you'll forget
Today's catastrophe
You will learn by sipping from the wisdom cup
That when you're down there's no place else to go
but up!
Up! Up!
You can bounce right back
You can bounce right back
Like the happy clown who's fallen down
Can bounce right back
When you try to smile and think you've lost the knack
I'm happy to announce
You can bounce right back!
You can bounce right back!
So my friend, you went and stubbed your little toe
And you'd like to tell your tale of woe
In a minute from now
I'm sure you'll wonder how
And where that pain did go
Make believe you weren't really hurt at all
Like Humpty Dumpty said
When he began that fall
You can bounce right back!
You can bounce right back!
Just refuse to cry and, by and by
You'll bounce right back
Like the fellow said when he sat on a tack
I'm happy to announce
You can bounce right back!
It's the smile you smile that counts
Happy thoughts in large amounts
Any problem you can trounce
You can bounce right back!
You can bounce right back!
You can bounce right back!
You can bounce right back!
That's very nice. It's clever.
Say, if the ladies will excuse you,
I'd like to talk to you for a minute, huh?
Sure. Excuse me, kids.
- I'll see you later. Goodbye.
- Bye.
- Bye!
- Bye!
Hey, mister!
What about me? Shut out again, huh?
Yeah, thank you. Bye-bye.
Don't worry, now.
Of course I won't tell Patsy.
She wouldn't care.
- Patsy and I had a big fight.
- About what?
She didn't tell me.
Well, assert yourself, son!
Show her who's boss.
I did. She is.
You got to move right in, boy. Take charge.
I guess I just don't have your knack with women.
How's Gaby?
She's not talking to me.
Well, I can't lose Patsy now.
I've waited all my life for her.
I know it's not very long, but it's all I've got.
So what are we going to do?
Well, at least I got the leading-lady problem solved.
I've got it figured out now how both girls can do the show.
- You have?
- Sure.
- How?
- Here's how it works.
-...and there's the finale!
- That's great!
We can wrap the whole thing up in a breeze.
That's wonderful. The girls will love it.
Now, if I can just figure some way to get Gaby out of her cabin...
-so I can tell her.
- Yeah. What the...
How about that?
I could lower you down past the porthole.
I guess not.
Don't tell me a couple of clever operators like us can't figure some way to get a gal out of her cabin.
- Jeez, that should be possible.
- Yeah, well, French girls aren't easy.
- Especially, Gaby.
- You know, she's very stubborn.
But I think I know how to handle it.
- How?
- Magic.
- What?
- Magic. Watch this.
- You've been getting too much sun.
- Voila.
- Good morning.
- Good morning.
Now, if you'll excuse me, I'm going to lie down. That trick always tires me out.
-I brought you a present.
- Thanks.
I'm glad you came.
I've been trying to get to talk to you.
-I had nothing to say.
- Ted told me what he said.
Must have sounded awful, huh?
Only if it was true.
I meant every word I said last night.
Then you didn't sign another girl for the show?
- Well, I did, but--
- Open your present.
You have your contract back.
You're not quitting the show?
- You can't! Not now.
- You are confused.
Last night you wanted it very much.
So much that you even made love to me.
That's not why I made love to you last night.
I beg your pardon.
That's not why I made love to you last night.
Gee, Gaby, you don't quit a show just because you don't like someone.
- You have to do the show.
-I do not have to do anything.
When I want to do something,
I will do everything.
But if I am forced to do something,
I will do nothing.
Gaby.
Monsieur.
Don't tell me: She sent you to push me overboard, huh?
-I have come to help you.
- Help me what?
I know you are very unhappy, but so is Mademoiselle.
I have never seen her like this.
She loves you very much.
Yeah, sure. She's mad about me, I can tell.
You have hurt her.
I've tried to explain to her. She won't listen.
- She's running out on the show now.
- Do you know the reason why, Monsieur?
Sure! She loves me so much she just can't stand being near me, huh?
Non, Monsieur.
I will tell you the reason why.
You see...
- Come on, battle stations.
- What?
Come on, don't just sit there.
We're going into action, man.
I can't, Patsy might phone.
You really love Patsy, don't you?
Either that, or I've invented a new disease.
How do you feel about Steve?
- Patsy's more my type.
- No.
What I mean is, what would you do if your father-in-law went to prison?
I'd bake a cake and put a file in it.
But that's silly. I don't have a...
What?
Captain, could I speak to you for a minute?
It is my pleasure, Mr. Benson.
What can I do for you?
I'm having a little trouble with a French girl, and I--
You've come to the right man.
I have a plan, but I'm going to need your help.
You have only to speak.
Tonight at the ship's party...
- That's the plan. I don't think it can miss.
- Extraordinary.
- I shall be looking forward to tonight.
- So will I.
- Are they here yet?
- No, not yet.
- Hey, what if it doesn't work?
- Then you can lash me to the mast.
- I'm worried.
- Relax, will you? It'll work.
Our first little pigeon is coming.
I would suggest that you disappear.
- Good luck.
- Good luck.
- Good evening, Mademoiselle.
- Good evening, Captain.
Thank you for accepting my invitation.
I'm afraid I won't be able to stay very long.
I have a terrible headache.
I'm sure the party will make you feel better.
We have a table for two over there.
I'll join you in a moment.
All right.
- Good evening, Mademoiselle.
- Good evening.
It was so nice of you to accept my invitation.
I'm afraid I won't be able to stay very long.
I have a terrible headache.
There is an epidemic.
You will find a table for two over there.
I'll join you in a moment.
It takes a Frenchman...
Ladies and gentlemen, welcome to our gala.
We are fortunate in starting the show tonight... with that great American star,
Mr. Bill Benson.
I'll read your fortune in the tea leaves
I'll read the writing on the wall
But my very best work
The work I do best
I do with a turban and a crystal ball
A second-hand turban and a broken-down crystal ball
Get out of here, get out!
I was the very first to prophesy
The month of June would come before July
I predicted that the leaves would fall each fall
With a second-hand turban and a crystal ball
I think the year was 1929
When I insisted all the stocks were fine
Mr. Lindbergh wouldn't get to France at all
With a second-hand turban and a crystal ball
The future! The future!
It all looms very large
The future! The future!
It's yours for a nominal charge
I claim we'll all be dead by '85
Which means it's ten-to-one we'll stay alive
If I say "Good boating
Just expect a squall
A casual look at my list'll
Prove that I'm hotter than a pistol
With my second-hand turban and my crystal ball
And now, ladies and gentlemen... for a practical demonstration of my mystic and occult powers...
I shall need the assistance of some young man from the audience.
Preferably a young man whom I have never met before.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
- Have we ever met before?
- No, never.
Not even casually?
- Never.
- Never.
Our standing offer still holds good, ladies and gentlemen... if anyone can prove that I've ever...
If anyone can prove... that I've ever met this young man before...
I shall give them one old
Davy Crockett hat.
- Got one for you, too, if you're good.
- Never.
To continue now, ladies and gentlemen, out of the debris, out of the shambles...
I shall put this young man into a trance... to test his receptive powers.
- Are you sure we've never met before?
- Never.
As the High Lama of Birdland was wont to say...
I shall now awaken the young man from his trance, and when he awakens... he shall become the High Rajah, the all-knowing Rajah.
- What are you?
- I've been a Rajah all my life.
I shall pass among you now, ladies and gentlemen... and the high and knowing Rajah... the all-knowing Rajah, shall answer any and all questions.
Take the ball, please.
No, I did that, I did that.
There you are, Rajah.
Come on, you look like a doll.
I can't see anything.
That's the idea. We're business partners.
- Wait a minute, I'm getting a message.
- Okay, come along with me.
Now, for the demonstration.
I have an object here I'm holding high
I'd like you to identify
Now, am I getting through to you, my friend, at all?
Loud and clear, professor.
Tell me now, tell me, Rajah, what am I holding in my hand?
- You're holding something.
- Take your time.
- There's something in your hand.
- Yes, I have, in my hand.
Take my time, huh? Time magazine!
- No, no, Rajah, no, no!
- Life magazine!
- No, no, no...
- Look magazine. Time Marches On.
Watch yourself, Raj, watch it!
Watch myself, watch myself...
I have it! A wristwatch!
The Rajah is rolling tonight. Come along.
I'm going to stop at the table of this charming gentleman... and pick up an object and ask you to tell me... what am I holding in my hand?
What am I holding?
- You're holding up the show.
- No, you're fighting me, Rajah.
What am I holding in my hand?
Tell me quick.
- Boxing gloves.
- No, no.
- Hairpins.
- No, no.
- Buttons.
- No, no.
You're holding... It's an elephant!
What color?
This bum must've caught the act in Bridgeport.
Now I'm gonna stop at the table of this delightful young lady... and hold my hand over her head and ask you to tell me...
Now, you'll have to plumb the depths of your perceptive powers.
I ask you to tell me--
That's a lady plumber!
No, no. Is she a blonde or a brunette, Raj?
- Blonde or brunette?
- Yeah.
That young lady is a brunette.
Oh, Rajah, you've just desolated me.
This young lady is a blonde.
Wait a week.
The future! The future!
It all looms very large
The future! The future!
It's yours for a nominal charge
Let's go get 'em.
Please be sweet, my chickadee
And when I kiss you just say to me
It's delightful
It's delicious
With my second-hand turban
and a crystal ball
I'm sorry, but... that's the only way we could get you two to sit still long enough for us.
We thought we could laugh you into letting us explain.
Ted, my mind's made up.
I just can't see you anymore.
Ted's going to make a great son-in-law.
I just wanted you to know that we're not doing the show we started out to do.
We're having a whole new book written.
This story's about this Broadway character... who signs a leading lady for his show... and then he discovers that his partner's signed a French girl.
And he doesn't like this French girl... because he thinks she's interfering with his show.
And he starts out by trying to get her out of the show.
Instead, he falls in love for the first time in his life.
The new show's about this talented young television star... who goes to France and signs a wonderful French girl for his show.
Then he learns his partner signed another girl in England.
He's kind of mad about it, until he meets her... and she's pretty incredible.
She's talented, and she's beautiful...
-and, anyway, he's nuts about her.
- Ted.
Did you really think I'd leave you because Steve is in trouble?
Bill told me what the new show's about.
Great idea.
It's the story of this dashing gambler... who has a daughter that he wants to become a Broadway star.
Now, this gambler is a very clever fellow, and when he hears--
Steve!
- Would you join us in a toast?
- Love it.
To the new show, huh? You're the Top.
I sure wish I could be there opening night.
- Can't you?
- I'm afraid not.
My partner and I are going to South America on a big uranium deal.
Fine!
When do you think you'll be able to see the show?
You better have a smash.
I'll be gone for some time.
- Well, good luck, Steve.
- Good luck.
- Good luck to you.
- Good luck.
Do you hear that playin'?
Yes, [ hear that playin'
Do you know who's playin'?
No, who is that playin'?
Why, it's Gabriel, Gabriel playin'
Gabriel, Gabriel sayin'
"Will you be ready to go when I blow my horn?"
Yeah!
Oh, blow, Gabriel, blow
Go on and blow, Gabriel, blow
I've been a sinner
I've been a scamp
But now I'm ready to trim my lamp
So blow, Gabriel, blow
I was low, Gabriel, low
Mighty low, Gabriel, low
But now since I have seen the light
I'm good by day and good by night
So blow, Gabriel, blow.
Blow, Gabe, blow
Blow, Gabe, blow
Blow, Gabe, blow
Gabriel, blow your horn
Blow, Gabe, blow
Blow, Gabe, blow
Blow, Gabe, blow
Gabriel, blow your horn
Yes, when I got to Satan's door
I heard you blowin' on your horn once more
So I said, "Satan!
Man, I'm cuttin' on out of here!
Blow, Gabe, blow
Gabriel, blow
Blow, Gabe, blow
Gabriel, blow
Blow, Gabe, blow
Gabriel, blow your horn
Blow, Gabe, blow
Go, Gabriel
Blow, Gabe, blow
Blow, Gabriel
Blow, Gabe, blow
Blow, Gabriel
I've purged my soul and my heart, too
So climb up the mountaintop and start to
Blow, Gabe, blow
Blow, Gabriel
Blow, Gabe, blow
Blow, Gabriel
Blow, Gabe, blow
Blow, Gabriel
Gabriel, blow your horn
Blow, Gabe, blow
Oh, Gabriel, blow
Blow, Gabe, blow
Oh, Gabriel, blow
Blow, Gabriel, blow
Oh, Gabriel
Gabriel, blow your horn
I want to join your happy band
And play all the day in the promised land
So blow, Gabriel, blow
Gabriel, blow
Oh, Gabriel
Gabriel, blow your horn
Blow
Blow
Blow
Oh, Gabriel
Gabriel, blow your horn
It's Gabriel, Gabriel sayin'
Gabriel, Gabriel sayin'
Gabriel, Gabriel playin'
Gabriel, Gabriel playin'
Blow, Gabriel
Blow
Aha! You like it?
Well, everybody join with me.
We sing together, huh?
- Thank you.
Thank you. Thank you.
You want more? You do?
Well, aren't you wonderful?
Wait. Don't go away.
I'll be right ba-
I'll be right back with the luscious Colette.
Boy, it's a great audience.
Best yet.
- They love you.
- And what about you?
- I love you too.
- Well, give me a kiss.
- No. Turn around.
- Not till you give me a kiss. Okay.
- You know something?
- What?
Gapeaux will be moving us up to the Terrace Room soon. The big show.
- He's crazy if he doesn't.
- Don't say that. He is crazy.
- Hurry up. Come on.
- All right. Thank you.
Come. Duran is landing any minute.
We've got Nice on the television. Come on!
Oh, it's Duran!
Come on. Come with me.
Duran is landing. Come with me.
- Okay. Ready?
- Wait a second, lassie.
- There is a wee spot on my kilt here.
- Well, I'll fix that.
Stop it! You tickle.
- Hey, we're on.
Watch it, Mac.
- What-
Hey! Wait a minute.
What's going on in there?
- It is Duran. He's landing.
- Duran! Let's go and see!
Huge crowds have gathered to welcome the nation's hero...
Capitaine Henri Duran.
Not since the arrival of Lindbergh... has a flight created so much excitement.
When his magnificent plane, the Victory, touches the ground... he will have broken the round-the-world nonstop flight record... by more than 12 hours, a great, great achievement.
You can feel the mounting tension of the crowd.
Is he gonna land in all that fog?
Jack, don't be so vain.
Put on your glasses so you can see something.
-  Ah, it is he!
The Victory is coming in!
Just listen to that crowd roar!
And now, on the platform, the distinguished committee of high officials... waits to receive the great capitaine.
Even the air minister is here to pay him honor.
In just a moment now,
Capitaine Duran will appear.
He has been at the controls for more than two days... and, without sleep, he must be exhausted.
- Bravo!
The first to greet the capitaine... are Philippe Labrix and Louis Forel... his associates in the manufacture of these magnificent planes.
We have been told that Air Europa has given them a contract for 50 of them.
Hey, Colette. Doesn't he look familiar to you?
Kind of like somebody we know?
- Mmm-
- Huh? Huh?
You know, he looks much like you!
That's what I thought, too, except I didn't want to be the one to say it.
- Good-looking chap, isn't he?
Aha! Here is Madame Duran... the beautiful wife of the capitaine.
Oh, no, no. Sorry.
That is not Madame Duran.
It is Elena Petrovna, the ballet dancer.
Ah, now we have Madame Duran.
A situation, no?
No. No, sorry again.
That is Marilyn Turner, the American movie star.
Wait, wait! Let us hope that this is Madame Duran!
Ah, oh, yes. There is no doubt.
This is really Madame Duran.
What a giant among men.
Capitaine Duran. Capitaine, please.
Would you kindly say a few words to the television audience?
- Congratulations, Capitaine!
- Did you have any trouble, Capitaine?
- What did you think about while you were making this flight?
- Will you give us a statement?
- I would be delighted.
- The whole world is waiting to hear you.
My dear friends, thank you very much.
I am deeply moved by this demonstration.
I, uh- I would like to say more, but I'm sure you will excuse me.
I am really so very tired.
All I would like now is a bottle of champagne, and after that...
I would like to go to bed for a week.
Who will join me in cheering my brave comrades who have made this achievement possible?
- Bravo.
- Bravo!
- How can he?
- What?
Look at other women.
His wife is so beautiful.
Boy, look at those eyes. Those-
Now, come on, you. Back to work.
I've got those too.
I've got beautiful eyes.
This concludes our broadcast brought to you... from the Nice Airport.
We now return you to the studio.
I sure hate to follow that guy.
He's terrific, isn't he?
- Oh, Jack.
- Yes?
- Monsieur Gapeaux- he wants to see you.
- He does?
- Uh-huh.
- I'll be right with him. Thank you, Andre.
- Right.
- Did you hear that? Gapeaux wants to see me.
Here we go, baby, up to the Terrace Room and a raise.
- I do not like it.
- Why not?
- Because when you want to see him, that's a raise.
- Yeah?
But when he wants to see you,
I don't like it.
Ah, do not fret, my bonny lassie.
The clan MacMartin has never lost a battle yet.
Hee-hee!
No! Saturday night, you are through.
Through? But I don't get it. Why?
Because I no longer find you amusing.
That's just a matter of personal taste.
I don't happen to like olives.
- The audience loved me.
- I do not care about the audience!
- It is what I like that matters.
- But business is great!
Oh, please do not argue,
Monsieur Martin.
I've seen everything you do, and I'm bored.
After all, I have to live too.
Look, Monsieur Gapeaux,
I can give you something new.
I've got a lot of other things I can do.
If you can do something sensational,
I might reconsider.
In the meantime, Saturday night, you are through.
Well, thank you very much.
- Sensational, huh?
- And it better be better than you are doing now!
Yeah.
- Something sensational, huh?
Yeah, sure.
Any little thing will do, just so he likes it.
Who cares what he likes?
Who tells him to watch?
- He owns the place.
- Oh!
Look, let's not argue, will you, sweetie? Let's just think.
Wait a minute. Maybe this will go.
Ah! I'm mortified! 
Nothin', huh?
Well, I don't know.
I just don't know.
I- Wait a minute.
Who is that?
Never mind.
- You really think I look like him?
- Who?
- Duran.
- What has that to do with this?
Nothin'. Nothin'.
I was just lookin'.
- Well, you look like him, but you do not, uh-
- Do not what?
Well, it's just that you do not.
I mean, you see, when you look at Duran, something happens to you.
- Yeah.
- And when I look at you-
Fine. I suppose if Duran walked in here now, you'd run off with him and leave me flat.
No, Jack, I wouldn't leave you flat.
- I'm in love with you.
- Mmm.
But everyone is in love with Duran... and I'm the only one in love with you.
- You see? That's the difference.
- Oh.
- No savoir faire, huh?
- No savoir faire.
Oh, well, that's just an act like anything else is.
He happens to be the big hero at the moment, a great lover.
- You know something?
- What?
- I could have what he's got just like that.
I'll show you.
It's very simple. Watch.
Capitaine, I trust you find this table satisfactory?
- Quite. Thank you very much, Gapeaux.
- Oh, not at all.
- Madame?
- Thank you.
Mesdames... et messieurs... we take great pleasure... in presenting... to you...
Monsieur Jack Martin... in his impersonation of... the one and only
Capitaine Henri Duran!
- Duran!
- Ahh!
My dear friends-
Mimi, Fifi... and Celia.
I don't recall your face... but I'd like to be familiar.
It's uncanny.
You should at least pretend to be amused, my dear.
Oh, it is amusing, Henri, and very enlightening.
India!
Pardon.
Hello.
Eeh!
Eeh! Oh, oh. Eeh!
Oh, oh!
Eeh! Oh, eeh! Oh, eeh, oh! Oh!
Hey!
- Oh, good, good!
- What about Duran? Is he applauding?
With his hands, yes, but with his face, I don't know.
- Oh.
- Go ahead. Come on.
- Capitaine, I do hope you were not offended.
- On the contrary.
We found it terribly amusing.
Didn't we, my dear?
Oh, terribly.
I should like to go back and meet Jack Martin.
But of course!
He would be delighted.
- Would you excuse me, my dear?
- This is quite refreshing.
- What?
- Your going backstage to see a man.
Hmm. I won't be very long.
Don't worry about us, Henri.
We'll either be here or in the bar.
- Excuse me.
Please, his dressing room is just downstairs.
- Monsieur Gapeaux.
- Yes?
You must come at once.
The magician had a terrible fight with his wife.
- She ran off with his rabbit.
- Oh!
Will you excuse me, Capitaine?
This is very sad.
- You see, he loves that rabbit. Quick.
- Right here.
- Eugenie!
- Henri!
 My little souffl!
It's been such a long time.
Two years!
Yes. And still the souffl has not fallen.
- Oh, Henri. I must go now. You will call me?
- Yes. Same number?
- And if a man answers?
- That is my husband. He will take the message.
- Very touching! Souffl, huh?
- I beg your pardon?
You no-good two-face.
The minute you think my back is turned-
Mademoiselle, you are making a mistake.
- I'm not the one who makes mistakes.
- But this time you are.
Allow me to introduce myself.
I am Capitaine Henri Duran at your service.
Capitaine Henri Duran!
Do you expect me to believe-
Ah! 
You see, the mustache is real.
It's incredible!
Oh, you've come to see Jack.
You're angry with him.
- You do not wish me to be angry with him?
- Please, no.
Ah. I take it you are interested in him.
Very much.
Mademoiselle, you should not be interested in imitations.
You have too much to offer yourself.
A beautiful girl like you should have the real thing.
Capitaine Duran, are you making love to me?
But of course. What are you doing, my dear, after the show?
- I have a previous engagement.
Perhaps I could, uh, persuade you to break it?
You probably could, but I'm not going to let you.
- Tomorrow night?
- No.
Well, then perhaps you will come to my villa Saturday evening.
- Certainly not!
- You misunderstand, my dear.
We're having a large reception, and the house will be filled with people.
Capitaine Duran, that's a very old one.
I come, and all the other guests have failed to show up, eh?
Oh, it is my misfortune that they all will be there.
But please come anyway.
- Here's my card.
- Henri!
- Henri, this telegram- Read it. It is urgent.
- Yes. Just a moment.
- You will come?
- I will think about it.
- Good.
- Good night, Capitaine.
- Good night.
- Will you excuse me?
Antoine just brought it over.
Read it, Henri.
- For heaven's sake, read it!
- Calm yourself, Philippe.
"Regret to advise
Air Europa unable to execute contract...
"for purchase of Victory planes...
"pending further tests.
- Periton."
- He's only fooling, yes?
- I wish he were, Philippe.
- Why should Periton do this? He needs our planes.
Periton is playing a game.
He knows I'm overextended at the bank and need money desperately.
- If he delays signing the contract, we are ruined.
- Oh!
He will buy our company for a song and make the planes himself.
- He cannot do this. It would finish us.
- Definitely.
Unless- Unless I can raise the money from someone else.
- But who?
- Monsieur Alonzo.
Yes! He always liked me.
But suppose he does not give us the money.
Henri, let's take what we can and fly to South America.
Stop trembling, Philippe. If you look like that, no one will give us a penny.
Pull yourself together. If one word of this leaks out, we are ruined, all finished!
Now, come. I will telephone Monsieur Alonzo for an appointment immediately.
- Thank you, madame.
- You're quite welcome.
What about the impersonation?
Did you like that too?
Well, you're enormously successful, monsieur.
- Why should my opinion make any difference?
- But it does.
- It's the only opinion that counts.
- Lili, we must be going.
- Henri will be waiting.
- Sit down, Louis.
- Mine is the only opinion that matters?
- That's right.
And if I didn't like your impersonation... would you stop doing it?
- Well, I don't know.
- Oh, don't be frightened, Monsieur Martin.
I'm not going to suggest that you drop it.
What about the captain?
Did he like it?
Oh, yes, very much.
He's backstage at this very moment, seeing you.
I know. That's why I came in here.
Tell me something, monsieur.
I'm very curious.
When you do these impersonations, how do you go about it?
Do you make a study of your victim?
Well, as much as I can. It's something that comes to me kind of easy, I guess.
Well, as much as I can. It's something that comes to me kind of easy, I guess.
I try to mimic his way of speaking, his mannerisms.
You know, sort of put myself in his shoes.
Like, uh- 
Madame, you are very beautiful.
This actor, this Jack Martin... has never met a woman like you before.
It will go to his head, like wine.
Yes, monsieur. You do do it easily.
- I suppose you could even do an impression of me.
- No, madame.
To capture you, I would have to reach up for some stars... seek the petals of a white rose... the blue of the sky over the Mediterranean...
- the sadness that I see in-
- Sadness?
Yes. The sadness that I -
Forgive me, madame.
When I do Captain Duran,
I get carried away. It's a wonderful part.
If I may say so, monsieur, you have brought something to it... that I don't think you saw in the original.
Thank you.
- Now, if you'll excuse us,
I think we'd better get back.
- I should think so.
- Good night, Monsieur Martin.
- Good night.
I hope I've given you some new ideas to use as Capitaine Duran.
You've given me some new ideas to use as Jack Martin.
- Good night.
- Good night.
"New ideas", huh? 
Dropped this, sweetie.
Oh, Jack, darling! This is gorgeous!
What? Oh, wait a minute.
That belongs to Madame Duran.
- Is that so?
- Hey, Colette!
Glorious day.
Such beautiful girls.
I hope Henri gets the money.
Ah, yes, Louis, you are in trouble.
Today you are a rich, fat man.
Tomorrow you'll be only a fat man.
- Periton!
- Stop thinking about Periton.
Thinking about him?
I see him, there, with Lili!
- What is he doing here?
- He's down here for the kill, no doubt.
Let's find out. Come on.
Stop looking like that. Smile!
- Hmm?
- Smile!
Forgive me. Oh, gentlemen.
- I'm delighted to see you.
- Good morning.
- Good morning.
- We thought you were in Paris.
- Yes. What brings you here?
- What brings anyone here?
- Climate, beautiful girls- and, uh, business.
Uh, business?
Yes. I always mix business with pleasure.
That way my opponents never know what I'm up to.
I must be going, my dear.
I'll see you this evening.
My best to Henri.
Tell him not to worry.
I shall not forget our long friendship.
I'll try to make things as easy for him as possible.
Good-bye. Good-bye, gentlemen.
- Good-bye, Felix.
- Good-bye.
- Bye.
- What did he mean by that?
He says Henri needs money.
He seems to think he's taking over the airplane company.
- Is that true?
- Yes, too true. He has found out everything.
- We'd better tell Henri right away.
- He's at home.
- I'll drive.
- Good.
I invited Felix to the reception this evening before I knew all this.
- Perhaps I should make some excuse-
- No, you cannot do that.
- Let him come. Then Henri can talk to him.
- Yes, Henri will save us.
- He's the only one who can.
- Yes, Henri.
And for heaven's sake, take that foolish smile off your face!
- But you told me to!
- Oh!
- Madame. Oh, madame-
- Excuse us, Lili.
The florist, madame. He'd like to see you about the table arrangements.
- He's on the terrace.
- Thank you, Antoine.
- Antoine! Antoine!
- Yes, monsieur?
- Capitaine Duran- he's not here.
- No, monsieur. He's gone.
- Gone?
- Where?
He did not say, monsieur, and I never ask. However, he carried a valise.
- Thank you, Antoine. Now, why would he-
- Carry a valise?
- I do not know.
- Neither do I.
- Do you think he has-
- Gone to Paris?
- I do not know.
- Neither do I.
Well, he must have been in a very big hurry. Look at his desk.
- I've never seen it like that before.
- Look! A note.
It is addressed to both of us.
In Henri's handwriting.
- You don't suppose-
- Do not start supposing. Read it, Philippe. Read it.
"Dear friends, I failed last night to get the money from Alonzo.
Our dear friend Periton seems to have reached him first."
I knew it. I knew it.
"There is only one hope left-
Sir Hubert Canon.
"I'm flying to London to see him.
If I do not succeed, you may never see me again."
He's going to kill himself!
"Don't worry.
I'm not going to kill myself.
"I must succeed. But be certain to say nothing of this to anyone.
If word gets back to Periton, we are ruined."
"Back to Periton." He's here!
I know, I know.
I- Sir Hubert Canon. Yes, he might.
Louis, we are lost! Completely lost!
- What now?
- The reception tonight!
Lili invited Periton.
If he finds out that Henri is not here-
- He will know that he has gone to London.
- Exactly! We must see Lili.
- At once.
- At once.
- There is but one thing to do. Lili must-
- Call off the reception.
- No, that would be even-
- Worse.
- But she must make some-
- Could I see Madame Duran?
- May I tell madame who's calling?
- Oh, sure.
- Tell her Jack Martin.
- Who?
Jack Martin.
She left her cigarette case at the Cote d'Azur. I'd like to return it.
- I will see that madame gets it.
- Well, I'd kind of like to give it to her myself.
- I had a pretty tough time getting this back.
- Very well.
- There's the actor.
- The one who impersonated Henri.
- Are you thinking-
- What I am thinking?
- Will it work?
- What have we got to lose?
Nothing.
It will be simple, monsieur.
You just act gracious and charming.
- I don't know.
- We will be right beside you.
- We will not leave you for a moment.
- There. A perfect fit.
- Like it was made for you.
- And think, monsieur.
Half a million francs for one night's work.
- All right. I'll do it.
- Wonderful!
On two conditions. First, that I get half the money in advance.
- Yes, yes!
- Agreed.
And second, Madame Duran is not to know
I'm impersonating her husband.
- That is impossible.
- We will have to tell her.
- I'm sorry, gentlemen. Those are my conditions.
- No, wait.
- Why not tell her?
- Because I'd get stage fright, that's why.
I couldn't give a good performance if I thought she was laughing at me.
I just couldn't go through with it if she knew.
- If we must agree-
- We must.
- That I insist upon. Okay?
- Okay.
- Okay. You got a deal.
- There are certain things you should know.
- Like what?
- Your wife's name is Lili.
Oh, yes, I know. Lili.
- That's a lovely name, isn't it?
- The butler is Antoine.
The gardener's name is Emile.
- Your chef is Monsieur Popoliniere.
- Who?
- Popoliniere.
- Popoliniere?
Yes. Your pilot's name is Georges.
Your wife's maid is Michele.
- Michele.
- She is rather pretty and a trifle forward.
Forward? How far forward?
You joke with her occasionally.
Sometimes you pinch her cheek.
- Her, uh, cheek.
- Cheek.
- Can you remember all that?
- What, learn a few names?
Gentlemen, that's my business.
I'm supposed to be an actor.
My name is Henri. 
My wife is Lili.
You are Philippe and Louis.
The butler's Antoine.
The gardener is Emile.
The chef is Monsieur... Popoliniere.
- Good!
- The maid is Michele. I joke with her.
- And occasionally I pinch her cheek.
- Cheek.
Bravo. Bravo.
Hey, about this Felix, this Periton-
- You'll point him out to me?
- The moment he arrives.
- Ah, and what do I say to him?
- Nothing!
- You must say nothing.
- Nothing?
What am I supposed to do, stand around with egg on my face?
- I have it. Henri has a trick.
- Oh, good.
When he does not understand something or does not wish to answer... he taps his fingertips together so, looks down his nose and says, "Hmm."
You see the beauty of it? He says nothing.
He commits himself to nothing.
He does not understand a word, but he looks very wise.
Hmm. Say, that's a pretty good piece of business.
- I think I may be able to use that in my act.
- Yes, you could.
- No. That is not a closet. That leads to Lili's room.
- Oh, really?
- One moment, monsieur.
- Oh, monsieur.
You and your wife are on very formal terms.
- Very formal.
- You're kidding.
- What's the matter with him?
- Nothing.
- Doesn't she like him?
- She's crazy for him.
- Well?
- To Henri, the grass is always greener-
- The sky is always bluer-
- The tomatoes are always juicier-
In somebody else's garden.
You understand, monsieur.
- Hmm.
- Good! Good!
- Albert will take you to your table.
- We will see you out there?
- Fine.
- Please, Lili, please!
Our whole future depends on it.
No. Of course I won't.
It's ridiculous!
- Just for these few hours!
- But why should I pretend that I don't know?
Because this actor, this Martin, insists upon it.
Don't you see, Lili? If he thinks you don't suspect, it will give him-
Confidence! Make him feel that he really is Henri.
- That's what I'm afraid of.
- Lili, you have nothing to fear.
We have explained that you and Henri are on very formal terms.
Oh, thank you. Thank you very much.
As soon as the party is over, he is to go home. He understands that.
If he does not go, we will not pay him the other half of the money.
No! It's impossible. Ah, Suzanne!
- Good evening. How are you?
- Ah, Pierre.
- Good evening, Capitaine.
- Good evening, uh, Michele.
- Oh, Michele.
- Yes, Capitaine?
Thank you, Capitaine.
- Not at all, my dear.
 It's my pleasure.
Please, Lili, if you refuse, it means the end.
- Oh!
- Oh, Lili, you are young and beautiful.
- But Louis and I, we are old-
- And broken.
- Shh.
- Good evening, my dear.
- Good evening, Henri.
I, uh, trust the arrangements for tonight have been managed... without too much difficulty for you.
So far everything seems to be proceeding nicely.
Good, good.
The champagne is properly iced and the birds are properly cooked?
I basted them myself.
Hmm. I am looking forward to a wonderful party this evening.
What entertainment have you planned for our guests, Lili?
- Entertainment?
- Yes.
I did have a dreadful disappointment.
I meant to tell you about it earlier.
Really? What is it, my dear?
Well, I tried to get that, um- that performer that they have at the Cote d'Azur.
- What's his name again?
- Oh, Jack- [ French Accent ]
Uh, Jack Martin?
Yes, yes. That's the one.
Yes, he's very good. I liked him.
Yes, I thought you did.
That's why I tried to get him, of course.
I'm sure if he had known you wanted him, he would have been delighted to come to you.
- Do you really think so, Henri?
- I am positive.
Uh, shall we dance?
Why, Henri, I thought you detested dancing.
I do? Oh, I do.
I do, but, uh, anything to be near you, my dear.
- How nice.
- Not at all.
Pardon.
- Well, so far, so good.
- Yes. Yes.
What are we so happy about?
Who has he fooled? She knows who he is.
- But he does not know that she knows, so-
- So she has fooled him.
Exactly.
Lili, this is a lovely party.
I must compliment you, my dear.
Why, Henri, you have changed.
- Have I?
- Yes.
Once you would have said to me,
"Parties are so dull.
Let's run away from all our guests, just you and I, and-"
- And what?
- Henri!
- Come in!
- Where is Jack?
Don't talk to me about Jack!
I hate him!
But where is he?
He's not in his dressing room.
Monsieur Gapeaux, what's wrong with me?
Nothing! Nothing shows.
That's it! Nothing shows.
Well, I'll fix that!
But you haven't answered me.
Where is Monsieur Martin?
He's not going to be here tonight.
- He sent word that he's indisposed.
- Indisposed?
- Oh!
- But the broadcast- the television broadcast!
- I've made all the arrangements.
- Television?
What are you talking about?
Jack is such a success, the television people want to put him on the air tonight... and I said yes.
- Now, where is he?
- You find out and tell me!
I'll go there and break his head!
If he does not show up tonight, he is through!
He will never work in another nightclub in France, on the continent.
I have friends. I will finish him!
Good!
- Now tell me nothing shows.
- Oh!
- We will put you on the television.
- No.
But you will be a sensation.
With that neckline, you will be the Faye Emerson of France.
- I said no.
- Where are you going that you got so undressed?
To the villa of Capitaine Henri Duran.
My dear Jack is going to find out he's not the only one who can get himself "indisposed."
Madame Charlier looks lovely this evening, doesn't she?
- Madame Charlier?
- Yes, the woman over there wearing the diamond choker.
- Oh.
- Why, Henri, since when have you been wearing glasses?
Glasses? Uh, glass- Oh!
Uh, since the flight.
Yes, since the flight.
We were flying over the polar cap, and the glare was blinding.
- Absolutely blinding.
- Oh.
These are the price of adventure, my dear.
- Oh, Louise. How nice to see you.
- Lili, darling.
- Henri.
- Charmed, madame, I'm sure.
Isn't he formal tonight?
You old fox. Don't you remember Antibes?
Uh, oh, yes, of course.
Uh, Antibes. Hmm.
I thought you would.
I'll see you later, darling?
Yes, Louise.
Henri, what happened at Antibes?
Lili, would you believe me if I told you I didn't remember?
Yes, indeed, I would.
Oh, the Peritons.
Madeleine, I'm so glad you could come.
- I'm very happy to be here, Lili.
- You are beautiful as always.
- Henri.
- Good evening.
- Henri.
- How are you, uh, Felix?
- Delighted to see you.
- Thank you.
- And surprised. I rather thought you'd be in London.
- London?
What could I do in London that I cannot do here?
- You could be seeing Sir Hubert Canon.
- Shh!
Oh, yes, Sir Hubert.
He's a charming fellow, but hardly worth a trip to London.
Lili, why don't we invite Sir Hubert down for a weekend soon?
- Oh, but, Henri, he's so dull.
- Oh, no, not really.
It's only the way he talks.
Jolly good hunting yesterday.
Caught three rabbits and the upstairs maid.
- You two seem very happy.
- Why not, Felix?
- Yes.
- Henri, perhaps you could spare me a few moments.
- Yes?
That little business matter-
I'd like to discuss it with you.
- Business matter?
- Yes. You know what I mean, of course.
- Uh, hmm.
- Henri!
Pardon. You must come at once- the telephone.
- The air ministry.
- Air ministry?
- About the planes.
- Oh, good, good.
- The planes?
- Yes. Will you excuse us, Felix?
I'll take it in there.
- What did he want?
- Something about business.
- He wants to see me alone.
- Do not! Whatever you do-
- Do not let him see you alone.
- Suppose he corners me.
- What do I do?
- Radiate confidence.
- Be very sure of yourself.
- But do not say a word.
And another thing, with Madame Duran-
- You are being much too attentive.
- What?
- Everyone will know-
- That you are not Henri.
- You may pay attention to all the other women at the party.
- But not Lili.
Look, I thought I was giving an inspired performance. If you want a run-of-the-mill-
- You understand. It is dangerous-
Pardon me, Capitaine.
Could I speak with you for a moment?
- Certainly, Antoine.
- In private.
Oh. Excuse me, gentlemen.
- What is it?
- There's a young lady to see you, Capitaine.
- I showed her into the library.
- Uh- Well, do I know her?
I do my best to keep track, Capitaine, but this is one I have never seen before.
Uh, it's a little difficult for me to see her now.
- Why don't you send her away?
- I'm afraid that's easier said than done, Capitaine.
She's quite persistent and might make a most unpleasant scene.
- Ah!
- If I might suggest, you are most adept in such matters.
I am? Oh, yes, of course I am, but-
I have never been in the service of any gentleman who could handle them as well... coming and going.
Thank you, Antoine. I will see her.
Thank you, Capitaine.
Di- Uh-
I- Good evening, mademoiselle.
Capitaine Duran, are you surprised to see me?
Surprised?
I am delighted, astonished.
But you invited me.
Or did I misunderstand you?
No. No.
It's just that I thought you had given your heart to that young American.
- Martin?
- Yes, he is such a handsome, such a gifted, such a-
Such a big, ugly pig!
But, mademoiselle,
I have always found him charming.
- You don't know him.
- Ah, you are angry.
That is why you have come to see me- because you are angry with him.
Why do you keep talking about him?
I have a very good reason.
You see, my wife and he-
- No!
- Yes.
She is very attracted to him.
- She is?
- Yes.
And he's attracted to her? Yes?
I'm afraid so.
- There's only one thing we can do, mademoiselle.
- What?
We must, uh, console each other.
- This is our vengeance.
- Please, Capitaine.
Uh-huh. I was right.
You do belong to Martin.
I belong to no one but myself.
It's just that you- you go too quickly.
Very well, my dear.
I will not frighten you.
We have the whole night before us.
What a beautiful home you have, Capitaine.
- What lovely pictures.
- I'm glad you like them.
This one- those little dogs, they are adorable.
Yes. I raised those puppies myself.
I can hardly believe it, Capitaine.
With all these lovely women, do you really care for me?
My angel, I cannot tell you what you do to me.
Just looking at you is like a tonic.
Yes, Capitaine Duran. You and I.
- Our vengeance will really be sweet.
- Darling.
- What was that for?
- You pig! I knew it was you all the time.
You did, huh? You did not.
You thought I was Duran.
And you thought they were puppies.
Well, take a look.
They are horses.
Horses as big as a house.
You thought you were going places.
You came here to throw yourself into his arms.
What are you doing here?
You came here because of that woman.
- She doesn't even know who I am.
- You don't fool me.
- You don't care about me anymore.
- Stop screaming and listen to me!
They're paying me a half a million francs for this.
And who am I gonna spend it on? You.
- Half of a million francs?
- Yes.
Oh, baby, I'm sorry. Television.
- Jack, the television.
- What television?
Gapeaux made arrangements for you to be on television tonight and you're not there.
- Why didn't he tell me?
- It all happened today.
He has been looking for you.
Jack, he's furious. He said if you're not there, you'll never work again.
Oh, it was the chance of a lifetime too.
- I'll make it.
- But how?
I'll get there somehow.
You go back to the theater.
Tell Gapeaux I'll be there, not to cancel the show.
- If necessary, you go on first.
You better go out this way.
- All right, baby, but hurry.
- I will. I'll get there as quick as I can.
- Kiss me.
- I would still like to meet this Capitaine Duran.
- Oh, come on.
- Ah, Henri. I have caught you at last.
- Uh, caught me?
Yes, I thought perhaps if we could step into the library... we might have our little business talk now.
Business talk at a party?
Oh, Felix, you surprise me.
Look, my friend. It is not that important.
We will talk tomorrow.
Not important? Henri, sometimes
I do not understand you.
Hmm. Now, Felix, if you will excuse me, I must see Lili.
At the casino, really?
Oh, please sit down.
With your luck, I can understand it.
- Pardon. Lili, may I speak with you for a moment?
- Of course.
- You will excuse us?
- Excuse me.
Henri, what is it?
Is anything wrong?
No, no, my dear. It's just that, well, you may not see me for a little while.
- Why not?
- Felix persists in talking business.
- And you want to keep out of his way?
- Exactly.
And remember, you promised me another dance.
I'll be waiting.
Henri.
Oh, Henri, I have missed you so.
-  I- I've missed you too.
- Where can we go?
Uh, well, really, just now
I cannot go anyplace. I- I have to leave-
- You are putting me off. I can hear it in your voice.
- You-You can? 
You are not going to drop me like you dropped all the others.
- No?
- No, not after all the promises you made.
Oh. Well, I promise to keep those promises, every one.
- But later. Really, right now
I must be leaving at once.
- But, Henri.
I will be back.
You wait for me right here.
Will you? Hmm?
What a man.
Where does he find the time?
Ah, where is Henri?
Henri? I saw him a moment ago.
He is with Lili, I suppose.
- Dancing, drinking, enjoying himself.
- He's not with Lili.
Oh, well, you know Henri.
He may be busy elsewhere.
You all seem to be in very good spirits this evening.
- And why not?
- Yes. Is this not an occasion to be gay?
Perhaps. And perhaps it is just a front for my benefit.
Oh, nonsense.
- Then why is Henri afraid to talk to me?
- Afraid?
- Ridiculous.
- Oh, Felix, Madame Cornet wants to see the television.
Yes, that actor at the Cote d'Azur is on.
The one who does the marvelous imitation of Henri.
- He is supposed to be on now?
- Yes, I read it in the Eclaireur.
- This is not possible.
- Why not?
Of course it is possible.
He could be wrong.
- But he is very bad.
- I hear he's excellent.
Who could have told you that?
He is terrible.
Well, I want to see him anyway.
Come along, Felix, or we will miss it.
- What are we going to do?
- Why worry? How can there be a show?
Martin cannot be in two places at once.
But if Periton finds out that Martin is not at the theater, he'll put two and two together.
- He is no fool.
- He's not that clever.
What do you mean, "He's not that clever"?
Who has all the money, you or he?
He. You are right.
We must stop them.
- That cannot be the right station.
- Try another.
- No, no. That boy is magnificent. Leave it on.
I've been reading about this child. He is a genius.
Yes, the greatest violinist since Paganini.
That may be. But to me, he's terrible.
Let me get the right station-
Please, I'll do it. These things, you know, they are very complicated.
Allow me.
This special program from the stage of the Cote d'Azur of Monte Carlo.
There you are.
Moo. Oink.
Very good. But I thought
Henri was going to-
- Where is Henri?
- Shh. He's going to do Henri now.
- So, he fooled everyone, did he?
- Yes, but what about you, Henri?
Did you see Sir Hubert?
I went only as far as Paris. I called him on the telephone while we were refueling.
He knew what I wanted.
Periton had seen to that.
He was polite, but he said it was impossible to see me.
So I turned around and flew back.
What are you going to say to Felix?
That depends entirely on what Felix has to say to me. He has the upper hand now.
- By the way, did Lili know it was Martin?
- Of course.
- She has been an angel. Such a display of affection.
- Such a performance.
You're certain it was a performance?
Oh, Henri, that is not important now.
You must think of Periton.
He has been trying to see you all evening.
Very well, I will speak to him.
But I'm afraid that all I can do is plead for more time.
- I think, Louis, that we have come to-
- To the end of our rope.
Why, Henri. You didn't disappear for so long after all.
- Lili.
- Henri.
You've been so affectionate this evening.
- Have I?
- Yes. Just like a schoolboy with his first crush.
- Oh.
- But I like it.
Hmm, may I say, Lili, that you are looking very lovely tonight?
- Or have I said that before?
- Several times.
Now come along. You promised to dance with me again, remember?
Yes, I forgot.
- Hi.
- Jack, wait a minute.
- Where are you going?
- I have to get back to the party.
No, you're not going back to that woman!
- Well, I've gotta finish the job.
- It's not the job.
- You're going back because of her.
- Oh, Colette.
You told me yourself she was beautiful.
Everybody knows her husband doesn't even look at her. So now she wants you, eh?
- Now don't you talk that way about her. She's a lady.
- Oh!
- And I'm not.
- Nobody said you weren't.
It's true. You've really fallen in love with her.
Colette, don't be silly.
I'll see you tomorrow morning at rehearsal.
Colette, don't be silly.
I'll see you tomorrow morning at rehearsal.
If you go back to that woman, you'll never see me at rehearsal tomorrow morning or ever again.
- Would you stop-
- I mean it!
Close the door.
Nothing but champagne.
If I don't have a real drink, I will go crazy.
I think I will go crazy anyway.
- Fix me one too, a stiff one.
Gentlemen, I am leaving.
- Leaving?
- But Felix, why?
I have found out what I wanted to know.
- But you have not talked with Henri.
- Exactly.
He continues to avoid me. And why?
Because he has failed to get the money.
- That is why.
- You're jumping to conclusions.
- That is not true at all.
- Just wait here. We will get Henri.
- He will convince you.
- Can we fix you a drink?
- I do not want a drink.
- Please, Felix, relax.
I will wait exactly one minute.
- We will get Henri.
- Right away.
- Relax.
- Don't go away.
Have you seen Felix?
I've been looking everywhere-
- He is in the library.
- He is very disturbed.
- If he does not see you at once, he threatens to leave.
- Just a moment.
- Has something happened that I do not know about?
- No.
- Why?
- If he holds all the trump cards, why does he not leave?
Why does he have to see me?
There must be something to our advantage that we do not know about.
- What?
- I do not know. But I shall behave as if I do.
And you two, stay away. One look at your faces, and our credit will be zero.
Credit- What is it now?
Ah, Felix, I'm sorry to have neglected you.
What is it you wish to see me about?
- Henri, you astonish me. Such confidence.
- Why not?
Because I have you blocked at every turn.
You are entirely at my mercy.
I know everything there is to know about you.
Except one thing:
That telephone call.
Which one, Felix?
I receive so many, you know.
The one from the air ministry.
What did they want?
You surprise me. Really, Felix.
I thought you knew everything there is to know about me.
- Henri, we have been friends for many years.
- Yes.
Tell me what the air ministry offered.
I'm afraid I cannot do that, Felix.
Then I'll call them myself and find out.
You do that, and all negotiations are off.
Now, Henri, let us not be too hasty.
I, hasty? Who sent a telegram canceling Air Europa's contract for our planes?
- My telegram canceled nothing.
- Well, that is hardly debatable, Felix.
It is a simple matter of record.
I have the telegram right in my office.
I would certainly like to see such a telegram.
I'll be very happy to get it and show it to you.
- Oh, Capitaine.
- Yes, Antoine?
- That young lady you told to wait on the terrace-
- What? Oh, yes.
No, sir. She's no longer there.
She became quite impatient, so I put her in the upstairs sitting room. She is furious.
Ah. Well, uh, you speak to her.
I'm afraid that would do no good, Capitaine.
If I may say so, once they have met you... it seems to spoil them for anyone else.
I suppose that is true.
- Very well, I will see her.
- Thank you, Capitaine.
Oh, Henri.
I'm sorry I lost my temper.
We will forget about the telegram.
- And we will talk things over like friends.
- Yes, but, uh-
I know, I know.
I perhaps did say that in the telegram.
But it is of no consequence at all.
Henri, you do not understand me.
- And I do not understand you.
- What could be fairer than that?
But you are acting so strangely.
I'm beginning to think you do not care.
- There is no need to worry.
- Henri will be-
Look, that actor. He's back.
- Oh, if Periton sees him-
- It will spoil everything.
We've got to get him out of here.
- What are you doing? Go away.
- Far away.
- What is the matter with you?
- We do not need you any longer.
- Duran is back.
- Duran, Duran. I am Duran.
- You're-
- Certainly. I do not know how, but Martin is in there.
- Martin? But he's at the theater.
- I tell you he is in there.
Then you cannot stay here, Henri.
Where shall I go, to his nightclub and do his act?
It will be all right if you two go into the office.
- "It will be all right."
- Do not worry. He has been told not to commit himself.
I will wait out here.
- Hmm.
- Will you please stop doing that?
It is driving me mad. Say something.
- Felix.
- Yes?
Have a cigar.
Bonbons. I never know where anything is in this house anymore.
Oh, please, Henri. Let's come down to business.
What about the telephone?
- Telephone?
- Yes, the telephone.
- Felix, I have a confession to make.
- Ah.
I do not know where the telephone is either.
Always redecorating.
Always something new.
I go around the world in two days.
I arrive back, Lili has changed everything.
Henri, something has happened to you.
Your trip- you should take a vacation.
Really, Felix? Where do you think
I should go at this time of year?
Well, at this time of year,
I think a cruise on your boat would be-
How did we come to talk about this?
How did we come to talk about this? Let me see.
I was doing this and you said
I should stop because it was driving you crazy.
Then I offered you a cigar, but it turned out to be bonbons.
I said, "I never know where anything is in this house anymore."
You said, "What about the telephone?"
I said, "I do not know"-
All right, Henri. I see your game.
You're fencing for time.
- So?
- You do not wish to make a deal tonight... because tomorrow, you will make a better deal with the air ministry, is that not true?
Hmm.
I wish I knew what you are thinking.
But I cannot afford to take a chance.
Air Europa must have those planes.
My first and last offer,
20 billion francs.
- 20 billion-
- Shh.
- 20 billion francs.
- Hmm.
Very well, then. 25 billion.
Hmm.
- What has happened?
- I do not know. They are still in there.
Stay inside. I will let you know.
I have to find my wife.
- What did he say?
- He said he had to find his wife.
- No. What did he say in there?
- I don't know. I think that guy is wacky.
And I'm not so sure about you either.
- You must go away from here at once. Duran has returned.
- He has?
Yes. Here's the rest of your money.
Go out through the library.
Wait a minute.
What about my clothes upstairs?
You can get everything tomorrow, but go, please, and quick.
- Our friend has finally gone.
- Good. What has happened?
- I don't know nothing. I think this Martin is wacky.
- At least he is gone.
If I only knew what I said in there,
I'd be much happier.
Mimi, I'm delighted-
Oh, this Martin.
Mimi has never slapped anybody before.
Perhaps he should have paid us for tonight's work.
- Good night, Henri.
- Good night, Madeleine.
- Lovely evening.
- Thank you. Felix.
I meant every word I said, Henri.
And when I see you tomorrow,
I will prove it to you. Good night.
- Good night, Felix.
- Good night, gentlemen.
Good night.
See me tomorrow?
What did he mean by that?
- Just what he said.
- He will see you tomorrow.
Ah, no. There was something underneath it.
Do you think that Martin gave the whole thing away?
How could he?
He did not know anything.
- He knew how to fascinate Lili.
- He certainly did.
You, uh, have not told Lili I am back?
No, you are still in London as far as she's concerned.
Then I am still in London as far as you are concerned.
I think I will be Monsieur Martin till the party is over... and even afterwards perhaps.
- It must be very bad.
- Asking us to rush out to the boat like this.
- Yes?
- Bad news?
- From Periton?
- Something far more tragic.
- More tragic?
- Good heavens. What?
- I have lost everything.
- Tell us, Henri. Tell us.
- It's Lili. She has betrayed me.
- Last night she was in the arms of another man.
- Oh, I don't believe it.
- How do you know?
- How do I know? I was there.
- You mean you actually-
- Yes. I wish I could say no.
- Poor Henri. Who was the man?
- I was.
- Perhaps we did not understand.
- Of course not. How could you understand?
You cannot imagine such an experience.
Last night I went to her room.
I took her in my arms and kissed her tenderly... hoping against hope she would rebuff me.
But she did not. She kissed me eagerly, fiercely. It was horrible.
- What's horrible about a wife kissing-
- Her own husband?
She was not kissing her husband. She thought
I was Martin. She thought she was kissing him.
But she wasn't kissing him.
She was kissing you.
- So she was the one who was fooled.
- That is not the point.
Last night, with him- with me- she was a completely different woman than she ever was with me.
I've been such a fool.
I never realized how wonderful she is until now.
Now it is too late.
She's in love with that actor.
There's nothing I can do about it.
I cannot even blame Martin for what he did, because he did not do it.
I did it myself.
You have certainly placed yourself in an embarrassing position.
It's horrible.
That's why I sent for you.
I cannot go back to the villa.
I-I could not face her. I'm sailing in an hour.
- But what about our company?
- What about Periton?
That is your affair.
I am no longer interested in anything.
Oh, Henri. It is impossible.
I do not believe Lili would do such a thing.
- Why not?
- Every man in France has tried to make love to Lili and failed.
There was never any other man for Lili but you.
She knew it was you last night.
All the time.
Of course she did.
She just wanted to teach you a lesson.
You think so?
- Knowing Lili, it is obvious.
- Think about it.
I wonder.
She did act rather strangely last night.
At first, uh, she was quite angry.
Then suddenly, she changed.
- That was the moment she discovered it was you.
- Definitely.
Right now, she's probably laughing her head off.
- And I have been worrying about nothing.
- Of course.
Then perhaps it is time
I gave her something to worry about.
- Come, my friends. I will telephone to shore.
- What for?
First I shall call the airport, then my wife.
- Come in.
- Good morning, madame.
- Good morning, Antoine. Isn't it a lovely day?
Yes, madame. The capitaine would like to speak with you.
- Why doesn't he come in?
- He's on the telephone, madame.
The telephone?
Here. Take this, Antoine.
Hello, Henri.
You might at least have come in and said good morning to me before you left.
- Where are you anyway?
- I'm here at the airport, my dear.
I'm sorry I could not get home for the reception last night... but, uh, we ran into bad weather and we were forced down.
You mean you've just arrived?
You weren't at home last night?
No, of course not, my dear.
Why? Did something happen?
Oh, no, Henri.
No, nothing happened, nothing at all.
Didn't you sleep well?
Oh, yes, I- I didn't even take a pill. Oh, my.
You sound upset, my dear.
Oh, no, Henri. It's nothing.
Good. I'm glad to hear that.
I will be home in a little while.
Good-bye, my dear.
Oh, no. It- It couldn't have been.
- Madame?
Michele, ask Antoine to come in, please. Quickly.
Yes, madame.
Hello. Is this the airport?
Control tower, please.
Hello, this is Madame Duran.
Would you please tell me what time Capitaine Duran's plane landed?
Just a minute, madame.
It's Duran's wife. She's checking up on him.
- What will I tell her?
- Duran told us to say his plane got in this morning at 11:28.
Where do you suppose he spent the night?
Hello, madame?
According to our records, Capitaine Duran's plane landed at 11:28 this morning.
This morning? Are you sure?
Well, thank you.
Thank you very much.
- Madame wishes to see me?
- Yes, Antoine. Did you see
Capitaine Duran this morning?
Of course, madame.
I laid out his clothes, as usual.
Did you notice anything- anything different about him?
I mean, did he act strangely in any way?
If you please, madame.
I would rather not discuss it.
- Oh, but you must. What happened?
- Very well, madame.
I've been in service for many years.
Now, I don't look down upon my position.
I consider it an honorable and dignified calling.
If more people took their jobs as seriously as I do... the world wouldn't be in the hideous mess it's in today.
Yes, yes, Antoine.
What did the capitaine do?
He was extraordinarily rude to me.
He didn't shower. He didn't shave.
He didn't eat his breakfast.
And to top it all, he completely disregarded my selection... and left wearing a blue suit with a green tie.
Why, I shall be the laughingstock of the Riviera.
I've never known the capitaine to behave in this fashion before.
- Oh.
- It was almost as if he were another man.
Oh. Oh, I'm sorry, Antoine.
So am I, madame. But it's a situation for which there's no solution.
If he apologizes, it will destroy our relationship completely.
Then I would have to leave.
Will that be all, madame?
Yes, yes, Antoine. Thank you.
By now, she has telephoned the airport.
- I will give her five minutes more.
- But Periton.
They have verified my story, and the horrible truth is beginning to dawn on her.
Don't you think we ought to find out what Periton is going to do?
She has called in
Michele and Antoine... and they have confirmed her worst fears.
There's no longer room for any doubt.
She can barely face the realization of what she has done.
- But, Henri-
- It will take me about half an hour to get ashore... and drive up to the villa.
The bad news.
- Good morning, gentlemen.
- Good morning.
I'm glad I found all three of you together.
I've been looking for you all morning.
- Well, you have found us.
- They told me at the club you had come out here.
I was afraid you'd sail without my seeing you.
Perhaps that would have been just as well.
One would almost think you did not want to see me.
- Well, did we?
- Didn't you tell them?
- What was there to tell?
- About our conference last night, of course.
Oh, yes, of course I told them.
- And you told them the terms?
- Mmm, yes, in a general way.
- Then why are they acting so gloomy?
- Why, indeed?
- You do not act very cheerful yourself.
- Cheerful? Why should I?
Oh, Henri, you're an amazing man.
- I bring you a check for 30 billion francs-
- 30 billion francs?
- You sound surprised.
- Well, I am.
I, uh- I am surprised that you got it so quickly.
I'm a man of my word. I told you last night
I would bring you the check this morning.
- And there it is.
- Yes, there it is.
I have always said you had the shrewdest business mind in Europe, Henri.
- Last night, you proved it.
- You give me too much credit, Felix.
- No, you held a trump card, and you played it like a master.
- Thank you very much, Felix.
I'm sorry I cannot ask you to stay, but Lili is not feeling very well just now.
- I must get back to the villa.
- I'm sorry to hear that.
I'll take you back in my launch.
- That's very kind of you, Felix.
I'll be with you in a minute.
- Gentlemen.
30 billion francs!
We are saved!
We are solvent! We are rich!
- Thanks to Monsieur Martin.
- Yes.
He seems to have played my part almost as well as I have played his.
- Oh, good morning.
- What are you doing here?
- Came to get my clothes.
- How did you get in?
Sneaked in through the library.
Oh, don't worry. Nobody saw me.
- I'm surprised you have the gall to face me.
- Why not?
What you did last night was utterly contemptible.
You knew I thought you were my husband.
- Sure, I did. We had a lot of fun, didn't we?
- Fun?
Yeah. You know, I wasn't too keen about it at first.
But when I realized the situation, you know, with the captain gone...
- and how desperate you were.
- Really?
- Oh, I'm not saying I can't use the money.
- Oh.
- And I was wondering if I could ask you a favor.
- What kind of a favor?
Well, if it isn't too much trouble,
I'd like a letter of recommendation.
- Recommendation? After what you did?
- Yeah.
What's the matter with what I did?
Didn't you like my performance?
- I certainly did not.
- Well, I'd like to know anyone who could've done better.
- Oh, you vulgar, insufferable-
- Wait a minute.
If you weren't satisfied, why didn't you tell me before this?
Because your performance was too good.
I don't mind saying you gave a pretty good performance yourself.
Will you get out of here, you conceited-
It's not conceit. I did a good job last night.
And I'm proud of it. That's all.
I just thought you might know some other homes where I could do the same thing.
- My charges would be very reasonable.
- Monsieur Martin.
- I must ask you to leave.
- Okay.
But if the captain's ever away again,
I'll be very happy to oblige.
Is that why you came here?
To make cheap, disgusting-
No, I told you why I came.
I came to get my clothes.
Why didn't you take them when you left this morning?
- What?
- Why didn't you take your clothes when you left this morning?
Left this morning? I left last night.
- You left last night?
- Sure. Soon as I found out the captain was back...
I beat it out of here as fast as I could.
Then the capitaine was here last night.
- Sure, he was. Didn't you see him?
- Oh, yes.
Yes, of course I did.
Oh, thank you. Thank you very much.
I- I can't tell you how relieved I am.
I'm delighted you came back this morning.
I don't get it. You certainly haven't been acting that way.
Oh, I am sorry. I'm afraid I was confused.
But I'm not anymore.
It's all very clear to me now.
Jack, I wonder, would you do me an enormous favor?
- Sure, anything.
- But we must act quickly, before my husband gets here.
- Okay.
- Now-
Well, Monsieur Martin.
Uh, good morning, Captain.
Good morning.
I'm, uh- I'm delighted to find you here.
- You are?
- Yes.
I want to thank you for what you did for me last night.
I'm sending you a check in the morning which will express my gratitude more fully.
Well, thanks, Captain.
I sure can use it. By the way, what did I do?
You made a great financial deal for me.
What did you say to Periton?
Oh. I said, uh, "Hmm."
- Oh, that.
- Yeah.
- I was told you always use it.
- But never with such success.
Look, Captain. I don't know how to say this.
It's really none of my business.
But you're making a great mistake.
- I am? How?
- Your wife. She's wonderful.
Believe me, she's got everything, everything a man could ask for.
- I found that out.
- You know, she's so crazy about you... she just tried to talk me into making you jealous.
- You were supposed to come up and find her in my arms.
- Oh?
Why don't you quit playing the field and concentrate on her?
- You're right, my friend.
- Now will you go up? She's waiting for you.
Monsieur Martin... will you and your charming Colette have dinner with us tonight?
We will come to the show and afterward, the four of us will have a big celebration.
- I wish we could, but, uh,
I don't know where Colette is.
- No?
No, she walked out on me.
She didn't understand about last night.
- Oh, I am very sorry.
- So am I.
- Is there anything I can do?
- No. No, I'm afraid not.
- Wait a minute. You could do me one favor.
- Anything.
- Tell me, Captain. What's your secret?
- Secret?
Yeah. Let's face it. We do resemble each other.
We proved that last night.
But when women look at you, they- Well, you know.
And when they look at me, they run for the nearest exit.
What's your secret?
- Well, thank you, Captain.
- Not at all.
- Well, good-bye, Jack.
- Good-bye, Henri.
- Oh, Captain. Just one thing.
- Yes?
Make sure she knows it's you this time.
I don't wanna get in any more trouble.
Have no fear. She will know.
Whip crack away, whip crack away
Whip crack away
Whip crack away, whip crack away
Whip crack away
The Deadwood stage!
The Deadwood stage!
The Deadwood stage!
Oh, the Deadwood stage
Is a-rollin' on over the plains
With the curtains flappin'
And the driver slappin' the reins
A beautiful sky
A wonderful day
Whip crack away, whip crack away
Whip crack away
Oh, the Deadwood stage
Is a-headin' on over the hills
Where the Injun arrows
Are thicker than porcupine quills
Dangerous land
No time to delay
So whip crack away, whip crack away
Whip crack away
We're headin' straight for town
Loaded down with a fancy cargo
Care of Wells and Fargo, Illinois
Boy
Oh, the Deadwood stage
Is a-comin' on over the crest
Like a homing pigeon
That's a-hankerin' after its nest
Twenty-three miles
We've covered today
So whip crack away, whip crack away
Whip crack away
The wheels go turnin' round, homeward bound
Can't you hear them humming
Happy times are coming for to stay Hey
We'll be home tonight
By the light of the silvery moon
And my heads a-thumpin'
Like a mandolin a-plunking a tune
When I get home
I'm fixing to stay
So whip crack away, whip crack-away
Whip crack-away
Whip crack away, whip crack away
Whip crack away
Here they be, here they be
How's about a welcome?
A peaceful sort of welcome for the gang
Oh, the Deadwood stage
Is finally home again
Well excuse my stammer
If it ain't Calamity Jane
Hi, Calam
- What'd you bring us today?
- New rubber boots?
- Ten-dollar suits?
- Things to crochet?
Beads that sparkle like a prism
Snake oil for your rheumatism
Calico and gingham for the girls
Gumdrops made in Chicago
Gumdrops just a trifle soggy
And a genuine string of artificial pearls
Here's a hat from Cincinnati
Same as Adelina Patti
Wore in every famous concert hall
Cast your eye on Dr. Boer's
Patent-pending hair restorer
Guaranteed to grow hair on a billiard ball
Introducin' Henry Miller
Just as busy as a fizzy sarsaparilla
Ain't a showman and he's smarter
Operates the Golden Garter
Where the cream of Deadwood City
Come to dine
And I'm glad to say
He's a very good friend of mine
Hi, Joe
Say, where'd you get them fancy clothes?
I know
Off some fellow's laundry line
Hi, Beau
Aren't you the Prairie Rose
Smelling like a watermelon vine
Here's a man the sheriff watches
On his gun
There's more then 27 notches
On the draw there's no one faster
And you're flirting with disaster
When Bill Hickok's reputation you malign
And I'm glad to say he's a very good friend,
Of a friend of mine
Oh, my throat's as dry
As a desert thistle in May
In the Golden Garter
Gonna wet my whistle today
Last to the bar's a three-legged crow
Set them up, Joe, set them up, Joe
Set them up, Joe
Drinks on the house, drinks on the house
Set them up, Joe
Make mine sarsaparilla.
It ain't so funny.
Any excitement on this trip, Calam?
Excitement.
Why, I got more arrows in the back of that coach than a porcupine's got stickers.
Seemed like the whole Sioux nation.
- Hey, where is that sarsaparilla?
- Here you are, Calam.
I'd like a little beer.
No, please. Don't. Don't!
Is there a woman in here?
No, sir. Just Indians.
Where is my actress?
Without warning, down they come out of them hills howling like souls in torment.
Why, must have been 100 of them.
It weren't no laughing matter.
Sure, it wasn't. I'd hate to have a war party that big on my tail.
You know, Bill, except for me, of course... you're the only galoot in the world could've brought that coach in.
Thanks, Calam.
Of course, it called for some mighty rapid shooting.
My gun got so hot, I had to sit with my legs stretched out... holding the muzzle of my gun between my feet to keep it from curling up.
Yeah, I must have killed about 30 of them painted varmints before they got discouraged.
I've got to see to the horses.
How many of them injuns you reckon I shot, Rattlesnake?
About 30, I reckon, Calam.
That's better. Next time I tell a story, keep your hands in your pockets... you toothless old buffalo.
Come and get them.
Who wants cigarettes? Just came in on the stage. A dollar a pack.
Look at them, snapping for them cigarettes like a bunch of silk-gloved dudes.
- Another dying Robert E. Lee.
- I got General Grant.
- Queen Victoria.
- Carnsarn boat again.
- Yippee! I got her. I got her.
- Let's see it.
I'll give you $5 for it.
I wouldn't take 50, because I'm keeping her close to my heart.
- What you suppose is getting into them?
- It's Adelaid, Calam. Adelaid.
What's an Adelaid?
She's a hope. A dream. A vision.
You see her carved on the prow of an ancient ship... in the dying embers of the camp fire.
Circe, Aphrodite, Helen of Troy.
In this case, it's Adelaid Adams.
You mean, all that in a pack of cigarettes?
Beautiful, ain't she?
She ain't got nothing on but her underwear.
Them's tights, Calam.
She's a great actress, so they tell me.
She's charming, lovely figure, everything that a woman ought to be.
Looks like a fat, frilled-up side of undressed beef to me.
I could look the same.
Except I got certain ideas about modesty.
Ain't one man wouldn't ride 100 miles just for one glimpse of Miss Adams.
You, maybe.
Some of that scum around here.
But a gentleman wouldn't look twice at such a picture.
Yeah. A gentleman like
Lieutenant Gilmartin for instance?
Yeah, now that you mention it.
Like Lieutenant Gilmartin.
You're kind of stuck on him, ain't you?
Ain't saying until he does.
Say, where's he been, anyway? I kind of thought maybe he'd be here to meet the stage.
Oh, he's on duty at the Fort, I guess.
Last time I saw him was a week ago.
He came in to buy a pack of them cigarettes.
Mr. Miller, please.
Nobody pays any attention to me.
Why should they?
Well, Mr. Miller, you're expecting me.
I'm Francis Fryer.
Where is my actress?
The one who wrote me the letter about my ad in the Chicago newspaper?
I hired her.
She's supposed to be here. Look.
I'm advertising her.
Oh. Well, that's me.
You're her?
No, I'm not her. You see, I'm...
Look. "Francis Fryer."
You're Francis Fryer?
You deceived me. You're fired.
No, you're not fired.
I've got to have somebody.
I'm ruined.
I advertised an actress. When that crowd sees you tonight, they'll lynch me.
Go hide in my office.
Tell us all about it.
What happened? Who got you?
Indians. War party.
There were five of us: Two surveyors and a lieutenant from the Fort.
They jumped us at Eagle Pass.
They killed the surveyors and the lieutenant.
- What lieutenant?
- Gilmallin, his name was.
- They got Danny Gilmartin?
- They got him, all right. The others too.
The rotten savages!
How did they get him? Quick?
Clean? In the heart?
- I reckon. Or in the head.
- Maybe both.
Don't you know?
They got him plenty.
They got him quick and fast.
His horse went down.
He died right where he fell.
Didn't you go back and find out for sure?
Go back? How in blazes could we go back?
They chased us for 10 miles, showering us with arrows.
You left him, didn't you?
You never went back to see if he was dead or alive.
You slab-sided, white-bellied coyotes.
You left Danny like I wouldn't leave a hurt dog!
- Calam, where are you going?
- To get Danny.
Let's go!
- Are you all right?
- Yeah. Just untie me.
Get on that horse.
Why do we have to ride the same horse?
We could've grabbed an Indian pony.
It's cozier this way.
What happened then, Calam?
I give him a bullet right between the eyeballs.
Then me and Danny lit out, two more of them coming after us.
I shot them both. Didn't I, Danny?
- Why... Well... Ahem.
- You killed four of them?
- That's all there were.
- You're the girl to do it too.
What's the matter with you?
Don't you believe me?
Oh, sure.
Only, with you killing off them redskins so fast...
I was wondering why the government even bothered to send the army.
Are you calling me a liar again?
Why don't you ever fix your hair?
Adelaid Adams! I got her! Look!
I didn't save you for no other female.
Gentlemen and... gentlemen.
In keeping with the policy of the Golden Garter... which strives to bring to Deadwood the best in entertainment... regardless of the expense... it is my great pleasure to present to you now... that lovely star, that toast of New York,
Miss Frances Fryer.
I can't.
I can't.
- Come on. Get out there.
- If I go on as a woman, they'll murder me.
If you don't, they'll murder you.
And me too. Now, get out there.
- Do you see what I see?
- She ain't very good-looking.
That ain't all she ain't.
I've got two wonderful arms
I've got two wonderful lips
I'm over 21 and I'm free
Oh, I've got a hive full of honey
For the right kind of honey bee
Psst.
I'm not the glamorous type
But I'm the amorous type
You'll love the way I fit on your knee
Oh, I've got a hive full of honey
For the right kind of honey bee
My daddy owns a rail road
And my ma is a millionaire
And besides, I'm an only child
Do you think you could learn to care?
If you're the one I adore
Come on and get it before
Somebody shakes it down from the tree.
I've got a hive full of honey
For the right kind of honey bee
I got two wonderful arms
I got two wonderful lips
I'm over 21 and I'm free
Oh, I've got a hive full of honey
For the right kind of honey bee
Miller is in for it now.
Please, everybody, I can explain.
I may have made a mistake about his gender... but not his talent. He's a great actor.
He's wonderful. If you'd give us a chance.
I'll make it up to you.
You'll have a good time.
Gosh, Bill, they're all walking out of here.
This will ruin Millie.
- Do something.
- Do what?
Listen to me!
Listen to me, you mangy groundhogs.
This ain't no way to treat Millie.
You wouldn't have a theater without him.
Can't a man make a mistake in this town?
We ain't suckers. He promised us a New York actress. Look what we got!
Yeah!
- You got what he got!
- We don't want it. No, we don't want it!
Wait a minute!
He knows how disappointed you are.
Give him a chance and he'll make it up.
- Won't you, Millie?
- Sure. Anything.
He fooled us once, and he'll fool us again.
Millie won't do nothing for us.
He will. He'll get you an actress prettier than the one you expected.
- Why, he's written for her already.
- What actress? Who's he going to get?
A big one. A plumb big one.
Who, Calam? Tell us who.
We'd like to know who she is.
Adelaid Adams, that's who!
It sounds too good to be true, but it better be.
You've got Calamity Jane's word on it.
Get back to your tables, you coyotes.
Enjoy the show!
I'll make this all up to you.
Mr. Miller, Adelaid Adams is in Chicago.
She wouldn't be caught dead in this town.
I think I'll take a long walk off a short precipice.
Look, I figure...
My death warrant, she signed.
Adelaid Adams.
If you'd only promised them any other actress.
- I don't know no other actress.
- That's why they call her "Calamity."
Listen, you two-bit gambler...
I didn't see you come up with an idea when the chips were down.
At least you've still got a theater.
What stops you getting this Adelaid?
This joint's the biggest goldmine in Deadwood. You can afford it.
- Why don't you send for her?
- Why don't I send for the Queen of Sheba?
Yeah.
No good. They want Adelaid.
Look, nothing is impossible for Calamity.
Didn't she save the stage from 100 savage injuns?
Didn't she rescue her pretty lieutenant from a fate worse than death?
Besides, she gave the boys her word that Adelaid would be here.
Calamity's word is sacred.
Bill.
- You really have that much faith in me?
- Who knows you better than me?
You think I could go to Chicago and bring Adelaid Adams back here?
You gave your word, and I trust that.
About as much as I do a blind rattlesnake with a brand new button on his tail.
Hey, wait a minute.
- Aw, you no good four-flushing...
- You talk too much.
In the summer you're the winter
In the finger you're the splinter
In the banquet you're the stew
Say, I could do without you
In the garden you're the gopher
In the Levi's you're the loafer
Like an overturned canoe
Well, I can do without you
You can go to Philadelphia
Take a hack to Hackensack
Hey, I'll never ring a bell for you
Or yell for you to come back
In the question you're the why
In the ointment you're the fly
Though I know some things
Are indispensable
Like a buck or two
If there's one thing I can do without
I can do without you
In the barrel, you're a pickle
In the goldmine, you're a nickel
You're the tack inside my shoe
Yes, I can do without you
In my bosom you're a dagger
You're a mangy carpetbagger
In the theater you're the boo
I can do without you
You got charms, they ain't bewitchin' me
You've a face no one would paint
I got the darndest itch in me
To be wherever you ain't
In the bullfrog, you're the croak
In the forest, poison oak
Though I know some things are necessary
My half-pint buckaroo
If there's one thing I can do without
I can do without...
- You're a knothead
- You're a faker
- You're a bonehead
- Troublemaker
I can do without you
Oh, Calam.
The night Adelaid steps on that stage,
I'll come dressed as a Sioux squaw... lugging a papoose.
I'll bring her, Bill Hickok, if I have to drag her back with my teeth!
Look out, Adelaid Adams. Rattlesnake!
Salary's no object.
Promise her anything, but bring her.
I've got the cigarette picture,
I'll find her.
- Calam, do me a favor.
- What?
When you're in Chicago, notice the women, how they act and what they wear.
Get yourself some female clothes and fixings.
You know, dresses, ribbons, perfume, things like that.
- If you don't like how I smell...
- It's nothing personal.
If you ever crawled out of that deer hide and dolled up a bit...
I got a hunch you'd be a passable, pretty gal.
Well, save your hunches for females who get their pictures taken in long underwear.
I ain't one of them.
- Come on. Get this schooner rolling.
- Hyah!
Scalps.
A massacre.
Drop it, you murdering copperhead.
I'll be hornswoggled.
When you turn to the subject of Harry
That's a horse from a different safari
He can box like a fox
He's as dumb as an ox
But it's Harry I'm planning to marry
Yes, it's Harry she's plannin' to marry
My heart's twined around his suspenders
He's the one that I truly adore
I'm numb, I succumb when he renders
The face on the bar room floor
When he flexes his muscles, I flutter
Like a butterfly caught in a shutter
When he calls me his mate
I just disintegrate
Since the world first began
Since the world first began
Never been such a man
Never been such a man
Who could love like he can
So it's Harry I'm planning to marry
They love you, Miss Adams.
Shouldn't you take another bow?
It's your last night.
I'm gratefully aware of that.
See that the trunks are packed, and my costumes...
Get rid of those awful things.
Sell them or do something.
I'll make you a present of them.
I'll buy a whole new wardrobe.
London, Vienna, Paris.
How different from this primitive Chicago.
These past few weeks have been a dreadful bore.
How can you say that, Miss Adams?
They have been glorious.
If I could be on the stage for one minute, to see all those people looking up at me... listening, admiring...
Like looking into the pens at the stockyards.
Hurry up, Katie.
We mustn't keep Mr. Kingsley waiting.
Maybe some day I will be on the stage.
Not a grand, beautiful star like you, Miss Adams.
Just to sing a song maybe.
I can dance and sing a little.
Of course you can. I've heard you.
Very nice for choirs and weddings, but...
I doubt that your voice would ever carry beyond the footlights.
There, now. How do I look?
Beautiful, Miss Adams. Just beautiful.
Even if I never sang alone, if I were only in the chorus... couldn't you suggest it to somebody sometime?
You're not serious, Katie. Not really?
My dear, it isn't just your voice, it's...
You other equipment is hardly adequate.
Oh. Cheer up. Maybe I'll send for you when I get to Paris. All right?
Good night, darling.
Good night.
When you turn to the subject of Harry
That's a horse from a different safari
He can box like a fox
He's as dumb as an ox
But it's Harry I'm planning to marry
My heart's twined around his suspenders
He's the one that I truly adore
I'm numb, I succumb when he renders
The face on the bar room floor
When he flexes his muscles, I flutter
Like a butterfly caught in a shutter
When he calls me his...
What is it, ma'am? Where's the varmint?
Who are you?
Oh. My name is Canary, Miss Adams, most folks call me Calamity.
I came from Deadwood City to see you and talk you into going back with me.
Gosh almighty, you're the prettiest thing I've ever seen.
I've never known a woman could look like that.
Say.
- How do you hold that dress up there?
- Please.
- I have to change clothes. Do you mind?
- Helping you? Why, sure.
I've plugged men for less than that.
If you don't get out of here this instant, Mr. Canary... or Mr. Calamity, or whatever your name is...
Mister?
Why, I ain't no mister.
- You're a woman?
- Of course, I'm a woman.
You thought I was a man?
Come to think of it, that ain't so funny.
I'm sorry. But those clothes, the gun and everything.
I reckon I do look a mite strange to a lady like you.
I guess I ain't much to look at.
But there ain't a woman I can't out-ride or out-shoot or...
Everybody can't have a figure like Adelaid Adams.
That's a matter of opinion.
In the opinion of Deadwood City, there ain't no other opinion.
Now, let's get down to business.
I'd like to hire you to come and sing in Deadwood.
Me?
I got a lot of nerve asking you, I know.
Deadwood City ain't no Chicago... and the Golden Garter ain't no grand theater like this one... but they want you mighty bad, and I promised them you'd come.
Name your own salary.
Well, the salary isn't important.
It's just...
Me?
Every prospector in the territory is chewing himself sick with tobacco... just to get a picture of you.
Tell Deadwood, Miss Adams is sorry, but she's going to Europe.
Don't you reckon you could put that off until after you played Deadwood?
Sure, I could, but...
Maybe I could.
It's ridiculous. I couldn't.
Is this the only picture they have of me in Deadwood?
- The cigarette picture?
- I reckon so, ma'am.
Where is Deadwood?
Dakota Territory.
Out in the Black Hills.
- Indians?
- Sioux tribe.
But you needn't worry about Injuns when you travel with Calamity Jane.
Do trains go there?
Well, not for the last 100 miles.
- But the stage is comfortable.
- No telegraph?
No.
If you want to send a letter, there's a dispatcher...
If I refused, you'd poke that gun in my back and march me to the rail road station.
- Well, now...
- I'm at your mercy. Come help me pack.
I got a strange feeling someone is being hustled.
Hyah! Hyah!
Come on, you redskin naked heathens!
Run up here and get your one-way ticket to the happy hunting grounds!
Come on, catch us! And catch that!
And that!
Get the steam up in them horses.
Are you comfortable in there, Miss Adams?
Well, it's all over.
I told you you had nothing to worry about.
Not when you're riding with Calamity.
Miss Adams, you all right?
Miss Adams.
Calamity's back, and she brought Adelaid Adams.
Adelaid Adams.
Quiet! Listen to me!
All right, you mangy pack of dirt-scratching beetles.
I promised you Adelaid Adams, and I brought her.
Quiet! Wait a minute!
Everybody stand back.
Let's give her a real Deadwood welcome.
Throw them bags down, Rattlesnake.
- Your servant, ma'am, Bill Hickok.
- Wild Bill Hickok?
If I am, you could tame me, ma'am.
Lieutenant Daniel Gilmartin, Miss Adams.
Yours to command.
Thank you.
This way, Miss Adams.
Miss Adams, you are here.
I'm unworthy. My theater is unworthy.
But you're a true artist. You are here.
Yes, I'm here.
Oh, Miss Adams, permit me to introduce a fellow thespian, also from the East.
Mr. Francis Fryer.
How do you do, Mr. Fryer?
Fryer. Don't I know you from somewhere?
We played St. Louis the same week last year.
At... different theaters, of course.
How nice to see you again.
Shall we go inside, Miss Adams?
Calam, you did it.
I could shoot myself with happiness.
Maybe I should shoot myself for bringing her.
Now, Miss Adams,
I'll show you to your room.
Finest room in the house.
Had it specially decorated.
Oh, thank you.
Gentlemen.
- Congratulations, Calamity.
- Only Calamity could do it!
I bet if she went after Sitting Bull she'd bring him back, too.
Did you see the show?
Did you see Miss Adams work?
What is it like in the big city?
Boys, Chicago's the biggest noise in Illinois!
Listen.
I just blew in from the windy city
The windy city is mighty purty
But they ain't got what we got
No sirree
They got shacks up to seven stories
Never see any morning glories
But a step from our doorway
We got them for free
They've got those minstrel shows
Purty ladies in the big chapeaus
Private lawns, public parks
For the sake of civic virtue
They've got fountains there that squirt you
I just blew in from the windy city
The windy city is mighty purty
But they ain't got what we got
I'm telling you, boys
We got more life in Deadwood city
Than in all of Illinois
On the street was a dancin' fellow
All dressed up in a suit of yellow
And the dance that he did there
Went somethin' like this
Whistle
More
You should've seen me a-window shopping
A-window shopping with eyes a-poppin'
At the sights that you see there
Yes, sirree
Press a bell and a moment later
Up you go in an elevator
Just as fast as a polecat a-climbin' a tree
I heard claim hundreds came
To a thing they calla baseball game
Cigar stores, revolving doors
Men wear sideburns and they ought to
Because a haircut costs a quarter
I just blew in from the windy city
The windy city is mighty purty
But they ain't got what we got
I'm tellin' you, boys
I ain't a-swappin' half of Deadwood
For the whole of Illinois
Hurry up. This isn't just any night.
This is Adelaid Adams' night.
Hear that crowd!
Billy, you've got to know.
I've got to tell you. That girl, she's...
Oh, never mind.
Millie, that Adelaid Adams, she isn't...
I mean, she's...
What's the use if she is or if she isn't?
She's got to be.
Because if she isn't, that crowd...
We'll all be...
I'll have two fast horses waiting at the stage entrance.
Why? I'm not going anywhere.
Actors are crazy people.
Scared, aren't you, Katie Brown?
You thought it was smart posing as Adelaid Adams.
Like to run like mad, wouldn't you?
Catch a train, get out of this crazy town.
But you can't. You're trapped.
There is no train.
Oh, clever, clever you.
- Five minutes, Miss Adams.
- I'll be ready.
Five minutes, and look at you.
You haven't even got a face.
Gentlemen and... gentlemen.
The great moment has finally arrived.
There are no words to describe the beauty of the lady you are about to meet.
No melody as sweet as the voice you are about to hear.
Gosh almighty, it's Bill Hickok!
Ain't he gorgeous?
Wild Bill Hickok, sweetheart of the Sioux!
Where are the rest of your kids,
Pocahontas?
Here, take him.
Thanks. Everybody get out of here.
All right. That's enough, do you hear?
Bill Hickok!
The funniest sight I've ever seen.
Calamity, please! He's mad.
Don't break up the show!
All right, Calam. I paid my debt.
The next man that laughs is going to get his head ventilated.
Calam, please! Miss Adams is waiting.
The one and only, Miss Adelaid Adams.
Go on out there and give them everything, Katie.
Katie?
- She don't look much like her pictures.
- She's prettier.
Well, now, if you've got a cutie
Who's a real sweet patootie
Better keep it under your hat
Just remember curiosity in fables of old
Killed the curious cat
What's the matter with her?
She didn't sing like that in Chicago.
If you love a laddie
Who's a real sugar daddy
Better take in the welcoming mat
Remember there's a dozen dolls
For every Dan
You're not the only sweet pea...
Where's your voice, Adelaid?
You leave it in Chicago?
So if you wanna know the way
To keep your man
Keep it under your hat
- That's the great Adelaid Adams?
- The poor, foolish kid.
Well, now, if you've got cutie
Who's a real sweet patootie...
Your hat
Just remember curiosity in fables of old
Sing out, Adelaid, like you did in Chicago!
I can't. I'm not Adelaid Adams.
You're not A...?
Aw, she's joshing.
Of course she's Adelaid Adams.
I brought her myself, didn't I?
I ought to know. Not Adelaid Adams.
Don't joke like that, Adelaid.
These galoots ain't got no sense of humor.
It's not a joke. I wish it were.
Please don't be angry with me.
I know I shouldn't have done it, but...
Let's get this straight.
You say you're not Adelaid Adams?
No, ma'am. Sir.
I'm Katie Brown.
Katie Brown?
Calamity!
You were Adelaid Adams in Chicago, in her dressing room.
I was her maid.
She gave me her costumes.
She was going to Europe, and I wanted so badly to be on the stage.
- Calamity framed it.
- Yeah, bringing in Adelaide maid-.
She ought to be run out of town.
Fellows, listen.
What's Adelaid Adams to us, anyhow?
If this is a double-cross, all I gotta say... is you can double-cross me like this every day of the week.
I didn't know. I thought she was Adelaid.
I'm just as surprised as you are.
So help me, Bill, I can't understand.
Please don't blame Calamity.
She didn't know. She didn't!
I fooled her just as I tried to fool you.
It's all my fault.
I thought I could make you like me.
Listen to me.
Listen!
Don't let her bull-nose you.
She ain't getting away with it this time.
There, now. That's better.
Ain't you ashamed of yourselves, treating a lady this way?
All right, so she ain't Adelaid Adams.
She made off she was because she wanted to be an actress.
And she thought maybe we'd give her that chance.
What's wrong with that, anyhow?
We're all here on the same ticket.
You all came here to Deadwood looking for something... you couldn't find anywhere else.
You're all looking for that pot of gold, and Katie here ain't no different.
Well, what have you got to say?
Are you going to grouch about a picture, or are you going to give a real live... and pretty young lady a chance to prove she belongs here?
It's up to you.
- As long as she's up there, let her sing.
- All right, give her a chance.
What do we've got to lose?
That's all we want to hear.
Let her rip, Katie Brown.
Give it all you got. Do it your own way.
Play.
Well, now, if you've got a cutie
Who's a real sweet patootie
Better keep it under your hat
Just remember curiosity in fables of old
Killed the curious cat
Supposin' you've got the laddie
Who's a sweet sugar daddy
Better take in the welcoming mat
Remember there's a dozen dolls
For every Dan
You're not the only sweet pea
In the can
So if you wanna know the way
To keep your man
Keep it under your hat
If you wanna know the way
To keep your man
Keep it under your hat
Keep it under your hat
Keep it under your hat
She is great. Deadwood doesn't need no imported actress. We roll our own.
Let me loose!
Let me loose. Quit it, Bill Hickok.
So help me, I'll shoot your ears off.
Quit it, I say. Let me loose.
You hear what I say? Let me out of this.
Bill Hickok, I'll get you, if it's the last thing I do. Let me down.
You no-good sneaking sidewinder.
Let me down out of here.
Adelaid Adams?
And me in this squaw getup.
You've got the biggest mouth in the whole Dakota Territory.
You flap-eared varmint, let me down.
You dirty, mangy, mole-legged, miserable son of a slinking coyote!
Let me down out of here!
Flap your wings, Calam, you can fly!
Let me down!
I'll get you for this.
Here we go.
You're leaving already, Miss Brown?
You only opened last night.
I'm sorry. I was hoping to get better acquainted.
Getting better acquainted with him is like making a pet out of a polecat.
I think that would be very nice,
Mr. Hickok.
It ain't likely I'll turn up in Chicago.
Chicago? I'm not going to Chicago.
You're not? Where are you going?
It ain't none of your business, squaw man.
I'm moving into Calamity's cabin with her.
- You're what?
- I brought her, and I'm responsible for her.
- What's the matter with the hotel?
- Nothing.
There aren't many women in town and Calamity had the idea we should live together... and sort of chaperone each other.
You chaperone Calam? And she...?
Oh, this ought to be interesting.
We're mighty glad you approve.
And, Mr. Hickok, please feel free to drop in any time.
Thank you kindly, ma'am.
Feel it, but don't try it.
- Come on in, Bill, I'll get you a drink.
- No thanks.
If I felt any higher, I'd be flying!
Harry, come here.
I want you to do something for me.
My heart is higher than a hawk
My love is deeper than a well
I'm thinkin' in a little while
My love and I'll be doin' very well
An owl is givin' me the eye
The wind is blowin' me a kiss
I wouldn't be at all surprised
If I were only dreamin' all of this
And when I strut about like a Sunny Jim
Dressed in yellow and red
Folks'll shout, "Take a look at him
He's touched in the head"
I said that I would never fall
I laughed at others when they fell
And here I'm falling
Higher than a hawk
And deeper than a well
And when we're all rigged out
Like a birthday cake
Eyes'll pop everywhere
Folks'll shout, "Don't you think they make a wonderful pair?"
I said that I would never fall
But if you promise not to tell
My love for you
Is higher than a hawk
And deeper than a well
Ho.
Well, there she sets.
Just where I left her.
I won that cabin from a Kansas fellow in a poker game.
A week before he died of lead poisoning.
Bill was in that game.
He lost everything but his fillings.
- Oh. Let me help you down.
- Thank you.
Do you dislike Mr. Hickok as much as you pretend to?
Dislike Bill? Me and Bill are thicker than flies in a Pawnee camp.
We're like the seven-year itch to each other, but it's fun scratching.
Yup, that Bill Hickok is about the best friend I ever had.
Of course, my sparky taste... that kind of runs to blue uniforms and shiny buttons.
- Like second lieutenants wear?
- Like second...
Lieutenants wear.
Make yourself right at home.
Be careful.
Yep. You and me will batch it here as cozy as two bugs in a blanket.
Excuse me.
I reckon it needs a little airing around here.
Ain't used the place much, it's too lonesome.
I like to bunk out in the open under a wagon or something.
I know one thing we'll have plenty of:
Home cooking.
Just hand me a sack of flour and bacon grease...
Looks like we're out of water.
It's right handy though,
I get it from the creek down there.
That's one good thing about this place.
No, I guess there's nothing good about it.
I'm sorry, Katie.
- Oh, it will be all right, Calam. Fine.
- No, it won't.
It ain't fit for a dog, let alone a lady.
I didn't know it till you came in here.
Just like I didn't know how far from being a lady I was... till I saw you in that dressing room in Chicago.
What do I know about nice things?
I ain't never had any.
Come on,
I'll drive you back to the hotel.
I'm staying right here.
In this rat's nest?
We can fix it. Make it real nice.
All it needs is a woman's touch.
A woman's touch?
A woman's touch
A woman's touch
The magic of Aladdin couldn't do as much
She's a wizard, she's a champ
And she doesn't need a lamp
A woman's touch can weave a spell
The kind of hocus pocus
That she does so well
With the magic of a broom
You can mesmerize a room
With a whisk, whisk here
And a whisk, whisk there
And a dustpan for the cinders
With a rub-rub here and a rub-rub there
You can polish up the windows
Then presto, change-o
Suddenly the sun comes shining through
- And what does Mr. Sunshine say to you?
- Howdy-do
It makes you blink to stop and think
A woman and a whisk-broom
Can accomplish so darn much
So never underestimate a woman's touch
A woman's touch can quickly fill
The empty flower boxes on a window sill
One smile from her and zoom
Little buds begin to bloom
A touch of paint
A magic nail
Can turn a kitchen chair into a Chippendale
Even make the lamp appear
Like a crystal chandelier
With a tack, tack here and a tack, tack there
And a hand around a hammer
With a mop, mop here and a mop, mop there
You can give a cabin glamour
Then gosh almighty, all at once
The cabin that we knew
Becomes a shining castle built for two
Me and you
The pies and cakes a woman bakes
Can make a fellow tell her
That he loves her very much
It can?
So never underestimate a woman's touch
It's up to me? I'll bet $40.
Howdy, Lieutenant. Care to take a hand?
Not now, thanks. You see...
I'm looking for...
No, not now.
It's up to you, Bill. Call or fold?
- Where are you going?
- The same place the lieutenant's going.
Only I'm going to be there first.
All right, all right, I've got ears.
I'm coming.
- I'd like to see Miss Brown.
- You and every other rooster in town.
She's not staying here.
She moved in with Calamity.
Maybe I'd better have a sign painted.
With Calamity?
Where are you going, Calam?
Herb Potter's got tick fever, he's at his cabin by himself.
He needs some doing for him.
No shoes?
I can't wear shoes across the creek.
Bill.
- Hello, Katie.
- Lieutenant.
Say, that's a right smart harness you're wearing.
You just keep on getting prettier and...
- Here.
- They're very nice. Calamity loves flowers.
- The lieutenant never calls without them.
- Wait.
I brought them for...
Where is Calamity?
Up the hill visiting a sick prospector.
Won't you come in?
That's Calam, just can't resist a distress signal.
- This ain't Calam's cabin.
- It sure doesn't look like it.
We fixed it up a little.
Sit down and I'll make you some tea.
It won't take a minute.
Say... lieutenant, don't they need you back at the fort?
They'll manage.
I thought you had a poker game going.
There's always a poker game going.
With the Cheyennes on the war path, folks would feel a heap safer... if you soldiers didn't gallivant around so much, wasting taxpayer's money.
Nice of you to think of the taxpayers, after the money you cost them in funerals.
Yeah.
Oh, dear.
I'm all out of wood.
I'll have to go out and chop some.
- I'll do it.
- Here, let me.
- I hate to trouble you, Bill.
- No trouble at all, ma'am.
Katie.
It was very thoughtful of you and Mr. Hickok to look in on us.
But then, Deadwood is that kind of a town.
I mean, everyone's so friendly and nice.
Well, after the fool I made of myself the other night... the way they forgave me and let me go on.
Anyone could forgive you anything, Katie.
Not anything, lieutenant.
And not Calamity.
I don't know what idea you have about Calamity and me, but...
It's not my idea, it's hers.
She's in love with you.
But that's ridiculous.
We're friends, good friends.
She even saved my life.
- But you can't believe that I and she...
- I like Calamity, lieutenant.
She's been very good to me.
I would no more think of coming between her and the man she loves...
The man she loves? Katie, I swear I...
Well, fancy that, it was there all the time.
Danny, believe me...
- Here we are. It didn't take long, did it?
- Not long enough.
The... shawl, it fell o...
Let's have tea.
They've got a new commander at the fort,
General Stark. He says he knows you.
Yes, I served under him in Virginia during the war.
They're having a ball in his honor
Saturday night. I thought you...
I've been invited myself.
I kind of hoped you'd go with me, Katie.
She is going with me.
It's customary, lieutenant, to let the lady choose for herself.
- Couldn't the... four of us go together?
- What four of us?
Well, you, Bill, me and Calamity.
Calamity?
She's been invited too, and if she doesn't go, I won't either.
She's been expecting you to ask her, lieutenant.
Me? Why me? I told you how I...
That's a smart arrangement.
Settles everything.
Calam goes with the lieutenant, you go with me.
Over my dead body.
Get a little respect in your voice when you talk about Calam... or it might just be that way.
- She's a mighty fine girl.
- Girl?
- You should be proud to take her.
- You would be, wouldn't you?
I sure would.
Me? Wait, I ain't gonna be stampeded into no fast shuffle here.
I know what you're thinking, both of you.
Calamity's fine on top of a stagecoach or behind an ox team.
But she's not lady enough for social appearances with distinguished gentlemen.
Well, she ain't beautiful.
Calamity's not beautiful? You boys have a big surprise in store for you.
There's only one way to settle this, and that's to draw straws.
The long straw gets Katie and the loser takes Calam.
Is that all right with you, Katie?
Draw, Lieutenant.
I won!
- I'll have the prettiest girl at the ball.
- Don't bet on it.
Bill, keep your eyes on that door.
Calamity!
I fell in that dangblasted creek!
Gosh almighty, look who's here.
What brought you to this neck of the woods?
Injun trouble?
They came to ask you to go to the ball.
Both of you?
That's plumb flattering.
- Only I can't go with both of you.
- It's all right. We drew straws.
You did? Who won?
- Well...
- I did, Calam.
Oh. Oh, you did? Well, that's fine, Bill.
That's mighty fine.
Can't think who I'd rather tag along with.
Try to get yourself cleaned up by Saturday, and I'll call for you.
I hear tell it'll be a plumb fancy affair.
Soldiers in dress uniforms, ladies in fancy gowns.
I've never been to a big shindig like that.
I reckon I'll burst my corset strings in the pride of just being asked.
I'll fix you some tea.
Danny.
Ask Katie to go, Danny.
I know you want to take me, but ask her.
Do it for me, Danny, please.
You're quite a lady, Calamity.
- Did you have to wear that old army coat?
- Old coat?
It was Custer's, Bill.
He gave it to me himself.
If it's good enough for Custer, it ought to be good enough for Fort Scully.
This ain't no scalping expedition against Sitting Bull. We're going to a ball.
I know it. We sure got a night for it, ain't we, Bill?
Don't it thrill you just to look at them hills?
It sure does.
No wonder the Injuns fight so fierce to hang on to this country.
Take me back to the Black Hills
The Black Hills of Dakota
To the beautiful
Indian country that I love
Lost my heart in the Black Hills
The Black Hills of Dakota
Where the pines are so high
That they kiss the sky above
And when I get that lonesome feelin'
And I'm miles away from home
I hear the voice of the mystic mountains
Calling me back home
- So take me back to the Black Hills
- So take me back to the Black Hills
- The Black Hills of Dakota
- The Black Hills of Dakota
- To the beautiful Indian country that I love
- To the beautiful Indian country that I love
Take me back to the Black Hills
The Black Hills of Dakota
To the beautiful
Indian country that I love
Lost my heart in the Black Hills
- The Black Hills of Dakota
- The Black Hills of Dakota
- Where the pines are so high
- Where the pines are so high
- That they kiss the sky above
- That they kiss the sky above
- And when I get that lonesome feelin'
- And when I get that lonesome feelin'
- And I'm miles away from home
- And I'm miles away from home
- I hear the voice of the mystic mountains
- I hear the voice of the mystic mountains
- Callin' me back home
- Callin' me back home
So take me back to the Black Hills
The Black Hills of Dakota
To the beautiful Indian country that I love
- To the beautiful Indian country
- To the beautiful Indian country
- That I love
- That I love
That can't be Calamity.
Why, she's beautiful!
What happened to her?
Save one for me, Miss Calamity.
Wait a minute, fellows.
I can't get all your names on this here card.
I can't even spell most of them.
That's all I got room for.
What you need is a bigger card!
Calamity has been holding out on us, carrying concealed weapons.
How come all these galoots want to dance with me?
At that shindig at Hogan's stable, none of them came around.
- They didn't?
- I spent the night chatting with the mules.
That's what I've been telling you, that you'd look better in a dress.
Do I, Danny?
You're an absolute vision, Calamity.
Calamity, is this dance open?
Well, I'm kind of saving this one.
Come on, Calam.
Danny hasn't even asked me for a dance.
I know.
Katie and him are thicker than molasses.
Bill, look there.
He's taking her out in the garden.
Katie.
Katie, darling.
Danny, we shouldn't.
I love you, Katie.
I...
Danny...
What about Calamity?
Calamity can be your bridesmaid.
Calam, wait.
- Where are you going?
- Home.
I brought her here. Me.
All the way from Chicago.
Just to make love to Danny.
So help me, this town ain't big enough for me and that flirting, man-rustling petticoat!
It ain't that serious. People always act silly at these sociables.
You saw them out in that garden.
They weren't acting!
- Give me that gun.
- Stand clear, Bill Hickok.
I don't see her anywhere, Danny.
You're the only person in the world who'd worry about Calamity.
Bridesmaid?
- Are you all right?
- Yes, I'm all right.
She ain't nothing but a miserable, two-timing claim jumper.
Oh! Help me get out of this dangblasted thing!
Well, stand still.
I even took her in my own cabin because I figured she'd need protection.
Like a weasel in a hencoop, she needs protection!
Throw that in with the rest of her man-traps.
And that! And that!
I bet it wasn't the first time she kissed him.
I bet it's been going on all the time.
Here in my own cabin.
Gosh almighty, I'm dumb!
If you have to blame somebody, blame that pretty-boy lieutenant of yours.
It seems to me he was on the other end of the kissing.
She charmed him hog-eyed.
Look at these. Silk. Pure silk.
I'll bet her mother spun them.
Here. Take them to her!
Tell her to keep out of my sight!
So help me, Bill, if I ever see her again...
I'll put a bullet smack in the middle of that pretty face!
In both of them!
When you turn to the subject of Harry
That's a horse from a different safari
He can box like a fox
He's as dumb as an ox
But it's Harry I'm planning to marry
When he flexes his muscles, I flutter
Like a butterfly caught in a shutter
- Sarsaparilla.
- Calam, where have you been?
Katie said to tell you if you come in, she'd like to see you.
She's going to see me. Right now.
And it's Harry I'm planning to marry
There's going to be trouble.
My heart's twined around his suspenders
He's the one that I truly a...
What do you want, Calamity?
There's a stage leaving at noon tomorrow. Be on it.
Are you threatening me?
I'm warning you.
What is it? What's going on?
Calamity just warned Katie to get out of town.
Buck, lend me a gun.
Calamity.
Hold up your glass.
What's the matter? Afraid?
Katie's done it!
Imagine Katie making a shot like that.
- Where are you going, Calam? Come here.
- Leave me be.
- Get in that buggy.
- Let go of me!
Get in there or I'll knock you senseless, if you had any sense.
Come on! Hyah! Hyah!
I've seen you do lots of crazy things... but this is the first time
I've seen you make a fool of yourself.
Sit down and listen.
You're a fake, Calam.
You dress, talk, ride and shoot like a man, but you think like a female.
Like a green-eyed, snarling, spitting female.
Katie beat you twice, out of your man and out of the respect you had around here.
And you helped her.
I did too.
She didn't shoot the glass out of your hand, I did. You needed a lesson.
Who are you to tell people who to love?
Suppose you did scare her out of town, would that get your lieutenant back?
Would that stop Katie from loving him, or him her?
That's female thinking.
He'd bring her back, and they would both hate you.
You had to lose tonight, Calam, or you'd never win again.
Go on, bawl. Admit you're a female.
Have your hysterics, get them over with.
You'll feel better.
I was so plumb crazy about him.
I know. I felt the same way about her.
You mean, you're in love with Katie?
It's funny, ain't it?
- Bill, I'm sorry. I didn't know.
- Aw.
That's all right.
It'll take some time, but I'll get over it.
You will too.
- No, I won't. Not Danny.
- Yes, you will.
All I've done for months is dream about him.
- Yeah?
- Yeah.
About getting married, and building a cabin... and having young'uns.
I know it sounds silly, I guess, but...
Bill, I really wanted all those things.
I was kind of hankering for them myself.
There'll never be another man like him.
Not for me. Not ever.
It ain't going to be easy getting her out of my system either.
She was so beautiful and...
Beautiful and...
- Bill.
- Calam.
Hey. What ever happened to that lieutenant you were telling me about?
I never heard of him.
Once I had a secret love
That lived within the heart of me
All too soon my secret love
Became impatient to be free
So I told a friendly star
The way that dreamers often do
Just how wonderful you are
And why I'm so in love with you
Now I shout it
From the highest hills
Even told the golden daffodils
At last my heart's an open door
And my secret love's no secret
Anymore
Now I shout it
From the highest hills
Even told the golden daffodils
At last my heart's an open door
And my secret love's no secret
Anymore
Howdy, Flanagan.
Say, how's the claim panning out?
The way she acted, no wonder nobody will talk to her.
I hope she don't speak to me.
I hate to insult women.
Howdy, fellows. Morning, Billy.
- Howdy, Francis.
- Hello, Calamity.
Have you seen Bill around here anywhere?
He and Colorado are out working their claim.
How come they're taking down them signs?
Katie's not here anymore.
Where is she?
She ain't been hurt? Is she sick?
Tell me, Francis, where is she?
On her way back to Chicago.
Chicago?
You warned her to get out of town, didn't you? Well, she got.
But I didn't mean it! I was loco.
I didn't want her to go.
That's what I came to tell her.
You're late.
The stage left a half hour ago.
The town is going to miss that kid.
- We sure will.
- Everybody will miss her.
I didn't think she'd go, I swear it.
She wasn't scared. She shot back at me.
Why would she go away? Why?
Because she's a lady, Calamity.
She's not mean and selfish and never learned to wreck people's lives like...
Like me. Say it.
I don't have to say it. She left this note.
It says everything. Listen.
"Dear Danny, Calamity loves you and..."
- But, I don't!
- Shut up and listen!
"Calamity loves you and you probably love her.
I had no right to come between you.
I love you both and want you to be happy.
Pretend it was Adelaid Adams who came to Deadwood.
Katie Brown never existed.
She doesn't now. Goodbye, Danny."
Never existed?
She was the most real person in Deadwood.
Put them signs back up, Millie.
I'm bringing that stage back here!
Hey, Calam, where are you going?
Come on!
I don't know what kind of life you'll have living with that catamount... but it ain't gonna be dull.
That's for dang sure.
Hey, Rattlesnake.
Rattlesnake, stop.
Hot-headed old possum.
Why don't you stop when I yell?
I thought you was injuns.
Katie, I'm going to get married.
Congratulations.
Rattlesnake, stop this coach.
Whoa! Whoa, there!
But I'm going to be Mrs. Hickok.
Bill? But I thought you loved Danny.
Oh, that's female thinking.
Nothing will get you into more trouble.
Well, where are we heading,
Chicago or back to Deadwood?
Deadwood, Calam. Home.
- Katie.
- Oh, Calam.
Females. Pure females.
Now I shout it from the highest hills
Even told the golden daffodils
At last my heart's an open door
And my secret love's no secret
Anymore
Ain't going back to the windy city
The windy city is mighty pretty
But it ain't got what I've got
I'm telling you, boys
I wouldn't trade this golden nugget
For the whole of Illinois
My heart is higher than a hawk
My love is deeper than a well
I'm thinkin' in a little while
My love and I'll be doin' very well
Hey.
What's this for?
Well, that's just in case any more actresses roll in from Chicago.
We'll be home tonight
By the light of the silvery moon
And my hearts a-thumpin'
Like a mandolin a-plunkin' a tune
- When we get home, we're fixin' to stay
- When we get home, we're fixin' to stay
So whip crack away, whip crack away
Whip crack away
Oh, the Deadwood stage
Is a-rollin' on over the plains
With the curtains flappin'
And the driver slappin' the reins
Beautiful sky, a wonderful day
Whip crack away, whip crack away
Whip crack away
Whip crack away, whip crack away
Whip crack away
"These smiling flowers"
"These fragrant gardens"
"This world filled..."
"with glorious colours"
"The nectar intoxicates the bees"
"The nectar intoxicates the bees"
"What little have I to add to this splendour..."
"save a fear tears, a few sighs"
I told you to keep the place tidy.
If that manuscript was here, then where has it got to?
- What do you know, then?
- He wished you good morning.
Fool!
I mean about the manuscript!
You've looked at my things?
Wings?
This is a newspaper office, not a bird house!
Wings, indeed!
Things.
Have you read the poems I left?
I have.
Did you like them?
You'll publish them?
I haven't lost my mind.
Call that gibberish poetry? It's a crusade against unemployment.
Poetry deals with delicacies:
You must write poems about love.
You are incomparable, Sir!
Write about intoxication...
...the beauty of a cup, or a fine woman.
Shut up.
You don't write poetry.
Have you read poets like Mir and Momin?
Yes, and Josh and Faiz, who are beyond your comprehension.
Give me my poems.
- We will find them later.
What do you think you're doing young man?
What right have you to throw away my poems?
Should I make a paper hat of them?
Don't insult them by wearing them on a hollow head.
My head? Hollow?
How about yours? If you're a poet, I'm a donkey!
It's clear, and it's nice to hear you admit it.
Are you weighing vegetables or gold?
There's Uncle Vijay!
I've caught him.
I'm not your enemy.
Why run from your mother?
Where have you been?
I can't bear to see your suffer.
I'm well, mother.
Sure you are. Just look at the state you're in.
Come home. I've hidden away some good food for you.
You've found him?
- Yes.
Well, mother.
So your poet is home!
Every literate fool thinks he's poet.
Where else can he get food as a parasite?
Take no notice of them. Eat.
See? We earn and mother feeds delicacies to her layabout.
He's shameless.
If he had any self-respect, he'd starve rather than eat here.
Shut up, you two! I won't hear a word said against him.
He's back after so long, and you can't bear to see him eat.
He's hale and hearty. Why doesn't he earn and not burden us?
After his father died, you should look after him.
It wasn't our wish that our parents produce such a layabout.
That I must have to hear this!
It was my misfortunate to give birth to you two.
You won't even let me work, because of your "prestige".
If I could work as a maid,
I could feed my son.
Sister-in-law,
Where are my poems?
Address me, not the women.
I sold them for
10 annas as waste paper.
Waste paper?
You sold my poems for ten annas?
Uncouth fools no better.
You call me uncouth?
Did you hear that, brother?
I got rid of them this morning.
Now I'll get rid of you! Out!
Where will you go on an empty stomach? Who will tend to you?
You take me along with you.
I don't want to stay here for another minute.
Don't worry, mother.
I'll do my best.
I'll take you away from here as soon as I can.
Let me get on with my work instead of searching waste paper.
But there was an important file.
A file?
Containing handwritten papers?
Where are they?
- A woman bought them.
They caught her eye, she read some, then she took them away.
Which woman?
Where does she live?
I don't know; she wasn't a local person.
If she comes again, I'll ask.
Come come!
Have you fallen out with your brothers again?
Are you hungry?
You'll starve to death.
Well, today I got 20 rupees from a rich man.
His car was run over a woman's leg.
I gave false witness for him.
Shyam, remember how you found a lame sparrow as a kid?
You cared for it until it was better.
I was only a kid.
But you are a kid now also.
"Lament not..."
"if I turn my face away..."
"your gaze is filled..."
"with such longing"
Listen.
I was saying...
"Who know what you said?"
"Who knows what I heard?"
"Something stirred in my heart"
"Who knows what you said?"
"I felt my heart awaken,
I felt such elation"
"Slumbering dreams reawakened, something stirred in my heart"
"Who knows what you said?"
"Who knows what I heard"
"Something stirred in my heart"
"I stumble no more, my feet no longer falter"
"There is new life in my step.
Something stirred in my heart"
"Who knows what you said"
"Who knows what I heard"
"But something sure stirred in my heart"
"The cascade of my hair is filled with sweet fragrance"
"Doors open to reveal secret longings;
"something stirred in my heart"
"Who knows what you said"
"Who knows what I heard"
"Something stirred in my heart"
Excuse me...
- Yes?
That song you were singing...
- You like it?
Where did you get it?
It's mine.
It isn't yours.
- Then why ask, if you know?
Because I...
- What do you want?
The file with that song in it.
Is that all?
I don't like prattle.
Do you like me?
No.
Then why follow me?
I want to know only that the file is with you or not.
It's valuable to me.
Whenever I have money...
So you've followed me empty-handed? Get out!
Please understand.
I want only that file.
For me it is important.
You go, or should I remove my sandal.
Stop shouting, silly.
Your customer will run away.
A pauper! I lured him here, but he hasn't a penny.
Juhi, it was him.
Gulabo, where are you running?
I must apologize to him,
I treated him very badly.
Stop talking in riddles and tell me in plain words.
What's all this about?
The man who followed me is a poet.
The poet whose poems I bought as waste paper.
Look: The same paper, the same writing.
And I threw him out as a pauper.
He is a pauper.
You did quite the right thing.
Foolish girl! Come on
Have you written any poems in the holidays?
A few.
Anyone can write poems. If you're a true poet, create something.
Extempore?
But on what subject?
Who is she?
There's your subject:
A poem about her.
"When I walk, even my shadow lags behind"
"When you walk, the universe keeps pace"
"When I stop, clouds of misery gather"
"When you stop... spring's radiance is outshone"
Miss Pushlata.
"Our love will survive every trial"
"We shall never forget our oath of love"
"We leave the world far behind"
"How long will we journey together?"
Coolie!
A coolie.
- At your service.
Put these in the car.
What has the world come to?
The educated work as coolies.
Have your money.
No credit.
It's counterfeit.
So you've got nothing else.
So that's your game!
Now who'll pay for that food you've touched?
Pay up, or I'll have your shirt.
Take the plate away.
Put it back!
Keep the change.
Go to a barber and get yourself made to look more human.
Do eat.
I'm not hungry.
- Yes, you are.
You've no right to take pity on me.
I'm sorry...
...take no notice of me.
You have every right to be angry.
I treated you very badly the other day.
I've nothing against you.
Then please eat...
...for my sake.
What did you say?
For your sake?
You don't even know me.
I know you very well.
- How?
Through your poems.
I know your thoughts and feelings.
What else is there?
I don't understand.
But, Miss...
Why address me so politely?
I am not used to it.
Until today, people have spoken rudely to me.
I have suffered their vulgar remarks...
...their abuse, their crude jokes.
But you behave so respectfully.
Massage, oil massage, make things gleam!
"If your head reels with pain, or your heart sinks in gloom..."
"Don't fret, leave it to me;
I'll set things right soon"
"Massage, oil massage!"
"The lotion I use has magic.
Curing baldness and dandruff"
"Once my hands begin to whirl, your hair won't look so rough"
"Mark my words, my friend, this lotion brings you joy"
"It cures a thousand ailments, so why not give it a try?"
"Suffering a lovers' tiff?
Is your business in the throes?"
"A touch of this supple hand will dissipate all woes"
"Mark my words, my friends, this lotion brings you joy"
"Be you a master, be you a slave.
Be you a leader, or one of the led"
"Come to me, as everyone does.
Come to me and bow your head"
"Mark my words, my friend.
This lotion brings you joy"
"It cures a thousand ailments.
So why not give it a try?"
"Don't fret, leave it to me..."
"If your head reels with pain, or your heart sinks in gloom..."
"Don't fret, leave it to me;
I'll set things right soon"
Mr. Vijay, come here!
A great poet: I was singing one of his songs.
Since I've been singing your song, business has doubled.
Don't go
I'll just finish him.
- What?
Stay put.
Mr. Vijay, I'll give you a special massage completely free.
No, thank you. The present times have battered me enough.
It's amazing how you still manage to smile.
Only a donkey in the noon sun...
...and a poet lost in poetry are so stunned.
True, only the glitter of gold is like the sun.
So donkeys will.
What are you talking about?
- We're discussing donkeys.
Here I am.
Juhi, weren't you waiting for me?
I'm waiting for a man in a car.
- In a car? Not a masseur?
May He puncture his tyres.
May He puncture your head.
Juhi, what happened?
- Are you cross with me?
Have you no consideration for the heart you've punctured?
Get it patched up.
- I have no wife to patch it.
What can I do about it?
- Marry me.
Stop it, idiot!
Did you hear? I have the gift of massaging.
If I had the gift of cheating we could afford a car.
I'm done for!
A coconut? I get it.
I won't say another word.
Stop him, or I'll have to chase him for a mile!
Stop! Naughty fellow
Hello, Pushpa.
Vijay! I didn't recognize you.
You were so handsome. Whose
"love" brought you to this?
Someone who won't let me go...
Unemployment.
Your children?
- And their father's.
They're Gullu and Fullu, bright sparks like him.
What do you mean?
There's a gathering at our old college tonight; you must come.
Now I'll have to chase him for a mile. I'll leave
You must come tonight.
Where is Bhattacharya?
He was going to sing next.
Vijay, why hide out here?
Come inside.
No, Pushpa. My clothes...
You're decently covered from head to foot. Come along.
Ladies and gentleman.
Bhattacharya isn't here.
We're delighted...
...we're delighted that Vijay is here...
...and request him to recite a poem.
Don't be formal. Come along.
Let's hear you, Vijay.
"I am weary of this troubled life"
"Weary of this troubled existence"
"In my grief, may I not reject the entire world"
Why such a sad song on this occasion? Recite a happy verse.
"How can I sing of joy..."
"if I live in pain"
"I can only..."
"...return to life what life itself offers me"
"Once again..."
"...the memories of love stir in my heart"
"I confess..."
"that I am overcome by life's blows"
"Today I break all belief..."
"...in the illusion of hope"
"Today I vow..."
"to voice no complaint against anyone"
Are you an ex-student?
Have you a job?
No, I need one.
You recite very well.
Here's my card.
Come to my office tomorrow.
- Yourself?
Here are my poems.
When did you study at college?
- From '48 to '52.
Shall I read the poems aloud?
I married in 1952.
Did you study science or arts?
Arts. May I recite the poems?
You're sure you left college in '52, or was it before?
In '52. Mr. Ghosh, my poems?
- Will you work?
Service? I thought you called me about publishing my poems.
There's still plenty of time to publish your poems.
I must get to know you better first.
Mr. Chatterji, this is your new assistant.
You can start tomorrow.
"If I were to give my heart to you, only you"
"If I were to lock your heart away"
"If I were to adorn your hair with flowers of love"
"If I were to shake the flowers to the ground"
"If I were to remember you in my dreams"
"If I were to give you sleepless nights"
"If I were to lay my heart at your feet"
"If I were to deny your love and walk away"
How have you been?
- I'm alive.
I want to see you happy.
Don't worry. I have learnt to be happy.
Has some girl taught you?
One girl was enough for me.
I don't want to suffer again.
You mean you have erased your first love.
I should have.
I forgot: I was really going up.
Closing time. Three hours you've waited. For whom?
Does Mr. Vijay come here often?
Yes, but not lately.
Any message for him?
So you find something to say to the waiter. How about me?
Have you had time to look at them?
- Which papers?
- Vijay calls them his poetry.
I've read them, they're fine.
Why not publish some?
Are you mad?
You must know we publish famous poets, not the trash of novices.
Put in an advertisement instead.
What do you want?
Sir, this trash of a novice...
...may I take it away?
Are you free tomorrow evening?
Come and lend a hand at a party in my house.
I'll be there.
It's no good getting upset, Juhi.
Who will care for you in your old age?
God willing.
Be careful, or a nut will fall on you.
If you want security, listen to me.
If I listen to you, I'll starve.
You can hardly keep yourself, how can you feed me, too?
My hunger will be satisfied by seeing you in my house.
Really?
Abdul Sattar, do you love me that much?
Let's marry.
- Stop, it idiot!
Do you hear? No, nothing.
No nut.
Your husband?
- He's ill.
He wanted me to take him to hospital, but I put it off.
How could I miss such a party?
You're very kind!
And the children?
How did you get my address?
Your address? Do you live here?
Let's go outside.
Mr. Ghosh told me to come.
Told you? Do you know him?
I work for him.
And you?
- I am his...
Who is the most talented poet here?
They are all good.
But the one in the black jacket is...
Don't tell him about us.
Understand?
Poems that serve the nation are better than...
...love poems.
Gentleman, drop this argument.
The drinks are here.
Leave it to the servant, dear.
Come along, serve the drinks.
"How could I..."
"apprise her of my love?"
"The words froze on my lips"
"Tears welled in my eyes"
"In the gallantry of frigid hearts"
"Where pleasure is sought"
"Clammy fingers cling to the cup of whine"
"I quaffed the wine, a drop was spilled"
"An extreme despair came to my rescue"
"Receiving my poet, out of pity, she deigned to love me"
"Who are the fortunate ones..."
"who gain the love they seek?"
Great, Mr Ghosh!
Even your servants recite poems
I'll arrange for the dinner
Can only the rich be poets?
Go ahead, young man
"When I asked for flowers,
I was given thorns"
"Who are the fortunate ones..."
"who gain the love they seek?"
"When I searched for happiness..."
"I was lost in streets of sadness"
"When I sought songs of joy,
I heard songs of sorrow"
"Every torment doubled the pain my heart"
"When I asked for flowers,
I was given thorns"
"Who were the fortunate ones..."
"who got the love they sought"
"Companions came..."
"Companions came, stayed awhile, then left me all alone"
"Who can spare the time to clasp the hand of a falling man?"
"Even my shadow eludes me as it fades away"
"When I asked for flowers,
I was given thorns"
"Who are the fortunate ones who gain the love they seek?"
"If this is called living, then I'll live my life somehow"
"I shall not sigh, I'll seal my lips,
I'll dry my tears"
"Why should I fear grief, when I have encountered it so often?"
"When I asked for flowers,
I was given thorns"
"Who are the fortunate ones who gain the love they seek?"
Wonderful! Excellent!
I have come to see you.
Mr. Ghosh has gone to the board meeting.
You shouldn't have come.
I have been very upset since the party.
Do you bear me ill will?
No, Meena.
I bear no grudge.
Why did you sing that heart-rending poem that day?
You revived my desires.
- Forget the past.
I had forgotten,
I had remoulded my life.
I controlled my heart.
Why disturb my heart?
Why return to my life?
When did I ever leave your life? You left me.
Do not try to correct your first mistake with another, Meena.
I've made no mistake.
Besides love, a sensible woman needs security and the comfort of a home.
And some money is also required.
For those things...
You married Mr. Ghosh, selling love for wealth.
Don't accuse me wrongly.
I loved you, but you were poor and unemployed.
In life, besides love and poetry, there's hunger.
How could you bear my burden when you couldn't feed yourself?
You gave me no chance.
When a man has responsibilities, he shoulders them.
Don't deceive yourself.
You sought wealth and high position in society.
Now you have them. Despite that, you are restless and resentful.
You know why?
Because you have always been selfish.
You never considered my plight.
Now you don't consider your husband.
Life's real joy lies in making others happy.
You've never understood that; that's why you're unhappy.
Wonderful!
My wife's no better than a streetwalker.
Vijay and I hardly know each other.
How long has this been going on?
We hardly know each other.
Anything else?
- Nothing.
Then let's see how upset you are when I dismiss him.
Pay up!
- I earn my money the hard way.
Scoundrel! Pay Up!
Constable!
Save me, do something!
You?
What's the matter?
Has a girl run this way?
No.
Who is she?
- My wife.
Sorry sir, I made a mistake.
What is your name?
Gulab.
It's all clear now.
You can go safely.
"Tormented by a long absence..."
"Radha longed..."
"for her lover"
"One day she went..."
"to her beloved and lamented"
"Hold me in your arms today, my love..."
"so that I am fulfilled"
"Ease the pain in my heart..."
"slake the fire in my body"
"My eyes are wide open"
"My luckless eyes"
"I can't rest until
I am truly yours"
"I can hardly see ahead.
Behind me torment follows"
"Without you, life is meaningless"
"Beloved, make my love complete"
"so it may last
"Call me your very own"
"Call me your own,
"Slake the thirst..."
"Slake the thirst that lies deep in my soul"
"Beloved, make my love complete..."
"so it may last beyond eternity"
There is a millionaire in the car. Come with me.
No! Go away!
You won't?
I've already promised him!
Let me go!
You won't obey me?
Get going!
And thank your lucky stars
I used my weak hand.
Be seated.
This is my territory and if anyone disturbs you...
...just call for me,
I'll come running.
Where are you?
What did you say?
- I didn't say a word.
She's lost, isn't she?
Who is he?
- Who?
I wouldn't ask if I knew, would I?
Just a postman knows the meaning of postcard, so I... a masseur, can tell things at a glance...
Sitting here looking lost, not noticing me.
Not hearing a word, that's a sure sign.
I see you've fallen in love.
Rushing off is a sign, too.
Tell me truly who he is.
A poet.
- I have a poet friend.
What's your poet's name?
Vijay.
- So is mine.
I'll ask him if he knows another Vijay-poet.
Maybe they're the same person.
Possibly, I'll ask him
Brothers, is all well?
What are you doing?
What's it you if someone is dead, you vagabond?
Who is dead?
Whose last rites are these?
- Mother's.
Don't call us brother.
We share our relationship because of her.
And now that she is dead, you are dead for us.
"Where will you go on the empty stomach"
"Who will look after you"
"I don't want to stay in this house for another minute"
Let's see you dance.
I'll play the drums for you.
Ask your friend to join us.
Come on, drink it!
I'd drink poison for her is she told me to.
He's shy!
Come, sir, have a drink for my sake.
Strange chap!
Are you a man or a mouse?
You look as if your grandma died.
He's a beginner, but he's finished it!
You can't be a real beginner!
When did you start?
"I was so overcome with sorrow"
"I drank to drown the grief"
"My poor heart was so dejected"
"I drank out of pity for it"
So he's a poet, too?
Indeed! He's composed hundreds of poems.
"For so many years the world..."
"has rejected and dismissed me"
"Today I..."
"...reject the world"
"And I think..."
"...to forget that it exists"
Where to?
My child is ill.
I need you, too.
Tend to us first.
Tend to us first, then see to your child.
Start the music.
"These lanes, these houses, where pleasure is auctioned"
"These ravaged caravans of life that pass us by"
"Where are they, the guardians of dignity?"
"Where are those who claim to be proud of this land?"
"These insidious streets, where infamy is traded"
"Where men conceal their names, where money talks"
"Where chastity is bargained for and purity is sold"
"Where are those who claim to be proud of this land?"
"These old streets where dreams wither..."
"where flowers are trampled underfoot"
"These sham celebrations of colour are for sale"
"Where are those who claim to be proud of this land?"
"These brightly lit rooms where dancing bells chime"
"The tables beat in time with heavy hearts"
"These soulless rooms that echo to coughing"
"Where are those who claim to be proud of this land?"
"These garlands, these walls..."
"...stained with blood"
"These fragile bodies, these vain faces"
"Where are those who claim to be proud of this land?"
"Old men pass through here, young man too stop awhile"
"Sons, respected fathers and husbands"
"These are our wives, our sisters, our mothers"
"Where are those who claim to be proud of this land?"
"These daughters of Eve seek help"
"These daughters of Radha and Yashoda"
"These daughters of Zulekha, these children of God"
"Where are the leaders who claim to be proud of this land?"
"Summon all the leaders of this land"
"Show them the treachery, show them these devious streets"
"Summon all those who claim to be proud of this land"
Who is it? It's you.
Come with me.
Taking a pity of me again?
Today I am not hungry.
I have drowned my hunger in drink.
I have drunk
...all my joys and sorrows.
I have swallowed everything.
Where to?
Come and rest in my house.
Leave when you feel better.
Should I leave when I feel better?
I'll feel better when
I've left this world, Gulabo.
Everything is lost.
My job. And my mother has left me forever.
What am I doing here?
Why am I alive, Gulabo?
Don't talk like that.
The world needs you and your poetry.
The world needs nobody.
I tried my best to make my poetry reach the world.
But you know how the world valued it?
Waste paper sold for ten annas.
My life is valued at ten annas, Gulabo.
Do you want me to live for ten annas?
Don't lose courage, there's much to live for.
There's Meena.
How do you know her?
I read her name on your file.
Who is she?
She is chaste and virtuous society girl...
...who loves for fun and amusement...
...and sells that love for comfort.
But why take such an interest in her?
Because you did.
That's why.
You mean you...
No, forget me.
I can only make you suffer.
I've never been able to make anyone happy.
You'll publish them?
- What for?
Am I mad?
Call that gibberish poetry?
The world needs you...
You must know we publish famous poets, not the trash of novices.
Could you bear my burden...
...when you couldn't feed yourself?
It wasn't our wish that...
...our parents produce such a good-for-nothing.
Have you read about the poet?
I knew him well.
Why did he commit suicide?
"Tragic death of young poet"
"Last night a young man jumped in front of the Burdwan train"
"His body was mutilated beyond recognition"
"A letter in his pocket..."
"...contained his last poem, his last message to world"
"His name was... Vijay"
Are you all right?
What is it?
SHADOWS
Send her in.
Who are you?
Where from?
- Sona... from Dharmtallah.
Give me the poems.
If you know they are poems, you'll know they are beautiful.
I want them published.
So you're going to show them to my husband.
What's your price?
- You'll publish them?
May I will, may be not.
Name your price!
Price?
I haven't come to bargain.
I want them published.
Are these poems precious to you?
How did you know Vijay?
By good fortune.
- Your relationship?
Relationship?
How could such a gentleman meet a lady of your background?
Good fortune.
You sell much for money.
Why not sell these poems?
Are you Meena?
My husband will be here any moment.
Sell me the poems before he comes.
I'll pay 1,000 rupees... 2000.
- Not even 30,000.
What's that? Show me.
"For Meena..."
"...whose memory has inspired every word"
I brought them to have them published.
What is that?
- It's all I own in the world.
I can't pay you more for their publication.
They must be published.
I'll be eternally grateful to you.
A fine bookseller you are!
We want Vijay's book.
How can it be sold out so soon?
Is it "under the counter"?
Have the third edition tomorrow.
Or we'll burn the shop.
If only you were alive to see this.
Have you established his identity?
No, he hasn't said one word since he was admitted.
How are you?
Let me know if he speaks at all.
I can't pay more than
5,000 for them.
They've his poems but too high a price.
Do you want to cream of all the profit and leave me with nothing?
Then name a sensible price politely.
Sir, these poems are priceless.
Vijay's last, unique works.
I'll share fifty-fifty.
I can't pay that much.
- Nice to have met you.
You're strange.
Twenty five per cent.
My last offer.
Now you may leave.
I wouldn't like you to think I'm unreasonable.
Here, let's shake on it.
"I recollect the past"
"I adorn your hair with flowers"
"What is this secret which chokes me..."
"which parches my lips?"
"I recollect the past"
"Shadows"
These are my poems, all mine.
This is my book.
Of course.
But what is your name?
My name is Vijay. This book was written by me.
The Vijay who wrote this book is dead.
Think carefully, what is your real name?
Why don't you believe me?
I tell you my name is Vijay.
Why have you kept me here?
Let me go!
I think he has lost his mind.
Telephone Doctor Sen.
So you are Vijay's brothers?
His elder brothers.
- I'm the eldest.
What do you want?
Shall I tell him?
- No, you go ahead.
I asked you what you want.
Well, I brought up Vijay and educated him...
...and cared for him so that he would be someone one day.
So did I.
- I have no time. Get to the point.
The point is, we've come for some money from you.
Are you sane?
We are the rightful heirs to his property.
Including poems.
We have a legal right to the money you gain from his works.
We don't want it all, we'll be content with some.
I don't know you and I didn't get the poems from you.
You won't get a penny.
Understand?
It isn't Vijay.
Shyam!
No, he's not Vijay.
So you want a share?
The rightful claimant is Vijay.
He's alive.
Yes, he's alive.
No! You must be joking.
I never joke.
However, you will get a share of the profit.
Two percent...
...on condition that...
...you refuse to identify Vijay.
Why shouldn't we identify our brother?
What are we?
- Do you consider us so low?
For a mere two per cent?
- Make it 6%.
Massage! Oil Massage!
A ghost!
Lord, please make it vanish.
Let go off poor Sattar!
It's me, Vijay.
So you aren't dead.
He's really alive.
I've been forcibly detained.
Get me out.
What is it?
I'll massage your head only if you agree.
"If your head reels with pain, or your heart sinks in gloom"
Brother.
Don't you recognize me?
I'm your brother Vijay.
Why so quiet?
Won't you recognize me, either?
Are you mad?
Vijay's dead.
You've the nerve to call yourself our brother.
Get out of here! Our brother!
Going to the meeting for
Vijay's death anniversary?
Of course.
Vijay was a friend of mine.
Did you really know Vijay?
Move aside, let me pass.
He was fine poet.
A noble man.
If it wasn't for my help...
...he would have died
6 months earlier.
How?
- Of starvation.
Hurry, we won't get a seat.
You all know...
...we are gathered in memory of Vijay.
On this day last year...
...a terrible event took the great poem from us.
If I could have saved Vijay,
I would have given my fortune...
...and my life.
It could not be.
Why? Because of you all.
It is said he committed suicide...
But in fact you killed him.
If Vijay were alive he would see... the world which...
...starved him is ready to shower wealth on him.
The world in which...
...he died unknown, would treat him as a king.
Today this world would give him a palace.
"This world of palaces, of kingdoms, this world of power"
"The enemies of humanity, this world of rituals"
"These men who crave wealth, as their way of life"
"For what will it profit a man if he gain the world?"
"People with parched souls, with wounded spirits"
"With troubled gaze and sad hearts"
"This world which is distraught, and full of trouble"
"For what shall it profit a man if he gain the world?"
"The world where life is considered trivial"
"A world where the dead are worshipped"
"A world where death is cheaper than life"
"For what shall it profit a man if he gain the world?"
"A world where youth is driven to crime"
"A world where the young are groomed for the market-place"
"A world where love is another name for trade"
"For what shall it profit a man if he gain the world?"
"A world where man is worth nothing"
"A world where loyalty and friendship mean nothing"
"A world where love is regarded with disdain"
"For what shall it profit a man if he gain the world?"
"Burn this world, blow it asunder"
"Burn this world, blow it asunder"
"Take this world away from my sight"
"This world belongs to you, you keep it"
"For what shall it profit a man if he gain the world?"
Stop his brothers, give whatever they want.
They mustn't identify him.
Sorry, all your resources cannot stop...
...Vijay being identified now.
Can you bribe everyone now?
Buy everyone,
I'll spend all I have...
I don't want it proved he's Vijay.
Or we'll lose our name, we'll be finished.
Save yourself. I know how to save my own neck.
What!
You think you'll do it so easily?
You denied him, too!
I sway with the wind.
I followed you when it was in my interest. Now I'll ally with Vijay.
You're looking happy.
Why not? I have my hands on the king of fame.
I've got Vijay; I'll earn millions by publishing his poems.
Bravo! Excellent!
It's a goldmine.
Do you think you'll mine it alone?
You'll share it with me.
What are you gaping at?
Get out!
You are very insolent, young man.
Who are you?
- Never mind.
But I can identify Vijay if I so choose...
...and if I don't, he'll be shut away as a lunatic.
Are you the head of state, to lock someone away?
His brothers know him.
We'll identify him.
- Of course.
He may not care about us.
- We may not profit.
After all he is our blood.
- Why shouldn't we identify him?
Well said!
Brothers are Brothers!
I spent 5,000 on his education.
4,000 on feeding.
If we'd loaned it, we'd have 15,000 now.
Will you pay to identify him?
- Yes, 15,000.
But you have your precious brother back.
What more could you want?
We don't want a brother, we want money.
We can't eat him.
Vijay, my brother!
Is he really Vijay?
Where's the proof?
Sit down! Soon you'll say that I'm not Sattar.
How can we know that he is Vijay?
What about the suicide?
We prove it.
The neighbourhood knows,
Vijay is our brother.
We say he is Vijay.
And I confirm that he's my boyhood friend.
The great poet Vijay.
The Vijay you wish to welcome so warmly...
...the Vijay for whom you shout slogans...
...I am not that Vijay.
I'm not Vijay.
- Why deceive us?
I said he was an imposter.
A publicity-seeker. Hit him!
"Burn it! Blow it asunder"
"Burn it..."
"blow the world asunder"
"Take this world away from my sight"
"The world belongs to you, you keep it"
Are you mad?
What did you do?
Tell these people you're Vijay, there is still time.
What's wrong?
They're all here for you.
Why not tell them?
I am not that Vijay.
He is dead.
- What are you saying?
All your friends say that you are Vijay. Come to your senses.
Friends?
They are not my friends.
They're friends of wealth.
Once they refused to identify me.
But now...
Why turn against yourself because of false friends?
Why refuse fame and fortune...
...when you can repudiate those people?
I have no complaint against them or any human being.
But against a society that...
...denies the right to be human.
That makes a brother a stranger, a friend an enemy.
I complain against a world that worships no humans.
But worships idols.
That destroy humans and tramples them.
Where it is a crime to share the sorrows of the poor.
Where it is cowardice to face troubles.
In such a world I shall never be at peace, Meena.
No peace, ever.
That is why I am going away, far away.
Did someone call me?
No one called. Sleep.
Gulabo, where are going?
You're feverish.
Someone called me.
Let me go.
I am going far away, Gulabo.
Where?
Where I won't need to go any further.
Is that what you came to say?
Will you come?
Some drink, drink, drink, drink, drink
Do you hear us about
You lazy lout
We want some beer
We want some wine
We want some wine
We want some beer
We want some wine
We want some beer
We want some wine
Pour out the wine
and drink and drink till morning
Pour out the wine
for drinking is divine
lt is divine
Pour out the wine
and drink and drink till morning
Pour out the wine
Pour out the wine
And drink
for drinking is divine
We want some wine
and drink till morning
We want some wine
and drink till morning
We want some wine
We want some wine
And drink and drink till morning
We want some wine
Good day, my friends
Good day
A chair, a glass of wine
and a pipe
Excuse me, Master
if you don't mind
l'll sit and drink and smoke
same as you
Fair's fair
- How true
Make a place for two
Come on, make a place for two
Nott' e giorno mal dormire
The devil take you and Mozart
At once, sir
What makes you so put out
lndeed we never would have known you
Now what on earth
brought that about
Frozen earth all dead or dying
There in the snow buried deep
And outside where he was lying
The sight of a drunkard asleep
That's true
Seeing him there
a craving seized my brain
For drinking
Yes, drinking
Then do the same
Lie down there in the ditch
- And for a pillow
- The pavement
- And for a roof
- The sky
- What about sheets
- The rain
Are you having nightmares, Hoffmann
The first song is yours then
Don't make us ask again
The chorus leave to us
Yes, leave that to us
Right
Choose something that's gay
Sing the song of the rat
No, we're all sick of that
l know
We'll have to have
the one about Kleinzach
Oh, yes, come on
We'll have the song about Kleinzach
Right
Here's Kleinzach
Now long ago
the duke of renowned Eisenach
The duke of Eisenach
Employed a tiny clown
with the name of Kleinzach
He had the name Kleinzach
He wore a busby big and black
And his noddle
his noddle did go crick-crack
Crick-crack
Crick-crack
So that's
So that's Kleinzach
- Crick-crack
- Crick-crack
- Crick-crack
- Crick-crack
So that's
So that's
Kleinzach
He also had a paunch
quite as stout as a stack
As stout as any stack
His feet looked just like twigs
sticking out of a sack
Like twigs in any sack
He capered like a jumping jack
And his knees cracked together
And went click-clack
Click-clack
Click-clack
So that's
So that's Kleinzach
- Click-clack
- Click-clack
- Click-clack
- Click-clack
So that's
So that's
Kleinzach
Now what words
What words to paint those features
Now what words to paint those features
Now what words
What words to paint those features
To paint those features
Past comparing
She is there
Fair
Fair as dawn of the day
When love first bade me dare
to leave the home of my youth
And in my heart to swear
l would fly far away
to a world we could share
Oh, her hair
Oh, her hair with its curls entwining
Shed a warmth where the snow
of her bosom was shining
Her eyes, her eyes
unfathomed lakes of blue
Spread around where she trod
A reflection as true
And as our pageant car
By cupids all attended
Sped on with ne'er a jar
Her voice with triumph blended
While mortals held their breath
Sang out with heavenly art
While mortals held their breath
She sang with heavenly art
Till echoes melt in death
Resounding
Through
My heart
Oh, Stella
Three women blended as one
Three souls
United as one
True artist
Tender maiden
And courtesan
My mistress
No, no, rather say my three
Three magic visions fair to see
Of all my life they claimed a part
Would you hear
the three tales of my folly of love
Yes, yes, yes
Now what do you mean
three magic visions
Your pipe
And by the time
you have to light it up again
You'll know why
when all has been said
Even you, who in this tale
of my heart and its pain
Showed good sense
and still kept your head
Good sirs
the curtain is going to rise
Let it rise then
Let it rise then
- For that we don't care a pin
- No, we don't care a pin
Right you are
Now we're in our glory
While we drink
listen to a story
At the clouds of our smoke we gaze
And see dreams in the growing haze
At the clouds of our smoke we gaze
And see dreams
ln the growing haze
l'll begin then
Begin then
Begin then
Here's the story of the first
Olympia was her name
There, sleep in peace
Aha
Modest and sweet and clever
Through her l shall endeavor
to recoup the whole sum at a stroke
That l lost
when my backer went broke
Yes, but what of Coppelius
l swear he sits up nights
thinking up ways to blackmail me
By filing a claim against me
for inventor's rights
Words fail me
Well, l'm glad he's not here
Ah, come in
Sir, good day
An early hour to call, sir
Tell me, sir, you're a pupil
Not worth your skill at all, sir
You're too modest, l should say
Pay to art no more attention
Learn mechanical invention
Then a degree
Might come your way
There's my daughter to see, sir
She's a heavenly sight
Yes, science is always right
do you hear
Olympia's very, very dear
First his science, then his daughter
What can be the connection
Cochenille, come to me, sir
Go turn up all the lights
And the ch-cham-p-pagne
Leave that to me
Stay here, my boy
l'll return to you straight
So be it
To my fate l bid defiance
l will study naught but science
Let knowledge come in any guise
l must deserve
The one l treasure
ln my heart l feel there's a measure
Of the stuff that makes men wise
She is there
lf l dared
She's there
Now could l dare
Oh, how fair
How divinely fair
Ah, could we two together
Know the same tomorrow
The same remembered past
We could share every joy
Could share in every sorrow
Could share in every sorrow
Yes, every sorrow
we could share to the last
May then
Oh, may my dreaming
ln you reflect the morn
Let clouds of glory streaming
Proclaim that love is born
Let clouds of glory streaming
Proclaim that love is born
'Tis l, Coppelius
Now look out
Very gently
A man
Who can he be
What's he eyeing so intently
Our Olympia, eh
Why not
Their Olympia, eh
Young fellow
My dear sir
Hears not a jot
Dear sir
Dear sir
Yes, what
Oh, Coppelius, sir, is my name
As a friend
l Signor Spalanzani attend
You see all these barometers
And hygrometers and thermometers
Very cheap, but pay in cash
and you'll agree you've not been rash
These glasses in a flash
turn all as black as a sweep
Or else as white as whitening
As white as whitening
Dark as night, dark as night
Bright as lightning
l've got eyes, actual eyes, alive
And eyes a-blazing
l have eyes people prize
for hidden hearts are they appraising
And at times it may befall
A heart they can present
To those who've got none at all
l've got eyes, actual eyes, alive
And eyes a-blazing
l've got eyes
Lovely eyes
See
Would you try the heart of a woman
Whether kind or whether inhuman
Would you rather have the knack
To see it white when it is black
Look and you will see
all you want to see
Try all my eyes
l've eyes alive and eyes a-blazing
l've eyes the heart appraising
Try out my eyes
ls that true
Well, try
Here, then
That's three ducats
Gracious heaven
Power divine
Oh, the charms
that so brightly round her shine
Three ducats
My love, can this be true
For three ducats
Oh, but why snatch away
That heavenly vision
of delight and of love
Oh, you
Dear professor
Well what
lt had all been agreed
- Not in writing
- Still
No jesting
A fortune you will realize
And half will be mine
Must l keep on protesting
Olympia's mine
- Oh, no, she's got my eyes
Less loud
Less loud
Less loud
Her eyes
Yes, he's right
for l don't know how they work
But l'll fix it
Yes
Would you like
a further 500 ducats
Just sign for me that you're resigning
Her eyes
with all the rest of her designing
Then l'll give you a check
On the house of Elias
Elias
Splendid reputation
Whatever's this negotiation
All right
Agreed
Come on, come on
My friend indeed
l rather think it is he who will pay
By the way, a suggestion
Marry off Olympia now
That young fellow there, l vow
Very soon will pop the question
My friend indeed
That is science, my friend
Lord
He's quite demented
Oh, sir, the g-guests
w-wait to be presented
None but our host
l do declare
None, l do declare
Entertains with such a flair
With such a flair
Wealth and good taste
combine to greet us
All combine to greet us
Sheer perfection
Sheer perfection through and through
Now, Signor Spalanzani, do
Now, Signor Spalanzani, do
Now, Signor Spalanzani, do
Allow your daughter to meet us
They do say none was made so neat
They do say none was made so neat
They do say
They do say
And none so faultless in their graces
- We'll not be allowed
- We'll not be allowed to eat
Till she's seen us face-to-face
and shown her paces
None but our host, l do declare
None, l do declare
Entertains with such a flair
With such a flair
Wealth and good taste
combine to greet us
All combine to greet us
Sheer perfection
Sheer perfection through and through
Sheer perfection through and through
Sheer perfection through and through
You will not have to wait, my friends
a moment more
At last we'll see close to
the pride of all his treasure
That he does cherish
past all measure
Be quiet
Here she comes
And now, ladies and gentlemen
Your wish l am granting
My daughter Olympia
Enchanting
Enchanting
Enchanting
Enchanting
A lovely pair of eyes
Her figure is perfection
A wonderful complexion
There's nothing more to add
A lovely pair of eyes
Her figure is perfection
A wonderful complexion
ln fact she isn't bad
Who sees her must adore her
And heaven bow before her
A great success, my dear
She's really not so bad
A lovely pair of eyes
Her figure is perfection
A wonderful complexion
There's nothing more to add
ln fact
ln fact she isn't bad
She isn't bad
ln fact
ln fact she isn't bad
- She isn't bad
- She isn't bad
- She isn't bad
- She isn't bad
She isn't bad
She is not bad
Not bad
And now, ladies and gentlemen
Flattered by all you say
And besides, eager to earn
your critical praise without delay
My child, keen to fall in
with your slightest caprices
Will, if you wish
Parade all her technical pieces
Sing a song for you all
And supporting her voice
high soprano
l'll play you the guitar or piano
Or the harp
So make your choice
The harp, sir
The harp, sir
Very good
Cochenille, be quick
and bring us here the harp
Yes, the harp
my daughter sings to
To hear her voice
What joy
What things love finds to say
Come now
Away with your dismay and be gay
Yes, yes
Th-Th-Th-There
My friends, no more delay
N-No m-m-m-more delay
No more delay
No more delay
Birds in woodland ways are winging
Shines the morning star above
Now all maiden hearts are ringing
Now all maiden hearts are ringing
With love
For all are in love
Now that is the song to be singing
And that is my song of love
My song of love
- Now that is the song to be singing
- That's the song she's always singing
- And that is my song of love
- That's her song
Her song of love
- My song of love
- That is her song
- That is her song
- That is her song
- Of love
New delights can love discover
Joyous lark or sighing dove
Broken hearts can soon recover
Broken hearts can soon recover
With love
For all are in love
Now that is the song for a lover
And that is my song of love
My song of love
- Now that is the song for a lover
- That's the song she's always singing
- And that is my song of love
- That's her song
Her song of love
- My song of love
- That is her song
- That is her song
- That is her song
- Of love
Her reputation's well deserved
Oh, what scales
What scales
Now will you all look for your places
For the supper now is served
Supper at last
Supper at last
Supper at last
That is grand
Unless you expected a dance before
No, no, the supper must be respected
And then strike up the band
Strike up the band
lt's just as l planned
Will you allow me
After she has rested
she'll give you a dance
Yes, yes
There you are
She'll obey
Would you mind if now l suggest
That you should stay in here with her
while we're away
lt's an honor
Now we'll see what he will find to say
She's not eating today
No
Food she finds too coarse to mention
What's that
That
Pure invention
Yes, my boy
Pure invention
S-S-S-Supper is served
Supper at last is served
Now it's served
None but our host, l do declare
None, l do declare
Entertains with such a flair
With such a flair
None but our host, l do declare
None, l do declare
Entertains with such a flair
So now they've gone away at last
And you are near me
Quite, quite alone
Oh, may l hope that you will hear me
Olympia
Oh, my love
Let me gaze for a while
And dazzled by your charms
Let me bask in your smile
Yes
Yes
Did l hear a sigh
escape your lips so tender
Or was it but a dream
my fever does engender
No
No
Gentle sigh
a pledge of love begun
You now are mine
Our hearts forevermore are one
Can you feel, my love
That joy ever springing
From a heart's silent replies
Two souls
One in their scheming
With a sweep
they are winging
Till we ascend the skies
May then
Oh, may my dreaming
ln you reflect the morn
May clouds of glory streaming
Proclaim that love is born
May clouds of glory streaming
Proclaim that love is born
Oh, my dear, do but stay
Why must you leave me so
Tell me
Why turn away
Then l'll go where you go
Oh, good lord
don't get so excited
Come on now and have a good feed
Oh, Nicklaus, my love is requited
My love
Love divine
Oh, indeed
lf you knew
what against her was cited
What can be cited
What
- That she's a dead thing
- Great heavens
- Or never was alive
Oh, Nicklaus, my love is requited
My love
Love divine
The cheat
The rogue
lt's ruination
Elias can't meet his obligation
So, then all in good time
l shall find out the way
to be revenged
l'm fleeced
l'm fleeced
Me
l'll make someone pay
Let the dancing proceed
The opening
They're repeating
How the waltz sets our hearts a-beating
Let the gentleman lead you so
Now go
Yes
Yes
Now she's dancing
How entrancing
Never could art such grace impart
Smiling, smiling
How beguiling
Light as the air
Now here, now there
Now she's dancing
How entrancing
Never could art such grace impart
Smiling, smiling
How beguiling
Light as the air
Now here, now there
Olympia, no
Someone detain her
Someone detain her
Why should we be expected to go
He's in trouble now
What could be plainer
Now what the devil
There they go
Now go slow
That's right
No more, no more
dear daughter
You've had enough today
No more, no more
dear daughter
Go and escort her
back where you know
S-S-So then
S-So then
So
No
What do you think they're saying
Such compliments we're paying
There's nothing more to add
She's not too bad
She's not too bad
No, she's not too bad
She's not too bad
- ls he dead
- No
ln falling
only his glasses came to grief
He revives
What relief
Truly appalling
He revives
What relief
- Truly appalling
- Truly appalling
- What
- The spectacle maker-- there
Merciful gods
Olympia, beware
Olympia, beware
Oh, heavens
Now she has crashed
She's crashed
Yes, she is smashed
You fright
You swine
You fool
Fox
Fanatic
lt's automatic
lt's automatic
Ha, ha, ha
lt's too dramatic
His beloved's automatic
How too dramatic
His beloved's automatic
His beloved's automatic
- You cheat
- You fiend
You cheat
She's automatic
Moon of love
O tender moon
Smile down on our caresses
Fools demand of day a boon
O lovely tender moon
Memory fades and all too soon
No past delight confesses
Sad with shame our years are strewn
For memory fades too soon
The breeze all
- The breeze all afire
- Warms the kiss that it presses
The breeze all afire
- lt warms the kiss it presses
Leaves a kiss of desire
Warms the kiss
Our desire
Warms the kiss
Our desire
Moon of love
O tender moon
Smile down on our caresses
Fools demand of day a boon
O lovely tender moon
Lovely tender moon
Smiling on our caresses
Tender moon
- O moon of love
O tender moon
For me a love like that
l swear can never fire me
Enraptured by her charms
for love of whom we die
ln our bliss
what need to sigh
No
A laugh in the heart
Has a song to inspire me
Has a song to inspire me
A love full of worry and care
Beware
Beware
A love that is merry and bright
Delight
Delight
When passion's blazing fire
in your heart is burning
The fever of desire
will inflame its yearning
Yet love they say
Will die away
Will die away
Will die away
Have done with dreary dying
For two bright eyes
For we all cares defying
Despise all ties
No sense in sighing if you're wise
Have done with dreary dying
For two bright eyes
For we all cares defying
Despise all ties
No sense in sighing when you're wise
l see
A celebration
How delightful, milady
Schlemil
Well, l did cry for you
three whole days
- Did you
- Runt
- Look here
- No, not now
Do you see we've a poet
from abroad here today
Hoffmann
- Too charmed
- Too charmed
Oh, what a gloomy face
Will you all find a place
for a game of faro
Bravo
Let's have a game
What insolence
Come on
Come on, my friends
Come on, come on, come on
A word
l've two horses ready saddled
But no sweethearting
Once your daydreams begin
then, Hoffmann, we're departing
And what daydreams indeed
Do you think one could trace
ln such a worldly place
Can one love one in her station
That Schlemil says he does
He's not the same as l
You be careful
The devil's very quick
He can try
lf l fall in love with her
Then l shall deserve damnation
Come on
- Come on
So gleam
With desire
Keen diamond
the sunlight reflecting
So gleam with desire
With splendor steal her heart
As the moths fly round a candle
Woman does crave your fire
Though 'tis death to admire
They're but staking their being
But she forswears her soul
They're but staking their being
But she forswears
Her soul
So gleam
With desire
Keen diamond
the sunlight reflecting
So gleam
With desire
And steal her heart
And steal her heart
Yes, steal her heart
Diamond afire
Now steal her heart
Diamond afire
Now gleam
And steal
Her heart
Fair angel
What must l do
to merit such a prize
This
You've already shown
You allure the hearts of men
ln guile you are so wise
That through you l now do own
The shadow of Schlemil
l require new delights
And l ask
will you get me
Hoffmann's reflection today
Yes, his reflection
Do you doubt
the potent strength
Of those eyes
That poet's dream
above desire may rise
Why, yes, indeed
While l chanced to be about
At you he sneered
At you he sneered
Then l'll make
Hoffmann dance
Here he is
Here he is
You're leaving me so
No more to lose
What, even you
So you mean to insult me
So you mean to insult me
No regrets and no thanks
Well, go
Yes, go
And leave you to your sorrow
No, l love you
Though l should die tomorrow
Are you mad
and have you got no qualms
That with your life any moment
any hour, you may pay
And that my love will lose you
evermore if you stay
And that Schlemil
may strike you dead in my arms
You cannot refuse my prayer
My life is all yours, l swear
Ah, go
And soon l'll be with you
And then no more alarms
O heaven
Ajoy divine
lllumines all around me
Like music from the spheres
Your voice has pierced my heart
A fervent eager flame
Consumes my every part
Your glances kindle mine
And tongues of fire surround me
They burn as the stars in the skies
And l feel with my love ablaze
The breath of your passion that plays
On my mouth and on my eyes
The breath of your passion
Of your passion that plays
On my mouth
On my mouth
And on my eyes
O heaven
Ajoy divine
lllumines all around me
Your glances kindle mine
And tongues of fire
And tongues of fire
Surround me
Your eyes
Your face
This reflection close to mine
lt is for that l pray
What
My reflection
What do you mean
This
When it is wiped away
And when the glass is clean
Unimpaired
Straightaway in my heart
lt shall stay
- ln your heart
- ln my heart
'Tis l
'Tis l for this am pleading
All else do l abjure
- You are sure
- l am sure
Whether heedless or heeding
l am yours, l'm sure
Though the night
Though the night be dying
May the day
the day endure
Though the night
Though the night be dying
May the day endure
Though the night be dying
May the day endure
May the day endure
Schlemil
Just as l thought
Together
You see, my friends
You see
lndeed l rather wonder whether
We should greet a new devotee
Why, sir
Don't answer
He's got my key
l love you
Let us kill him
No, not now
You're looking very pale, sir
l
Well, look for yourself
Heavens
What
My reflection
l have lost my reflection
My reflection
- She may know
Look at his dismay
Oh, come
Let's get away
Or you have lost your soul
No
No
l love her
l love her
Let me go
Alas
My soul again outpouring
My burning passion brooks no delay
A curse on love
All faults ignoring
For my reason still
Says me nay
- lf she smiles
- Oh, my friend
- All desire is soaring
- Your soul outpouring
- Yet my shame
- All in vain
- Would tear me away
- Brooks no delay
l may hate
Yet still l'm adoring
Though death were mine
From her a kiss l pray
My dearest friend
'Tis you l'm adoring
- My soul outpouring
- l ne'er refuse what comes my way
- My passion brooks no stay
Accursed love all faults ignoring
- This diamond
Sets all hearts a-soaring
- When passion burns it brooks no stay
- What does it cost
- So how can you say me nay
- A kiss to pay
'Tis you, my friend, l'm adoring
- Though l hate, l'm adoring
l ne'er refuse what comes my way
lf it demand a kiss to pay
All who admire l'm adoring
All who admire
l'm adoring
My friends am l imploring
To bear you far away
Away
Away
Do you hear, my friends
The music is playing
Gondolas gently swaying
And so the evening ends
Moon of love
O tender moon
Smile down on our caresses
Fools demand of day a boon
O lovely tender moon
Lovely tender moon
Smile upon our caresses
Tender moon
O moon of love
- O tender moon
- O moon
All in vain
Dead leaves are falling
How cruel, yet how sweet
Our last farewell recalling
l seem to see him still
He is here
He is mine
Even now l see him still
He is mine
He is here
He is mine
All in vain
Dead leaves are falling
All in vain
Heart of mine
ln my dreams
Fond hours recalling
Thou dost ask for a sign
Fond lover stay
My voice is calling
To say that my love is thine
Know that my love is thine
Know that my love
ls thine
All in vain
Dead leaves are falling
All in vain
All in vain
Heart of mine
Franz, so they're here
Get up, my friend
Eh, who is that
Why, it's Hoffmann
Himself
And now where is Antonia
Oh, sir, he's not at home
Deafer l find since a year ago
You are too kind, sir
Yes, thanks to heaven
l am quite well
l said Antonia
Go tell her l'm here
l'll call Master Crespel
Oh, how glad he'll be
Sweet is the song lovers learn
From the hours of sun or showers
Sweet the hours of sun or showers
My love
Antonia
l knew within my heart
a love like yours
Would never, never fail me
My heart has told me too
Your tears were shed for me
My heart then told me too
Your tears were shed for me
- So, a farewell to sorrow
- So, a farewell to sorrow
- For yours will l be tomorrow
- For mine will you be tomorrow
Fly happy hours
Days to come all are ours
- Days to come all are ours
All are ours
Days to come
Days to come
Days to come
All are ours
All ours
Days to come
all are ours
All ours
And yet, beloved, if l may
There is something l must say
That torments me
Through and through
When your music l hear
My jealousy keeps growing
You love it too much
Oh, what a curious fear
you are showing
Do l love you because of music
Or music because of you
For you would never fear
to hear me singing
As my father fears
What do you say
Yes, my father has even
Forbidden me this room
that l love so
But will you hear me
But how strange
What can he mean
Then come, as long ago
Yes, come and hear me
And you can say if l can sing or no
lf l can sing
Or no
How your eyes are shining
And how your hand is trembling
Look, here's the song we loved
Often we sang it together
lt's the song we loved
Often we sang it together
Together
Sweet is the song lovers learn
From the hours of sun or showers
Sweet the hours of sun or showers
Turn by turn
Sweet is the song lovers learn
From the hours of sun or showers
How sweet is the song we learn
How sweet the song of love
The rose all her glory
the summer will lend
But when is the end of her story told
But when the end of her story
Of her story
Sweet is the song lovers learn
From the hours of sun
Of sun or showers
Sweet the hours of sun or showers
Turn by turn
Sweet is the song lovers learn
From the hours of sun or showers
How sweet is the song we learn
How sweet is the song of love
Are you ill
No
Listen
Heavens
lt's my father
Come
No
l shall never rest till this be clear
No
l thought that Hoffmann was in here
Wish he were at the devil
Many thanks
- Oh, sir
- What
Dr. Miracle is here
ldiot and scoundrel
Quickly shut all the doors
That is so
lt's the doctor
He
He a doctor
Not on your life
He never cures
but he destroys
And now he'd kill my child
As he killed my wife
l hear the sound of his bottles
as they clink in the air
Far from here may we keep him
He's there
Well, well
lt's myself
l am here, friend
Master Crespel at home
He's my dear friend
Where can he be
No, no
l was just looking for Antonia
Well, this illness her poor mother
did leave her
Going all right
She's a dear child
We'll soon get her well
Now take me to see her
You'd kill her tonight
lf you move a step
Then that moment
you will be lost
There, there
Be calm
l have no desire to grieve you
Why do that
lmpostor
Well, say on then
And be brief
Would you sit in this chair
l'm sitting here
How old are you
if you please
- Who, me
- lt is your daughter l mean
Antonia
Your age
Now reply, if you please
Only 20
Why, the springtime of life
Let's see
Let's see your hand
Her hand
Hush, let me take her pulse
God
ls this but a wanton dream
ls it illusion
The beat's very uneven and quick
A sad conclusion
Then sing
No, no
No more
You shall not make her sing
- Sing away
Look, her cheeks are aglow
Her eyes aflame
And she presses her hand to her heart
as it beats
What's he say
lt would be a shame
lt would indeed
lf we should leave to death
So fair a prey to claim
- No more, no more
lf you would care
to trust what l contrive
lf you would care
she could survive
Now see some bottles here
Which l keep in reserve
No more
These should provide
No more
The Lord preserve me
from your vile consultations
You torture and slay
These should provide
one dose each day
One dose each day
l hear you
Come this way
Quickly then
No delay
On my help now relying
may all your heart complying
- Love of my life
- Be gay
Why stay
- Love of my life
- Be gay
Away
- Now all my fears are dying
- Now with death
- l hear you, come this way
- Let him pay
- And all my tears
- Quickly then, no delay
- l'll save you come what may
- All my tears replying
- No delay
- Why stay, away
- From his spite all-defying
- Why stay, away
- Your throats are vain and lying
- May your heart now be gay
Away
Away
- No delay, now be gay
May all your heart complying
- So all my tears replying
Why stay
- Be gay
- Why stay
- Away
- l will provide one dose each day
- Away, away
Away
- l will provide one dose each day
No more to sing
Alas
But how can l persuade her
This sacrifice to make
And now, my father
What did he say
l cannot tell you now
But later you shall know
On a new road must we go
My bride that is to be
lf l'm to guide you
Forget you've heard a story
Of brilliant days to come
Of success and of glory
Then with all your heart
Trust in me
And if l do
Our love
more brightly yet appearing
Will bind me to your heart
Content and never fearing
Never fearing
Then come
l shall obey
Ah, can it ever be
That l shall fully know
All you've sacrificed for me
Your father
Will soon return
So l leave you for today
For today
lndeed, it's plain to see
My father's won him over
Ah, well
My tears are all in vain
For l have sworn
l'll never sing again
You'll never sing again
And have you thought it over
The sacrifice demanded
The youth that you will lose
Your beauty and your charms
And your art to refuse
All these gifts come from heaven
ln trust for you to share
And should they be entombed
ln the gloom of daily care
Or have you never heard
When you have dreamed of praise
Like all the forest leaves
That the wind is caressing
That soothing trembling roar
Of the crowd round you pressing
As they murmur your name
And hold you with their gaze
See there the burning joys
Before the feet of beauty
And these your youth in flower
ls ready to abjure
How commonplace the toys
They'd force you to endure
And children swarming round
To call you back to duty
Ah, what can be that voice
that so disturbs my heart
Are those the words of hell
Or does God take my part
No
No
No, it is false that delights
that excites me
Against ambitious pride
is my love armed to fight
For fame cannot rival
the calm that invites me
To the home of my heart's delight
What kind of love
From such a lover
For Hoffmann's made you the victim
To excite his brutal desire
Only your beauty feeds his fire
And for him as all discover
The time soon will come
when his passion will expire
No, tempt me not again
Away, l say
You shall no more be heard
l have sworn l am his
l know for me he'll stay
l am not my own mistress
And cannot break my word
And just a while ago
By his heart l adore
His everlasting love
So tenderly he swore
Who can save my soul
from the fiend
From my own self
My mother
O dear Mother
l love him
l love him
Your mother
You dare invoke her soul
Your mother
Now remember well
That 'tis her voice
speaks through mine
Ungrateful
She would tell of the fame
of her name
That you'd gladly forego
So listen
Antonia mine
Heavens
Just listen
Antonia mine
So listen
O God
My mother
My mother
Child of mine
Hear me calling
So now rejoice
'Tis thy mother who's calling
Hear her voice
Child of mine
hear me calling
So now rejoice
'Tis thy mother who's calling
Let thy heart rejoice
'Tis my mother who's calling
Her spirit is calling
Hers, the voice in your ear
A wiser voice than any other
Bequeathing you a skill divine
Which all the world longs to hear
- Antonia mine
- So listen
Now listen
- Antonia mine
Now again life's returning
And again her cheeks aflame
With wild bravos are burning
- Antonia mine
- My mother, my mother
Sing with her though tears are falling
Her spirit is calling
is calling
- Sing together, now sing
- Antonia mine
- My mother
- Though your tears are falling
- My mother
- Sing with her though tears are falling
- Child of mine
- Yes, her spirit is calling
- Hear me calling
- So now rejoice
- So now rejoice
- 'Tis your mother who's calling
Yes, l hear her voice
Oh, hear her voice
This is her voice
Yes, her spirit is calling
- Child of mine, hear me calling
- So now rejoice, this is her voice
- Ah, my mother
- This is my voice
- This is her voice, this is her voice
No, but stay
l am fainting
Grant a rest, l do pray
- No fast and faster
- All afire, all afire
- Still faster
- My frenzy l ne'er master
- But why this delay
'Tis your mother who's calling
Her spirit is calling you to rejoice
So hear her voice
- My mother
- She's calling
- l hear her voice
Yes, 'tis her spirit that does call
Yes, her spirit is calling
Her voice is calling
- Child of mine, hear me calling
- Yes, her spirit is calling
- 'Tis your mother who's calling
- So now rejoice
'Tis my mother who's calling
Let thy heart rejoice
'Tis my mother
l hear her voice
l seize on this joy all-defying
Ever flaming
How it sears my eyes
Ever flaming
Ever flaming
How it sears
How it sears my eyes
How it sears my eyes
How it sears my eyes
How it sears my eyes
A moment more ere life be flying
- Faster, faster
- A moment more ere life be flying
- Faster, faster
And then my soul
shall mount the skies
My voice is calling
And then my soul shall
mount the skies
My soul shall mount the skies
Her spirit is calling
so now rejoice
A moment more ere life be flying
- Calling to you
- And then my soul shall mount the skies
My voice is calling
so now rejoice
And then my soul
shall mount the skies
l seize on this joy all-defying
Ever flaming
How it sears my eyes
A moment more ere life be flying
And then
And then my soul
And then my soul
Shall mount
The skies
Antonia
Pour out the wine
and drink and drink till morning
Pour out the wine
for drinking is divine
Pour out the wine
and drink and drink till morning
Pour out the wine
Pour out the wine
And drink
for drinking is divine
Divine
He won't get that raise.
McKissack just can't turn him down so close to Christmas.
Look, what do you see in that guy?
He's got about as much future as a snowman.
That's opportunity knocking.
This may be your last chance to go out with a Yale man...
...who's the son of the president and founder of the California Fidelity Trust.
Please go away.
Twenty branches,
$ 1 0 million hanging from every branch.
-Bob, don't you ever give up?
-No, and l'm pretty too.
What a combination.
Money, rosy cheeks...
...money, flashing teeth...
...money, curly hair and money.
You see, Mr. McKissack, with prices going up on everything, l--
-A recession is just around the corner.
-What? l said, a recession is just around the corner.
Just yesterday,
R.B. Pulsifer himself predicted it.
Uh, yes, l know. That's the reason l thought it's time--
Dalton, how much business went through your hands last month...
...at Window Number 4?
-Oh, about $300,000.
-Three hundred thousand dollars.
That's quite a responsibility.
Most young men would be proud of being trusted with such a vast sum...
...but you're not satisfied.
But it's not the money that goes through my hands...
...it's what sticks to them.
-After all, on 42.50 a week, l--
-Forty-two-fifty a week?
You're a single man, young, in good health.
-You are in good health, aren't you?
-Yes, sir.
-Sleep well?
-Mm-hm.
You eat three wholesome meals a day...
...you sleep better than l do, you have work that you respect and enjoy.
-l only eat three meals a day.
-But, Mr. McKissack--
And l can't wear more than one suit at a time.
And l don't mind telling you that you got a suit on there...
...that looks a good deal better than mine.
Haven't been on a buying spree, have you? l haven't been buying anything.
That's just the point. l'd like to be able to buy things now and then.
-What sort of things?
-Oh, things, to use.
After all, l've been with the bank a long time now.
-And l'd like to get married too.
-Married?
On 42.50 a week?
Dalton, that doesn't make sense.
Oh, gee, Johnny, look at that kitchen. lsn't it dreamy?
We better get lunch and hurry back...
...or we'll be dreaming up a couple of new jobs.
Johnny, we could get a dime-store wedding ring and get the furniture instead.
For a little over a thousand dollars...
...we could completely furnish an apartment with rugs and draperies and everything.
Mibs.
We'd only have to pay a third down.
Oh, Johnny, look.
Two can live as cheaply as one. ln these times, honey, one can't live as cheaply as one. l love you, Mibs.
But a happy marriage is based on security and a future.
And if we did get married, how would we manage? l have nothing.
-How would we live?
-l'm sure something would come along.
Yeah, then we'd have to feed that too. lt's no use, Mibs. Without that raise, we'll never have enough to get married on.
Darling, it isn't the end of the world.
Look, the sun's still up there, big as life and twice as happy.
Sure. He doesn't work for the Friendly Bank, and McKissack isn't his boss.
Oh, l'm so confused, l don't know what to do.
-Why don't you rob the bank?
-Now, that's an idea, Emil.
Sure. l'll rob the bank, and when they discover l'm gone...
...they'll leave a light burning in my teller's window.
Take the case of Sam Schlemmer, alias Benny the Beetle.
He wanted to get married but had no money.
He stuck up the Chicago Merchants' Trust, stashed away the loot and took his rap.
That was April 3rd, 1 903. When he got out of jail, his girl was waiting.
They left on their honeymoon.
-How long did she have to wait?
-Only 33 years.
-Some honeymoon.
-Can't have everything.
-l think that's a beautiful story, Emil.
EMlL: Thank you, Mildred. lncidentally, Johnny, may l talk to you alone?
No. You still haven't paid me back the 5 l loaned you last week.
Don't be too hasty. This is a sure thing. l've got a horse going in the third so fast that he'll win the second.
-No.
-He doesn't trust me. l don't approve of betting on horses.
You don't approve of lots of things, but lots of people do them.
We don't have much time.
Would you snap it up and get me the merchant's lunch?
Typical bank clerk. No real merchant ever ordered the merchant's lunch. l've been telling you for years, you've gotta learn to enjoy life.
Live dangerously. l'll get you the pickled pig's feet. l hate pickled pig feet.
-These have all had pedicures.
-The merchant's lunch.
No daring.
No imagination.
Typical bank clerk.
Mildred here, she's an adventurer.
-She loves pickled pigs' feet.
-The merchant's lunch.
-What's the matter? The wedding off again?
-Will you please get us the lunch?
-You're not getting any younger, you know.
-Our lunch, Emil.
And neither are you.
Gather ye rosebuds while ye may
Old time is still a-flying:
And this same flower that smiles today
Tomorrow will be dying.
Then be not coy, but use your time
And while ye may, go marry:
For having lost but once your prime
You may for ever tarry.
Robert Herrick, 1 583.
Do we have to have poetry?
Why not? lt goes with the lunch.
-What a character.
-He makes sense, though.
-Johnny?
-Yeah?
Have you ever thought about what's gonna happen to you? To us?
-Are we just gonna go on and on and on?
-Who said we're just gonna go on and on?
Mibs, do you think l enjoy handing out money to other people...
...and then spending all afternoon adding up how much l handed out all morning? l hate banking. l hate figures. l hate addition and subtraction.
And l hate being an old maid.
Oh, baby. l wish we could get married today...
...but without that raise, it....
Well, look, our combined gross annual income is $421 2.25.
Before taxes.
You have it all figured out to the penny, haven't you?
You've got your whole life planned like a bank statement.
My father got married when he was only making $ 1 8 a week.
And steak was 9 cents a pound.
No, baby, it won't work. lt's too much of a gamble.
Well, what's wrong with gambling?
That kind?
What's wrong with taking a chance and getting married...
...just because you love somebody so much--?
What would we use for money?
You'll get lucky, Johnny.
Look at my uncle Julius.
He got married a pauper. Overnight, he made a fortune in the lumber business.
-Overnight?
-They discovered trees on his property.
Emil, they want you in the kitchen.
Somebody must want you. lf you were half the man she thinks you are, you'd marry this lovely girl right now.
Even if you had to live in a tree.
Remember, Johnny, a man in love is never afraid to take the long chance.
The trouble with you is you don't really love Mildred at all.
Maybe that is it.
Would a man who loved you eat like that at a time like this?
MlLDRED: No.
-l'm hungry. ls that such a crime?
A man who loved you, like Sam Schlemmer...
...would rob for you, steal for you, murder for you.
-Live in a tree for me.
-Exactly. But not Johnny. Oh, no.
What he's really thinking is,
''l've led this girl along for three years...
...and now that she's thinking of marriage, how can l start a quarrel and get rid of her?''
-Now, just a minute.
-You're right, Emil. You're absolutely right. lf you listen to him, you can't care for me.
Gather ye rosebuds while ye may
Well, maybe l don't care.
Maybe Emil's opened my eyes to something.
You and your combined gross annual income. l hate adding and subtracting too.
And l think that maybe you and l just don't add up.
-Are you satisfied now?
-No, she didn't leave me a tip.
Well, aren't you gonna run after her and beg her forgiveness?
-That was the whole idea.
-Peachy idea.
Maybe l don't wanna run after her, because maybe l'm right.
She'll see it my way and realize that l was only thinking of our future.
Alias Sam the Beetle.
Here's for my lunch. lt was good for a change. What was it?
Pickled pigs' feet.
[MEN GRUNTlNG]
Hey. Hey, what are you doing?
What's the big idea?
Go away, boy, will you?
JOHNNY:
Wait a minute.
Hey, Lefty, get this Boy Scout off me, will you?
Come on, let's blow, Lefty.
-Are you hurt badly?
-No.
We'd better get the police and tell them what happened.
-What happened?
-Two men were slugging you.
-l didn't see anybody slugging anybody.
-You didn't see--?
-Thanks anyway, son.
-But l just saw-- There were....
-Look, l go this way--
-Come on, son.
There's a fellow named McKissack. l gotta....
This is as far as l go. Come in. l'd like to show my appreciation. l'm awfully late. lf everything's all right, l'd like to--
Wait a minute, l'll see.
-How's it look, Max?
-All clear, boss.
There ain't a cop between here and Santa Anita.
-Come in, son.
-What?
Come in, l'll make it right with you.
-Honestly, you don't owe me anything.
-Boss, what happened to you?
Three guesses. Step in, son. l think l'd better run along. l don't wear shirts anyway. l said, step in. Didn't l, Frankie boy?
Yeah.
MAN 1 : A late scratch at the fairgrounds.
Ballerina's Baby.
MAN 2: What happened to your kisser?
MAN 3: Who hit you, boss?
A couple of Chick Sloane's boys tried to rough me up.
Think they can scare me out before Santa Anita opens. l'm gonna bust that two-bit syndicate of his wide open. l've got three sharp nags running today.
We're gonna ride them and ride them hard.
MAN 4:
What if Chick gets wise?
He won't. l run classes for boys like him.
We'll bet everything we've got in his horse rooms.
Not a dime in California so we don't tip our mitt.
Chicago, Cleveland,
New Orleans, New York.
Get a line and keep it open.
[CHATTERlNG]
Sit down, son.
Look, l work in a bank and they'll wonder where l am.
Great. Keep them guessing.
Show them you're independent.
Joe, get over here in a hurry.
[PHONE RlNGS]
Yeah, Chick Sloane. l'll teach that rat how to go broke in one easy lesson. l wanna do something for you, kid.
Just name it.
Uh.... Could you get me a telephone?
-l've had my order in for a year and a half.
-Sure.
[PHONE RlNGS]
Call me later, honey.
-Well, then, thanks very much.
-Wait a minute. That ain't enough.
Well, what's that?
-What does it look like, a blotter?
HARRlS: lt's a thousand bucks for you.
Gee whiz.
-What are you drinking?
-A thousand-dollar bill. l can't. You don't owe me anything like that. l owe you plenty.
Chick Sloane's goons would've had me in a hospital if you hadn't come along. l always pay off, kid.
What's the matter?
Don't you like money?
-Well, sure.
HARRlS: Can't think of a way to spend it?
Slip it under your pillow tonight.
You'll dream of something.
Oh, a thousand-dollar bill.
[COUGHS]
-l just remembered something.
HARRlS: What's that? l don't drink.
And l don't want anything to do with anything like this. l gotta....
[PHONE RlNGS]
Hold it.
Listen to me, son.
When l wanna show my appreciation, l expect cooperation.
Don't make it tough.
Let's say l'm lending you the grand.
Harry, you got Chicago?
Put 20 Gs down on Heavenly Queen.
You heard me, 20 big ones.
On the nose.
Chick Sloane's place on Dearborn Street.
All right, l'll take it. lt's probably counterfeit, but l'll take it.
-Now, please let me go back to the bank.
-Harry, make it 21 .
Put 20 down for me and a grand for an old pal. l work in a bank and l'm not allowed to bet on horses.
-Everybody's allowed to bet.
-They are? lt's in the constitution. Relax, kid.
You got a thousand bucks riding on Heavenly Queen.
Mibs.
Dalton's over an hour late.
You any idea where he's gone?
No, l just know where l'd like him to go, but we don't have a branch down there.
[KNOCKS]
Well, Old Man Opportunity knocks again.
-Say, would you like to go--?
-Yes.
Wait a second. How am l gonna learn to be a wolf if you give in so easily?
Bob, please take me out tonight.
Think l'm the type that takes out a girl that's engaged?
Yes.
All right, l'll pick you up at 8:30.
Where would you like to go?
Someplace where it costs a dollar and a half for bread and butter.
Where the music's so expensive that you can hardly hear it. l wanna drink champagne and Cointreau...
...and just anything that you can't mix with cola. l wanna dance and dance and stay out so late that the neighbors will talk. l wanna enjoy life. l wanna live dangerously.
What an opportunity for a heel like me.
HARRlS:
Four, five, six.
There you are, son, 6 grand.
Compliments of Chick Sloane.
That isn't my money.
Nobody loans $ 1 000 without collateral and nobody gives away 6000...
...without a note, co-signers and 6 percent interest.
This is a new kind of a bank.
With horses. l loaned you a thousand, remember?
Now, look.
You're returning the loan, see?
You wouldn't be returning a G unless l lent you a G.
That proves l lent it to you.
Now you can get the 5 grand you won, and nobody can say boo and we're even.
Nobody hands out money without wanting anything.
What's the matter, junior?
My money no good?
Well, l didn't mean to insult you, but l don't want the money.
-Something wrong with you, kid?
-We ought to give this guy a saliva test.
Okay, okay, l'll take it.
That's right. Force yourself.
[PHONE RlNGS]
Yeah? Where? Okay.
Put 20 Gs on-- Hold it.
Kid, how'd you like to turn that 5 into 25 more?
Oh, l don't think so. l'd better get back to the bank. ls...? ls this another sure thing?
-Figures don't lie.
-lmpossible, Robert.
There hasn't been a shortage in your father's bank or its branches in 32 years.
Look, there it is in black and white.
Seventy-five thousand dollars missing.
Seventy-five thousand--
All right, Robert, all right.
You better call the bonding company.
Have them investigate every employee.
Find out if anybody is living beyond their means.
Speculating in the market, gambling or....
What a parlay. You're in the money, kid.
-You're in the money.
-There you are, son.
Your original 5 plus 25.
That makes 30,000.
Dollars?
[PHONE RlNGS]
Don't answer it.
-Scotty?
-Don't talk to him.
-Got it.
-lgnore him.
You're a pal, Scotty.
Stick with it. You bring me luck.
You got the golden touch. l'll touch a dozen eggs for you tomorrow, but l don't wanna bet any more now.
Yeah. We're shooting the roll on Marcy Ford's Beetle.
-No.
-Take the line price.
-No, no.
-Yeah, this is it.
Seventy thousand for me and 30,000 for my friend.
No, don't listen to him, no.
When l get through with Sloane, l'll put a jockey on his back and ride him.
-No, no.
HARRlS: Sit down, kid. lf this comes in, you're loaded. lf it doesn't, l'll go out and get loaded.
-Relax.
MAN [O VER SPEAKER] : They're off.
Fair Dealing is going to the front.
Sudden Riches is second.
Magilla moving up to third. Now
Sudden Riches moving up to the outside. lt's a boat race. Your horse is in.
At the half, it's Sudden Riches taking the lead and drawing clear.
-Come on, Sudden Riches.
-You didn't bet on Sudden Riches.
-l didn't bet on...?
-Into the far turn, there goes Magilla.
He's neck and neck with Sudden Riches.
Now it's Magilla in the lead.
-Come on, Magilla, come on.
-Not that plug.
And coming fast is Johnny-Come-Lately.
Finds racing room on the inside and gets through.
Come on, J-- Am l getting any warmer?
Then which horse am l betting on?
It's a driving finish.
Four noses on the wire, and it's Soris.
Soris wins it by a nose.
Soris.
What a horse.
Thirty-eight, 39, 40,000. lt's all the cash l have on hand, kid.
Drop by tomorrow for the other 20.
You mean l won?
This is all true? lt's really happening?
Did you hear what he said? lt's happening.
We're gonna get married now.
Don't you understand?
Oh, that's wonderful. Thank you, mister. l'll see you tomorrow. Thank you.
Wow! Now we can get a place of our own.
We'll have cows and horses...
...and chickens and quadruplets.
Wait till l tell Mibs.
Just wait till l tell Mibs.
Thank you. Thank you very much.
Thank you.
You're wonderful.
There really is a Santa Claus.
[EMlL SlNGlNG]
JOHNNY:
Hey, Emil. Emil.
Oh, l beg your pardon. Emil.
-Look.
-Johnny, you've robbed the bank.
Congratulations. l'll hide you in the kitchen.
As soon as it gets dark, head for the border.
JOHNNY:
Listen to me.
The first thing you gotta do is blow town until this cools off. lf the bank issues a warrant, l'll send it to the Automobile Club.
-They take care of everything.
-l didn't steal.
You got a rich uncle with one foot in the grave and you tripped him. l have no uncle. Stop being silly. l wanna get you a coat.
You're gonna be my best man.
-Mibs and l are gonna get married.
-Where you holding the ceremony, Alcatraz?
All this money. l won it on the horses.
That's foolish, Johnny.
You don't bet on horses. l don't, but l did. l don't have to anymore.
You've been drinking.
Nobody in their right mind bets on horses.
-You bet.
-Never my own money.
-Only what l can borrow.
-l borrowed some. lt was loaned to me. A thousand dollars.
-Listen, Emil. Heavenly Queen.
-Six-to-one.
-Misery.
-Five-to-one.
-And Soris.
-Even money.
-Forty thousand and 20 more to come.
-How nice that would look...
...sewed in the lining of my coat. l'm gonna give it to Mibs for a Christmas present.
When she sees it, she'll have a lump in her throat.
Maybe, but she'll certainly have a lump in her stocking.
No more window shopping.
She can have anything.
Now you're talking. Live dangerously.
You've got it, spend it.
-Spend it all.
-All?
-lt's only money.
-Emil, you didn't finish the floor. l'm taking the day off, Mr. Baganucci. lf you have any objections, call up the Waiters' Union and ask for Otto.
[SPEAKS lN lTALlAN]
Good afternoon.
JOHNNY & EMlL:
It's only money
It's only gold
But you can't get enough
Of the wonderful stuff
That you jingle or fold
It's only money
It fluctuates
But there's this thing about it
The poor schnook without it
The girls don't give dates
I love the artwork
The treasury sure does smart work
The nicest people we know
Are the people
Who get their faces on dough
It's only money
It's only dough
-And the people who crave it
-Who worship and save it
All come to know
You can't take it with you
When you go
And our bonding company has relentless operatives.
They never give up. lt may take a year, 1 0 years, 20 or 30.
And sometimes the malefactor waits a whole lifetime...
...and dies without ever having used a single penny.
Keep the motor running.
[JOHNNY WHlSTLlNG]
McKlSSACK: As many embezzlers have found out, it is impossible to outwait justice. lf you think you can outwait them, lay low until things cool off...
-Mibs.
-...get that foolish thought out of your mind.
-We're gonna get married and quit our job.
-Mr. McKissack.
To heck with McKissack.
We're buying a ranch with quadruplets.
So we have to get married first.
John Dalton, you've been drinking.
And of all the times. l bought you flowers and diamonds and a mink coat.
And the top goes up and down.
Oh, to do such a thing. And you pick a day when the bank has been robbed.
Well, l picked a day-- Huh?
McKlSSACK:
--lead us to the culprit.
And let me make one more thing absolutely clear to this embezzler...
...whoever he may be.
You will never have an opportunity to enjoy your ill-gained fortune.
You will never have a chance to spend one dime of our $ 75,000.
That is why l say confess. Confess now.
Or face the possibility of spending half your lifetime...
...behind the bars of a federal penitentiary.
[CAR HORN HONKlNG]
Quiet, quiet.
There's a shortage in the bank.
How much did you get this time?
Where's Mildred, tying up McKissack?
What courage. And l was telling you to live dangerously. Oh, brother.
JOHNNY: The man with the sunglasses.
He'll tell you how l got the money.
-And he'll tell Mibs, too, and McKissack.
-Johnny, listen to me.
The car's got a full tank.
You're facing south.
Step on the starter and head for the border.
Oh, please, Emil, you know very well l'm no bank robber.
EMlL: All right. Hope you know what you're talking about.
First horse room l've ever seen...
...where you could lose your shirt and have it mended at the same time.
-You can't get in there just like that.
-No?
Uh-uh.
-What's that for?
-Signal.
Try the Morse code.
Let's use my system.
[SEWlNG MACHlNES HUMMlNG]
Yes? All our salesmen are out. lf you can tell me which shirt you're looking for--
What happened here? Where are the horses? l mean, the telephones.
What are these women doing here without men?
-l beg your pardon.
-Wrong shirt shop.
-Look at her. No sunglasses.
-No, no. This is the place. l remember.
They had phones, and there was all kinds of betting going on all over the country.
And that guy still owes me $20,000.
Where's the man with the sunglasses?
Why, you're not wearing sunglasses.
And you're not even a man. l'm glad you can tell the difference.
Emil, you know what they've done here?
They've changed the whole place around.
Honest, they did. Just three hours ago, this was a horse room...
...and these ladies were men. lt's witchcraft. Please excuse him.
He just got in from the Pacific.
Hasn't seen a woman in years.
Max. Now you'll see.
Max, what happened?
Where is everybody?
Was it Chick Sloane, or did the police get wise of the setup?
Are you addressing me, old chap?
You're not Santa Claus.
You're an impostor.
-All right, Johnny?
-Honest, Emil, this doesn't make sense.
Santa Claus was a lookout.
-Tell me you believe me. You do, don't you?
-Of course l believe you, Johnny.
-Now, will you do me one little favor?
-Sure. What?
Head for the border.
Yes?
Oh, hello, Mildred. ls Johnny in?
Mr. Dalton's apartment is the next one,
Number 2A.
EMlL:
Oh, thank you.
-What do you mean, ''ls Johnny in?''
-Well, l just thought--
Do you think l'm in the habit of entertaining people like this? l know.
What kind of a girl do l think you are?
Anyway, l wouldn't invite John Dalton in here if he were starving.
-Who is it?
EMlL: lt's me, Emil.
Oh. Just a second.
What are you here for, pal?
Got some information for you.
You can take a plane and be in Mexico City in eight hours.
Now, look, Emil. l didn't rob the bank and l'm not taking a plane to any city. l don't know whether you did or didn't. l've got an open mind.
-That's white of you.
-But l would like to be present...
...when you explain to J. Edgar Hoover that you won $60,000 on a shirt.
Never mind about that.
What did you do with the car?
Parked it in front of the police station.
You'll never get a ticket there.
JOHNNY:
Mibs. Mibs.
-She can't hear you through the wall.
MlLDRED: What do you want now?
California concrete.
Mibs, let me finish telling you exactly what happened this afternoon.
Not exactly.
Exactly wouldn't make a good story.
Embroider it a little.
Look, the man that l saved took me into the shirt shop...
...and gave me one little drink.
And with one little drink, you try to get me to marry you...
...with promises of ranches and diamonds and-- Shirt shop, my eye.
Look, it wasn't exactly a shirt shop, Mibs. lt was a horse room. l mean, it isn't anymore.
Never tell a woman.
She'll blab everything all over town.
You'll have your picture in every post office by morning.
Shh! Be quiet.
And then he gave me a thousand dollars.
What was his name, Santa Claus?
No, no, Santa Claus was outside.
He was the lookout.
-He was watching for the cops.
-Oh, Johnny.
[SlNGlNG]
Keep quiet.
Richard Lovelace, 1 583. l don't wanna hear another word out of you until you've sobered up.
And even then, l'm not sure that--
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
Quick, out the window.
Tegucigalpa, Honduras. Nice, dry climate.
That's her doorbell.
Why, l don't remember ordering anything from McCray Company.
Look, this time of year, people sometimes send other people presents. lt's a quaint old custom, and l wish they'd cut it out.
Sign.
-Merry Christmas.
-Merry Christmas.
The mink coat.
Oh, l'd forgotten all about the mink coat.
Maybe she won't open it.
They usually put those stickers on it.
''Do not open till Christmas.''
A woman can smell mink through 6 inches of lead.
-We'll have to tell her.
-Did l ever tell you about the Lavender Kid?
Told his own sister about a job he pulled.
She turned him in for the reward money and bought herself a fur coat.
And that was only skunk.
-Well, Mibs wouldn't do a thing--
-Do you think she'd believe you?
No, l guess not.
Have you got a cold chisel?
[WATER RUNNlNG]
-lt's raining.
-That's her shower.
Splendid, now one of us can sneak in and get the package.
Which one of us?
This should be mere child's play for a man who robbed a bank.
-Emil, l told you l didn't rob the ba--
-Johnny, l believe you.
But l'm the only one in the world who would.
MlLDRED: Johnny?
-What?
Wouldn't you like to know where Bob Pulsifer's taking me tonight?
JOHNNY:
No.
Well, l'll tell you.
He's taking me to Hollywood to a very swank nightclub.
Keep talking. Keep her occupied. l'll bet you'll be very thrilled when he orders hamburger in French.
[LAUGHS]
You're jealous.
Just because he spent four years at Yale.
Six years.
And at that, he graduated magna cum nothing.
He's a wonderful dancer.
He could have learned that at UCLA.
MlLDRED: Every girl in the bank is just crazy to go out with Bob.
They'd have to be.
MlLDRED: Well, anyway, he doesn't go out and imbibe too freely...
...just because he's mad at somebody. l did not imbibe too freely.
There was this alley and these three men.
And Santa Claus.
Don't forget darling Santa Claus.
All right, all right. l got drunk and l was seeing things.
That's more like it.
And if you'd only been man enough to admit that in the first place--
Johnny.
No, no, it couldn't have been.
More champagne. Fill it up, please.
Mibs, don't you think maybe you're living a little too dangerously?
-Supposed to make you feel gay, isn't it?
-Yep.
Well, then, why doesn't it?
Little Mildred feels, hup, terrible.
Well, pretty soon, you won't feel anything.
And then we'll see whether Yale really made me a gentleman and a scholar, won't we?
-l don't like him a bit, you understand?
-Who?
-You said it.
-l didn't say anything.
But why do l keep seeing him every time l look at you?
Him and his mink coats and diamond rings and....
And go up and down and up and down.
He was gonna give them to me.
But he was drunk, you know.
Disgustingly, hup, drunk.
-What's that?
-Your dinner, madame.
Roast pheasant.
[SPEAKS lN FRENCH]
-Oh, l couldn't eat a pheasant.
BOB: Why not?
Oh, no, l used to feed them popcorn at the zoo.
BOB:
Oh, but, Mibs, look--
-You don't--
-But not this one.
You don't understand.
They used to come up to me and l'd feed them.
And they were so cute, and now you want me to eat it.
BOB:
Oh, now, Mibs, please.
-l want pickled pigs' feet.
-Pickled pigs' feet?
-Under glass.
-Mibs.
What's wrong with pickled pigs' feet?
Just because they didn't go to Yale?
Oh, take it away.
[SPEAKlNG lN FRENCH]
-l wanna go home.
-No, what you need is something to eat.
-l'm not hungry.
-You're going to eat.
-Let me see that menu, please.
-Oui, monsieur.
Oh, my.
What Miss Goodhue would like to have...
...is the viande hache champignons en vin.
-Bien, monsieur, bien, monsieur.
-l'll bet you're ordering me a hamburger.
Oui, madame. lt is the specialty of the house.
Ohh. Hup!
Twenty-eight thousand.
Poor Mibs. What a dirty trick, leaving an empty box under the Christmas tree.
-Twenty-nine thousand.
-Tsk, tsk, tsk.
Thirty thousand.
This was an inspiration.
They'll never think of looking here.
-Who heard of a cop taking a shower?
-Stop talking about the police. lt makes me nervous. l jump every time l hear--
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
-Who is it?
MAN: Mr. Kofer. Open up, Dalton.
-lt's my landlord.
-Tell him to use his own bathroom. l must let him in. He's got a key.
See if he's got a sponge too.
Get rid of him.
-Well, hello, Mr. Kofer. What's wrong?
-l don't talk in the hallway.
Listen, there was a man here asking a lot of questions...
...about you and Miss Goodhue.
-Really?
-A detective.
-You've torn my chair.
-A detective, you say?
Yes. l don't wanna have any trouble with you. l got a lot of tenants waiting for these apartments.
-What have you done?
-What did he wanna know, Mr. Kofer?
-What did he wanna know?
-Mm-hm. lf you'd been gambling, spending money and buying expensive things.
-Silly things.
-What did you tell him?
What did l tell him? l told them that you didn't even pay last month's rent.
Well, thank you very much.
That's nice of you.
[WATER SPLASHES]
My bathroom.
What are you doing to my bathroom?
-Well, l like this.
-You do? Well, join me.
Dalton, l demand an explanation.
Yes, sir. You see, he happens to be a friend of mine.
Got in from the Pacific.
Hasn't seen a bathtub in years.
All right, Dalton, all right.
Whatever you're doing that's bringing detectives around, stop.
Yes, sir. l'll try my best, sir.
-Good night, Mr. Kofer.
KOFER: Good night.
[SlGHS]
-Did you get rid of him?
-Yeah.
We better find some other place to hide the money. l think we shrunk this one. lt's no use, Emil.
First time in my life l get any dough, l can't use it.
Can't even quit my job without having the bonding company detectives on my neck.
You are in a barrel of rice with your mouth sewn up.
-Old Chinese proverb.
-Mm-hm.
Of course, you could hide it in your shoe, hollow out the heel.
The Lavender Kid.
He got away with it for years.
-Kept it under his false teeth.
-l happen to have my own teeth.
We could fix that.
Look, Emil, l'm no Lavender Kid or Sam Schlemmer, alias Benny the Beetle. l won this money, and Mibs and l are going to enjoy it. l'm going to McKissack in the morning and tell him the whole thing.
He may not believe me at first, but the important thing is to tell him the truth.
-The what?
-The truth.
Oh, that old thing.
Look, Johnny, if you tell McKissack that crazy story-- lt isn't a crazy story.
Or is it?
Oh, Emil, what am l gonna do? l've got the perfect solution.
This ought to get me off with about 60 years.
You can't use this money, can't hide it, can't deposit it in a bank. lt might be 50 years before you can lay a finger on a penny of it, right?
Right.
Suppose l deposit it?
-You?
-ln some little out-of-the-way bank.
-ln whose name?
-Mine, naturally.
Naturally.
You know, Emil, l'm deeply touched by your kind offer of assistance.
And l'm so grateful that you're willing to take these tremendous risks...
...just to help me.
But somewhere way back in my mind, there's a little voice that keeps saying:
''Dalton, don't be a schmo.''
Some out-of-the-way bank.
Think it over. l'm sincerely trying to help. lf you don't trust me, who else can you trust?
Yeah, l guess you're right, Emil.
There's nobody else l can turn to.
-l better take the mink coat too.
-Well, do you have to?
Suppose the bonding company detectives search the apartment. l'll return it to the store in the morning.
Say, you'll be careful with the money, won't you?
Don't worry about a thing. l'll hide it in the apartment.
-Will it be safe there?
-Of course it will. lf l go out tonight, l'll hire a sitter for my mattress.
[DOORKNOB RATTLlNG]
BOB:
Won't you step into my parlor? l never, never go into strange men's apartments.
-This is your apartment.
-lt is?
-Mm-hm.
-Hm. lt is.
Guess l've got a right to go into my own apartment, haven't l?
[GRO ANS] l don't feel very good.
This little piggy went to market, and--
[LAUGHS]
What are you doing here?
Well, that remains to be seen.
JOHNNY:
And heard.
What's he doing in here?
-He lives here.
-Here?
Over there, on the other side of the wall.
-lt's thin, you know.
-How thin?
Thin enough.
Very thin.
-Goodbye.
-Hello.
[WHlSTLES]
Hello is right.
[KNOCKlNG ON WALL]
MlLDRED:
Johnny, you're not mad at me, are you?
Because l went out with Bob?
You're not jealous, are you, Johnny?
No. Sleepy.
Johnny?
What's the matter?
Don't you love me anymore?
[KNOCKlNG ON WALL]
Kisses and tears
That's all our love is
It's nothing but kisses
And tears
You don't seem to need
The slightest reason
To chase the sunshine
And bring on the rainy season
Kisses and tears
It's up to you
If we laugh or we cry
Through the years
Unless you trust me
Whenever a doubt appears
Your future with me will continue to be
[KNOCKlNG ON WALL]
Kisses and tears
[KNOCKlNG ON WALL]
Kisses and tears
That's all our love is
It's nothing
But kisses and tears
When I kiss you
There is no reaction
You're too busy
With addition and subtraction
Kisses and tears
It's up to you
If we laugh or we cry
Through the years
Unless you trust me
Whenever a doubt appears
Your future with me will continue to be
[KNOCKlNG]
Kisses and tears
[KNOCKlNG]
Kisses and tears
[KNOCKlNG]
-Kisses and tears
-Kisses and tears
[BANGlNG ON CElLlNG]
Good night, Mr. Kofer.
He's been showering her with gifts.
There's your evidence.
We'd better pick him up before he makes his getaway.
The bonding company doesn't operate that way.
But they've got their eye on him.
He bought a new car too. They located it.
Registered in the girl's name.
Then what are you waiting for?
For Dalton to lead us to the rest of that $ 75,000. lf the bank is to recoup its loss, we've got to make him think he isn't suspected.
Give him enough rope to hang himself. l must caution you not to mention this to anyone. l don't know whether or not you're handling this right.
Don't worry, Robert. l've had my suspicions of Dalton ever since he asked me for a raise.
And his conduct yesterday afternoon.
The guard told me he walked right out.
Right in the middle of my address to the employees. l got news for you. l thought it was pretty dull myself.
Not one? Nobody answered the ad?
Yes, you better run it again. Thank you.
[PHONE RlNGlNG]
Hello?
Hello, Mr. Baganucci?
This is Johnny Dalton.
Has Emil come in yet?
Look, Mr. Dalton.
Yesterday, Emil tells me he's taking a day off. l haven't seen him since. l'm waiting on tables myself.
Please don't keep calling me up. lt's a long walk to the telephone.
[KNOCKlNG ON DOOR]
-Sorry, sir. The bank isn't open yet.
-lt is for me. l'm Emil J. Keck.
-Who?
-l knew you'd recognize the name.
Young man, can you direct me to the manager of this establishment?
Emil, you said some out-of-the-way bank like Hollywood or San Diego.
-Better yet, Singapore.
-l thought it all over.
Where's the last place they'd look?
Right here.
But why all this? l'm depositing $30,000.
You don't do that in cotton worsted.
Emil, Emil.
Thank you, young man, you've been most helpful.
And here's 1 0 cents for yourself.
See how careful l am with your money?
[KNOCKlNG ON DOOR]
Who is it?
Good morning, l've come to open an account.
McKlSSACK: Sorry, sir. You'll have to see
Mr. Stander in New Accounts.
-Don't you want my money?
-What? l'm a blunt man, McKissack. l don't like your attitude.
-McKissack.
-''The Friendly Bank,'' it says.
Where's the friendship, the warmth, the open hand and heart?
McKissack, you don't bubble.
Just a moment, sir. Just a moment. l have banked in New York, Chicago,
San Diego, yes, even Singapore.
And there, my funds have been welcomed.
Even small accounts of 50 or $60,000.
Won't you sit down, sir? Right over here.
Have a chair.
EMlL: ls it clean?
-Yes, sir.
Sit right down and have a cigar.
-Now, what can l do for you?
-Well, you can give me a light. l'll be very glad to handle your funds personally, Mr...? Mr...?
-Keck. Emil J. Keck.
-Keck, Keck.
Now, where have l heard that name before?
Where do you eat lunch? Uh.... ln all modesty, you're apt to hear it mentioned wherever businessmen gather.
Here you are.
What? l said, ''What's your address?''
You asked me mine. l'm only trying to get some information on your assets.
Never mind my assets. How are yours?
-Hm?
-l'm trusting you with my money.
Seems to me l'm the one who's taking the risk.
This bank was founded in 1 903.
Here's our statement.
EMlL:
''Total assets, $ 1 0,823,465.03.
Total liabilities, $ 1 0,823,465.03.''
Well, you're flat broke.
Well, that only means--
Are you trying to tell me l don't know how to subtract? Get Pulsifer.
We never telephone. lt says on the window, ''R.B. Pulsifer, founder and president.''
Why should l deal with middlemen? l wanna talk to the boss.
-Mr. Pulsifer is in semi-retirement.
-Well, get him out of it.
He should be in his bank. How do l know he isn't absconding with the funds?
Who? Keck? Listen, McKissack, l happen to be presiding...
...at a meeting of the Community Chest
Committee, and l don't wanna be--
Large depositor? How large?
Put him on.
Business.
How do you do, Mr. Keck?
Glad you called.
Pulsifer?
Why aren't you in your bank instead of out playing golf someplace?
A likely story. l intended to deposit a considerable sum of money...
...but l'm beginning to have my doubts about your bank's solvency. l've seen restaurants that are better run than your bank. l assure you, Mr. Keck...
...the Fidelity Trust is the soundest financial institution in California.
Mm-hm. Then what's this story l get from my sources...
...that you've discovered a shortage in your books?
Uh, l....
To be perfectly frank...
...there has been a malefactor tampering with our accounts...
...but the loss is entirely covered. lt cannot in the slightest way affect our standing.
How much is missing?
Oh, uh....
-About $ 75,000.
-Glad it wasn't a large sum.
Still in all, when l inquired about your bank's status...
...Mr. McKissack should have not concealed that.
You should not have informed me...
...that this is the soundest financial institution in California. l would expect that much integrity from a busboy.
Good day.
-Merry Christmas.
EMlL: And a happy new year to you.
Johnny, we almost made a great mistake.
This bank isn't safe.
The owner is playing golf, the manager won't answer questions...
...and there's a shortage of $ 75,000 in their books. l'm gonna take your money and bury it in a baking can.
You better get out before Mibs sees you.
Now, give me the money.
McKissack is watching us. l wouldn't put a dime in anything that man's associated with. He's got shifty eyes.
[LOUDLY] Thirty-thousand dollars, thank you very much.
-All of it?
-[WHlSPERlNG] All of it.
Come, come.
-Well, it's only money.
-Yeah.
[lN NORMAL TONE]
Will you sign right here?
All right, Emil. You're hired again.
But remember, it's against my better judgment.
Thank you, Mr. Baganucci.
You're a kind and generous man.
No, it's not that. My feet are killing me.
[PHONE RlNGS]
Emil, answer him, please.
Hello? Yes, Johnny?
What?
-Pulsifer?
-He's coming over to see you...
...to hit you for a donation to the Community Chest.
That won't be necessary, l've already contributed generously.
Three dollars and fifty cents.
He thinks you're a millionaire, Emil.
Yes, he's chairman of the committee and figures he can make a good touch.
McKissack told him you gave your address as the Hunterton Hotel.
Hunterton Hotel?
Now, go over and register right away and hurry.
Don't worry, l'm on my way.
[SlNGlNG
''THE BALLAD OF JESSE JAMES'']
-l'm taking the day off, Mr. Baganucci.
-What? ln the back of the broom closet, you'll find my arch supports.
But, Emil....
[SlNGlNG
''THE BALLAD OF JESSE JAMES'']
Ta-ta.
Johnny?
You left the bank in such a hurry...
...l didn't get a chance to invite you formally, but...
...well, l like surprises better anyway.
You won't have to eat at Baganucci's tonight. lt's Christmas Eve, Johnny.
Johnny, Chinese food.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
[KNOCKlNG ON DOOR]
[PHONE RlNGlNG]
Hello?
Oh, hello. Miss Mildred Goodhue?
Yes, this is her. She. l mean me.
Well, this is Mr. Hartman...
...of the McCray Company
Complaint Department.
Would you mind telling us...
...just what you found unsatisfactory about the mink coat we sent you?
Mink coat?
Well, now, according to our records, it was ordered by Mr. John Dalton.
It was delivered yesterday, and this morning it was returned.
And we....
Miss Goodhue?
Miss Goodhue?
Miss Goodhue?
Miss Goodhue? lt is the first of our $3000 numbers to prove unsatisfactory.
And we're interested in learning why.
-The fur was on the wrong side.
-What?
I like my mink on the inside of the coat.
Keeps you warmer.
Now, that's ridiculous.
[PHONE RlNGlNG]
Hello?
-Hello, is Johnny there?
-No, Johnny didn't come here for dinner.
Emil? Huh. How should l know? l only pay him.
He comes and goes as he pleases.
He said something about the Hunterton Hotel. lf you find him, tell him something for me, will you?
First, the arch supports don't fit.
Second, l'm starting a union for the bosses.
JOHNNY:
The bridal suite.
You had to rent the bridal suite?
What are you gonna do with three bedrooms? l don't know, what does a bride do with them?
And this afternoon, the Bank of America telephoned.
They wanted to know if a check for $ 1 000...
...signed by Emil J. Keck was any good.
So naturally, l had to say,
''Why, of course.
Mr. Keck has ample funds on deposit.''
What's wrong with that?
They happen to be my funds.
What are they soaking you for this layout?
'' 1 928.'' Where did you get that?
Room service is very obliging.
How much for those?
Well, let's just say they're not what this country needs a good one of.
What do you expect if l'm supposed to be a millionaire? l've gotta get in the mood.
Eat, drink and be merry.
Because tomorrow, we may be in the hoosegow.
And beside, my money may not last forever, you know.
EMlL:
Exactly.
Ah, fill the cup
What boots it to repeat
How time is slipping underneath our feet:
Unborn tomorrow and dead yesterday
Why fret about them if today be sweet?
But why do l have to supply all the sugar?
Johnny, listen to me.
Think of my side of it.
All my life, l've been advising my friends,
''Live dangerously.''
And what have l been doing?
Waiting on tables.
Do you realize l'm 50 years old...
...and this is the first time l've ever tasted imported champagne?
Good, isn't it?
Stinks, but l'm gonna finish every drop of it.
What am l supposed to do while you sit around enjoying yourself?
Learn to stop worrying. We both know you're not guilty of any crime...
...and eventually we'll prove it. lf only l could find the guy with the sunglasses.
Say, l know a dame with sunglasses.
Would that do you any good?
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
Pulsifer. Hide in there.
-Emil.
-Hello, Nick.
What are you doing here? l haven't seen you since the last waiters' ball.
Boy, were you loaded. l thought you knew, my aunt in Connecticut died...
...and left me her entire fortune.
Gee, that's great. Now you can pay me the 20 bucks you owe me.
Believe me, it's a pleasure.
-What's the matter? No tips?
-Here, get yourself a box of cigars.
You must be in the chips, all right.
But you'll run through it fast enough.
More champagne? Why?
Well, when Pulsifer gets here, l can hardly offer him a root beer float.
[DOORBELL BUZZES] lf that's R.B. for the donation...
...remember, you are a millionaire of very limited means.
-Hello.
-Emil--
[KNOCKlNG ON DOOR]
-lt's Mildred, she wants to come in.
-Mibs?
What'll we do?
Well, you're living dangerously. Live it.
Why didn't you knock?
All right, Mr. Keck, you might as well tell me. What is going on? l quit Baganucci and got myself a better job.
You better get out before my new boss comes in.
This suite happens to be registered under the name of Keck.
-Keck?
-Hm.
Very common name. lt's English for Smith.
Look, Emil, l'm a big girl now. l don't wear pigtails anymore.
-l'll bet you look lovely in them.
-Hm.
There's a few things around here l have got to find out.
-Anything you ask.
-Who paid for that mink coat?
Uh, almost anything.
And all of this.
Where's the money coming from?
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
How is this possible?
There's a man here who can explain the whole thing to you.
MlLDRED:
Johnny.
Mr. Keck, l'm R.B. Pulsifer Sr.
-Won't you come in, Mr. Pulsifer?
-Thank you, Mr. Keck.
You can call me Emil. l don't like to trade on the family name.
-Will you sit down?
-Thank you. l hope you don't mind my dropping in on you like this, Emil.
Of course not. lt's much better than sitting here alone...
...waiting for some quiz program to call you.
-May l get you any--? Something?
-Thank you, l'll have a cigarette.
Cigarette.
-There you are.
-Thank you.
-Take two or three for later.
-Oh, this'll do.
And l'll come right to the point.
Do you believe in charity?
Giving or receiving?
[LAUGHlNG]
Emil, l like you.
You're not stuffy. You haven't let your money go to your head. lt's been an effort.
-Champagne?
-Thank you.
Johnny, what are you two up to?
What can it possibly be that you can't tell even me?
Okay, Mibs. l'm gonna give it to you straight.
You remember the story l told you about the shirt shop?
-You mean the one about the horses?
-lt's all true. l won $60,000 betting on the horses...
...the same day they found the shortage in the bank.
So l couldn't tell anybody about it, don't you see?
And Emil has been helping me keep it a secret.
Johnny, is that the best you can do?
You don't believe me?
You'll never regret this generous donation of $3000.
What was that?
-Something collapsed in the next room.
-Oh.
As l was saying, it's this attitude of generosity...
...this friendliness, that has been the basis of my success in the banking business.
Do you mind? lncidentally, while we're speaking of it...
...do you mind my asking what is your business?
-Pigs' feet.
-Pigs' feet?
Largest packers of pickled pigs' feet in the country.
Wherever people eat, you'll find Keck's feet.
-Good slogan.
-Thought it up myself.
Well, l'm sorry to run away, but l have a dinner engagement. l was hoping you'd have dinner with me. l'd like to, Emil, but l'll be in town until next week.
-How about Thursday?
-Thursday's fine.
We have meatballs and spaghetti and a separate napkin to each customer.
[LAUGHS]
You're a card, Emil.
What a rare combination.
A millionaire and a sense of humor.
-You don't know the half of it.
-Pickled pigs' feet.
You think l robbed the bank?
Oh, honestly, Johnny, l don't know what to think.
Do you think l'm a thief?
Why, how could you po--? l don't even wanna talk to you anymore. l'm tired of pretending and hiding and telling lies and of telling you the truth. l stole it, yes. l took the money from the bank with Santa Claus.
-Now, go ahead and go to the police.
MlLDRED: Johnny.
Mibs.
Sit down, please.
Here, drink this.
After you hear what l have to say, you'll realize you can't go to the police.
-Why?
-Because you're the criminal.
-Me?
-Johnny told me the whole thing.
How you wanted to get married right away and how he couldn't afford it.
And how you threatened to leave him.
That poor boy, driven desperate for the love of a woman...
...seized his opportunity and robbed the Fidelity Trust Company.
Oh, Emil.
He did it for me?
Poor Johnny.
He loved me that much.
For bonnie Annie Laurie
He'd lay down and die.
Emil, this isn't another one of your stories, is it?
This is the truth, isn't it? lf it isn't, may l drop dead on this spot.
[DOORBELL BUZZES]
-Mibs.
-Bob, l had to come to you.
Well, what makes you think you're welcome?
-l've got my pride too.
-No, this is a matter of life and death.
Naturally.
You're not the first girl to discover she couldn't live without me.
Here, let me take your coat.
Take it easy. Relax.
-Brandy?
-lt's about the bank.
-About the bank?
-Mm-hm. l'm not wasting my Napoleon brandy on the bank's affairs.
Oh, Bob, you just gotta help me. l can trust you, can't l? l don't see why not.
Nobody ever has before. l was just on my way to spend
Christmas Eve with Dad...
...but he can wait.
Well, all l wanted was to ask you a question about an imaginary case.
Well, go ahead.
Suppose somebody had taken some money from your father's bank.
-Yeah?
-Thousands and thousands of dollars.
But he wasn't really a thief.
Just a wholesome, red-blooded
American boy, a little playful perhaps.
See, somebody made him take this money.
She didn't mean to, but, well...
...she was always talking about marriage and mink coats and diamond rings.
Just a wholesome, red-blooded American girl.
But she would have married him if he didn't have a cent.
So if she should get ahold of some of this money...
...and she knew that she could get this somebody to bring the rest of it back...
...could get your father to promise not to send him to jail, please?
Well, l'd do my best...
...but first l'd have to see the money to make certain it was being returned.
Oh, well, that's easy. l've got it right here.
That's about $20,000 exactly.
Here's some more.
Here's some more.
That's all.
What are you doing?
Calling the police to arrest John Dalton for robbery.
-That's what l'm doing.
-l didn't say anything about Johnny.
-This is an imaginary case.
-Well, this is unimaginary money.
-Operator, get me the police.
-Please, you can't do that.
-l can, now, operator, get me--
-Don't arrest Johnny. l'll do anything, anything.
What?
You used to like me, Bob.
Yeah. l'll write you a letter.
-l'm even willing to marry you.
-Sure.
Marry?
You can't threaten me.
Hello, operator, get me the police right away.
Mibs.
Get me the police right away, operator.
That's right.
Operator, for the 1 0th time, will you get me the police, please?
Yes.
[ENGlNE STARTS]
Hey, Mibs. That's my car.
Police! Hey! Police! Pol--
And is wanted for embezzling $ 75,000 from the California Fidelity Trust.
Audit of books confirms identity.
The man, Caucasian, brown hair, blue eyes,
5-feet-1 0, wears elevator shoes...
...anemic-looking.
When last seen, was wearing ill-fitting suit, well-padded at shoulders.
Resembles Frank Sinatra.
The girl, Caucasian, brown hair and eyes.
Height, 5'7'' . Weight, 1 35 pounds.
Extremely well-distributed.
They are in a Chrysler convertible, license, 4F-- Like in ''fish.'' --1 1 50.
Last seen heading south toward Mexican border on Highway 1 01 .
All units in vicinity proceed at once.
That is all. Rosenthal.
Oh, Johnny, l don't care what you've done. l just don't want them to catch you.
Mibs, this may come as a great disappointment to you...
...but l didn't steal any money from the bank.
-But Emil said--
-Oh, Emil.
They can't do anything to me. l don't have to run away, Mibs.
What they're really after is the money.
And even if l were guilty, they wouldn't touch me until they got it.
-Johnny.
-Mm-hm.
They've got it.
[SlRENS WAlLlNG]
Stop the car, Mibs.
Look, l love you for what you're trying to do for me, but it's no use.
And my Santa Claus story is true, believe me.
All right, then, Johnny, the man with the sunglasses.
No gambler's gonna stick his neck out to save me.
Oh, Johnny, what are we gonna do?
All my life, l've been practical and cautious, and look what it got me.
To heck with tomorrow, Mibs.
Let's get married tonight.
You mean me? Mildred Goodhue?
-Tonight?
-Now.
All right.
MAN 1 :
Okay, okay, break it up.
-Come on, get out of the car.
MAN 2: Come out.
Okay, l'm ready.
Hey, what's the big idea?
We're arresting Mildred Goodhue for embezzling $ 75,000 from the Fidelity Trust.
You are?
-They are.
-Oh, there's some mistake here.
That was my money she gave Bob Pulsifer. l won it on the horses, only l can't prove it.
-You gotta arrest me.
-We know all about you.
You won your money from Hot Horse Harris.
-Hot who?
-Everybody knows Hot Horse.
A bald-headed guy, always wears sunglasses.
We picked him up a couple of days ago.
-Come on, you're going with us.
-But we're gonna get married.
We'll get you a cell with a double bed. lf you'll pardon the expression, gin.
[DOORBELL BUZZES] l'll get it. Always ready to serve.
-What are you doing here?
-What are you doing here?
-Comes out even.
-Stop playing millionaire.
They got Mibs in jail.
They blamed the bank shortage on her.
PULSlFER:
Who is it, Emil?
Mr. Pulsifer, my name is John Dalton. l'm only a teller, but you gotta listen to me.
-Now, see here.
-Give him a hearing, R.B. lt's all a mistake about Mibs.
You can't have her thrown in jail on Christmas Eve.
Why, she never stole a thing in her life.
Oh, now l know who you are.
The bonding company told me about you.
-You're the man who won all that money.
-That's what l came to tell you.
That was my money that Mildred Goodhue turned over. l don't blame you for trying to protect the girl you love.
But l'm afraid you've been taken in by that young woman.
You're not the first to be deceived by a pretty face.
But l know Mibs. l know that she wouldn't take anything.
For your information, Dalton...
...our audit of her accounts shows a deliberate falsification of $ 75,000.
-And figures don't lie.
-Figures don't lie.
But human beings do.
Two and two make four no matter who gets hurt.
-ls that the way it is?
-lt's there in black and white.
-The girl is guilty.
-How can you say she's guilty?
You don't even know Mibs.
Can't your arithmetic be wrong for once?
Can't your books be wrong?
Can't your bank be wrong?
Not this time. lt's been checked and double-checked.
-Ashtabula National Trust.
-What?
1 902. Sent a teller to jail for stealing $ 1 4,000.
Fifteen years later, they found the money...
...where it slipped into a crack behind his cash box.
Maybe that is it. lt could be.
That bank is so old it's ready to fall down now.
Little Rock Security, same thing, 1 928.
Certified check for $50,000 missing.
Ten years after, found stuck to chewing gum behind a filing cabinet.
-Come on, or l'll see you're sued.
PULSlFER: Where are we going?
EMlL: The bank. Maybe somebody there has made the same kind of stupid mistake.
PULSlFER: l don't hire people who make mistakes.
How do you know?
You haven't been there.
PULSlFER: l keep in touch by telephone.
Where would l be if l ran my business by phone?
Up to my neck in pigs' feet.
PULSlFER: Things like that don't happen in a well-ordered bank.
McKissack is one of the finest managers in the country.
You've never met him.
PULSlFER: l've seen his recommendations, they were excellent.
EMlL:
Probably wrote them himself.
EMlL:
Mm. What have we here?
Bang, bang, bang.
-He'll hear from me in the morning.
-By telephone?
PULSlFER: All this is absurd.
We're on a wild-goose chase.
Believe me, Mibs is being blamed for something she had nothing to do with.
Someone must have taken cash and concealed the loss in her book.
-Who?
-How far do you trust your son?
-Keck!
-No harm in checking.
Blood isn't thicker than money.
PULSlFER: l placed my son here to see that things are run efficiently.
Your son, sir, sits at his desk all day...
...shooting paper clips at girls bending over the files.
EMlL:
Hm.
What have we here?
[CLATTERlNG]
What was that?
Probably a mouse in the Mortgage Department.
He'll never get a loan.
Well...
...l'm sorry, my boy, but l'm afraid we're wasting our time.
The money is missing, the shortage is in her books.
The girl is guilty. Two and two make four.
Simple arithmetic, Mr. Pulsifer.
But it doesn't always apply where human beings are concerned, believe me.
No one will ever convince me that Mibs is guilty of any crime.
-Things add up, Dalton.
-Sure.
Two and two make four.
-You try it. Go on, you try it. Go ahead.
-lmpossible.
Try three and three. Let's make it tough.
EMlL:
There's the criminal.
Run for your life.
The machines are striking back.
Tomorrow morning, your burglar alarm may spit in your eye.
[ALARM SOUNDS]
You're who?
R.B. Pulsifer Sr., you nincompoop, l own this bank. l've never seen you around here. lf you'd take the trouble to verify my statements....
My friend, here, Emil J. Keck, the eminent millionaire, will vouch for me.
Him?
Why, he's a waiter at Baganucci's Restaurant.
-l eat there all the time.
-Hi, Sam.
-l hurried right over. What happened?
-Breaking and entering, Mr. McKissack.
-Ever see this fella before?
-Never.
You idiot, l'm R.B. Pulsifer.
Now, l'll tell one.
You don't look anything like that picture in there. l did once.
Note the eyes. Dull, glazed, moronic.
Not only criminal, but tinged with insanity.
A Frankenstein.
Your unemployment insurance paid up, McKissack?
John Dalton.
-Emil J. Keck.
-Dick Tracy.
Your father visit banks in the middle of the night?
Not even in the middle of day.
The old man's lazy. l hope he doesn't put us into bankruptcy.
Hey, McKissack, do you mind telling me what's going on?
This imposter here is....
Dad.
That's some hunk of mink you got there, lady.
-Oh, thank you.
-Yes, sir, $3000.
Show him the ring, baby.
Fifteen hundred dollars for that ring.
And that car out there, 4000.
We're going on a honeymoon around the world.
When we get back, we're gonna settle down, buy a ranch...
...and grow the finest oranges in California. lf we grow any bad ones, we'll put
Florida wrappers on them and ship them.
Yes, sir.
And l got Emil here to help me run it. lt'll take every cent we've got, but it'll be worth it. l won $60,000, and we're gonna enjoy every cent of it.
Sixty thousand.
[WHlSTLES]
Well, thanks a lot.
You don't know what a help you've been.
Wait a minute.
What newspaper is that going to be in?
Oh, don't ask me, l'm just a tax collector. l represent the Bureau of lnternal Revenue. l'll be seeing you.
Wear it, baby. Let's live dangerously.
Mr. Keck.
[SPEAKS lN lTALlAN]
ALL:
It's only money, it's only gold
But you can't get enough
Of the wonderful stuff
That you jingle or fold
It's only money
It's only dough
And the people who crave it
Who worship and save it
All come to know
You can't take it with you when you go
[ENGLlSH SDH]
Edinburgh, the royal town and the capital of Scotland.
The ancient castles are the guards of the historic city.
Once a year, travelers from all over the world are coming... to watch the beginning of the Edinburgh Festival... which is dedicated to high- more particularly art.
Occasionally, there is space and for something like that.
At the wedding of Macquette up there in Cleveland... the guests have been invited to the health of the... when mild whiskey is mild and me...
Macquitos was pleased to die.
The musicians played cheerfully... his uncle did not start dancing... but the area was solved and his skirt fell.
When Macquitus tried leave... it was blocked by friends... you have to dance... because the door was locked.
Macquitos was angry he did not know what to do... tried to stop the wedding... turned the watch back, tore the date...
- Charlie!
- Mrs. Frost?
A handheld or a dummy?
- We're both deaf!
- I hope you're right.
- Get out and tell them something.
- What do I say?
It does not seem to me!
Ladies and gentlemen if you allow me...
We want Frost!
Thanks for honoring me, I do not know what to say.
We want our money.
I know I have not paid some accounts...
Two of my own have begun to load the tents.
If I do not pay, I'll get it.
If I get it I will not be able to to make a premiere... and no one will be paid.
You have to leave me open!
It's not about money, it's a matter of order.
Do not you want the money?
- The tax office will get it!
- You are magnanimous.
Look at these chums girls! Open the curtain!
They work hard all of them, they are all stars!
Think about their career, please...
I came from America to bring you their talent.
People are coming from all over the world the world in your city.
- Awesome performance!
- She has another...
Please let me know a little more.
- How long do you want?
- Give me three days.
- We'll give you 48 hours.
- I love you all, thank you.
You are wonderful, thank you.
Kids, rehearse tomorrow in the morning at ten o'clock.
You did not dance well, leave now.
We did not dance well because we do not eat.
The artists he is not thinking about food.
I do not want to say it to Mr. Frost but we have to pay...
- You have no faith?
- I have faith, I have no hope!
- Can I talk to you?
- Tomorrow my dear.
You went to stop them, get the shit out!
- Did you load them?
- Do not you see?
The naive tells you go back inside.
- We're done!
- Please, Philis!
There was no money either organization, it's all a mess!
- Calm down my love.
- Find another star!
- The Philadelphia pavement!
- I do not quite do that!
- What is it, Mr. Frost?
- Now we do not have a star!
- We do not have a star!
- Are you a parrot?
I will make a premiere and I will not have neither star nor money!
- We need a miracle!
- And we'll find it!
- Good morning, ladies.
- Hello Mrs. Erikis.
- Want your feet?
- We did not want to hear anything.
Your kindness, but you do not pay for 2 weeks.
- We'll pay you.
- You have no faith?
You were on the show before you come...
I have done them myself, do not interfere with our relationship.
I have two tickets for the premiere.
You have already given me half first row, thank you.
We invoke your dedication in Edinburgh... people from all over the world are coming to your wonderful city.
- You will come to us!
- Okay, you won!
I forgot to tell you that you have a visitor back.
- Who is he?
- From the motif, he wants money.
My dude was coming in here when it was late in the evenings.
I have to say it is very lucky man.
Yes, he has been dying for ten years ago, you're coming now!
Do not wait any longer, can do not bring the girls.
I have instructions to wait until
I'll get 10 pounds.
- I'll wait.
- Good night!
I'm late, I'm late!
Come on, get up!
Look at what time it is!
Run, I know you're in.
We will leave the exit cheating!
Run!
Give me and the cattle, you have to hurry too!
Release the door immediately!
- Good morning, why do you get it?
- How can I not shine?
I want my money where it is
Miss Jowve?
She left for the theater, did not you see her?
- Here it is, I know it!
- Look under the bed.
I told you not to go to work without money.
I told you he left, we have rehearse and I'm late!
- Did you make a sound?
- Yes, I hope you do not mind.
- I'm late.
- Come in.
- You're not American?
- Yeah, how did you get it?
You have so much at home!
- Your kindness, sir...
- My name is Bates.
- I'm Jave Tweed.
- Are you working in Mercury?
- Not if we do not reach 15.
- We'll get to ten!
Is it necessary?
I will not arrive in time, is there anything wrong?
I will overtake if and not need to.
The police are following us!
I was wrong for ten minutes.
Will we rehearse without Phyllis?
We will make a premiere with or without star! I started the rehearsal.
Hello thank you.
Good morning, Mac.
It was not good, who told you do you look up there?
- You said it!
- Me? Never!
That's the cheap places... you will look forward to the exact somehow so... for them you play, from here the money is coming.
Let's go again, we start.
- At last, where are you?
- Do not tell me, Charlie.
- I'm the reserver...
- Yes, the best one!
And be careful not to have it problems Mr Frost, I know.
You do a great job sav tv mavajer!
Mr Frost, I said how we ended this way.
- That was yesterday.
- He did not know you changed it.
Yes, of course, stop!
You just came, I saw you.
- I had an accident.
- Yes sure...
You ended up doing so, rather than being good.
- I am sorry.
- I'm sorry about you... and for all of you, a life you will be moderate dancers.
How do you remind me I arrived?
Where am I today?
I had courage, determination and no one ever.
Did not hit our ribbon!
The stars are not made with cubicles.
I have talent for that you will always live in ballet.
You make mistaken Mr.
Frost, I give up!
One minute!
No one resigns here, you are fired!
- It's my pleasure!
- You have a break for kids.
- The Joweye, please.
- You have to wait.
- The Jvette Joe, please.
- You wait, rehearsal.
You will see it after me.
I want to give her the tea, leave her in the car.
You can not see it until the rehearsal is over.
- Did you get me, Mac?
- No, my dear.
- Are you Mr. Tramov's chauffeur?
- No, Mr Bruno.
The manufacturer of worship cards?
- Exactly.
- Did he send you for me?
- I'm saying Betty Samers.
- I'm afraid not.
I'm waiting for Miss Jowow, are you her boyfriend?
You will do me your favor give her her cake?
Gladly, give her the love
Tell me, Mr. Bruno.
I do not think he will appreciate it.
I will not wait any longer, do not say to Joe that I was not here.
- I did not see you!
- If you danced with the energy... you run into the corridors, we may have had good show.
- What do you got there?
- A cake.
It's Joe's, it's friendship of Bruno.
And is this reason you...
- Filthy?
- By Bij Giovanni.
It's one of the richest-
Scotland's finest apostles.
- You're a millionaire.
- I know, I was looking for it.
It comes out from our girls...
- How do you tell me?
- Betty Samers.
- I wanted to talk to you about...
- Not now...
- I'll give her the tea.
- Give me a little time...
I will give you an increase in the time I pay.
- Yes, Mr. Frost?
- Do not do that!
Who is he that says he will less for ballet?
You will not leave the city unless you make money first.
You will go to Frost and you will the transformed daughter.
Excluded, then from so many insults.
- And why else?
- There are many reasons.
You are the one who is we owe you, do you want to live?
You are so stupid; Javet he goes with the Bruve.
Is she a trustee, does she say anything to you?
Bij Giovanni, the millionaire?
Multimillionaire!
It is worth 5 maybe 6 million.
Jowve with a millionaire, what a pity.
Why; She's a good girl, the best.
- He was flying fast.
- He's not working here.
Do not be clear, we saved!
If he loves Bruno...
- What do you have?
- You do not remember her?
That's it! It will we're staring, that's gonna happen...
- Where does it stay?
- I do not know.
Why do not you know?
Do I ask something so hard?
- Where's the Savvette Jowve?
- What, sir?
Everyone is afraid of me!
Where do you put the names from J?
Find here to find its management.
Do not sit, do something!
Why is it nothing in his place;
A direction I want in the name of Jow.
You can not do it nothing right?
The problem is that there is no system here.
I have to show you and archiving?
- Fr.
- Later, I have a job.
Because we have no leadership girls?
What would you do if you were ill some of them?
I would call the doctor.
- I wanted to ask...
- look for you too!
Who are you; - Javet Joeves.
Do not sit, look to address!
- The Directorate?
- Javet Joe's!
- What did you say you were?
- Javet Joeves.
Jacqueline Joe, Charlie!
All I have to do is do it!
Where were you, we searched for to find you! Come in...
Conspiracy about clutter but we wanted to find you...
I came to ask for a word for my behavior.
- I lost my temper.
- I understand you...
I like girls who have courage.
- Here's your cake.
- Where did you find her?
That's what we have to say for your position on the show.
- Get me a contract.
- I dance well you know...
I do not think you've seen me to dance solo.
It is not necessary to see you love me... now you can not find it nor a contract?
Look, Mr. Frost.
It's such a big paper, it would be a baby!
Wonderfully, we will find something good for you.
I can make wheels too!
- Do I have to do everything?
- But Mrs. Frost...
Here it is so simple!
Did you hit? Fortunately...
- Sign here.
- I'm just singing.
Okay, sign up!
Hi Joe!
You're gonna make me a star!
I hope you do not mind we came, bible Joy.
Is the two-eyed? Good morning.
Mattam Amavta I told you that
I'll pay you on Friday.
Pay me?
Let's not talk about it.
Look what we brought you try it.
We have the first dress reminisce of Blue Moonlight.
- Is not that great?
- Fantastic...
You have to put it, it will take you a lot.
You have the right body, your waist is so thin.
- Do you agree with me?
- Of course, mawam.
We have other things you can try it whenever you want.
You did not forget to bring the pink siffer...
- Conviction?
- With the red poppy.
It's great!
It's so chic, you wait a little...
Here you are, fantastic!
The color fits so well with your skin!
You do not have a mirror...
You can see here.
What do you say?
It's incredible!
- What do you say about it?
- You do not understand...
It's for you, from the mawam Amamta.
- But I can never...
- I want you to fuck.
The double jowe can put you the silver beads.
You are so smart, that's what you think.
Look what nice which is the gouva.
Do not say a word, I want to see you and all the rest.
- Mr. Frost told you...
- I do not know anything... is our little secret, okay?
That's love!
Come on, let's get you.
You need to be honored be tired.
If you want something else phone me.
- Promise it.
- I promise you.
Too bad, thank you very much.
- Is not it a nice day?
- Mallow...
Fortunately you came, get it a deep await and listen!
- I hear but I do not know...
- Frost gave me a contract!
And the mawam Amvata all these clothes!
- And where are your stables?
- Please pay attention!
Someone must stay reasonable!
- What do they mean?
- You do not know?
- Of course not!
- Savvet, you're a jerk!
Me, do not begin to bear and you are mad!
Until you desert
I will take out this dress.
And I in your place it will be the same.
I do not know why you were so mad.
You could say that to your best friend!
I'm trying to tell you but do not listen!
Well, tell me something for Bij Giovanni.
- Who is he?
- Are you asking?
- Your trustee is!
- Are you crazy!
Then everyone in the theater they must be mad.
I did not expect to know the new ones last and let me be stuck!
- I do not know what you say.
- So you're going to get it?
- And of course!
- Then I'll check it out...
Jacqueline Joeves you are a junk!
Everybody crazed!
Why did Frost star you?
And you old man sends you these?
- I do not know, why?
- Because of Bij Giovanni!
You will tell me please
Who is this Bruno?
He has made millions with greeting cards.
He is the richest in Scotland.
- You're not telling me yet.
- Listen to you, Jacob... you swear in what you have a sanctuary that you have not been betrothal?
How do I get it?
When I do not know it?
Where's the joke?
Will you tell me why you laugh?
You do not find it funny make you expensive... and become a star because of it someone you do not know?
It's horrible...
Listen, Frost reminds me that she is smart... make the star girl for you get money from the developer.
- You do not think that...
- She's gone.
You want me to tell you how many stars did I start in this way?
Come in.
Miss Jowve?
Sign Please.
I do not believe it, it's from Frost!
Then you can get it!
One minute, give them to me.
How long do you pray for something so wonderful?
- Here it is!
- I do not want it in this way.
How important is the way?
You will tell them all later.
You did not tell Frost that you are engaged, right?
Neither in the mawam Amamta that you have to pay.
Why not enjoy it how long do you keep?
For Mrs. Bruno.
For Mrs. Bruno.
For Mrs. Bruno.
Mavam Amatta Fashion House.
Account, Jetwing Joe
Theater Mercury.
- It's wrong!
- It's for Mr. Bruno.
We know both of them that is wrong!
When I heard he visited you this landlord... in the hour of work I was outraged, not Harold!
- I do not want to come back.
- Indeed, Mr. Bruno.
There is also an annual one excursion to these things.
Harold, I do not want to be bothered in one's personal life... but here in the company, I do not want my employees to...
- What is this?
- I have an account, sir.
I do not want to be dismayed work with pleasure.
There are some rules...
Things I want you to do are respected. You can leave.
To see what this is...
Fashion House, why do you go to me?
That's what I'm talking about and I, sir.
Jacqueline Jowve, Mercury silver beige and velvet...
You are outrageous!
I have not been to the theater... and I do not know this Joe, arrange it.
- Why are you looking at me like that?
- How's that, sir?
You think I have some relationship with all this?
- You, sir? Of course not.
- Of course not.
I knew it had happened some mistake.
- How did you know that?
- You could not...
- What can not I do?
- You would not!
Of course not.
He called the phone.
Office of Mr Bruno.
Who are they?
From Mercury Theater, for you.
I have a wonderful new Mr. Bruno.
The Jvette Jowve is the star of the project!
You've gotten to the company
Brooke, you make a mistake.
It's not a mistake, I've been watching it for a long time... we are changing the work for it.
Is it going to be a thing of the past?
I do not know it!
I understand, do not worry... your secret is yours in good hands!
Do you believe me now?
Nato again!
You were looking at me strangely,
I tell you that I do not know.
- Of course not.
- It's a farce...
Something worse.
In your place, I would be alert the police force.
I do not want you to be disappointed in a spade the company.
I will do it myself.
- Again I was looking at you strangely?
- Exactly.
- I do not do it deliberately.
- I hope so.
We will do it again from start to finish.
Everyone in your positions.
Let's go!
Have a break, Joe.
It was good rehearsal.
I'm a lovely Javet.
I want to talk though...
Thanks, I have a problem in turns but I will fix it.
I'm sure you were going you rehearse in your suit.
I have a prayer with Jacqueline Jowve.
Mr. Trezis is waiting for you, go ahead.
It will be a terrible sea bass, right?
From a dancer to a star within one day.
I hope you are right.
- Who is he?
- From Morviv Express.
- Wait a minute please?
- Yeah, I do not mind.
Glad to see you, Treisse, let's have a drink.
- I'm waiting for Joe.
- You have an hour... must rehearse her suit, go.
- You are welcome...
- I want ya yahoo.
- He has a job, who are you?
- Mr. Bruno.
- Bij Giovanni?
- Correctly.
Please, Mr. Bruno, go, go to the camel 1.
You can pass.
- I'll send you a moment.
- It's okay now.
I'm sorry I am with the suit, I'm very happy.
I did not want to leave you to wait...
- Sit down please.
- Miss Jowve...
I came to clarify a specific issue.
To be honest...
- Are you Jetway Jowve?
- Yes, you were disappointed?
I was expecting something different.
Sit please, must
I change you if you do not mind.
- I'll wait outside.
- I can talk from here.
And I thought you were going to be different.
- You say you were waiting for me?
- Of course...
- Then you know why I came.
- Of course.
- Why did you do it?
- I wanted to do it by little.
- My dad was disturbing.
- And so it must!
On the contrary, my mother encouraged me.
You cheated on deceiving...
I did not cheat, I said that I want to be on the scene...
- And I did it.
- Miss Jowve... this is not the explanation which I expected.
You want something more intriguing.
I can not believe it... when I said he would
Paul Tracy for interview... somewhat active journalist but you...
- Paul Tracy...
- Is not that your true one?
It does not matter, I feel it let me talk to you.
Truth; And I do not feel as uncomfortably as possible.
I find you very...
- What a nice guy!
- I'm glad you like it.
I'm here this morning... joyful curtains and the flowers help you, right?
Truth; - Of course...
- Do I start from the beginning?
- You are welcome!
Do we sit back?
- You wanna know where I came from?
- Yeah, I'd love to.
I grew up in a small farm in Virzivia...
Amazing! And I in a farm I was born.
Not in Virzivia, however, in Devosvir.
Then I went to Haro...
I left my sixties because I did not know anything else... my father had his own ideas for life...
Conspiracy but who gets it what is it from?
I was forgotten, continued, please.
The house was in the middle of trifolias and mosses... in a small pond.
I get up very early in the morning...
- And I was culling the cows.
- How many were you?
Pevvvata.
- Why are you smiling;
- Nothing, please go on.
- Do not you believe me?
- I know of farms...
- I have some.
- Do you have farms?
I know many villagers who are living in farms.
Well, it was a simple one home without trifolias.
- There was no cow.
- And he did not go to Virgina!
I'm from New Jerzy.
It grew up in a fishing boat in the Gulf of Mexico.
Her mother was an artist but she left her career... when he baptized the father of Jacqueline, she loved it a lot.
- He was a diver.
- How much is Bruno doing to you?
Listen and the drama! Her boyfriend she taught her everything she knew... when the storm was lost in the storm and did not have a franc... where you find what he did the poor girl or the girl.
He left and found the Bij Giovanni.
Have a drink!
- Luckily my luck changed.
- Wonderful how did it happen?
It was from hard work or from gossip?
What exactly do you do?
I'm afraid you know somev with power...
- Do you think specifically?
- Some Mr Bruno...
Avarothomomv when we would get to this point!
I just wanted to know...
There is nothing in between to me and Bruno.
- You do not believe it.
- And I believe it!
I'm bored with these rumors for me and Bruno.
Truth; I am glad.
Where did you know?
We were celebrating a party last winter.
It's been in Egypt last year the winter I know.
It is not in Egypt the weather;
- Yeah, that's where I was.
- There we know...
- On pyramids.
- On pyramids?
I turn on the pyramids, a little left...
Boredom in Hawaii...
- I immediately fell in love.
- Were a Hawaiian skirt?
I'm trying to tell you the story and you do not keep notes.
I remember them, but you too
I forgot to put my own.
Do not be angry, I had to know for Seva and Bruno.
I know, you have to do it your job like me.
What does it interest you?
Choir and old man?
- Hoover?
- She wears glasses.
Coming right up. You must
I put the rehearsal clothes on.
I want to know more.
We can meet for a meal at Aperitiv?
Who do you think you are?
Bij Giovanni?
Do not worry, I have economies.
You do not have to go for food. Close the zipper.
We can meet away from the theater.
You're coming out! Sorry...
- At one.
- Okay!
You promise not to write for the Bruno...
- It would be totally...
- Completely!
Good morning Fraser.
- For you!
- Thanks.
Good morning how are you today;
How are you? Good morning.
I want to talk to you.
Mr. Dot, have you ever thought that something is missing from the office?
- No, Mr. Bruno.
- He misses the charm.
Nothing is charming even you.
- I'm very sorry.
- It is not your fault... we need to change something.
Life is a strange thing.
How to work people in such an environment?
We need something over there, over there...
Flowers, lots of flowers this is needed!
- Flowers, Mr. Bruno?
- Of course... joyful curtains and the flowers help...
- Is not that the case?
- Truth;
We went to the routine, the office reminds a vampire!
There's something about it, about it and that!
It is her lucky maneuver
Jacqueline Jowve at Mercury.
Yesterday dancer, today star tomorrow a possible vague!
We will not say who he is the lucky millionaire... but Javen will receive many greeting cards!
Give me this!
Good man this master Treis...
- Yes very much.
- With charm and compassion.
Yes why; - Take a look here.
Come in.
Are you stingy? When I do
Something perfect, look!
- Is not that nice?
- Yeah, who are they?
- For your sake and yours.
- Someone and what?
They're the scouts for your new look.
Especially made for the little one
Lady of Bruo!
- Will not he please?
- It will burst out of pleasure!
K. Frost I think it is better to tell you...
Later, we will say it tonight at the dinner.
- Do you want to have dinner together?
- I'd love to, but...
Cancel all your plans, bring Mr.
Bruno.
I want to talk to him about the show, you can come and you...
- Being four.
- You put it well.
I'm sure Mr. Bruno would you like to come...
- But he's missing out on the city.
- We'll be out tomorrow.
- Come on, come on.
- Great!
I'm going now because
I have a job, hello.
- Again in front of my legs?
- I need to talk to you...
Tomorrow my love, tomorrow!
Where do you go?
- From here...
- Nice!
You lasted only half an hour, you are very conspicuous.
And you are worthy of contempt!
- The house sculpture...
- I'm heading your column.
You promised not to write nothing but the one you have.
- I did not write it!
- Then who wrote it?
It could have been anyone.
- Do you swear to me?
- I swear.
How happy I am! I did not believe how you could do it!
- Did not you believe it?
- No...
- I thought you were good.
- Good coincidence...
Good morning, you want the best deal?
- Yes thank you.
- And you, sir?
- You speak.
- I'll get what the lady gets.
- Do you want to share it?
- Absolutely.
Will you drink something; - Shabava.
Tea, Sali.
Will we finish the interview?
Yes, the interview...
Tell me now... You have... you are...
- Ring ringing?
- I'm not engaged.
Congratulations!
You are not engaged.
I started dancing at the theater at my 16th... but last winter
I did not find a job...
- And I worked as a waitress.
- Last winter?
- Before or after Egypt?
- Before I go to Egypt.
That's where you knew Bruno and he immediately prompted you.
- He did not do that!
- You must be crazy.
Except for an old man and a son.
Let me tell you how I found my first job?
The meaning of the original Bi Ji?
Bijji... does not want to talk which is why it is very fragile.
Honest, old man, chore and crazy. Nice pictures!
- He's a good man.
- Where does he stay?
I went to my first tour by keeping a score.
- Where does it stay?
- Jimmy... it is difficult to remember, he always sends his chauffeur.
I had no idea it was so late, it came too...
I have to leave.
It's the bizhiro chai
I do not have to wait for me.
I still have a lot of questions.
- I am sorry.
- Will you be at the same time tomorrow?
All right, Mr. Paul.
It's too high, swamps back on the table.
- Much better.
- Will you see Bayt now?
Yes, you were in.
- You can pass.
- Thanks.
- You can talk, Bates.
- Mr...
You got an idiot with the car by Mr Bruno.
Yes, she was late and afraid she would lose her job.
And you got it with the car.
An ignorant whole... you did not know what it was.
And it did not have to be good... after he accepted to come in in the car of one ignorant.
Let us not characterize some that we do not know.
It was very good and very beautiful.
Sure, I think you took the opportunity.
- I do not like what you say.
- Confession... but I know exactly what happened!
Bates said he was good girl and I know it is.
- It will be!
- You will do the same.
Right, I just wanted to know because you went to the theater yesterday.
For the call, the he had to submit.
You used the car to your advantage... and you serve ignorant women. You need to know... that this matter has
Mr Grove's dissatisfaction.
Yes it is serious...
I do not want to feel that
I was cheating on my employees.
That's why Beits, I express the view of Mr Bruno... and I have to tell you that we are sorry but...
Come, I came to the accountants.
- Sorry...
- You bet your trust...
I keep on it to double your salary.
- I forgot my papers.
- Being a lesson for you.
Nothing, my decision is definitive.
- What are you doing?
- We get the dresses again.
- Who said take them?
- Mr. Jostol, it's in.
- Fortunately you came!
- One minute gentlemen... tomorrow we have a premiere, you said how will you give me time.
The time is over you do not have money as usual.
You know he supports me you are very rich from here!
We do not want other excuses and lies, it's too late!
- What lies?
- You are missing the moral, Mr. Frost.
You heard me talking with the Bruno, right?
I did the star girl, is not that ethical?
Find Jacqueline and send it in my office.
- Why do not you pay us then?
- These things... you want time, you know how are the lawyers!
Come a little in my office
I want to show you something.
- Jacket, you want Mr. Frost.
- I am coming.
They're the scouts for the new life.
Imagine how much you will enjoy when do you make it?
- When do I fix it?
- Of course... you remark that I am ungrateful and will I give it to another?
You're asking me to make a sculpture the moment I get the others?
- I'm not sick!
- I'm sewing other costumes!
- Did you ask me Mr. Frost?
- Savvet, my dear...
Mr. Jostol and his friends.
I told them about our plans... for our despatch dinner with your creator.
We will discuss the latter details of the show.
- Yes correctly.
- Where will you go for dinner?
- In Bov Vivier.
- We'll be there.
- Okay, will you leave the scouts?
- Why do you get them?
We'll see how the evening will go.
Thanks, just a little while!
You can not make it without the model.
Thanks, that's it.
You were going to get the scouts.
That's what we're going to do!
Look at Mr. Frost I'm afraid how are you sick?
I look at your big one opportunity, is not it?
You have to do it too something for me.
- Convince Bruno to come.
- I can not, it is missing and...
He turned, I saw his chauffeur yesterday in court.
Javet, you'll save the show your career is disturbing.
- I can not do it!
- I have to risk them all!
Think of the children that are based at this premiere.
You are a good girl, I know that you will not disappoint us.
He went quickly to bribe it with Brubo.
- Did you finish?
- Yes finally.
You have to go back inside.
This is Jimmy, but do not do it because it stutters.
How about Ritchie?
It looks like a millionaire.
I can not do it.
After you promised the Bruno you have to show it!
- I'll tell the truth!
- Will you miss the opportunity?
I come from my body, calm down and chose a mistress!
- We do not know how it is!
- She's 35 with a mustache.
- How do you know;
- It was simple, Watsov.
I got his secretary and I said that I was writing an article... for wealthy men and their hobbies.
- What's his hobby?
- His job.
Then we need some serious master.
- He looks rich.
- He just went bankrupt.
It is worthwhile.
- Hey, Paul.
- I got some flowers.
- It's a great Paul.
- How are you;
You have not known yourself.
This is Mei.
I see so much for the first time flowers, where did you find them?
- A shop.
- What did you do, fuck you?
- I do not understand...
- Do not listen to what he says.
Will you put them in a vase?
Well, you do not have to spend in such things.
I saw them in the vitriva as it comes to...
Bij Giovanni!
What are you doing, Mr. Bruno?
- You're crazy, we can not!
- Why not;
You want to save the career of Jacqueth?
You can make it that you are Brueve?
I will not allow it.
We may be in trouble.
It's simple, we'll get out for dinner with Frost.
Very nice, supposed how am I going to be Bruve?
Frost wants you to know but it is missing.
- Where is this time?
- In Monte Carlo.
- Will you do it?
- Of course!
It's not easy to be present somebody else, Paul.
- Do you think you can?
- I will try.
To ask something, do you have an evening suit?
Is it good? It is some glossy greens?
- No, not...
- Nice, you're getting involved.
Come on, sit down for information now.
Savo Bruno, supposed that you know all the social.
You will talk about the villa and your yacht in Mote Carlo.
- Do I have a yacht?
- You two have!
Do not forget that you are rich, you are not Paul...
- You must be cynical.
- And somehow it's a bitch.
- You must buy and cigar.
- No, I do not.
All Millionaires smoke cigar.
- All the time!
- I will try.
- You are very sweet Paul.
- I'll do the fuck for a seve.
We do not have time for these, we have to get ready.
- What time do we start?
- Come on, get us at ten.
We have to hurry.
- Enterprise Brubo!
- Tell me more...
I'm not Paul Tracy,
I'm Bij Giovanni.
Horrified, he was going home practice.
I think we did a big mistake.
He is the most unconvincing
I've never seen me!
I'm Bij Giovanni.
I am;
Do not be nervous, say that you are sympathetic to these.
- I will try.
- I still say it was wrong.
- Mr Frost's table?
- From here, sir.
Mr. Frost's table.
When you come to tell him where we sit.
- I am very good.
- That's what I'm saying.
Look!
Good morning Mr.
Frost, please be here.
- Do not worry, okay?
- And do not talk too much... otherwise you cheat to reveal it all.
- You 're Jim Brouwo.
- Mr. Bruno do not get up...
I wanted to show you how much
I love Scotland with the kilts.
- I hear a lot about you, Mr.
- And I wanted to know.
Bjhi just turned around from Monte Carlo.
- Yes, with the yacht.
- Bingo cigarettes?
- Do not you smoke a cigar?
- I forgot them.
- He prefers cigars.
- Take one of my own.
- No thanks.
- Come my love.
What will we take;
Do you want to start with caviar?
- Caviar; Wonderful!
- I don't like it.
It has been overestimated and it's very expensive.
Millionaire you are, why are you worried?
- What do you say about oysters?
- I would like a soup.
Do not listen to it, it loves it the oysters, so my love?
He is so rich who forgets what he has!
- Lobster, duck...
- I want a simple scramble.
Omelette; - Stop it!
Excuse me, that's it our favorite song.
It's a perfect couple.
- You're not trying at all, Paul.
- But I try.
- Do you know what a problem I have?
- No what;
Please tell me my love.
You have your mind what you do.
- You 're Jim Brouwo.
- I'm Bij Giovanni!
And for dessert, crepe sugeette.
Bring and saber. It is
Brouvo very charming.
It does not seem like that he is a millionaire.
Who is the gentleman on Mr. Frost's table?
Dancing with the girl with the blue dress.
- It's Mr Bij Giovanni.
- Thanks.
I wanted to make sure that he told us the truth.
Try to do it too you say what you need, Paul.
- I'll make the oath for a seve.
- Do not forget who you are!
Jostol was impressed
I see it, all goes well!
Mr Bruvo, sit down my three friends there...
I'm sure you think you're financing me.
I've been thinking about investing a few thousand at the theater.
My love, we have to dance and in this song!
Excuse me!
- Nice time pick!
- Mr. Frost... you do not have to take it money from Mrs. Bruno.
- Why not;
- He doesn't know by show.
Until we finish the dinner he will know everything!
I was trying to play well my role.
- You did the trick.
- I am sorry.
You're very sweet and I am yours... but you do not for a millionaire.
Maybe I had to wear it false generic.
It's what you say and do.
I will do whatever you want
I'm going to fuck cigar too!
Tell him to dance again to grab it!
- I have a good orchestra, right?
- You want to dance continuously!
- Hello guys, are you leaving?
- We wanted to say hello.
Do you say before? From here
Mr Bij Giovanni.
I'm very happy, I'm learning that your theater interests you.
- Yeah, that's it.
- Will we see you in the theater then?
- I hope so.
- Do not delay...
- Do not worry about anything.
- We started the tents.
Thank you very much, goodnight.
You do not know how much I enjoyed being you are interested in the show.
If you come to my office tomorrow, you will learn more.
What do you call Bing?
I'm trying to pull you the attention... but you were not looking to me.
Let me introduce you the promises
Joe and Tommsv... and Mrs. Frost. Lady Mavridv.
- Nice to meet you.
- Likewise.
Joe Frost, somewhere
I have heard the word.
You may have read for me at Varizete.
I gave her a few pounds to do that.
Mr. Frost expects one musical at the Mercury Theater.
- Come on.
- Bring the duke.
Paul paid him to do that.
- I was glad to see you.
- I gotta get you.
I was glad to know you.
And Frost with the kilts...
- It tries, though?
- Okay.
Suppose I had a lot of money...
I'll give you a shot some in Frost?
I think you are, I want let me see it... it is also good for even for one night.
His creditors will shut him if he does not pay them.
I want to ask you something for Bij Giovanni.
Let's not talk about it, help me come down.
I want to talk about it, it's important.
Please, we're upset.
Crushed with the Bruve?
What is it about?
For you...
Bi Ji is jealous of you.
It's ridiculous, I'll tell him
Tomorrow I'll see it.
No Paul, please.
- Thank you for everything.
- I'll explain everything to him.
You would be very angry if I told you... something I want to tell you,
I do not know the Bruno.
I have not understood it, understand me please.
I want to tell you something about Jacob... from the moment I knew you
I want to dance, to sing... and climb to a clatter!
Are you still there Javen?
I have to tell you something, listen to me!
He wants to make it again.
Goodnight.
PREMIER APOPSE
I told you a thousand times... that I do not want to talk with the bank!
Dear, goodbye to you you passed by to see me.
It was a strange thing, just thinking about it.
- I was looking at the bills...
- And you thought me?
I liked you a lot from yesterday evening.
- You have something special.
- I wonder what it is.
I do not know but I think how difficult it is...
I have to leave you invite you to the show.
- Your kindness.
- It's a great opportunity... and it's simpler from your own work.
We do not buy paper or write cards!
Let's start a little an amount of 3 thousand let's say...
Two thousand? I can not to take less than a thousand!
- I've decided.
- Look here... we can do that the amount every week.
Then we will have the revenue from songs and albums.
When I make a decision is definitive.
You laugh, you know what did I think I saw?
- A check for 10 thousand.
- That's it.
By Mrs. Frost, I do not want Savvet to learn it.
I did, though, forgot it.
You can forget it and you want it!
- What are you doing here Paul?
- I can not talk to you...
I have a press conference.
Take the bank, I want let me speak to the governor.
Yes, I told the bank.
Change things!
Come in, Javet!
K. Frost, what did you do here?
Mr. Bruno?
What everyone is doing the millionaires.
Send in Charlie, I want to go to the bank.
K. Frost must know... if he gave you the check the one who left early.
Mr Bruno and I did an agreement and not...
It's not Mr. Bruno!
- Did you ask me?
- Yes to me a favor...
She went to the check at the bank... and tell them to keep you well the safe!
Ten thousand pounds!
You do not have to deposit the check.
You will be blamed for forgery.
- Who me;
- It was not Bruno that.
You are a journalist, you are my friend.
I do not know the Bruno!
Tell this again, but this time say it late!
I have never known the Bruno... but when you persevere to go out for dinner...
I had to find something.
- I'm sorry Mr. Frost.
- It does not matter to Savvett.
- Will you forgive me?
- Yeah, forget it... you were going to get ready for the rehearsal.
Do not sit, he warned
Scott Jarvt!
- You 're in Logviv.
- I want it!
- Which category?
- Find one, impersonation...
- Plastography, chaos!
- Mr. Frost...
Sympathy, arson...
Get out in front of me!
Dumbbell stab!
Wonderful work, worship!
K. Frost this scammer it's here, look!
He has a lot of audacity, he got the police fast!
- Where's the police?
- Everywhere in the theater.
- What are you going to do about Mr. Frost?
- Do not worry.
- You do not understand...
- You went to change yourself.
- Where are we going;
- Do not ask, come with me!
I loved it!
- You gotta be crazy!
- Why, what do I have?
- You have to leave quickly!
- Why;
You're looking to fuck!
Quickly, out of the window!
- You 're gonna get into a little alley.
- But I do not!
Fly and leave?
Do I have to do everything?
Take the key of my house you were going to hide there.
I want to see the rest of the show!
He runs you all over the Scottish police!
- Why are you headed?
- For the fake check!
Do not worry, he's my friend.
What are you doing here?
- I want to go to the theater!
- To enter;
Are you crazy; You have to leave!
Girls, take out the robes and put your costumes!
What is happening?
Whatever I say to you!
That's it.
- You have to leave quickly.
- Is there no other way out?
I do not want to bother but
I have to explain something to you.
I did not give a fake check in the Frost... because I am Bij Giovanni.
I hear Paul Tracy, I'm trying to help you... if you do not want it, but think of me too.
- It's my premiere.
- I can prove it.
He looked at the door and tell them to me.
- I can not do it!
- Why;
Why do I love you, goddess!
Say it again!
Please, please what I'm telling you!
- Okay, but I'm the Bruno!
- Get out of the window!
I'll go in again to see the rest of the show.
And then I want the show let me know you the devil.
- One minute.
- You have to come to the department.
- Can I explain...
- I'm sorry, lady.
- Good kids kids.
- Good inspector.
K. Bruno I am very sorry.
Do not start with yourself, it's not Bruno!
- And yet...
- I know so many years.
You are the real;
- The check is...
- And of course it is.
- Where are they? I lost it...
- You better find her!
- Do you believe me now?
- Get out of Jacqueline!
This is terrible, Paul is Bij Giovanni!
What does it look like?
You go for your mind!
- Do not bump, leave!
- I found this and...
My check! You found her, you are a wonderful girl!
- I have been rewarded for this.
- I want to talk to you.
- Tell me what you want!
- You see Mr. Frost...
Daddy is disappointed.
He has a lot of money...
- She wants to get on the show.
- I do not feel very good...
You saw Frost when he did how did he miss the check?
He was so excited for the premiere.
Are you miles away, in New Jersey?
In Virzivia with cows?
In Cairo in the pyramids?
He plunges into the pyramids, a little to the left.
Where you knew the chore main with glasses.
I want to ask you something for Bij Giovanni.
Let's not talk about it.
- I want to know something...
- What thing;
- What do they mean initially?
- Paul...
Performance-Adaptation
VIVI ALEXANDROPOULOU.
Subrip: ELKESIPELOS
[ORCHESTRA PLAYlNG]
[CROWD APPLAUDlNG]
[ORCHESTRA PLAYlNG]
[SlNGlNG]
With a laugh and a dance
Mine's a life to entrance
Not a thought, not a care
With a heart debonair
I am free as the sea
Like the lark who at dawn
Bids the darkness begone
Do I sing merrily
With a laugh and a dance
Mine's a life to entrance
For I know naught but glee
And the word that I bring
And the theme that I sing
Is the song of a heart that's free
Oh, then let music ring
While sweet voices sing
Pleasure is mine
Echoes repeating, measures entreating
Song of a heart light and free
Laughing all the day
Chaffing cares away
Hear my roundelay
Heigh-o
Not a thought, not a care
With a heart debonair
I am free as the sea
Like the lark who at dawn
Bids the darkness begone
Do I sing merrily
With a laugh and a dance
Mine's a life to entrance
For I know naught but glee
And the word that I bring
And the theme that I sing
Is the song of a heart
That's free!
[MOUTHS]
Come on. Hurry up.
Better play the short version, Papa.
Mama's in a hurry.
''The Light Cavalry Overture.''
[ORCHESTRA PLAYlNG]
Patti, get your valise. We'll have to rush or we're going to miss the boat. l wanna miss the boat.
Mother, why do we always have to go to Kissamee-in-the-Catskills;
-l hate Kissamee-in-the-Catskills.
-Oh, nonsense. Last year you loved it.
-Last year l was a child.
-You're still a child...
...even if you sit up half the night lengthening your dresses.
But l was 1 7 last week.
You may treat me like a baby, but inside l'm a woman.
Now, Patti, l want no trouble with you this summer.
You're not interested in boys and l want you to stay that way.
When you're 1 8, we'll have a little talk--
Eighteen ;
Mother, that's almost a whole year away.
How will l ever get through the summer;
-l'm gonna be a misfit all summer long.
-That's enough.
Finish your packing and change your clothes.
And l don't want to hear one other word about Kissamee-in-the-Catskills.
Remind me to shorten that dress.
MELBA: Mr. Hibbs is here with the carriage, Mama.
BOTH: Hi, Mr. Hibbs. Hi, Nettie. Hi, Hettie.
HlBBS: Hi.
Come on up for the baggages, Mr. Hibbs.
KATHERlNE: Oh, boys, close your valise.
RlCKY: We can't. They're too full.
-Have Melba sit on it.
-You gotta sit on our valise.
-Why;
-Because you got the biggest sitter.
Besides, Mama said.
A female woman is supposed to have hips.
RlCKY:
Sit harder, Melba.
[ORCHESTRA PLAYlNG]
Put on your hats and coats.
RlCKY: Do l have to sit on Patti's lap this year, Mama;
McCORMlCK:
Can l take Delilah along;
Oh, he was supposed to play the short version. Yes, you do. No, you can't.
Only sissies sit on girls' laps.
[KNOCKlNG]
Come in, Mr. Hibbs.
-Who's going to give Delilah her bath ;
-Maggie will be stopping by every morning.
You ought to have allowed more time this year.
Nettie and Hettie ain't what they used to be.
But Delilah doesn't like Maggie.
-Why can't Patti sit on my lap ;
-Folks never leave enough time.
Can l take Delilah as far as the boat;
She's never seen the Hudson River.
All right. Mr. Hibbs can bring her back.
Mother, really.
You'd think we were Gypsies.
-That's it.
-Don't be silly.
[CROWD APPLAUDlNG] lt is. Come on, children.
Be sure you have everything, now.
Take Father's coat, bring Delilah and we're off.
Off for two glorious weeks at Kissamee-in-the-Catskills.
[PEOPLE CHATTERlNG]
Young man, l'm not paying you
1 0 cents a day to gawk into a well.
-l wasn't gawking. There's a frog in there.
-Shh!
[FROG CRO AKlNG]
Fish it out after dark.
Carry the Schuster's bags in.
They're still on the front stoop.
Papa, the surrey's gonna be here any minute.
-What's the surrey got to do with it;
-Papa, the Robinsons will be on it.
Oh, Robinsons or no Robinsons, get up here and carry these bags in.
Welcome home. Mrs. Robinson, you're looking as young as your daughters.
-Hello, Mr. Robinson.
-Hello, Finlay. lt's hot.
Billy. Billy Finlay.
Gosh, he's grown a foot.
Hello, Patti.
-Gosh, you look wonderful.
-So do you, Billy.
-Can l help you; Can l take your bag;
-Thank you.
-Here's mine.
-What's the matter; Your arm broken ;
-l suppose we have our same old rooms;
-No, better ones. You're up in 23 this year.
-Old Mrs. Hochstatter finally died.
-ln our bed;
No, in Hoboken.
Patti, how about a walk before supper; l mean, after supper. l mean, how about a walk;
-l have an engagement, Billy.
-Already;
-Oh.
-What's wrong with his pants;
Gee, can l help it if my father won't let me have longies for another year;
Poor boy. Parents are so trying.
Patti, how about walking to the post office with me tomorrow, maybe;
Sorry, l'm not expecting any mail, Billy.
Golly, last summer she was fun.
What's got into her, anyway;
Old age. She thinks she's 1 8 and she knows you're only 1 6.
Well, can l help it; Besides, l look older. l know. And l don't mind a bit.
Be sure to scrub out this basin, girls.
And remember, there are other people in the world.
Don't stay in the bathroom forever.
-Yes, Mom.
HORATlO: Katie!
Who put this feather snake in my suitcase;
My new jacket's covered with whiskers.
Now, Horatio, don't get excited.
-Must be the molting season.
-Yes. Well, l won't have it.
[KNOCKlNG]
Come in.
[DOOR OPENS]
-Valerie.
-Patti.
-Oh!
-l just heard you got in.
A whole year and how you've changed.
Why, you're pretty.
Melba hasn't changed a bit.
-We followed your tour in the papers.
-Oh, that.
After one's been on the stage since one was 6...
...why, one tour is just like another.
But with John Barrymore.
Let me touch you.
Well, yes, he was rather nice.
Did you have a scene with him;
Well, no, not exactly.
You see, l die in the prologue.
-Someone in the audience shoot you;
-Melba.
Patti, l've got oodles to tell you...
...but it's all going to have to keep until big ears with hair bows aren't around.
Melba, dear, why don't you go and see what we're going to have for dinner; l already know.
Sauerkraut and pig's knuckles.
Patti, Mother's still playing whist.
Be a sport and tighten me up, will you;
About 1 8 inches.
PATTl: lt's beautiful.
-lt's the La Belle Mode for Young Misses.
PATTl: ls that all right;
-A little tighter, dear.
-l can still take a deep breath.
PATTl: All right.
They wear the same in the loony house only they call them straitjackets.
They do give you such a wonderful feeling, don't they;
Yes, wonderful.
How would you know;
Melba, would you ask Mr. Finlay what night we take our baths; l already know. Thursday, 7 a.m.
We have Saturday night.
But then, of course, we have a more expensive room.
-Are there any new people here this year;
-Not a soul.
Talk about the man shortage. Why, l may have to ask one of your brothers for a date.
-Oh, is it that desperate;
-lt's indescribable.
Of course, it's not so awful for you.
You're not eligible for the older set.
Well, l'm almost 1 8.
-Yeah, in 1 1 months.
-Will you please go downstairs;
Oh, Patti, darling, l know just how you feel.
That old unwritten law.
Seventeen just can't go with 1 8. lt doesn't seem fair.
But when you're in the older set, why, then you'll understand. lf you ask me, some people are just afraid of competition.
Melba, dear, why don't you go downstairs and help Billy Finlay set the tables;
Think l will. l have the most wond--
[HORN HONKlNG]
[PEOPLE CHATTERlNG] lsn't he dashing;
PATTl:
Who do you suppose he is;
He must be related to that Mrs. Armendez from Cuba.
Well, l guess l'd better be running along. l mustn't keep my mother waiting.
Thanks for lacing me, darling.
[DOOR CLOSES]
What are you gonna wear;
Oh, l don't know.
What are the Cuban colors;
Three blue stripes on white with a red triangle.
But you're too skinny for stripes.
You don't look good in red.
More water, Patti;
-No, thank you.
-l'd love some.
Melba, that makes five.
The dam will go any minute.
Mama said a bad word.
Go swimming with me tomorrow, Patti; l really can't say, Billy.
-Next day;
-l'll have to let you know. l can go both days.
What are they staring at;
My new dress.
Right this way, Senor Armendez.
Thank you.
KATHERlNE:
Patti, close your mouth.
Oh.
[CHUCKLES]
That mustache does nothing for you.
KATHERlNE: Wipe you lip, dear.
-Oh.
Careful, you'll blow crumbs in Papa's lap.
Oh, Papa, l'm sorry.
Oh, now it's ashes.
What's the matter with that girl; lt's that new Cuban.
Ouch! That's my sore ankle.
Now, Papa, ashes are good for moths.
Well, l don't like moths.
Why should l be good to them;
What new Cuban ;
Papa, please. He's right behind you.
Hm; Oh, so that's it, eh ;
What's so extraordinary about him;
You'd think he had two heads.
[HORATlO CHUCKLES] l was much more attractive when l was his age, wasn't l;
Yes, Papa, much.
-May l please be excused;
-You haven't touched your tapioca.
-l'll eat it.
-l'll eat it.
Quiet, children. Very well, Patti.
-Thank you.
-Elbows off the table, dear.
Oh, l'm sorry--
-Oh, Patti. Gee, l'm sorry.
-Oh, gosh, tapioca.
With raisins.
Oh!
-Oh, no, dear.
-Get back to the kitchen, young man.
A regrettable accident, regrettable. lt won't happen again, l assure you.
Poor child.
ALL [SlNGlNG] :
Like the roses need their fragrance
Like a sweetheart needs a kiss
A kiss
Like the summer needs the sunshine
Like a laddie needs a miss
A miss
Like a broken heart needs gladness
Like the flowers need the dew
Need the dew
Like a baby needs its mother
That's how I need you
How I need you
[VOlCE CRACKS]
[BO YS GRO AN]
What did you expect, Caruso;
[BO YS CHATTERlNG]
[PLAYlNG OFF-KEY]
[SlNGlNG]
That's how I need you
Patti. ls your head all right;
You sure dented my tray.
-He isn't in here, is he;
-With us kids;
Hey, Patti, come on.
Let's have ''The Oceana Roll.''
Yeah, Patti, sing ''The Oceana Roll.''
-Yeah, come on, Patti.
-Come on, Patti.
[ALL CHEERlNG]
[SlNGlNG]
Billy McCoy was a musical boy
On the cruiser Alabama
He was there at the piano
Like a fish down in the sea
Oh, when he rattled off some harmony
Every night upon the ocean
He would get that raggy notion
Start that syncopated motion lovingly
No one could sleep
Way out there on the deep
When Billy cut loose out at sea
Each fish and worm
Begins to twist and squirm
The ship starts in to dip
And does a corkscrew turn
Just see that smoke so black
Sneak from that old smokestack
It's floatin' right to heaven
And it won't come back
Now here and there
You'll see a stool and chair
A-slippin' round the cabin
Shoutin' ''I don't care!''
And then the hammock starts a-swingin'
And the bell begins a-ringin'
While we're sittin' at that piano
There on the Alabama
Playin' the Oceana Roll
ALL [SlNGlNG] : Each fish and worm
Begins to twist and squirm
The ship starts in to dip
And does a corkscrew turn
Just see that smoke so black
Sneak from that old smokestack
It's floatin' right to heaven
And it won't came back
Now here and there
You'll see a stool and chair
A-slippin' round the cabin
Shoutin' ''I don't care!''
And then the hammock starts a-swingin'
And the bell begins a-ringin'
While we're sittin' at that piano
There on the Alabama
Playin' the Oceana Roll
Every time he sits down
At the piano stool
People start a-shoutin'
''You're a playin' fool''
'Cause he is the master of the razzmatazz
He's known to everyone as Mr. Jazz
When he gets a-goin'
With a real hot break
Even Davy Jones
Begins to shim and shake
Oh, brother, you'll declare
Hey, he's a bear
What a lot of music he can make
-So listen here
-So listen here
-And lend an ear
-And lend an ear
So listen here and lend an ear
And lend an ear
Slippin' round the cabin
Shoutin' ''I don't care!''
And then the hammock starts a-swingin'
And the bell begins a-ringin'
While we're sittin' at that piano
There on the Alabama
Playin' the Oceana Roll
[ALL CHEERlNG] l'll see you all later.
VALERlE: Patti.
-Thank you.
Oh, Val, wasn't it awful what happened in the dining room;
Oh, you poor dear.
What a dreadful impression to make. l can never look him in the face again.
But l suppose l'll have to when l apologize. lf l were you, l'd keep out of his way for a while.
He was quite upset.
-You've met him;
-Well, naturally.
He asked to be presented to me.
-Oh, Val, what's he like;
-Oh, very adult.
Beautiful manners. A gentleman.
Oh, a gentleman. l've never met one.
Patti, l've got wonderful news for you.
Eddie Gavin doesn't have a girl this year. l believe he's available.
Oh, him. He's always available.
Well, l wouldn't be too hasty if l were you.
You know, a clever woman can always mold a man.
No, thank you. He's moldy enough.
Oh, dear.
-Senor Armendez.
-Excuse me a moment, please.
[PLAYER PlANO PLAYlNG]
Miss Robinson ; l've been looking for you.
-For me;
-Everywhere. But you had vanished. l wanted to return your fan and to reassure you about the little accident.
Oh, but it wasn't an accident.
-You mean you did it on purpose;
-Oh, no, l mean it was all my fault.
-l stooped when l shouldn't have stooped.
-Oh, no. lt was my fault.
-l bent when l shouldn't have bent.
-No, mine.
-l stooped when l--
-Nonsense, mine. l bent.
-Stooped.
-Bent.
-No, please. lt's forgotten, yes;
-Oh, well, thank you very much.
Oh, but l did spoil your jacket and your dessert.
You know,
Mr. Finlay only allows one helping.
Well, l'll tell you a secret. l detest tapioca.
Me too. l'd much rather have one of your American ice-cream sodas.
Well, there's an ice-cream parlor in the village.
-Oh ;
-Yes. You just go down this road...
...turn left at the knife-- l mean, at the fork.
And then you turn right-- l mean left.
Well, maybe you'd better show me the way, huh ;
Shall we take a little stroll;
-Now;
-Yes.
-The two of us;
-Unless you'd like to ask someone else.
-Oh, no.
-Well, fine, fine.
-We will toast our meeting with a soda.
-Strawberry.
Well, hello, you two. l didn't know you had met.
-Oh, we're old friends.
-We're going to have a soda.
-Strawberry.
-l'd love one.
-Would you like to join us;
-l'd adore to.
Heavenly night for a stroll.
-Patti, isn't it rather late for you;
-l don't know what you mean.
Oh, Patti. Hello, Valerie.
Good evening, Mr. Armendez.
-Good evening.
-Bad news, darling. Time for bed.
But, Mama, l'm not tired.
Nevertheless, you need your rest.
Growing girls, you know.
Come along, dear.
Now, isn't that just like a mother; l'm so sorry.
We'll do it some other time.
That's a promise.
Good night, senorita. Buenas nochas.
Good night.
My, don't they make a nice couple;
He asked me first.
Oh, now, Patti, don't you go getting ideas.
He's much too old for you.
You've got plenty of time.
Not on a two-weeks vacation, l haven't.
[CHlLDREN LAUGHlNG]
Don't run and watch out for the poison ivy.
-What's it look like;
-A shiny green leaf with three forks.
Anybody knows that.
-Like this;
-McCormick, drop that.
Mac's gonna get poison ivy. lf l do, l'll give it to you.
That's enough. l forbid either one of you to get it.
Oh, Patti. Hurry along, dear.
Children.
Be sure you stay on the children's side and don't get out where it's deep.
-Now run along.
RlCKY: Okay.
Take a squint at the potato sack.
Where did you get that suit;
[lMlTATES SEAL BARKlNG]
[ALL LAUGHlNG]
Why don't you watch where you're going;
Castle-buster. l'm sorry, Mac. l'll help you build another.
What's the matter;
Look at me.
Yeah, pretty awful. lf l were you, l wouldn't let anybody see me.
Hi, Patti. Don't go away. l'll be right back.
Hello, Melba.
On second thought, Patti, an older woman like you ought to be with the grownups.
Why don't you stand up for your rights and go on back there;
Oh, quick. Cover me with sand.
Bury me or something.
MELBA:
Come on, Mac.
McCORMlCK:
What's the matter; ls she dead;
-She will be if he sees her.
-Hurry.
Hurry up.
-Havana must be simply beautiful.
-Mm-hm.
Not that.
-Hello, children. What are you playing, huh ;
McCORMlCK: Funeral.
Yeah, we just buried a dead fish.
-ls that Morro Castle;
-No, Robinson's Castle.
-Oh, are you Patti Robinson's brother;
RlCKY: Yeah.
Where does she hide herself, huh ;
-Oh, under pails, boxes, most anything.
-Ha, ha. Well, when you find her...
...tell her that the strawberry sodas are wonderful, will you;
Come along, Demi. Horrible child.
Oh, no. l think she's very amusing.
They're a very charming family.
Did you hear that; l'm horrible, the family's charming, the sodas are wonderful.
-Shall we take a dip ;
-lf you'll promise to protect me.
Why, Valerie, you disappoint me. l had hoped to find you independent, self-reliant.
All the qualities l admire in American women.
Oh.
Well....
Hey, look.
Lady Godiva.
Hey, Melba, where's Patti; l haven't the faintest idea.
Billy, wait for me.
PATTl:
Help, Melba. Melba, Mac.
Oh, please, kids.
Come get me out of here. Melba!
-Patti, where are you;
PATTl: Here, Papa, l'm down here.
-Down where;
PATTl: Oh, hurry, Papa. Under a pail.
-Come on, Papa, hurry. Please, hurry.
-Pail; What...;
PATTl:
Please, l can't stand it any longer.
Help, help, help, Papa.
Get me out of here, please!
What are you doing there;
You come out of there this minute.
-You could be drowned.
-l wanna drown.
And when l do, l hope my bathing suit washes up at Mama's feet.
What's the matter with your bathing suit;
Has it got a hole;
Oh, Papa, everything.
All the other girls are dressed like young ladies.
And l'm kept like an orphan, an infant.
The way Mama treats me, you'd think l'm in diapers.
Patti, l'm sure your mama knows what's good for you. ls it good for me to be a laughingstock, an object of ridicule, a potato sack;
Oh, my dear child, it can't be as bad as that--
Oh, my, yes, yes, it can.
Oh, you poor little thing.
Here, put this on.
Cover yourself up.
And l'll be right back.
Thank you, Papa.
Katie, l wanna talk to you.
Look, the lifeguard's teaching me to swim.
Yes, so l notice. l'll finish the lesson, thank you very much.
A pleasure, sir.
Katie, you've got to buy Patti a bathing suit.
She has a bathing suit.
-Look out.
-Hold my chin up.
Call that a bathing suit;
That's a potato sack.
My daughter is not a potato.
KATHERlNE:
Your daughter; lf l remember correctly, l had a little something to do with that.
Now, Katie-- Look out, Katie.
What do you want her to do, go around flaunting herself like Valerie;
Great heavens, no, but l-- l suppose l ought to put her hair up, pull in her waist.
-Pad her hips.
-Look out, look out.
The first thing you know, some silly man will come along and want to marry her.
-ls that what you want;
-Good heavens, no,
She's just a child, she's a baby, she's....
Katie, you're a smart woman.
You know what's best for our girl. l'm gonna leave Patti entirely to you.
But look here, Katie.
Couldn't you possibly find a bathing suit for her...
...that's maybe a little bit in between ;
That's a girl, Katie.
Say, you're doing fine.
Come on around here now.
That's the stuff.
ALL [SlNGlNG] :
Aba daba, daba, daba, daba, daba, daba
Means ''Monk, I love but you''
Aba daba, dab in monkey talk
Means ''Chimp, I love you too ''
Then the big baboon one night in June
He married them and very soon
They went upon
Their aba daba honeymoon
Way down in the Congoland
Lived a happy chimpanzee
She loved a monkey with the long tail
Lordy, how she loved him
Each night he would find her there
Swinging in the coconut tree
And the monkey gay at the break of day
Loved to hear his chimpie say:
''Aba daba, daba, daba, daba, daba, daba ''
Said the chimpie to the monk
''Aba daba, daba, daba, daba, daba, daba ''
Said the monkey to the chimp
All night long they'd chatter away
All day long they were happy and gay
Swinging and singing
In their honky-tonky way
Aba daba, daba, daba, daba, daba, daba
Means ''Monk, I love but you''
Baba daba, dab in monkey talk
Means ''Chimp, I love you too ''
Then the big baboon one night in June
He married them and very soon
They went upon
Their aba daba honeymoon
''Aba daba, daba, daba, daba, daba, daba ''
Said chimpie to the monk
''Aba daba, daba, daba, daba, daba, daba ''
Said monkey to the chimp
All night long they'd chatter away
All day long they were happy and gay
Swinging and singing
In their honky-tonky way
Aba daba, daba, daba, daba, daba, daba
Means ''Monk, I love but you''
Baba, daba, dab in monkey talk
Means ''Chimp, I love you too ''
And the big baboon one night in June
He married them and very soon
They went upon
Their aba daba honeymoon
[CROWD LAUGHlNG]
And the big baboon one night in June
He married them and very soon
They went upon their aba daba honey
CHORUS: Aba daba, aba daba
Aba daba honeymoon
ALL:
A honeymoon
[CROWD LAUGHlNG
AND CHATTERlNG]
Billy, Mrs. Schlessinger wants a hot-water bag.
On a night like this;
Don't argue, fill it.
MELBA: l'll hold the bag.
Hello, Val.
Why, Patti, what are you doing here all by your lonesome;
-Waiting for someone.
-Billy;
Oh, well, l should hope not. Demi.
Oh ; Do you have a date with him;
Well, not exactly.
But last night, when l couldn't go for a walk with him, he said another time.
-And this is another time so....
-Oh.
You know, Patti, if you want to intrigue a sophisticated man like Demi...
...you're just going to have to learn to project your personality.
-l'm afraid l haven't much to project.
-But of course you have.
Why, you're full of latent fire.
All you have to do is fan it a little bit.
Adopt a more alluring manner.
Act more worldly, more mysterious, like, uh....
Like Theda Bara.
Oh, but, Val, Theda Bara was born in the shadow of the sphinx...
...and l was born across the street from McSweeney's Livery Stable.
Theda Bara is the perfect model for you.
Now, when you get Demi exactly where you want him...
...appeal to his protective instinct.
Act helpless.
You know, if there's one thing foreign men adore, it's a clinging vine.
Oh, but, Val, Theda Bara's too exotic, l--
But, Patti, it's so simple.
All you have to do is think of Egypt, the Nile and the pyramids....
-You really think it would help ;
-Absolutely.
Gosh, Val. Thanks a lot.
Don't mention it, darling. l'm always glad to help.
Theda Bara;
DEMl:
What did you say;
PATTl:
Yes, Demi, there are two Patti Robinsons.
One is gay, carefree, debonair.
[PATTl AND DEMl LAUGHlNG]
The other is deep, mysterious.
The real me.
The me l keep hidden from the world.
-l'm an iceberg.
-l beg your pardon ;
Oh, not that l'm cold, mind you...
...but only one-fifth of me appears above the surface. lmagine that.
Well, do you suppose the other four-fifths might care to go for a canoe ride;
Oh, golly, that'd--
Well, that might be rather nice...
...if you promise not to rock the boat.
The other four-fifths of me can't swim.
Oh, well, then l don't know.
They tell me the lake is pretty deep.
Oh, but l wouldn't be afraid with you. lf anything happened--
Well, if anything happened...
...l'd fling my arms around your neck like a clinging vine and l'd cling. l'd cling, cling, like a....
Like a clinging vine.
-Patti, l'd love to take you canoeing, but--
-Did somebody mention canoeing;
Demi just asked me for a canoe ride.
-Unfortunately, she doesn't swim.
-Oh, dear.
And the Robinsons would never forgive you if anything happened to their little girl.
Shall we;
All right. l'm sorry, Patti.
When you learn to swim, hm;
-Let's go, Valerie.
-Mm-hm.
-Of all the gooses.
-Geeses.
Letting that vamp walk off with him.
And what was the idea of telling him you couldn't swim; lt wasn't my idea, it was Val--
Oh!
Sometimes l wonder what Billy sees in you.
CHORUS [SlNGlNG] :
By the light
Of the silv'ry moon
I want to spoon
To my honey I'll croon love's tune
MEN: Honey moon
WOMEN: Honey moon
CHORUS:
Keep a-shining in June
Your silv'ry beams
Will bring love's dreams
We'll be cuddling soon
By the silv'ry moon
Mama and Papa;
Gee willikens.
[SlNGlNG]
By the light
Of the silv'ry moon
-I want to spoon
-I want to spoon
-To my honey I'll croon love's tune
-To my honey I'll croon love's tune
-Honey moon
-Won't you listen, Honey moon;
-Keep a-shining in June
-Keep a-shining in June
-Your silv'ry beams will bring love's dreams
-Beams will bring love's dreams
-We'll be cuddling soon
-We'll be cuddling soon
Cuddling soon
-By the silv'ry moon
-By the silv'ry moon
By the light
Of the silv'ry moon
I wanna spoon
To my honey I'll croon love's tune
Honey moon
Keep a-shining in June
Your silv'ry beams
Will bring love's dreams
We'll be cuddling soon
By the silv'ry moon
Oh, my dear.
Oh, my dear Patti, you sing like a nightingale.
Oh, l could listen forever.
-Do you really like me;
-Oh, Patti, can't you see;
To me, you are perfect.
Oh, but, Demi, you're so much older.
Everybody says so.
Don't listen to them. ln my country, age is unimportant.
Girls marry very young.
Oh. You're not asking me to marry you;
Not yet, but who knows;
Who knows; That isn't very definite.
Oh, my darling. lsn't it enough for you to know that you're the one woman l've been seeking;
So beautiful, so alluring, so full of latent fire. l feel exactly the same way about you, Demi.
-But we must be honest with each other.
-Of course.
There's something l must tell you. lt wouldn't be fair to go on until you know the whole truth about me.
-You have a past, huh ;
-Oh, no, no. lt's right now. Oh, l-- l'm so ashamed. l don't know how l can say it. lt's something over which l have no control.
You--
You're not addicted to drink;
No, only sodas. Strawberry.
My darling, whatever it is, l will understand. l will forgive and forget.
Querida, may l kiss you; lf you like.
-Demi, what is it;
-No corset.
Oh, Demi. Demi l tried to tell you. lt'll only be 1 1 months, please wait.
-What you ask is impossible.
-Oh, Demi.
Demi, don't leave me.
Please, don't leave me.
Demi, don't leave me. Please, Demi.
Demi, please come back to me.
-Patti, what is it; What's the matter;
-Please, Demi....
Huh ; Oh!
She can't swim. l'll save you, keep calm.
Don't lose your head.
-Don't touch me, don't touch--
-Stop struggling.
-Stop.
-Let go. Go away.
-But you can't swim, you'll drown.
-l don't care.
DEMl: She's hysterical.
-Hold her, l'll hit her with the paddle. Oh!
Oh, oh! Demi, Demi, Demi.
Oh, Demi, Demi. l'm so sorry, did l hurt you;
-That's all right. Where is she;
-Oh, Demi.
-Patti!
-Demi. Oh, Demi.
Oh, oh, oh!
Oh!
DEMl:
Patti, Patti, come back here.
Patti, come back here.
Patti, where are you;
Patti; Patti;
[PATTl SNEEZES]
[HORSE WHlNNlES]
You may as well come out. l will wait.
Now, what do you mean telling me you couldn't swim; l was scared out of a year's growth.
You deserve a good, sound spanking, you know that; l'm sorry. Honest. l was only trying to....
A girl's not supposed to be independent, able to swim, things like that.
-Who says so;
-Valerie.
Oh, she does, does she;
Men don't like it, do they;
Well, that depends.
Some don't and some do.
Before you catch cold, you've got to get this dress off.
Now;
As soon as you get back to the hotel.
[HORSE WHlNNlES]
Just borrowing it, amigo, all right;
You're not angry anymore;
-We'll talk about that in the morning.
-What time;
Come along, l don't want you to catch the influenza.
Come on. Hurry up.
[SNEEZES]
-Hello, Papa.
-Mr. Robi--
Ten minutes after 1 0, a fine time to be bringing a girl home.
-What happened;
-Patti fell in the lake.
-He frightened me.
-You frightened her; ls this a joke;
No, Papa. He was serious.
-Where did you get that blanket;
-When he chased me into the barn.
-Her dress was soaking wet and l--
-He wanted me to take it off--
What;! Young man, you ought to be ashamed of yourself.
Throwing my little girl into the lake, chasing her into a barn.
Bringing her home in a horse blanket.
Control yourself.
You'll wake up half the hotel.
-l'll wake up the other half of the hotel.
-l was trying to tell your husband--
And l mistook this man for a gentleman.
A fella that plays jokes, chases little girls into barns.
-Oh, Papa, he's gone.
-l'll speak to your consul about this.
Beast.
You can't do that to my girl.
Put them up, you rounder.
[SPEAKS lN SPANlSH]
When are you gonna light the fuse,
Mr. Finlay;
Tomorrow evening, boys.
-Here you are.
-Thanks.
This is going to be the biggest, most elaborate pyrotechnical display...
...in the entire Catskills.
Oh, Billy, make sure all the Roman candles and skyrockets are pointing north...
...then come inside and change the flypaper.
-What are pyrotechnicals;
-Shh!
Those things we got hidden under the bed.
McCORMlCK:
Oh.
All right, Katie. One, two, three, inhale.
There. Every summer it gets a little more difficult.
Oh, not that you're gaining weight, my dear. lt's that l'm losing muscle.
[KNOCKlNG]
-Horatio, the children.
-lt's all right. l imagine by now they suspect we're rather fond of each other. Come in.
Hello, Patti. What's the matter;
Why aren't you dressed for the dance;
What dance; Oh, that.
Well, l'm not going. l'd much rather stay here and take care of Mac and Ricky.
Melba can do that. She should be at the party with the rest of the young people.
That Armendez fellow is taking Valerie and she refuses to go with anyone else.
Oh. What's the matter with Billy;
Oh, Papa. Billy, he's just a child.
How would l look walking in with a child who's still in knickers;
More sensible than you would with a grown man. l think you're taking this too seriously.
You'll have a lot of beaus before you find the right one.
-Have a lot of girls before you met Mama;
-Who me; Of course.
-That's not what Mama says.
-Well, of course....
Your mama didn't know anything about that.
There was one in particular, a stylish little redhead.
She had big brown eyes.
She had a turned-up nose.
She had-- Oh, she was a pip.
-What was her name;
-Who; Oh, Beulah.
Beulah was crazy about me.
She kept giving me presents all the time.
Crocheted neckties.
She gave me a hand-painted shaving mug with forget-me-nots on it.
Painted it herself, you know.
That was her perfume.
Every time l smell forget-me-nots, it brings me back to Beulah.
PATTl: Oh, what happened to her;
-Beulah ;
She married another man.
A millionaire, mind you. l thought my life would end.
But here l am.
Still going strong, eh, Mama;
-My, yes.
-And it'll be the same with you, my dear.
After a couple of weeks, you'll forget this foreign fella.
-lsn't that so, dear;
-Oh, yes.
Just as you forgot all about that stylish little redhead.
Come say good night to the boys.
The Stresemanns are waiting.
Oh, no, no, no, Katie.
Not the chicken feathers again.
Oh, Horatio. They're very fashionable.
Yes, well l only hope we don't run into a rooster.
KATHERlNE:
Boys, stop that.
-Hey, hold on.
-Time for you to quiet down.
Why have they got their sister's nightdresses on ;
The girls have outgrown them, but they're still perfectly good.
There's no reason why they should go to waste.
Besides, nobody's ever going to see them.
Time for you to settle down now.
Night, dear. Night, darling.
-Patti's going to sit with you.
-Well, good night, girls. l mean, boys.
Night.
[DOOR CLOSES]
[SPEAKlNG lN SPANlSH]
The blanket belongs to the horse.
[KNOCKlNG]
Now, you boys stop it.
Remember what Mama said.
Hi, Patti. Look, cut myself.
-Doing what;
-Shaving, of course.
Oh.
How about changing your mind and coming to the dance with me;
-Billy, l already--
-But l got long pants. l borrowed them from Adolph Glick, the undertaker's son.
His father's got all sizes.
Please, Patti. Be a sport.
Very well then, Billy.
But only under one condition.
That you promise to dance every dance with me.
Gee, Patti, l didn't know you felt that way.
My feeling for you is purely maternal, Billy. lt's just that....
Well, for certain reasons, l can't let anyone else put his arms around me.
Well, that's jake with me.
You get dressed and l'll go pick up the pants.
-Well, where are they;
-Down the old Moravian cemetery...
...behind Ezekial, beloved husband of Arabella.
[ORCHESTRA PLAYlNG]
PATTl:
Billy.
Well, it's about time. What kept you; lt's these pants. l think they're made for bigger remains.
-Well, let me see.
-Well, l dassn't.
-Billy!
-Well, l told you.
Well, don't just stand there. Pull them up. l think l need suspenders.
Don't you know anything about men's pants;
My father has some.
Wait for me, l'll be right back.
DEMl:
Well, Valerie, l should imagine...
...you'd find the theatrical profession quite fascinating.
Of course a career is all very well and good...
...but what a woman really longs for is a home and babies.
Don't you just adore babies;
Well, l don't know, l never had any.
VALERlE: Well, l was talking to my mother only yesterday...
...and l told her that if the right man came along...
...l'd give up my career in an instant.
Oh, l'd be very sure it was the right man before l made such an important decision.
Oh, but l am sure.
Well, what l mean is when it's the right thing, you know it at once.
Love is like that, Demi, darling.
DEMl:
Yes, l guess it is. Ahem.
Shall we dance;
[SONG ENDS]
[CROWD APPLAUDlNG]
-Billy! What are you doing in those pants;
-Looking for suspenders.
You deliberately disobeyed me.
Take them off. l'll see you in your room.
Father, be reasonable. Patti's waiting.
Get out of those pants.
[BOTH GASP]
Billy, how dare you;
You ought to be ashamed.
What for; His legs are beautiful.
[ORCHESTRA PLAYlNG]
[CROWD CHATTERlNG]
What a perfect couple.
Wouldn't they have beautiful children ;
That depends upon whom they marry.
Gee, it's sure a scorcher.
Maybe if you didn't wear celluloid, you know.
See any nice stray skirts around; l'd like a turkey trot, but they all got gobblers. Ha, ha, ha!
You have my deepest sympathy.
Patti. l find you in the strangest places.
Now, what are you doing under this canoe;
-Waiting for suspenders.
-Su-- You wear suspenders;
Oh, no. Not me.
My friend.
You know, l've never met anyone quite like you.
-You're an amazing young woman.
-Woman ;
An amazing young lady, then, if you object to being called a woman.
Oh, no. No, l don't.
Um, may l have this dance;
Oh, no. No, l've got to go home.
But you said you were waiting for your friend.
Well, he wouldn't like it.
He's very possessive.
So am l.
Oh. Please don't hold me close. l'm subject to fainting spells.
Oh ; Very well. Arm's length.
[PATTl HUMMlNG]
Do you hesitate;
Well, l try not to.
No, l mean in the waltz. The dip step.
Oh, yes, l can be very dippy.
[SONG ENDS]
[CROWD APPLAUDlNG]
You're not having one of your fainting spells, are you;
Oh, Patti.
The dance is supposed to end that way.
Didn't you know;
Ladies and gentlemen, form your circles for the polka. lt's all right, Patti.
This dance ends quite differently. lmagine coming to a dance half-dressed.
Gee, who;
No fooling;
Ain't cut your pinfeathers yet, eh ;
[LAUGHS] l always knew l hated you, Eddie Gavin, and now l know why.
Why don't you go back to your dolls;
Does your mother know you're out, little girl;
No one asked you to dance with me.
Aw, don't be a crybaby.
-Why, look, there's Patti.
-What;
Well, what did l tell you;
She's having a wonderful time.
-But does she have to wear them;
-Certainly.
A man your age ought to know better.
Everybody's accusing you of robbing the cradle.
Oh, hello, dear. Have some punch.
That's the....
Why, Patti, what's the matter;
Oh, Papa....
[SOBS]
Here.
Golly, what happened;
PATTl: l wanna die.
Gee, what did Billy do; lt's all his fault.
He should've worn suspenders.
[KNOCKlNG ON DOOR]
Patti!
Patti, dear, no, no, no. What happened;
She wants to die.
No. Now, there, there. Don't cry so hard.
Oh, Papa, l wanna go home.
My reputation in the Catskills is ruined.
Yes. Now, well, Papa's here now.
You tell Papa all about it.
-Well....
-What happened;
First he lost his pants.
-Who;
-Billy.
Then he kissed me.
Billy;
Then he put his arms around me.
-Who;
-Demi Armendez.
What; That rounder again ;
Then the most awful thing happened.
Oh, Papa, l'm so ashamed.
What did that man do; lt wasn't what l wanted. lt's what you and Mama wanted. l'm the only girl almost 1 8 who doesn't--
Doesn't what;
Who doesn't own a pair of corsets. l warned her to be careful.
So that's all.
All;
Papa, l won't be laughed at. l won't. l can never show my face among decent people again.
Well, now, honey, it's a very pretty little face.
Everybody knows my secret. l'm a marked woman now.
[KNOCKlNG ON DOOR]
Oh, there's your mama. Come in, Katie.
You! What are you doing here; l'm terribly sorry about what happened. ls there anything l can do;
HORATlO:
You've done enough. l demand to know what your intentions are toward my daughter. lntentions; l have no intentions,
Mr. Robinson.
She's just a child.
Child; Oh, no!
Here we go again. l never wanna see him again.
-There, you hear that; Now go away.
-The shouting, you'll have to stop. l pay my board. l'll shout whenever l want to.
FlNLAY: But l can't have you disturbing the guests at this hour.
-After all, they pay their rent too.
-Libertine!
FlNLAY: Your screaming and shouting is keeping them awake.
Please have consideration for them. lf you were a man, you'd meet me on the lawn. lf you were a man, l would.
-This is a family hotel.
-This is a family matter. l'll trouble you to keep your nose out of it.
-Katie.
-Papa, what happened;
-Why did you leave the dance;
-l wanna talk to you.
Alone!
What is it; Where's my little girl;
You're always trying to keep her a little girl.
You ought to be ashamed of yourself.
The mess you got my daughter into. l--; Just a minute, Horatio.
Let's start at the beginning.
All right. First he lost his pants.
-Who;
-Billy.
-Then he kissed her.
-Billy;
-No. Then he put his arm around her.
-Who;
That Cuban fella.
-And that isn't all.
-Oh, no. My poor baby. lsn't a baby anymore.
Everybody's laughing...
...because you won't let her wear one of those figure-pinchers.
-Oh, that's ridiculous.
-l won't have my daughter a laughingstock. lt's time l took charge of the welfare of this family.
My girls are dressed like babies.
My boys are dressed like girls. l don't think you know anything about bringing up my children.
-Oh, you don't;
-No. l suppose that little redhead could've done better.
-What little redhead;
-So there was more than one.
-Now, wait a minute. You're being foolish.
-lt came out finally, didn't it;
All these years you've been pretending there was no one else.
No, no, Katie, there was never anybody but you. l was second choice. You only married me because Beulah wouldn't have you.
Now, Katie, l made all that up. l was sitting there. l winked at you. You saw me.
For a girl who doesn't exist, you described her perfectly.
Well, she doesn't exist.
-l know who it was too.
-Who;
That little barmaid who used to work
Schultz's beer garden.
Schultz's beer garden ;
Katie, you're out of your mind.
First l'm not a fit mother, now l'm out of my mind. l didn't say you were out of your--
-l refuse to stay and be insulted further.
-Well, where are you going; l'll undress in the bathroom.
You can't. This isn't our night.
[PATTl GRO ANS]
[PATTl SOBBlNG]
For gosh sake, Patti, stop blubbering and let's get some sleep.
PATTl: l'll never sleep again. Never.
You're gonna be awful tired by the time you're 30.
Oh, Patti dear, don't cry so.
No man is worth it.
You don't understand.
My reputation's ruined.
Oh, it isn't as bad as you think.
Nothing is so terrible it can't be lived down and forgotten.
Mama, l wanna go home.
Now, running away never solved anything.
These things seem so tragic at your age.
But in a few years, you'll look back and laugh at the whole thing.
Laugh ; How can a mother say such a thing to her daughter;
Oh, believe me, darling, when l was 1 7, l felt just the same way.
Only with me, it was bustles. l thought l couldn't live without one, but l did.
But that's different. Bustles were silly.
Now, that's only in the point of view.
Ten years from now, you'll probably think corsets were silly.
How am l gonna get through those 1 0 years;
With you sniffling and Mom lecturing, how am l gonna get through the night;
RlCKY:
Ah!
[CRO AKlNG]
[FlRECRACKERS POPPlNG]
[BO YS CHEERlNG]
Help! Help! Let's go!
Where--; Where is somebody;
[FlRECRACKERS BOOMlNG]
Help!
There you are.
Well, it's been a grand and glorious 3rd.
BlLLY:
Hello, Patti. Feeling better;
PATTl: l haven't been sick. l do wish you'd stop following me.
BlLLY: l'm not. l'm following the hedge.
Patti, it's not healthy for you to be a hermit.
You ought to get out more among your friends.
-l have no friends.
-You have me. l know what you're going through, Patti.
We're in the same boat.
With me it's knickers and with you it's--
Some parents ought to be locked up. lt's not only that, Billy.
The other night, my parents had their first quarrel and it was over me.
Why, they're not even sleeping in the same room.
Yeah, l guess one room is kind of small when two people aren't speaking.
You know;
When l served dinner last night, your mother asked me...
...to ask your father to ask your brother to pass the gravy. lt's all because
Mama won't let me grow up.
She won't let the way l look outside catch up with the way l feel inside.
Parents know so little about us.
What we think, how we feel, our problems.
They know nothing about our world.
They don't seem to want to.
They've forgotten they were ever in it.
Whether we're happy or not doesn't seem to matter.
PATTl: As long as we do what they think we should do.
Somebody our age ought to tell people their age about people our age. l know it.
Patti, help me out tonight at the show.
Do our old number with me.
Gosh, Billy. l'd like to, but l'm never going to appear in public again until l own--
Golly, l wish l had the money to buy you a pair of--
Billy....
That's a very nice thought, though.
Thank you.
[HORATlO GRUNTS] lt's Papa!
-Did you hurt yourself, Papa;
-Of course l hurt myself.
Children, l wanna ask you something.
-We didn't do it, Papa.
-We didn't do it, Papa.
-Didn't do what;
-Whatever it was.
Children...
...are you happy;
Am l a good father or do you think l should be locked up ;
Let me into your world.
Let me do something for you. ls there anything you need; l need some worms to go fishing.
Worms; Oh, yes. Here's a dime.
Buy yourself a shovel.
-l'd like a white rabbit.
-You shall have two white rabbits.
No, wait a minute. On a second thought, perhaps one would be better.
Melba, is there anything l can get for you;
No, Papa.
What l want, l think l can get for myself.
-Gee, he must have fallen on his head.
-Yeah.
[CHORUS SlNGlNG]
[SlNGlNG]
I have a true and noble lover
He is my sweetheart all my own
His like on earth who shall discover
His heart is mine
And mine alone
We pledged our troth each to the other
And for our happiness I pray
Our lives belong to one another
Oh, happy, happy wedding day
Oh, happy, happy wedding day
Come, come, I love you only
My heart is true
Come, come, my life is lonely
I long for you
Come, come, naught can efface you
My arms are aching now to embrace you
Thou art divine
Come, come
I love you only
Come
Hero mine
Come, hero mine
CHORUS [SlNGlNG] :
Come, come, naught can efface you
My arms are aching now to embrace you
Thou art divine
-Come, come
-Come, come
-I love you only
-I love you only
-Come, hero
-Sweetheart
-Mine
-Mine
[KNOCKlNG ON DOOR]
-Melba;
HORATlO: No, darling, it's Papa.
Well, darling, have you changed your mind about going to the show tonight;
How can l in my condition ; l don't know. l'd like to see you go.
Oh, l can't. Nothing can induce me.
Nothing;
Well, perhaps one thing, but that's impossible.
My dear child, with Papa, nothing is impossible.
You lace them up on a bedpost, you know.
Oh, and you know that black dress of your mama's;
Now, you get Miss Zilly to fix that up to fit you.
Oh, Papa. Oh, Papa.
You're the most wonderful papa in the world.
-Thanks, dear.
-Oh, golly.
[SlNGlNG] Young Johnny Jones
He had a cute little boat
Bet your life
And all the girlies
He would take for a float
Uh-huh
He had girlies on the shore
Sweet little peaches by the score
Ho, ho, ho, ho
But Johnny was a wisenheimer, you know
-Why, his steady girl was Flo
-That's me
And every Sunday afternoon
She'd jump in his boat and they'd spoon
And then he'd row, row, row
Way up the river
He would row, row, row
A hug he'd give her
Then held kiss her now and then
She would tell him when
He'd fool around and fool around
And then they'd kiss again
And then he'd row, row, row
A little further
He would row
Oh, how he'd row
-Then he'd drop both his oars
-Take a few more encores
And then he'd row, row, row
Then he'd drop both his oars
Take a few more encores
And then he'd row, row, row
Oh, honey, you were wonderful.
-l got three bows.
-l know you did. lf l'd known you were here, l would've done the number with you.
Oh, well, thanks, Billy, but Mr. Finlay asked me to sing.
All right, Eddie. You're on.
Well, if you'll excuse me, l guess l'll go get dressed.
Mr. Finlay.
What's Patti doing backstage;
FlNLAY: l'm putting her on for a song after Jane Schimpf's birdcalls.
VALERlE: l won't have it. Everything goes wrong when that troublemaker's around.
You know, l have my professional reputation to think about.
As the star of this show...
-...l will not appear on the same bill.
FlNLAY: l just asked her to fill a spot.
VALERlE: This theater is not big enough for the two of us.
Now, which one of us goes; l guess that's me.
FlNLAY: Oh, Miss Robinson, l--
-lt's all right, Mr. Finlay. l'll go. Thank you for being so kind.
Mr. Finlay, it's not my artistic temperament. lt's just that Patti's a plain, old-fashioned jinx.
[AUDlENCE LAUGHlNG]
Mother; Mr. Finlay!
-What is it; What happened;
-My dancing shoes, they're gone.
-Hurry up. You follow Eddie Gavin.
-l'm not a barefoot dancer.
-Someone's taken my darling's shoes.
-Where are your street shoes; l didn't bring any, and l can't do this in bedroom slippers.
Some miserable sneak stole my shoes.
Now, who wa--;
Billy Finlay.
-Who, me;
-Yes, you. You did it for Patti.
My son is an honest boy.
Why, he wouldn't think of--
Where are they;
Oh, Billy Finlay.
How dare you!
-l wear a size 4 triple-A.
-Yes.
-Well, they were here a minute ago.
-l refuse to submit to these indignities. l won't go on. l won't go on and that's final.
You can give the people all their money back.
Come, Mother. l've had enough of amateur theatricals.
Who wants their money back;
Anybody can do her number.
My sister, for instance.
-Yeah, but she doesn't know it.
-l beg to differ.
She peeked in the window all during rehearsals.
She did; Well, where is she; l don't know.
You might try the drugstore.
Here we are.
Here's a nice strawberry soda. l guess there's nothing left for me to do but become a missionary.
Well, you wouldn't wanna do that on an empty stomach.
Try this.
Oh, good evening, Mrs. Penford.
-Hello, Billy.
-Patti, the show's in trouble.
My father wants you to take
Valerie's place. She walked out.
She did;
How would l know her number;
Well, you peeked in the window during rehearsals.
Oh.
No, Billy. lt's out of the question. lf you don't, we'll have to give the money back. lt was supposed to go to the
Preservation of Wildlife in the Catskills. lt was;
Think of all those poor little beavers and possums, skunks and....
You're right, Billy. l mustn't let personal feelings stand in the way of our four-footed friends.
-Come on.
-Gee, l hope l peeked enough.
-You did.
PATTl: Thanks for the soda.
There goes one of my satisfied customers.
Only this afternoon, her father bought her one of these corsets. Oh.
She's undoubtedly suffering from curvature of the spine.
WOMAN: Oh.
-The corset will correct it.
But you mustn't bend over in them or they lock.
-Like so:
-Really;
DEMl:
Patti, are you ready;
You are going to dance with me, aren't you;
Please, l need you.
Oh, Patti, can't you ever forgive me for what l did;
Whatever it was. lf you don't, l'll drown myself in the lake.
Oh, Patti.
FlNLAY:
Senor Armendez, Miss Robinson, you're on.
So that's where they went.
What are you doing after the show;
Why, there's Patti.
And that's my best dress.
Tell Mama it was.
-lt was.
-lt was.
-You can straighten up now, Patti.
-l can't.
You can't.
What; You can't;
Smile, Patti. Smile.
Smile, smile.
Oh, she's laced them up too tight.
What she got, lockjaw;
-Stand back. Give her air, will you;
-What is it;
Frozen muscles. Very interesting.
-lt's that straitjacket.
-What have you done to my child;
-Your child is no longer a child.
-l'll take charge of this.
-Carry her to the dressing room.
-Here, give her to me. lmagine, one kiss causing such complete paralysis.
Mind your own business.
You buy that man some pants.
Just set her down here on the couch, please.
On my side, please.
Thank you. Now everyone out.
-Yes, everybody out. Everybody.
-You too, Papa.
Me too; Okay, all right.
-Hurry, Mama.
-Oh, Patti, honey.
Darling, a surgical corset!
Your father ought to have his head examined.
-There.
-Oh!
Oh, Mama, how would he know; ln other words, l should have picked it out.
You're a woman, Mother.
KATHERlNE:
And so are you, my baby.
Tomorrow we'll get you a La Belle Mode corset.
We will;
Unless you'd rather have a whalebone wasp waist.
-Oh, Mother.
-But as for my new dress....
Oh, l didn't hurt it, honest.
You wear it much better than l ever did. l think you better keep it.
Besides, don't tell Papa, but l can't get into it anymore.
Oh, Mama. l'd like permission to call on your daughter when we get back to the city.
What for;
-Well, to get to know her better.
-Seems to me you know her well enough.
All this kissing, bending. lt is customary in my country to ask permission to call...
...when a man's intentions are serious.
You may call, Demi.
We'll be very happy to see you.
-Look, this man's trying--
-l know.
-But this is my daughter.
-Papa.
Don't you think it's about time you two stopped acting like children ;
Why, the way you're behaving, the kids aren't getting any sleep.
KATHERlNE:
Patti.
Oh, Mama.
Well, look at that. l walked the floor with her...
...brought her through sickness, helped her with her homework...
...and worried and worried about her happiness.
And now what do l do; l walk into a church, and when the preacher asks:
''Who gives this woman to this man ;'' l stand up like a fool and say, ''l do.''
Papa, my father was no fool.
SubRip - diamarg {marg}
This is Paris.
And I'm an American who lives here.
My name, Jerry Mulligan...
... and I'm an ex-G.I.
In 1945, when the Army told me to find my own job...
... I stayed on.
And I'll tell you why.
I'm a painter.
All my life that's all
I've ever wanted to do.
For a painter, the mecca of the world for study...
... for inspiration and for living...
... is here on this star called Paris.
Just look at it.
No wonder so many artists have come here and called it home.
Brother, if you can't paint in Paris, give up and marry the boss' daughter.
We're on the Left Bank now.
That's where I'm billeted.
Here's my street.
In the past couple of years...
... I've gotten to know practically everyone on the block.
And a nicer bunch you'll never meet.
Back home everyone said I didn't have any talent.
They might be saying the same thing over here...
... but it sounds better in French.
I live upstairs.
No, not there.
One flight up.
Jerry!
Those are three of my pals.
Etienne, Maurice and Jacques.
I'm their man because
I give them American bubble gum.
I have a lot of good friends in Paris.
A lot of very good friends.
And I am one of them.
Adam Cook is my name.
I'm a concert pianist.
That's a pretentious way of saying I'm unemployed at the moment.
I live in the same brick pile with young Rembrandt.
That's not me.
He's too happy.
I'm here on a scholarship.
Last year, I won the Hackenwall prize and was sent abroad to study.
That's the eighth fellowship I've won.
And you know something?
I'm getting pretty homesick.
Not only that, but I'm beginning to feel like the world's oldest child prodigy.
One time I ran out of fellowships and had to go to work for a living.
I had to stop because
I discovered I liked it...
... and I didn't want to become a slave to the habit.
It's not a pretty face, I grant you.
But underneath its flabby exterior is an enormous lack of character.
I like Paris.
It's a place where you don't run into old friends.
Although that's never been one of my problems.
Strangely enough, I made a friend over here once. I worked for him.
His name was Henri Baurel.
You know, the French music hall star?
Do you remember him?
I do, because that's me.
Adam was a fine accompanist.
I wish he were still with me.
My, how nice to be in the old quarter!
You see?
Everybody recognizes me.
I guess I haven't changed so much after all.
They've known me a long time.
But now, don't misunderstand.
I don't mean to imply that I am old.
I'm not.
After all, I am only...
Well, what's the difference?
No, that's not me.
I am not that young.
Let's just say...
... I am old enough to know what to do with my young feelings.
Right?
- Georges!
- Henri Baurel!
- Henri!
- Mathilde!
Adam?
You used to sing it a tone higher.
I'm a big boy now.
My voice is changing.
- Shall I come up?
- No, I'll be right down.
Hey, Georges, some coffee!
Henri, I'm going to make you an "omelette  la confiture".
Don't kiss me.
You'll spoil my makeup.
You look great, Hank.
What're you doing?
Taking injections?
Something much better.
I hear your show's a big hit.
It is, "naturellement".
- When did you get over?
- Last March.
I phoned you, but there was no answer.
I'd have phoned again, but I was afraid you might be in.
March? I wasn't in Paris then.
Lise and I were visiting friends in Juan-les-Pins.
- Some coffee, please.
- What are you working on?
- Same old concert.
- When will you give it?
When I can't figure out any more reasons not to.
Some coffee, please.
I took Lise to hear
Weingarten play the other night.
It was her first concert, and her eyes were shining two days.
Why didn't you take her to an eye doctor? Incidentally, who's Lise?
That's the second time that name has come up.
Adam, I am very happy these days.
I'll show you her picture.
- Are you married?
- Not yet.
Pretty. Very pretty.
- She looks familiar.
- She's Jacques Bouvier's daughter.
Jacques Bouvier?
My coffee.
Poor Jacques.
He was caught in the Resistance.
I took care of Lise all through the occupation. She lived in my house.
Your house?
Shocking, but generous.
She was a little girl then.
We only became in love after she left.
She's a little young for you, isn't she?
No, not really. She's 19.
She's getting on.
What's she like?
Well, she has great vitality and "joie de vivre".
She loves to go out, have fun and dance. She could dance all night.
Sounds tiresome.
Kind of a wild kid, huh?
Wild?
Whatever gave you that idea?
No, she's very simple.
Very simple.
She works all day at the
Maison Nicole, the perfume shop.
I prefer not to discuss the matter any further.
Be serious.
She's an enchanting girl, Adam.
Not really beautiful, and yet, she has great beauty.
Very spiritual type, huh?
Not at all.
She's an exciting girl, Adam.
She seems to be a lusty young lady.
No! She's sweet and shy.
An old-fashioned girl, huh?
Course not!
She's vivacious and modern.
Always yakking it up?
Don't be silly!
She reads incessantly.
Doesn't all that reading make her moody?
Never.
She's the gayest girl in the world.
Look, let's start all over again, shall we?
What's she like?
Good morning, Therese.
How are you today, "monsieur"?
I could be better, Therese.
I'm broke.
- Broke?
- That means I have no money.
When I'm broke I don't eat.
Then I get tired and depressed.
When that happens, the only thing that helps is wine and women.
That should be very simple.
You are in Paris.
But even in Paris that takes money...
...which is what
I don't have in the first place.
This isn't music!
It's uncivilized.
It's noise.
- Hi!
- Hi.
Jerry, this is Henri Baurel.
Jerry Mulligan.
How do you do?
I know you.
I've heard you sing a thousand times.
You're wonderful.
- Thank you.
- Excuse me.
Do you have
300 francs on you?
I'm going to Montmartre.
I need lunch money.
Sorry. Bought a postage stamp and it broke me.
Please allow me.
No, thanks.
I never touch a guy unless I've known him 15 minutes.
I've known him 15 years.
Lend me 300.
I wouldn't lend him money if I were you. He's a bum risk.
Adam! For this you win a scholarship?
What's the matter?
Evidently the man doesn't like jazz.
- He's against it.
- What else is there?
I know what he likes.
He's strictly a three-quarter man.
Old Vienna.
Franz Josef!
The Palace of Schnbrunn.
- Kaffee with Schlagsahne.
- And Wienerschnitzel.
- Dog!
- Pig!
My card!
Gentlemen!
The Emperor!
Relax, sister.
I'm from Perth Amboy, New Jersey.
I can see disregarding perspective to achieve an effect, but I believe...
Why don't you be a good little girl and move on?
You won't buy anything.
You're just blocking out the sunshine.
I just wanted to discuss your work.
I don't want you to discuss my work.
I'm not interested in your opinion of my work.
If you say something nice
I won't feel better...
...and if you don't it'll bother me.
Thank you. Good day.
Do you mind if I look...
...or will you chew my head off too?
Go ahead.
You're okay.
Thank you.
She's a third-year girl that gripes my liver.
Third-year girls?
You know, American college kids.
They come here to take their third year and lap up some culture.
They give me a swift pain.
Why?
They're harmless enough.
They're officious and dull.
They always make profound observations they've overheard.
Say, do you have a cigarette?
- I think so.
- Thanks.
Don't you like criticism?
Who does? Tough enough getting it from those who know.
My first today.
My guess is the business isn't very good.
Your guess is right on the nose.
You know...
...I like these two.
Thanks. So do I.
I want to buy them.
How much are they?
Gee, I don't know.
You don't know?
I never thought I'd come to the point where that would be an issue.
Offer me something.
15,000 francs.
For each.
Will that be satisfactory?
That'll be good and satisfactory.
You sure you know what you're doing?
What do you care?
That's about $50 apiece, isn't it?
I don't know.
I haven't changed money lately.
Oh, dear!
- What's the matter?
- I haven't got enough with me.
Come back tomorrow.
It's a cinch they'll still be here.
Why don't you come to the hotel?
I can pay you there.
Fine. Is it far?
Would you care if it were?
- What's your name?
- Jerry Mulligan. Yours?
Milo Roberts.
- Milo?
- Yeah, as in "Venus de".
Venus de.
Is this yours?
Maybe I should have charged you more.
I'll be back.
Make yourself at home.
Here.
Thanks.
- Would you like some sherry?
- All right.
How'd you come by these worldly possessions?
A rich husband or father?
A father.
- What's he do?
- Oil.
I should have known.
Suntan oil.
Really? I didn't know there was so much in that racket.
-There's a lot of red skin in America.
- There must be.
Let's see now.
Where shall I hang these?
Maybe over on...
Here's a good place.
Good light.
Not too much sun.
That'll be fine.
By golly, you know, these are good!
I've seen hundreds of paintings by young artists...
...and not one has impressed me till these!
I'm glad.
Makes it easier to give up.
Give up?
It's kind of hard for an artist to sell.
A writer, a composer can buy a copy of what they create.
With a painter, it's the original that counts.
Once that's gone, it's out of his life.
I never thought of that.
Excuse me for a minute.
Hello, Tommy.
No, dear.
Don't come up.
Be a darling and wait for me in the dining room.
I'll be right down.
I'm sorry.
I didn't mean to stay long.
Don't apologize.
I wanted you to.
I wish we had more time to talk.
Goodbye, and thanks again.
By the way...
...what are you going to do tonight?
Why?
I'm giving a small party here.
There'll be an extra girl.
Why not come?
I don't know.
Do you have a date?
Well, then come.
You'll find the company very easy.
Nothing formal.
- Be here at eight.
- Okay.
My car can take you home.
He has nothing to do.
Thanks.
Me, me!
Jerry, do you have any bubble gum?
"Demain." Tomorrow.
Tomorrow.
- Rptez aprs moi. "Door."
- Door!
- Street.
- Street!
- Lady.
- Lady!
- Window.
- Window!
- Flowers.
- Flowers!
"Monsieur le" wise guy.
A very hard word.
Massachusetts!
An American song.
- I got.
- I got.
Good.
Charleston!
Choo-choo train!
Soldier!
Napoleon!
Cowboy!
Hopalong Cassidy!
- Charles!
- Charlie Chaplin!
Airplane!
More!
- Good evening. I'm sorry I'm late.
- Good evening.
The moment I went to dress...
...the phone started ringing like a steeple on Sunday.
Would you like one of these?
Fine, fine.
I've never seen so many
Americans in Paris before.
The Champs Elyse looks just like Main Street.
Do you live here all the time?
I usually go home to Baltimore for Christmas and Thanksgiving.
That's quite a dress you almost have on.
- Thanks.
- What holds it up?
Modesty.
- Cheers.
- Cheers.
I see it's a formal brawl after all.
What makes you think that?
The more formal the party is, the less you have to wear.
No, you're quite wrong.
It's most informal.
Where is everybody?
Here.
Downstairs?
No, here in this room.
What about that extra girl?
That's me.
- The party's you and me?
- That's right.
I see. It's kind of a little joke, isn't it?
In a way.
Well, lady...
...here's your dough back. I'll take my pictures and run along.
Wait a minute.
Wait, my foot!
You must be out of your mink-lined head!
I know I need dough, but
I don't need it this badly.
If you're hard up for companionship...
...they have guys in town who do this for a living.
Call one of them.
What's so funny?
You! You're so righteous.
Stop defending your honor so assiduously...
...and listen to me for a minute.
I don't need a paid escort.
And I'm not trying to rob you of your precious male initiative.
I'm interested in your work and want to know you better.
Is that such a crime?
Well, it certainly is a roundabout way to do it.
Would you have accepted a normal invitation?
I want to help you.
I think you have a great deal of talent.
It doesn't hurt to have somebody rooting for you, does it?
- It'll be the first time anybody ever did.
- Then let me.
Please?
How's the food downstairs?
- Very good.
- And probably very expensive.
Would it embarrass you if I signed the check?
Let's go someplace I can afford.
How about the Caf Flodair on Montparnasse?
I feel like "jazz hot".
It's not expensive.
It better not be.
I'd like to show a little profit at the end of the day.
How long did it last?
About two years.
I lost him in the war.
I'm sorry.
To another woman.
Somebody he met in California while he was in training.
If he was the dog you said he was...
...you must have been glad to be rid of him.
I was, I guess, except that I...
Except it would have been more satisfactory...
...if you could have kissed him off.
I guess.
You should get married again.
You need it.
- Why?
- Everybody does.
Everybody must have someone to account to.
Especially when you don't work.
It keeps the personality together.
No, thank you.
Not for me.
- Besides, I have work to do.
- What?
Well, for the moment, you.
I want to bring you to the attention of dealers.
They know me.
I'm a big customer.
We have a large collection at home.
I could sponsor you...
...talk about you, encourage you.
When you've done enough canvases
I could arrange your first show.
That is, if you'll let me.
It sounds great, but what's in it for you?
Just the excitement of helping somebody I believe in...
...and finding out if I'm right.
- Milo, darling.
- Tommy! I knew you'd turn up here.
This is Jerry Mulligan.
This is Tommy Baldwin.
He's on the "Paris Telegram".
Milo, I'm showing the Jansens around and need your help.
What do you say?
Shall we go to his rescue?
Anything you like.
Follow me. You need radar to find your way in this smoke.
- Who are the Jansens?
- Magazine illustrators.
- What're they like?
- Death.
- Look what I found.
- What a pleasant surprise!
- Jack, say hello to Milo.
- Hello, Milo.
This is Jerry Mulligan.
Jerry, the Jansens.
How do you do?
Isn't this the chap you told me about at lunch?
Waiter, two more glasses, please.
Milo says you're quite wonderful.
I'd love to see some of your pictures.
I'm having a private showing tomorrow on a corner in Montmartre.
You paint?
So do we. Jack and I.
We work together.
Well, that's cozy.
Dance, you two.
I want to talk to Milo.
Come on, Jack.
Have fun.
There's a special doll over there.
Do you know who she is?
No. But she is lovely, isn't she?
She sure is.
I'm very anxious for you to see Jerry's work.
If you like it, you can get him a mention on the art page.
Nothing to it.
- Lise.
- What?
Her name is Lise.
Let's dance.
We haven't for years.
Excuse me, Jerry.
You're going to have trouble with that one.
No, I'm not.
He's just not housebroken yet.
When will you stop involving yourself with young artists?
It never works.
If they're no good, you're ashamed.
If they are, they get too independent.
Just dance, Tommy, please.
All right. But I warn you, he'll be out in four months...
...just like the composer and the sculptor.
Lise! I didn't see you sitting here!
What a pleasant surprise!
My wife and I were talking...
...and were wondering what happened to her.
Let's go around the floor for old time's sake. Do you mind?
You're certainly not without your nerve!
Don't get angry.
This was perfectly harmless.
I haven't been able to take my eyes off you since I walked in.
I only let you do this because
I didn't want a disturbance.
And I don't have a wife.
I threw that in to make it look respectable.
That was very considerate.
Please, I would like to return to my table.
In a minute.
I revise my estimate.
Make that two months.
This is the first time
I've done anything like this.
At least as a civilian.
I just had to meet you.
I don't know what type of girl you think I am, but I'm not!
And now I would like to return to my friends.
I thought you were bored with them.
You sure looked it.
You should see me now.
The music has stopped.
The elements are against me.
It was swell seeing you again.
I'll tell Elaine to call you.
What was your phone number?
It slipped my mind the moment you said it.
Opera 2-5-7-4.
No, Lise. 2-4-7-5.
Thank you.
Good night.
Well, I'm tired.
Good night.
Good night, darling.
I'll call you.
Say good night to Milo.
- Good night, Milo.
- Good night, Jack.
Don't I owe you something for the wine?
Forget it. You do it next time.
If there is one.
Good night.
Good night.
- That was fun, wasn't it?
- Was it?
That's a fascinating place.
I'd like to hang around and paint it.
I can imagine all the work you'll get done.
You've already painted a Montmartre dive...
...and it wasn't successful.
- Wait a minute.
Don't tell me how and what to paint.
I didn't like your exhibition tonight!
I thought you were very rude.
Rude? I didn't mean to be. I'm sorry.
Picking up stray women is your own affair...
...but don't do it with me.
Is that clear?
That's clear. That's very clear.
Stop the car.
Sensitive artists!
You're touchy about yourself...
...but oblivious of others.
You don't understand how they feel.
It's been fun.
Sorry you're stuck with the pictures.
- I still like the pictures.
- Thanks a lot.
Jerry Mulligan.
I met you at the Caf Flodair last night. Remember?
You!
Yeah, me.
It's a beautiful day and I thought
I could drop by and...
Well, now, one moment, Mr. Mooligan.
Mulligan.
Last night you were an annoyance.
But today you're growing into a nuisance.
Now please leave me alone and don't call me again, ever.
Good morning.
Good morning.
Would you care for...
No, thanks.
I've had my breakfast already.
I've been up for hours...
...working, I might add, for you.
Do you know Jules Parmentier, the art dealer?
I know of him.
He came to the hotel and had coffee this morning.
I showed him your pictures.
He was very impressed.
He thought you had great individuality.
He thought they were fresh.
- That's wonderful.
- Not only that...
...but he wants to talk about your show.
- That's a long way off.
- Maybe not such a long way.
I don't have near enough for an exhibition.
- What I do have, I'm not sure...
- That's not important.
Then I went to the Marais Galleries and talked to Louis Dufond.
He's a very old friend of mine.
He's coming tomorrow to see your pictures.
You don't waste any time, do you?
I hope not.
Come with me and we'll talk about it over lunch?
I've something to do this morning...
...but I could meet you.
How about the Restaurant Paul on the Avenue de la Paix?
I'll see you there at one.
I'm sorry about that little tiff last night.
I was tired I guess.
Forget it.
- I did.
- You did? That's not very nice of you.
See you at one.
Very nice for a summer perfume.
This is a little heavy.
I'll show you something else.
What's that one on the right?
- This one?
- No, the other.
This is very nice.
It's called...
It's called Escapade.
There's a saleslady free at the other end of the shop, "monsieur".
Thank you, but what I want is at this end.
I don't know which to choose.
They're both lovely.
I wish my husband were here.
He's so fussy about the way I smell.
Why don't you bring him later and decide then?
That's an excellent idea.
He's in Milwaukee.
Dear, oh, dear.
I hate decisions.
I always get a rash if I have to decide something.
Let me help you.
I'd have the man's point of view.
Yes, that's a good idea. Here.
See which one you like.
Not bad.
This is it.
"Nuit d'Amour." Night of Love.
- No contest, lady.
- Really?
Wear that and the Frenchmen will never let you go back to Milwaukee.
I'll take it.
Would you send it to my hotel, collect?
I'm Mrs. Edna Mae Benstrom.
I'm at the Granville.
Here's my card.
Thank you.
I think I'll put a little on.
It is good, isn't it?
You'll need protection.
I hope so.
You've been very kind.
Thank you.
Thank you both. Good day.
Good day.
Now, "monsieur", what can I do for you?
You know what you can do for me. Go out with me.
How do you know I'm not married?
That finger on your left hand is awfully naked.
It's a pity you don't have as much charm as persistence.
I do. You've only seen my aggressive side.
I have a lighter side.
I'm loaded with charm.
I go to parties, put on hats and do funny things.
You see? What do you say?
Come on.
All right. You win.
You can take me for lunch.
I can't. How about dinner?
No. That's not possible.
You have a date?
What about after dinner?
Say, nine o'clock?
I guess it would be all right.
- I'll pick you up.
- No. I'll meet you somewhere.
Do you know the Caf Bel-Ami?
By the bridge?
- I'll see you there at nine.
- Fine.
There is no happier man in Paris than "Monsieur" Mulligan.
At this moment.
Madame, you're delicious!
One's company, two's a crowd.
You get it?
Disappear!
Don't you see I'm busy?
Hit the boulevard!
Look! One hand.
Hello. What's new?
Who is this?
- Guess.
- Oh, Adam!
You always call at the wrong moment.
Wrong moment? You make me feel like a rejected child.
When's the new number going into the show?
The new number goes in tonight.
What? Tonight, Henri?
Yes, darling, tonight.
Are you having a party?
Need an extra man?
No, I was talking to Lise, my dinner guest.
Give me a rundown on that menu.
What're you having to eat?
Magnificent pheasant.
I can drop everything and be up in ten minutes.
That is, if I'm not intruding.
No, no. I see you later at the cafe.
Goodbye.
I'm hungry.
That Adam.
He'll never change.
What's the matter, darling?
Can't you come tonight?
If you can't, it's all right, darling.
Don't worry.
- No. Of course, I want to come.
- You are a doll.
Would you...
Yes, thank you.
I wasn't sure you'd come.
I thought maybe you said yes to get rid of me.
Not that it would have.
What would you like?
Would you mind if we didn't sit here?
- Why, no.
- Anything wrong, "monsieur"?
I'm sorry.
That's all right. I didn't feel like sitting there anyhow.
Let's walk along the river.
All right.
I have a big thing for this spot.
One of these days
I'll paint it.
You're a painter?
You don't look like a painter.
There are those who'll say
I don't paint like one either.
But that doesn't bother me.
Discouragement stimulates me.
That much about you, I know.
Yes, you do, don't you?
But mark me well, one of these days...
...the world will ring with the name Mulligan.
Picasso will be remembered as the forerunner of Mulligan.
This tree will be famous because it was painted by Mulligan.
And when will this golden age of art be?
Well, it's hard to say.
It's hard to say.
Civilization has a natural resistance against improving itself.
It might take quite a while.
Quite a while.
- How do you feel now?
- Why?
A moment ago you were acting like the police were after you.
I was, wasn't I?
Why?
No. Never mind, never mind.
Don't try to think up what to tell me.
I don't have to know.
It's your business.
Candy. Would you like some?
I couldn't eat a whole one.
Go ahead. Try.
The night's young.
We should live dangerously.
Tell me some more.
Well...
...in America,
Saturday night's the big night.
No work, no school...
...when you get home, no money.
And Sunday?
Is Sunday nice in America?
In America, everybody catches cold on Sunday.
- Did you?
- Well, sometimes. Sometimes.
What about you? Aren't you sick of the life and times of Mulligan?
I'd rather listen to you.
I don't like to talk about myself.
- You'll have to get over that.
- Why?
With a binding like you've got...
...people will want to know what's in the book.
What does that mean?
Well, primarily, it means you're a very pretty girl.
- I am?
- Yes, you are.
How do you know?
I heard it on the radio.
Making fun with me.
Doesn't everybody tell you that?
I haven't been out with many people.
And always friends.
Honey, believe me, I'm no enemy.
I don't know if you're a girl of mystery...
...or just a still water that doesn't run deep...
...but there's one thing I can tell you.
If I'd been around sooner, you'd know by now that...
...you're very pretty.
And I'm not making fun with you.
- What time is it?
- Eleven o'clock.
- Eleven! I have to go.
- Where?
- When will I see you again?
- I don't know.
Lise, we have to see each other again.
Yes, we do, don't we?
Tomorrow night.
- No, I can't. How about lunch?
- No. I can't.
Saturday morning I'm at the Ecole des Beaux-Arts.
- I'm finished at noon. Meet me there?
- Saturday. Yes, I will.
How are you?
I am delighted.
It's a wonderful idea.
I'm so sorry.
Lise, I have wonderful news.
This, I take it, is the young lady who'll do all the deciding.
That's right.
This is John MacDowd, my favorite American impresario.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
I've been trying to persuade Henri to come to America...
...and give us Yanks a break.
He says he has to talk it over with you.
You make him do it, Miss Lise.
- I'll call you in a few days.
- That's all right.
And may I say, your Lise certainly lives up to your advertisements.
Thank you, Johnny.
Good night.
- I'm sorry, but the movie...
- Never mind the movie.
What do think of the news?
John wants me to go on an American tour.
We could get married and go together.
Doesn't that sound wonderful?
- When would you go?
- Not for a few weeks.
John will have to see first about bookings.
But it could be beautiful.
A honeymoon on the boat...
...then America.
You'll love the Americans.
- Your limousine is here, sir.
- Thanks.
This sponsor of yours...
...what does she want from you in return?
-Don't tell me. I shock easily.
-You're crazy. She isn't interested in me.
She's just a goodhearted kid who likes the way I paint.
That's real dreamy of her.
Tell me, when you get married...
...will you keep your maiden name?
Hello, Therese.
"Monsieur" Jerry, don't pay any attention to Monsieur Cook.
I don't intend to.
Suppose you do have to make love to the lady?
It's all for the sake of art.
I don't have to make love...
Bravo!
Colossal! Encore!
Encore! "Magnifique"! Bravo!
Who are we seeing here?
Never you mind.
Wait and see.
What is all this?
Your studio.
Isn't it beautiful?
I've got a studio.
Well, yes, I know, Jerry, but you need space.
This isn't to live in, it's to work in.
I can't afford a joint like this.
Why do you make such an issue of money?
Because I ain't got any...
...and when you ain't got any, it takes on a curious significance.
Don't be silly.
You'll be able to pay me back.
In three months.
Three months?
What do you mean?
That's the real surprise.
Your exhibition at the Parmentier Galleries.
My exhibition in three months?
Already they're arranging posters...
Wait a minute, hold everything.
Sit down and let's see if I can explain this to you.
More than anything,
I want to have an exhibition.
But when I'm ready.
When my stuff is good enough to show to the public and critics.
You can't set a production date for a thing like that.
Don't you understand?
I'm not manufacturing paper cups.
I do understand, Jerry.
But you're a painter and you want people to see what you've painted.
I want that too.
Give me an opportunity to provide a decent show at a decent gallery...
...where people can see your things.
Is that so extraordinary?
Look, you're a painter and a good one.
I happen to have a little drive.
That's a good combination.
Besides, you have to face the critics sometime.
Yeah, but three months.
Of course, it'll be work.
Hard work.
That doesn't matter.
I'll do it.
On one condition.
I pay you back.
Jerry, I'm so glad.
I would have died if you'd said no.
- Did you think I wasn't coming?
- No, I thought you would.
Let's take a cab over to the Bois.
I want to drop my stuff off.
- When do you have to be back?
- In an hour or so.
That's not much time.
What kept you?
Why were you so late?
Well, I...
I wanted to tell you, Jerry...
What?
We have so little time together.
Can't we have our own world...
...and not talk about anything that happens when we're apart?
I promise I'll never ask what you do when you're not with me.
Well, I suppose it's just as well.
- What?
- Nothing.
Why? What do you do when you're not with me?
If you don't want to talk about it, okay.
Let's let it go at that.
Kiss me.
- Why are we stopping here?
- I live here.
- No, Jerry, let's go on...
- I want to leave my things.
I'll be back in a minute.
Hi, kid.
- What's your rush?
- Busy, busy.
Have Therese put these in my room.
Sit down.
Have some coffee.
I've got someone waiting in a cab. See you later.
Have some coffee.
You have time now.
Georges, two coffees.
- "Bonjour", Jerry, Adam.
- Hi, kid.
So your exhibition's set for next month?
Why so glum?
- Woman trouble.
- Proves you're a man.
That was her in the cab.
I told you this sponsoring business was complicated.
Women act like men and want to be treated like women.
What are you talking about?
That girl in the cab.
The suntan queen.
No. That's a different girl.
You're a busy little man these days.
I'm hooked.
That girl's it.
Is she worthy of a struggling young artist?
She's worthy of anyone.
She's wonderful.
What gets me is,
I don't know anything about her.
We manage to be together for a few moments and then off she goes.
Sometimes we have a wonderful time together.
Other times it's no fun at all...
...but I got to be with her.
Yep. You're hooked.
- What's her name?
- Lise Bouvier.
Georges, some brandy.
And some cleaning fluid.
- Hi, Hank.
- Jerry. Adam. May I sit down?
- My guest.
- Thank you.
Georges, a little sherry.
Adam, I have wonderful news.
Wonderful news.
That's great.
Tell us something cheery.
- I'm going to be married.
- You're what?
We're getting married and going to America on our honeymoon.
Another brandy.
When was this decided?
- Last night.
- Congratulations, Hank.
I'm glad somebody's happy.
- What's the matter?
- Nothing.
Maybe I can help.
Did I ever tell you about the time I performed for Hitler?
Wait. Jerry has some problem, and I'd like to hear about it.
It's pretty complicated.
I'll make it brief.
There's a gal who's sponsoring me...
...and she's really helping me a lot, but...
She's stuck on me.
There's a girl I'm stuck on.
She doesn't know about the first one.
Naturally.
So far this is very ordinary.
- So far.
- Now wait.
The girl I'm stuck on has something she can't tell me.
So we go out together and go out together and get nowhere.
Let me ask you something.
Is this girl, as you say, stuck on you?
- I think so.
- Then you have no problems.
Where'd they go?
- No problems?
- Of course not.
There's only one problem with a man and a woman.
When one of them's in love and the other isn't.
After that, it's all mechanics.
Have you told her you love her?
No, not in so many words.
When you don't know what goes, you're afraid to get hurt.
The first thing to do is to tell her.
Believe me, Jerry, with a woman...
...one insincere "I love you" that's said...
...will bring more results than ten sincere ones that aren't.
So go to her and tell her you love her.
Then she'll tell you she loves you.
Then you will embrace.
You will both be very happy.
And then you will ask her to marry you.
- You want to, don't you?
- Sure. Sure.
Good. Then she will say yes...
...and then you will tell her about these other little matters...
...and she will tell you about hers.
And you'll see.
They won't seem important anymore.
Is it as simple as that?
Strange as it seems, yes.
So be happy.
- You only find the right woman once.
- That many times?
- When will you be with her?
- In a little while.
So you know what to do?
- I'll do it. Thanks.
- Good.
Adam, to be in love is to be alive.
Jerry and I, we are so lucky, eh, Jerry?
He's right.
There's nothing like it.
I have something to tell you.
I have something to tell you.
I love you.
I love you and everything's going to be all right! I know it is.
I won't see you anymore.
What do you mean?
I'm getting married.
You're getting...
You're in love with me, aren't you?
It doesn't matter whether I am or not.
It doesn't matter?
I couldn't leave him.
- Who?
- His name is Henri Baurel.
I practically owe him my life, Jerry.
During the war, my parents worked for the Resistance.
I was so young, they asked Henri to hide me...
...and if he'd been caught, it would have been the end of him.
But for five years he took care of me.
He was all I had...
...and I loved him.
And he grew to love me.
And now I...
Jerry, I can't!
You must understand.
Sure.
Well, it's okay.
There's a woman who's helping me a lot...
...who means so much to me, I wouldn't want to lose her for anything.
My work's so important.
Good luck.
If it means anything to you,
I love you!
Goodbye, Lise.
What are you doing tonight?
I was getting ready for a dinner date.
- How about breaking it?
- That'd be difficult.
But not impossible.
You know, some days you look exceptionally pretty.
Is this one of them?
This is one of your best.
This is one of your good days too.
You and I are going out tonight.
I'm taking you to the Art
Students Ball. Have you been?
It's jet-propelled New Year's Eve, and all of Paris will be there.
It's costume, isn't it?
I'll take care of that.
Leave it to me. Tonight's my night.
I feel like a woman for a change.
You are.
- Haven't I ever mentioned it to you?
- No.
You will hear a lot about it from now on.
I'll be back soon.
I got to take care of everything.
I want some champagne!
So do I! They all seem a bottle ahead of us!
Come on!
Come on, let's get some champagne!
- Are these parties always this wild?
- This is my first.
Look at that costume.
Jerry Mulligan, a buddy of mine, made me come.
- Thanks.
- To Jerry.
May his name survive his folly.
His folly? What's he doing?
- He's giving a show. He's a painter.
- So what's wrong with that?
- He'll get it in the neck.
- Then why does he do it?
He's got a sponsor that's got more nerve than cash.
Well, Charmaine, this is farewell!
Let's not say "au revoir".
Just goodbye forever.
By the way, I think you might like to know, I'm Jerry's sponsor.
I know you are.
The vanishing American!
Finally! I met a friend of yours just now.
Who?
Him. Who is he?
That's Adam Cook.
He's a concert pianist.
That's funny.
I've never heard of him.
It's not funny.
He's never given a concert.
- What a pleasant surprise.
- For me too.
- Jerry, this is Lise.
- How do you do?
And Miss Roberts.
Milo, this is Henri Baurel and fiance.
This is our last night in Paris.
We are driving to Le Havre at dawn to get married.
And then we leave for America.
Well, that sounds very romantic.
Let's dance, Henri.
Nice to have met you.
I'll see you later.
That little advice I gave you this afternoon.
- It worked out fine?
- It worked out great.
Good!
- Haven't I seen that girl before?
- I don't know.
Her face seems very familiar.
Quite a nice boy. He's a painter.
A friend of Adam's.
- Are you all right?
- Yes, Henri.
Milo, I'm a fake.
I'm not full of life and good spirits.
It's just the reverse.
I shouldn't have brought you tonight. I'm sorry.
That girl.
In the nightclub.
I'm in love with her.
I think I need some champagne.
I didn't know you were getting married so quickly.
I couldn't tell you.
- Tomorrow?
- Yes.
It's so dreadful standing next to you like this...
...and not having your arms around me.
You'll always be standing next to me, Lise.
Maybe not always.
Paris has ways of making people forget.
Paris? No. Not this city.
It's too real and too beautiful.
Never lets you forget anything.
Reaches in and opens you wide...
...and you stay that way.
I know.
I came to Paris to study and to paint it...
...because Utrillo did and Lautrec did and Rouault did.
I loved what they created...
...and I thought something would happen to me too.
It happened, all right.
Now what have I got left?
Paris.
Maybe that's enough for some, but it isn't for me anymore.
Because the more beautiful everything is...
...the more it'll hurt without you.
Don't let me leave you this way.
Stop the Jeep, Sergeant.
What's this all about, Captain?
A little entertainment for the men, sir.
Tonight's Christmas Eve.
These men are moving up tonight,
General Waverly.
They should be lined up for full inspection.
You're absolutely right. There's no Christmas in the Army, Captain.
Yes, sir.
There's always a slip-up or two during a change in command.
The men get a little loose.
- I know I'm leaving them in good hands.
- Thank you, General.
Sergeant, take me to headquarters immediately.
You'll have those men turned out on the double.
- Sergeant, take the shortcut.
- Yes, sir.
That's not the way back to headquarters.
Joe, you know that and I know that, but the general doesn't know it.
At least he won't for about an hour and a half.
That sergeant will be a private in the morning.
Yes. Isn't he lucky?
~ I'm dreaming ~
~ Of a white Christmas ~
~ Just like the ones I used to know ~
~ Where the treetops glisten ~
~ And children listen ~
~ To hear sleigh bells ~
~ In the snow ~
~ I'm dreaming ~
~ Of a white Christmas ~
~ With every Christmas card ~
~ I write ~
~ May your days be merry ~
~ And bright ~
~ And may all your Christmases ~
~ Be white ~
Well, that just about wraps it up, fellas.
Certainly too bad General Waverly couldn't have been here for this little
Yuletide clambake, but...
'Cause we really had a slam-bang finish cooked up for him.
I guess you know by now that he's being replaced by a new commanding general fresh out of the Pentagon.
That's not a very nice
Christmas present, is it, for a division like us that's moving up?
The old man's moving toward the rear.
That's a direction he's never taken in his entire life.
Well, all I can say is we owe an awful lot to General Waverly...
Attention!
Captain Wallace, who's responsible for holding a show in this advanced area?
- Well, sir, as a matter of fact...
- It was me, sir.
Me, sir. It was my idea, sir.
I mean, when you've got an entertainer, sir, of the caliber of Captain Wallace, sir...
I mean, sir, it's Christmas Eve, sir, and...
Well, sir, I mean that if you were in New York, sir, you'd have to pay $6.60 or even $8.80 to see or hear a great singer like Captain Wallace, sir.
I'm well aware of Captain Wallace's capabilities.
- Who are you?
- Phillip Davis, sir.
Private first class, sir.
- Well, at ease, Davis.
- Yes, sir.
I said, "At ease!"
Yes, sir. Thank you, sir.
This division is now under the command of General Harold G. Carlton.
I don't want you to forget it, not that he'll let you.
He's tough, just what this sloppy outfit needs.
He'll have you standing inspection night and day.
You may even learn how to march.
And if you don't give him everything you've got,
I may come back and... fight for the enemy.
- Merry Christmas.
- Merry Christmas.
Well, I guess all I can say is how much I...
What a fine outfit.
How am I going...?
Don't just stand there.
How do I get off?
Just happen to have a slam-bang finish, sir.
Yes, sir.
~ We'll follow the old man ~
~ Wherever he wants to go ~
~ Long as he wants to go ~
~ Opposite to the foe ~
~ We'll stay with the old man ~
~ Wherever he wants to stay ~
~ Long as he stays away ~
~ From the battle's fray ~
~ Because we love him ~
~ We love him ~
~ Especially when he keeps us on the ball ~
~ And we'll tell the kiddies ~
~ We answered duty's call ~
~ With the grandest son of a soldier ~
~ Of them all ~
~ We'll stay with the old man ~
~ Wherever he wants to stay ~
~ Long as he stays away ~
~ From the battle's fray ~
~ Because we love him ~
~ We love him ~
~ Especially when he keeps us on the ball ~
~ And we'll tell the kiddies ~
~ We answered duty's call ~
~ With the grandest son of a soldier ~
~ Of them all ~
- Look out. It's about to come down.
- Get down!
Put me down!
You all right, Davis?
Yeah, I'm all right, sir.
It's just my arm, sir.
What do you...?
- This looks pretty bad.
- Yeah, it's nothing but a scratch.
- Hey, Davis, how you feeling?
- Pretty good, Captain.
I just dropped by to thank you for saving my life.
- Well, it was a life worth saving, sir.
- Well, I appreciate it.
I want you to know something, Davis.
Anytime I can do anything for you, anytime, any place,
- you just pick up a phone.
- Thank you, sir.
- So long, Davis. Sorry. I'll see you.
- That's all right, Captain.
Captain, you could do one little tiny favor for me.
- What's that?
- Well, sir,
I've kind of written a little song, you see, and I thought perhaps when we get back to the States, when this is all over, you know,
I thought maybe if you put this song in your act, it might be a big hit for you.
- Why, sure. Just pick up the phone.
- Yeah. Captain,
I just happen to have it with me right here.
- This it?
- Yeah.
Well, this is for two people.
It's a duet.
Yeah. It needs two people, two dynamite entertainers.
But I work alone. I do a single.
Who do you figure on for the other hunk of dynamite?
Well, I happen to know a fellow, Captain.
He's pretty funny in living rooms, kind of has a fair voice, you know, and I...
- How about me?
- Well, I do a single, you see.
Yeah, well... That's all right, Captain.
I wouldn't want you to feel any special obligation in any way.
Oh, well.
OK, Dynamite, we'll give it whirl.
- OK, Captain. Bye.
- Good luck.
~ We're having a heat wave ~
~ A tropical heat wave ~
~ Well, now the temperature's rising ~
~ It isn't surprising ~
~ She certainly can ~
~ Can-can ~
~ Let me sing a funny song ~
~ With crazy words that roll along ~
~ And if my song can start you laughing ~
~ I'm happy, happy ~
~ Blue skies ~
~ Blue skies smiling at me ~
~ Nothing but blue skies ~
~ Blue skies do I see ~
~ Bluebirds ~
~ Singing a song ~
~ Nothing but bluebirds, bluebirds ~
~ All day long ~
~ I never saw the sun shining so bright ~
~ Never saw things going so right ~
~ Noticing the days hurrying by ~
~ When you're in love ~
~ My, my, how they fly ~
~ Blue days, all of them gone ~
~ Long gone ~
~ Nothing but blue skies from now on ~
Keep it bubbling now, girls.
- Phil, can I see you for a minute?
- Yeah.
- Hello, honey. Hi.
- Hi.
- You know Doris?
- Yeah.
- Hi.
- Hi. Hi. Fine.
On stage, girls! On stage. Finale.
Albert, did you get the notice drawn up?
- Yes, sir. Show lays off tonight.
- Good boy.
Cast and crew get ten days off with pay.
Gee, they'll go wild. Nicest Christmas present anybody ever had.
Well, they deserve it.
You got the tickets for New York?
Well, a little rough for the holiday traffic, but I pulled a few strings, got you and Mr. Davis on the 1:00 train.
- Tickets are on the way over.
- Good enough.
- Put that on the bulletin board.
- Sign this, Bob.
OK. Say, if you want us for anything in New York, we'll be at Radio City.
We'll be rehearsing there
- for the Ed Harrison Television Show.
- Yes, sir.
Too bad you and Mr. Davis couldn't get a little rest.
Oh, man,
I wasn't about to turn this down.
This is a great big, fat plug for the show.
- Bring the tickets when they come.
- Yes, sir.
- Edna, the light of my life!
- Bob?
Can I see you a minute?
- You know Doris, friend of Rita's.
- Another one?
- How do you do?
- Mutual, I'm sure.
I thought before train time, we'd get a bite to eat
- and have a few laughs or something.
- No, I can't make it.
I'm afraid you can't either.
We got some business to take care of.
- What kind of business?
- We got to go look at an act.
- Look at an act?
- Some other time, I hope?
Well, I like that! Without so much as a "Kiss my foot" or "Have an apple!"
That does it. That's the last time
I'm gonna dig up a date for him.
And from now on, you can do your dirty work yourself.
Yeah, well, excuse me one minute, will you, kids?
Wallace, I think it's time you and I had a little talk.
Yeah, it's a good idea, buster.
If you don't mind, I'll lead off.
- Now, wait a minute.
- You wait a minute.
You know something, for about three months now, you've been clumsily trying to entangle me with some female.
- All I'm trying to do...
- Fat ones, tall ones, thin ones.
Doesn't make any difference, as long as they're wearing skirts, a little mascara and still breathing, you ran them at me.
Believe me, it's for your own good.
- For my own good?
- Yeah. Let's face it, Bob,
- you're a lonely, miserable man.
- What?
And you're unhappy, too, and when you're unhappy, I'm unhappy.
After all, I feel a strong sense of responsibility to you, Bob,
- ever since the day I...
- Not again with that life-saving bit.
- Well, if you'd rather forget it...
- How can I? You won't let me.
Since you saved my life, you decided you had the right to run it.
You've ootzed me along every step of the way.
You've hammered, drove, pushed, shoved.
And if that wasn't enough, you'd look at me with those great big cow eyes of yours, point at that phony arm, and I'd melt and go along!
- I don't expect any gratitude.
- You're gonna get it.
We did great, and I'm grateful.
So, thank you. Thank you, Phil Davis, from the bottom of my heart.
Now, will you let the rest of my life alone?
- No, I won't.
- Well, why not?
Because you're a miserable, lonely, unhappy man.
You're whacky. I'm a very happy man.
Well, then, you're happy for the wrong reasons.
And that's the same as being lonely and miserable, except it's worse.
You know something, you're off your nut about a mile and a half.
I've got everything in life I want.
- I'm off my nut a mile and a half.
- At least.
You've got everything you want except the most important thing.
- What's this?
- A girl.
Well, I'll get around to that one of these days.
My dear partner, when what's left of you gets around to what's left to be gotten, what's left to be gotten won't be worth getting whatever it is you've got left.
When I figure out what that means,
I'll come up with a crushing reply.
- What's back all this, anyway?
- Nothing. Only your happiness.
- My happiness?
- Yeah.
You know, when you get an idea that's for my sole and ultimate happiness, there's always lurking behind it a little angle for you.
- Now, what is it?
- Do you really want to know?
- Yes, I really want to know.
- All right, I'll really tell you.
Then lay it on me, will you?
Ever since the day we became producers, you were a changed man.
You've gone absolutely berserk with work.
The strange thing is you liked it.
You like being Rodgers & Hammerstein.
- It was your idea, you know? Yeah.
- Well, sure it was my idea.
But I didn't think
I was going to create a Frankenstein.
From that day on, I haven't had one minute I could call my own.
What do you want me to do about it?
I want you to get married.
I want you to have nine children.
And if you only spend five minutes a day with each kid, that's 45 minutes, and I'd at least have time to go out and get a massage or something.
You don't expect me to get serious with the kind of characters
- you and Rita have been throwing at me.
- There've been some nice girls, too.
Yeah, yeah. Like that nuclear scientist we just met out in the hall.
All right. They didn't go to college.
They didn't go to Smith.
Go to Smith? She couldn't even spell it.
That's very funny. The crooner is now becoming the comic.
Phil, let me tell you something.
There's a lot of sense in what you say, and I have to admit it.
But the kind of girls you and I meet in this business, they're young and they're ambitious.
They're full of their own careers.
Not interested in getting married, settling down, raising a family.
That's funny, Bob. I never heard you open up like that before.
Someday, the right girl is gonna come along, and if she'll have me, we'll get married. We'll settle down.
We'll start having those nine kids for you.
Forty-five minutes going to be enough?
- If I need any more, I'll tell you.
- Come in!
Your railroad tickets, sir.
Drawing Room A, Car 207.
- Thanks. Grab those, will you, Phil?
- Here.
We'll go right over to the station from Novello's
- after we audition this act.
- What kind of an act is it?
- It's a sister act.
- We don't need any sister act.
What are we wasting time for?
Well, I got a letter from Benny Haynes.
They're his sisters.
Do you remember Benny Haynes, the old mess sergeant?
Freckle-Face Haynes, the dog-faced boy?
- That's the kid. Yeah.
- He's got sisters?
- Claims he's got them.
- Come on now.
How can a guy that ugly have the nerve to have sisters?
Very brave parents, I guess.
- Bob, will you do me one favor?
- What's that?
Give me one reason, one good reason, why we should spend our last two hours in Florida looking at the sisters of Freckle-Face
Haynes, the dog-faced boy.
Let's just say we're doing it for a pal in the Army.
Well, it's not good, but it's a reason.
- Hey, Novello.
- Good evening, Mr. Wallace, Mr. Davis.
Say, have the Haynes Sisters been on yet?
No, sir, not yet.
They'll be on in about 15 minutes.
- Tell them we're here, will you?
- Certainly, Mr. Wallace.
Luigi, show these gentlemen to their table.
This is ridiculous. We could have been out with Doris and Rita having some laughs.
Phil, when are you gonna learn girls like that are a dime a dozen?
Please, don't quote me the price when I haven't got the time.
- Who is it?
- It's me. Novello.
Bob Wallace and Phil Davis are out front to catch your act.
- Wallace and Davis?
- They got a letter from your brother.
He asked them to take a look and give you some advice.
Come on now. You'd better hurry.
Isn't that fabulous?
Wallace and Davis here to see us.
Yeah, fabulous.
Who'd have thought that of Benny?
What a brother!
- What a sweet, wonderful guy!
- Amazing.
I wonder whatever gave him the idea.
Well, he probably knew we were here, you know, and that they were in town with the big show.
He probably figured we were too shy to take advantage of an old Army friendship to call...
Judy, did you read Mother's letter this morning?
- No. Why?
- Benny's got a job in Alaska.
He's been out of the country for three months.
Well, he could have written from Alaska.
But he didn't, did he?
- He might have.
- Judy, why did you write the letter?
Well...
Because it's good business.
You can't leave everything up to fate.
Just like honesty needs a little plus, fate needs a little push.
Judy, next time, will you talk to me first before you push us and plus us right out of show business?
You needn't sound so patronizing.
You sound just like a mother hen looking after a little chick.
Well, little chick needs plenty of looking after.
Until someone else comes along who can do it better, mother hen's gonna stick pretty close to the coop.
- All right, girls, five minutes.
- Thank you.
Honey, you look beautiful tonight.
He'll be crazy about you.
Which one?
What does it matter?
They're both famous.
Ladies and gentlemen, the Haynes Sisters.
Can you imagine Freckle-Face having sisters as cute as that?
It's incredible!
~ Sisters, sisters ~
~ There were never such devoted sisters ~
~ Never had to have a chaperone no, sir ~
~ I'm here to keep my eye on her ~
~ Caring, sharing ~
~ Every little thing that we are wearing ~
~ When a certain gentleman ~
~ Arrived from Rome ~
~ She wore the dress ~
~ And I stayed home ~
~ All kinds of weather ~
~ We stick together ~
~ The same in the rain or sun ~
~ Two different faces ~
~ But in tight places ~
~ We think and we act as one ~
~ Those who've seen us ~
~ Know that not a thing ~
~ Could come between us ~
~ Many men have tried to split us up ~
~ But no one can ~
~ Lord help the mister ~
~ Who comes between me and my sister ~
~ And Lord help the sister ~
~ Who comes between me and my man ~
- How about those big brown eyes?
- No, they're blue.
Brown.
Blue.
Yeah, deep blue.
- Hello.
- Hello.
- Won't you sit down?
- Thank you.
Won't you sit there, and you sit right here?
There, that's cozier, isn't it?
Boy, girl, boy, girl.
Well, I'm Betty, and this is my sister, Judy.
And you're Phil Davis, and you're Mr. Wallace.
- Guilty on both counts, I guess.
- Isn't this nice?
Mr. Wallace was just saying how remarkable it was that Benny Haynes' sisters should have eyes... I mean, blue eyes.
- That is, eyes...
- Nice out.
That's quite an act you kids have there.
It's a funny thing Benny never told us there's so much talent in the family.
Well, to be perfectly honest...
Benny didn't want to take advantage of an old Army friendship.
You know how shy he is, so modest and retiring.
- It's a family characteristic.
- I have a recent snapshot here.
He always was a good-looking kid.
Speaking of families,
I read an article just the other day about citrus fruit and its effect on children's teeth.
Are you interested in families or children
- or things like that, Miss Haynes?
- Yes, I suppose so.
- Oh, man, nix, nix.
- Isn't that amazing?
Imagine a girl in show business today, wanting to settle down and raising a family.
- It's so refreshing, isn't it?
- Pushing, pushing.
- Well, would you like a cigarette?
- No, thank you.
I, for one, would like a little free advice.
Mr. Wallace, do you have any suggestions for the act?
No. Just keep plugging away.
But there must be something.
Should we both be blondes?
Maybe Betty's hair should go a shade darker?
Or should she maybe change the style?
A little more off the face?
- No. I wouldn't change a thing.
- Would you care to dance?
- Don't you think we should discuss...
- Let's say it with music.
All right.
Now, promise you won't say anything important till I get back. Bye, now.
- They look well together, don't they?
- Yes.
Say, I was sure surprised to get
Benny's letter today. I didn't know...
Look, Mr. Wallace, before you go any further, I must tell you, you were brought here tonight under false pretenses.
Benny didn't write the letter, my sister did.
Judy?
She figured you'd never come to see us if we asked you, and you might if Benny did.
As simple as that.
How do you like that? Even little
Judy there's got an angle going.
- She didn't mean anything by it...
- You don't have to apologize.
Everybody's got an angle.
- That's a pretty cynical point of view.
- Come, come now, Miss Haynes.
Surely you knew that everybody's got a little larceny operating in them.
- Didn't you know?
- Just for the record,
I want you to know that my sister and I don't play angles.
Well, if that letter wasn't an angle,
I'd like to know what it was.
- I don't like your whole inferences.
- I've got no squawks, no beefs.
The kid played a percentage, it worked and we're here.
Let's not make a whole big mish-mosh out of it.
- They're getting along just fine.
- And so quickly, too.
Isn't that nice?
All I'm saying is, when you've been around show business as long as I have, you just get used to people working angles, that's all.
Mr. Wallace, as the chance of our seeing each other again is extremely remote, I don't think it's important for us to go on arguing.
- Well, I'll drink to that.
- Be my guest.
Hey, if this keeps up, we'll practically be in-laws before the dance is over.
Well, I don't mind, if you don't.
Yeah, it's too bad we're leaving town tonight.
That is a shame, but we're leaving tomorrow, anyway.
- Where are you going?
- Vermont.
- We're booked for the holidays.
- Vermont?
Vermont should be beautiful this time of the year, with all that snow.
- Yeah... You know something?
- What?
Vermont should be beautiful this time of year.
- All that snow.
- That's what I just said.
We seem to be getting a little mixed up.
- Maybe it's the music.
- Maybe it isn't only the music.
~ The best things happen ~
~ While you're dancing ~
~ Things that you would not do at home ~
~ Come naturally on the floor ~
~ For dancing soon becomes romancing ~
~ When you hold a girl in your arms ~
~ That you've never held before ~
~ Even guys with two left feet ~
~ Come out all right if the girl is sweet ~
~ If by chance their cheeks should meet ~
~ While dancing ~
~ Proving that the best things happen ~
~ While you dance ~
~ The best things ~
~ Happen while you're dancing ~
~ Things that you would not do at home ~
~ Come naturally on the floor ~
~ For dancing ~
~ Soon becomes romancing ~
~ When you hold a girl in your arms ~
~ That you've never held before ~
~ Even guys with two left feet ~
~ Come out all right if the girl is sweet ~
~ If by chance their cheeks should meet ~
~ While dancing ~
~ Just proving that the best things ~
~ Happen while you dance ~
What is this?
The best two out of three?
- I guess I got carried away.
- Yeah, she carried me right with her.
I don't weigh very much.
We'd better change for the last number.
- See you after the show.
- The sheriff's here.
He's in my office with a warrant to arrest both of you.
- The sheriff?
- What's up? What's the trouble?
The landlord claims we burnt a hole in the rug, and he's trying to hold us up for $200.
No, not that old rug routine.
And on top of that, we sneaked our bags out of our room.
- Where are they?
- In our dressing room.
Dressing room. Look, I'll tell you what.
You girls go and pack.
Bob and I'll take care of this.
No, no, no, no.
We don't want to cause you any trouble.
- It's no trouble, honey.
- I know, but Mr. Wallace already...
Will you stop worrying about Mr. Wallace?
We like to take care of our friends.
- We're practically strangers.
- We'd like to take care of that, too.
But you might get yourself in an awful jam. Why should you?
- I mean, what's in it for you?
- Forty-five minutes all to myself.
- What?
- Now, come on. Will you hurry, girls?
Come on. Come on. Go on. You go back to the office and stall the sheriff.
- But, Mr. Davis, how will I stall...
- Make up a story. Tell him anything.
Tell him the girls have to finish the show or something.
Bob. All right, Bob, the girls are in jam. We'll have to help them.
- What's the beef?
- Come on. They're in big trouble now.
- What's the picture?
- Somebody is trying to get... Come on.
Let me ask you something.
Why don't we pay the fellow the $200?
Are you kidding?
Pay off a chiseling rat like that?
Will you send a cab out back, and I'll meet you in the dressing room?
I don't know how I get mixed up in these things.
Why do I listen to you?
Give me one good reason.
Let's just say we're doing it for an old pal in the Army.
- It's not good, but it's a reason.
- Will you go on?
You kids get down to the station and hop on a train.
- Here, Phil.
- We can't.
Our tickets aren't good until tomorrow.
But you've got to get out tonight.
Tickets. Wait a minute. Here, take these. Now, get going. Come on.
We can't take your tickets.
What will Mr. Wallace think?
Well, honey, it was his idea.
Now, will you please get going?
- His idea? Are you sure?
- Yeah.
He won't think it's some kind of an angle?
I told you it was his idea.
Now, come on. Upsy-daisy. Here we go!
That's right.
We'll pay you back.
Where can we reach you?
Don't worry. We'll be in touch. Come on.
Our trunks, our phonograph and the recording.
Honey, we'll get them to you. Would you please go? The taxi is coming.
- Don't stop for anything. Bye.
- Bye, Phil.
- Here.
- Here.
- Open the door. Bye.
- Bye, now.
And I can't stall him much longer.
Hey, whatever happened to paying the $200?
Well, we've got to give the girls five or ten minutes' start.
Wait a minute, I've got an idea.
If you could just stall him for just a few minutes.
I'll try, but he's eating me out of business already.
- Well, keep punching, will you?
- OK.
Come on, Bob, I think this will work.
I got a feeling I'm not gonna like it.
I got a feeling you're gonna hate it.
- What am I doing it for?
- Let's just say we're doing it for a pal in the Army.
- Yeah.
- Yeah, I know. I've heard that...
Listen, Sheriff, I haven't got all night to wait here while you eat free food.
You got your warrant, now arrest those girls.
Now, we agreed to let them finish their show first.
I didn't agree. It was his idea.
I got some rights, too.
You don't get those girls till after they've done their number.
Well, how long is it going to take?
Well, it'll only be...
Wait a minute, there's their music.
- How's your coffee holding up? Yeah.
- Warm it up a little.
Ladies and gentlemen, an impromptu surprise for you.
The Haynes Sisters.
~ Sisters, sisters ~
~ There were never such devoted sisters ~
~ Never had to have a chaperone no, sir ~
~ I'm here to keep my eye on her ~
~ Caring, sharing ~
~ Every little thing that we are wearing ~
~ When a certain gentleman ~
~ Arrived from Rome ~
~ She wore the dress ~
~ And I stayed home ~
~ All kinds of weather ~
~ We stick together ~
~ The same in the rain or sun ~
~ Two different faces ~
~ But in tight places ~
~ We think and we act as one ~
~ Those who've seen us ~
~ Know that not a thing ~
~ Could come between us ~
~ Many men have tried to split us up ~
~ But no one can ~
~ Lord help the mister ~
~ Who comes between me and my sister ~
~ And Lord help the sister ~
~ Who comes between me and my man ~
~ Sisters! ~
~ Sisters! ~
~ Sister, don't come between me ~
~ And my man ~
Hey, we're a smash. Let's take a bow.
Are you crazy? We'll be taking a bow down at the jailhouse. Come on.
- Hey! Hey, you!
- The sheriff!
- Open up! Come on. Open up.
- You've done it again.
It was your fault.
If we get out of this...
Let's go.
Taxi!
- Boy, girl, boy, girl.
- Let's get over the... Hold this.
Here we go.
You gentlemen made it just in time.
- Is this the right car...
- You say you have space on this train?
Show him the tickets, buster.
- Tickets?
- The tickets.
- Tickets. Yeah.
- Yes.
Hold this just a minute.
- What's the matter with you?
- No. I'm looking for the tickets.
- Get them up.
- I'll get them.
- Railroad tickets...
- Yeah.
I have the... No, it's...
I don't seem to have them.
Maybe you've got them, Bob.
Me? You crazy?
I saw you put them in your pocket.
Well, they're gone. They're gone.
I must have left them in my girdle.
Gentlemen, either you have tickets or you haven't tickets.
We've got a drawing room.
Every available space on this train is occupied.
However, if you care to purchase tickets, you can sit up all night in the club car.
Well, that's fine.
How much are two fares to New York?
Now, let me see. $97.24.
- How much more is it to Vermont?
- Vermont? We're going to New York.
It must be beautiful this time of year in Vermont, Bob. All that snow?
- Two tickets to New York.
- How much more to Vermont?
Vermont? Who cares?
Who's going to Vermont?
We are. I mean, we should.
It'll do us a lot of good, Bob, all that snow and the fir trees and the clean fresh air and...
Great change of pace, just what we need.
- Two tickets to New York.
- It's still $97.24 though.
- OK, buster, get it out. Come on.
- I don't seem to have any cash.
What did you do with that?
Leave it in your snood? Here.
- OK. There you are.
- Where are you going?
- It's for breakfast.
- Breakfast! Get some peanuts.
- All right.
- Club car's straight ahead.
- OK.
Excuse me, gentlemen.
I certainly don't get this.
We had space in our names.
They're not allowed to give it away to somebody else.
Well, with the holiday rush and all there could have been a slip-up.
- Excuse me.
- The club car's in there, I think.
Well, this is great, just great.
We've paid for our tickets twice, and now we've got to sit up all night.
What are you screaming about?
If we took a plane, we'd be sitting up all night.
We're not taking a plane.
We're taking a train, a train on which we had tickets.
Tickets for a drawing room with two nice, warm, soft comfortable beds, where, at this very moment, two...
No, you wouldn't do this to me.
- Wouldn't do what?
- After you dressed me up like a dame, you get me involved with a sheriff.
I almost lose my life trying to catch a train. I know...
I just know on top of all that, you wouldn't take away my nice warm bed and let me spend the night out here in a drafty old club car.
You wouldn't do this to old Bob, would you?
Whatever are you talking about?
I'm going down there to Drawing
Room A, I'm gonna open up that door, and if I find those two Haynes sisters there, I'm gonna take them by the hair and with these two hands I'm...
Mr. Wallace, how can we ever thank you?
It was really so sweet and generous of you.
Mr. Davis told us you insisted on giving us the tickets, and, well, it was just wonderful of you.
Wasn't there something you wanted to say to the girls?
Yeah. Won't you have a drink or a sandwich or something?
- Let's sit down.
- Yeah, sit down.
Can we have some club sandwiches?
- I'd like lemonade, please.
- I'll have a malt, please.
- We're emceeing the joint.
- This is cozy, boy, girl, girl, boy.
Tell me, where are you kids going to stay in New York?
We're not staying in New York.
We're booked for over the holidays.
- Where?
- The Columbia Inn, Pine Tree, Vermont.
That sounds very Vermont-y.
Should be beautiful this time of the year in Vermont,
- all that snow and everything.
- Yeah, yeah, beautiful.
The fir trees, the clean pine air.
Very beautiful. Just what we need.
Wonderful. Could you come up for a couple of days?
Well, I don't know...
I wish you could.
It would be awfully nice.
Miss Haynes, if you're ever under a falling building and somebody runs up and offers to pick you up and carry you to safety, don't think, don't pause, don't hesitate a moment, just spit in his eye.
- What did that mean?
- It means we're going to Vermont.
Oh, boy!
Might not be bad at that, you know.
The snow-covered slopes, the skiing,
Christianas and the stemming and the platzing and the schussing.
Hot buttered rum, light on the butter, snow.
~ - Snow, snow ~
~ - Snow, snow ~
~ Snow ~
~ It won't be long ~
~ Before we'll all be there with snow ~
~ Snow, snow ~
~ I want to wash my hands ~
~ My face and hair with snow ~
~ Snow, I long to clear a path ~
~ And lift a spade of snow ~
~ Snow, oh ~
~ To see a great big man ~
~ Entirely made of snow ~
~ Snow ~
~ Where it's snowing all winter through ~
~ That's where I want to be ~
~ Snowball throwing ~
~ That's what I'll do ~
~ How I'm longing to ski ~
~ - Through the snow ~
~ - Snow ~
~ Those glistening houses ~
~ That seem to be built of snow ~
~ Snow, oh ~
~ To see a mountain covered ~
~ With a quilt of snow ~
~ - What is Christmas with no snow? ~
~ - What is Christmas with no snow? ~
~ - No white Christmas with no snow ~
~ - No snow ~
~ - Snow ~
~ - Snow ~
~ I'll soon be there with snow ~
~ I'll wash my hair with snow ~
~ And with a spade of snow ~
~ I'll build a man that's made of snow ~
~ I'd love to stay up with you ~
~ But I recommend a little shuteye ~
~ Go to sleep ~
~ And dream ~
~ - Of snow ~
~ - Snow ~
~ - Snow, snow ~
~ - Snow, snow ~
~ Snow ~
Pine Tree. Coming in to Pine Tree.
- Hi.
- Good morning, merry sunshine.
- How did you sleep?
- Like a baby.
I always love sleeping on trains.
Yeah? You remember
Nanook of the North.
You wound up on the shelf?
Must've lost the toss.
- Let me help you down.
- All right.
- Let's go visit the firemen.
- Yes.
- Your strategy's a little obvious.
- You don't really mind, do you?
- But I got a flash for you.
- What?
She's a real slow mover.
Honey, I got a flash right back for you.
She's in there with the champ.
Looks like our work's cut out for us.
Will you leave it to me?
I've got a whole plan worked out.
Come on, let's go.
Hey! Hey, Bob, Betty, Judy, come here.
I think we took the wrong train.
- What?
- What's the matter?
Well, it's all green out here.
We're still in Carolina.
They must have grass-covered igloos up here.
- Here, honey.
- Let me help you with that.
- This is warmer than Florida.
- Where's the beach?
We should have brought our bathing suits.
- You all right, honey?
- Yeah.
Is this Vermont,
New England's winter playground?
- You sure this is the right Vermont?
- This must be southern Vermont.
- I just don't understand it.
- Ask Cisco here.
Where's the snow? This is supposed to be America's snow playground.
We haven't had snow since
Thanksgiving. Sixty-eight yesterday.
Car for Columbia Inn this way.
- That's us. Let's go.
- Yeah.
Well, must be wonderful up in Vermont this time of the year.
All that underwear!
Gosh, I hope
I can take the electric blanket back.
- Where do you got that?
- Under the underwear.
You'll get a nice tan.
~ - Snow, snow ~
~ - Snow, snow ~
~ Snow ~
~ It won't be long ~
~ Before we'll all be there with... ~
~ Little old snowflakes ~
~ Eskimo pie ~
~ Chocolate and vanilla for you and I ~
- Well...
- It's real nice.
- Aren't you glad you came now?
- Very Vermont-y.
You'll be able to do all the schussing and the platzing and everything, see?
We hope to find the snow here.
Welcome to Columbia Inn. What sort of accommodations would you like?
I can offer you a fairly wide choice.
Any room in the inn, including mine.
We're not here as guests.
We're the Haynes Sisters.
My friend and I are guests.
We came up for the snow.
- Where are you keeping it?
- Well, we take it in during the day.
I'm terribly sorry, but I'm afraid we won't be able to use you.
We'll pay you the half salary for canceling.
Well, are things really that bad?
We're using the ski tow to hang the wash on.
You aren't gonna stay either, are you?
Well, if the girls are leaving,
I'll just get the luggage here.
Thank you, sir.
General Waverly!
- Sir.
- At ease.
- How are you, Captain?
- I'm fine, General, but...
We just try to keep the "general" part quiet.
Why? Begging your pardon, sir.
Well, to put it in one sentence, people don't expect a major general to carry firewood.
Bob, I was just thinking... Hi. I was...
Private Davis, sir.
At ease, Davis.
General Waverly! A janitor!
- Never thought I'd make it?
- Yes, sir. Sir.
You could do anything you put your mind to, sir.
But a janitor!
Matter of fact, it's worse than that.
I own this hotel.
- A landlord.
- He got it in a shrewd business move.
If I start the introductions,
- can I get to meet these young ladies?
- Why, sure.
My housekeeper, Miss Emma Allen.
My granddaughter, Susan Waverly.
- Susan.
- Hello.
- We're the Haynes Sisters.
- Your floor show.
Don't worry, I've already told them we'd have to cancel.
Why? We have a floor, haven't we?
Last time I looked.
But who are they gonna sing to?
Well, even if it's only to you and me, it'll be well worth it.
Besides, there'll be six inches of snow tonight. We'll be full up tomorrow.
Is that the weather forecast?
No, but if there was one thing I learned in the Army, it was to be positive, especially when you don't know what you're talking about.
General Waverly, we want you to know that you needn't feel obligated.
- I mean, since there's no snow...
- Nonsense. We've made a contract.
Your first performance is tonight at 8:00.
- Be there or I'll sue!
- Here.
Excuse me, ladies and gentlemen,
I'm on KP.
- Yes, sir.
- Yes, sir.
~ Those who've seen us ~
~ Know that not a thing ~
~ Could come between us ~
~ Many men have tried to split us up ~
~ But no one can ~
~ Lord help the mister ~
~ Who comes between me and my sister ~
~ And Lord help the sister ~
~ Who comes between me and my man ~
We ate, and then he ate.
We slept, then he slept.
Yeah, then he woke up and nobody slept for 48 hours.
~ Sisters ~
~ Sisters ~
- Hi, girls.
- Hi.
You know what?
I think Bob and I could give you some pointers on that Sister number.
- I don't like the wardrobe.
- But it's so purdy.
Isn't this awful? It's like taking money under false pretenses.
Emma, couldn't you talk him into letting us work for half salary?
Not Light Horse Harry.
"Advance, advance, never retreat."
- He's advancing into bankruptcy.
- How deep's he in here?
He sunk everything, his pension, his life savings, everything in remodeling this place!
It used to be a gristmill and a barn.
Now, it's a Tyrolean haunted house.
Well, eat hearty!
There ought to be something we can do about it.
Well, there is. We're going to New York in the morning.
- New York?
- But you just got here!
We got some connections there, some good ones.
We can dig him up a spot somewhere.
Yeah, but that takes too long.
The problem is here, now.
We've got to stay up here and dream up some way of getting people to come into this place.
- What do you suggest?
- I don't know.
It should be something unusual, some kind of a novelty...
Tell me, brainstorm, what do you think would be a novelty up here in Vermont?
Who knows?
Maybe we can dig up a Democrat?
They'd stone him!
Well, if you ask me, what this place really needs is a dynamite act.
Now, you're talking.
If we could get something really big.
- Something sock, like...
- Like Wallace and Davis.
No, honey, you couldn't get them.
They're too big.
Wait a minute. Wallace and Davis.
How about that, Bob?
We could do our old nightclub act, fit the girls in here and there.
- Might be wonderful. What do you say?
- I think you got something.
It's a great idea.
It's half a great idea, anyhow.
Will you excuse me? Young lady, get me the New York operator.
OK, Mr. Wallace. This way.
I don't know what he's up to, but he's got that
Rodgers & Hammerstein look again.
- Is that bad?
- Not bad, but always expensive.
Excuse me.
I know it sounds crazy, Al, but you're working for crazy people.
Now, get this straight. I want the whole show up here in three days.
Yeah, the whole show. Sets, costumes and all the cast you can round up.
Hey, wait a minute.
What's this gonna cost?
Everybody gets an extra week's pay and you get a bonus, Al.
- What's this gonna cost?
- We open Christmas Eve.
The tab! How much?
Al, what's this gonna set us back?
- Wow!
- How much is "wow"?
Well, OK, Al, do the best you can.
Good luck.
- How much is "wow"?
- We got a big job, buster, a big job.
Whatever acts we can't get, we fill in with the Haynes Sisters.
- How much is "wow"?
- Right in between "ouch" and "boing."
- Wow! I'm right behind you.
- Come along.
I won't tell the general, you do it your own way, but I think bringing your show up here is just one of the nicest...
How did you know?
Well, like any decent, self-respecting housekeeper,
I listen in on the other phone.
I just don't know what to say.
- He thought of it.
- Well, it was a lovely thought.
- Wow!
- Let's get hold of yourself. Come on.
Hurry up, kids. Check in the lobby for your room numbers.
Put your bags backstage.
Everybody grab his own suitcases.
Let's not get mixed up now.
The wardrobe trunk's in the hall.
Let's go, let's go, we got to get started hanging those drapes.
All right, kids, find your rooms, get settled.
Get your rehearsal costumes on. We start rehearsals right after breakfast.
I still don't understand it. You mean you brought your whole show up here?
- Well, most of it, sir.
- Well, it's still not clear to me. Why?
Well, we have this show. Now, we have to close down for the holidays, lay the cast off, and business is bad...
I know about business being bad. Go on.
Well, we figured since we had a chance to rehearse, we might as well do our rehearsing up here.
Why here?
Well, you've got this nice big empty ski lodge, and the minute Phil and I saw it, we decided it was ideal. Didn't we, Phil?
That's right, Bob. Ideal.
That's exactly the word we used, too.
Ideal. We looked at this big ski lodge and we said, "Isn't it ideal?
- Absolutely ideal." Didn't we?
- Ideal.
We've established the fact the lodge is ideal.
And it gives us a chance, you see, sir, to test new material.
- On what?
- On the audience.
We use them like guinea pigs.
Pigs, we can get for you.
I'm not so sure about people.
Well, with all due modesty, sir,
Wallace and Davis never had any trouble packing them in, sir.
- People that is, not pigs.
- Well, go ahead, if you want to.
Apparently, there's quite a bit about show business I don't understand.
- It'll come to you, sir.
- Just takes time.
Sure. We wouldn't be any good as generals.
You weren't any good as privates.
All right, kids, take it from the top once again.
That's right, that's it.
All right, keep it lively.
All right, let's keep it going.
That's good.
Keep it up there, honey.
Move that lumber over, fellas.
Take it over on the other side.
~ I'd rather see a minstrel show ~
~ Than any other show I know ~
~ Oh, those comical folks ~
~ With their riddles and jokes ~
~ Here is the riddle that I love the best ~
~ Why does a chicken go... ~
~ - You know the rest ~
- Yes, sir
~ I'd pawn my overcoat and vest ~
~ To see a minstrel show ~
~ Mr. Bones, Mr. Bones ~
~ How do you feel, Mr. Bones? ~
Rattling
~ Mr. Bones feels rattling ~
~ Ha, ha, that's a good one ~
~ Tell a little story, Mr. Bones ~
~ A funny little story, Mr. Bones ~
~ How can you stop an angry dog ~
~ From biting you on Monday? ~
~ That joke is old ~
~ The answer is to kill the dog on Sunday ~
~ That's not the way to stop a dog ~
~ From biting you on Monday ~
~ How would you bring the thing about? ~
~ Have the doggie's teeth pulled out ~
~ Oh, Mr. Bones, that's terrible ~
~ Yes, Mr. Bones, that's terrible ~
~ - Mr. Interloc'ter ~
~ - What is wrong with you? ~
~ - Well, I know of a doctor ~
~ - Tell about him, do ~
~ Sad to say one day he fell ~
~ Right into a great big well ~
- Oh, that's too bad
- But not at all
~ Why speak in such a tone? ~
~ He should have attended to the sick ~
~ And let the well alone ~
~ That's a joke ~
~ That was told ~
~ In the minstrel days we miss ~
~ When Georgie Primrose used to sing ~
~ And dance to a song like this ~
~ Mandy ~
~ Mandy ~
~ Mandy ~
~ Mandy ~
~ There's a minister handy ~
~ And it sure would be dandy ~
~ If we let him make a fee ~
~ So don't you linger ~
~ Here's a ring for your finger ~
~ Isn't it a humdinger? ~
~ Come along and let the wedding chimes ~
~ Bring happy times for Mandy and me ~
~ Mandy, what a gal ~
~ Oh, Mandy ~
~ There's a minister handy ~
~ And it sure would be dandy ~
~ If we let him make a fee ~
~ He's got his rent to pay ~
~ So don't delay ~
~ It's not a day to linger ~
~ Here's a ring for your finger ~
~ Isn't it a humdinger? ~
~ We advise to live and love ~
~ And honor and obey ~
~ Before he gets away ~
~ Make it Mandy and me ~
~ The wedding chimes ~
~ Bring happy times ~
~ For Mandy and me ~
~ So don't you linger ~
~ Here's a ring for your finger ~
~ Isn't it a humdinger? ~
~ Come along and let the wedding chimes ~
~ Bring happy times ~
~ For Mandy and me ~
- Wonderful!
- This will bring business in, Grandpa.
- Loved it!
- Was everything all right, really?
- All right? Wait till tonight...
- It was sensational!
Judy, was the tempo a little slow for you right here, honey?
~ Mandy ~
~ There's a minister handy ~
Yeah, but you got to drive it there.
You've got to keep it flowing.
~ So listen, Mandy ~
~ There's a minister hand... ~
- Isn't that better?
- Yes, I can see that's... better.
That's much better.
Much, much better.
Mandy
There's a minister...
Mandy
There's a minister handy
- Anything wrong?
- No, I'm just restless.
- Anything on your mind?
- Just restless.
Maybe you'd sleep better if you had something to eat.
No, honey, I'm not hungry.
Emma said she left some sandwiches down in the snack bar.
- Judy, go to sleep.
- And some buttermilk.
- Good night, Judy.
- Good night.
They say if you eat something right before you go to bed, it helps to...
- Judy.
- No, no, it drains the blood from the head, in case you're thinking of anything or anybody or just anything.
All right. Fine, OK, swell.
I'll go and get something to eat.
Not because I want something to eat, but because if I don't get something to eat, you won't go to sleep.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Hi.
- Well, hello. What's doing?
- I couldn't sleep.
You're a little young for that route, aren't you?
Well, I heard something about sandwiches and buttermilk.
Sister, this is the place.
We is loaded here.
We got New England blue plate or the Vermont smorgasbord.
Not as flashy as Toots Shor's probably, but I think you'll find the price is right.
- What'll you have?
- Anything.
Tell me what you want to dream about,
I'll know what to give you.
- What's that?
- I got a whole big theory about it.
Different kinds of food make for different kinds of dreams.
Now, if I have ham and cheese on rye like that,
I dream about a tall cool blonde.
Sort of a first sacker type, you know.
Turkey, I dream about a brunette.
A little on the scatback side, but sexy, sexy.
- What about liverwurst?
- I dream about liverwurst.
- It's a little chilly in here, isn't
- it? I got just the spot for you.
Here, grab the cow,
- and we'll gather round the fire.
- All right.
Got a nice open-hearth job here with some Vermont logs burning briskly.
- Isn't this nice?
- Wonderful.
- Glad you came?
- It's better than a picnic.
Why, certainly. No sand or yellow jackets buzzing around.
I can't understand what's wrong with me.
I usually don't have any trouble sleeping.
Well, you've come to the right fellow.
Here, sit down.
You know,
I have a theory about that, too.
- Would you like to hear it?
- Very much.
~ When I'm worried and I can't sleep ~
~ I count my blessings ~
~ Instead of sheep ~
~ And I fall asleep ~
~ Counting my blessings ~
~ When my bankroll is getting small ~
~ I think of when I had none at all ~
~ And I fall asleep ~
~ Counting my blessings ~
~ I think about a nursery ~
~ And I picture curly heads ~
~ And one by one I count them ~
~ As they slumber in their beds ~
~ If you're worried ~
~ And you can't sleep ~
~ Just count your blessings ~
~ Instead of sheep ~
~ And you'll fall asleep ~
~ Counting your blessings ~
Do you mind if I say something just for the record?
Of course not.
I think what you're doing for the general is one of the most decent, unselfish things I've ever heard of.
- No angle?
- No angle.
I want to apologize for the way I sounded in Florida.
I guess I've always been kind of a silly schoolgirl.
You know the bit, the lady fair and the knight on the white horse.
Let me tell you something, it's kind of dangerous putting those knights up on white horses.
- They're likely to slip off, you know.
- I think mine's here to stay.
That's sure good to know.
Makes a fellow feel a little shaky to hold up there all alone on one of those bleached chargers.
- Are you worried?
- Kind of.
~ If you're worried ~
~ And you can't sleep ~
~ Just count your blessings ~
~ Instead of sheep ~
~ And you'll fall asleep ~
~ Counting your blessings ~
Excuse me, I'm sorry.
I was just after a little something for a sweet tooth.
I see you've beaten me to it.
You'll find the Vermont smorgasbord very good, General.
- It'll make you sleep like a baby.
- Thank you.
So you know something?
You still haven't eaten anything.
I know exactly what
I'm going to dream about tonight.
Good for you.
Hold your fire, men. I'm coming through.
- Morning, Captain.
- Morning, General.
Looks like you're on active duty.
Yeah, Emma drafted me for a few chores.
And I picked up the handbills for the new show.
Look pretty good?
Well, that ought to bring in quite a few guinea pigs.
You ever hook up with the fellows in the horseshoe game?
No. No, I'm a little too young for that sort of thing.
Figure a fellow ought to hold off on horseshoes till after the parade's passed him by.
That'll be some time, sir.
- You get it?
- Thank you.
Look, Bob, I still don't know too much about show business and guinea pigs, but in case you and Phil are worried about the welfare of a certain Vermont innkeeper, you needn't be.
- His inn-keeping days are numbered.
- I wouldn't say that.
The percentage is gonna catch up with the weatherman one of these days.
I've been watching those clouds, and there's snow in them.
Those are cumulus clouds, elevation 7,000 feet.
Yeah, well, I wouldn't be surprised if it snowed overnight.
I want to tell you something
I haven't even told the womenfolk.
- I'm going back in the Army.
- Really?
- I've applied for active duty.
- Well, that's wonderful news, sir.
I got an idea they may try to palm off one of those desk jobs on me, but they'd better not.
I'm holding out for a training command or something overseas.
When will you hear, sir?
I expect a letter from Washington any day now.
Holy smoke, I'm really on the boil!
I got the mail right here, and I think there's a letter for you, General.
Yeah. Here it is, from Washington, too.
- It looks like the one.
- War Department, see?
I left my... My glasses are in my room.
I would like to read this by myself, but I'm a little anxious.
- Read it, son, slowly.
- All right.
I'm starting to play trombone a little, too.
Let's see if I can get focused in here.
- "Dear Tom, why you dirty old..."
- Skip that word.
"Certainly was a surprise hearing from you.
Your amusing letter was appreciated more than you imagine.
Of course, you've got plenty of time to be amusing, sitting on that porch, rocking away, while we put in a full day's work.
You always were a lucky stiff, and I envy you.
A few years more, I was saying to Edie the other evening, and I'll be able to take it easy like old Tom."
Old Tom.
"Oh, well.
Some people have all the luck.
Everything's fine here.
Carol had the mumps..."
The rest of the letter is about the family.
He's telling me that they can't use me.
No place for me.
We're not fooling each other.
Bob, it wouldn't be too hard to learn this game of horseshoes.
Now, would it?
It'd be a cinch.
Begging your pardon, sir, but there's really a lot to be said for leisure.
Of course, you've always been active, but in time...
Never kid a kidder, son.
See you later.
That's a good one!
Fine, fine.
All right, kids, take a rest.
- I'm sure it's a great...
- Bob? Phil?
Ready to run through the Choreography number.
I'll be with you in a minute.
It's the craziest thing I ever heard of!
How are you gonna get a whole division up here by Christmas Eve?
So we don't get a whole division.
But there must be enough guys in New England alone from the old man's outfit to fill a town this size.
At least enough guys to let him know he's not forgotten.
Don't you think putting the show on will do it?
Phil, if you'd seen the look in his eyes when he read that letter you'd know it wouldn't.
It's gonna take five days to put the show on, is it?
That's right.
How are we gonna get in touch with all the fellows?
Television. Ed Harrison.
I'm gonna go put a call in to him now.
I'll go on down to New York, and if I can swing it, I'll get on his show and make a pitch to the guys myself.
What do you think of it?
I think it's impossible, ridiculous and insane.
- Anything else?
- Yeah. I wish I'd thought of it first.
You rehearse the number.
I'll put the call in, Bob.
Hey, Johnny, get the kids for a dress rehearsal, will you?
Emma? Could you put in a long-distance call for me?
I want to get Ed Harrison,
New York City.
- The television Ed Harrison?
- That's the fellow, yeah.
You'll catch him at Radio City, I think.
And let's keep it quiet.
This is kind of a personal thing.
Sure, sure. Ed Harrison, television.
Radio City, gee.
All right, fellas. From the top.
The theater, the theater
What's happened to the theater
Especially where dancing is concerned?
~ Chaps ~
~ Who did taps ~
~ Aren't tapping anymore ~
~ They're doing choreography ~
~ Chicks ~
~ Who did kicks ~
~ Aren't kicking anymore ~
~ They're doing choreography ~
~ Heps ~
~ Who did steps ~
~ That would stop the show ~
~ In days that used to be ~
~ Through the air they keep flying ~
~ Like a duck that is dying ~
~ Instead of dance ~
~ It's choreography ~
Ed, Ed, I know it's a long shot, but there's no other way to reach the men in a hurry.
How does it sound?
I love the idea of doing something for the old man.
If it weren't for him,
I wouldn't know how to peel a potato!
Look, why don't you go all out?
Put the whole show on TV?
I'll come up there myself, bring the camera, the crew, the works.
- Thanks, Ed, but that's not the idea.
- Well, it's a great idea.
Put the show on the whole network right from Pine Tree. Play it up big.
A real Christmas Eve show, all about how you're playing
Santa Claus to the old man, you know.
Plenty of schmaltz, lots of heart.
Would be worth over $100,000 in free advertising for you and Phil.
And, yeah, we'll put the old boy on himself, you know, the forgotten-man angle.
Tear their hearts out.
Here's the laundry, Emma.
I'm sorry, Ed. Sorry, but that's out.
We're not commercializing on the old man's hard luck. No chance.
All I want to do is go on your show and make a little pitch. OK?
Wonderful. Wonderful.
See you Sunday night then. Bye.
- Take it upstairs, Susan.
- All right.
Emma?
- Was there a telegram for me?
- What?
Yeah! Just an offer from the Carousel Club in New York, anytime you and Judy are available.
What's your technique?
Holding them up to the light?
- That's for amateurs. I use steam.
- You're quite a pro.
I'm thinking of turning in my uniform.
Stick your nose in other people's business and eventually you find out things you wish you hadn't.
Anything specific?
Did you know the boys are planning to put this whole show on television?
- Television?
- Right from here, on Christmas Eve.
I just heard Bob fix it with
Ed Harrison. It's a big deal.
Real schmaltz, I think they called it.
- They're even gonna put the general on.
- I just can't believe it.
That'll make him a pathetic figure from coast to coast.
What's it gonna do to his pride?
Of course, you know it means over $200,000 worth of free publicity
- for Davis and Wallace.
- Emma, that's a terrible thing to say.
I didn't say it. Bob Wallace said it.
I just heard him.
No. Bob wouldn't be involved in a thing like that. I'm sure you're wrong.
Well, if I am, I'll resign as president of the New England chapter of Busybodies Anonymous.
Oh, dear, my nerves. It's the phone.
Hi, Betty. Have you seen Bob?
Do you know whether he made that phone call to New York or not, Emma?
- I understand he did.
- Good.
I hear that television's entered the picture.
- Then he worked it out?
- Beautifully.
- It's a great, little angle, isn't it?
- Brilliant.
Listen, keep this under your hat, will you?
We wouldn't want the general to know about it, because it's...
I can understand that.
Betty, that was Bob. He's waiting to rehearse in the dining room.
- Anything wrong?
- Tell him I'm on the way.
- Hi, hon. How about some lunch?
- I'm not hungry.
- But Betty...
- I said I'm not hungry.
- What's with her?
- I'm not sure, but I have an idea.
I want to think about it.
Yeah, well, let's think about it over a sandwich, kid. I'm starving to death.
- Change the routine...
- That other rehearsal's got me crazy. I don't know...
Let's set up the next number.
Howdy. I was just going over this Blessings number.
Something we could do together.
Want to try it from the release?
~ When my bankroll is getting small ~
~ I think of when I had none at all ~
~ And I fall asleep counting my blessings ~
What's the matter? A bad key for you?
Look, I don't think
I'm right for this song.
Of course you are. Lays great for you.
Come on, now, let's try it.
- No, I don't think I'm right for it.
- Don't be silly.
What I'm trying to say is
I don't feel like doing this song.
I don't want to do this song. In fact,
I'm not sure I want to do the show.
Well, what is this?
You sleep well last night or what?
I'd rather not discuss last night, if you don't mind.
Come now, I admit I was a little carried away and everything, but there's no use getting all upset with just a simple little kiss.
Nobody signed a contract.
There's certainly nothing for you to feel guilty about.
- Look who's talking about guilt.
- What do you mean by that?
I mean, you shouldn't mix fairytales with liverwurst and buttermilk.
- What did you have for lunch today?
- I didn't have lunch.
Well, maybe you ought to eat something.
Why is everybody suddenly so concerned about my eating habits?
- Why don't people leave me alone...
- Time, time, cut!
Let's get off the merry-go-round.
If you got something to say, say it.
Otherwise, let's get to work. I got a lot of details here to take care of.
Well, then, let's just skip all this.
I certainly wouldn't want to interfere with the business plans of the great Wallace and Davis.
- That's quite a remark.
- I'm sorry. It's the best I can do.
Look, Betty,
I've got no time for games today.
Now, are you gonna sing this song or not?
- I don't want to sing the song.
- Well, nobody's twisting your arm.
- Is that all, Mr. Wallace?
- Yes, that's all, Miss Haynes.
Yours ought to be done by now.
- How do you figure that?
- I'm not sure, but daylight's beginning to glimmer.
Last night she couldn't sleep.
Today she won't eat.
- She's in love.
- If that's love, somebody goofed.
It's love all right, but she's deliberately putting up barriers.
I'd bet my bottom dollar on it.
- Why?
- Because of me.
She's always felt that she's mother hen and I'm her little chick.
She'll never leave the roost until I'm taken care of.
- That's funny. Are you sure?
- I should've known.
She'll never get involved with anyone until I'm married
- or engaged or something.
- Well, I guess that's the end of that.
Unless I get myself engaged or something real fast.
That's ridiculous.
Even if it made any sense at all, you're up here in the wilderness.
There's nobody around here.
I don't know.
Be realistic. Who could you find up here to get yourself engaged to?
Well, I suppose it ought to be someone that I know.
That always helps.
- Of course, it's got to be a man.
- That's an absolute must.
No, no, no. I mean a mature man.
One with talent and experience.
- Talent, experience...
- One that's witty,
- gay, charming, attractive.
- Witty, gay, charming, sure.
Where are you gonna find such a super man?
- Don't be so modest.
- Honey, fellas like that don't...
- Me?
- Well, you're not exactly Superman,
- but you're awfully available.
- Yeah, now, don't get any ideas, Judy.
- I'm not the marrying kind.
- It's just an engagement.
Yeah, well,
I'm not the engaging kind, either.
Well, what kind are you?
Well, I'm more the "I don't mind pushing my best friend into it, but I'm scared stiff when I get anywhere close to it myself" kind.
How terrible could it be for a few days?
- You do like me, don't you?
- Sure, I do.
- I mean, I'm not exactly repulsive.
- Of course not.
And you do find me gay, amusing, good company, fun to be with?
Sure, but I feel the same way about my cocker spaniel.
Well, let's just skip it.
I was only thinking of Betty and Bob.
Betty and Bob, yeah.
Look, it would only be temporary?
Well, of course. Well, you don't think I'm the kind of girl that goes around throwing myself at a man, do you?
Of course not. Nobody thinks that.
Well, look, let me figure this out.
Now, it would only last two or three weeks at the worst. At the most, I mean.
Well, of course.
And we wouldn't have to announce our engagement till it was absolutely necessary.
Absolutely necessary.
Well, OK, it's a deal.
But don't you think we ought to kiss or something?
Not until it's absolutely necessary.
Isn't it a wonderful party?
Bob, would you like to dance?
- I'm game if you are.
- Thank you.
Hey, Betty. How about some exercise?
Come on.
~ The best things ~
~ Happen while you're dancing ~
~ Things that you would not do at home ~
~ Come naturally on the floor ~
~ - For dancing ~
- Pardon me.
~ Soon becomes romancing ~
Hi. OK.
~ Even guys with two left feet ~
~ Come out all right if the girl is sweet ~
~ If by chance their cheeks should meet ~
~ While dancing ~
Mr. Herring, this is Miss Lennis.
- How do you do?
- Mutual, I'm sure.
- Bye.
- May I?
- Looks like it's absolutely necessary.
- What... You mean, I...
Hold it a minute, fellas.
Give me a little ching-a-ring, will you?
Folks, I have an announcement to make.
An announcement, and I want you all to be the first to know.
I don't know whether the best things happen while you're dancing or whether they just happen in Vermont...
...but Judy has just agreed to...
Well, I mean that she just asked me...
That is, she just said...
What I'm trying to say is that Judy and I are engaged.
- Congratulations.
- Thank you.
- I sure wish it would happen to me!
- Yeah, I do, too!
It's just wonderful, darling.
I'm so happy for you.
I hoped you would be.
Is everything all right?
Sure, sure, it's all right. I'm fine.
You realize you're getting the best girl in the whole wide world?
- I... Yeah. Sure.
- You take care of her.
- I'd say this calls for champagne.
- I'll help you, Emma.
- Congratulations, kids!
- Thanks, Bob.
I don't know what you see in this long drink of charged water, but, honestly, after you get to know him, he's almost endurable.
- You're gonna settle down, buster?
- Yeah.
- Pipe, slippers... All the best, boy.
- Yeah. Yeah. Thanks, Bob.
By the way, the water's fine.
Why don't you take a little plunge?
I don't know.
It seemed a little icy today.
That's today. I've a feeling by tomorrow it'll warm up just fine.
Well, you sold me. I'll go.
Well, don't just stand there.
Aren't you going to kiss the bride?
Kiss... Yes, sir.
Yes, sir!
Now, that didn't hurt too much, did it?
You know, in some ways, you're far superior to my cocker spaniel.
At ease, General.
- Champagne?
- Yeah, I think I will.
Champagne?
Here. Let's drink to their happiness.
To buttermilk and liverwurst and getting things back to where they were yesterday.
I know we always said we'd never break up the act, but that wasn't really very realistic.
I mean, well, we both knew that someday one of us or both of us would want to be free.
Besides, now that I'm taken care of, you don't have to feel responsible for me anymore.
I mean, well, if there's anything special you want to do, you can just feel free now to go ahead and do it.
Isn't that true? I say, isn't that true?
Betty, honey, are you asleep?
Good night.
Thanks, General.
When you get back to the inn, would you give this to Judy?
It explains everything.
I can't help feeling this is a tactical error.
I kept watching you and Bob last night.
I say what you two need is a good talking to.
No, General, this is a private war.
Don't do anything.
I promise. Good luck.
Sure, I know about that, but on Christmas Eve we're gonna have a lot of special trains coming in here, from Boston, Philadelphia and New York.
Now, can you handle it OK?
I'll call the traffic manager.
Good, but remember, strictly off the record.
- Yes, Mr. Wallace.
- That's great.
All aboard!
Betty!
What's this?
Where do you think you're going?
- I'm going to New York. I've got a job.
- You've got a job. Where?
Goodbye, Bob. Good luck. I hope you have great success with the show.
Betty, about yesterday, if I said anything, I didn't mean it.
Goodbye.
I was so busy with other things,
I must have sounded like an idiot...
- Goodbye.
- ...but I didn't mean... Betty.
Judy. Hey, Judy. John.
Come on up here.
Let's run through the Abraham number.
Watch the tempo on the last part.
Keep it rocking, will you, fellows?
That's wonderful.
That's great, Johnny.
Listen, all right, kids, come on up here. I want the boys in the back.
Excuse me, Judy.
It's for you from Betty.
- She gave it to Grandpa at the station.
- At the station?
Phil! Phil!
- What's the matter?
- Phil, it's from Betty.
How could you be stupid enough to try a stunt like this?
Phony engagements and messing around with people's lives.
You ought to be horse-whipped.
First you, and then you, and then you again.
Gee whiz, Bob,
I only did it for your own good.
Yeah, because I'm a lonely, miserable, unhappy man.
That's right, and when you're unhappy,
I'm unhappy. After all, Bob, I...
Oh, no. You're not gonna start again with that life-saving bit.
Well, I told you,
I don't expect any gratitude.
I'm not even sure you saved my life.
Sometimes I wish the wall had fallen on me.
- Don't say that.
- And you, her own sister, how could you do such a thing?
It's always that she's been a kind of a mother hen...
Yeah, we wanted the mother hen to leave the roost, so that the little chick could...
- Well, I guess we laid an egg.
- An egg?
Brother, you laid a Vermont volleyball!
I'm going to New York and try and square it with Betty.
You ought to consider yourself plenty lucky.
You might have been stuck with this weirdsmobile for life!
- Judy!
- Leave the kid alone.
You've got her confused enough already.
Bob, you don't understand one thing.
Boy, you've mixed things up beautifully, you have.
- Listen to me...
- No! You listen to me.
I got a job for you to do, if you think you can get one simple thing straight.
- Try me.
- OK.
The general always listens to the Ed Harrison Show, right?
- Yeah.
- I'm gonna be on about 9:00.
- Tell Emma about it.
Maybe she can help you.
But the big thing is don't let the general anywhere near that television set. You get me?
Don't worry, Bob. I'll keep him away from that television set if I have to break my arm.
Break your arm, your ankle or your neck, but don't break anything valuable.
OK, Bob. You can depend on me.
Let's see, break the arm...
- Good evening, Mr. Wallace.
- Marcel, how are you?
Fine, thank you.
I have a table all ready for you, sir.
Good.
- Has Betty Haynes been on yet?
- Not yet. In a few minutes.
Good. I'm expecting Eddy Harrison, too.
Show him to the table.
- Certainly, Mr. Wallace.
- Thanks.
- Dick.
- Yes, honey.
Let's not do the number we rehearsed this afternoon.
Play Blue Skies. Anything.
The number sounded great in rehearsal.
I know it did, but I just...
It's a wonderful number, honey.
Come on. Let's do it. Please, do it.
~ Love ~
~ You didn't do right by me ~
~ You planned a romance ~
~ That just hadn't a chance ~
~ And I'm through ~
~ Love ~
~ You didn't do right by me ~
~ I'm back on the shelf ~
~ And I'm blaming myself ~
~ But it's you ~
~ My one love affair ~
~ Didn't get anywhere from the start ~
~ To send me a Joe ~
~ Who had winter and snow in his heart ~
~ Wasn't smart ~
~ Love ~
~ You didn't do right by me ~
~ As they say in the song ~
~ You done me wrong ~
~ My one love affair ~
~ Didn't get anywhere ~
~ From the start ~
~ To send me a Joe ~
~ Who had winter and snow in his heart ~
~ Wasn't smart ~
~ Oh, love ~
~ You didn't do right by me ~
~ As they say in the song ~
~ You done me wrong ~
~ Yes, Mr. Love ~
~ You done me wrong ~
Surprise! What brings you here?
I had a little business to take care of.
- I see.
- Some of it concerns you.
- Really?
- Yeah. It sort of boils down to this.
You didn't have to break up the act or run out of town, because Judy and Phil's engagement was phony.
A phony?
Seems they were trying to figure out some way to get rid of any barriers between you and the altar.
Seems like they thought you and I were serious about each other.
It just shows you how foolish people can be.
Yeah.
Why do people have to stick their noses in other people's business?
- Well, that's Phil for you, I guess.
- That's Judy for you.
The two of us were having some laughs together and they thought we were in love with each other.
- Ridiculous.
- Sure.
They're sorry about it now, and Judy wants you to come back.
Matter of fact,
I'd like to see you come back myself.
- Well, I don't know...
- Betty.
I know that knight of yours has slipped off his charger.
Why, I don't know, but I'd like to do all I can to get him back up there again for you.
- Mr. Wallace has been expecting you.
- Thank you very much.
- Bob, come on. It's 8:30.
- This is Ed Harrison. Miss Haynes.
- How do you do?
- Hi.
Boy, what I went through for you, sponsors, network, but I finally got it squared away just the way you wanted it.
- That's swell, Ed. Listen...
- I got a cab waiting. We're late.
Just a second, Ed. I want to...
Looks like I've got to scoot.
Could I see you later tonight maybe?
- I'm sorry, I have a date.
- What about tomorrow?
- No, I'll be busy all day.
- Come on, will you?
You'd better go.
You're keeping Mr. Harrison.
- What will I tell Judy?
- I don't know.
I have to think about it.
Goodbye, Bob.
Think Phil will be able to keep the old man away from the television set?
I have complete confidence in him.
When it comes to conniving or finagling, you can't beat this boy.
- Hello, girls.
- Hello.
You have the right station?
- Yeah.
- Sure.
Grandpa, the battery's dead on the Jeep.
It's stuck...
I'll fix it later. I don't want to miss the Ed Harrison Show.
Judy.
Should be a very good show tonight.
- General, come quickly.
- What's this?
It's a terrible thing. Fell down the stairs. I tell you it's an awful thing.
Mercy! Go see if you can help him.
What is it? What is it?
Did you fall down the stairs?
- Yes, sir.
- Are you hurt?
I'm all right, sir. Probably just a small compound fracture, sir.
- There we are. How does it feel?
- It feels pretty good, sir.
- Put your weight on it.
- My weight. Right here, sir.
- Susan, call a doctor.
- Please don't do that, sir.
It's probably just a small internal muscular hemorrhage, sir.
It'll be all right.
You'll feel better if we take you where you can be comfortable.
- Yes, sir.
- Let's just go back in here and you can watch the television.
- Sir.
- I'm going to call a doctor.
Please, sir, don't bother. If you'll just help me back to the bungalow,
- I'm sure I'll be all right, sir.
- OK.
Thank you, sir. I wouldn't want to faint in front of the women, sir.
I'll be all right!
- Don't put your weight on it.
- No, no, no, sir.
Fine, sir.
Thank you. Thank you.
And now it's a great privilege to present my special guest, an old pal from Army days, a great guy and a great entertainer,
Bob Wallace!
Bob's got a special message tonight for all you guys who were a part of the 151st Division.
It's about someone who's very close to all of us, and he's gonna tell you about it in his own special way.
- Bob?
- Thanks, Eddy.
~ When the war was over ~
~ Why, there were jobs galore ~
~ For the GI Josephs ~
~ Who were in the war ~
~ But for generals ~
~ Things were not so grand ~
~ And it's not so hard to understand ~
~ What can you do with a general ~
~ When he stops being a general? ~
~ Oh, what can you do ~
~ With a general who retires? ~
~ Who's got a job for a general ~
~ When he stops being a general? ~
~ They all get a job ~
~ But a general no one hires ~
~ They fill his chest with medals ~
~ While he's across the foam ~
~ And they spread the crimson carpet ~
~ When he comes marching home ~
~ The next day someone hollers ~
~ When he comes into view ~
~ "Here comes the general" ~
~ And they all say, "General who?" ~
~ They're delighted that he came ~
~ But they can't recall his name ~
~ Nobody thinks of assigning him ~
~ When they stop wining and dining him ~
~ It seems this country never has enjoyed ~
~ So many one and two and three ~
~ And four-star generals unemployed ~
Like Eddy told you, that song is for the 151st Division.
The officers and the men under the command of Major General Tom Waverly.
I hope a lot of you guys were listening, because I have something
I want you to do for me.
Don't you want to sit down?
No, no, sir. If you'll just walk me around the barn a few times,
I think it'll be fine, sir. Yes.
It's a little too fast, sir.
If we just slow down a little bit, sir.
I know it's murder asking you to leave your homes on Christmas Eve, and certainly a trip like this is no bargain.
It shouldn't be too tough for the fellows who live in the
New England area, but remember this, nobody connected with the show is getting anything out of it, nothing at all.
Except what we're offering you, a chance to give the nicest
Christmas gift he'll ever get to the nicest guy we'll ever know.
Remember, then, your objective is Pine Tree, Vermont.
Synchronize your watches then for Operation Waverly.
Hey, listen, men, when I give you the signal,
I want you to fall in single file on each side of the stage.
And I want you to fall in at attention like that day at Montecatini when
Clark came through. You remember?
It was a big day for you. You got a lot of that stuff hung on you. Remember?
I'm gonna have you face the general.
When I give you the command to march,
I want you to step right out, just like you used to.
- All right, Captain.
- OK, boys.
- Captain, these things have shrunk.
- Your appetite hasn't shrunk.
Who's there?
They're sure gone.
How could you have sent all my suits to the cleaners?
You've only got two.
Well, I think you'd send one at a time then, in that case.
- Why can't you wear your uniform?
- Yes!
I won't appear in uniform.
- Please, Gramps.
- Absolutely not.
Very well, I'll explain to Bob and Phil that you didn't care to come to the show tonight.
- I'll have you court-martialed.
- Susan. You're not obliged to go.
They haven't done much for you, hardly anything.
Emma, I'll make my own decisions.
I got along very well in the Army without you.
It took 15,000 men to take my place.
- Susan.
- Fifteen thousand men.
I hope he comes down.
That'd be awful if he wouldn't.
It's Betty!
- Welcome home, Betty!
- Hello, Emma.
How are you?
- Hi, Susie.
- Hi, Betty.
- Where's Judy?
- She's coming.
- Honey. I'm so glad you came.
- Hello, Judy.
You didn't say anything to Bob, did you?
Hurry up now.
You haven't got much time to get ready.
If I weren't such a mean old biddy,
I'd break right down and cry.
Grandpa!
You look wonderful.
You didn't expect me to come down in my bathrobe, did you?
No.
Ten-hut!
~ We'll follow the old man ~
~ Wherever he wants to go ~
~ Long as he wants to go ~
~ Opposite to the foe ~
~ We'll stay with the old man ~
~ Wherever he wants to stay ~
~ Long as he stays away ~
~ From the battle's fray ~
~ Because we love him ~
~ We love him ~
~ Especially when he keeps us on the ball ~
~ And we'll tell the kiddies ~
~ We answered duty's call ~
~ With the grandest son of a soldier ~
~ Of them all ~
~ Because we love him ~
~ We love him ~
~ Especially when he keeps us on the ball ~
~ And we'll tell the kiddies ~
~ We answered duty's call ~
~ With the grandest son of a soldier ~
~ Of them all ~
Troops are ready for inspection, sir!
Just routine, sir.
I am not satisfied with the conduct of this division.
Some of you men are under the impression having been a non-CO entitles you not to wear neckties.
Well, you're wrong.
Neckties will be worn in this area.
And look at the rest of your appearance.
You're a disgrace to the outfit.
You're soft. You're sloppy.
You're unruly. You're undisciplined.
And I never saw anything look so wonderful in my whole life.
Thank you all.
- Thanks, Phil.
- General.
- I'm grateful, Captain.
- You're welcome.
Ten-hut!
~ When I was mustered out ~
~ I thought without a doubt ~
~ That I was through ~
~ With all my care and strife ~
~ I thought that I was then ~
~ The happiest of men ~
~ But after months of tough civilian life ~
~ Gee, I wish I was back in the Army ~
~ The Army wasn't really bad at all ~
~ Three meals a day, free ~
~ For which you didn't pay ~
~ Uniforms for winter, spring and fall ~
~ There's a lot to be said for the Army ~
~ The life without responsibility ~
~ A soldier out of luck ~
~ Was really never stuck ~
~ There's always someone higher up ~
~ Where you can pass the buck ~
~ Oh, gee, I wish I was back in the Army ~
~ Gee, I wish I was back in the Army ~
~ The Army was the place to find romance ~
~ Soldiers and WACs ~
~ The WACs who dressed in slacks ~
~ Dancing cheek to cheek ~
~ And pants to pants ~
~ There's a lot to be said for the Army ~
~ A gal was never lost for company ~
~ A million handsome guys ~
~ With longing in their eyes ~
~ And all you had to do was pick the age ~
~ The weight, the size ~
~ Oh, gee, I wish I was back in the Army ~
~ Gee, I wish I was back in the Army ~
~ The shows we got, civilians couldn't see ~
~ How we would yell ~
~ For Dietrich and Cornell ~
~ Jolson, Hope and Benny all for free ~
~ There's a lot to be said for the Army ~
~ The best of doctors ~
~ Watched you carefully ~
~ A dentist and a clerk ~
~ For weeks and weeks they'd work ~
~ They'd make a thousand-dollarjob ~
~ And give it to a jerk ~
~ Oh, gee, I wish I was back in the Army ~
~ Three meals a day ~
~ For which you didn't pay ~
~ A million handsome guys ~
~ With longing in their eyes ~
~ I thought that I was through ~
~ With all my care and strife ~
~ But after months and months ~
~ Of tough civilian life ~
~ Oh, gee ~
~ I wish I was back in the Army now ~
- Buster, lookit here!
- Hey, here it comes.
- This is it.
- Isn't this great?
Come on, Phil.
- Lookit here!
- Isn't this great?
- We may get snowed in here, pal.
- Oh, boy, this is great!
~ - Snow, snow ~
~ - Snow, snow ~
~ Snow ~
Hey! Merry Christmas!
- Merry Christmas!
- Merry Christmas!
Remember, kids, hold those candles up good and high for me, aren't you?
Keep a nice straight line when you go out there.
Don't go straggling all over the stage.
- How's your voice, Bobby?
- I'm Bobby.
Pardon me. Well, how's your voice?
You all right?
Give me a nice clear tone.
Let me hear it.
Those were the days.
OK, now, turn around.
We're gonna go on in a minute.
Watch your space. Don't get far apart.
Everybody the same distance. That's it.
Keep the candles up.
Keep them way up high.
OK, Byron.
~ I'm dreaming ~
~ Of a white Christmas ~
~ Just like the ones ~
~ I used to know ~
~ Where the treetops glisten ~
~ And children listen ~
~ To hear sleigh bells ~
~ In the snow ~
~ I'm dreaming ~
~ Of a white Christmas ~
~ With every Christmas card ~
~ I write ~
~ May your days be merry ~
~ And bright ~
~ And may all your Christmases ~
~ Be white ~
~ I'm dreaming of a white Christmas ~
~ Just like the ones I used to know ~
~ Where the treetops glisten ~
~ And children listen ~
- Who's that?
- Santa Claus.
- Welcome to the family, buster.
- Look at this. Relatives already.
Wallace and Davis are flat, you know.
We've got to get some loot.
We've got to take the show to Chicago.
No, no, no, no. I can't make it.
I'm gonna be very busy here.
Wait a minute, I'll join you.
Merry Christmas!
~ I'm dreaming ~
~ Of a white Christmas ~
~ With every Christmas card ~
~ I write ~
~ May your days be merry ~
~ And bright ~
~ And may all your ~
~ Christmases ~
~ Be white ~
Merry Christmas!
Would you get the door, Paul?
- Hi, Paul.
- Mr. Cole Porter, sir.
- Thanks for coming.
- Hello, Fred.
You're right on time. Everything's set.
Keyboard's dusted, and the piano's tuned.
That is a matter of opinion.
By the way, what was wrong with my place?
- You want Lilli to do the part, don't you?
- Very much.
Then psychologically, this is the proper setting.
Here? Where you lived together?
Cole, Lilli loved the apartment.
Besides, she'll be dying to see if I've changed anything.
Even if she does come, there's no guarantee she'll do the show.
Of course she'll do it.
It's a good script, a great score, fat part.
You're forgetting one thing.
Besides directing the show, you'll also be playing opposite her.
Most actresses would consider that an inducement.
Under the circumstances,
I should think things might be... a little strained.
Because we used to be man and wife?
Oh, Cole, that's archaic.
We're adults. We're civilized.
Oh, forgive me!
I'd forgotten.
Just one thing.
When Lilli gets here, start with a love song: "So in Love."
She's a pushover for a sentimental lyric.
Okay.
That's her ring.
She always leans on the bell.
Oh, hello, Paul. How's the bursitis?
Better, thank you, Mrs. Graham.
I mean...
Lilli Vanessi.
- Cole, how wonderful to see you again.
- Lilli, darling.
- Hello, Fred.
- Hello, Lilli.
- You look wonderful, Lilli.
- Thanks.
Peace of mind. It does wonders for you.
- You really ought to get rid of that spot.
- Never. It's a keepsake.
- You threw the inkwell, remember?
- I'm sure I had provocation.
- Well, did you like the script?
- Oh, I loved it.
Would you care to hear the score?
I'm dying to.
That's the reason I'm here.
- The only reason.
- Well, Fred... this is sort of a musical version of The Taming of the Shrew.
- Shakespeare, you know.
- Yes.
Let's see. Where should we start?
Why don't we, start with a love song?
- "So in Love"?
- Yes, it's great for Lilli.
It's a duet.
Well...
So it is.
Strange dear, but true, dear
When I'm close to you, dear
The stars fill the sky
So in love with you am I
Even without you
- My arms fold
- My arms fold about you
You know, darling, why
So in love with you am I
In love with the night, mysterious
The night when you first were there
In love with my joy, delirious
When I knew that you could care
So taunt me
And hurt me
Deceive me
Desert me
I'm yours till I die
So in love
So in love
So in love
So in love
So in love with you, my love
So in love
Am I
It's beautiful, Cole. Just beautiful.
- You sang it beautifully.
- Thank you.
But tell me something.
Do you really think
I could play the shrew?
You'd make a perfect shrew.
What I mean is... it takes an actress of real stature, like Judy Marlow...
- Constance Collier.
- Yes, Connie Collier, Lynn Fontanne...
- Great actresses.
- The costumes are great.
For your entrance, we've picked red velvet.
- She looks wonderful in red.
- I know she does...
There's another good song in the score for Lilli.
"I Hate Men."
Now, here's what we had in mind... for the wedding scene.
- Pretty, isn't it?
- It's certainly tempting.
- Then you'll do it?
- It's difficult to refuse.
I'll tell you What I'll do, I'll...
Well...
- Expecting someone?
- No.
Yes, though not just yet. I...
Another bell-leaner?
Hello. Hi, sweetie. Am I late?
- No. Early.
- Oh, that's great.
I just dashed over between shows at the Copa.
I hope you don't mind my legs.
Oh. On the contrary.
Oh, this is, Miss Lane... the young lady I was telling you about.
- Telling me about?
- You know, for the part?
- Part?
- Bianca.
- The younger sister.
- Younger?
- Only in the play.
- Oh, of course. Bianca.
Gee, it's a thrill meeting both of you.
I just love your songs, Mr. Porter.
And I'm just nuts about your ex-husband.
Aw, sweetie, we're out of ginger ale.
Anybody want a drink? What'll you have?
Nothing, thank you.
- Not right now.
- If nobody wants anything...
- ...how about doing the number?
- Number?
The big one I'm gonna do in your show, the "Too Darn Hot" number.
That must be the boys.
Hiya, fellas, come on in.
Didn't you tell her the number's out?
You told her she could play Bianca?
Fellas, get over by the piano, will you?
Okay. Mr. Porter, would you mind sitting here?
And, Fred, sweetie, you sit over there.
There, that's a square deal.
Okay. Go, boys, go.
Go, girl. Go.
It's too darn hot
It's too darn hot
I'd like to sup with my baby tonight
Refill the cup with my baby tonight
Crazy, man!
I'd like to sup with my baby tonight
Refill the cup with my baby tonight
But I ain't up to my baby tonight
'Cause it's too darn hot
- Yeah
- It's too darn hot
It's too darn hot
I'd like to coo with my baby tonight
And pitch the woo with my baby tonight
I'd like to coo with my baby tonight
And pitch the woo with my baby tonight
But, sister, you'll fight my baby tonight
'Cause it's too darn hot
It's too darn hot
According to the latest report
Every average girl you know
Much prefers her lovely doggie to court
When the temperature is low
But when the thermometer goes way up
And the weather is sizzling hot
Mr. Adam, for his madam, is not
'Cause it's too, too, too darn hot
It's too darn hot
Too darn hot
It's too darn hot
Cool!
Well, do it.
Real nervous.
Make me know it.
Go, girl. Go.
Too darn hot
It's too darn hot
It's too darn hot
Hot
Hot
Hot
Hot
Hot
- Hot
- MAN:
Hot
- Delightful.
- Gee, thanks, honey.
- How was I, Mr. Porter?
- Wonderful.
- Great!
- Gee, thanks, fellas. Take 10.
There's a slight problem. We've... taken the number out of the show.
Out of the show?
Oh, but you can't, Mr. Porter.
Sweetie promised it to me.
He promised faithfully.
- You crossed your heart!
- He always does.
- It didn't fit, honey.
- There's no place to put it, you see.
No.
Hey, wait a minute.
Now it's coming through to me.
She wants to do the number.
You gave it to her!
Why, that's absurd!
I wouldn't dream of displaying my legs.
What's the matter with your legs?
Are you knock-kneed?
- Why don't you ask Fred?
- Ladies, please...
On second thought, I don't really think
I ought to do the show.
It might interfere with my honeymoon.
Honeymoon?
Yes. I'm being married, you know.
Gee, congratulations!
Sorry, Cole. Goodbye, sweetie.
Oh, let her go. I can play Kate.
I can do the part.
"Friends, Romans, countrymen, lend me your ear."
Great idea! You'd be wonderful...
- ...in the part. Wouldn't she, Cole?
- Oh, now, look...
Fred, I... Oh, sure!
- I'll get the sketches.
- Here, read the script.
I'll start coaching you tomorrow.
You'll look wonderful in that red dress.
- You can't see my legs.
- We'll shorten it.
To here.
- Gee...
- Oh!
Now, just a minute!
What do you mean giving my part to someone else?
No, Lilli, you're right.
Nothing must stand in the way of your honeymoon.
Oh, no, you don't.
You're not talking me in and out of a hit show.
- My script, please.
- Sweetie gave that part to me!
Ladies, ladies.
So kiss me, Kate
Darling, devil, divine
For now she shall ever be mine
All mine
All right! All right, let's set the final curtain calls.
Back at 7 sharp, Sully.
First call: Petruchio...
Katherine and Bianca.
Miss Vanessi. Miss Lane.
Madame.
Could you manage to smile, Miss Vanessi?
All right. Let's have a nice curtsy, ladies.
We'll have to do better than that.
Watch Miss Lane.
- It's really very simple.
- It must be.
Just raise your skirt and...
Oh, I forgot! Your knees.
There's nothing wrong with my knees.
Thank you.
You may step out now, Miss Vanessi.
Second call:
Bianca and the three suitors.
Where the devil is that partner of yours? Lucentio! Lucentio!
Bill Calhoun!
- Bill Calhoun!
- I think he went to the chiropodist.
How am I doing, sweetie?
I mean, Mr. Graham.
Very nice.
Go to your dressing room and relax... until curtain time.
- Let your mind go blank.
- Whatever thou sayest.
One moment, Miss Vanessi,
I'd like to run over your bow again.
You were a bit awkward, you know.
You louse!
On-stage, everybody!
Bill? Where is he?
He's a prisoner of the Star Cab Company.
Shoot you for it. Double or nothing.
- How much is it this time?
- Two dollars, lady.
Oh, great!
Thanks, lady.
Honey, you're the cutest piggy bank in town.
Yeah.
- You're sure the donkey's housebroken?
- They guaranteed it.
Well, if anything happens, you're responsible.
Bill Calhoun, have you been gambling again?
- How much did you lose?
- Two G's.
Two thousand?
You haven't even got two dollars.
- Signed an IOU.
- An IOU?
- But not with my name.
- Whose name did you sign?
Your boyfriend's.
Frederick Graham.
Oh, Bill, no! This is our big chance.
Do you want to work nightclubs the rest of your life?
What's wrong with nightclubs?
Nothing, if you like smoke, noise and drunks.
You thought they were great till you met this Hamlet.
Mr. Graham is a gentleman and a scholar.
He's merely, culturing me.
- He's helping to further our careers.
- Whose? Yours or mine?
- Both!
- Oh, Lois, dear?
- Yes, sweetie?
- Has that hoofer showed up yet?
No, he hasn't, sweetie.
When he gets in, tell him I want to see him.
Oh, yes, I certainly will, sweetie.
Bill?
Bill Calhoun?
Where are you?
- Oh, Bill.
- I'm sorry, honey.
- Honest.
- Yeah. If you only meant it.
Why can't you behave?
Oh, why can't you behave?
After all the things you told me
And the promises that you gave
Oh, why can't you behave?
Oh, why can't you be good?
And do just as you should?
Won't you turn that new leaf over
So your baby can be your slave?
Oh, why
Can't you behave?
There's a farm I know
Near my old hometown
Where we two could go
And try settling down
There I'll care for you forever
'Cause you're all in the world I crave
But why can't you behave?
Calling me a louse! And on-stage!
Sorry.
I should have waited.
You louse!
It's customary for a gentleman to knock.
I'm not a gentleman.
I'm a louse. Remember?
Will you stop that infernal squeaking?
You know it gets on my nerves.
What do you want me to do?
Bite them off?
- Who is it?
- Suzanne. I've got your dinner tray.
- Take it away.
- What do you mean, take it away?
You know you can't eat before a performance.
It gives you indigestion.
It's my stomach, thank you.
Bring it in, Suzanne!
You'll not burp during my love scenes. Take it away.
Suzanne, don't you dare.
- Let's make up our mind, shall we?
- It's made up.
Out!
Well, pick it up.
It's probably that cowboy.
He is not a cowboy.
He's a cattle baron.
Cattle baron?
What's his crest?
A hamburger smothered with onions?
Hello?
Oh, hello, Tex, darling.
I was expecting you at the theater.
Oh, you're still at the stockyards.
What are they getting for New York cuts?
How dare you!
Tex, darling, I apologize. This...
$1.30 a pound?
Oh, but I wanted you to come to the theater tonight, darling.
Oh, the steer are restless.
Yes, love. I'm blowing you two kisses.
Bye, darling.
All right. I give up. What is it?
Headlight of a locomotive?
It's my engagement ring.
- Well, I hope you'll be very happy.
- Thank you.
Do you know what day this is, Fred?
- Our anniversary.
- What anniversary?
The first anniversary of our divorce.
And I have a little remembrance... for you.
Well, it's just what I wanted. A cork.
From our first bottle of champagne.
Our wedding breakfast?
In my apartment.
You mean that one room of yours... over the Armenian bakery?
You should complain, you didn't even have a room.
Why do you think I married you?
That was the season we played the Barter Theater in Virginia... and they gave you a ham.
Well, we lived on it all winter.
And I got a job reading tea leaves at the Automat. Remember?
And I demonstrated shaving soap at the five-and-dime.
That's how I spent my honeymoon... at the five-and-dime, watching you shave.
Were we married then?
Yes. Mother was staying with us.
How could I forget?
It was right after we closed in that...
Viennese operetta... laid in Switzerland, only the costumes were Dutch.
Oh, sure! Now I remember.
I was understudying the lead.
No, dear. We were both in the chorus.
You know, there was a waltz in that show. Something about...
Something about a bar...
Yeah!
You are ravishing.
You've made me the happiest of men.
Oh, Your Highness, you overwhelm me.
Wunderbar, wunderbar
There's our favorite star above
What a bright, shining star
Like our love, it's wunderbar
Gazing down on the Jungfrau
From our secret chalet for two
Let us drink, liebchen mein
In the moonlight benign
To the joy
Of our dream come true
Wunderbar, wunderbar
What a perfect night for love
Here am I, here you are
Why it's truly wunderbar
Wunderbar, wunderbar
We're alone and hand in glove
Not a cloud near or far
Why, it's more than wunderbar
Say you care, dear
For you madly
Say you long, dear
For your kiss
Do you swear, dear?
Darling, gladly
Life's divine, dear
And you're mine, dear
Oh!
Wunderbar, wunderbar
There's our favorite star above
What a bright, shining star
Like our love, it's wunderbar
Wunderbar, wunderbar
What a perfect night for love
Here am I, here you are
Why it's truly wunderbar
Wunderbar, wunderbar
There's our favorite star above
What a bright, shining star
Like our love
It's wunderbar
It was a good number, wasn't it?
I...
I always liked it.
What happened to us, Fred?
I... I don't know.
Whose fault was it?
Well, it could have been your disposition.
It might have been your ego.
Fifteen minutes.
We'd... We'd better get dressed.
I don't like my face.
- Neither do I.
- Who are you?
- Hey, fine-looking fellow.
- Clean-cut.
What are you doing backstage?
- What a figure!
- What a profile.
Gentlemen, I'm deeply touched by your admiration, but...
- What diction!
- Very elocutionary.
And he does not spit when he talks.
Gentlemen, this is all very flattering, but I receive the public...
- ...after the performance, not before.
- Oh, what grace!
If I had to do something to him,
I'd cry like a baby.
Come back after the performance.
I'll be very happy to present you with my autograph then.
We already got your autograph.
That's why we're here.
Little matter of an IOU. Here it is.
Two G's.
Mr. Hogan, that's our employer...
- ...he regards this as a debt of honor.
- Yeah.
- How's about it, Mr. Graham?
- You're crazy.
Here. Let me see that.
Why, that's not even my signature.
- That's what they all say.
- Yeah.
I'm surprised at you.
You just signed this this afternoon after a game over to the hotel.
We wasn't there. Of course, we got Mr. Hogan's word for it.
You're really crazy. I've been in this theater since 8 this morning.
- Aw, he forgot.
- Yeah. Well, that's human beings for you.
Once a man signs an IOU, everything goes black.
Yeah, the doctors call it, magnesia.
We cure it.
Gentlemen, would you mind leaving?
Jeez, ain't he virile?
And now we'd like to express our best wishes for a magnificent opening... and success of the brilliant talent that you so richly deserve.
- I copied that out of Western Union.
- Heartiest felicitations.
- I made that up myself.
- Mr. Graham, try and jostle your memory.
Yeah. We'll be back, buddy.
Come on. Not now. Not now.
How many times I gotta tell you?
I'll let you know when.
- They're bringing flowers.
- The funeral ain't till tomorrow.
All right. Come on, will you?
What's the matter with you?
- Yes?
- Good evening, Suzanne.
From the master.
Oh.
- Darling.
- LILLI:
Here are some flowers.
From him.
You see, Suzanne? He didn't forget.
Violets and roses. My wedding bouquet.
You need some food.
I better get back your dinner tray.
No, Suzanne.
I've made up my mind.
I won't touch a thing.
If he wants me to go hungry,
I'll go hungry.
When you can eat, eat.
So taunt me and hurt me
Deceive me, desert me
I'm yours till I die
So in love
So in love
So in love with you
My love
Am I
Oh.
- Do you think it's creeping back?
- No, sir.
We're keeping it at bay, sir.
Thank you.
- Did you deliver the flowers?
- Oh, yes, sir.
- Did you put the note in?
- Oh, yes, sir.
Good. You took them upstairs to Miss Lane personally, of course?
Upstairs, sir?
I thought they were for...
Miss Vanessi? Oh, you driveling idiot!
- Do you know what you've done?
- Yes, sir. I've loused you up, sir.
- Don't use that word.
- Yes, sir. No, sir.
Quite, sir.
- Oh, Fred.
- Now, now, now, Lilli.
- I can explain everything.
- So thoughtful, darling.
- You mean, you didn't read the card?
- Card? Was there a card? I didn't see one.
Now, Lilli, you know I'm allergic to roses. Give me hay...
On-stage and good luck.
- Okay. Let's go.
- Oh, Fred.
- I can't. I just can't.
- Oh, no!
My cheeks are burning and my hands are freezing...
- ...and my tummy...
- You ate! Lilli, you had something to eat!
- No, I didn't. Really...
- You're not gonna whoops?
- Yes, I...
- No, no. You can't. I won't let you.
Oh, Mademoiselle Lilli, I found the card that came with the flowers.
- Oh, thank you, Suzanne.
- No, no. There isn't time.
Look, I'll tell you what I wrote:
"To Lilli, the only woman I've ever loved... the only artist I've ever worshiped."
Now, let me have the card, and let's go.
- Did you really mean that, Fred?
- Oh, darling, with all my heart.
Then that's where it's going.
Right next to mine.
I'm not nervous now and I'm not going to whoops.
And I'll never call you a louse in public again. Never.
You will, my sweet. You will.
A troupe of strolling players are we
Shakespearean portrayers are we
We're just a simple band
Who roams about the land
Dispensing fol-de-rol frivolity
We're folk who give distraction are we
No theater guild attraction are we
We're just a crazy group
That never ceases to troop
Around the map of little Italy
We open in Venice
We next play Verona
Then on to Cremona
Got some laughs in Cremona.
Our next stop is Parma
That stingy, dingy menace
Then Mantua, then Padua
Then we open again, where?
We open in Venice
We next play Verona
Then on to Cremona
Lots of quail in Cremona.
Our next stop is Parma
That heartless, heartless menace
Then Mantua, then Padua
Then we open again, where?
In Venice!
This is the tale of Baptist-a Minola.
A merchant of old Padua who is firmly resolved not to bestow... his younger daughter Bianca... till he canst find a husband for the elder, Katherine.
A shrew!
Oh, if I could only find a man... who would thoroughly woo her, wed her and bed her... and rid my house of her!
The fair Bianca has three stalwart suitors:
Gremio, Hortensio and Lucentio... who wouldst fain take the maid to wife.
- I burn.
- I pine.
I perish.
Till I alone canst wed the fair Bianca.
Sweet Bianca.
She sings as sweetly as a nightingale.
She looks as clean and fresh... as morning roses newly washed with dew.
To my father's pleasure, humbly I subscribe.
My books of music shall be my only company... on them to look and practice by myself.
Me.
A pity Katherine were not of a gentler, milder mold.
But she is shrewd and forward beyond all measure.
An irksome, brawling scold!
Bianca is my father's treasure.
She must have a husband and for love of her...
I must dance barefoot on her wedding day.
Katherine, for shame.
Think on thy poor father.
Oh, was ever father thus grieved as I?
His grief will soon be put to rout.
A happy wind blows me, Petruchio, to Padua from old Verona... for I am born to tame this Kate.
Kate the Cursed.
A title, for a maid, of all titles the worst!
Father!
- Poor child!
- She weeps!
- What is it, sweet Bianca?
- I'm a maid who wouldst marry.
- Any Tom?
- Dick?
- Or Harry?
- Any Harry, Tom or Dick!
I've made a haul in all the leading rackets
From which rip-roaring rich
I happen to be
And if thou wouldst attain the upper brackets
Marry me, marry me, marry me
My purse has yet to know a silver lining
Still lifeless is my wifeless family tree
But if for love unending thou art pining
Marry me, marry me, marry me
I come to thee a thoroughbred patrician
Still spraying my decaying family tree
To give a social lift to thy position
Marry me, marry me, marry me
Marry me
Marry me
Marry me
Marry me
Marry me
Marry me
Marry me
I'm a maid who would marry
And will take with no qualm
Any Tom, Dick or Harry
Any Harry, Dick or Tom
I'm a maid mad to marry
And will take double-quick
Any Tom, Dick or Harry
Any Tom, Harry or Dick
I'm the man thou shouldst marry
- Howdy, Pop
- Howdy, Mom
- I'm the man thou shouldst marry
- Art thou Harry, Dick or Tom?
I'm the man thou shouldst marry
- Howdy, pal
- Howdy, chick
Art thou Tom, Dick or Harry?
Call me Tom, Harry or Dick
- I'm a maid who would marry
- Maid who would marry
- And would no longer tarry
- No longer tarry
- I'm a maid who would marry
- Who would marry
- May my hopes not miscarry
- Hopes not miscarry
- I'm a maid mad to marry
- Mad to marry
And will take double-quick
Any Tom, Dick or Harry
Any Tom, Harry or Dick
Any Tom, Dick or Harry
Any Tom, Harry or Dick
Bianca! Bianca!
- Petruchio!
- Well, Lucentio!
What happy wind blows you to Padua from old Verona?
Such wind as scatters young men... through the world to seek their fortunes.
- And you?
- I came to study.
I am glad that you thus combine your resolve... to suck the sweets of sweet philosophy... the mathematics and the botany.
Fall to them as your stomach serves.
No profit grows where is no pleasure taken.
In brief, sir, study.
As for me...
I've come to wive it wealthily in Padua
If wealthily, then happily in Padua
If my wife has a bag of gold
Do I care if the bag be old?
I've come to wive it wealthily in Padua
He's come to wive it wealthily
In Padua
I've heard you mutter
"Zounds, a loathsome lad you are"
I shall not be disturbed one bit
If she be but a quarter-wit
If she only can talk of clothes
While she powders her doggone nose
I've come to wive it wealthily in Padua
He's come to wive it wealthily
In Padua
I've heard you say
"Gadzooks, completely mad you are"
Wouldn't give me the slightest shock
If her knees now and then should knock
If her eyes were a wee bit crossed
Were she wearing the hair she'd lost
Still the damsel I'll make my dame
In a brawl they are all the same
I've come to wive it wealthily in Padua
He's come to wive it wealthily
In Padua
I heard you say
"Good gad, but what a cad you are"
Do I mind if she fret and fuss?
If she fume like Vesuvius?
If she roar like a winter breeze
On the rough Adriatic seas?
If she scream like a teething brat?
If she scratch like a tiger cat?
If she fight like a raging boar?
I have oft met a boar before
I've come to wive it wealthily in Padua
With a hunny, nunny, nunny
And a hey, hey, hey
Not to mention money, money
For a rainy day
I've come to wive it wealthily in Padua
This gentleman is happily arrived.
Petruchio is too much my friend.
I cannot wish him a shrewd, ill-tempered wife.
- But she is rich.
- And young and beauteous.
But shrewd, and forward so beyond all measure... that were my state far poorer than it is...
- ...I would not wed her for a mine of gold.
- Peace, Lucentio.
Thou knowest not gold's effect.
And therefore, if thou know one rich enough to be Petruchio's wife... tell me her father's name, and 'tis enough.
Her father is Baptista Minola.
- Her name, Katherine.
- Elder sister of the fair Bianca.
Bianca!
That is she.
An irksome, brawling scold.
Think you a little din can daunt mine ears?
Have I not in my time heard great lions roar?
Have I not heard great ordnance in the field... and heaven's artillery thunder in the skies?
- Then you will woo this wildcat?
- Done.
Go you to old Baptista and say,
"I have a husband for Katherine."
Let's quaff carouses to this gentleman.
Sister! Sister! Wrong me not!
Content thee in my discontent!
Thou hilding of a devilish spirit... why dost thou wrong her that did ne'er wrong thee?
Her silence flouts me and I'll be revenged!
Oh, was ever father thus grieved as I?
- A word with you, kind sir.
- Importune me no further... for how deeply I am resolved you know.
Whisper louder.
Oh, that is news.
Good news! Come in, Lucentio.
Lucentio, thou meacock wretch!
I hate men
I can't abide them, even now and then
Than ever marry one of them
I'd rest a maiden rather
For husbands are a boring lot
And only give you bother
Of course I'm awfully glad
That mother deigned to marry father
But I hate men
Of all the types I've ever met
Within our democracy
I hate the most the athlete
With his manner bold and brassy
He may have hair upon his chest
But, sister, so has Lassie
Oh, I hate men
I hate men
They should be kept like piggies in a pen
Don't wear a traveling salesman
Though a tempting Tom he may be
For on your wedding night
He may be off to far Araby
While he's away in Mandalay
'Tis thee who'll have the baby
Oh, I hate men
If thou should'st wed a businessman
Be wary, oh, be wary
He'll tell you he's detained in town
On business necessary
His business is the business
With his pretty secretary
Oh, I hate men
I hate men
Though roosters they
I will not play the hen
If you espouse an older man
Through girlish optimism
He'll always stay at home at night
And make no criticism
Though you may call it love
The doctors call it rheumatism
Oh, I hate men
From all I've read alone in bed
From A to Zed about them
Since love is blind, then from the mind
All womankind should rout them
But, ladies, you must answer too
What would we do without them?
Still I hate men
Katherine! Katherine! Wonder of wonders!
A gentleman from Verona desires you in marriage.
Then he'd best go back there!
Greetings, good sir.
I hear you have a daughter called Katherine, fair and virtuous.
I have a daughter, sir, called Katherine.
I am a gentleman from Verona, sir... that, hearing of her beauty and her wit... her affability and bashful modesty... her wondrous qualities and mild behavior...
Mild behavior... am bold to make myself a forward guest within your house... to make mine eye the witness of that report which I so oft have heard.
I'm afraid my daughter Katherine is not for your turn.
The more my grief.
- I see you do not mean to part with her.
- Mistake me not.
- Or else you like not of my company.
- You're more than welcome.
Well, then. What dowry shall I have with her to wife?
After my death...
- ...one half of my lands.
- The fertile part.
- So be it.
- And in possession?
- Twenty thousand crowns.
- Thirty.
- Thirty!
- Father!
Let specialities be therefore drawn between us... that, covenants may be kept on either hand.
Go. Get thee to a notary.
Aye, when that special thing... is well-obtained, that is my love... for that is all in all.
Of all the men alive,
I never yet beheld that special face... which I could fancy more than any other.
Were thine that special face
The face which fills my dreaming
Were thine the rhythmed grace
Were thine the form
So lithe and slender
Were thine the arms
So warm, so tender
Were thine the kiss
Divine
Were thine the love
For me
The love which fills my dreaming
When all these charms are thine
Then you'll be mine
All mine
Were thine the love for me
The love which fills
My dreaming
When all these charms are thine
Then you'll be mine
All
Mine
"To my darling, 'Let my lovely... "'
Lois?
It was not to her liking.
But that is nothing.
For I tell you, Father, I am as peremptory as she proud-minded... and where two raging fires meet together... they do consume the thing that feeds their fury.
I will attend her here and woo her with some spirit when she comes.
If she bids me pack,
I'll give her thanks.
I bid thee pack!
What's the matter, Fred?
Were thine that special face. Ha!
What have we here?
Some flowers from my daughter.
Talk. Talk.
Speak, Petruchio, speak.
Speak, Petruchio, though thy message is not for me.
You louse!
Good morrow, Ka... Achoo!
We're on-stage now, Lilli!
Good morrow,
Kate, for that's your name...
- ...I hear.
- Well have you heard... but somewhat hard of hearing.
They call me Katherine that do speak of me.
You lie, in faith, for you are called Plain Kate... and Bonny Kate and sometimes Kate the Cursed.
But Kate, the prettiest Kate in Christendom.
Hearing thy mildness praised in every town...
Thy virtue spoke of and thy beauty sounded... myself am moved to woo thee for my wife. Come. Sit on me.
Asses are made to bear and so are you.
Women are made to bear and so are you.
No such jade as bear you with me, you mean.
Grr! Come, come.
You wasp! I' faith, you are too angry.
If I be too waspish, best beware my sting.
My remedy, then, is to pluck it out.
Aye, if the fool could find it where it lies.
Who knows not where a wasp does wear his sting? In his tail.
I swear I'll cuff you if you strike again!
Keep on acting the way you're doing, Miss Vanessi... and I'll give you the paddling of your life, and on-stage.
- You wouldn't dare!
- No?
If you strike me, you're no gentleman.
What is your crest, a coxcomb?
A combless cock so Kate will be my hen.
Come, give me thy hands.
Come! And will you, nill you,
I will marry you.
For by this light whereby I see thy beauty... thy beauty that doth make me like thee well... thou must be married to no man but me.
For I am he am born to tame you, Kate... and bring you from a wild Kate... to a Kate conformable as other household Kates.
Father! You devil.
Petruchio, how speed you with my daughter?
How but well? It were impossible
I should speed amiss.
We have 'greed so well together that upon Sunday is the wedding day.
May God give you joy. 'Tis a match!
Amen, say we!
Father and wife and gentlemen, adieu.
I will into Venice...
I'm warning you, Lilli.
...to buy apparel against the wedding day.
Sunday comes apace... and we will have rings and things in fine array.
And kiss me, Kate.
All right, Miss Vanessi.
You asked for it and you're going to get it.
Fred, what are you doing?
For now she shall ever be mine
Stop it! Fred, stop it!
Stop it!
Suzanne! Suzanne, get me an ice pack, quick.
That's the last time you'll ever lay hands on me, Frederick Graham.
You asked for it.
May I remind you, Miss Vanessi... the name of this piece is The Taming of the Shrew... not He Who Gets Slapped.
Sending my wedding bouquet to that little tramp!
That's no excuse for ad-libbing. None.
"Let my lovely Lois shine through
Bianca tonight... and there'll be a new star in the heavens."
- Thou jerk!
- All right. All right.
- I sent the child some flowers.
- Oh.
I sent a card with the flowers.
May I remind you that I'm free, male and 31?
- Thirty-one?
- All right. I'm 32.
What's my age got to do with it?
They were full, rich years and I'm proud of them.
Show me an actor who's done what
I've done. My Peer Gynt in London.
- They threw crumpets at you.
- My Hamlet in Dublin.
You got paid in potatoes. Mashed.
Money, money.
That's all you ever think of.
The trouble with you, Miss Vanessi, is you have no soul.
What's the idea of jabbing the ribs out there?
- It's in the script.
- The devil it is.
I couldn't teach you manners as a wife, but by heavens...
- ...I'll teach you manners as an actress.
- Not in this production, you won't.
What did you say?
You heard me.
And here's a little something that isn't in the script.
What are you trying to do, kill me?
Ralph? Ralph?
Ralph!
There's a law against attempted murder.
Good heavens, I'm bleeding!
- Yes, Mr. Graham?
- Quick, get me some alcohol.
How do you want it?
Oh, my rib. I think she's broken a rib.
- How can you tell if you have a broken rib?
- X-raying.
Well, don't just stand there, look in the prop room.
Am I bleeding heavily?
I don't see any blood.
Here. What do you call that?
- Suntan number two.
- What?
Oh.
Well, skin's bruised, though, isn't it?
I don't see anything.
Discolored?
- Nope. Not a thing.
- What?
That's all I need.
A blind stage manager.
All right, kids, let's get with it.
We got a quick change. Come on.
Bill, you've simply got to tell Mr. Graham.
Signing somebody else's name is perjury.
Honey, you don't understand.
Hogan's boys play rough.
I could wind up with a broken leg.
At least I'd know where you were at nights.
Bill Calhoun, you go in there and tell Fred right now... or you can find yourself another piggy bank.
Suzanne! Suzanne!
Where's that ice bag?
Hello, Tex?
Tex, Lilli.
Tex, I'll marry you tonight.
Send a car for me.
No, better still, send an ambulance.
You don't know what that beast has done to me. I can't sit down.
I said, I can't sit down!
That is not where it hurts.
I'm through with the theater.
I want to go where no one will ever find me.
I'll go to Texas.
Well, I'm quitting right now.
Mademoiselle Lilli, your ex-husband just dropped in.
Suzanne, pack my things.
You don't think that you can walk out of a show in the middle of a performance?
- Oh, no?
- I'll have you up on charges at Equity.
I'll be glad, glad to appear before Equity.
And I'll bring photographs of what you've done to me. In Technicolor!
And I'll bring my x-rays!
- Tex says you ought to be lynched.
- Oh...
Suzanne, unzip me.
Lilli, you don't really mean that you would?
- Oh, you would?
- You bet I would!
You'll never play the theater again.
Oh, no? Well, I hate the theater... and I hate actors... and most of all, I hate you!
Get out! Get out!
- I thought this was your dressing room.
- Ralph! Ralph!
There's something I want to tell you.
Well, what is it? Ralph!
This afternoon, when I went to the chiropodist, I didn't.
- He's not only blind, he's deaf.
- It seems I was in a little game... down at the hotel.
- I lost some money.
- Yes?
- Get the understudy ready.
- For you?
No, no! Lilli. She refuses to go on.
Trouble was, I was short, so I signed an IOU.
- Okay. I'll break the news to Jeanie.
- It seems I signed your name.
Yeah, good. Fine.
- Tell her to take a bromo.
- Fine?
You mean you don't care?
- Why, gee, Mr. Graham, thanks!
- All right.
If I'd known you were such a great guy,
I wouldn't have...
Oh, no, you don't.
If she's leaving... she's leaving on an empty stomach.
- Thanks, Mr. Graham.
- All right.
You signed my name?
Why, you no-good, little...
Oh, no.
Hey! For us? Wow.
You shouldn't have done it.
You shouldn't have done it.
Hey, what...
- ...a performance.
- What unction, buddy.
- You think the audience is digging it?
- They're a bunch of lowbrows.
- Now, look here...
- We're just here to see... if you jostled your memory yet.
- Coleslaw.
- Hey. Psst.
Oh, yeah. Mr. Graham, listen.
We gotta know when you're gonna pay your debt of honor... to one of America's most respected... floating crap games.
Look, I told you.
I never signed anything.
What's more, I can prove it.
It was...
Well, as a matter of fact...
I did sign that IOU.
- He remembers!
- It all comes back to him.
The trouble is, I haven't got the money.
I would have at the end of the week...
- ...if the show could only run.
- It'll run.
It's entertaining, vivacious... and calculated to please the most discriminating theatergoer.
- You can quote me. Chicken?
- Yeah. Thanks.
Sorry. Seniority, you know.
You don't understand.
Miss Vanessi, my costar, is quitting.
- Quitting?
- As of right now.
Temperament. Didn't like the way
I played a little scene.
She's dressing to leave the theater.
Well, I guess all I can do is return... whatever money there is in the box office, that's all.
Maybe we should talk to her.
Fred, sweetie, I simply had to come...
Oh, excuse me.
Don't mind us. Go right ahead.
Couple old friends of the family.
On Lilli's side.
I just wanted to say thank you for being so wonderful about Bill.
Oh. Well, look, honey, forget about it.
It was nothing.
Nothing? Why, it was absolutely noble of you.
After all, he did sign your...
And to be so understanding... after doing such a horrible thing like signing your...
I always knew you were a fine person... but it took really a great man to forgive another man... for signing his...
Fred, I...
- Well!
- Stop, Lilli!
Bill! Oh, Bill, wait, honey! Wait!
You don't understand.
I was just saying thank you.
How do you suppose she says, "You're welcome"?
Hey, is that the little lady who's gonna take a powder? We gotta dissuade her.
- Oh, Lilli.
- You're wasting your breath. I'm leaving.
Some very ardent admirers of yours.
Come in, gentlemen.
- How do you do?
- What a trouper.
- What a personality. Allow me.
- Thank you.
Is it true you're contemplating quitting this high-type entertainment?
I am. Careful.
Miss Vanessi, the show must go on.
Yeah. There's no business like show business.
We got a financial interest in the success of this opus, Miss Vanessi.
Therefore, we would like you to finish the show till the end of the week... when, Mr. Graham can pay off his debt of honor.
Honor? Ha. He doesn't even know the meaning of the word.
Oh.
- Beautiful, isn't it?
- Yeah.
Her costume for the wedding scene.
We'd like to see you model this.
I'm sorry. My understudy will be wear...
We think it would look better on you.
Especially with your coloring.
Are you threatening me?
No, I'm just transferring the weight from this side over to this side.
Yeah, the bullets get kind of heavy.
Shall we just step behind the screen and try it on?
- Fred?
- We'd be glad to help you zip it up, baby.
Fred? Fred, don't just stand there.
Do something, do something!
Gentlemen, this is an outrage.
Ooh!
Come, my bonny Kate.
I said come!
Fred, look.
I see puzzlement upon thy good faces.
Who are these two angelic sprites who bear my lady's train?
They are distant relatives from Pisa.
- What's a sprite?
- Some kind of fairy.
Oh, yeah.
Obey the bride, you that attend her.
Go to the feast and revel and domineer.
Leave us not lose our heads, buddy.
Carouse full-measure.
Be mad, be merry, or go hang yourselves.
But for my bonny Kate...
She must with me.
I will be master of what is mine own.
She is my goods, my chattels, my horse, my ox... my anything.
Touch her, whoever dares. I'll bring mine action on the proudest he... that dares to stop my way in Padua.
Bring forth my noble steed.
Come, Kate, most patient, sweet and virtuous of wives.
Thou must not soil thy dainty feet.
Thou shall ride and I will walk beside thee.
You louse! You know I can't sit down.
She resists! Then I shall cart her to the nuptial chamber... like a sack of flour... going to the mill.
Gentlemen, forward.
Bye. Goodbye!
I came and wived it wealthily in Padua
Hey, look! Come here. Hey!
Yes, thankfully and happily in Padua
Give me a hand.
My wife has a bag of gold
And the bag isn't very old
You...!
I came and wived it wealthily in Padua
Watch it, lady!
In Padua
- Come on, get up. Lady!
- In Padua
Come on. Come on, get up.
Get back on. That's it. There.
In Padua
What? No men at my door... to hold my stirrup or to take my horse?
Where be these knaves?
- Where is Nathaniel?
- Here, sir.
- Gregory!
- Here, sir.
You loggerheaded and unpolished grooms.
What, no attendance?
No regard?
No duty?
Kind strangers, thou angels in disguise... who didst help me in my hour of need.
It were well you rested from your travels... in yon chamber.
Get ye hence. Go to. Go to.
To flee or not to flee, that is the question.
We wouldst not thinkst of leaving thou.
Yeah. Going away is such sweet sorrow.
Food, food, food!
Sit down, Kate.
Thou knowest full well that I cannot.
Well, then, stand and be merry.
Some water here.
Will you give thanks, sweet Kate, or else shall I?
- What's this? Mutton?
- Aye.
- Who brought it?
- I.
'Tis burnt.
And so is all the meat.
What dogs are these?
Where is the rascal cook?
How durst you villains bring it from the dresser... and serve it thus to me that love it not?
Here, take it away, trencher, cups and all!
Gin.
I pray you, husband, be not so disquiet.
The meat was well, if you were so contented.
I tell thee, Kate,
'twas burnt and dried away... and I expressly am forbid to touch it... for it engenders choler, planteth anger... and better it were that both of us did fast.
Since of ourselves, ourselves are choleric... then feed it with such over-roasted flesh.
Did you marry me to famish me?
Tomorrow shall we eat, my honey love... when we return unto thy father's house.
Oh, no, you don't!
Come. I will bring thee to thy bridal chamber.
- You louse!
- Attend thy mistress.
Thus have I politically begun my reign... and 'tis my hope to end it successfully.
My falcon now is sharp and passing empty... and till she stoop, she must not be full-gorged.
She eat no meat today, nor none shall eat.
Last night, she slept not, nor tonight she shall not.
As with the meat, some undeserved fault...
I'll find about the making of the bed... and here I'll fling the pillow, there the bolster... this way the coverlet and another way the sheets. Aye!
And amid this hurly, I intend... that all is done in reverent care of her.
This is a way to kill a wife with kindness.
And thus I'll curb her mad and headstrong humor.
He that knows better how to tame a shrew, now let him speak.
'Tis charity to show.
Kate?
My bonny Kate.
My winsome Kate!
I' faith, the woman shot her bolt.
She has performed while I did act the dolt.
When at first aware of masculinity
I began to finger feminine curls
I became the toast of my vicinity
For I always had a multitude of girls
But now that a married man, at last, am I
How aware of my dear, departed past am I
Where is the life that late I led?
Where is it now?
Totally dead
Where is the fun I used to find?
Where has it gone?
Gone with the wind
A married life is just a pain
And raising an heir could never compare
With raising a bit of Cain
So I repeat what first I said
Where is the life that late I...?
In dear Milano
Where are you, Momo?
Still selling those pictures
Of the Scriptures in the Duomo
And Carolina
Where are you, Lina?
Still peddling your pizza
In the streets o' Taormina
And in Firenze
Where are you, Alice?
Still there in your pretty, itty-bitty Pitti Palace
And sweet Lucretia, so young and gay
What scandalous doings
In the ruins of Pompeii
Where is the life that late I led?
Where is it now?
Totally dead
Where is the fun I used to find?
Where has it gone?
Gone with the wind
The marriage game is quite all right
Yes, during the day it's easy to play
But, oh, what a bore at night
So I repeat what first I said
Where is the life that late I...?
Where is Rebecca?
My Becki-weckio
Could still she be cruising
That amusing Ponte Vecchio?
Where is Fedora
The wild virago?
It's lucky I missed her gangster sister
From Chicago
Where is Venetia
Who loved to chat so?
Could still she be drinking
In her stinking pink palazzo?
And lovely Lisa
Where are you, Lisa?
You gave a new meaning
To the leaning tower of Pisa
Where is the life that late I led?
Where is it now?
Totally dead
Where is the fun I used to find?
Where has it gone?
Gone with the wind
I've oft been told of nuptial bliss
But what do you do a quarter-to-two
With only a shrew to kiss?
So I repeat what first I said
Where is the life that late
I led?
There's a madman outside with an ambulance. Insists on seeing you.
Sorry. So does my audience.
Where's my little girl? Where's Lilli?
Please.
There's a show on.
He'll be right with you.
Keep an eye on her.
You ought to be tarred and feathered!
- Get Jeanie ready.
- Where I come from...
- ...a man don't strike a woman.
- She hit me first.
That's a lie. Why, that little girl wouldn't hurt a fly.
If you'd care to step over here, you'll see the little girl in action.
...mother deigned to marry father
- What's she doing on that loading chute?
- Winding up.
I hate men
Of all the types I've ever...
But I don't get it. How come...?
How come she asked me to bring an ambulance?
My dear Tex... you don't understand the artistic temperament.
You've been spending too much time with your cows.
She may even say to you tonight:
"Darling, I'm playing the show under duress. Call the FBI."
- A very efficient organization.
- Yeah. We know them personally.
Why would she want the FBI?
Why would she want an ambulance?
All right, drop Scene 3.
Jimmy. Three.
Come on, kids, let's go.
You're on. Come on.
Oh, Tex, thank heavens you're here.
- Quick, call the FBI.
- The FBI?
Now, look, honey. I don't mind bringing an ambulance and a stretcher...
- ...but Mr. Hoover's a pretty busy man.
- But you don't understand!
- These thugs are threatening me!
- What thugs?
These two. They're making me play at the point of a gun.
I thought they were actors.
They're gangsters, I tell you.
They won't let me leave the theater.
Are you referring to two of the most promising... graduates of the Abbey Players?
Not to mention Civic Repertory, the Theater Guild and others.
And he's in cahoots with them!
- They sure look like actors.
- They're not actors, I tell you.
Lilli, you ought to be ashamed.
Dragging this poor boy away from the stockyards just for a whim!
Whim? Whim?!
- I'll show him my bruises!
- You can't. You're not married yet.
We will be, as soon as we get back to Texas. Everything is all set.
- Our plane is ready to go.
- Tex, angel, I keep telling you...
- ...I cannot get out of the theater!
- Why not?
Those two apes won't let me.
Of course she can leave the theater.
Can't she, boys?
Well, yeah, she wouldst, but she can'tst.
All right. Go ahead, if that's what you want.
After all, what's in the theater to hold you?
It's all so tawdry, the dreary business of creating a part.
Meaningless applause... silly pictures in the papers.
Those boring parties... and the ridiculous people who stare and whisper:
- "There goes Lilli Vanessi."
- I never want to see the theater again... or you again!
You're right, Lilli, you're absolutely right.
Get out while you still have a chance for happiness.
Real happiness with this fine boy here.
- Thanks, friend.
- You're welcome, partner.
I must say, I envy you, Lilli.
Me?
The life that you lead with Tex...
So different from the one you had with me.
I'll see to that.
- No quarrels. No bickering.
- I want peace.
And you shall have it.
Peace, quiet, solitude.
Oh, we've got plenty of that.
Why, you can ride for nigh on to two weeks and see nary a soul.
Why, just think.
- You can spend all day in the saddle.
- Oh, that's right.
I'm mad about horses.
And eventually you'll stop falling off.
Oh, she'll love the roundup.
Ho-ho. And the cattle branding.
Why, I can see it now:
Up at 5 and in the saddle.
The dew is on the sage.
A brisk 50-mile canter to the branding corrals.
That's right.
Steer roped and waiting.
Yeah.
- Branding irons are sizzling.
- Yeah.
You take one from the fire... and you hand it to the little woman.
Ye... I do?
She grabs the struggling critter.
She grits her teeth... and the steam hisses.
The red-hot metal comes closer and closer.
She grinds it into their shrinking hides.
And the smell.
The smell of burning flesh fills the air!
I can't stand it.
I think he swooned.
Now, get out of here.
Take your branding irons with you.
Go on, get out, all of you.
Go on.
- Ralph, where's Jean?
- Coming up!
Just put her down very gently, sir.
You'll be all right, madam.
There's been a misunderstanding.
Here's something for your trouble.
Thank you very much, sir.
Tex!
- Tex Call-away.
- Howdy, ma'am. I...
- imagine meeting you here.
- Well, I...
Oh, well, don't you remember me, sweetie?
No, I...
At the Shamrock in Houston.
I got something in my eye... and you took me all the way to El Paso to take it out.
I'm sorry, but I'm afraid you made a mistake.
I still have that side of beef you gave me.
I think of you every time
I look in the freezer.
I'm sorry, but you must have the wrong man.
Wrong man, my foot.
I never forget a wealthy face.
- Trying to annex Texas?
- Excuse me.
Oh, Bill, no!
Bill, wait a minute. Wait.
Bill, wait a minute!
I can explain! Come back!
Oh, Bill, how could you?
What a terrible thing to say... when a girl is good-hearted and normal... and tries to get along with her fellow man.
Why can't you behave?
Oh, why can't you behave?
Tell me how can you be jealous
When you know, baby, I'm your slave?
I'm just mad for you and I'll always be
But naturally
When a custom-tailored vet
Asks me out for something wet
When the vet begins to pet
I shout, "Hooray!"
But I'm always true to you, darling
In my fashion
Yes, I'm always true to you, darling
In my way
There's a lush from Baltimore
Who is rich, but such a bore
When the bore falls on the floor
I let him lay
But I'm always true to you, darling
In my fashion
Yes, I'm always true to you, darling
In my way
What about that Mister Thorn
Calls you up from night till morn?
Mister Thorn once cornered corn
And that ain't hay
But I'm always true to you, darling
In my fashion
Yes, I'm always true to you, darling
In my way
Saw you out with Mister Fritz
You were dining at the Ritz
Mister Fritz invented Schlitz
And Schlitz must pay
But I'm always true to you, darling
In my fashion
Yes, I'm always true to you, darling
In my way
I could never curl my lip
At a dazzling diamond clip
- Suppose the clip means let her rip
- I'd not say, "Nay"
Yeah, I know
Oh, you're always true to me, darling
In your fashion
Yes, I'm always true to you, darling
In my way
Mr. Harris Plutocratz
Wants to give your cheek a pat
If the Harris pat means a Paris hat, baby
Ooh-la-la
Mais je suis toujours petit, darling
In my fashion
J'ai, je suis toujours petit, darling
In my way
- Mr. Gable
- You mean Clark?
Wants me on his boat to park
- If the Gable boat means a sable coat
- I know, anchors away
But I'm always true to you, darling
In my fashion
Yes, I'm always true to you, darling
In my way
All right, kids, you better get ready.
Bill! Bill, Sweetie!
Say, pop. Will you tell Miss Vanessi...
- ...I'll wait for her on the buckboard?
- Yes.
- Thank you.
- Oh, no, thanks.
Yeah. Hello, Gumpy.
Yeah, I would like to converse with Mr. Hogan.
He's in conference? With who?
Mugsy Higgins?
You mean the big boss from the South Side?
What are they talking about?
- The North Side.
- He's probably trying to muscle in.
- Mr. Hogan wouldn't stand for it.
- No.
Well, look, it's very important
I should speak to Mr. Hogan.
He's tied up?
To a chair?
Well, can you give him a message?
- He already got one.
- Poor Mr. Hogan.
So long, Mr. Graham.
I guess this is the end... of our very, very pleasant association.
Yeah. Like I said before, Mr. Graham... going away is such sweet sorrow.
- What do you mean?
- The debt is canceled.
And so is Mr. Hogan.
His unidentified remains will be found floating in the river tomorrow.
Except for the fact he'll be slightly weighted down with cement.
Rest his soul.
Why, Miss Vanessi.
We wish to say farewell to you,
Miss Vanessi.
You are free to go.
You do not have to finish the show.
That's right. You can fly to Texas... and marry that jerk.
It has been a very delightful experience, ma'am.
We will not forget you soon,
Miss Vanessi.
Should old acquaintance be forgot.
- How do you like that? A slug.
- Yeah.
Hey.
Think we better step out of these longies.
Oh, yeah.
Mugsy Higgins might get the wrong impression.
Goodbye, Fred.
Will you wish me luck?
It won't work, Lilli.
You belong in the theater. We both do.
Tsk. The theater.
That's all you care about.
You don't need me.
You've got an understudy.
No one could ever take your place, Lilli.
On-stage or...
Or off.
You read those lines very well.
If I do, it's because I mean them.
With all my heart.
Now, what script did you steal that from?
It was a good script, Lilli.
About two people who fell in love and were married.
It should have had a longer run.
- Maybe it was bad casting.
- No, Lilli.
The leading lady was great.
It was the... leading man. He just wasn't big enough for the role.
Mademoiselle Lilli,
Mr. Callaway is waiting.
Lilli.
He's depressed.
His doll took a powder.
- It's a dirty shame.
- Yeah.
She's got breeding.
And culture.
She was a real classy broad.
Well, cheer up.
You still got your hair.
Yeah, and you still got your career, Mr. Graham.
Just remember what the immortal bard once said:
"All the world's a stage... and all the men and women merely players."
Unquote.
So remember this:
The girls today in society
Go for classical poetry
So to win their hearts
You must quote with ease
Aeschylus and Euripides
But the poet of them all
Who will start them simply raving ls the poet people call
The Bard of Stratford on Avon
Brush up your Shakespeare
Start quoting him now
Brush up your Shakespeare
And the women you will wow
Just declaim a few lines from Othell-a
And they'll think you're a heck of a fella
If your blond won't respond
When you flatter her
Tell her what Tony told Cleopatterer
And if still to be shocked she pretends well
Just remind her
That "Ali's Well That Ends Well"
Brush up your Shakespeare
And they'll all kowtow
Yeah!
All right!
Brush up your Shakespeare
Start quoting him now
Brush up your Shakespeare
And the women you will wow
If your girl is a
Washington Heights dream
Treat the kid
To A Midsummer's Night Dream
If she fights when her clothes
You are mussing
What are clothes? Much Ado About Nussing
If she says your behavior is heinous
Kick her right
In the Coriolanus
Brush up your Shakespeare
And they'll all kowtow
- And they'll all kowtow
- Thinkst thou?
- And they'll all kowtow
- I trou'
And they'll all kowtow
Ods bodkins!
Gentlemen, thou art divine.
- Prithee.
- Finale, Mr. Graham.
- All right. Well, we'll see you, boys.
- Yeah. So long.
- Take good care of yourself.
- Say, good luck! Good luck, buddy!
Thanks, pal! Good luck to you too!
- What a swell guy?
- Yeah.
Brush up your Shakespeare
Start quoting him now
Brush up your Shakespeare
And the women you will wow
Brush up your Shakespeare
And they'll all kowtow
My dear Bianca and her newfound spouse!
Feast with the best and welcome to my house.
From this moment on
You for me, dear
Only two for tea, dear
From this moment on
From this happy day
No more blue songs
Only hoop-de-doo songs
From this moment on
For you've got the love I need so much
Got the skin I love to touch
Got the arms to hold me tight
Got the sweet lips to kiss me goodnight
From this moment on
You and I, babe
We'll be riding high, babe
Every care is gone
From this moment on
Signor Petruchio... my daughter Katherine...
Where is Katherine?
Where is she?
By now, she should be flying over Newark.
Where is the maiden?
Sirrah!
Go you to mistress Katherine... and tell her
I command her to come to me.
I know she will not come.
The fouler fortune mine and there an end.
Jeanie's going on.
Now, by my holy dame, where is my daughter?
- Where's Jeanie?
- I don't know. She was dressed.
I'll find her.
What is your will, sir, that you send for me?
What is thy will, sir?
That's your cue, Fred.
Katherine, I...
I charge thee, tell these headstrong women... what duties they owe their lords and husbands.
I am ashamed that women are so simple... to offer war where they should kneel for peace.
Or seek to rule, supremacy and sway... when they are bound to serve... love... and obey.
Why are our bodies soft and weak and smooth... unapt to toil and trouble in the world... but that our soft conditions and our hearts... should well agree with our external parts?
So hold your temper, wives, and...
And meekly put your hand... beneath your lord and husband's foot.
In token of which duty... if he please... my hand is ready.
Ready may it do him ease.
Ready.
Lilli.
Why, there's a wench!
Come on and kiss me, Kate.
So, kiss me, Kate, and quite surprise
Ere we start living in paradise
So kiss me, Kate, darling angel divine
Come, Kate, and we'll to bed.
A pox upon the life that late I led!
For now I shall ever
Be thine
All thine
Where's that marine lieutenant?
Lieutenant Cable!
Yes?
The captain wants to know if you'd like to sit up in the cockpit with him.
Sure. Thanks.
Ah, pull up a chair, marine.
I'm Buzz Adams.
Glad to know you.
Joe Cable.
Nice to meet you, Joe.
What are those islands over there?
[Buzz]
Japanese.
All of'em?
Just a minute.
[Explosions]
Yeah, they're unfriendly.
Well, take it up!
What's the idea?
It's all right.
I just wanted to show the lieutenant.
Thanks. I'll take your word for it.
You gotta do something to break the monotony,
Lieutenant.
If this war ever really gets started
It'll get started.
Sure, sure, it'll get started.
Yeah.
You, uh, ever hear of a French civilian down where we're going... named Emile De Becque?
Yeah.
What do you know about him?
Nobody knows much about him.
He's rich, got a big plantation on a hill, hunts, fishes.
What's he doing out here?
Story goes that he had to beat it out of France some 15, 16 years ago.
Nobody seems to know much why.
How 'bout taking me on your mission with you, Lieutenant?
Who says I'm on any mission?
My mistake?
Your mistake.
Sorry.
Now, here we are.
You see over there?
That's the fleet hospital where they keep the nurses.
That's where the Seabees play.
[Male Chorus]
# Bloody Mary is the girl I love. #
# Bloody Mary is the girl I love. #
[Laughing]
# Bloody Mary is the girl I love. #
# Now ain't that too damn bad! #
# Her skin is tender as a baseball glove. #
# Her skin is tender as a baseball glove. #
# Her skin is tender as a baseball glove. #
# Now ain't that too damn bad! #
# Bloody Mary's chewing betel nuts, #
# She is always chewing betel nuts, #
# Bloody Mary's chewing betel nuts, #
# And she don't use Pepsodent! ##
[Men Clapping, Whooping]
[Men Hooting, Clapping]
# Now ain't that #
Hey, Stewpot, Professor!
# Too damn bad! ##
[Men Cheering]
Here you are, Mary.
Put 'em down, Professor.
These beautiful grass skirts... were made by myself, the Professor and Stewpot and three other Seabees... in half the time it takes your native workers to make 'em.
See? No stretch.
Look 'em over, sweaty pie, and give me a price.
- All hand-tied.
- Now, what do you say, sweat-so.
What am I offered?
Gee, pretty nice work.
Did you hear that?
You can probably sell these to the chumps... for five or six dollars apiece.
Now, let's make a quick deal.
I'll let you have the whole batch for say, um, 80 bucks.
Give you 10 dollar.
What?
[Men Chuckling]
Aah! Now, see here, dragon lady. You
Hey, what's that you got there?
A boar's tooth bracelet.
Where'd you get that?
Over there on Bali Ha'i?
You like?
Hey, come here.
Come here.
You don't run into these things every day.
They're scarce as hen's teeth.
They're bigger too.
That darn Bali Ha'i.
Why does it have to be off-limits?
You can get everything over there shrunken heads, bracelets.
Only officers can sign out boats.
I'll get a boat, all right.
I'll latch on to some officer who's got some imagination, who would like to see that boar's tooth ceremonial as much as I would.
It's a pip of a ceremonial.
Dancin', drinkin', everything.
Why, you big phony.
We all know why you wanna go to Bali Ha'i.
Yeah? Why?
Because the French planters... put their young women over there when they heard the G.I.'s were coming.
That's why.
Just as if they didn't trust us.
The trouble with you is, ain't boar's teeth.
It's women.
It is boar's teeth... and women.
# We got sunlight on the sand,
We got moonlight on the sea, #
# We got mangoes and bananas
We can pick right off a tree, #
# We got volley ball and ping pong
And a lot of dandy games. #
# What ain't we got? #
# We ain't got dames. #
# We get packages from home, #
# We get movies,
We get shows, #
-# We get speeches from our skipper #
-# And advice from Tokyo Rose, #
# We get letters doused wid poifume,
We get dizzy from de smell! #
# What don't we get? #
# You know damn well! #
# We got nothin' to put on a clean white suit for, #
# What we need is what there ain't no substitute for. #
# There is nothin' like a dame, #
# Nothin' in the world, #
# There is nothin' you can name #
# That is anythin' like a dame. #
# We feel restless,
We feel blue, #
# We feel lonely and, in brief#
# We feel ev'ry kind of feeling #
# but the feeling of relief. #
# We feel hungry as the wolf felt when he met Red Riding Hood. #
# What don't we feel? #
# We don't feel good! #
# Lots of things in life are beautiful,
But brother, #
# There is one particular thing that is nothing whatsoever in any way, shape or form #
# like any other. #
# There is nothin' like a dame, #
# Nothin' in the world, #
# There is nothin' you can name #
# That is anythin' like a dame. #
# Nothin' else is built the same! #
# Nothin' in the world #
# Has a soft and wavy frame #
# like the silhouette of a dame. #
[Deep Voice]
# There is absolutely nothin' #
# like the frame #
# of a dame. #
[Women]
Hup, two, three, four.
Hup, two, three, four.
Pick 'em up. Set 'em down.
Hup, two, three, four.
Hup, two, three, four.
Pick 'em up. Set 'em down.
Hup, two, three, four.
Hup, two, three, four.
Hup, two, three, four.
Hup, two, three, four.
Hello.
Luther.
[Mockingly]
Luther.
Yes, Miss Forbush.
Have you done what you promised?
Yes, Miss Forbush.
I did it all last night.
Uh, uh, you don't have to open it now.
Oh!
Why, you do beautiful work, Luther!
Gosh, I guess I'm just about the luckiest nurse on this island to have found you.
You're a treasure.
Hup, two, three, four.
## [All Whistling]
She's a nice little girl.
But some of them nurses, the officers can have 'em.
They got 'em.
Well, they can have 'em.
# So suppose a dame ain't bright,
Or completely free from flaws #
# Or as faithful as a bird dog or as kind as Santa Claus? #
# It's a waste of time to worry over things that they have not. #
# Be thankful for #
# the things they've got! #
Hup, two, three, four.
Hup, two, three, four.
Hup, two, three, four.
Hup, two, three, four.
[Men]
# There is nothin' you can name #
# That is anythin' like a dame #
# There are no books like a dame #
# And nothin' looks like a dame. #
# There are no drinks like a dame, #
# And nothin' thinks like a dame, #
# Nothin' acts like a dame. #
# Or attracts like a dame. #
# There ain't a thing that's wrong with any man here #
# That can't be cured by puttin' him near #
# A girly, womanly, female, #
# feminine dame! #
# There is nothin' you can name #
# that is anythin' ##
Hello.
You make trouble for me?
Huh?
Are you crummy major?
No, I'm even crummier than that.
I'm a lieutenant.
"Lootellan."
Lootellan.
Hiya, Lootellan.
New on the rock?
Just flew in on that P.B.Y.
- Where from?
- Little island south of Marie Louise.
Hey, Lootellan.
You sexy man.
[Men Laughing]
Thanks. Uh, you're looking pretty, uh, fit yourself.
[All Laughing]
Sexy!
Who's she?
Ah, nobody.
She's Tonkinese.
You got sweetheart?
Take home Chicago to sexy sweetheart.
Oh, no, she's a Philadelphia girl.
I doubt that she'd quite appreciate.
What's that
"Philadelia" girl?
What's that mean?
No sexy?
[All Laughing]
You like,
I give you free.
Free? You never give me anything free.
You no sexy like Lootellan.
[All Laughing]
Take.
No, thanks.
Where'd you get that anyway?
Bali Ha'i.
[Female Chorus]
# Bali Ha'i #
# Bali Ha'i #
# Bali Ha'i #
# Bali Ha'i ##
There's your officer.
[Whispering]
Leave it to me.
Intriguin' little island, ain't it, Lieutenant?
Officers can get launches and go over there.
Bali Ha'i.
What's that mean?
Bali Ha'i mean
"I am your special island."
Mean "Here I am."
Bali Ha'i your special island, Lootellan.
I know.
You listen.
You hear island call to you.
Listen.
You no hear something?
You hear voice?
# Mos' people live #
# on a lonely island #
# Lost in de middle #
# of a foggy sea #
# Mos' people long #
# for a nudder island #
# One where dey know #
# dey would like to be #
# Bali Ha'i may call you #
# Any night, any day #
# In your heart
You'll hear it call you #
# "Come away, come away." #
# Bali Ha'i will whisper #
# On de wind of de sea; #
# "Here am I,
Your special island!" #
# "Come to me, come to me!" #
# Your own special hopes, #
# Your own special dreams #
# Bloom on de hillside #
# And shine in de streams. #
# If you try, #
# You'll find me #
# Where de sky meets de sea, #
# "Here am I,
Your special island!" #
# "Come to me.
Come to me!" #
# Bali Ha'i #
# Bali Ha'i #
# Bali Ha'i #
# Someday you'll see me, #
# Floatin' in de sunshine, #
# My head stickin' out #
# F'um a low flyin' cloud. #
# You'll hear me call you, #
# Singin' through the sunshine, #
# Sweet and clear #
# as can be, #
# "Come to me, #
# Here am I, #
# Come to me!" #
# If you try you'll find me #
# Where de sky meets de sea #
# Hear am I,
Your special island #
# Come to me #
# Come to me #
# Bali Ha'i #
# Bali Ha'i #
# Bali Ha'i ##
Of course, Lieutenant, uh, right now, uh, that island is off-limits.
Of course, you being an officer, you could get a launch.
I'd even be willin'... to requisition a boat for you.
[Chuckles]
But another thing goes on over there.
The, uh, ceremonial of the boar's tooth.
After they kill the boar, they... pass around some of that, uh, coconut liquor.
And women, uh, dance with just skirts on.
And everybody gets to know everybody pretty well.
And I thought you bein' up in the shootin' war... for such a long time without getting any recreation, uh, thought you might be interested.
[Whooping]
Iron belly.
[Men Whooping]
[Whooping Continues]
Here she is, sir.
You are causing an economic revolution on this island.
These French planters can't find a native to pick a coconut... or milk a cow... because you're paying them
10 times as much... to make these ridiculous grass skirts.
French planters stingy stinker!
Like you, crummy Captain!
I want you to pick up every scrap of this paraphernalia now.
And for the last time, carry it way down there... beyond that pier... off navy property.
All right, you men!
Take this stuff down there past that pier!
Snap to it!
Who is he?
Don't know, sir.
All right, all right.
Come on. Let's go.
Get it down there.
Let's go. Let's go.
Come on. Come on.
Way down there.
Off navy property.
You go too.
All right, Lootellan.
Thank you.
Lieutenant?
Who are you anyway?
Lieutenant Joseph Cable, sir.
I just flew in on that P.B.Y.
A joyride?
No, sir. Orders.
A marine under orders to me?
Yes, sir.
This is Commander Harbison, my executive officer.
Commander.
Lieutenant Cable.
Well, what's it all about?
Well, sir, my colonel feels... that all these islands are in danger... because none of us has been getting any firsthand intelligence.
We don't know what the Japanese are really up to.
He couldn't be more right.
He feels that what we need is a coast watch.
A coast watch?
Yes, sir.
One of our men with a radio... hiding out on one of the enemy-held islands... where he could watch for enemy ships... when they come down through the bottleneck down this way.
What do you think,
Bill?
Well, sir, our pilots could do a lot of damage... to enemy convoys with information like that.
How would you get a man on one of those islands?
Have to sneak him ashore somehow, sir.
How long do you think he could hold out there sending messages... before the Japanese spotted him?
It could be done, sir.
Yeah, but who's going to do it?
Well, sir,
I've been elected.
You got yourself quite an assignment, son.
I think I'd be okay... if I could take a man with me who really knew the country.
Headquarters has found out that there's a French civilian here... used to have a plantation on Marie Louise Island.
Did a lot of hunting and fishing there.
Marie Louise.
That's a good spot.
Right on the bottleneck.
What's this
Frenchman's name?
Emile De Becque.
Ah! He lives right up there.
[Cable]
Yes, sir. Do you know him?
Well, I've met him.
But I don't know very much about him... yet.
Is all this yours?
Yes.
[Miss Forbush]
Is it true that all the planters on these islands
Are they really running away from something?
Uh, who is not running away from something?
There are fugitives everywhere.
New York, in Paris, even in Small Rock.
Yeah, where you come from.
Oh! Little Rock.
Oh, Little. Oh.
[Chuckles]
Yes.
Small Rock.
Excuse me. Little Rock.
You know any fugitives there?
I'll show you a picture of a Little Rock fugitive.
I got this clipping from my mother... today.
Hey.
[Chuckles]
"Ensign Nellie Forbush,
Arkansas's own
Florence Nightingale."
That was written by Mrs. Leeming, the social editor.
Hmm.
She went to school with my mother.
Pretty girl, huh?
That picture was taken before I knew what... rain and heat and mud can do to your disposition.
[Sighs]
But it isn't raining today.
Gosh, it's beautiful here.
Just look at that yellow sun.
And way off in the distance, those lovely little white clouds.
Those lovely little white clouds could easily be gunfire.
Oh, how awful.
On such a day.
Boys getting killed, people getting
But you know, Emile, I don't think it's the end of the world like everyone else thinks.
Do you?
Perhaps the end of some worlds.
Not this one.
It can't be.
I I can't work myself up to getting that low.
You think I'm crazy too?
They all do over at the fleet hospital.
You know what they call me?
Knucklehead Nellie.
I suppose I am.
But I can't help it.
# When the sky is a bright canary yellow #
# I forget ev'ry cloud
I've ever seen #
# So they call me a cockeyed optimist, #
# Immature and incurably green! #
# I have heard people rant and rave and bellow #
# That we're done and we might as well be dead #
# But I'm only a cockeyed optimist #
# And I can't get it into my head, #
# I hear the human race is falling on its face #
# And hasn't very far to go, #
# But ev'ry whippoorwill
Is selling me a bill #
# And telling me it just ain't so. #
# I could say life is just a bowl of jello, #
# And appear more intelligent and smart #
# But I'm stuck (like a dope!)
With a thing called hope, #
# And I can't get it out of my heart #
# Not #
# this #
# heart. ##
Do you wanna know anything else about me?
Yes.
Would you like to see the view?
Mmm.
You say you are a fugitive.
When you joined the navy, what were you running away from?
Gosh, I don't know.
It was more like running to something.
I wanted to see what the world was like outside of Little Rock, I mean.
And I wanted to meet different kinds of people... and find out if I liked 'em better.
And do you?
Well, I-I don't really know yet.
I guess they're... different.
Would you like some cognac?
I'd love some.
[Nellie's Voice]
# Wonder how I'd feel #
# Living on a hillside, #
# Looking on an ocean, #
# Beautiful and still. #
[Emile's Voice]
# This is what I need, #
# This is what
I've longed for, #
# Someone young and smiling #
# Climbing up my hill! #
[Nellie's Voice]
# We are not alike. #
# Probably I'd bore him. #
# He's a cultured Frenchman, #
# I'm a little hick. #
[Emile's Voice]
# Younger men than I, #
# Officers and doctors, #
# Probably pursue her, #
# She could have her pick. #
[Nellie's Voice]
# Wonder why I feel #
#Jittery and jumpy! #
# I am like a school-girl, #
# Waiting for a dance. #
[Emile's Voice]
# Can I ask her now? #
# I am like a school boy! #
# What will be her answer? #
# Do I have #
# a chance? ##
In peacetime, the boat from America comes once a month.
The ladies the wives of the planters often go to Australia during the hot months.
It can get very hot here.
Oh, it can get hot in Arkansas too.
It can?
Uh-huh.
I have many books here.
Marcel Proust?
Anatole France?
Did you study French in school?
Oh, yes.
Then you can read French.
No.
I can conjugate a few verbs.
I'll bet you read a lot.
Out here, one becomes hungry to learn everything.
Not to miss anything.
Not to let anything good pass by.
[Sets Glass Down]
Yes?
One waits so long for what is good, and when at last it comes, one cannot risk to lose.
So one must speak and act quickly, even if it seems almost foolish to be so quick.
I know it's only two weeks.
A dinner given at your
Officers Club, wasn't it?
Yes, it was, Emile.
And that is the way things happen sometimes.
Isn't it, Nellie?
Yes, it is, Emile.
# Some enchanted evening #
# You may see a stranger, #
# You may see a stranger #
# Across a crowded room #
# And somehow you know, #
# You know even then #
# That somewhere you'll see her #
# again and again. #
# Some enchanted evening #
# Someone may be laughing, #
# You may hear her laughing, #
# Across a crowded room #
# And night after night, #
# As strange as it seems #
# The sound of her laughter #
# will sing in your dreams. #
# Who can explain it? #
# Who can tell you why? #
# Fools give you reasons, #
# Wise men never try. #
# Some enchanted evening #
# When you find your true love, #
# When you feel her call you #
# Across a crowded room, #
# Then fly to her side #
# And make her your own, #
# Or all through your life #
# you may dream #
# all #
# alone. #
# Once you have found her, #
# Never let her go. #
# Once you have found her, #
# Never #
# let #
# her #
# go! ##
I am older than you.
If we have children, when I die, they will be growing up.
You could afford to take them back to America, if you like.
Think about it.
Monsieur De Becque.
[Speaking French]
[French Continues]
Oh! Oh, my jeep.
Thanks, Henry.
Tell 'em I'll be right there.
Good-bye, Emile.
I had such a lovely time. I
Before you leave, Nellie,
I want to tell you something.
A while ago you asked me a question:
Why did I leave France?
Emile, that was nothing
But I want to tell you.
I had to leave France.
I killed a man.
Why did you kill him?
He was a wicked man the town bully.
Everyone in our village was glad to see him die.
And it was not to my discredit.
Do you believe me,
Nellie?
You You just told me that you killed a man... and that it's all right.
I hardly know you.
And yet I know it's all right.
Thank you, Nellie.
And you like my place?
Yes.
You You will think?
I will think.
Shh.
# La, da-da, da-da, da #
[Children]
# La, la-la, la-la, la #
Oh.
[Chuckles,
Speaks French]
[All Speaking French]
# Dites-moi #
# pour quoi #
# La vie est belle #
[All]
# Dites-moi #
# pour quoi #
# La vie est gaie? #
# Dites-moi #
# pour quoi #
# Chere mad'moiseille #
# Est ce que #
# Par ce que #
# vous m'aimez ##
I'm Lieutenant Cable.
[Brackett]
Oh, come in, Cable.
Come over here.
Look at this.
We've got some dope on your Frenchman.
Had a plantation on Marie Louise Island.
Moved down here to this island
16 years ago.
Married to a Polynesian woman for about five years.
Two children by her.
She died.
Here's one thing we've got to clear up.
Seems he left France in a hurry.
Killed a guy.
What do you think of that?
Might be a handy man to have around.
[Intercom Buzzes]
Cable.
Good. Send her in.
Here she is.
Oh, come in, Miss Forbush.
Captain Brackett, please excuse the way I look.
I was just
Oh, you look fine.
May I present
Commander Harbison?
I have the pleasure of meeting Miss Forbush twice a week.
We serve together on the G.I. entertainment committee.
Oh.
How's the Thanksgiving entertainment coming along?
Very well. Thank you, sir.
We practice whenever we get a chance.
May I also present
Lieutenant Joseph Cable?
Miss Forbush.
Sit down, Miss Forbush.
Miss Forbush, you've been seeing a French planter,
Emile De Becque.
Yes, sir.
Good. What do you know about him?
Well, uh, uh, what do I know about him?
That's right.
Well, I, uh
We met at the Officers Club dance.
He was there.
And I met him.
Yes. Now, what kind of a man is he?
Well, uh, he's very nice.
He's kind.
He's attractive.
I just don't know what you wanna know, sir.
Miss Forbush,
Captain Brackett wants to know, did you discuss politics?
No, sir.
Would you have discussed politics, Commander?
What we're specifically interested in is well, when these fellas come out from France, it's generally because they've had trouble.
Has he ever told you anything about that?
Well, uh, what do you know about his family, for instance?
Oh, uh, he has no family.
No wife. Nobody.
- He doesn't have any children?
- No, sir.
And you say he's never told you why he left France?
Yes, sir.
He left France because he killed a man.
Did he tell you why?
No, but he will if I ask him.
Well, Miss Forbush, that's exactly what we'd like to have you do.
Find out as much about him as you can his background, his opinions and why he killed this man in France.
In other words, you want me to spy on him?
Well, I'm afraid it is something like that.
Why? Do you suspect him of anything?
No. It's just that we don't know very much about him.
And he's Will you help us, Miss Forbush?
I'll try.
Thank you. You may go now if you wish.
Thank you.
I don't know very much about him, really.
Do I?
He's kept a few secrets from her, hasn't he?
Well, you don't spring a couple of Polynesian kids on a woman right off the bat.
I'm afraid we aren't gonna get much out of her.
She's obviously in love with him.
That's hard to believe, sir.
They tell me he's a middle-aged man.
Cable, it is a common mistake for boys of your age... and athletic ability... to underestimate men who have reached their maturity.
Sir, I didn't mean
Young women frequently find a grown man attractive, strange as it may seem to you.
I, myself, am over 50.
I am a bachelor.
And, Cable,
I do not by any means... consider myself... through.
[Chuckles]
What's the matter, Bill?
Nothing, evidently.
[Laughing]
Okay, Cable, see you at chow.
Yes, sir.
Anything for Ensign Forbush?
Oh, uh, your mail,
Miss Forbush.
Oh, thanks, Luther.
And, uh, your hot water's still waiting for ya.
Oh, thank you, Luther.
You're sweet.
Don't change your expression,
Lieutenant. Just act like we're talkin' casual.
I got the boat.
What boat?
We're shoving off for Bali Ha'i in 45 minutes.
What are you talking about?
The project you and I got to go to Bali Ha'i.
Oh, yeah.
Well, you can forget it.
Lieutenant, what are you doing to me?
I signed this boat out in your name.
Well, then you're just the man to cancel it.
Forget the whole thing.
Okay, mate?
Lieutenant, you and me are going on a boat trip... whether you like it or not.
Letter from home?
Oh, yes.
Do you get letters from your mother telling you that everything you do is wrong?
No. My mother thinks everything I do is right.
Of course, I don't tell her everything I do.
My mother is so prejudiced.
Against Frenchmen?
Against anyone living outside of Little Rock.
She makes a big thing out of two people having different backgrounds.
You mean ages?
Oh, no.
Mother says older men are better for girls than younger men.
This has been a discouraging day for me.
Suppose you had a sister and she was in love... with a man like
De Becque?
Yeah.
I'd tell her to lay off.
You don't have to worry about me anymore because it's all off.
[Woman]
With him?
Uh-huh.
- Smart girl, Nellie.
- I'm gonna break it off clean before it's too late.
Do you think you can?
Before I go any further,
I just better not get started.
Don't you think so too, Gracey?
Yes, I do.
You do, huh?
Yes.
Well, I guess I do too.
Well, you don't have to look so dramatic about it.
Things like this happen every day.
# I'm gonna wash that man right outa my hair, #
# I'm gonna wash that man right outa my hair, #
# I'm gonna wash that man right outa my hair, #
# And send him on his way. #
Get the picture?
# I'm gonna wave that man right outa my arms, #
[All]
# I'm gonna wave that man right outa my arms, #
# I'm gonna wave that man right outa my arms, #
# And send him on his way. #
# If the man don't understand you, #
# If you fly on sep'rate beams, #
# Waste no time!
Make a change, #
# Ride that man right off your range, #
# Rub him outa the roll call #
# And drum him outa your dreams! #
[All]
# Oh ho! #
# Oh ho! #
[Blows Raspberry]
# I went an' washed that man right outa my hair, #
# I went an' washed that man right outa my hair, #
# I went an' washed that man right outa my hair, #
# And sent him on his way! ##
[Trills]
Hyah!
Oh, hello.
Hello.
Uh, that song is it a new
American song?
Well, uh, uh, it's an American-type song.
We were just kind of, uh, putting in our own words, you know.
Uh, uh, where is everybody?
I left a note for you at the hospital.
It was to ask you to my home for dinner next Friday.
Oh, uh
Well, Emile, I don't think
I'll be able to come.
I have these rehearsals
I have already invited some of my friends.
The planters' colony.
Oh. Oh, a big party.
Well Well, then if I can't come, you won't miss me.
But it is for you.
It is for my friends to meet you... and, more important, for you to meet them.
To give you an idea of what your life would be like here.
I want you to know more about me how I live and think.
More about you.
Yes. You know very little about me.
That's right.
Uh, would you sit down?
Do you think about politics much?
And if so, what do you think about politics?
I've
Do you mean that
Do you mean my political philosophy?
I think that's what I mean.
Oh.
[Chuckles]
Uh, well, to begin with, I
I believe in the free life and freedom for everyone.
Like in the Declaration of Independence?
C'est a.
All men are created equal, isn't it?
Emile, you really believe that?
But of course, Nellie.
Well, thank goodness.
Oh.
It's why I am here, why I killed a man.
Oh, yes, I, uh
[Clears Throat]
I meant to ask you about that too.
Now, uh, I don't want you to think I'm prying into your private life... asking a lot of personal questions, but, uh,
I always think it's interesting... why a person... kills... another person.
But of course, Nellie.
That has worried you.
When I was a boy,
I carried my hat in my hand.
So, when this man came to our town, though my father said he was good,
I thought he was bad.
I was young.
He attracted all the mean and cruel people to him.
Soon he was running our town.
He could do anything, take anything.
I didn't like that.
I was young.
I stood up in the public square.
I made a speech.
I called upon everyone to stand with me against this man.
- What did they do?
- They walked away.
- Why?
- Because they saw him standing behind me.
I turned.
And he said to me,
"I'm going to kill you now."
We fought.
I was never so strong.
I knocked him to the ground.
And when he fell, his head struck a stone and
I ran to the waterfront and joined a cargo boat.
I didn't even know where it was going.
I stepped off that boat into another world... where I am now, and where I want to stay.
Nellie, will you marry me?
There are so few days in our life, Nellie.
The time I have with you now... is precious to me.
Have you been thinking?
Have you been thinking?
I've been thinking.
# Born on the opposite sides of a sea, #
# We are as different as people can be. #
# It's true #
# And yet you want to marry me. #
# I do. #
# I've known you a few short weeks #
# And yet somehow you've made my heart forget #
# All other men
I have ever met #
# but you, #
# but you. #
# Who can explain it? #
# Who can tell you why? #
# Fools give you reasons, #
# Wise men never try. ##
Will you come next Friday?
Uh-huh.
[Women Laughing]
[Woman]
Well, she sure washed him out of her hair.
- [Woman #2]
She sure did.
- [Women Laughing]
# I expect ev'ry one of my crowd. #
# To make fun of my proud protestations of faith and romance #
# And they'll say
I'm nave as a babe to believe #
# Any fable I hear form a person in pants #
# Fearlessly
I'll face them #
# and argue their doubts away #
# Loudly I'll sing about flowers and spring #
# Flatly I'll stand on my little flat feet and say #
# Love is a grand #
# and a beautiful thing. #
# I'm not ashamed to reveal #
# The world famous feeling #
# I feel #
# I'm as corny as Kansas in August, #
# I'm as normal as blueberry pie, #
# No more a smart little girl with no heart #
# I have found me a wonderful guy! #
# I am in a conventional dither #
# With a conventional star in my eye, #
# And you will note
There's a lump in my throat #
# When I speak of that wonderful guy! #
# I'm as trite and as gay
As a daisy in May, #
# A clich coming true! #
# I'm bromidic and bright #
# As a moon happy night pouring light on the dew! #
# I'm as corny as Kansas in August, #
# High as a flag on the fourth of July! #
# If you'll excuse an expression I use, #
# I'm in love, I'm in love,
I'm in love, I'm in love, #
# I'm in love with a wonderful guy! #
# I'm as corny as Kansas in August, #
# High as a flag on the fourth of July! #
# If you'll excuse an expression I use, #
# I'm in love, I'm in love,
I'm in love, I'm in love,
I'm in love, #
[All]
# I'm in love, I'm in love,
I'm in love, #
# I'm in love, I'm in love,
I'm in love, I'm in love, #
# I'm in love with a wonderful guy! ##
Now, before you give us an answer,
I wanna impress you with three things.
First you are a civilian and you don't have to go.
Second this is a very dangerous mission... and there's no guarantee that you will survive... or that it will do any good.
Third that it might do a great good.
It might be the means of turning the tide of the war in this area.
Yeah, I understand all these things.
Are you ready to give us your answer?
Yes, I am.
My answer must be no.
When a man faces death, he must weigh values very carefully.
He must weigh the sweetness of his life... against the thing he's asked to die for.
The probability of death is very great... for both of us.
I know that island well,
Lieutenant Cable.
And, uh, I'm not certain that I believe... that what you're asking me to do is is that
[Brackett]
We're asking you to help us lick the Japanese.
It's as simple as that.
We're against the Japanese.
I know what you are against.
What are you for?
When I was 22,
I thought the world hated bullies as much as I did.
I was foolish, and I killed one.
I was forced to flee to an island.
Since then, I have asked no help from anyone... or any country.
I have seen these bullies multiply... and grow strong.
And the world sat by and watched.
Oh, the hell with this, De Becque!
Let's be honest!
Aren't you just a guy in love with a girl and you're putting her above everything else?
Yes.
I do care about my life with her... more than anything else in the world.
It is the only thing that is important to me.
This I believe in.
This I'm sure of.
This I have.
I cannot risk to lose it.
Good day, gentlemen.
He's an honest man, but he's wrong.
Of course we can't guarantee him a better world if we win.
The point is we can be sure it'll be worse if we lose, can't we?
Well, can't we?
I don't know.
What should I do now,
Captain Brackett?
Go back to my outfit tonight?
- Why don't you take a couple of days off and unwind?
- Unwind?
Sure. Take a boat.
Go fishing.
Boat.
[Chorus]
# Bali Ha'i #
# may call you #
# Any night, any day #
[Man]
There's a ceremony today,
Billis. The whole town's out.
# "Come away, come away." #
[Ringing]
# Bali Ha'i will whisper#
# On de wind of de sea; #
# "Here am I,
Your special island!" #
# "Come to me, come to me!" #
# Your own special hopes, #
# Your own special dreams #
# Bloom on de hillside #
# And shine in de streams. #
# If you try, #
# You'll find me #
# Where de sky meets de sea, #
[Giggling]
# "Here am I, #
[Billis Chuckles]
# "Your special island!" #
# "Come to me.
Come to me!" #
Here you are. [Chuckles]
[Chuckles]
That's it.
Dance it up, kids.
[Chorus]
# "Come to me. #
# Come to me!" #
# Bali Ha'i ##
[Bloody Mary]
Welcome Bali Ha'i.
- What are you doing here?
- Here I live.
[Chuckles]
You like?
Bali Ha'i call you, eh?
You no escape Bali Ha'i when she call you.
Are you guys with the boar's tooth ceremonial? You know
[Growls]
Yes. You go with them, big dealer.
Lootellan, you come with me.
Will you get your carcass out of here!
He's going with me.
Which way is it?
All right. Come on.
[Natives Chattering]
[Billis]
That ain't all halibut in that net, Lieutenant.
The place is loaded, ain't it?
Well, ain't it?
No comment.
## [Drums Continue Beating]
[Sticks Rattling
Rhythmically]
[Chanting In Native Language]
## [Singing In Native Language]
That's the chief.
He's the one that takes out the tooth.
[Snorting]
Look at those tusks.
Yeah, they've gone through the pig's face twice and once through his jawbone.
That's why they're so hard to get out.
[Groans]
## [Singing Continues]
Hey, look!
He's dancing on those hot coals! Come on!
Now for the cuttin'.
I'm not gonna wait around for that.
[Birds Twittering]
What's this all about?
You wait.
There's nobody around here.
You wait, Lootellan.
What's going on, Mary?
What
[Rustling]
You like?
Who is she?
Liat.
Liat.
[Bloody Mary]
Is French name.
But she no French girl.
She Tonkinese, like me.
We are very pretty people, no?
Liat nice daughter, no?
Make nice wife.
Yes?
You speak English?
Only few word.
She talk French.
Franais.
Je parle franais... un peu.
Moi aussi. Un peu.
[Laughing]
Afraid of me?
Oh.
Avez-vous peur?
Non.
Oui.
Non.
You're just a kid.
How did an innocent kid like you get mixed up with Bloody Mary?
C'est vieux femme votre amie?
Ma mre.
Your mother!
Bloody Mary really is your mother.
That's why she's been looking me over like that.
[Bell Clanging]
It's the boat, all right.
Ah, let 'em wait.
# I touch your hand #
# and my arms grow strong #
# Like a pair of birds #
# that burst with song #
# My eyes look down #
# at your lovely face #
# And I hold the world #
# In my embrace. #
# Younger than springtime are you #
# Softer than starlight are you #
# Warmer than winds of June #
# are the gentle lips #
# you gave me. #
# Gayer than laughter are you #
# Sweeter than music are you #
# Angel and lover, #
# Heaven and earth #
# are you to me. #
# And when your youth #
# and joy #
# invade my arms #
# And fill my heart #
# As now they do... #
# Then... #
# Younger than springtime am I #
# Gayer than laughter am I #
# Angel and lover, #
# Heaven and earth #
# am I #
# with you. #
[Bell Clanging]
# Younger than springtime am I #
# Gayer than laughter am I #
# Angel and lover, #
# Heaven and earth #
# am I #
# with #
#you. ##
[Chorus]
# Bali Ha'i #
## [Singing Continues]
## [Continues Faintly]
Ring the bell again!
Ring the bell again!
[Bell Clanging]
[Bloody Mary]
You no worry, Billis.
He be here soon.
Look!
[Chorus]
# Bali Ha'i #
# Bali Ha'i #
# Bali Ha'i ##
Is gonna be my son-in-law.
[Laughing]
[People Speaking French]
[Speaking Broken French]
[Emile Laughing]
Au revoir.
Nellie.
Huh?
Nellie, please, stay for just a moment.
You know I can't stay.
Why not? No one will think anything.
And-And I gotta get this jeep back.
I stole it.
You must never return anything you steal.
Then they'll know you stole it.
But I really just borrowed it.
Or rather someone stole it for me.
A wonderful man named Billis.
I have to sneak around behind the hospital as it is.
In that case,
I forbid you to go.
If you have to sneak back without anyone seeing you, you might as well sneak back later.
You're absolutely right.
[Man]
Au revoir, Emile.
Au revoir.
[Emile Speaking French]
Oh! I never had such a wonderful time in my whole life.
They're nice people, no?
Oh, they're lovely people.
That cute old man that spoke French with me and made believe he understood me.
And that exciting native couple who danced for us.
Oh.
Oh, it's so different from Little Rock!
[Laughing]
What on earth are you laughing at?
Am I drunk?
Oh, no.
Oh, yes, I am.
But it isn't the champagne.
It's because
# I'm in love with a wonderful guy #
# I am in a conventional dither #
# With a conventional star in my eye #
# And you will note
There's a lump in my throat #
[Chuckles]
# When I speak to that wonderful guy. #
# I'm as trite and as gay
As a daisy in May, #
# A clich coming true! #
# I'm bromidic and bright #
# As a moon happy night pouring light on the dew #
# I'm in love I'm in love
I'm in love I'm in love #
# I'm in love with a wonderful guy! #
# I'm in love, I'm in love,
And the girl that I love, #
# She thinks
I'm a wonderful guy. ##
[Sighs]
Oh! Imagine leaving all of this wonderful champagne.
[Chuckles]
Mmm!
Mmm!
Here, Emile.
You have some too.
It's such a waste.
Here. Here is another bottle.
[Nellie's Voice]
# This is how it feels #
# living on a hillside #
Here we are, just like two old married people are.
Our guests have gone home and we're alone.
[Emile's Voice]
# This is what I need #
# This is what
I've longed for#
# Someone young and smiling #
# Here upon my hill ##
Emile.
Hmm?
My mother says we have nothing in common, but she's wrong.
We have something very important in common very much in common.
Yes. We are both in love.
Yes, but more than that.
I've had enough.
We're the same kind of people, fundamentally- you and me.
We appreciate things.
We get enthusiastic about things.
It's really quite exciting when two people are like that.
We're not blas.
Mmm.
You know what I mean?
Yes.
You know what I mean?
Yes.
We are both knuckleheads.
Cockeyed optimists.
# I hear the human race is falling on it's face #
# And hasn't very far to go #
# But ev'ry whippoorwill
Is selling me a bill #
# And telling me it just ain't so. #
# I could say life is just a bowl of jello #
# And appear more intelligent and smart #
# But I'm stuck (like a dope!)
With a thing called hope, #
# And I can't get it out of my heart #
# Not #
# this #
# heart ##
Nellie. Nellie,
I have a surprise for you.
Oh!
No, stay there.
Oh! Why, you're the cutest things I ever saw in my whole life.
What are your names?
You probably can't understand a word I'm saying.
But oh, my goodness, you're cute.
Nellie, I want you to meet
Ngana and Jerome.
Ngana and Jerome, Nellie.
Nellie?
Nellie?
[Chuckles]
[Speaking French]
[Speaking French]
Bonsoir, Nellie.
Bonsoir, Nellie.
Bonsoir, Nellie.
Aren't they adorable!
Those big black eyes staring at you out of those sweet little faces.
[Chuckles]
Are they Henry's?
They're mine.
Oh, of course they are.
They look exactly like you.
Where do you hide their mother?
She's dead, Nellie.
She's
Emile, they are yours?
Yes, Nellie.
I'm their father.
And And their mother was a
Polynesian.
She was beautiful, Nellie, and charming too.
And you loved her.
I want you to know
I have no apologies.
I came here as a young man.
I lived as I could.
Of course.
But I have not been selfish.
No woman ever hated me or tried to hurt me.
No No woman could... ever want want to hurt you, Emile.
What time is it?
I promised to get that jeep back.
Oh! Oh, this is awful.
Oh Oh, why just look at the time!
Please, Nellie.
Wait.
I'll drive you home.
Oh, you'll do no such thing.
But
Anyway, I couldn't leave the jeep here. I've gotta get it back by
Don't go now, Nellie.
Don't go yet, please.
Oh, well, I have to go.
Yes, this this is just terrible.
I I won't be able to face the girls at the hospital as it is. I
You can't imagine the way they look at you when you come in late.
Yes, Nellie
I'll call you. I'll come by tomorrow. Yes.
Nellie
Oh, no.
[Panting]
Oh, dear.
There are those awful rehearsals for Thanksgiving day.
I'm teaching them a dance and they wanna rehearse night and day.
But after that
Thank you for tonight, Emile.
I had a wonderful time.
It was the nicest party and you were a perfect host.
Good-bye.
Nellie, I-I
Please, Emile.
Please stay here.
Please don't come to the jeep. Please!
Nellie.
I love you.
Do you hear me?
I love you.
And I love you too.
Honestly, I do.
Please let me go.
Oh, please let me go!
[Sobbing]
# Once you have found her #
# Never let her go. #
# Once you have found her, #
# Never let #
# her #
# go! ##
## [Orchestra]
[Bell Clanging]
[Squeals]
[Squeals]
[All]
Whoa!
Come on. Allons.
Whoo!
[Laughter]
Happy, Lootellan?
[Laughing]
Jacques Barrere want to marry Liat.
He ask again last night.
You mean, that old
French planter you told me about, the one you despise?
You can't let her marry a man like that!
- Is white man, too, and very rich.
- I don't care!
You can't let her marry him.
Okay. Then you marry her.
Lootellan, you have good life here.
I am rich.
Since war,
I make 2,000 dollar.
War go on,
I make maybe more.
Give all the money to you and Liat.
You no have to work.
I work for you.
All day long, you and Liat play together.
Make love, talk happy.
No think about
"Philadelia."
It's no good!
# Happy Talk, keep talkin' Happy Talk #
# Talk about t'ings you'd like to do. #
# You got to have a dream #
# If you don't have a dream #
# How you gonna have a dream come true? #
# Talk about a moon #
# Floatin' in de sky #
# Lookin' like a lilly on a lake #
# Talk about a bird #
# Learnin' how to fly #
# Makin' all de music he can make. #
# Happy Talk, keep talkin' Happy Talk #
# Talk about t'ings you'd like to do. #
# You got to have a dream #
# If you don't have a dream #
# How you gonna have a dream come true? #
# Talk about a star #
# Lookin' like a toy #
# Peekin' through the branches of a tree. #
# Talk about a girl #
# Talk about a boy #
# Countin' all de ripples on de sea. #
# Happy Talk, keep talkin' Happy Talk #
# Talk about t'ings you'd like to do. #
# You got to have a dream #
# If you don't have a dream #
# How you gonna have a dream come true? #
# Talk about a boy #
# Sayin' to the girl #
# "Golly baby, #
# I'm a lucky cuss!" #
# Talk about a girl #
# Sayin' to de boy #
# "You an' me is lucky #
# to be us" #
# Happy Talk, keep talkin' Happy Talk #
# Talk about t'ings you'd like to do. #
# You got to have a dream #
# If you don't have a dream #
# How you gonna have a dream come true? #
# If you don't talk happy #
# An' you never have a dream #
# Den you'll never have #
# a dream #
# come true. ##
Is good idea?
You like?
[Laughing]
Wait a minute.
Liat, I want you to have this.
It was my grandfather's.
My dad carried it through the last war.
First minute I see you,
I know you right man for Liat... and she right girl for you.
You have special good babies.
Mary, I can't marry Liat.
Was your last chance!
Now she marries
Jacques Barrere!
Come, Liat.
[Sobs]
Give me watch!
[Shattering]
[Whimpering]
Stingy stinker!
# Younger than springtime #
# were you #
# Angel and lover, #
# Heaven and earth #
#were you ##
## [Piano]
[Nellie]
Step together, step together.
Point, point.
Bounce, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight.
Hitch, kick!
Hitch, kick!
Scissors!
Scissors!
Hi, Bill.
Hello, sir.
How's it going?
Just fine, sir.
What do you think of it?
Oh, looks pretty good.
I guess we'll get opened all right.
[Cries]
I'm sorry. I can't go on.
## [Piano Stops]
Ah, sure you can,
Miss Forbush.
You're the whole show.
I'm sorry, Luther.
I don't know what's the matter with me.
What's the matter?
Well, sir, would you take care of her, please?
I-I'm so sorry.
Please excuse me.
It's nothing, honest.
It's really
It's nothing.
I know
All right, all right.
Let's go. Come on.
Back to the deck.
Get them weights.
Let's dance!
Come on. Okay.
Hitch, kick and scissors!
Hitch, kick and scissors!
## [Piano]
A transfer?
Yes, please.
To any other island but this one.
Miss Forbush,
I don't want to pry into your affairs, but... whatever is bothering you is some personal thing, of course.
But I wonder if you realize just how unimportant it is.
Unimportant?
Yes.
And how important you are at this particular time.
I mean, the Thanksgiving Follies.
Why, you're the star, the choreographer, the whole spirit of the thing.
I don't think a little show like this is very important.
And that's just where you're wrong.
Miss Forbush, up to now, in this war, our side has been having a merciless beating in two hemispheres, and nobody's going to be going home until that situation is reversed.
It may take a long time before we can get any big operation under way, before the boys here get off this island.
They're lonesome, homesick boys.
And no matter how tough they talk, don't you think... they're not looking forward to this "little show," as you call it.
This isn't a little show,
Miss Forbush.
This is a big show.
## [Band]
[Cheering]
## [Piano: Glissando]
# My doll is as dainty as a sparrow #
# Her figure is something to applaud. #
# Where she's narrow she's narrow as an arrow #
# And she's broad, #
# where a broad #
# should be broad. #
- [Man]
Get it?
- Sit down!
Quiet down there!
Let her sing!
# A hundred and one pounds of fun #
# That's my little honey bun! #
# Get a load of honey bun tonight. #
# I'm speakin' of my Sweetie Pie, #
# Only sixty inches high #
# Ev'ry inch is packed with dynamite! #
[Laughing]
# Her hair is blonde and curly, #
# Her curls are hurly burly, #
# Her lips are pips!
I call her hips:
"Twirly" and "Whirly" #
[Cheering]
# She's my baby,
I'm her pap! #
# I'm her booby,
She's my trap! #
# I am caught and don't wanta run, #
# 'Cause I'm havin' so much fun with Honey Bun! #
# A hundred and one pounds of fun #
# That's my little honey bun! #
# Get a load of honey bun tonight. #
# I'm speakin' of my Sweetie Pie #
Billis, get off that stage!
# Only sixty inches high #
Knock it off. All right.
# Ev'ry inch is packed with dynamite! #
# Her hair is blonde and curly. #
# Her curls are hurly burly. #
# Her lips are pips! #
# I call her hips:
"Twirly" and "Whirly" #
Hey, Billis! Who does your hair?
[Growls]
[Jeering]
[Booing]
## [Vocalizing]
[Cheering]
# I am caught and don't wanta run, #
# 'Cause I'm havin' so much fun with honey bun #
# (Believe me, sonny) #
# She's a cookie who can cook you till you're done #
# (Ain't bein' funny) #
# Sonny, put your money #
# On my #
# honey bun! ##
[Cheering Continues]
Miss Forbush.
Oh, Luther.
Oh, thank you.
[Men]
Whoa!
[Whistling]
## [Band]
# A hundred and one pounds of fun #
# That's my little honey bun! #
# Get a load of honey bun tonight. #
# I'm speakin' of my Sweetie Pie #
# Only sixty inches high #
# Ev'ry inch is packed with dynamite! #
All right, all right!
Leave it alone!
# Her hair is blonde and curly, #
# Her curls are hurly burly #
# Her lips are pips! #
Ah, come on, wise guy!
Cut it out!
# I call her hips:
"Twirly" and "Whirly" #
## [Drum]
[Man]
Come on. Go home!
[Man #2]
Hey, Billis! You got a hole in your boat!
[Laughter]
[Cheering]
# Fly, navy down the field #
# Anchors aweigh #
# From the halls of Montezuma #
# To the shores of Tripoli #
## [Drum]
# She's my baby,
I'm her pap #
# I'm her booby
She's my trap #
# I am caught and I don't wanta run #
# 'Cause I'm havin' so much fun with honey bun. #
Ow!
# And that's the finish. #
Who did that?
# And it's time to go for now the show is done #
All right, who did that?
# We hope you like us, #
Who did it?
# And we hope that when you leave your seat and run #
# Down to the Mess Hall. #
# You'll enjoy your dinner each and ev'ry one. #
# Save me some turkey! #
# And put some chestnut dressing #
# on our honey bun ##
Cigarettes, anybody?
# bun. ##
[Chattering]
Luther? Luther?
Oh, Luther, you really are a honey bun.
These beautiful flowers.
I needed someone to think of me tonight.
I appreciate it,
Luther.
You don't know how much.
Miss Forbush, I would like to have you know... that that I consider you... the most wonderful woman in the entire world, even including the fact that you're an officer.
And And I just can't go on being such a heel... as to let you think
I thought of giving you those flowers.
Oh, but you did give them to me, and
No.
Here's the note that came with them.
[Emile's Voice]
I lie in the loneliness of evening, looking out on a silver-flaked sea, and ask the moon,
"Oh, how soon how soon will my love come home to me?"
[Nellie's Voice]
Will my love... come home to me?
What's the matter,
Nellie the Nurse?
Joe Cable!
Having diplomatic difficulties with France?
Joe, who let you out of the hospital?
Me! I'm okay. Come on.
Nellie?
Are you ready?
Oh, Bill
Bill, would you wait just a minute, please?
Sure.
You're trying to get over to Bali Ha'i.
That little girl you told me about.
I've got to.
All the time
I've been in the hospital with that darn malaria,
I haven't been able to see anything but her face.
I love her, and
What kind of a guy am I anyway?
I love her, and yet I said I couldn't marry her, and
I don't understand myself.
If I love her, why don't I marry her... and stay here and
You're just far away from home, Joe.
We're both far away from home.
But it doesn't make sense!
Oh, yes, it does.
I guess it does anyway.
I guess people like us well, we just have to go back to where we belong.
What about that girl of yours back in... Philadelphia?
# My girl back home #
# I'd almost forgot! #
# A blue-eyed kid, #
# I liked her a lot. #
# We got engaged, #
# Both fam'lies were glad; #
# And I was told by my uncle and dad #
# That if I were clever and able #
# They'd make me a part of a partnership, #
# Cable, Cable, #
# and Cable! #
# How far away #
# Philadelphia, P.A. #
# Princeton, N.J #
# How far are they #
# From coconut palms and banyan trees #
# and coral sands #
# and Tonkinese! #
# How far away #
# Little Rock, ARK #
# Princeton, NJ #
# How far are they #
# How far are they #
# From coconut palms and banyan trees #
# and coral sands and ##
Nellie,
I must see you.
Emile, I
Will you excuse us,
Lieutenant Cable?
No, Joe! Stay.
Stay, please.
I've been meaning to call you, Emile.
You have asked for a transfer. Why?
What does it mean,
Nellie?
I I'll I'll explain it to you tomorrow, Emile.
No. Now.
What does it mean, Nellie?
It means that I can't marry you.
Do you understand?
I I can't marry you.
- Because of my children.
- Oh, not because of your children.
They're sweet.
It is their Polynesian mother then their mother and I.
Yes.
I can't help it.
I-It isn't as if I could give you a good reason.
I
There is no reason.
This is emotional.
This is something that's born in me.
It is not.
I do not believe this is born in you.
Well, then why why do I feel the way I do?
All I All I know is,
I I can't help it.
I I can't help it.
Joe? Joe, explain how we feel.
Joe!
Nellie
Bill! Bill!
Nellie
Bill?
Can we go now?
Please?
What makes her talk like that?
Why do you have this feeling you and she?
I do not believe it is born in you!
I do not believe it!
It's not born in you!
It happens after you're born.
# You've got to be taught #
# to hate and fear, #
# You've got to be taught #
# from year to year, #
# It's got to be drummed #
# in your dear little ear #
# You've got to be carefully taught. #
# You've got to be taught #
# to be afraid #
# of people whose eyes #
# are oddly made, #
# And people whose skin #
# is a diff'rent shade #
# You've got to be carefully taught. #
# You've got to be taught #
# before it's too late #
# Before you are six #
# or seven or eight, #
# To hate all the people #
# your relatives hate #
# You've got to be carefully taught! #
# You've got to be carefully taught! ##
You've got the right idea,
De Becque.
Live on an island.
Yes, sir.
If I get out of this thing alive,
I'm not going back there.
I'm staying here.
All I care about is right here.
Yes. So, when all you care about is here, yeah, this is a good place to be.
When all you care about is... taken away from you, there is no place.
I came so close to it.
So close.
# One dream in my heart #
# One love to be living for #
# One love to be living for #
# This nearly was mine. #
# One girl #
# for my dream #
# One partner in paradise #
# This promise of paradise #
# This nearly was mine. #
# Close to my heart she came #
# Only to fly away #
# Only to fly #
# as day flies #
# from moonlight #
# Now, now I'm alone #
# Still dreaming of paradise, #
# Still saying #
# that paradise #
# Once nearly #
# was mine. ##
You know, back home, whenever I got in a jam,
I used to go hunting.
That's what I think
I'll do now.
Good hunting up there around Marie Louise.
Carriers.
Cargo boats.
Troop ships.
Big game.
De Becque.
Would you reconsider... going up there with me to Marie Louise Island?
I mean, now that you haven't got so much to lose?
We could do a good job,
I think.
You and I.
How could a P.B.Y land anywhere near that island... without being seen by the enemy?
It will not land near the island, but far out at sea.
I know the fishing grounds my friends use, and I know two fishermen there
Inato and Basil.
They will help us.
The equipment's all aboard, sir. We loaded it while it was still dark.
You'd better wait a while yet before you take off.
Above all, this must look like a casual, routine flight.
Well, there's still plenty of time to change your mind.
Hey, Buzz!
Captain?
Yeah?
Are you we gonna need the parachutes or not?
No, it looks calm enough for us to set down.
No parachutes!
[Emile]
All right.
[Cable]
Looks like a summer day in Maine.
That's a state in America.
Yeah.
Lobsters.
Lobsters.
Hey, you guys better start getting into that gear!
Hey, we're approaching
Marie Louise.
[Explosions Continue]
- [Loud Explosion]
- What's going on here?
What? Roger.
Hey, we got it in the tail section.
I'll go take a look.
[Explosions Continue]
Well, say something!
Who's driving this airplane anyhow?
I hope you realize there's a hole in this plane!
Oh, hello,
Lieutenant, everybody.
It's Luther.
What are you doing on this plane? How'd you get on here anyway?
Well, I I thought maybe you might need an extra man.
Seemed like an interesting project, and I
What's the matter, Lieutenant?
You feeling sick or something?
If you don't like the idea, we'll just forget it.
I'll go back to the baggage compartment.
Just pretend you never saw me.
- I'll kill him.
- Now, Lieutenant.
If I thought you were gonna take this attitude, I wouldn't have volunteered my services.
How do you like this character?
I'm gonna have you court-martialed for this,
Billis!
You better take it easy!
I'm gonna ride you out of the navy!
Do you realize that this is a secret mission of the utmost importance?
I realize this is a secret mission, and I'm gonna keep the mission. I'm gonna
[Explosion]
[Screaming]
Pull the handle!
Pull the handle!
Which one?
Hey, Captain!
Man overboard!
Boy, that Cable plays it rough.
His parachute's opening.
Secret mission, huh?
Well, it's no secret now.
Hello. This is
Beer Bus to Brewery,
Beer Bus to Brewery.
Yeah, look. Say, look,
I got a man parachuting down into the Empress Augusta Bay.
That's right.
You guys are gonna have to help me 'cause I can't.
Right.
Roger and out.
So, it's gonna be one of those days, huh?
Okay.
Hey, hey, hey! Wait!
Don't leave me!
Look, drop a boat back there, will you?
[Screams]
[Machine Gun Fire Continues]
Can't you get him out of there?
He'll be shot to pieces!
I can't. I gotta get you guys in first.
After that, I'll come back and pick up the pieces, if there are any.
Okay. Let's go.
Looks like he's an American, and they're shootin' at him.
Well, let's make 'em shoot at us.
Hey! That's it, boys! Go!
Hey! That's it! Hey!
He must be down about there.
Well, get him out of there.
Use anything you need.
We'll send in a destroyer, if necessary.
Aye, aye, sir.
The admiral says go all out.
Do you see any fishing boats?
Ah!
Yeah, there we are.
That's the fishing grounds.
- Can you go lower here?
- Roger.
Hey!
That's Inato's boat!
Basil! Inato!
Inato!
All right.
Can we set down here?
De Becque,
I can set down anywhere.
I'll take it.
This is a black day for the navy!
A black, black day!
How much did you say this cost, Bill?
It's estimated at $600,000, sir.
Did you hear that?
That's what your little stunt today cost the taxpayers!
Six hundred
What are you grinning about?
I was just thinking about my uncle.
Remember my uncle
I was telling you about?
He used to tell my old man
I'd never be worth a dime.
Excuse me, sir.
Billis, you've been striking for the brig ever since you hit this island, and today you finally made it... because Captain Brackett and I are gonna throw the book at you!
Sir, may I barge in?
My copilot and I, sir- we've been sort of kicking this thing around, and, well, we feel that Lu well, Billis here down in that rubber boat with all the airplanes buzzing around him... caused sort of a diversionary action.
It made it a lot easier for us to land Cable and the Frenchman without being seen.
In fact, it turned out to be an awful lucky break for us, sir.
What do you want me to do, give this guy a gold medal?
[Sighs]
I don't want no gold medal, Captain, but, uh, I could use a little more, um, freedom, a little room to swing around in, if you know what I mean, if you get the picture.
Get out of here.
Get out of here.
Get the hell out of here!
[Emile On Radio]
Come in, Kennel.
Captain! Captain!
Kennel, come in.
This is the Frenchman.
Do you hear me?
This is Kennel.
Go ahead, Frenchman.
This is our first chance to send news to you.
We have made contact with former friends of mine.
We have set up quarters in a very nice hole in a rock.
No room, but a lovely view.
We can see right down into the bottleneck.
First the weather.
Rain clouds over Bougainville, the Treasuries,
Choiseul,
New Georgia.
We expect rain in this region from 9:00 to 2:00.
[Cable]
0900 to 1400.
Oh, my friend Joe corrects me.
0900 to 1400.
You must not expect from us any regular communication.
There are hundreds of Japanese in this region.
It will be necessary to constantly change our quarters.
And now, our military expert Joe.
[Cable]
All you navy, marine and army pilots, write this down.
Surface craft
19 troop barges... headed down the bottleneck, speed about 11 knots.
Ought to pass Banika... at about 2000 tonight, escorted by heavy warships.
As for aircraft,
22 bombers, Betties
A bottle of beer says
I get the first strike! went by at 0600,
[Cheering] headed south southwest.
About time!
[Cable] There ought to be some way to knock off a few of those.
- Hey, wait for us!
- That's all for now.
Good luck.
Two weeks?
Well, how can those guys stick it out for two weeks?
Yeah. Everybody thought they'd be dead pigeons in a couple of days.
I tell you, those two guys are doing us a lot of good.
That Frenchman reported 40 bombers north of Munda.
We took off, and 40 bombers right on the nose boom, boom.
How do those guys keep alive up there?
The enemy's all around.
How do they do it?
That Frenchman knows these jungles around here like the palm of his hand.
He's a hunter, see?
All I know is, they changed the whole setup here.
I think we got the Japanese on the run.
That's what the Frenchman said.
Well, is it my lead?
Yeah.
Let me see.
Come on, come on.
I got money on this.
[Emile]
Listen carefully, please.
Ceiling today unlimited.
Thirty-three fighters,
Zeros, have moved in from Bougainville.
Their course is approximately
0-2-3 degrees true.
[Engines Droning]
I'm certain heavy bombers will follow.
I think something big is afoot.
That's all
I have time for now.
Joe and I must change our position immediately.
Planes are directly overhead.
Two only, but they're looking for us, I think.
They know about where we are.
I will try to get back to you later.
Good luck.
They got us pretty well pinpointed.
Stay here.
In a few minutes, it will be dark enough to run for it.
You know, I think we're right.
It looks like they're going all out.
Even these planes.
They've stopped looking for us.
They're going away.
Let's make a run for it.
All right. Let's go.
[Machine Gun Fire]
A-And we have a lot of fighter pilots over in the ward, and and they keep talking about a Frenchman.
The Frenchman said this, and the Frenchman said that, and
I was just wondering if the Frenchman they're talking about could be... my Frenchman.
Yes, Miss Forbush, it is.
I couldn't tell you before, but
Then he is behind enemy lines.
With Lieutenant Cable.
Hello. This is Emile De Becque.
Please listen to me carefully.
I haven't much time.
My message today must be brief and sad.
Lieutenant Cable my friend Joe died a few minutes ago.
I will never know a finer man.
I wish he could have told you the news.
The Japanese are pulling out.
There is great confusion here.
My guess is that the enemy will try to evacuate troops from Cape Esperance tonight.
This is the opportunity we've been waiting for.
Make the most of it, my friends.
You may not hear from me again.
They are coming back.
[Engines Droning]
They're right above me.
[Machine Gun Fire]
- Good-bye!
- Is that all? Is that all?
Can't you get him back?
Kennel to Frenchman.
Kennel to Frenchman.
Come in, Frenchman.
I'm sorry, sir.
He's cut off.
How far away.
Philadelphia, P.A.
Poor Joe Cable.
Captain Brackett, do you think there's a chance I'll ever see
Emile De Becque again?
There's a chance.
Of course there's a chance.
I didn't even know he was going.
Of course not.
How could he tell you?
Don't blame Emile De Becque.
He's okay.
He's a wonderful guy.
Uh-huh.
He has got a chance, hasn't he, Bill?
Of course.
There's always a chance.
Emile?
Emile, come back so I can tell you something.
I know what counts now.
Just you.
All those other things?
The woman you had before?
Her color?
What What piffle. I
What a pinhead I was!
Come back so I can tell you.
Oh, don't die before
I can tell you.
All that matters is us being together.
That's all.
If you think of what you said to me that day, you can stay alive, Emile.
I know you can.
Think of what you said.
# When you find your true love #
# When you feel her call you #
# Across #
# Then fly to her side #
# And make her your own #
# Or all through your life ##
Live, Emile.
Live, Emile!
Live. Live!
Live.
Live.
[Bloody Mary]
Miss Nurse.
Please.
Please, Miss Nurse.
Where is
Lootellan Cable?
Who are you?
I am mother of Liat.
Who?
Liat.
She will marry no one but Lootellan Cable.
Oh. Oh, my darling.
[Man On Speaker]
All right, hear this.
All those outfits that are waiting for loading, please keep in position.
We'll be loading immediately.
Hey, Billis.
Let's head back, huh?
Our outfit's about a mile back down the beach.
Suppose they call our names.
Yeah, they may be ready for us to board the ship.
They won't be ready for hours.
This is the navy!
Huh. Look at that beach, swarming with eager beavers.
10,000 guys.
All right, you men.
Stay down there with your own unit where you belong!
You Seabees, you belong down the beach this way.
Excuse me, sir.
Can you tell me where I can find Captain Brackett, sir?
Down the beach this way.
Thank you, sir.
That's all.
I beg your pardon, sir.
Can I speak to you a moment, sir?
Who is it?
Billis, sir.
Luther Billis.
Yes, Billis.
What is it?
We're moving out now.
I know, sir.
Stewpot, the Professor and me was wondering... if anything is being done about rescuing the Frenchman off that island.
We hereby volunteer for such a project.
A triple diversionary activity like I done to get him on there.
You could, uh
You could drop us in three rubber boats... on three different sides of the island.
Confuse them out of their minds!
Get the picture?
That's very fine, Billis, but you're too late.
Operation Alligator is under way.
Landings were made on a bunch of
Japanese-held islands during the night and early this morning.
Mary Louise Island was the first one they hit.
How about that Frenchman?
Did they get him?
- Is he alive?
- We don't know.
Lieutenant Buzz Adams flew up there to find out.
But it would be just too bad if a part of this huge operation couldn't have saved... one of the two guys who made it all possible.
The big ones are battleships.
And the little ones are, uh, destroyers.
They're moving out, you see, because well, there's been a big change.
They won't be around here much anymore.
Just off and on, a few of us.
Did you understand anything I said?
[Sighs]
Vous ne comprenez pas?
Oui, oui.
Nous comprenons.
Oui.
Now, while I'm down at the hospital, you've got to promise me to mangez everything everything that's put before you on the table.
Sur la table.
Sur "le" table?
Sur la table.
Oh. Sur la table.
Merci.
Jerome! Come back here and sit down.
Asseyez-vous!
Now, you have to learn to mind me when I talk to you and be nice to me too... because I love you very much.
Je t'aime.
[Chuckles]
Je vous aime.
Now, mangez.
Chantez, Nellie.
Mmm. I will not sing that song.
You just want to laugh at my French accent.
All right.
But you gotta help me.
# Dites-moi #
# pour quoi #
# La vie est belle #
# La vie est belle #
# Dites-moi #
# pour quoi #
Pour quoi what?
# La vie est gaie? #
[Both]
Papa!
# Dites-moi #
# pour quoi #
# Chere mad'moi selle #
# Est ce que #
# Par ce que #
# vous m'aimez? ##
Mangez. Mangez.
## [Orchestra]
## [Continues]
TEA FOR TWO
- Good afternoon.  - Good afternoon.
Guys, look what I painted.
We give up.  What is it?.
I found him in the trunk of my mother.  Before he dressed well.
And Halloween ?.
If you think this horrible, you'll see Richard.
Here comes the guy to fashion.
Estimate!
My father dressed like 20 years ago.
Looking like that, it's amazing they had not shot them.
How they could wear those outfits on the street ?.
And you have not seen anything yet.
May I have this dance ?.
- Look your best, Lynne.  - Come on, Richard, teach them.
- Come on, Richard, come on.  - Do not step on the feet.
- Watch your hands.  - Come on, Richard, come on.
Parad.
Parad.  Put away the disc.
- What's up, Uncle Max ?.  - I'll tell you what happens.
- What happen?.  - It is very easy to ridicule something.
But believe me, dressed like that, your precious mother was.
I know, Uncle Max. We were only having fun.
Rindoos of things you do not know.
We know all of 1 929. We have seen it in the movies.
The collapse of Wall Street and Prohibition.
Yes, that's when everyone drank either legal or not.
You were there?.
No, but I know the story.
There are some things...
... a man of the world like you never imagine.
-How about, uncle Max?. -Like this:.
Very bad things that paint, always can be worse go.
I always carry this over to make the same mistake does not happen again.
-It is a piece of paper. - But often piece.
The first saw this role, the end of the world thought that it was here.
Panlco in WALL STREET!
THE ACClONES is COLLAPSING
VlERNES black!
MARKET QUlEBRAN
Twenty-four, 23...
Eighteen...
.. .a and a half.
At ten. I am finished.
How is it possible.?
Max, as your attorney, I noticed that this was going to happen.
Who relies on a lawyer?.
As head of the inheritance of your niece, you should do what I tell you.
You should have it invested in government bonds.
And earn only a two and a half per cent?
Do I look you crazy?.
Today I won a fortune. I have sold down.
On the downside, he said.
-Was it sold who?. -To you.
Now I that I come down.
-How will I tell Nanette?. -Picks up the phone and call her.
That pick up...
It is not, in his dance class. I won't bother her.
-Why not?. -Perhaps its last dance.
Her uncle is in charge of its millions, she believes.
Someone should be charged with his uncle.
TOMMY TRAlNOR Professor of BAlLE
I know you know
That go where you go
You choose you, I will not let go
If only you knew how much I love having you in my arms
This time I'm me soon we say goodbye
In light of the stars, hold me
Give me one last kiss goodnight
I know you know
I'll go wherever you go
I choose you, I will not let go
If only you knew how much I like you in my arms
This time it's my turn soon we bid farewell
In light of the stars, hold me
Give me one last kiss goodnight
- What I have done ?. - great.
- If you were back. - Always I have eyes for you.
- Nan, sit down. - Thank you.
With the money you have, why you see these beatings ?.
Because I want a shot at the theater.
I am flesh scenarios.
- Basically we are all actors. - Yes.
Does the stock market crash has affected you much, Nan ?.
No, I have a very clever guy. My money is in bonds.
- You know what to do with your money ?. - What?.
If you marry me, you'll know.
- What a way to learn. - You do not get it.
Tommy wants a rich girl who retire from this life.
- Someone should. - Yes.
Take me to the hut on the hillside ...
... where I spend the rest of my life ...
... watching the kilometric meadows of greenbacks.
Nanette Carter, what a surprise. How strange to find you here.
- How did you know I was here ?. - It's Elementary.
Singing lessons on Mondays and Wednesdays. Dance classes on Tuesdays and Fridays.
You take a very organized life.
Well today I have no time for you.
Wait, do not be like that.
I did not want to see you until you give me the loan.
Okay, we argue about money.
Every time I call you, give me pumpkins.
I've missed you, baby.
My flame still burns.
There is a etintor on the wall. I have to get dressed.
It becomes hard, but casting for me.
Yes, obviously.
If Bee Darcy learns that, you'll end up with a black eye.
Still, I do not let my girls combined.
Each is in a different class.
If you pasarais more time rehearsing ...
... instead of giving advice and dance classes, we would get something.
You can not expect us to live with the money we have.
The stock has broken. The money is immobilized.
You have to help me Nan again interested in the work.
No way. These shenanigans are up to you.
It's a lovely girl and does not deserve that.
Someone has to do something.
Speak to the songs. Bring back to go to the theater.
For the engatuses ?. No way.
It's a great work. It will triple your investment.
Tripling ?. Maybe.
Hey, every day spends more money playing Chinese dominoes.
Stop worrying about it.
Grab your coat. We have to take her to the theater.
Wait a minute.
Why do I have to stay to take her to the theater ?.
What are you complaining about ?. Look who I am.
- A five-minute break. - How are you, gentlemen ?.
Larry is trying to get money for costumes and scenery.
- And that?. - He wants to see a couple of songs.
- Have you prepared "Crazy Rhythm"?. - I always am.
It will show that.
Just I ask them some of your time and money.
If this work is released, will recover 100 percent of every dollar.
- I guarantee ... - Mr Blair, can we talk ?.
Not now, dear. I am busy with these gentlemen and ...
Gentlemen, I present Miss ...
Mabel Wiley. Mr Blair promised me a role in the play.
But so far I'm just a pony.
- What's that ?. - A pony.
Jargon theater. A dancer.
It's a very attractive young Blair.
I think I could find a role for her.
Of course. Honey, go back to your companions block.
What are we waiting for ?. Come on, Tommy.
Here we are ready. Come on, let's begin.
GIVE YOUR imagination.
Imagine the beautiful scenery that Mr. Woltz going to give us.
- And the great costumes Mr. Grover. - Maybe.
Imagine it, gentlemen. It's great.
The appeal of the forest, the sound of drums.
La locura de "Crazy Rhythm".
Idlewild, this is the output
I'll go over here and you over there
Idlewild From now on we finish
Now we face
I am very snobby and you simple
Idlewild, I bid you farewell
They say that when a snobbish know someone simple
Walking on Broadway
And drawing is stranded
What a job is your fault
What does Prohibition? All continue drinking
Idlewild I also have gone crazy
A great number, right ?. I have ten more like that.
- The work will be successful. - That is yet to be seen.
It is infallible, I never failed. Ask around and you tell them how I am.
We have done and what they have done.
Well, they asked who should not.
Did Nanette come out here to give me money ...
... if I was not sure it is a success ?.
- Talk about HB Carter's daughter ?. - I do not mean to Little Red Riding Hood.
Do you know Miss Carter ?.
Know her?. We're engaged.
I did not want the girl metiese in showbiz ...
... but I he begged crying.
This is a small part of the work. The first number is spectacular.
First act, the curtain rises.
Imagine 40 beautiful girls.
Well, 30.
I am sorry. I am so sorry.
End of the first act. The second is completely different.
The curtain rises.
Okay, Blair, that's enough.
I want to give you an idea.
We'll discuss it and we will reply on Monday.
- See you later, Blair. - But they have not seen the third act.
- Larry wants you to see the trial. - And my bank account.
Hi.
Nanette, honey.
What joy that you came.
You've delayed. Were you watching Uncle Max won another million ?.
- Who are the suits ?. - lnversores in decor and costumes.
They want to participate in the work, but the reserve for the ideal person.
What took you so long, baby ?.
It has cost me convince her that this was her place.
Saba que no podras seguir enfadada conmigo tras verme.
- As es la vida. - De las cucarachas.
- Nan ha venido a ver un ensayo. - Por qu la llamas Nan?.
Quieres que la llame Lucille?.
Llmala seorita Carter.
Ahora que has vuelto a mi vida...
...a lo mejor acabamos haciendo un viaje a las cataratas del Nigara.
He venido a ver los nmeros, Larry, no para hablar de las cataratas del Nigara.
El teatro es todo tuyo, nena. Pronto pararemos para comer.
T y yo iremos a Antoine's para una comida romntica.
- Hoy no puedo. - Claro que s. Lo tengo todo listo.
- Qu nmero quieres or?. - Quiero que oiga "Tea For Two".
"Tea For Two"?. Es el ms flojo de la obra.
Estoy pensando en eliminarlo.
Venga, tcale "l Only Have Eyes For You".
Vale, como quieras. Nan, sintate en la primera fila.
Ponle pasin, Jimmy. Djame sin aliento.
Tranquilo, Casanova. Yo te dejar sin l.
Hola, pocholita, cre que estabas entre bastidores.
Ya lo he visto.
Cundo ha vuelto doa Millones?. Y a qu ha venido el beso?.
Fue un seuelo. Los dems estn arruinados.
Ella tiene ms dinero que los bancos. Tengo que conseguir que invierta.
Los chicos me estaban atosigando.
Supongo que la comida romntica en Antoine's es parte del plan.
No le voy a sacar 25 000 invitndola a un bocadillo.
Para eso necesito un ambiente con luz de velas.
Y mientras t preparas el ambiente, dnde como yo?.
- En la cantina como siempre. - Ya me lo imaginaba.
En cuanto me extienda el cheque para producir la obra, ir a buscarte.
Menudo caballero ests hecho.
Mientras t te pones ciego a perdices...
...yo me tengo que conformar con jarrete de bfalo.
Calm down, okay, baby ?. Okay, Jimmy, began.
You have off today the stars?
I do not know if it is overcast or clear
Porque solo tengo ojos para ti
Querida
La Luna puede estar brillando
Pero no veo nada en el cielo
Porque solo tengo ojos para ti
I do not know if we're in a garden
Or on a crowded avenue
You're here
And I also
Perhaps we surround million people
But all disappear
Of my sight
Because I have eyes only
Para ti
You're here
And I also
Perhaps we surround million people
But all disappear
Of my sight
Because I have eyes only
Para ti
It is beautiful, Jimmy.
Each number is. The public will go crazy.
You will not regret investing 25,000 dollars.
I do not remember saying that I would.
Wait, we're not going to eat ?.
- I kind of singing. I can not. - And the 25,000 ?.
If you spend on the road kill rabbits heal.
It's not about the money, Larry, but by your attitude.
What attitude ?. Do you think you fool ?.
No?.
Maybe he did with others, but you do not.
- Sorry, I do not trust you. - Wait.
You could manage 15,000.
Adis, Jimmy. Adis, T ommy.
Goodbye.
I wonder if Ziegfeld had to go through all this.
Tommy, Jimmy, meeting in the lobby.
Still I do not understand.
Si se ha negado a darte el dinero, por qu vamos a su casa?.
Acaso Babe Ruth se rinde cuando le han hecho dos strikes?.
A ti he han hecho cuatro.
Y qu quieres que haga?.
Cuntale una historia trgica. Se derrite si alguien est en apuros.
Ni hablar. No pienso ser cmplice para que te beneficies.
Ella tambin lo har. Doblar su inversin.
- Vale, y por qu no lo hace l?. - La conozco desde hace mucho.
No puedo sacarme una madre enferma de la manga.
Y l no tiene ninguna enfermedad.
Si con una pierna rota sirve, yo podra romprsela.
Es aqu. Mirad qu choza.
Hemos llegado, chicos.
Vale, amigo, qu dice el taxmetro?.
- Tres con 75. - Tres con 75?.
Puedo comprar AT&T por menos. Aqu tienes un dlar.
Uno 75, uno 78...
No os quedis ah. Contribuid.
La cosa va a andar muy justa. Ah tiene un pavo.
- Le sirve un dlar mexicano?. - No.
Dame esas monedas. Dos con 84.
- Ah van otros diez centavos. - Y aqu 25 ms.
- Le sirven sellos por 12 centavos?. - Nada de sellos.
Diez, 35, 45, 95 y 2,78 suman justamente 3,75.
Vamos, chicos.
Pens que no nos llegara.
- brete ssamo. - No me gusta el plan.
Vaya, he muerto y estoy en el infierno... Si es Larry Blair.
Sigo sin caerte bien?.
Te deseo una luna de miel en Birmania y una bonita casa en Hell's Kitchen.
Ahrrate los chistes. Quiero ver a Nanette.
Creo que se ha vacunado contra ti. Ir a ver si ya est a salvo.
Encantadora, verdad?.
- Nos volvemos a casa andando?. - No tenemos dinero ni para eso.
Si dejas de cantar, traigo un mensaje del Averno.
He parado. Qu ocurre?.
Si soy educada, dira que esa sanguijuela ha vuelto.
- Larry?. - Hola, nena.
No esper a un gran recibimiento. Saba que te alegraras de verme.
- Eso es gratis. - No vale ni un centavo ms.
Hola, Jimmy. Hola, T ommy.
- Hola, Nanette. - Hola, Nan.
Encantada de veros.
No quera venir aqu as, pero Larry ha insistido.
Eso se le da muy bien.
Qu hacemos aqu de pie?.
El to Max an tiene ese licor de gran graduacin?.
- Qu tal un whisky de verdad?. - No prefieres champn francs?.
- Estupendo. - Pedir que te hagan un pasaporte.
Pauline, te importa decirle a Stevens que nos sirva unas copas?.
Ya volvemos al cuento de siempre.
If you come by the issue we talked about in the theater ...
... it is settled.
We get the money elsewhere.
The boy was bummed because they heard their other songs.
Se mora por tocrtelas. Vamos, Jimmy.
Conmuvela.
Me gustara que oyera "Tea for Two".
Por qu pierdes el tiempo en ese bodrio?.
Tcale "l Wanna Be Happy". Esa vender un milln de copias.
Deja que toque lo que quiera.
Imagnate sobre mi regazo
T para dos y dos tomando t
Solos t y yo, juntos t y yo
Te gusta?.
Tiene ideas geniales.
Canciones que harn del mundo un sitio mejor.
Est bien orte apreciar a alguien que no seas t.
Ese chico me ha conmovido.
Con esas melodas salidas de un corazn lleno de dolor.
- De dolor?. - Su madre es invlida.
Se ha gastado una fortuna en mdicos. No pueden hacer nada por ella.
Es horrible.
Y tambin tiene una hermana, una chiquilla maravillosa.
Depende de esta obra para mandarla a Arizona.
Por qu no me lo ha comentado?.
No es de esos. Es demasiado orgulloso.
Tengo miedo de que la frustracin le mine su talento.
Seguramente no vuelva a componer en su vida.
Lo has bordado, chaval.
Crees que es buena, Nanette?.
Creo que es fantstica.
Prubala conmigo.
- Adelante, nena, cntala. - Me encantara.
I'm not happy with the houses I've rented
So I invented a
Dear, this place is an oasis
Where life is uncomplicated
Away from the bustle of the city where the beautiful flowers
Pet currents
A cozy hideaway in which to live together
Do not let more in my dreams
Imagine my lap
Tea for two two drinking tea
Just you and me
Together you and I
No one can see us or hear
No friends or acquaintances and vacation weekend
We never hear anything
It is our
Phone
It will dawn and wake
And prepare a cake
To give to children
And they see
- We will form a family - will form a family
A boy for you, a girl for me
- Now you can see how happy - Now you can see how happy
- we would be - we would be
- it sounded great. - Great.
- It's a beautiful song, Jimmy. - The first time you sing well.
- I think something is missing. - A voice like Nanette.
Quiet, Bee embroiders the song.
Yes, in New York and Philadelphia at a time.
This song would give me to know and solve all my problems.
Larry, I changed my mind. I'll give you the money you need.
You're wonderful. Defraudaras we knew not.
- You have a lot of tenderness and sensitivity. - And a lot of money.
A toast to you, baby, and for our prosperous society.
And it will put money, why can not the protagonist ?.
- Jimmy, do you think I could do it ?. - I know you could.
If you were not good, it would be the first to tell you.
- We need you more than you do us. - Quiet.
It's a great idea, but maybe Nan creates ...
... which it is not yet ready for Broadway.
Larry wants to wait until he is old enough to play a grandmother.
Why?. It is a new face with a fresh personality.
It's just what we need. And it will never be more prepared.
Ready to do ?. Or I am I too young to know ?.
Larry's work. I would love to play the lead, Jimmy.
- I've been my whole life waiting for that. - Come on, Larry, has natural talent.
Do not get into that. I decide those things.
I would give the role right away, but what about Bee ?.
I can not break my word just like that.
As this work is successful, I'll make one for you.
This whiskey is very soft. I have not heard anything.
Listen, Larry, I try to succeed.
If Bee going to mow my songs, I'd rather not sing.
Not you.
Would not invest a dime without your songs.
Wait, you're right. Bee Sally would do very well.
- This guy would sell his grandmother. - Baby, you'll be the star.
Give me the money and go to prepare everything.
Half the country is without an ... penny.
And you're going to entrust your money to Louie Pilferer ?.
You do not need a secretary, but a guardian.
I know what I do, Pauline.
Tomorrow you will have the money. I'll ask Uncle Max to sell some bonds.
Okay, I'll leave the details to you. Let me know as soon as everything is ready.
- Come on, guys, Circle 0. 6-101 - 6-101 0 Circle.
If you still have money, marriage proposal still stands.
- Goodbye, Tommy. - Goodbye.
Bye. I hope tomorrow at the theater at 10: .30.
Do not be so sure. At ten o'clock I will have locked up in the nuthouse.
Back to the load, baby.
Do not forget, Circle 6-1010.
OK, bye.
- Goodbye, Nan. - Goodbye, Nan.
- Call Uncle Max. - That guy has made you a fool.
Stop worrying, Pauline.
I've gotten what I want for less than you expected.
Call Uncle Max, quickly.
Mine is not to ask, but call.
Ladies and gentlemen...
... a message from the President of the United States of America:
The country's economy is built on a solid foundation.
Aumen banking revenues ...
Maybe in Washington remains solid.
Tell me, how spoiled I ?.
It will take weeks to calculate not have enough money ...
... to pay accountants.
Yes, what I do ?.
Live simply. Maybe in six months the shares go up again.
Maybe in six months is not the same.
The first thing to do is to cut costs Nanette.
If you do not, you'll have to mortgage the house in Westchester.
No, no, no, I never blow the house Nanette.
I promised that to his father.
I...
- Say ?. - Hi, Uncle Max.
Nanette is. What do I tell them?.
The truth. Someday you'll have to do.
How will I explain that everything is on paper money ?.
How do I explain that ?. Say ?.
I'm sorry, dear, I can not talk now.
I have a shareholders meeting.
All day.
I will return home soon.
Beware.
Oye?.
And do not spend more money.
No, not shopping ...
Goodbye. If, according.
Everything I did was for the good of Nanette.
That is wrong?.
These actions were.
Besides, you've invested in any botched who have offered you.
Texas oil, gold in Alaska.
No, no, no, gold was in Texas and oil in Alaska.
Anything luxurious, expensive and sumptuous.
That reminds me, see.
I want to show you something, come.
Now I'll teach you something.
Look.
What the hell is that?.
It is called Don Irons.
It is a rack of pants you the plate at a time.
The amazing thing is how this gadget works.
I'll show you how it works.
Wait.
By the saints.
Why doubt everything ?.
Sometimes the simple things give big dividends.
Tie pins, zipper.
Do not forget pins for diapers.
It was not my fault that they were not so sure that undid diapers.
This invention could give us millions.
First, you put the plug.
And in a ...
Mr. Bloomhaus, call this number.
It's just a demonstration, Hattie.
Do not worry, Mr. Bloomhaus has always been an eccentric.
What do you mean eccentric ?.
It is an expression used in the madhouse.
Come on, you ensaar this.
At night, this tube is heated.
And passes between pants.
In the morning, straight out of the cleaners.
Yeah, well, I'm sorry, but I can not spend the night waiting ...
... because I have a trial.
Remember, the expenses are over.
Cut off the tap Nanette expenditure for the remainder of the year.
Quiz no consiga nada, pero hablar con ella.
Podras solucionar muchas cosas si por una vez dijeras que no.
No a qu?.
A todos los que entran por esa puerta ofrecindote un negocio o un invento.
Nigate de vez en cuando.
Si pudieras decir que no en lugar de s durante 24 horas...
...te habras ahorrado cientos de miles de dlares.
Recurdalo.
No, no, no. S, s, s.
Palabras.
No, no, no.
WALL STREET VUELVE A HUNDlRSE
"El mercado de valores vuelve a hundirse.
Prdida de miles millones.
Los bonos del Estado se mantienen".
Incorprate, querido. Voy a ponerte cmodo.
No, no te preocupes. Eso me acercara al peridico.
Venga, as.
- As est mejor?. - S, mucho mejor.
- To Max... - Nanette...
Te ha gustado la cena, querido?.
S, mucho. Un poco cara, quizs.
Quizs deberamos ahorrar un poco.
Ahorrar el qu?.
Ha sido una cena sencilla. Rosbif, ensalada y crpe suzette.
Un par de huevos fritos tienen las mismas vitaminas.
Y el pollo sabe igual y cuesta menos.
Y a sabes que los huevos te causan indigestin.
Y otras cosas tambin.
- Nanette, mi... - To Max...
To Max, tengo una sorpresa para ti.
Tiene una sorpresa para m.
Le sirvo una copa, seor?.
No, no, no, me la servir...
Mi whisky se consume solo.
El alcohol se evapora en verano, seor.
S, pero ni en el Shara se habra evaporado tanto.
Te contar la verdad, to Max. Larry ha estado aqu.
Hemos hecho las paces.
Para colmo de males, esa sanguijuela vuelve a mi vida.
Vaya.
- Desea algo ms, seor?. - Qu ms voy a querer?.
Ponle un candado a todo. Incluidos los candados.
Muy bien, seor.
Larry ha cambiado, to Max.
Se ha ablandado.
S, con este whisky, cualquiera lo hara.
Every time I see Larry Blair, I smell fishy.
Quiet, dear. I know what I do.
I want you to hear something.
Are you going to tell me something else ?.
A beautiful song.
I'm in no mood for songs.
He has composed a brilliant composer, Uncle Max.
A friend of mine.
Did he also has softened ?.
You listen.
Imagine my lap
Tea for two two drinking tea
Just you and me
Together you and I
No one can see us or hear
No friends or acquaintances and vacation weekend
We never hear anything
Than our phone
It will dawn and wake
And prepare a cake to give
Children and see it
We will form a family
A child for you
A girl for me
Now you can see how happy
We would be
- How about?. - Very nice, but I've had enough of tea.
I took six cups at dinner.
Just relax I will serve a good drink.
Relax, he says.
You'll see when you see me sing a crinoline dress ...
... a skirt of straw and an umbrella.
Another costume party.
Nani, how much does a dress like that ?. only $ 25,000.
I already clean. Do not move.
I can not move.
I want to invest in the work of Larry, Uncle Max.
In the work of Larry. That's different.
I thought ... What ?.
I will play the lead.
For $ 25,000 you could interpret all the papers.
Definitely.
Just sell some of my bonds.
That no doubt. Yes that's impossible.
You have to cut expenses.
This is not an expense, Uncle Max, it's an investment.
Twenty-five thousand dollars is a drop of glass.
Have you seen the glass lately ?.
No, and I do not want to talk about this.
But you'll have to do it because I have already accepted.
That's the problem.
Everyone says yes.
If all say no, banks would again be filled.
- What are you talking about?. - Sit down.
Sit down.
If you said no to everyone for 24 hours ...
... I would save hundreds of thousands of dollars.
Could you be clearer ?.
Do not you speak clearly ?.
Hundred thousand dollars if you say no for 24 hours.
Are you serious?.
Otherwise, he would not open his mouth.
Uncle Max, accept the bet.
I ... What bet ?.
For $ 100,000, I will say no to everything for 24 hours.
Do not be absurd. I repeat only what Early ...
I'll give you better terms.
Conditions or probabilities ... I do not care.
It's ten o'clock on Saturday.
I say no to everything for 48 hours ...
... and you just have to give me $ 25,000.
If I open my mouth, you put your foot me.
You just say what you say is always serious.
- Are not you going to keep your word ?. - That's not the point.
And how will I know if you say yes or no ?.
Uncle Max, since I was little ...
... you and I have played all without cheating, right ?.
You do not trust me?.
With my life.
But this is money.
Well, we'll put in the hands of a third person, okay ?.
Pauline!
Luckily, I was expecting attached to the lock.
Something wrong?.
I have wagered $ 25,000 Uncle Max ...
... that I can say no to everything until Monday at ten.
That has nothing unusual.
But we'll have to pad the walls.
You have to stay with me to check that I meet the bet.
What kind of bet ?.
You're not risking anything.
I'm playing my chance to accomplish that for which I worked.
And if I lose, I will not ask anything for a year.
Forget the matter ...
- For a year?. - Yes.
Three hundred sixty five days.
Less leap years, which do not help much.
Only basic expenses.
No more minks or singing lessons or dance ?.
And no party ?.
Not even a new dress.
Will it apply to all questions ?.
You will not do a ruse to change the meaning ?.
A non-direct every question.
I swear.
- Preparations. - Ready.
Ya.
- Well ... - This is gonna be fun.
Funny, yes.
I'm already laughing.
If I gave you the money now, we nullify the bet, right ?.
No.
And do not try more childish tricks.
If I had said yes and no when it should, today would be rich.
Do you want anything else, sir ?.
Bicarbonate.
And call my lawyer.
I'm back in trouble.
Very well sir.
US president. UU. assures the people ...
... the economy ...
... it sits on a solid foundation.
- Stevens! - Ayer, en Washington...
See how you get through this.
A strong and prosperous basis.
Larry?.
I'm sorry I delayed so much.
It's okay, honey.
I've been waiting sitting in my old iron bedstead.
Everything is going well. On Monday I will have the money.
Well, I knew you would not fail me.
I can now go to sleep.
Come to the theater early morning.
Sweet dreams, dear.
We have 25,000 pocholita. The work is underway.
Here, take a receipt from the pawnshop. I invite.
It's my platinum watch.
Larry, you're wonderful.
I know, dear, but not even tell me.
Larry.
- Hey, we've been waiting for. - Hello.
- Yes, we were expecting. - It's a beautiful day.
Nice conversation for ten o'clock.
- I was afraid you'd changed your mind. - You do not know me well.
I'm Pauline Hastings, in case anyone cares.
- Secretary of Miss Carter. - I've been promoted to a researcher.
What has come to Larry ?.
It's in the lobby with wolves.
If Nanette Carter does not arrive in five minutes ...
... there will be neither first nor second act.
He arrives with some delay.
A effrontery when someone with the ethics of Gandhi and genius of Ziegfeld ...
... it must deal with the bills.
But there comes 25 minutes late.
Put 25 grand. They are a thousand dollars a minute.
Do you know someone who would pay more ?.
They are there.
There is plenty here to speak.
Nan, dear.
I was worried about you. I thought maybe you had an accident.
No, he was unlucky. It could come.
Why did you bring to it ?.
Control of epidemics.
Have you told Beatrice that would make your role ?.
And I'll tell you later, baby. I'll introduce you to the guys.
Come on, Pauline.
Do you see what I'm saying ?.
We'll see at the end, Nan.
I want to introduce you to Nanette Carter, the future Mrs. Larry Blair.
A future unlikely.
- How is it?. - Congratulations.
Miss Carter, to the point.
Miss Carter, are you willing to pay the debts of Mr. Blair ?.
- I ... - Be careful.
No.
Do not?. You do not understand, baby.
I'll talk about that $ 25,000 on Monday.
I know, and on Monday will.
- Okay, on Monday it will be fine. - You tricked me for a moment.
Can we trust you will have a check for $ 25,000 on Monday ?.
I...
No.
Someone offered 50,000 ?.
Do you support this gentleman ?.
No.
That's all I wanted to know.
Sorry.
- And me too. Bye. - Bon voyage.
How did you do this to me ?.
It has been a pleasure.
Larry, do not worry about anything.
What do you mean?.
I just lost the stage, costumes and theater.
The'll recover on Monday when you deliver the check.
- You said you'd not Monday. - Yes, I will.
I wish people would stop asking me questions.
What else get questions ?.
- Could not you have said yes ?. - Do not.
One of us has gone mad.
Do you know what this means?.
The cast will separate and showgirls seek other jobs.
You can not take them home until Monday.
That will be great.
40 What ?.
Why not?. We have enough food, right, Pauline ?.
If not, they will eat each other.
- What if Uncle Max does not give you the money ?. - It will.
- You just said ... - Forget what I said.
Trust me.
Now invite them all to my house in Westchester.
I'll have to spin all this in my head.
You'll be very lonely up there, buddy.
- Larry. - Vamos, Larry.
Come on.
Yes.
Larry.
Sometimes I think you're losing it.
How did you do such a stupid bet ?.
Believe me, it was not easy.
What it makes you think he has not said yes while not saw ?.
His word. Nan would never cheat.
If you were not an old bachelor you would know women.
Earned talk like you.
Okay, William, stay on Sunday.
We will spend a good weekend in the countryside.
We will relax and enjoy the calm.
Okay, I could use a break.
Early, look what they're doing.
Those idiots are wrong.
Hey, return it.
Return, it has the wrong address.
We have pianos.
And you say it, buddy.
This is the third we have brought this morning.
- Go. - We bring 36 beds and blankets.
Where do you want to say that ?.
Do you think they have come to declare war ?.
I can not...
Fast with that piano. We are waiting.
Do not stay there, you check them a hand. We have to rehearse.
- This is my home?. - Yes.
William, mira.
Who are these people?.
I do not know?. They are half naked.
Come on.
Pauline.
Welcome to the Hostal de la Locura.
I am a mixture between setter and waitress.
Who are all these people ?.
Actors or lunatics. It is not clear to me yet.
Do you see what I mean ?.
What language is...?.
Swiss.
Where is Miss Nanette ?.
I'm in no mood for riddles.
Look for it. I want to see.
Hey, I have to do 32 beds and sheets and three missing me.
Then make them. Tell him we're in the studio. Come on.
I would not take you there ...
Well, they are already older ones.
Max, this environment is not likely to do business.
Shame on you with that nonsense yes and no.
Never in my life ...
Come on.
Here we will be alone.
Girls, this is the idea.
Look at me.
You're annoying me.
Go away, please.
I can not believe it.
Outside.
When the sky is gray
And you say you're sad
I command the sun shining
I want to be happy
But I will not be
Until you're so
When the sky is gray And you're sad
What are you going to do?.
I command the sun shining
- I want to be happy - I want to be happy
- But I will not be so - but I will not be
Until you're so
I will also make you happy
You'll do great. You do not have to worry.
- Nerves put me goosebumps. - It's good. So you'll be careful.
Quiet. I will be until Monday night.
- What happens on Monday ?. - We give you a heart attack Uncle Max or me.
- Hey, Jimmy, what about your sister ?. - My sister?.
It's okay.
The doctor says he will bounce back leg.
Leg?. I thought were the lungs.
It is a vicious circle.
Someday I'll explain.
Can I ask you a personal question?.
I prefer not to do any question.
This is important.
Are you engaged to Larry ?.
It is something definite ?.
No, it is not definitive.
Does that mean you do not want him ?.
- No. - What does that mean ?.
Jimmy, stop asking me questions.
I have allergies to them.
I just want to make one more.
You give me a kiss?.
No.
Pauline, what do you want ?.
The remains I'm content.
You are looking for your uncle. It is foaming at the mouth.
Poor Uncle Max. I'll explain everything.
Where is?.
Surely under three acrobats.
Recorrerte'll have the house to find it. Excuse us.
Nothing happens.
Sign here, Nanette.
What nobody seems absurd this whole thing ?.
Nobody has asked you.
I volunteered.
May I go now?. I have to make 32 beds.
I want you to be the witness of the deal.
How do you want to sign ?. Annie clean sheet ?.
Can I ask where you sleep ?.
I did not know he was interested.
Until the completion of the contract ...
... will share the room with Miss Carter and be awake.
Why?.
You may say yes in a dream.
Do not we all ?.
And if you mention this matter, it will remain out of work.
And I will not make the 32 beds ?.
But if you hear Nanette saying yes, you receive a bonus of $ 250.
One moment.
Do you think you betray my best friend for 250 measly dollars ?.
I agree.
How about?.
Do it, do it, do it Do what you've done before, babe
Do it, do it, do what I do and I adore you
Repitmoslo
Sighs again
We'll heaven
Honey, it's very easy
- I love you and you love me - I love you and you love me
I know, I know, I know I know what I want suitor
So no, no, no Do not say no, no, no
Be honest, babe
My heart starts to hum
- While the gods as gods as long as - as long as when the gods as gods
Do it, do it, do it Do what you've done before
Do it, do it, do it Do what you've done before
Do it, do it, do what I do and I adore you
Let us repeat again Sighs
We'll go to heaven
Honey, it's very easy
- I love you and you love me - I love you and you love me
And darling, my darling My darling, come here
And you'll see, you'll see, you'll see that you make you happy
My heart begins to sing
- The di di the the the the - The di di the the the the
So do
Do what you've done before
- Done, done, done before - Done, done, done before
It's been great, Nan.
When Larry Blair invites a weekend, you leave.
If you do not find something, I pedidlo. Here money is not a problem.
Mr Blair, when rehearse my role ?.
Your role ?. Yes, do not go away.
Then we go over.
Okay, we go to the salon to try "Oh Me Oh My!".
Let's go.
Turning again.
Is this a work or a dance marathon ?.
Leave the whip for a while, Simon.
I will go, but I'll take the tea to keep me company.
No vaciis the pool until you return.
I'll be in the chair, Mr Blair.
Yes.
Sahib, their cigarillos.
Thank you. Grab a pair for the day.
Thank you, it will be a long day.
The lounge will be a little crowded.
For a partition strip. Do not bother me with trifles.
Okay, I hope you know what you're doing.
Hi.
Hello, then we stayed in the gazebo or something ?.
- I'll tell the gardener to build one. - All right.
Is everything alright?.
Great, baby.
Surely rehearse here all my works.
Fresh air and sunshine give me many ideas.
Why you did not come Miss Darcy ?.
Bee ?. I had things to do in the city.
Probably come tonight or tomorrow.
How has the change taken roles ?.
He was very glad when I explained the matter.
Bee does everything I say.
I wondered why he had not come.
I forget about it rather than cause problems.
You talk about not forget the matter. We all depend on you.
With that face, that body and voice. you'll not forget the check, right ?.
No, you'll have Monday night.
- Nan, waiting for you to try. - Good thank you.
Listen, hotshot.
You can fool Nanette, but not me.
What do you mean?.
You have not talked to Bee on changing paper.
Chopin, you devote yourself to the piano. I deal with sensitive issues.
You have not had the guts to tell him.
You give false hope to Nan to get the money.
When we're married, the money will be both.
I'm using my money, if you think a certain way.
Stop kidding yourself. He never marry you.
Who told you that?.
Your soulmate alleged.
As far as you're concerned, you would not mind to marry a chimpanzee.
And where you will find a chimpanzee with my talent ?.
Take, buy a driver's license.
Hey you, boy.
Dating ?.
One moment.
Are you who hired to play the butler ?.
What I do here I should not even happen to a dog.
- Who are you?. - Beatrice Darcy.
The protagonist of this mess.
I am looking for a treacherous and despicable leech.
I recognize that description. It is relaxing by the pool.
I'll settle the matter.
One moment.
Maybe it's better not bother now.
Why?.
He is busy contriving to Nanette Carter is the protagonist.
Nanette Carter?.
I'm the protagonist.
Maybe, maybe not.
Instead I would check it out. Go, run.
I'll find out, grandfather.
You can bet underpants.
I already I lost.
Not a very long paper. It's just one page.
It will grow over time.
Let us try.
I love you dear. I will always do it.
I can not help it.
Follow. What else does ?.
"Jasmine gives him a passionate embrace."
OK, follow the directions.
I have to do what you can offer.
Remember where we left off.
But Mr. Blair ...
You're not a seal, Roscoe. You have to go out and breathe.
The water is great, dear.
Have you brought your swimsuit ?.
I have a better idea.
Why did not you tell this party ?.
I figured you'd want the weekend off. Act in all numbers.
But now Nanette Carter will play my role.
It is an economic issue, and I'll fix it. Be good and leave the matter to me.
I just saw how you manage things.
I'll handle this personally.
Wait, baby, you're going to annoy me shebang.
Okay, guys, rest a while.
Now it is when it comes Miss Carter.
Take a good look.
Oh, me, oh, my, oh, your 1019 01: 01: 26,160 -> 01: 01: 30.073 I do not want another girl worries will end And this world will be splendid
If you molestases to be honest
Oh, me, oh, my, oh, your
Those lips, those blue eyes
You are a charm, a ricura
You make me take to fly
Oh, me, oh, my, oh, your
Okay, guys, follow me.
Just a moment. Wait.
Who do you think you try to gamble ?.
To nobody. Larry already told you that the roles were changed.
You are about to play Lucille. It is a very good role.
Yes?. What good for all.
I left lying in New York while ye invent a trick.
Well I'll tell you one thing.
I love show business. Not to you?.
Wait, I'll talk.
Careful where goteas.
Vale, Johnny Weissmuller, habla.
Wait to catch my breath.
Okay, be reassured. It's just a change of roles.
Nothing else. He was going to tell you, but I forgot.
You forgot it?.
You can forget to breathe.
Mr Blair, what about my role ?.
Quiet, beautiful, also llevars you what you deserve.
Be reasonable, Bee.
Sing "Call of the Sea", the best song of the work.
I will be the star and sing "Call of the Sea".
Tell Dona Ricachona to target their money elsewhere.
Look, all discussed without reaching any agreement.
I could solve this.
Who is this guy?.
It is Uncle Max, dear.
Okay, that me says it all.
Okay, Uncle Max, get out.
No, get the hell no. I stay here.
It is the guardian of Nanette.
Yes Dear. He has all the pasta.
Well, that's different.
Later, Uncle Max, say what you want.
What you want.
Nanette, dear ... Excuse me a second.
Do you think you can play the best role that this lady ?.
No.
Of course. Leaves it to the bitumen.
Over my dead body.
Nobody wants his body.
Do you think the music of this young ...
... it's good enough for your voice ?.
No.
You want to be the protagonist or invest in the work ?.
No.
Well then, tomorrow all the street.
The vultures will turn away home.
Come on, guys, espabilad.
We get the money elsewhere.
Come on, Jimmy, al keyboard bridge.
I will teach you how to sing that song.
Nice try, dear.
Nena, is an error. I'll fix it in five minutes.
You should have solved before, Larry.
Things look bad.
Very bad.
Nanette, dear, I'm sorry.
Nanette...
Sometimes a man would be better off hanging.
Oh, me, oh, my, oh, your
This is one of those times.
I'm not worth anyone else
Maybe I'm wrong, but I think you've been very odd lately.
Not so, Jimmy.
They are your imagination.
I do not understand any of this, Nan.
Sorry, Jimmy.
But maybe I should not do it.
If you can not tell me the reason for this sudden change ...
... at least tell me why you avoided me ever since.
She had a headache.
Y el to Max me dej quedarme en mi cuarto a cenar.
Necesitas su permiso para ir a tu habitacin?.
No.
Hay algo en todo esto que no acabo de entender.
- Quieres un cigarrillo?. - No, gracias.
Si no has dicho:. " No, gracias", debera ir a un psiquiatra.
He cambiado de opinin.
Parece que es lo mejor que haces.
Jimmy, siento mucho lo que dije antes de tu msica.
No lo deca en serio.
Creo que no decas en serio nada de lo que dijiste.
Y creo que s la razn.
En cierto sentido, me alegro de que la obra se cancele.
"Tea for Two" no habra funcionado sin tu voz.
Quin dice que la obra se ha cancelado?.
No creo que pongas el dinero despus de lo que te ha hecho Larry.
Oye, he dado mi palabra y soy como mi to Max.
Nunca falto a ella.
Todas esas personas han trabajado para que la obra sea un xito.
- We must not disappoint them. - It's a great way to see it.
Whether your songs I sing I or someone else ...
... they will be released.
And they will become famous. They are too good to forget them.
I would not bet anything.
I do.
They will give the world much pleasure and happiness, Jimmy.
Your mother and sister will be proud of you.
Yes.
I want to tell you something about them.
It is not difficult to understand.
Nanette had taken the bait until you get into the middle.
- shebang is you got out of hand. - That can happen.
Let's get married. I betray my future wife ?.
Dude, you betray yourself for a turkey.
I'm sorry you had to find out as well, Nan.
It's what I expected from Larry, Jimmy.
He has not done that all men hate, right ?.
That depends on the man.
Disculpad. Health.
It's not my business, but I think ...
... you are taking a beating.
I guess that is what it seems.
Why do not you miss running around the house screaming yes ?.
I would win a fur coat ...
... and Mr. Bloomhaus solve your heartburn.
Be careful with that iron. Biting.
I have already careful, sir.
I do not care what they say. Tomorrow I want my furniture back.
That's impossible, sir.
Stevens, given his experience ...
... How does a woman say yes ?.
At our age, sir, that's pretty difficult.
I plug wire is this, sir ?.
No, I plug myself.
Your so active.
Activate it.
Do you want anything else, sir ?.
- What happens?. - We are calling.
It is the setting of turn.
Turn off the light.
Why tell me that only girls ?.
Well, boy, I was not expecting you.
No, come to the window.
I want you to see something interesting. Come on.
Approaches. Will I boiling water ?.
- No. - This time could have said yes.
I would not have ratted.
Well, Valley Forge attacked barefoot.
George Washington. And shut up.
In. In.
Why do not you answer me?. I could break my chrism.
The staircase needs revision.
Do not be like that, baby. We can fix everything.
There was not invited because he wanted Bee you will interpret the role.
You have class, baby.
Bee is just a two-bit actress.
This will show who is the first for me.
Carefully, I'm falling.
COGEMA.
Hey, repeat. Nan has not seen.
Say ?. Listen?.
Who calls both ?.
Good morning, Max.
Ah, it's you, Early.
What unfortunately you tell me today ?.
Are good news.
If you can come to sign a permission before opening the bag ...
... would be able to save some property.
You have an hour to arrive.
- Right now I'll stop there. - Agree.
Will we get to my office at ten ?.
- No. - But you need.
Can not we go any faster ?.
No.
Forget the game yes or no, okay ?.
No.
We only have 20 minutes.
Maybe we kill, but get there in time.
More problems.
Good Morning. Do not you think I was going too fast ?.
- No no?.
It can explain everything, agent. I'm late for a meeting.
If I delay, I will lose a lot of money.
- Teach your driving license. - Driving license.
Are you Miss Nanette Carter ?.
No.
Of course it's Nanette Carter. It says there.
Just a moment. Is she not know who is ?.
Sometimes it confused.
- The car is yours, Miss ?. - Do not.
- Where did you get ?. - garage.
Ours ... our garage.
- Show me the record. - I do not have it.
One moment, agent. Now I give.
It can explain everything.
I have it in my pocket. In my pants.
I got into the ... Yesterday, I ...
I...
Or Basketball Golf ?.
Not that I like her business out legs in the air.
I get to New York before opening Wall Street.
You can follow the Dow Jones at the police station.
Agent, if you can stop until ten o'clock at night, I'd appreciate it.
I think that can be arranged.
Just a moment. I'm Max Bloomhaus Carter and Bloomhaus.
And I'm Terry Clancy Highway 31. Follow me.
You can not do this.
I have to be in New York before opening Wall Street.
Come on, Uncle Max, to the car.
Often outrage.
I am a US citizen and pay my taxes.
Or he did.
It is your fault. You stepped on the accelerator.
The stock market has already opened.
I'm losing money that I have.
The President of the United States of America repeats them ...
... the economy ...
... it sits on a solid foundation.
This is cruelty.
Hit a tree.
They will hear.
Mr Blair, would you want to test this morning ?.
Do I look that fancy me ?.
Despite the bumps, bruises, rain or snow ...
... the show must go on, Mr. Blair.
You ask who should not. Do not bother me.
Hello, two couples.
Where are you ?. Had you gotten
In the slammer.
We've been in the brig.
Good God, what have you done now ?.
I killed a busybody. often nicer suit. Who's your tailor ?.
You had thought it lost. Where were you?.
Where you should have been your last ten years.
Hello dear. I am beginning to worry about you.
Very moving, Larry.
The boy has received very bad news this afternoon.
- What bad news ?. - About her sister.
- Oh, no, Jimmy. - Wait a minute.
I did not want to tell you, but I've persuaded.
- You know how to deal with these issues. - What happened?.
Nothing. Because I have sisters.
My mother lives in Philadelphia and is like a rose.
It was a plan petty scoundrel to get you money.
Gracias, Jimmy.
But you tell me something I already knew. ravens and they will peck your eyes. You are a Judas.
- Shut your mouth. - You have thrown overboard the work.
But what do you care ?. You go to knight for life.
Very well, Lancelot, bring your songs ...
... to nightclubs and radio stations.
Stop whining. It'll give you the money.
Why do you think he will do after that ?.
Me dijo que iba a hacerlo por el bien de los actores.
De verdad?. Es genial.
Tu sigue con Bee.
Es igual que tu. Podis timaros mutuamente.
Se lo dir a la compaa. No quiero que pierdan el espritu.
Joven, ests enamorado de ella?.
- Qu?. - Es una pregunta sencilla.
Quieres a Nanette?.
Bueno, ya que lo pregunta tan sutilmente, s.
Por qu no averiguas si ella te quiere?.
Cmo?.
Es fcil. Pregntaselo.
Quiere decir que me da su bendicin?. Que me quiere?.
No, no, yo no. Pdeselo a ella.
Ahora est un poco disgustada.
Bien, as quiz diga que s sin querer.
Adelante. Vamos, no te acobardes.
Y no aceptes un no por respuesta.
Gracias.
Qu pasa, Jimmy?. Has tenido una idea nueva?.
No te culpo por estar enfadada. Tienes muchos motivos.
Es culpa ma que haya llegado a este punto.
Qu te ha hecho flaquear?.
He descubierto que estaba enamorado de ti.
No es un truco muy viejo, Jimmy?.
Solo te digo la verdad. No esperaba que me creyeras.
Bueno, ahora mismo es un poco complicado.
S, supongo que s.
Pero es la verdad.
Y solo quiero poder demostrrtelo.
Qu me dices, Nan?.
El to Max te lo ha sugerido?.
No del todo. Solo me ha respaldado.
Entiendo.
Tengo alguna posibilidad, Nan?.
Ahora mismo tengo que decir que no.
Quieres decir que si espero un poco podra ser que s?.
A eso tambin debo decir que no.
Entiendo. Nunca deb habrtelo preguntado.
Te gusta mi msica y he sido tonto por pensar que te gustaba yo.
Tu msica eres tu, Jimmy.
Entonces no puedes amar a uno sin amar al otro.
Nan, no te pido que pierdas el control.
Me conformara con que gustase un poco.
Te importo, Nan?.
No, Jimmy. No.
He hablado con el corazn y me llevo lo que me merezco.
- Adis, Nanette. - Jimmy, adnde vas?.
Al otro lado de la raya.
Nunca deb cruzar el lmite.
Callaos un momento, por favor.
Tengo que hacer un anuncio importante.
Dentro de un minuto, tengo una sorpresa para vosotros.
No puedo esperar.
- Lo he conseguido. - Salvada por la campana.
S, s, s. Nunca en mi vida haba disfrutado tanto decir algo.
Un momento. Nos cuentas de qu va todo eso?.
Le apost a mi to Max 25.000 dlares y he ganado.
Ahora podr decirle a Jimmy lo que realmente siento.
Dmelo a m. Jimmy se ha ido a Nueva York.
No, no se ira sin despedirse.
Olvdate de Jimmy. Eso significa que me das el dinero?.
Y yo soy la protagonista?.
Te quedas con el otro papel, nena. A trabajar, chicos.
Ahora eres mi nueva estrella.
Podr hacer una escena dramtica, seor Blair?.
Algrate, querida. Puede que Jimmy an no se haya ido.
To Max.
Qu pasa?.
Alguien me da la hora?.
Al sonar la alarma sern las 25.000 dlares y dos minutos.
Muy bien, to Maxie, dame el dinero.
Dmelo, dmelo, dmelo.
- Cmo est, seorita Hastings?. - Seor Early.
Qu hace aqu tan tarde?.
Tengo un desagradable deber que cumplir.
Nanette debe saber que el to Max no podr pagar esa ridcula apuesta.
Le importa repetrmelo ms despacio?.
Ser mejor que zanjemos este asunto cuanto antes.
- Estn todos ah dentro?. - S, vamos.
Dejad de tocar, chicos. Parad un momento.
Aqu hay alguien con un mensaje horrible.
Vamos, amigo, te toca.
Recoged las cosas y marchaos lo ms tranquilamente que podis.
Est interrumpiendo un ensayo.
No habr ms ensayos ni obra.
Qu intenta hacer ahora?.
Al parecer Nan est arruinada.
Y no podras sacarle ni un centavo con sacacorchos.
- Arruinada?. - No puede ser.
Me temo que temporalmente s, Nan.
Pero tena bonos del Estado.
Su to no confiaba en el Gobierno.
To Max, qu quiere decir?.
Querida, tu dinero lo invert...
...como un to holands que debi quedarse en Holanda.
Pero he ganado 25.000 dlares.
Puede que dentro de seis meses las acciones vuelvan a subir.
Seis meses?. Y qu comer mientras tanto?.
A los actores.
Y a te dije desde el principio que era una falsa.
Significa que no podr actuar?.
Te escribir una escena de un suicidio. La haremos juntos.
Aqu acaba mi fe en las personas. No me merezco un trato as.
Deja de meterte con ella. Ya tiene suficiente.
- No pasa nada. - Ah, s?.
Pues ahora mandas t. Te regalo toda la obra.
The libretto, music, contracts and all related debts.
I'm fed up.
Someone should take a good slap for this.
I'd love to help.
Have you hurt your hand ?.
Hence the piper leaves with rats.
And my ambitions with him.
Well, what's wrong with being broke ?.
I take all the ruined life and look at me.
There has to be better than that reason.
Sorry dear.
I know it's not much, but what else can I say ?.
I've been a fool.
Maybe everything I do is wrong.
I'm just a poor wretch.
No.
You're my uncle Max.
Maybe we lose money, but we have each other.
And now I love you more than ever.
Come on, cheer up both.
Love and money are not everything.
What am I saying?.
It was too good to be true.
A role on Broadway and Jimmy all in the same batch.
If that young man you deserve, you come back for you.
Of course. As he learns ...
What I told you ?. Ahead.
Good afternoon.
Is the.
Gayer than welcome.
I've been reviewing documents Larry pulled.
Maybe there's a chance to save the work.
Tommy, fortune why you want to marry me has evaporated.
Only temporarily.
The country's economy is built on a solid foundation.
Thank you Mr. Chairman.
I've thought about everything.
Larry the company has borrowed $ 10,000.
We need to raise 35,000 to take the work forward.
That's very encouraging.
We need to get them. It's a great opportunity to Nan.
You could buy Wall Street with $ 35,000.
And sidewalks.
Impossible, Tommy. Now only worth government bonds.
Until I have a new title :. No, No, Nanette ...
... and an idea to get the money.
But if you think that ...
That dancer is scheming something.
I'll pump him to know what it is.
Hey, light on his feet.
How are we going to get $ 35,000 ?. And he tells me.
Who in this wretched city, he had the integrity and vision ...
... to sell his best friend and is now lined pasta ?.
I join only happens :. Early Moe.
It is true. If you pass by my office ...
Haunted.
I love driving these quiet roads at night.
What you do, Mr. Early ?.
I prefer to drive during the day.
You do not have enough room ?.
I'm very comfortable, thank you.
- Thats weird. - What happens?.
I think I've run out of gas.
Oh, no, Mr. Early.
I'm sure you filled the tank this morning.
Mr. Early, how is it possible ?.
- What's that ?. - to run out of gasoline.
I did not know you were such a wild and impetuous boy.
- I assure you, Miss Hastings, I ... - Do not give me explanations, William.
Not that I do not trust you.
Is that...
You are very strong and ...
No, please no.
- Do not do it. - What I do?.
I do not trust myself in the dark with you.
Your personality can with me.
Where are you going ?.
A home like a good girl.
Goodnight.
Miss Hastings.
Pauline. You're hurt?.
I think I broke the tibia.
I'll help you get on the car.
No I can not.
- You can not go ?. - No no no.
I'm afraid you'll have to carry me.
You are very strong.
Hammer Thrower I was at Harvard.
1919 promotion.
WlLLlAM EARLY PRESENT A NO NO NANETTE
IN ASOClAClN WITH MAX BLOOMHAUS - PREMIERE
Very pretty. Beautiful engagement ring.
How much did you ?.
A fuel tank and a sprained ankle.
NO, NO, NANETTE the scenes Synopsis Act 1
Time - This House of Smith, New York
We're going to Atlantic City We prom dresses
We will soon see in a crowd
Before starting the holiday we only remains an obligation
Digmosle Nanette que venga
Why should we take Nanette? It will be another girl
Nanette falls well because we
Did I hear my name ?.
Let go
Let come.
No, no, Nanette
No no no no
No, No, Nanette, just hear that
I spend the day listening to it
No, no, Nanette, entertains my ears
No matter what you do
Someday I will get what I want
When I'm old and I go gray
But for now I'm still as ever
No, no, no, no, no, no, no, Nanette
No no no no no
ACT O 2 Beach Atlantic City
We took the suntan cream for a weekend at the coast
When the sea sings my name
It is a tempting call
I filled with euphoria
Call seems to go play
Come here and learn the old song
Fascination song of love
Something fills me with a thousand emotions
When the sea sings my name
When the sea sings my name
It is a tempting call
I filled with euphoria
Call seems to go play
Come here and learn the old song
Fascination song of love
Something fills me with a thousand emotions
When the sea sings my name
There is only one way to be happy
And it's making someone else happy
When the sky is gray And you say you're sad
I command the sun shining
I want to be happy
But I will not be
Until you so you're
And the fortuneteller tea leaves
They make it an evening to you and me
ACT O 3 - Country house of Smith, Atlantic City
And that's how your parents were married.
It's a great story, right ?.
Well, I liked it. And the other children ?.
They left in 1931.
They are Mom and Dad.
- Teach them costumes. - Voucher.
- Hello Dad. Hi Mom. - Hi Mom.
Behold.
- Where did you get that ?. - From your old trunk, Mom.
With this painting, how Dad married you ?.
- Because he had this painting. - Oh no.
Can not you do something with those kids ?.
Holy God. Do these monsters are our ?.
- I warned you about having children. - It was your idea, honey.
We will form a family
A boy for you, a girl for me
- Do not you see how happy would we be? - Do not you see how happy would we be?
I keep saying that song is bad.
Subtitulada por: SDl Media Group
[CASTlLlAN SPANlSH]
Send along another load
And win that war, win that war
One more to go and then one more
One more to go and then one more
One more to go, one more to go
Send them along and win that war
Send them along, send them along
Send them along, send them along?
Hey, you!
- Me?
- Your ID.
My which?
Oh, I ain't here to work.
- NoWhat for, then?
- I'm looking for a corporal named...
You can't go in to see a general without proper identification.
- You've gotta have a pass.
- Well, where do I get one?
From the security officer.
- Where's he?
- Securing himself, in Washington.
Your corporal will be a brigadier time he gets back here.
Lift 'em up and put 'em down
Lift 'em up and put 'em down
Mark time and lift your tootsies
Six inches off the ground
Lift 'em up and put 'em down
Marching all around the town
Company, squads right
That means turn around!
Wish that I was 21
- Squad, hup!
- Old enough to tote a gun
I'd go and be a soldier
They're the ones that have the fun
Wish I was a bugle man
Playing in the army band
I'd blow until I bust it
Playing in the army band?
Glad you could find the time to join us.
Hope we didn't inconvenience you,
Corporal.
Joe! Joe!
Wipe that smile off your face.
Fall in!
All guard, present arms!
Present arms!
All guard, order arms!
All guard, file!
At ease!
- Cindy Lou!
- Surprised to see me?
You can say that again.
Oh, Joe, I know
I ain't smart like you, but if the way I feel makes up for it, then I's way ahead.
- How you been, honey?
- Missin' you. My ma said...
- She all right?
- Uh-huh.
When I got your letter, she say
"Cindy Lou, you go see Joe off."
Woulda come anyway.
Hey, hey! Going to flying school's nothin' to cry about.
Either got to cry... or bust!
I'm so proud of you.
Come onto this side of the fence and tell me that.
- Can't.
- Why not?
- Got no pass.
- Just you watch.
Joe, don't get into trouble on account of me!
I never saw trouble look better.
Hey, Corporal! Pass that civilian.
- You're the Joe she's looking for?
- Nobody else.
- Why didn't you say you're his gal?
- All the way.
Then you're responsible.
All the way.
Hey, Dave!
Put away my gear for me, will ya?
Thanks.
Congratulations, Corporal.
That Air Corps was smart in picking you for officers' flying school.
Thanks!
- Hi, Carmen.
- Hi.
Well, get a load of
this hip-swinging floozy rolling around to work in time for lunch.
Hey, puss.
You make sounds I don't like.
I'm telling the foreman you was late again.
You do that and I'll scratch out the one good eye you got left.
Hey, Carmen. How about going to
Pastor's with me tonight?
I can dance those other guys right off the floor.
T- Bone, you too little and too late.
I don't waste no time. Dig me, baby?
Wastin' your time right now,
Sergeant.
The wind's blowing in another direction.
Ain't no use arguin' with the wind.
Hey, how about going out with me tonight instead of playing the field?
Yeah, Carmen. Pick out one.
That'll release the rest of 'em.
I won't pick out a man
And he won't pick out me
It don't go dat way
You can't ever know
Where your crazy heart
Wants to go
Love's a baby dat grows up wild
And he don't do what you want him to
Love ain't nobody's ngel child
And he won't pay any mind to you
One man gives me his diamond stud
And I won't give him a cigarette
One man treats me like I was mud
And all I got, dat man can get
Love's a baby that grows up wild...
Dat's love
- He don't do what you want him to
- Dat's love
- Love ain't nobody's ngel child
- Dat's love
- And he won't pay any mind to you
- Dat's love
You go for me and I'm taboo
But if you're hard to get,
I go for you
And if I do, then you are through, boy
My baby, dat's the end of you
The end of you!
So take your cue, boy
Don't say I didn't tell you true
You know you're through
I told you truly
If I love you
Dat's the end of you
You go for me and I'm taboo
But if you're hard to get,
I go for you
And if I do, then you are through, boy
My baby, that's the end of you
The end of you!
So take your cue, boy
Don't say I didn't tell you true
She told you true!
I told you truly
If I love you, dat's the end of you?
Gimme a chicken sandwich.
When your lover decides to fly
Dere ain't no door dat you can close
She just pecks ya a quick goodbye
And flicks the salt from her tail and goes
If you listen, then you'll get taught
And here's your lesson for today
If I chase ya, then you'll get caught
And once I got you, I go my way
- When your lover decides to fly
- Dat's love
- Dere ain't no door you can close
- Dat's love
- She pecks you a quick goodbye
- Dat's love
Flicks the salt from her tail and goes
Dat's love
You go for me and I'm taboo
But if you're hard to get,
I go for you
And if I do, then you are through
Boy!
My baby, that's the end of you
The end of you!
So take your cue, boy
Don't say I didn't tell you true
She told you true!
I told you truly
If I love you
Dat's the end of you!?
I hear you're gonna be a fly boy.
Congratulations.
Thanks.
I hope if you're gonna use a parachute, it's one I made.
I'd like to toss a party for you tonight at Billy Pastor's.
Give you a real send-off.
Pick me up at eight.
We'll have ourselves a ball.
Sorry. I've got a date.
Honeybee, if you change your mind, you know where to buzz me.
That girl's mighty pretty.
Oh, I don't know.
She's what the fellas back home call a hot bundle, I guess.
Yeah.
Looks like she's on fire just for you.
I never lit it, honey.
How do I know?
Cos I got a girl.
But I live in another town and I know what the fellas say.
"If you got a gal in another town, well, you ain't got no gal at all."
Yeah, but you're not just any girl,
Cindy Lou.
There's nobody in the whole worid like you. Nobody.
- Except...
- Except who?
The maw.
You talk just like my maw
You even walk just like my maw
And I know why I'm stuck on you
It's cos I'm just like my paw
I talk just like your maw
I even walk
Just like your maw
And I can see why you like me
Cos you is like your paw
- You's awful like your paw
- Oh
Let me tell you what the Lord did
He made me live next door
So we could fall in love
The way my paw and maw did
Is you my Cindy Lou?
I is your Cindy Lou
And I belong to you
And I belong to you
I is your Joe
My Cindy Lou
And I belong
To...
You?
- Cindy, suppose I asked my CO...
- Asked him what, Joe?
To write OK in triplicate.
And what if I found a chaplain and I said "Sir, here are orders for a rushed wedding"?
Joe...
No use waiting till the war's over for us to get married, not when I got a 24-hour pass.
Our honeymoon could be tonight.
What'll our folks say, us not getting married in church?
What do you say?
You wait right here while I go find the CO.
You blabbermouth witch! I told you if you told the foreman on me, I'd...
Go back to that bad street you come off of!
Take that off. What's this?
A full net of catfish!
Bail her out of that 'chute!
Who's responsible for this?
Me!
Corporal, take custody of that prisoner.
- Prisoner?
- Interfering with the war effort.
Destroying Government property.
You heard me.
Remove the prisoner off that table.
You go for me and I'm taboo
But if you're hard to get,
I go for you...?
Give this to the judge in Masonville.
Masonville?
You know the Army can't put civilians in jail.
Gotta leave that pleasure to the other civilians.
But I'm off-duty.
I got a 24-hour pass.
You mean you had yourself a pass.
This is an emergency.
- Sabotage, maybe.
- But Sarge, I don't see why...
You don't go to flying school till the morning which leaves all night to take care of the prisoner.
Here's the formal charges.
Judge sure to get it now.
Corporal, do your duty.
Take me to town.
Request a five-minute pass, respectfully.
What for?
- Private reasons.
- Request not granted, respectfully.
In case you forgot the manual, you're responsible for this prisoner until you dump her in the lap of the civilian authorities.
Now get going.
Carmen Jones is goin' to jail
Carmen Jones is goin' to jail
Carmen's gotta stay in jail
Sit all day upon her tail
Carmen Jones is goin' to jail
Carmen Jones is goin' to jail
Carmen's gotta stay in jail
Sit all day upon her tail
Carmen Jones is goin' to jail
Carmen Jones is goin' to jail
Carmen's gotta stay in jail
Sit all day upon her tail
Carmen Jones is goin' to jail
Is going to jail, is going to jail, hooray!?
Somethin' wrong, little gal?
He volunteered to take Miss Jones to jail.
Long way to town.
What you figure he got in mind?
Just shows, you can't trust no corporals.
Well, I trust Joe.
What's your rush?
The sooner we get there, the quicker we gotta bust apart.
Cut that out.
Get over where you belong.
That's just what I'm doing.
OK, honey, accelerate me all you want!
The harder I get bumped, the more of me bounces.
Sugar, you ain't gonna take me to the cooler, are ya?
I can't do you much good once I'm in jail.
What do you say we drive to a little place I know on the edge of town?
I'll show you more fun than you ever had.
You're going to jail.
Dere's a cafe on the corner
Run by my friend Billy Pastor
A spot where a man takes a lady when he wants to move faster
Guess I'll go and say hello to Pastor
How can a lady drink alone?
How can a lady dance alone?
No lady can romance alone
I ought to have a sweetie-pie
The one I had
I gave the air to
I threw his toothbrush out the door
Now that I'm free
My heart is sighin'
I'm off the hook and lookin' for more
Dozens of fellas telephone me
All asking me to make a date
I'm holding out for somethin' special
But I don't know
How long I'll wait
Where will I wind up?
Who'll I be true to?
Ain't made my mind up
Waitin' for you to
What you say, brother?
What you say, boy?
Ain't it time that we got away?
Ten o'clock sharp on the corner
See that you're right in there pitchin'
Cos I ain't the kind of a mare that'll stand without hitchin'
Now you got your little filly at the starting gate
Got a little filly who is raring to go?
No, you don't.
- I just want to stretch my legs.
- Stretch them in here.
Boy, you's the roughest of rough.
Won't even give me a little break.
Sorry, you're a prisoner.
You mean to say you're really gonna take me to jail?
You won't be in for long.
A minute's too long for me.
I can't stand being cooped up.
- An order's an order.
- Not here it ain't.
Aah!
Uh-uh.
That's no way to get to Masonville.
I'd like to see the road that can stop this baby.
You will, sugar.
Ain't no use.
You'll only get messed up.
Careful, honey.
You'll bust your gaskets.
OK, out!
Oop!
Boy, but you's strong.
Way you pulled me up like I was nothin'.
Bet you're a good dancer, ain't you, honey?
Maybe we could have us a lot of fun.
Now, if you ask my advice, you'd turn right around and go back as far as the railroad crossing, then along the track... till you get to Senatobia, which is my home town, where the train stops for Masonville.
You're trying to trick me and I know it.
I wouldn't do that no more.
Cross my heart.
OK, we'll do it your way.
Now get going.
And don't try nothing funny.
Believe me now?
When we get to Masonville.
Still don't trust me, huh?
Guess I'll have to work on it.
Hi, Willa.
Well, look who's home!
Carmen Jones!
Say, ain't that a brigadier-admiral you got on your arm?
Somethin' better.
This boy's gonna be a pilot.
Really?
Let's see now. Fly boy's gotta have something special for supper.
Well, how about a nice roast chicken, Carmen?
Yeah. Like that.
Hi, Harry!
Hi, Carmen. We got potatoes, beets, carrots, corn...
- And peaches right off the tree!
- Oh, peaches!
We can eat in Masonville.
Where's that train?
It ain't due till the moon's up. This town's the last stop for the moon.
Come on, I wanna know when that train comes in.
Not till ten.
I got time to cook you a supper you won't ever forget.
- Thanks, Harry.
- Thank you.
Oh, wait.
This is for you, fly boy... for free.
- It's mighty kind of you, but...
- We'll accept.
Hello, Grandma.
How you feelin', honey?
- I brought a fella home for supper.
- Hi.
Grandma, somethin' wrong?
- Trouble comin' your way. Soon.
- What trouble?
Found a buzzard feather on the doorstep.
- Buzzard feather?
- Just 'fore you come.
She's trying to keep the bad spirits off with that pail of water in the moonlight.
Let the ol' buzzard flap his wings right over me.
Till he comes down and gets me,
I got a lot of livin' to do.
Don't tell me you go for that junk.
Come on. Start the party rollin'.
Have yourself a drink while I get supper ready.
Thanks, but I don't drink.
Boy!
If the Army was made up of nothin' but soldiers like you, the war wouldn't do nobody no good.
Guess that's what
I like about you, though, Joey.
You ain't like the others.
No.
You ain't like them at all.
Say, that little candy-faced gal
I seen you with at the canteen, she your steady?
Uh-huh.
How steady?
We're getting married.
Soon as I get back to the base.
So that's why you were in a hurry to dump me off in Masonville.
I'm right in the way of your honeymoon.
But not for long.
- Ain't no way to get the mud off.
- It's OK.
Good thing you're getting married.
You need a gal to look after you in the worst way.
I'll do it.
You'll only mess yourself.
Don't want to get into trouble with them Army cops in Masonville.
You'll never get to flying school.
Bet when the war is over, you'll come home with a chest full of medals, and that gal... What's her name?
- Cindy Lou.
- Yeah.
She'll hand 'em out to all your kids.
Better win a lot of medals.
You and Cindy Lou'll need 'em.
One every year.
No bunch of kids for me, not till I can take care of 'em real good.
Got that all figured out too, huh?
I'm not going back to the farm.
I'm going to school, learn all about planes.
What you gonna do when the war's over?
The parachute factory's bound to close. You comin' back here?
Maybe. Maybe not.
I never figure from one day to the next.
Guess you don't have to.
You're sure to get a husband in any town.
MarriedMe?
Never.
Shoes need polish bad.
- I do my own.
- Not when I'm around.
Sure, you'll get married.
I bet you'll have all those kids you wished on me.
- Not a chance.
- Why not?
Ain't in the cards.
Look, you can't let that spooky stuff trip you up.
Signs never lie, Joe.
Just don't pay 'em no mind, Carmen.
A gal like you:
Why, there's nothing you couldn't get if you aim for it.
How do you figure that?
Just look at you.
You got a lot more than other gals.
A lot more what?
Got your belt on twisted.
I'll fix it.
What's the matter?
Still don't trust me, huh?
Or don't you trust yourself?
Carmen!
Carmen?
"Sorry, honey."
"Like I told you, I couldn't stand
being cooped up in jail. "
"I gotta be free to come and go
or I'd just die. "
"Don't hate me, Joey, cos I love you,
like I loved no man before. "
Prisoners, halt!
Left face!
OK, sit down.
Joe, honey,
I thought I'd never see you again.
I tried and I asked...
They don't allow no visitors the first two weeks in the stockade.
I'm sorry. Carrying on like this.
I made myself promise I wouldn't.
That's all right, Cindy.
How you been?
Waitin'. Just waitin' to see you.
Won't help none, you hanging around.
You oughta go home to your maw.
- You want me to?
- I was just thinkin' of you, Cindy.
Home's where you is, Joe.
You all right, honey?
How they treatin' you?
Fine, fine.
- When d'you think you'll get out?
- I can't tell.
They'll still send you to air school, you'll see.
- The truth is, Cindy...
- I know. Sergeant Brown told me.
But it don't matter to me none.
I know you, Joe.
I know you're done with that girl.
Joe, there's a package for you.
It must be from my maw.
I wrote her to bake something nice for you.
Time's up. Prisoners fall in!
Left face!
Forward... March!
Chow call! Come and get it!
This flower that you threw my way
Has been my friend
By night and day
I saw it fade
And lose its bloom
But still it kept
A sweet perfume
In my cell
Through every darkened hour
On my lonely eyes
Lay this flower
And so I'd sleep the whole night through
And dream of you
And dream of you
Then I'd wake up
With no-one near me
And talk for the jail walls to hear me
She ain't the best
They all the same
Like all the rest
She's just a dame
Then I told myself
I was ravin'
There was just one thing
I was cravin'
It wasn't food
It wasn't dough
I guess you know
That it was you
You're all I'll ever crave
And that's for true
I don't know anything about you
I don't know much about a shinin' star
Just know the worid is dark without you
That's all I know
I only want you as you are
Carmen
I love...
You?
Thanks for the lift, big oil man.
Going as far as New Orleans, if you wanna help the war effort, baby.
I got my battle station.
Anybody here ask for me?
The whole Army, that's all.
- Hi, Carmen.
- Hi.
You know who I mean.
No corporal by the name of Joe.
Go, Mack!
Go, Mack!
Go, Mack!
Go, Mack!
Go, Mack!
I'll tell you why I wanna dance
It ain't the sweetness in the music
I like the sweetness in the music
But that ain't why I wanna dance
It's something thumpin' in the bass
That thump-thump thumping on the music
That bump-bump bumping on the music
Is all I need
To start me off
I don't need nothin' else...
Maybe I do!
To start me off
Beat out that rhythm on a drum
Beat out that rhythm on a drum
Beat out that rhythm on a drum
And I don't need no tune at all
Beat me that rhythm on a drum
Beat me that rhythm on a drum
Beat me that rhythm on a drum
And I don't need no tune at all
A- all
A- all
A- all
A- all
I feel it beatin' in my bones
It feel like 20 million tom-toms
I know there's 20 million tom-toms
Beatin' way down deep inside my bones
I feel it beatin' in my heart
And then I get a kinda dream
And in my dream it kinda seems
There's one big heart
In all the worid
There ain't but one big heart...
One heart.
In all the worid
Beat out that rhythm on a drum
Beat out that rhythm on a drum
Beat out that rhythm on a drum
There's one big heart in all the worid
Beat out that rhythm on a drum
Beat out that rhythm on a drum
Beat out that rhythm on a drum
There's one big heart for all the worid
Worid
Worid
Worid
And now that heart is beating fast
And that's a rhythm I can dance to
I'm mighty glad I got a chance to
With the one big heart that's beating fast
Tomorrow morning let it rain
Tomorrow morning let it pour
Tonight we're in the groove together
Ain't gonna worry 'bout
Stormy weather
Gonna kick ol' trouble
Out the door
Beat out that trouble on a drum
Beat out ol' trouble on a drum
Beat out ol' trouble on a drum
And kick his carcass out the door
Beat me that rhythm on a drum
Beat me that rhythm on a drum
Beat out that rhythm on a drum
And kick ol' trouble out the door
Kick him out the door
Kick him out the door
Kick him out the door
Kick him out the door!?
Charlie, give me a double double on the rocks.
- Hey, Jones gal.
- Hi, Carmen!
- How's tricks?
- Ginger ale.
Slow, Frankie.
You still got a blowtorch for that boy in the stockade?
By now it ought to be so hot you could send it to the Navy.
They could use it to weld battleships apart.
That's how it is.
Husky Miller!
Thanks a lot, I'm sure glad to be
To be where I can see
So many friends of mine
How've I been doin'?
How've I been doin'?
If you really want to know the truth
I'm doin' fine
Seventeen decisions in a row
And only five on points
The rest was all KO
Jackson and Johnson
Murphy and Bronson
One by one they come
And one by one to dreamland they go
How's it done?
You ask me how's it done?
I got a trainer man
Who taught me all I know
Sure feels good to have him in my corner
Hear his voice a-whisperin' low
Big boy, remember
You must remember
Stand up and fight until you hear the bell
Stand toe to toe
Trade blow for blow
Keep punching till you make your punches tell
Show that crowd what you know
Until you hear that bell
That final bell
Stand up and fight like hell
When you fight out in the open air
In a patch of light, the ring looks small and white
Out in the blackness
Out in the blackness
You can feel a hundred thousand eyes
Fillin' the night
Cigarettes are blinkin' in the dark
And making polka dots around the baseball park
People are quiet
Then there's a riot
Someone throws a punch and plants it right
Smack on the mark
Someone's hurt
You kinda think it's you
You hang across the ropes
That's all you wanna do
Then you look round
And see your trainer's eyes
Beggin' you to see it through
They say, remember
Big boy, remember
Stand up and fight until you hear the bell
Stand toe to toe
Trade blow for blow
Keep punchin' till you make your punches tell
Show that crowd what you know
Until you hear that bell
That final bell
Stand up and fight like hell
Stand up and fight
Stand up and fight
And fight
Like hell?
Three cheers for Husky Miller, the comin' champion of the worid!
Hooray!
Drinks for everybody in the house.
Inform the gentleman behind the bar.
Set 'em up drinks on Husky Miller!
Hello, Heat Wave. Introduce yourself.
You talk like you know me already.
I noticed you right off, up on the balcony.
Did you notice me?
Why, no.
You was acting so bashful
I didn't hardly know you was there.
Hey, you talkin' to the champ.
He just looks at a chick and she's down for...
- Shut your teeth!
- Excuse my dust, gentlemen.
The air's getting mighty unconditioned around here.
What are you paid forTo manage me or to KO me with the dames?
This chick needs a big investment in time, and your train is waiting.
- It don't leave for an hour yet.
- It's at the station.
Remember, you promised the trainer ten hours' shuteye.
OK. I ain't gonna break no promise to him, but you listen to this and listen good.
When I wake up tomorrow in Chicago and get off that train,
I wanna see Heat Wave on the platform.
Suppose she don't want to go to Chicago?
That's your toothache.
If you can't show up with her, find yourself a new meal ticket.
- Good night, all!
- Good night, Husky!
What's he mean, "Go find yourself a new meal ticket"?
He means I don't eat. And, brother, if I don't eat, you starve.
Come on, Myrt, let's go where the money is.
I believe we had this parking space reserved, but don't get up, please.
Don't these gentlemen look like they met us someplace before?
I could swear I met 'em with Husky Miller.
- Where d'you know Husky from?
- Oh, maybe New York, New Orleans.
What you doin' in this hamburger joint?
- Just passin' through.
- Then you don't know nobody here?
Who d'you want us to know?
Thought you might be acquainted with her.
Carmen That's my best friend.
What d'you want with her?
Just asking. Won't you pull up to the kerb and park?
- If you insist.
- I do. Indeed I do.
Uh, drinks for the ladies.
- What kind?
- Ask 'em.
- You made up your minds yet?
- Anything light.
- You mean with bubbles?
- ChampagneMy, that's too splurgy.
Frankie!
Not for Rum Daniels, manager of Husky Miller.
You his manager, for real?
- And this is Dink Franklin...
- The manager's manager.
Large bottle of Champagne, from the bottom cellar.
Sure, Mr Daniels.
Too bad we're leaving for Chicago in an hour.
Hardly got time to trade punches.
Would you care to stop off in the Windy City with us?
What's the proposition?
She mean, you talking to us like we was a pair of you know what!
I had nothing like that in mind.
Just thinkin' it would be nice to have your company in a drawing room, showin' you around the fancy stores in Chicago, footin' the bill for some of the things you might want to buy, like a diamond ring and a mink coat.
Mink?!
Course, if that ain't good enough, maybe there's another kind of fur.
No. We're old-fashioned.
Mink and diamonds suits us fine.
- Then it's settled.
- Let's get going.
Don't wanna miss that train.
Yeah, go pack. While you're at it, pack up your friend there, too.
- Carmen?
- For Husky Miller.
And if she says no?
Then ain't none of us gettin' on that train.
I get it.
Figured you would.
Well, come on.
But don't everybody start talkin' at once.
Miss Jones, this is Rum, Husky's manager. And Dink, his manager.
They're taking me and Frankie to Chicago, in a drawing room.
That's nice.
Reserved the biggest suite on the top floor of the biggest hotel.
- Gonna buy us fancy clothes.
- Diamonds and mink!
We'll be livin' off the fatheads of the land.
The fatheads of fatheads.
We've room for one more. Care to join us at Husky's invitation?
Hear that, honeyHe askin' you to come to Chicago with us.
Keep us company.
- Chicago.
- Man, we'll have ourselves a ball!
All expenses paid including the little extras.
Like a storeful of diamonds and fancy clothes and everything nice.
- For true?
- That ain't the half of it.
You take us to Chicago, show us a good time. What we gotta do for it?
Don't ask him that now, honey.
Let's get to Chicago first.
What do you say, Heat Wave?
Wanna make a trip on a crack Chicago train
That's a trip you ought to make
It won't be hard for you to take
Travel 'bout as fast as a Kansas hurricane
It only takes a half a day to be a thousand miles away
- Away, away
- Come on, come on
That streamline engine won't delay
- Away, away
- Come on, come on
That streamline engine won't delay
That streamline engine just can't wait
That streamline engine ain't no freight
That streamline engine won't be late
Whizzing away along the track
Clickety-clack, clickety-clack
Leavin' the wind away in back
Clickety-clack, clickety-clack
Up a hill and down a hill
And out upon the plains again
Through a storm and outta the storm and pretty soon it rains again
It only takes a half a day
To be a thousand miles away
It only takes a half a day
To be a thousand miles away, away
- Come on, away
- Chicago, Chicago
- Away, away
- To come away, to come away
Hey!
On a Chicago train?
Go pack your duds.
Ain't got much time.
- Carmen'll come.
- I knew she would.
Well, let's get going.
Wait! Let me say my say
If you're bustin' to go, then go
But just count me out of the party
Just count me out
Cos I ain't in
Ah, Carmen, honey, have a heart
Don't want no part of it, don't want no part of it
Don't want no part!
Don't waste our time with all this fuss
Don't want no part of it, don't want no part of it
Don't want no part
What you got that you like so much better than this?
- What ya got?
- What ya got?
What ya got, what ya got?
If I told you, you'd only laugh
- Oh, no
- Not me
- Go on
- Give out
You got to promise not to laugh
OK
OK
Dere's a man I'm crazy for
She's got a man she's crazy for!
That's why she can't come to Chicago.
That's a laugh!
I'm in love
And dat ain't no laugh
Well, shut my mouth and call me dumb
And beat me! I'm a kettledrum
The birdies in the trees are hummin'
Carmen's in love, Carmen's in love
Still we ask, won't you come?
And break your date
Give the gate to your chum?
Another night, I might've come
To raise some pandemonium
But now the mockingbirds are hummin'
Carmen's in love, Carmen's in love
Leave me here with my Joe
Take your train to Chicago and go
- We gotta get you on that train
- Some other time
What makes you think there'll be another time?
What makes you think there'll be another time?
- To get a trip
- To get a trip
- To Illinois
- To Illinois
- And get it free?
- And get it free?
Dat is the place that I'd sure like to see
Whizzing away along the track
Clickety-clack, clickety-clack
Leavin' the wind away in back
Clickety-clack, clickety-clack
Up a hill and down a hill
And out upon the plains again
Through a storm and outta the storm and pretty soon it rains again
It only takes a half a day
To be a thousand miles away
It only takes a half a day
To be a thousand miles away, away
- Come on, away
- Chicago! Chicago!
- Away, away
- Come on away, come on away
Hey!
Whizzing away along the track
Off to Chicago
Illinois?
Well, Carmen, what's the count?
You comin' with us?
I always did wanna see the big town.
You got your wish, honey.
Chicago's gonna be real good for you.
You gonna be real bad for Chicago.
You comin'?
Uh-uh.
Look, baby. Let's talk turkey.
I gotta produce you in Chicago, and I don't care what it costs me.
You name it, Husky'll sign the bill.
I know that boy.
When he goes crazy for a chick, she starts looking like a neon sign, all lit up with diamonds.
Diamonds ain't what I want of a man.
If I love him, he don't need no chequebook.
If I don't, chequebook ain't gonna do him no good.
Who's talkin' about love?
We don't care what happens between you and Husky once we're in Chicago.
If he don't appeal to you, well, ain't nobody's fault.
It ain't that he don't appeal to me.
But he rang my bell when I'm busy.
BusyFooling around here when you got a chance to go to Chicago?
Are you gonna stay here and sleep or wake up and come with us?
I'm gonna wait here for Joe.
Been waitin' a month.
Bet he don't never show up.
He'll come. Soon as they let him out.
Look, Miss Jones, in case you wise up before the train leaves, here's a ticket for drawing room A.
Right over the wheels. You can hear yourself click-clicking to Chicago.
- No use wastin' it.
- Just castin' bread on the waters.
Come on, brother and sisters, join the prayer meeting in drawing room E.
Don't let too much distance come between you and that money.
Come on, honey.
Joe!
Joey!
I was afraid you wouldn't be here.
I've been here every night waitin' for you.
They ain't after you no more?
I got a suspended sentence.
Felt like you wasn't ever gettin' out.
Thinkin' about you all the time, while you was away from me.
I been dreamin' about tonight and wondering if you would be feelin' half as lovin' as your Carmen feels for you.
Carmen, there's something you gotta know.
Tell me later, when Carmen takes you home with her.
Carmen will unlace your shoes...
That's just it.
I can't stay or go with you.
I gotta report right back to the base.
What?
I gotta get that bus leaving for flying school.
Captain Halldale, my CO, he got my court martial reduced and made 'em take me back into flying school.
Where does that leave us?
How far apart?
Only 400 miles.
Only?!
You can come up when I got a pass.
Boy, if that ain't one on Carmen!
Love on a pass!
Carmen...
Go to flying school!
Take off right now!
Then lay in your bunk, look up at them pin-up gals!
See what that gets you, droopy drawers!
I got something I want you to see.
That's been with me all the time.
Right here, where you are.
That don't ring so true.
I swear it's true.
Joe, if you loved me true, know what you'd do?
- What?
- You'd come to Chicago.
- Chicago?
- I got enough dough for us both.
And a ticket too. I been savin' up to give my man a real good time.
You know I can't just pick up and go like that.
Joe, I want to go someplace where you're the last thing
I see at night, first thing I see in the morning.
I can't go AWOL.
You're just taking some time off so we can be together before you go away.
That's not the way the Army'd look at it.
Boy, if you ain't a lover red-hot for Carmen.
You just burnin' up with passin!
You sizzle like a fish on ice!
I can't afford no more demerits.
If I step out of line again, I'll never make officers' flying school.
You know what?
You too chicken for me to waste my time on!
Chicken is right.
Look at that officer material.
You got as much chance of being a flyer as a flea inside that shirt.
You quit that!
That's no kinda man for you, Carmen.
He can't even keep his shirt in his pants.
- You do that again, and I'll...
- You'll what?
You ain't thinkin' on strikin' your sergeant, I hope?
That wouldn't be four weeks in the guardhouse, more like four years.
How about it, sugar?
We got lost time to make up.
Let's get started.
You keep your paws off her.
Who's gonna make me?
Run along, Lt Caspar Milquetoast.
Looks like he's hurt real bad!
Yeah.
Four years for hitting a superior, ain't that what he said?
Maybe more.
Get him in them bushes! Hurry.
- They're bound to find him.
- By that time, we'll be far away.
- I can't. That's deserting.
- If they find you, that's prison.
What you got to loseCome on, man.
Get a move on, Joe!
Gotta make that train!
Who's that?
Husky Miller, the fighter.
I met him at Billy Pastor's with Frankie and Myrt.
Blow on 'em, sugar.
Make 'em dry faster.
You can turn the heat off now.
Ah, man, that tickles!
You some harmonica player!
What a mosquito bite.
Why the camouflage?
You don't need it with me.
Hand me them nylons, honey.
You ain't goin' out?
Far as the grocery store.
Gotta feed my man.
Look, Carmen...
I don't know how to tell you, but...
I'm busted. I gave the last of my pay to the landlady.
I got some jingly stuff.
I ain't gonna let you shell out.
We gotta eat, growin' boy.
Not on your dough.
What's mine's yours, Joey.
And that goes right down the line.
If I could only get out.
With them military cops on your tail?
They'd grab you so fast,
I'd still be kissin' the breeze goodbye when you's in Leavenworth.
Easy, honey, easy.
- You're two bits shy.
- Charge it to Husky.
And you discovered Husky?
To the stars belong the credit.
I was on the New York waterfront, sellin' $1 m of War Bonds, when I see this big boy walking along carrying a Jeep... with one hand!
You know what I said to myself then?
I said "That's my man!"
That's just what he said.
Put that in your column.
Heat Wave, be with you in no time!
Look who's here!
The answer to our prayers.
If it ain't the Jones gal!
- Hi, Frankie!
- Where you been all week?
Around, having myself a time.
WhereIn a bargain basement?
Get a loada me! Look at this iceberg!
It's almost real.
But that ain't nothing compared to what's driftin' your way.
I came to ask you for a little loan.
You... you bustedFlat?
Yeah. Can you let me have a couple of bills?
You talkin' to the wrong party.
There's your bank.
You just tell Husky what you want and don't stop, cos he's percolating to take care of you real good.
Now this manager's gotta manage something special for the Champ.
Got all that I need. Thanks.
Miss Jones!
This is our pleasure, indeed.
Hi, honey!
You sure showed up in time.
We can't get no more outta Husky.
She means Husky's got his mind set on finding you.
How you been, Myrt?
Great while we were buying out all the biggest stores, but now Husky's stopped all charge accounts.
You'll be raiding 'em again with Miss Jones.
Boss, I told you I'd produce her.
Hello, Jelly Roll. Where you been wasting time away from me?
Into the dressing room! Go on, get!
You wanna catch a draft?
Can't fight with my trainer.
Stay put. I'll be out in no time.
Then you and me'll start the second Chicago fire.
You all set, honey. Just like being partners with the US Mint.
- All you gotta do is grab.
- I'm not here for that punching bag.
- Don't you like Husky?
- He just one man too late, is all.
- You still with that soldier boy?
- You staking me or not?
Sorry, honey. I'm flat too.
All I got is fancy clothes, diamonds and mink, that's all Rum gives me.
Come with me, and maybe
I can promote some cash-and-carry.
I'll wait here.
You gotta be sociable with Husky or I'll get nowhere with his manager.
- Dust off the divan for the lady.
- Yes, Mr Daniels.
Look at that physique. Bet your soldier boy's got nothing like it.
The better man won, huh?
Glad to know you're only human.
Get this and get it right.
I didn't come here to stay in your corner.
- Say that again.
- She's too bashful to admit it.
Oh, that's different.
You gettin' me that loan, or do I have to listen to more braggin'?
- What loan?
- For clothes and things...
Put a raid on the stores.
Just name it and charge it.
Thanks, Frankie, but it won't work.
What is thisWhere you goin'?
- Sorry, Carmen ain't for sale.
- Heat Wave, wait!
You just relax them classy muscles.
Leave that gal to me.
It ain't my fault. You know females are always changing their stripes.
Get out. Don't come back till you bring Heat Wave with you for good.
And that goes for your manager too.
Carmen! Hey, Carmen!
I hate to see a hep chick like you acting like a dumb cluck.
- Be sensible.
- Frankie.
OK, keep your soldier boy, but don't walk out on a private convertible and gold-lace nightgowns.
You know two-timing ain't my speed.
Shift gears and join the female race:
Keep one man for the ride and one for the money.
Uh-uh.
Listen, honey. I'll level with you.
If you don't show up for Husky,
Myrt and I are right out in the cold.
How about it, sugarFor us?
Ain't that I don't want to help you.
- Only?
- I can't.
LoveNobody lives on that street forever, not with the same man.
You're bound to move, maybe sooner than you think.
Let you know when I get the message.
Well, when you do, ring me at the hotel. Here's the number.
Don't wait too long, Heat Wave, or
Husky liable to start blowing cold.
- See you.
- OK.
What took you so long?
- I had to wait for it.
- All that time?
- You been gone ever since...
- I got back as soon as I could.
It's a lot of stuff.
All you had was some loose change when you went out.
Where'd the rest come from?
What's the difference?
I wanna know.
Well?
Look, boy. Don't go puttin' me on no stand.
I don't answer to nobody.
If you got nothing to hide...
Do you think I do?
What do you expect me to think?
Why don't you tell me?
You think what you want!
- I don't account to no man.
- You're accounting to me.
- I love you. I have the right...
- You've no right to own me.
There's only one that does, and that's me.
Myself.
Where you goin'?
- I might come back.
- Carmen, I'm sorry.
Carmen.
Carmen!
That racket, it's enough to drive rivets into your head.
You're goin' out again?
Feel like takin' a walk.
- You already had one today.
- Feel like another one.
Look, honey, I'm sorry for the way I blew off.
You're spillin' it.
But that ain't no reason to turn on the ice.
Look, boy, I don't have to keep the truth from nobody.
I can't stand bein' cooped up in this alley no more.
But you know the MPs are after me.
I've got to stay in here.
You gotta.
I don't.
What does that mean?
I'm bustin' out for a while.
Who with?
- You really want to know?
- Well, I asked you.
I'll tell ya. With a friend of mine.
Frankie.
That gal that works at Billy
Pastor'sWhat's she doing here?
She's with that Husky Miller crowd, got here when we did.
My seams on straight?
Who's she throwing your way?
You ain't goin' nowhere.
You're stayin' where you belong, with me!
I don't get it. This place suited you fine before you went out.
What happened in between?
Got a whiff of fresh air, that's what happened.
Just wanna get more of it.
Not without me!
Maybe you ain't got the message yet.
But Carmen's one gal nobody puts on a leash.
No man's gonna tell me when can I come and go.
I gotta be free, or I don't stay at all.
You talk like this was a jail.
- You makin' it one.
- It ain't to me.
I could stay here and never go out as long as you're here.
But when you ain't, it's worse than jail.
There ain't no light, no air.
Suppose I never come back?
You'd never get away from me.
I'd follow you down the rivers or across the sea.
To hell or up to heaven.
Why'd you ask?
Just to hear you say it.
You're hurtin' me, Joe.
I'm sorry, honey.
I didn't mean to.
Get back soon.
And remember, I'm waitin'.
You just keep a light burning in the window, boy.
Poor Champ. Can't have no happy juice, no good time, nothin'.
Just gotta keep trainin' to keep in trainin'.
Wanna break it for fun and see what happens?
Take the count.
- Get me some more.
- You already had one Seltzer bottle.
Make this one for the road.
You can't have skirts in your head before the big night.
You gotta forget that woman.
I'm tryin', trainin' man. I'm tryin'.
Hi, Husk.
I said keep outta my corner. You're fired till you bring me Heat Wave.
You just got to give Rum the teletype, boss. There she is.
Heat Wave!
Easy, boy. Don't KO me in round one.
- Give the fans their money's worth.
- Tell my fortune.
- Let's go warm up a corner.
- I wanna watch.
Am I gonna get that certain party?
No way to tell in advance, but the cards don't lie.
- Cut them
- Cut them
- Seven
- Seven
- That's quite a card
- Yes, that's quite a card
Do you mean good or bad?
That's the queen of hearts.
- Quiet, please!
- Quiet, please
You're gonna get a lot of money.
I don't know how you'll spend it all but it's a lot of money!
Will this gal see a bright and happy future?
Or will she be a good-for-nothin' moocher?
Come on, you cards, and tell her true
Come on, you cards, and tell her true
And tell her how she's gonna do
And tell her how she's gonna do
For good or bad, for high or low
Come on, you cards, and let her know
Whatever way the wind will blow
All set?
All set.
For sure?
Let's go!
Let's see what they say about me
Oh, you gonna get a good man,
Carmen.
Yeah.
Here's your little secret.
The nine of spades.
De nine
Dere he is
De ol' boy
Plain as can be
Death got his hand
On me
It ain't no use to run away
From dat ol' boy
If he is chasin' you
It's best to stand right up
And look him in de face
When he is facin' you
You gotta be prepared to go with dat ol' boy
No matter what the time
So I won't fill my pretty eyes
With salty tears
Cos I ain't got de time
I'm gonna run out every second I got left
Before he throws me down
I'm gonna laugh and sing and use up all my breath
Before he mows me down
While I can fly around
I'll do my flying high
I'm gonna keep on livin'
Up to the day I die
De nine
Hello
OI' boy
Hello?
My Joe
He was always my Joe and use up all my breath
Joe said there never could be
We was in love
And I reckon we showed it
From the way people talked
Reckon everyone knowed it
Kids on the street where we'd go
Used to yell at us
"Cindy Lou belongs to Joe!"
Lord! O Lord!
You know that was true
And Joey belonged
To Cindy Lou?
We wanna check on his pass. He's been shacking up here for a week.
- I run a respectable place.
- Ain't sayin' you don't.
Take a look at this picture.
Does he live here?
One flight up. Room 24.
You're too late, miss. Husky's finished trainin' for the day.
I'm looking for someone the papers say he's runnin' around with.
- Is her name Carmen?
- That too.
She's in his dressing room now, right in there, to the left.
Thank you.
Sorry, we got all the toothbrushes we need, little lady.
Wait. I'm here to see
Miss Carmen Jones. Please.
Me?
Say, ain't you that little gal
Joe was stuck on?
Yes. I came here to find out where he is.
You the only one that know.
Nice gal like you gonna get into trouble taking up with a deserter.
I don't care what he done. I gotta find him before the military do.
Tell me where he is, please.
Joe!
So you ran out on me.
Sure. He can give you a better time than I can.
Fancy clothes... swell company, the whole works.
Husky Miller's latest woman.
Only that ain't the way it's gonna be.
We's all washed up.
Go away.
Go with this sweet little gal.
You'd like that, I guess, so it'd leave you free to play.
Only you're coming with me, where you belong.
Put a hand on Carmen again and I'll immobilise you.
- Joe, don't fight with him.
- Leave me alone.
- Who is this jerk, anyhow?
- You shut your fat trap!
- You double-crossin' tramp!
- What'd you call her?
- Husky, you'll kill him!
- If it's the last thing I do!
Husky, that won't be the last thing you do.
- I swore I'd let no man take you!
- How you gonna stop me?
- I'll show you!
- No! You's in enough trouble!
- Cindy, go away.
- Somebody get the police!
- Dink, what you waitin' on?
- Stay put!
Joe, honey, listen!
I ain't no good to ya, Cindy. Go home to your maw where you belong.
Put that thing away, boy.
Ain't gonna get you nowhere with me.
Nor with him neither!
That's enough, Husky!
That's enough!
One more crack!
The MPs!
Get out the back way! Go on!
- You're comin' with me.
- She ain't goin' nowhere with you.
- I said we was washed up.
- Why you helpin' me get away?
Cos I can't stand nobody bein' cooped up!
- Right this way, gentlemen.
- Just keep goin'.
Go on home. Forget him.
Bait your hook for fish you can fry.
How can I love a man
When I know he don't want me?
He ain't been good
He ain't been kind
He give me up
For that old roadside woman
But I can't drive him from my mind
I's scared, O Lord, I's scared
I's like a leaf that's lost her tree
I's alone, O Lord, I's alone
He got hisself another woman
Did she feel his arms
All around her?
No, Lord, I can't believe it's so
No, Lord, don't you let her keep my Joe
Make him throw her back
Where he found her
Joe!
You said that both your arms was mine
Remember?
You said your arms
Was mine
I's...
Your gal
I was always your gal
There was no-one but me
You said there never could be
We was in love
And I reckon we showed it
From the way people talked
Reckon everyone knowed it
Kids on the street where we'd go
Used to yell at us
"Cindy Lou belongs to Joe!"
Lord, O Lord
Look down and try to see
How you can make Joe
Come home
To me
O Lord, look down
Lead my Joe
Off the road
Where he's strayin'
Oh, tell my man
Where to go
O Lord, I's callin'
On
You?
Poncho! Poncho!
Ladies and gentlemen, this is your feature presentation, ten rounds of boxing...
...introducing from the great city of Chicago, Husky Miller!
And his opponent from Brazil... the South American heavyweight champion, the sensational...
Kid Poncho!
Give him another one, Husky!
Punch him! Punch him!
Punch him on the nose!
Well, what do you think?
This is just the beginning.
A piece of gum, please.
Hit him with the right! Hit him!
Yeah! Hit him, Husky!
...three, four... five, six... seven, eight... nine, ten!
Husky! Husky!
The time: Two minutes,
20 seconds of the second round.
The winner, by a knockout, Husky Miller!
Stand up and fight until you hear the bell
Stand toe to toe
Trade blow for blow
Keep punching till you make your punches tell
Show that crowd what you know
Until you hear that bell, that final bell
Stand up and...
That's our man
The man with the wallop
Hotter than a firecracker
What a man, man, oh, what a man
Bell! Bell! Bell!
Attaboy, can you make with the wallop
Win that dough and then we can doll up
With a diamond big as a scallop
Attaboy, attaboy, attaboy!
You're comin' with me or you ain't goin' noplace.
Let me go!
You promised you was gonna be mine till the end.
That's one promise you're gonna keep.
Can't you get it through your head?
We're done. Now let me go!
I'd sooner kill you.
Then here's your chance.
But all I wanna do
Is love you
Like I used to
To hold your hand
In my hand
And feel your heart
Next to my heart
Can't we begin again?
Couldn't we start all over?
Couldn't we
Begin again?
If you want to start a fire where a fire was before
The coal you burn must be new coal
Our flame is out
Cold as the snow
We had ourselves some fun
Didn't we?
And now it's done
But where can I put my memories?
They got no sea to drown in
The little things that used to make us laugh
When we was clownin'
And all the things we'd say or do
Are all part of me and you
Joe, you is makin' it tough now
For yourself, the same as for me
Joe, ain't you heard me say enough now?
No! No!
No!
What used to be ain't no more!
Do you forget how I used to love you?
No-one but Joe ever loved you so good
Let's go away and begin our life all over
Carmen all alone with Joe
Don't you think there's a chance?
Only say that you do
No! That wouldn't be true
Ain't gonna lie!
Ain't gonna lie!
I look at life straight in the eye?
I'll have no man laugh at me while you roll around in his arms.
You're stayin' with me or I'll kill you.
OK. Kill me now or let me go!
- For the last time...
- For the last time.
Here's that ten-cent store ring you gave me. Now that's the end of you!
You tramp!
You're no good. You never were.
Two-timin' me, like it don't count for nothin'.
Well, it does.
You ain't never gonna do that to no man again.
Keep punching till you make your punches tell
Show that crowd...?
String me high on a tree
So that soon I will be
With my darling
My baby
My Carmen?
Subtitles by Jenefer Davys
Intelfax Media Access
NANCY: Hello, Mr. Moroney.
- Hello, Nancy, the show's almost over.
Oh, I know, I know.
[WOMAN SINGING IN DISTANCE]
[WHISTLES]
Scotty, you ought to be ashamed of yourself.
- You come along with me.
MAN: Shh!
- Nancy, there's a show going on out there.
- Hello, Arthur. Arthur?
Arthur, I want you to meet my leading man.
Mr. Sheldan, Mr. Barrett.
- How do you do, Mr. Sheldon?
- Hi.
- Arthur produces all of Mother's shows.
- Gosh.
He's not very talkative.
Well, you two ought to make a great team.
Aren't you supposed to be up at school?
Yes, we came down for Mother's party tonight.
On the way down,
Scotty had the worst car trouble...
- Shh! Nancy, the finale's starting.
- Come on, I want you to see Mother.
[SINGING]
And through the years I'll remember
The love that was never quite mine
Time and time again
You'll hear me call
And, darling, then
You'll know I need you
Tell me I'll be free
To keep a perfect memory
Don't let me heed you
I need you
One kiss to last us forever
Then let our moment be through
And time and time again
My heart will sigh remembering when
I gave my love
To you
Time and time again
You'll hear me call
And, darling, then
You'll know I need you
He needs you
Tell me we'll be free
To keep a perfect memory
Don't let me heed you
I need you
- One kiss to last us forever
- One kiss to last us forever, my darling
- Then let our moment be through
- And then let our moment be through
Time and time again
My heart will sigh remembering when
I gave my love
To you
- Come on.
- Where you going?
We're going out front to applaud Mother.
Come on.
- I'm going to meet her.
- Not if you're going to Washington.
We've got to make the airport.
- He's right, Paul.
- You can meet her when you get back.
MAN:
I tell you, it's all over now.
Nothing can stand between us.
You can remain here with me.
Father's rehearsing.
Ruling without love is a lonely task.
If I lose you, I lose everything.
Oh, hello.
Papa, my darling, you really should've played the part.
You'd have been great.
Perhaps if I were a few years younger.
- Were you out front tonight, Greg?
- Of course I was out front.
I must say, I think the leading man might show a little more fire.
You've been saying that the past two years.
Well, yes, I suppose I have.
I'll run along now.
Your guests must be arriving.
- I won't be long.
- I'll see you at the apartment.
- Right, right, Greg.
- So long.
- Where's Nancy?
- She went out to yak up the applause.
Arthur, can't we find her a small part next season?
If Nancy's doing it, it won't be a small part.
Oh, well, there must be something.
Maybe I'll look for a nice offstage cyclone for her to do.
Did you get a chance to read
Domingos' new play?
[GASPS]
I loved it. Finished it last night and couldn't sleep.
I kept thinking of that poor Emily.
It's a wonderful play.
And that scene where she's going to have the baby.
I'll never let them take my baby from me.
Never, never, never.
I cried.
It's the best thing he's ever written.
You can tell him at the party tonight.
He's flying in from Brazil to talk to you.
- He is?
- Hi.
FRANCES: Hi.
- How's my favorite actress?
- How's my favorite daughter?
- Just fine.
My hands are sore from applauding so long and hard.
- Gee, you were wonderful.
- Oh, thank you.
- Who's going to the party?
- Everybody.
- Good. I can attack them at once.
- Let me give you some advice.
- Never ask for a part in a play.
- No?
Let them think of it themselves, then they'll try to sell you the idea.
- Oh, psychology, huh?
- Exactly.
- What happened to your leading man?
- He had to see about his car.
The motor dropped out.
May I bring him to the party tonight?
- With or without his motor?
- Oh, Mother.
- Of course you can.
- Thank you. I'll see you at the apartment.
I wanna talk about scenery for our country playhouse.
- Yes, yes, yes.
- See you all later. Bye.
Bye.
Oh, dear, I wonder if I was like that at her age.
No one was like that at her age.
[PIANO MUSIC PLAYS]
- Hello. Is Mother in yet?
- She's upstairs changing, Miss Nancy.
Oh, good. Here you are, Mary.
Oh, there's John Talbot.
- He's doing the new Hepburn show.
- Gosh.
There's William Grant.
He's with Rodgers and Hammerstein.
- Concentrate on the important ones.
- Well, how do I know which is which?
Well, some look important and some look unimportant.
The ones who look unimportant are the important ones.
- Oh. Well, what are we waiting for?
- Well, I've got to make an entrance.
All right. Walk in.
You don't just walk in.
You have to have people notice you.
Like this:
[LAUGHING]
[FRANCES LAUGHING]
Oh, really.
Well, Bess.
- You were divine tonight.
MAN: Magnificent performance.
- Thank you, Howard.
- Only good as opening night.
You should have brought a stairway.
- What are you going to do next?
- I haven't the faintest idea.
Well, Ray.
- Ray.
- Hello, Fran, darling.
- You're so interesting, Mr. Elliott.
- My dear girl.
- We expected to meet a much older man.
- You did?
Well, I went on the stage when I was just a boy.
You were telling us about voice placement.
Oh, was I? Well, it is very important that the voice be placed properly.
But I think in your case, it won't make any difference at all.
[ALL LAUGHING]
- Hello, Fran.
- Still coaching, Father?
GREG:
Oh, I'm just encouraging fresh talent.
- Frances. Excuse me.
- Yes?
- Domingos is here. In the study.
- Oh, wonderful. Excuse me.
Certainly.
- Here she is, Ricardo.
- Mr. Domingos.
- I'm so very happy to know you.
- I'm honored.
- Won't you sit down?
- Thank you. Pardon me.
- Did you have a pleasant trip?
- Yes, thank you.
I suppose all this seems very different from Brazil.
Oh, no.
These kinds of parties are universal.
The labels on the bottles may be a little different...
...but the labels on the people are the same.
- I can't wait to visit Brazil.
RICARDO: Oh, I think you would like it.
I was telling Mr. Domingos how much you liked his play.
Oh, I adored it.
I'm very pleased.
There are things in the second act he'd like to explain.
- I'll just close the door.
- Fine.
Well, I tell you...
Oh, I have to find Arthur.
While I'm gone, you pick out the biggest-looking idiot in the room.
- And go to work on him.
- Okay.
The biggest-looking idiot in the room, huh?
The biggest-looking...
Of course, I drew the trusty steel, pursued the villain.
He'd flown.
I returned my sword to its sheath...
...cloaked myself against the night air, doffed my hat and took a bow.
My dear children, it was nothing, nothing.
Nothing at all.
- I'm going to Brazil for a rest.
- Oh?
I wanna take the script and learn it among the people it's written about.
- Do you think it's a good idea?
- It's a great idea.
Yes, fine.
Now, I don't want this to get out until we're ready to announce it.
No publicity, you understand?
Not a word to anyone yet.
Oh, all right.
And now I must see to my guests.
- See that Mr. Domingos has a drink?
- Thank you.
- I'll join you later.
- Thank you.
ARTHUR:
Well, Ricardo...
Is anything wrong?
- Well, I thought she was much younger.
- Well, she was.
- On the stage, she looks superb.
- Granted.
But the part of Emily was intended for an 18-year-old to play.
ARTHUR: Frances is a great actress.
- Oh, there you are.
Arthur, I hope you're nice and relaxed because I need a skyscraper.
Oh. So you need a skyscraper?
- We haven't a thing up there in the way...
- Just a minute.
This is Miss Elliot's daughter,
Nancy Barklay.
- How do you do?
- Glad to know you.
We have to have a skyscraper for our second act.
I don't seem to have one on me.
You wouldn't settle for a small building?
You told me you had a storeroom full of backdrops.
Oh, that kind of skyscraper.
Well, I think we can manage it.
- How you going to get it up?
- One of the boys has a truck.
When are you coming to Connecticut?
I'm afraid that's going to be impossible.
Impossible? But, Arthur, you promised.
You said you'd direct it.
I know I did, but Mr. Domingos arrived in town and...
Oh, we were...
Oh!
- Are you the Ricardo Domingos?
- Yes.
Oh, I am glad to know you.
Would you write a play for me?
Well, I've already written a play.
Oh, you have?
Will there be a part in it for me?
The only small part is a 60-year-old governess.
I could look 60 years old.
- Everyone says I'm older than I really am.
- No, no, no.
No? Well, I think you're making a big mistake.
After all, a young governess is much more interesting.
Well, come to think of it, there is the part of an invalid's offstage cough.
Thank you, no.
- Are you in the professional theater too?
- Yes, I am.
Nancy's studying with a stock company in the country.
- Stock company?
- Mm. They do plays in barns.
- Oh, yes.
- Yes.
We do plays in barns.
There are kids and grownups working their hearts out year after year...
...putting on plays all over the country.
They don't need big, elaborate theaters and stars.
All they need is a room, a curtain and a few chairs.
Maybe it's in a church or in a clubhouse or in a barn...
...but they're satisfied.
And do you know why?
Because it's the theater and it's theirs.
You're wrong, Arthur.
They're not just people putting on plays in barns...
...they're the future of the theater, tomorrow's Oliviers and Bernhardts.
They're offering their time and their talent and their dreams.
All they ask is that someone see them and hear them and give them a chance.
But instead of helping them, you're too busy being successful.
Where is this company the young lady was talking about?
In Connecticut.
How about going up there and trying out the second act?
Not a bad idea.
Wonderful party, Fran, my girl.
- Had fun tonight, huh?
- Oh, yes, I...
- Where's the bicarb?
- The same place it always is.
I certainly need it.
[FRANCES & NANCY CHUCKLE]
Whenever he needs bicarbonate,
I know he's enjoying himself.
Thank you, darling.
Oh, men are so innocent.
They're just like children.
- Are you referring to your grandfather?
- Oh, no. I mean men.
Now, take Scotty, for instance.
You know, he's a year older than I am...
...yet when I'm with him,
I feel more like his mother.
Well, that must please him.
Oh, he doesn't know it.
I'm very sweet to him...
...but it frightens me a little.
I feel as though I've experienced everything and there's nothing more to live for.
Isn't that a line from one of the plays you did at school?
Oh. Uh.
Yes, so it is.
You see, I didn't even realize it.
I feel like I've lived all the parts
I've acted.
I've been a nun, I've been a drunkard.
I've played Portia, I've been in love.
I've been so many people...
...sometimes I wonder if the real me can ever fall in love.
When you fall in love, darling, you'll be just plain Nancy Barklay...
...and your only concern will be to make your husband happy.
You loved Father very much, didn't you, Mother?
Very much.
I wish he could have seen you, Nan.
He would've been so proud.
Thank you, Mother.
How old were you when you were married?
Your age. Just seventeen.
- I'll bet you were a mere child.
- I was not.
You know, I may never got married.
I feel like you do.
The theater's enough for any woman.
It's not much help on a cold winter's night.
Father.
I do wish you'd come with us to Rio.
I think you're being headstrong about staying here. Don't you?
Of course, she takes after her mother.
I wish I could, but I can't.
Arthur's coming up and Moss Hart's starting his auditions for his new play.
All right, all right. We'll leave you here to take care of the American theater.
[FRANCES CHUCKLES]
FRANCES:
Wasn't that a wonderful audience tonight?
- Yes.
- Funny how you remember closing nights.
I remember how thrilled I was when I was a little girl...
...and Grandmother took me to Chicago to see your grandfather.
That was a closing night too.
When the curtain came down, the audience stood up and cheered.
Well, naturally, they loved me.
They wouldn't let you go.
Oh, say, I was quite a romantic fellow.
I'll bet you were, Grandfather.
The most romantic figure of your day.
And quite a stepper.
[PLAYING PIANO]
[SINGING]
January, February, June or July
Snow time ain't no time to stay
Outdoors and spoon
So shine on
Shine on, harvest moon
For me and my gal
- Shine on
- Shine on
- Shine on, harvest moon
- Shine on, harvest moon
- Up in the sky
- Up in the sky
- I ain't had no lovin ' since
- I ain't had no lovin ' since
January, February, June or July
- Snow time ain't no time to stay
- Snow time ain't no time to stay
- Outdoors and spoon
- Outdoors and spoon
- So shine on
- So shine on
- Shine on, harvest moon
- Shine on, harvest moon
- For me and my gal
- For me and my gal
ALL:
Shine on
Shine on, harvest moon
Keep on a shinin '
Till you give the clouds a silver linin '
I ain't had no lovin ' since
January, February
Any old time is the time to marry
Snow time ain't no time to
What is so rare as an evening in June
With a moon and a gal
You can cuddle and spoon
Shine on
Shine on, harvest moon
Shine on
Shine on, harvest moon
For me and my gal
[ALL LAUGHING]
- Why did you send for me?
- No, no, no, look.
Look, Scotty, you come in here like this:
One, two, three. One, two.
Why did you send for me?
- Now, have you got that?
- Yes, sir.
- All right, let's try it.
- Yes, sir.
One, two, three. One, two.
Why did you send for me?
Is that all right, sir?
Oh, great, great, great. Let's keep going.
Now, what's your first speech, Nancy?
Because I heard you were going away.
Blah, blah, blah. Nancy's dialogue.
Then you move here and say:
"There's nothing else I can do, Emily.
She needs me. " Got that?
- Sure, sir.
- All right, let's try it.
There's nothing else I can do, Emily.
She needs me.
- Does she love you as much...?
- Blah, blah, blah.
Now, skip down to the next scene and pick it up at:
"It was never love, Emily. "
- Now I'm out here at that time?
- You're here now.
- It was never love, Emily.
- Please, please.
Don't attack that line so loud. Softer.
- You know?
- Right. I get you, yeah.
- All right.
- It was never love, Emily.
It was a clinical experiment.
Sterile emotions in an antiseptic vacuum.
What do you know of love?
- I'll tell you what I know of love. I...
ARTHUR: Emily's big speech.
Then your reaction and exit.
Now, have you got that?
But, Arthur, you don't even know whether I know my lines or not.
- You haven't listened to one of my lines.
- Yes, yes. You were fine, dear.
That's all for today.
Everybody, dress rehearsal tomorrow night.
One, two, three. One, two.
Why did you send for me?
I heard you were going away.
There's nothing else I can do, Emily.
She needs me.
Does she love you as much as I do?
SCOTTY: These aren't things that can be measured.
In the end, each of us must decide what he thinks is right.
NANCY:
So you've decided to escape?
Goodbye, Emily.
He'll come back.
There's nothing to come back to.
- It's over.
- You'll find someone else.
Strange, isn't it?
Almost everything that's important can be measured.
The wise man can measure the lights years to a star...
...and tell you how many robins make a summer.
But the really important things they can't measure at all.
They can't measure a robin's song...
...or tell me why the moonlight will make me weep.
[SINGING]
Magic is the moonlight
Silver stars above me
Send someone to love me
Show my heart the way
Somewhere in the moonlight
Surely I will meet him
With a smile I'll greet him
And I know he'll stay
Lost within the splendor
Of a kiss
So tender
We will then surrender
To a love divine
Then when love is over
I'll recall a June night
For magic was the moonlight
When the world was mine
Someday
I'll meet
My love
[AUDIENCE APPLAUDING]
Frances and I have been close friends for 20 years.
Now, how am I going to tell her?
[KNOCKING ON DOOR]
- You sent for me?
- Come in, Nancy.
- Sit down.
- No, thanks, I'm not a bit tired.
- Did you like it?
- We have a little surprise for you.
- You're making the old governess younger?
- No.
- I'm the invalid's offstage cough?
- No, we want you to play the part of Emily.
Emily.
- Emily?
- Yes.
Jinkies. Maybe I better sit down.
Oh, gosh, thank you so much.
But I'm afraid I couldn't.
- Why not?
- Is there something else?
Oh, no, no, it isn't that.
- But, well, I'm not good enough.
- Nonsense.
A part as wonderful as this would scare me to death.
The whole show would depend on me.
Didn't you tell us that you were the future of the theater?
Oh, but I didn't mean me personally.
Now, Nancy,
I know this isn't going to be easy.
But if you'd go away and memorize every word of the play...
...then we'll have three weeks of private rehearsals...
...before the regular rehearsals.
We don't open till next fall, so you'll have plenty of time.
- I don't know what to say.
- That's it. Don't say anything to anybody.
I don't want this to get out yet.
- Well, if you think I can.
- Good, good.
Congratulations.
Now, as far as anyone is concerned...
...you're only playing the part of the governess.
- What did you say?
- The governess.
Remember, not a word about Emily.
No.
Well, I guess...
Thank you.
Thank you very much.
Hey, I've been looking all over for you.
Did you get it?
- What?
- The part of the governess.
Oh.
Oh, yes. Yes, I got it.
- Aw, gee, Nancy, that's wonderful.
- Oh, Scotty, I'm so frightened.
- Frightened?
- It's the part. It's...
We'll work on it together.
I'll cue your lines.
I have to go away.
I've got to live the part.
- Gee, it's only a governess, you...
- Yes, yes, I know, but I...
- Can't you live the part here?
- I need coaching.
- Well, what about Mister...?
- I'm going to the best coach in the world.
My mother.
Oh.
It won't be for long.
Yeah, but Brazil is so far away.
Not if two people love each other.
Oh, golly, do you...?
Do you mean it, Nancy?
Oh, gee.
Gosh.
You know, we're almost engaged.
- Hey.
- Let's not tell anyone about it yet, huh?
- Let's wait till I come back from Brazil.
- Okay.
Hey, kids. Nancy's going to Rio.
- She is?
- Hey!
BOB: Hey, Dick. Dick. Hey, Dick.
- What?
- Nancy's going to Rio.
- She is?
Hey, Nancy's going to Rio.
- Rio?
- Yeah.
Whoo-hoo!
[SINGING] Nancy's going to Rio
ABCDE-O
Nancy's going to Rio
Far across the sea-o
That's where she will be-o
Me, oh, my, oh, me-o
Nancy's going to Rio
- A ye, aye, aye
CHORUS: A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
Now, if you go to Rio
Where does that leave me-o?
Far across the sea
Oh, me, oh, my, oh, me-o
CHORUS: A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
If it strikes my fancy
A- sailin ' south goes Nancy
In my new sombrero
Headin ' for Janeiro
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
Hey! Nothing could be finer
Than to sail a liner
But if it's heavy sailin '
Just lean upon the railin '
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
Eatin ' a banana
Right off the plantation
I'll cement our Pan-American relations
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
It's awful far to Rio
A thousand miles by sea-o
You know I'm gonna miss her
Excuse me while I kiss her
A ye, aye, aye
A ye, aye, aye
Now they're going steady
Scotty's really ready
But how am I gonna take her
South of the equator
My friends, may I have the floor?
On behalf of you all I'm addressing
This bit of advice to our Nancy
Keep the Latins guessing
RUDY: A ye, aye, aye
CHORUS: A ye, aye, aye
RUDY: Bye-bye, bye-bye
CHORUS: Bye-bye, bye-bye
RUDY: A ye, aye
CHORUS: A ye, aye
RUDY: Bye-bye
CHORUS: Bye-bye
RUDY: Cae-cae
CHORUS: Cae-cae
RUDY: Cae-cae
CHORUS: Cae-cae
Cae-cae, cae-cae
Fare thee well, my friends, goodbye
Cae-cae, cae-cae
I'm so happy I could die
CHORUS: Cae-cae, cae-cae
Fare thee well, my friends, goodbye
Cae-cae, cae-cae
She's so happy she could die
Don't you worry, oh, my sweet
I'll be lonely while I'm there
I am yours unless I meet
A Brazilian millionaire
CHORUS:
Cae-cae, cae-cae
Bon voyage and fond adieu
- Bon nuit
- Au revoir
And a few alohas too
The sun is shining.
The sun is shining...
...as though the whole world hadn't come to an end.
The sun is shining...
...as though the whole world hadn't come to an end.
[MOUTHS]
The sun is shining.
The sun is shining...
...as though the whole world hadn't come to an end.
Excuse me.
[WHISTLING]
[NANCY MOUTHING DIALOGUE]
Nice day, ain't it?
You're the quiet type, huh?
That's the type of gal that appeals to me.
I got a table for the entertainment tonight.
- How about you and me...?
- No, thank you.
Oh, come on, I've been watching you.
What you need is some fun.
Some dancing and things.
Excuse me. My wife doesn't dance.
- Your wife?
- That's right.
Sorry, sir, uh, ma'am.
Hope y'all ain't mad at me.
Just trying to be a little sociable-like.
Excuse me.
- Thank you very much.
- Not at all.
- My name is Paul Berten.
- How do you do? I'm Nancy Barklay.
Our friend was right about one thing, this is a beautiful day.
The entertainment should be very exciting tonight.
And an attractive young lady like yourself should be having a good time.
Look, I don't mean to intrude...
...but if you're in any kind of trouble,
I may be able to help you.
Oh, no, thank you. I'm just fine.
I'm glad I'm going to have the baby.
There's a part of him that will always be mine.
I'll never love anyone again. Never.
But it doesn't matter.
Nothing matters. Not now.
Oh, it doesn't matter.
He's run away with her, but she can never hold him.
He's still my husband.
- Oh, purser.
- Yes, sir.
- Have you seen Miss Rodrigues?
- I believe she's rehearsing for the show.
[SINGING] I've been to Chicago
And I've been to Milwaukee
I've been to New Orleans
And I've been to Mississippi
I've been to Saint Louis...
Stop the music, boys. You play too fast.
- Okay, shall we try it again?
- Let's cook it again, huh?
PAUL:
Marina? Marina.
Oh, Paul. We cook it enough.
I see you tonight, huh?
- Bye.
- Bye.
The passengers are putting a show and they asked me to do something.
That's fine.
I'd like you to do something for me.
- Is something wrong?
- Yes, I need your help.
- Any trouble with the husbands?
- A girl.
- A girl? You don't need my help.
- This is different. She's in trouble.
- She'd like someone to talk to.
- Why don't you talk to her?
Me? I can't.
[WHISPERS INDISTINCTLY]
Yeah, come on.
[KNOCKING ON DOOR]
- Miss Barklay?
- Yes.
I am Marina Souza Lopez
Castro Rodrigues.
- Well, how do you do?
- How do you do?
- Won't you come in?
- Thank you.
Please, sit down.
- I've come, like you say, Jack Alden?
- Jack Alden?
- You mean John Alden.
- That's the fellow.
- I have a message for you.
- For me?
Oh, please, don't do that.
I'll do it.
Yes. A very charming man wants you to have dinner with him.
Well, that's very nice, but I'm afraid it's impossible.
Impossible?
That a charming young man wants to have dinner with you?
You should not think like that.
You are on your way to Brazil, and in Brazil, we have fun.
I'm going down to do some work.
But you must not disappoint Paul Berten.
- Oh, did he send you?
- Yes.
He could have any girls he wants, but he wants you.
But I hardly spoke to him.
And Mr. Berten is a very romantic man.
And he likes you very much.
In fact, he told me to tell you that it's very easy for a man to love you.
And he'll be very unhappy if you do not come.
But I scarcely know him.
- Is he a friend of yours?
- No, he's my partner.
He won me on a craps game.
- What?
- I mean, his father won my father.
- Why, that's slavery.
- No, it's coffee.
You see, Paul's father shoot craps with my father.
You know, those white little things.
Snakes' eyes, you know?
So Paul's father and my father, they are partners.
So now Paul and I are partners.
- I see now.
- Good. Then is all settled, huh?
- Oh, well, I...
- Oh, you'll like Paul. He's a very nice man.
- Oh, all right.
- Fine.
Then I see you at the dining room tonight at 8.
I'll be there.
[BOTH SPEAK IN PORTUGUESE]
Hey, hey, hey, easy.
- You are a doctor, no?
- Yes.
- Do you know Nancy Barklay?
- I don't believe I do.
You are going to.
I'm going to give some advice.
[WHISPERS INDISTINCTLY]
- Good evening.
- Good evening.
- I'm glad you came.
- Thank you for inviting me.
- We're right over here at the captain's table.
- All right.
I'd like to present Miss Barklay.
Captain Ritchie, Mrs. Warren,
Mr. and Mrs. Harrison...
...Mr. and Mrs. Black and Dr. Ballard.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
- And Marina you know, of course.
- Yes. Hello.
MARINA: How are you?
- I've been looking forward to meeting you.
Well, thank you.
- You're looking very well.
- I'm feeling very well, thank you.
Good.
Try one of these, my dear.
They're for nausea.
Oh, I never get seasick.
[ALL LAUGHING]
- Did I say something funny?
- We're all your friends. And this one.
- Are we heading into a storm?
- That is a calcium pill. Builds your bones.
- Well, my bones are built.
- Of course they are.
But everyone on an ocean voyage takes calcium.
Keeps you from developing scurvy.
Take one for me.
Well, guess I don't want scurvy.
PAUL: Is this your first ocean trip?
- Oh, yes, it is.
- How old are you, my dear?
NANCY: Seventeen.
Oh.
Cereal? Well, if you don't mind,
I think I'd rather have scurvy.
That is very good for you. Eat it. All of it.
MRS. HARRISON:
Yes, my dear. It's very good for you.
- Is this your first trip down here?
- Mm-hm.
- You'll love Rio.
- I hope I get a chance to see it.
Afraid I won't be able to get around very much.
Yes, it's better to rest.
Tell me, why did you decide to go to Brazil?
Oh, well, my mother's down there and...
Well, something happened to me and I need her.
Oh, yes, of course.
- May I have this dance?
- Yes, you may. You don't mind?
Why, not at all.
Only Marina is going to sing for us now.
- Now?
- Now.
Okay. Now.
[SINGING]
I've been to Chicago and I like Chicago
I've been to New Orleans
And I like New Orleans
I've been to New Hampshire
And I like New Hampshire
- I like north, east, south, west
CHORUS: North, east, south, west
But the place I like most is the best
CHORUS:
The place she likes most is the best
The west
Ride along, singing a song
Get along, little hot doggie.
- Get along.
- Water.
I wanna go to a big empty space
Where the cows and the cantaloupes play
Wanna be a cowboy gal
Wanna sit in my corral
And hipsee-i-o and kiay
She wanna hip-ee-i-o and kiay
I wanna horse
With some good-looking chaps
I wanna chew up the dust like they say
Gonna put me on some boots
Gonna root me on some toots
Hipsee-i-o and kiay
When I'm hipsee-i-o kiaying
I'll put Annie Oakel to a shame
Don't know who she is
Or what I'm saying
But I have lots of fun just the same
I wanna go
Where they don't have no fence
When I go let me go thataway
And my day will be full
When I throw a little bull
And hipsee-i-o and I'll hipsee-i-o
And I'll hipsee-i-o and kiay
[SINGING IN PORTUGUESE]
Hey, lady. Get back to the west.
When I'm settle in the cactus
Yar!
You just reckon what I say
Don't go away.
But 10-gallon hat is too expensive
And a 2-gallon hat is okay
And that ain't hay.
Now take me out to a big empty space
Where the cows and the cantaloupes play
And my day will be full
When I throw a little bull
And hipsee-i-o and kiay
Give me my rusty. 44
Forty-five.
Give me a cow that I can punch
Cow-puncher.
Give me some buttons, some booze
No booze.
And I bet you that I reckon that I'll stay
I'm gonna be a cowboy girl
Gonna sit in my corral
- And hipsee-i-o
- And she'll hipsee-i-o
And I'll hipsee-i-o and kiay
- Get along
- Get along
- Get along
- Get along, got along, got along
- Whoop!
- Yabby!
[AUDIENCE APPLAUDING]
MAN:
Bravo, bravo.
- I'm afraid I'm gonna have to be going.
- I'll see you to your cabin.
- Now, you go right to bed, young lady.
MRS. HARRISON: Yes, get plenty of sleep.
MRS. WARREN: Good night, my dear.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Night.
Excuse me.
It's so peaceful here, it makes you forget your troubles.
Guess it does.
Nancy, it may be hard to understand now...
...but believe me, time heals everything.
You know, sometimes a person gets in trouble...
...and things look pretty hopeless.
You mustn't worry about it.
I'm sure everything will be all right.
That's it. Everything will be all right.
MASHER:
Well, well, well.
It sure is a small world, isn't it?
I see you changed your mind about dinner.
Why don't you go scrub a deck someplace?
Oh, I forgot. She's your wife, isn't she?
Well, I found out different.
- And that isn't all I found out.
- Come on.
Look here. Let me talk to the lady now.
Don't get me mad, man. Don't get me mad.
[THUDDING]
Thank you and good night.
Oh, Paul. Are you hurt?
It's funny how much better the stars look from down here.
Poor man.
And you did it all because of me.
I needed a rest. It was nothing.
- Are you sure you're all right?
- Fine.
He double-crossed me, hit me when I was looking.
You were so wonderful. I'm terribly sorry.
- That's all right. Let's forget it.
- No, no, no, you must rest.
Thank you.
Nancy, before we were interrupted,
I was about to say something.
I do hope you won't misunderstand me.
This isn't very easy for me.
Nancy, sometimes you meet the wrong person.
You have an experience that leaves you bitter.
Yes.
Well, if you'll allow it to, it can ruin your whole life.
I suppose it can.
You get to the point where you think you'll never love again...
...and no one will ever love you.
But then you meet someone...
...and you realize how wrong you are.
How wrong you are, and life is still ahead of you.
I think I know what you're trying to say.
Nancy, the companionship of someone who loves you...
...is the most important thing in the world.
And any decent man loves children.
- You mustn't say any more.
- But you should know that...
Oh, you're very sweet, but I'm in no position to listen.
I know. That's why I...
I'm terribly touched and I'll always remember this moment.
No. No, don't move.
I want to remember you just as you are.
What happened?
I'm not sure, but I think she just imagined a proposal out of me.
She did?
Not only that, she turned me down.
[KNOCKING ON DOOR]
- Come in.
- Well, we'll be landing shortly.
- You're all set, I see.
- Almost.
- And good luck to you, my dear.
- Thank you.
Oh, and you'll find that the doctors in Rio are excellent.
- So nice to... Excuse me.
- Hello, doctor.
- I just had to say goodbye to you.
- Thank you so much.
- Is your mother meeting you?
- No, I'm surprising her.
- Oh, dear. It's going to be quite a surprise.
- Uh-huh.
- Here's a little gift for you.
- Well, my goodness. Thank you.
Not at all. You'll be able to use it.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
- Sorry.
- Nancy, dear.
- Oh, Marina.
- I come to say goodbye.
We leave the States, boom, zoom, we get here so quick.
Oh, you've been so sweet.
Thank you very much.
- Is there anything I can do?
- Nothing. Everything is just fine.
You're a very sweet little girl.
And take care of yourself, will you?
- Goodbye, Nancy.
- Goodbye, Marina.
- I see you in Rio.
- All right.
- Hello, Nancy.
- Oh, hello, Paul.
I thought you might need some help.
That's very nice of you, but I have more help than I know what to do with.
I never met such friendly people.
You've been so sweet.
I do hope what happened the other night didn't upset you too much.
No. Well, I just wanted to say goodbye and...
- Goodbye, Paul.
- Goodbye.
If you should change your mind and do wanna see me, you can find me here.
- Well, thank you. I'll remember.
- Goodbye.
[HORN BLOWS]
Wait, please. I'm Miss Nancy Barklay.
Are my mother and grandfather at home?
- Oh, yes, miss. I will announce you.
- Oh! I'd rather...
I'd rather surprise them.
There's some luggage in the car.
- Grandfather.
- Hello, Nan.
Aren't you glad...?
- Father, I was just going to...
- Mother.
Hello, dear.
Would you like fish for lunch or chops?
Let's have chops.
No, no, no, it's too hot for chops.
Let's have something nice and cool like chili peppers.
I don't know. How about ice cream and cucumbers?
No, no, no.
I think some lemonade, baked beans and sauerkraut, eh?
[GREG CHUCKLING]
Oh, you two.
- Oh, Mother.
- Hi, baby. How are you?
- Hi, Grandfather.
- Bless you, baby. It's good to see you.
You knew I was coming.
It was supposed to be a surprise.
How did you find out?
When I tried to call you, they told me you were on your way here.
That's why we didn't meet the boat.
Mother didn't wanna spoil your surprise.
- Mother. Oh, goodness.
- Tell us about your trip.
- Yes, come on. Tell us.
- There were so many things.
It was simply heavenly.
But the most exciting thing of all...
...I met the most wonderful man and he proposed to me.
- Proposed to you?
- Oh, yes, Mother. He was a darling.
- But of course I had to say no.
FRANCES: Well, I should hope so.
And I had dinner at the captain's table.
And, oh, wait.
I have the lead in the most terrific new play.
I'm just too happy.
You sound like you've been a very busy little girl.
I have. I can't wait till I tell you about my new play.
- It starts out where...
- Wait a minute. Simmer down.
Let's get our coat off first, huh?
You can tell me about everything at lunch.
Alfredo, will you show Miss Nancy to her room? Here you are.
Wait right there.
I'll be down in a jiffy.
- I have to tell you all about it.
- All right, fine.
- Isn't she wonderful?
- Naturally.
Consider her predecessor.
And in all the years I've had her, she's never caused me a bit of trouble.
- Help me with the second act, will you?
- Certainly.
- Page 63.
- All right.
FRANCES:
Let's go over that scene again.
GREG:
The sun is shining...
The sun is shining as though the whole world hadn't come to an end.
I'm glad I'm going to have the baby.
No matter what happens...
GREG:
There's a part of him...
FRANCES: There's a part of him that will always be mine...
...and I need never be ashamed because he's a part of our love.
That's no good.
And I need never be ashamed because he's a part of our love.
Well, hello, darling.
All fresh and ready for Rio?
Yes, Mother.
- What were you rehearsing?
- The new play I'm going to do for Arthur.
Ricardo Domingos wrote it.
- It's simply wonderful, isn't it, Father?
- I tell you.
Exactly what I've always been looking for.
You want some lemonade, darling?
- Oh, no, thank you, Mother.
- Father?
Oh, just a little.
- Now, we wanna hear all about your play.
- Oh, yes.
- It's just a play.
- Just a play?
Tell us about it.
Who's going to produce it? Who wrote it?
You wouldn't have heard of the producer.
He has never done anything before.
- Well, who's the author?
- Isn't that silly?
I can't remember his name, either.
He's new too.
Well, is it a good play?
Oh, it's wonderful. It's a comedy.
It's laid in the South Sea Islands.
Well, that sounds interesting.
What's the story?
Well, it's the story about a girl...
- Me.
- Well, it is?
And, well...
- ... this girl is dying of a rare disease.
- Cigarette.
And she goes to South Sea Islands for her health.
No, no. Hold on a minute.
You say this is a comedy?
It doesn't start out very funny, but later on, it really is a scream.
Well, she goes to the South Seas...
Yes. Well, there's a doctor down there...
...and he's doing research on tropical diseases.
And he meets this girl, me.
And he falls in love with me and I fall in love with him...
...and we fall in love with each other.
Of course, I can't marry him because he doesn't know I'm gonna die.
Are you sure this is funny?
It doesn't sound very funny when you tell it...
...but, oh, the dialogue's simply magnificent.
And, well, there's a great part in it for me.
I fall in love and I have a nervous breakdown...
...and men commit suicide over me and, oh, just everything.
- Oh, you'll love it.
- Well, I...
- Well, we we'd like to read it, darling.
- I'd like to read that.
I'll get a copy of the play.
Excuse me, madam,
Professor Gama is here.
[SPEAKS IN ITALIAN]
- How are you?
- Maestro, good morning.
- Hi, professor.
- Nancy?
This is my daughter, Nancy.
Professor Gama.
How do you do?
[SPEAKS IN ITALIAN]
- Beautiful young lady.
- Yes, isn't she?
- Shall we try our music now?
- Fine.
We're going over one of the songs, the duet.
- Why don't you sing it with me?
- Oh, Mother, I really...
Oh, come on, it isn't difficult.
Professor, Nancy's gonna sing the song with us.
Oh, that's fine. This is fine.
Now, darling, you stand over here so you can see the music.
- All right?
- All right.
[SINGING]
Magic is the moonlight
Silver stars above me
Send someone to love me
Show my heart the way
Somewhere in the moonlight
Surely I will meet him
With a smile I'll greet him
- And I know he'll stay
- And I know he'll stay
- Lost within the splendor
- Lost within the splendor
- Of a kiss
- Of a kiss
- So tender
- So tender
- We will then
- We will then
- Surrender
- Surrender
- To a love divine
- To a love divine
Then when love is over
I'll recall a June night
- For magic was the moonlight
- For magic was the moonlight
- When the world was mine
- When the world was mine
- When the world was mine
- When the world was mine
GAMA: Bravo, bravo.
FRANCES: Darling.
What's the matter?
Mother, do you mind if I don't have lunch with you?
I had an awfully big breakfast on the boat.
But, darling, what is it?
- Well, what's the matter with her?
- Well, I guess she's just tired from the trip.
Hello?
Hello, I'd like to send a cable.
Thank you.
Hello?
Hello, I'd like to send a cable.
It's going to Mr. Arthur Barrett...
...Park Arms Hotel,
New York City, U.S.A.
Sorry, unable to do play.
Have decided to...
Have de...
Have decided to get married.
I'd like to see Mr. Paul Berten, please.
He's in conference.
- Do you have an appointment?
- No, but I'm sure he'll want to see me.
- Why don't you drop him a note?
- Drop him a note about this?
Oh, I couldn't.
[BUZZES]
I'm sorry.
Part of the order about the 15th of next month.
The balance will be delivered as requested.
MARINA [ON RECORDING]:
We appreciate your business.
You can expect the first part of the order about the 15th of next month.
The balance will be delivered as requested.
- This machine, we must send it back.
- What's the matter with it?
It has a Brazilian accent.
- Marina.
- Oh, Nancy.
Shoo, shoo.
- What are you doing here?
- I just have to see Paul.
- But he's very busy now.
- But it's terribly important.
- I have problems at home.
- Did you talk to your mama?
Yes, but she's so sweet and wonderful, if I told her, it would just kill her.
Oh, it would, huh? Well, you wait here.
Just a second.
PAUL: You can see that the fluctuation of the economic pattern...
...is much more irregular in the...
[SPEAKS IN PORTUGUESE]
Paul.
Huh?
If you'll excuse me a moment, gentlemen, some urgent business has come up.
I'll be right back. Marina, would you...?
[SPEAKS IN PORTUGUESE]
Nancy.
Well, this is a surprise.
I had to come.
You were the only one I could turn to.
What's this Marina tells me about your having a problem?
Oh, let's not talk about that now.
You've been so wonderful.
I'm sorry I took what you said so lightly on the boat.
- No, no, no.
- But I'll make up for it.
No. I mean, there's nothing to make up.
But there is.
You were so right about marriage.
- I was?
- Yes.
I'm gonna forget everything that happened in the past and start all over.
- I've decided to dedicate my life to ma...
- Nancy.
- Does your mother know about this?
- Not yet.
Then why do you bother to tell me?
Well, I had to come to you.
You're so wise.
It's nothing.
Don't you believe people are destined for each other?
I haven't given it much thought.
Look, Nancy, our souls may be very chummy...
...but we hardly know one another.
Well, I was born in New York and I'm 19.
- I thought you said you were 17.
- I'm getting older as fast as I can.
- Oh, I see.
- I got good marks school. I love children.
- And I can cook.
- Nancy...
Nancy, you're a nice, sweet child...
...but, well,
I'm old enough to be your uncle.
Oh, Paul, you haven't changed your mind about marrying me, have you?
But you've already got a husband.
Oh, you foolish darling.
So that's what you've been worried about.
- I'm not married.
- Not married?
- What did you say?
- Oh, well, I haven't got a husband.
- That's why I came here.
- Nancy, Nancy.
My advice to you is to go home.
Talk this whole thing over with your mother.
- Oh, I couldn't. It would hurt her so.
- Well, give me time to think.
Meanwhile, you run along and take good care of yourself.
- I will see you soon, won't I, Paul?
- Sure, I'll keep in touch.
- Oh, you don't have my address.
- Your address. Yes, okay. Address.
Well, here, you just write it right down here for me.
Thank you.
- You be sure and not lose this.
- Yes, yes... I mean, no, no.
- There you are.
- I'll take good care of this.
It was nice of you to drop in, Nancy.
Goodbye.
- Bye.
- It's been nice. Goodbye.
- Where is Nancy?
- She's gone home.
- And you let her go by herself?
- She got here by herself, didn't she?
And for your information, she is not married.
- Not married?
- No.
That poor child. That's terrible.
We must do something.
I can't, that's a job for her mother.
But she's afraid to tell her mother.
- Afraid to tell her mother?
- Yeah.
But I'm not afraid to tell her mother.
[SPEAKS IN PORTUGUESE]
Where are you going?
- To have a talk with Nancy's mama.
- Good.
- Her address.
- Give it to me.
Hello?
Hello?
- Hello?
- I beg your par...
- Oh, hello.
- Aha.
- You are the one.
- I am?
I want to talk to you about your daughter.
You should never let her go out alone.
- Frances?
- No, Nancy.
Aren't you Nancy's papa?
Oh, no, no, no. I'm Nancy's grandpapa.
Such a young-looking man.
Please.
Father, I won...
Oh, this is... Uh...
- Are you Nancy's mama?
- Yes.
- I am Marina Lopez Souza Rodrigues.
- How do you do?
I do not do so good. We must talk.
Well, won't you sit down?
Arthur.
- I have just talked to Nancy.
- Oh, is she home?
Oh, yes, yes.
She just went up to her room.
- You not throw her out, huh?
- Throw her out?
You have a wonderful daughter.
She's very brave.
And I was afraid she might try to have the baby without telling you.
That's ridiculous. Of course she wouldn't have the baby...
- Have the what?
- The baby.
For a moment, I thought she meant...
My daughter's name is Nancy Barklay.
I'm sure there's been some mistake.
This I know, that's why I'm here.
Who told you Nancy was going to have a baby?
- Nancy.
- But that's impossible.
No one told her it's impossible, so she's gonna have the baby.
I know there's been a mistake.
Excuse me, I'll go talk to Nancy.
[KNOCKING ON DOOR]
Come in.
- Well, still unpacking?
- Yes, Mother.
- I'll help you.
- All right.
Where were you this afternoon?
Oh, I had to go see a friend of mine.
- You had us very worried.
- Oh, I'm sorry.
Nancy, I wanna talk to you.
- All right, Mother. Is there anything wrong?
- Well, that's what I wanted to ask you.
No. Everything's just fine.
Darling...
...we've always been very close, you and I.
More like sisters than mother and daughter.
- Yes, Mother, I know.
- And you've always told me everything.
That's the basis for any honest relationship between two people who love each other.
Yes, Mother. I know, only...
Only what?
Well...
There's some things you can't tell anyone.
I'd do anything in the world not to hurt you, Mother...
...but sometimes things happen that, well, you have no control over them.
Oh, aren't they cute?
- Oh, Nancy.
- I wonder why...?
Mother, is there anything wrong?
Maybe you'd better lie down.
No, no, I'm quite all right.
- Maybe it's just the heat.
- Yes, it's just the heat.
No.
Let me do it.
Nancy...
...we're going to have a nice long talk about what's bothering you.
I can't talk about it, Mother.
It's too late to do anything about it, anyway.
Oh, my poor baby.
- This boy you were telling me about...
- He's not a boy, he's a man.
A man? Well, how old is he?
Oh, I guess he's about 40.
- Forty?
- Oh, but he's a young 40.
He's tall, good-looking, charming.
A sophisticated man of the world.
And you say he proposed to you?
Yes, but he wants to wait until I'm a little bit older.
I think I'm gonna be ill.
NANCY: Is there anything I can do?
- I think you've done quite enough.
What's the name of this man of the world?
Berten. Paul Berten.
- He's the head of a big coffee firm.
- Berten.
I want you to lie down and rest this afternoon. I'll send a tray of food up.
Is there anything special you'd like?
No, thank you, Mother.
[PHONE RINGING]
PAUL:
All right, all right. I'm coming.
Take it easy.
- Hello?
FRANCES: Mr. Paul Berten?
- Yes?
- This is Nancy's mother.
- Whose mother?
- Nancy's. Nancy Barklay's.
You remember her, don't you?
Oh, that Nancy. How's she feeling?
Fine, no thanks to you.
I'm very fond of Nancy.
He says he's very fond of Nancy.
- Look here, I'd better talk to him...
- No.
Mr. Berten, it's imperative that I see you tonight.
Well, that's very nice, but I have a sort of an engagement.
Well, if you'll forgive my saying so,
I think Nancy's welfare's more important.
I'm trying to be as calm and as civilized about this as I can.
Naturally.
It would help if we could get together and talk this over.
Well, hell, I...
I don't know very much about these things.
- But if I can be of any help...
- Well, you certainly could.
Well, I have a table at the Samba Club.
How about meeting me there?
Say, 8:00?
- The Samba Club?
- Yeah.
Fine, I'll be there.
He sounded as if he were doing me a favor.
- Don't you want me to go with you?
- I prefer to handle this alone.
- You don't really know him.
- We'll all have years to get acquainted.
- At least he wants to marry her.
- Look here.
If he seems a decent sort, if he isn't a criminal or insane...
...or something, it's all we can do.
- Look here...
- I'm putting in a call to Arthur.
- What's he got to do with it?
- I can't leave Nancy now.
Not when she needs me.
I'm not going to do the show.
I wish I could get my hands on this Berten fella.
Careful, Pappy.
You're talking about your future grandson.
George, I've got a problem.
A lady's joining me.
No. She's the mother of a friend of mine.
I've never met her, but I want you to break it up...
...as soon as possible after she gets here.
I understand.
- You leave everything to me, huh?
- Good boy.
- Good evening, madam. May I help you?
- I was to meet a Mr. Paul Berten here.
- Madam?
- Mr. Berten's table.
Mr. Berten.
- Mr. Berten?
- Yes.
Right this way, please.
- Mr. Berten, your guest is here.
- Oh, yes. Excuse me.
How do you do? I'm...
Why, you... You're Frances Elliott.
- Yes.
- Well...
- Won't you sit down, please?
- Madam.
This is a surprise.
I was expecting Nancy's mother.
In my spare time,
I'm also Nancy's mother.
- You? You're...?
- Yes.
- But I thought her name was Barklay.
- That was her father's name.
This is wonderful.
- May I order something for you?
- If you like.
- Two champagne cocktails, George.
- Two champagne cocktails.
And an occasion like this calls for caviar.
- Some caviar too.
- Some caviar.
I thought you said pea soup and hamburger steak.
No. Caviar and a bottle of champagne.
You know my favorite brand, George.
Very well, sir.
I can't tell you how anxious
I've been to meet you.
- I'm a great fan of yours, you know.
- Mr. Berten.
- I came here to discuss my daughter.
- If I'd known you were Nancy's mother...
...I'd have paid a lot more attention to her.
Would you?
Nancy's just a child, you know.
She's only 17.
Seventeen? She told me she was 19.
And I suppose that made everything all right?
Well, I shouldn't be too hard on her.
It's easy for a girl her age to get carried away.
Are you implying this is all Nancy's fault?
We should give her the benefit of the doubt.
Well, that's very generous of you.
- Tell me, is this your first trip down here?
- Yes.
Good. You've got to let me show you Rio.
It's the most wonderful city in the entire world.
- We were discussing Nancy.
- Oh, yes.
Mr. Berten, I would like to come right to the point.
Nancy's told me a little about you, but I'd like to know a great deal more.
That's a wonderful idea.
I would like to know something about your background, your family.
Well, there isn't much to tell, really.
I have the usual number of parents.
Then I suppose you're well qualified to take care of a wife and child?
To tell the truth,
I haven't given it much thought lately.
Well, don't you think it's about time you did?
You know, I've never met anyone quite like you.
You're so frank.
Well, I see no reason why two people can't be adult about things.
You're absolutely right.
I can't wait to show you around.
There's a place called Little Paquet Island.
In the moonlight...
The hospital just phoned.
They want you right away.
Your friend, Mr. Rogers, has been in a terrible accident.
- He has a broken neck.
- Oh, how awful.
Tell him to forget it.
I mean, it's probably not a very serious broken neck.
Thank you, George.
FRANCES: Aren't you going to him?
- Believe me, it's nothing.
He's always breaking his neck.
Now, where were we?
We were discussing Nancy.
Oh, yes. You know that Nancy has the most wonderful mother in the world?
Mr. Berten.
I'll never stop being grateful to her for bringing us together.
- Do you know what you're saying?
- If it hadn't been for Nancy...
...we might never have met.
Let's drink a toast.
To the three of us, happy times ahead.
Happy times ahe...? Well, I've never...
Really, I've never...
Mr. Berten, come quickly.
Your house is burning.
- Thank you, George.
- Hadn't you better go?
- It's a very small house.
- But it's burning big.
I'm sorry about all this.
Excuse me just a minute.
- The house was an inspiration, no?
- No.
- No?
- No.
Here. Maybe this will put out the fire.
Now, George, please, no more interruptions.
- I wanna be alone.
- I think you have got your wish.
[TAPPING]
Father? Father?
Father, what on earth are you doing?
I was just getting in some practice in case I run into that Berten fella.
- That will be all, Alfredo.
- If you pardon the expression, sir...
- ... you are a sucker for a right cross.
- Oh, really? Well, I...
Well, good night.
You'd better get to bed.
Thank you, sir. Good night, madam.
- Good night, Alfredo.
- Good night.
- Aren't you being a little melodramatic?
- Well, I'm not taking any chances. I...
- Well, how'd it go?
- We didn't settle anything.
You were right, you should've come with me.
- What's this fella like?
- He's wonderful.
- What?
- I mean, he's terrible.
Dangerously attractive and full of charm.
No wonder the child lost her head, any woman could fall in love with him.
- You don't say?
- Yes. How is Nancy feeling?
Oh, under the circumstances, she's feeling fine.
It's very strange.
I never would've thought he was the kind of...
I guess I don't know very much about men.
Well, it's never too late to learn,
I always say.
- Good night, darling.
- Good night.
You better wait.
- Good morning, sir.
- Good morning.
- Is Miss Elliott in?
ALFREDO: I'll see, sir.
- The name, please?
PAUL: Berten. Paul Berten.
Mr. Berten is here, sir.
You don't know me, but my name is Paul...
- Bravo, sir. Very good.
- Grandfather.
Oh, Paul, are you all right?
- Yeah, fine.
- How could you?
- Who is that?
- My grandfather.
Should they be letting him run around loose?
You have no right to do this.
I'm not a child anymore.
- She's not a child anymore.
- I'm a grown-up woman.
- She's a grown-up woman.
- I have the right to choose my own man.
- Does it hurt very much?
- No, it's...
Oh, my poor darling.
I'll get my first-aid kit.
Don't you dare touch him till I come back.
A little higher with the left, sir.
- I place these in a vase, sir.
- Thank you.
Sit down, son.
You and I better have a little talk.
Say, tell me something, will you?
Is there any insanity in this family?
No, not that I know of.
- Any in yours?
- I'm not so sure anymore.
Up until last week,
I was a peaceful, happy citizen.
Then I met Nancy and I seem to have become a punching bag.
- Now, I haven't the vaguest notion why.
- You met Nancy when?
Last week, on the boat.
- It's a very strange thing, but...
- Wait minute. Now, she...
- You never knew her before?
- Who?
- Nancy.
- Of course not.
What are you driving at?
- Wait, you don't think that I'm the one...
- Well, now, I...
- She seems very anxious to marry you.
- Oh, no.
Look here, when did she tell you that she was going to have a...?
Well, she didn't exactly tell me.
She was talking to herself on the boat deck.
What did she say?
Something about a guy running away...
...but she was going to have the baby.
Now wait a minute.
"And she was never going to love again. "
- But it didn't matter.
- "And life was over. "
- Say, how do you know?
- Well, look, look.
"He's run away with her.
She can never hold him.
I'm glad I'm going to have the baby. "
And you thought that...?
Sorry, but we all thought...
That's why her mother wanted to see me.
No wonder she ran out on me.
Will you excuse me?
There's another mystery I got to solve.
- About Frances?
- Yes... No, around here, it's Nancy, 2-to-1.
Here, boy, have a cigar.
No, no, here, here, have two cigars.
[KNOCKING ON DOOR]
Come in.
- Oh, hello, Father.
- Hello, dear.
- Paul's here.
- Oh, really?
I don't think I can face him.
You talk to him, Father.
Well, as matter of fact, we did have quite a chat.
- He's a wonderful fella, all right.
- He's a what?
Oh, I guess you were right about him.
He... Any girl would be lucky to get him.
- Father, after what he's done?
- What he's done?
- He's behaved like a gentlemen.
- Gentleman?
While the rest of us have been making idiots of ourselves.
- What are you talking about?
- I'll tell you what I'm talking about.
- Paul just met Nancy last week.
- What?
- And she's not having the baby.
- But Nancy practically admitted it.
She admitted nothing of the kind.
What happened was Paul heard her rehearsing some lines from the play.
The play she came down here to rehearse.
The one about the South Sea Islands.
The situation in that play is like the situation in yours.
She's having a baby.
She and this fella are captured by headhunters...
...and they're all going to be boiled in oil.
Oh, darling, I should be boiled in oil.
You know, I feel like getting boiled myself.
Come on, let's go downstairs.
NANCY [SINGING]:
Embrace me
My sweet embraceable you
Embrace me
You irreplaceable you
Just one look at you
My heart grew tipsy in me
You and you alone
Bring out the Gypsy in me
I love all
The many charms
About you
Above all
I want my arms
About you
Don't be a naughty baby
Come to mama
Come to mama
My sweet
Embraceable
You
My sweet
Embraceable
You
- That's fine.
- Oh, thank you.
- Hello.
- Hello, Mr. Berten.
- It's nice to see you again.
- It's nice to see you again.
- Do you still wanna see Rio?
- I'm dying to.
I can be ready in a minute.
And Paul's such a wonderful guide.
No one can show you Rio the way he can.
Well, perhaps I'd better not go.
Oh, please come.
I want you to start getting used to him.
- She won't be in the way, will she, Paul?
- No. No.
- All right, I'll go.
- Good, we'll all go.
- Fine.
- Come on, darling. We'll get ready.
- Do you like him?
- Oh, very much.
He'll make you a wonderful son-in-law.
Look, we're almost at the top of the mountain.
Oh, gosh.
Oh, Paul.
I wonder what they're laughing about.
Oh, Paul.
- I wonder what they're laughing about.
- I don't know.
FRANCES:
It's been a wonderful week, hasn't it?
NANCY: Dreamy.
- I think I'll get some bicarbonate.
Had fun tonight, huh, Father?
Say, that Rio mule's got a kick in it.
- Wasn't it a heavenly evening?
- Yes, dear.
- Doesn't he dance divinely?
- Yes, dear.
Mother, wouldn't Rio be a very romantic place for a honeymoon?
Yes, I think it would be wonderful.
Whose honeymoon?
Paul's and mine.
Nancy, you're not serious about marrying Paul.
Why, certainly I am.
He's serious. He proposed to me.
But it's ridiculous.
That a man would propose to me?
Oh, Mother, you're old-fashioned.
You don't seem to realize it, but I've grown up.
Really?
Well, according to our modern calendars, young lady, you are still 17 years old.
Well, I'm not really 17.
You know I've always been older.
Paul Berten is much too old for you, Nancy.
He doesn't think so.
What about Scotty?
Oh, Scotty's a sweet boy, but he could be my son.
Well, maybe you and Paul could adopt him.
I know Paul and I will be very happy, Mother.
We love each other so much.
Oh, it's different with you.
You're married to the theater and don't need anything else.
- But I am not married...
- Don't worry, darling.
Paul knows what he's doing.
I'll let you know as soon as we make our wedding plans.
Thank you.
- Good night, Mother.
- Good night, Nancy.
- Good morning, sir.
- Good morning.
- Hello there.
- Oh, hello.
I was just having a look at the view.
Hey, these new bathing suits, they're quite...
Yes, sir. Yes.
Alfredo, would you take these to Miss Elliott for me?
- Certainly.
- Alfredo, she's in the library.
- Yes.
- And these to Miss Nancy.
- She's in the garden somewhere.
- Come in.
- Almost ready?
- Almost.
- How do I look?
- Oh, I like that dress.
Oh, I hope Paul likes it.
This is the most important night of my life.
[MUSIC PLAYS IN DISTANCE]
NANCY:
Oh, the carnival's starting.
Come on, girls. Paul's here.
Let's not keep him waiting.
My word, the two most beautiful girls in the world.
[SINGING] When you are out on the street
Out in the tropical heat
You'll fall in love with a song
With a wonderful beat
Ka-ka-krum-pa-pa
Tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-ta
Ka-ka-krum-pa-pa
Tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-ta
It's got the kind of appeal
That turns your head like a wheel
And what a wonderful feeling
That feeling you feel
Ka-ka-krum-pa-pa
Tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-ta
Ka-ka-krum-pa-pa
Tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-ta
Your heart will beat like a bongo
Just like what's beating in mine
The heat of the sun
May be 101
But you'll make it 109
And there is more to it yet
I'm gonna bet you a bet
That you can pack up and go
But you'll never forget
Ka-ka-krum-pa-pa
Tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-ta
Ka-ka-krum-pa-pa
Tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-ta
Ka-ka-krum-pa-pa
Tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-ta
Here comes that vendor Manuel
He has umbrellas to sell
And everybody has fun
When they hear that funny man yell
A green umbrella
Blue umbrella
A red umbrella
Many shades and many types
Polka dots and yellow stripes
Help to keep you on your feet
Shade you from the tropic heat
Everybody's got one, got one, got one
Everybody's got one, got one but me
Ka-ka-krum-pa-pa
Tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-ta
Ka-ka-krum-pa-pa
Tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-tiki-ta
CHORUS: The heat of the sun
May be 101
But she'll make it 109
But there is more to it yet
I'm gonna bet you a bet
That you can pack up and go
But you'll never forget
Pa-pa-tik-tik-ta
Tik-tik-tik-tik-tik-ta
Ka-ka-krum-pa-pa
Tik-tik-tik-tik-tik-ta
Tik-tik-tum, tik-tik-tum
A -riki-tik-tik-tum, tik-tik-tum
- Shall we dance?
- Oh, I ' d love to.
It's my turn now.
- Grandfather. Grandpa, I ' d like to dance.
- You go right ahead, my dear.
- With you, silly.
- But I don't do these modern ones.
- Come on, I'm gonna teach you.
- Don't go away.
- I've got to talk to you alone.
- All right.
Not here. Let's go out on the terrace.
I wonder where Paul is.
You never mind Paul.
Pay some attention to your grandfather.
- There's such a full moon out tonight.
- Yes, and never mind the full moon too.
FRANCES: This is a wonderfully exciting city.
- I told you you'd like it.
What did you want to talk to me about?
Frances...
The fact of the matter is I need help.
Yes, Paul?
Nancy is such a wonderful girl.
I realize how close you and she are...
...and I wouldn't do anything in the world to break that up.
You believe that, don't you?
Yes.
Well, I'm afraid
I'm not doing this very well...
...but, Frances, I...
I want you to understand that I think this might be very good for Nancy.
She could use a father.
A father?
Frances, I'm trying to tell you that I love you.
Oh, Paul.
- Will you marry me?
- Yes.
Paul, I can't marry you.
- Is there someone else?
- Nancy. I couldn't do this to her.
- She's in love with you too.
- That's ridiculous. She only thinks she is.
- But you did propose to her.
- That's her imagination.
- Frances, you do love me?
- Yes, I do.
But I can't hurt Nan.
I know that.
But supposing I could prove to you that Nancy is not in love with me...
- ... would you marry me?
- Of course I would.
All right, then, I'll prove it to you.
[FANFARE PLAYS]
Ladies and gentlemen, we have a big surprise for you.
Miss Nancy Barklay from the United States, she's gonna sing a lovely song for us.
Oh, come on, Paul.
[SINGING "MUSETTA'S WALTZ"]
- That was beautiful.
- I'm glad you liked it.
- That was lovely.
- Thank you, Paul.
- I've got to talk to you.
- Yes, I've got to talk to you.
- Will you excuse us, Mother?
- Yes, dear.
I've got something very important to say to you, Nancy.
Oh, have you?
I'm so glad there's a full moon tonight.
It's so romantic.
The moon has nothing to do with what I'm going to say.
Oh, but it helps a lot, doesn't it?
Nancy, I want you to pretend it's raining.
All right, darling, it's raining.
No, no, no. I mean...
- Look, things can't go on this way.
- Of course they can't, darling.
That night on the boat when I proposed to you...
- I mean, when you thought I...
- Well, I was young and foolish then.
- But now I know what I want.
- You can't be in love with me.
Is that what you've been afraid of, darling?
- Why, of course I'm in love with you.
- Nancy, look at me.
- Oh, you're wonderful.
- Take a better look.
Why, I could be your father.
Oh, my father. You silly boy.
Nancy.
Paul is right.
He doesn't want to hurt you, dear, and you mustn't hurt yourself.
What you feel now is something every girl goes through.
It's part of growing up.
Why, when I was 15,
I was crazy about an acrobat.
When I was 16,
I wanted to marry a deep-sea diver.
And when you were 17, you married father.
Yes, I know. But that was different.
Your father was only two years older than I.
I know how you feel about Paul now, darling, but it isn't really love.
That's still ahead of you.
And someday you'll laugh about all this.
But when you find your Paul, someone your own age...
...you'll be the happiest girl in the world.
So that's it. You've taken him from me.
- Nancy.
- How could you?
The two people I love most betraying me behind my back.
I offered you the heart of a woman...
...and you treated it like a plaything.
You took a beautiful dream, made of starlight and evening song...
...and turned it into a shabby, sordid...
- Escapade.
- Escapade.
Well, I won't hold you.
You're free to go, free to forget me.
All I ask is the warm, merciful cloak of solitude.
I'm through with men and all their hypocrisy.
This is farewell. Farewell to you both.
- Wasn't she wonderful?
- Wonderful? You'd better go after her.
Why, that's the big scene from the third act.
Paul, she'd be wonderful as Emily.
I'll cable Barrett right away.
Miss Elliott... I mean, Mrs. Berten, you're late.
Yes, I know. Come on, darling.
I'm sorry we're late, but we had car trouble and we...
There's a show on, you know. The finale.
Yes, come on.
[SINGING]
Love is like this
Strange as it seems
The moment you kiss
Your maker of dreams
A beautiful world of love will unfold
The moonlight of old will turn into gold
With one little kiss
For love is like this
You float away
On the light of a magic lantern sky
A way
Where you certainly will
Reach the top of a thrill
On the wings of a sigh
All of your schemes
Lost in the blue
Will turn into dreams
The kind that come true
And when you feel the glorious glow
In someone's hello
Then your heart will know
The meaning of bliss
For love is like this
CHORUS: All of your schemes
NANCY: Ah-ah-ah
CHORUS: Lost in the blue
NANCY: Ah-ah-ah-ah
CHORUS: Will turn into dreams
NANCY: Ah-ah-ah-ah
CHORUS: The kind that come true
NANCY: Ah-ah-ah
And when you feel the glorious glow
In someone's hello
Then your heart will know
- The meaning of bliss
- The meaning of bliss
For love is like
This
[ENGLISH SDH]
Listen to this! Listen to this, you fellows! You fellows, listen!
General Grant chased the Rebs out of Richmond four days ago.
And it's rumored that Lee's already surrendered.
The war is over!
[GUNSHOTS]
- Here's the captain's papers.
- Get those Yanks out of here.
All right, you two, get this body out of here.
Pardee, get these men out of sight.
Now, come on, let's go.
Hurry it up, Mike.
Hurry it up.
- Captain Cagle?
- Yes.
- Brevet Major Harris.
- We've been expecting you.
Here's the warrant for the payroll.
Well, you brought a very small guard for this much money.
- There's no Rebs within 50 miles.
- What about Randall's Raiders?
We drove them clear out of Louisiana with their tails between their legs.
Well...
...all right. Hand it down.
Where's the station agent?
He got taken sick. One of the boys took him back to camp.
Where you going?
- Back to the train.
- Go ahead.
Stand beside it with your mouth shut and get on when it pulls out.
I'll be watching you from this window.
Sign this receipt. Get that money to your camp in a hurry.
Stop them, major!
They shot the station agent!
Get after them, you fools!
They stole your payroll.
- You all right?
- Yeah. Get out of here.
Fire at them, they're rebels!
Hey, lieutenant. Ain't that a federal offense, breaking open them boxes?
Ain't that a beautiful sight?
Makes you feel like a kitten with a whole basin of milk.
- What a pity it don't belong to us.
- How much you figure it comes to?
Lieutenant, how about making that a neat, round sum?
Say $ 10,000, and us fellows dividing up the difference?
You thieving rat.
The Army would shoot us.
Well, who would tell?
- I wouldn't, for one.
- Me neither.
Look at us. A bunch of starved scarecrows, whipped and dead broke.
All we got from this war is shriveled guts and saddle sores.
You got a tempting argument.
I doubt if it's legal.
It ain't legal, Vance, or moral.
Confederacy can use that money more than us.
You're right. Tomorrow we're taking this money to General Randall.
Well, we tried anyway.
Let's get into this grub.
- Regiments broke camp and moved out.
- But where to?
General said they'd wait for us right here.
Been away eight days.
Might've been attacked.
Or ordered away all of a sudden.
We better ride into
Claysville and find out.
VANCE:
What's your regiment?
Fifth Louisiana Rifles, or what's left of them.
Where's Randall's outfit?
The cavalry disbanded two or three days ago.
Scattered so as not to give up the horses.
You fellows should do likewise before the Yanks confiscate them.
Wait a minute. What are you talking about? What happened?
What's happened?
You mean you ain't heard?
General Lee surrendered to Grant five days ago.
Appomattox Courthouse in Virginia.
- Surrendered? You're crazy.
- No, that's a fact, lieutenant.
All of us gave up our guns in Shreveport last Monday.
So war's over.
We can all go home.
MAN:
If you've got one left to go to.
Now that the brigade's scattered, how we gonna find the general?
- That's just it. We can't.
- We gotta try, Vance.
- Why?
- Why?
To give him the money, of course.
I don't know.
The surrender changes everything.
We gotta talk it over.
We can't take this money.
It don't rightly belong to us.
Then tell us who it does rightly belong to.
It belongs to the Confederate government, I suppose.
There ain't no more Confederate government. It's finished.
That's the truth.
They'll hang Jeff Davis and throw all the others in prison.
Well, then it must still be Federal property.
You mean we ought to give it back to them?
A minnie ball in my leg's got to be paid for.
Your brother nearly died of gangrene in a Yankee prison.
We didn't steal this money.
We took it in battle, fair and square.
It's called "spoils of war," like capturing a horse.
We and the Federals didn't know it was over.
So it's still prize money.
It's ours. You don't have to take your share, if it sticks in your craw.
How do you feel about this, Ray?
What Vance says makes sense.
If we got a right to it, we're fools not to take it.
It's settled.
I got it figured out.
We got $ 1750 apiece coming to us.
Wait until I get to Georgia with this.
I'll buy a hog, a dog and a rocking chair.
We all three just gonna sit there and scratch.
We'll fix us up the best farm in east Texas.
You bet. But first...
...I'm gonna get married.
Cathy's been waiting four years.
It seems more like 40 to me.
And now, instead of going back to her empty-handed, I got this money.
Yanks!
Look at them. All brave and sassy now that they licked us.
Not us, Mike.
Maybe the South is licked...
...but not us.
Still, it's smarter if we split up here and now.
- So long, Mike.
- So long, Vance.
Whenever you get to Texas, you know where to find me.
I ain't ever gonna leave that rocking chair.
- Goodbye, Brett. Lots of luck.
- Thank you.
- Goodbye.
- Sarge.
You're new here.
What happened to McComb?
Joined the Army. I'm minding the store until he's back. If he's still alive.
You think Ma would like this bonnet?
That's pretty. See if there's a fancy one...
...with lace and pink ribbons for Cathy.
That's the only one I got left.
Anyhow, who feels free nowadays?
He does! He's going home to get married.
If we clean him up so his sweetheart recognizes him.
Don't worry. Cathy would know me a mile away.
Wish I could take her a real nice present like a gold ring or bracelet.
Sorry. That's all the female finery I got left.
Except this here bustle, which
I've been using for a mousetrap.
- Give us that too.
- Hey, Vance...
...now, this is fit and proper for a bridegroom.
- It's just your size.
- This feels like real broadcloth.
Sure is. Probably the last good suit left in the state.
How much?
With the pants, that will cost you $ 14.
I'll throw in a pair of galluses free.
Hard money!
No Confederate shinplasters.
This look hard enough for you?
A $20 Federal bill. I ain't seen one of these since '63.
- That cover what we owe you?
- Sure, I'll go wrap them up.
Jethro! Well, I'll be dad-burned if it ain't old Jethro!
- You're a sight for sore eyes.
- Old rascal.
How'd you stay alive all these years?
What's the matter?
We ain't changed that much.
You look kind of surprised to see us.
- We all heard you was dead, Mr. Vance.
- Well, he done near was.
That minnie ball misspelled my name a little.
You mean, our folks don't even know I'm alive?
No, sir. Nobody does.
We'll ride by Cathy's house and tell her.
She ain't there no more. Her folks was killed in the same raid your pa was.
- Where is she?
- Your place. Moved in with your ma.
VANCE:
Strange how things work out.
We go off and fight four years. But they come and kill him here at home.
BRETT: The place looks mighty rundown.
RAY: Plumb wore out, like us.
Come on, let's go in yelling like we used to.
[YELLING]
Ma?
My son!
They told me you were dead.
They were almost right.
But here's what's left of me, Ma.
Just think. All three of you.
Brett!
Ray.
All my sons. Home again.
Clint!
Clint!
Clint!
Clint, come running!
Cathy! Cathy!
Vance.
Cathy.
Let me have a good look at you, honey.
Yeah, that's just how I've seen you night and day for four years...
...except for those britches.
Clint! Clint!
Vance!
Oh, no!
This can't be the sprat!
Look at how he's grown and filled out.
- He's almost a man, ain't he, Cathy?
- They told us you were dead.
Yeah, I know. I know. Now, come on.
Come on. Tell me about you all.
We got a heap of work to do.
First thing, get Cathy out of those britches and into a dress.
I try, but she works harder than a mule all day helping me and Ma.
Not anymore.
We got three farm hands.
Come on, I got a bushel of things to tell you.
Vance? I don't reckon you could have known about this...
...but me and Cathy got married about three months ago.
Married?
Well, this is a...
This is a day of surprises all around.
I don't know what we'd have done without Cathy.
Or her without us after her folks died.
We had poor scratching to keep body and soul together...
...waiting for the war to end.
Well, it must've been hard.
Well...
...congratulations, Clint.
We always did want Cathy in the family, didn't we, Ma?
Yes, son.
Always.
Hey, Cathy.
Look at the nicks on this saber.
How many Yankees did you all get?
- We didn't stop to count.
- Whole bunch?
Most of those nicks came from butchering pigs.
I'll bet. A blue one with the brass buttons.
Wish I would've been there.
I bet you I would've gotten my share.
He ranted and raved whenever we got news of a battle.
You did right to stay here,
Clint. You did fine.
I love my bonnet. You boys shouldn't have spent what little you got on me.
That's a mighty poor gift,
Ma, for all you've given us.
CLINT:
Hey! Look here.
A brand new Sunday-go-to-meeting suit.
That's a present for you.
From all of us.
For me? It must've cost a fortune.
- Where'd you get money?
- We had some saved up.
- We still got a few dollars left.
- That's more than we got.
Sit down while everything's hot.
Come on, Clint.
You're hungry, aren't you?
Dear Lord, I thank you most kindly for bringing my boys home safe and sound.
It's sure good to hear him sing.
It sure is. All we're missing now is Pa.
Remember we all used to sit here and sing?
Indeed. Brings back a heap of good memories.
Vance used to sing the loudest.
This one was his favorite.
If we wanna get to work before sunup, we better turn in.
A lot of things around here need fixing.
What's troubling you, Vance?
You ain't your old self tonight.
Oh, I'm all right.
A little tired, I reckon.
Vance...
...I know you and Cathy used to be kind of fond of each other, but...
You ain't got no hard feelings against either of us, have you?
Hard feelings? Me?
Why, of course not.
You really mean that?
Down deep?
- Listen, did I ever lie to you?
- No.
All right. Oh, I liked Cathy, sure. But we all did.
But I was never in love with her.
We were just real good friends.
And that's how it still is.
So don't you ever think nothing else.
Why...
...I'm just happy for both of you.
I hoped it'd be that way, Vance.
We're so much in love.
I could never tell you.
You don't have to.
It's written all over your face. And hers too.
You go on to bed.
I'm gonna lock the barn.
There's a lot of stragglers.
They might steal our horses.
You can't even trust a Reb nowadays.
I'll see you in the morning.
Vance, you've gotta let me talk to you.
You never said one word to me tonight.
- Please let me explain.
- Nothing to explain.
Oh, but there is.
Please let me...
Give me a chance to tell you...
Coming to bed, Vance?
Vance?
How soon you figure we can tell folks about the money?
A couple months. We'll spend a little at a time so as not to start talk.
You're the boss, Vance.
We gotta buy seed if we hope to get a good crop this summer.
The crop'll have to wait.
The money we got hidden in here is a lot better than seed.
Vance.
Your mare worked her shoe loose.
It's all right now.
Please, I've been trying to see you alone for over a week now.
Won't you even try and understand?
No one asks why a woman gets married.
You do. You ask me with every look.
You've no right to think
I was faithless.
I waited for you, just like I promised.
I thought about you all day long, and prayed for you every night.
Then that letter came saying you were dead.
I didn't want to live myself anymore.
I loved you, Vance.
With all my heart and soul.
You know I did.
How can you doubt it?
That's what hurts the most, Cathy.
I know. And I can't forget it.
We got to, both of us, or we can't live under the same roof.
I know that too.
Maybe time will take care of it.
I want you to be happy.
I never will be unless you are, Vance.
I hear you lying awake at night.
I know what you're thinking about.
Me and Clint, side by side.
Why'd you tell him there was never anything between us?
- You want me to tell him the truth?
- He already knows it. I told him.
Why?
Because I don't like living with a lie.
He believed you when you said you never loved me.
He'll believe you because he loves you just as much as he loves me.
So if he's big enough to forget what's past, then you can too.
Please, Vance.
Please try for my sake.
Cathy?
What you doing?
- Something wrong?
- No, Clint. Nothing. I was...
Cathy, you're crying.
What are you crying about?
I don't know, Clint.
I had a bad dream, I guess.
The war and everything.
Don't cry. We're all safe again.
There's nothing to worry about.
I hope not.
But to have to lose you again so soon.
I knew this was gonna happen, son.
I could see the heartbreak growing in you.
I reckon what you're doing is right.
There's no other way, Ma.
I tried to hide it, but I can't stay on.
Sooner or later Clint would see.
- He might guess now anyway.
- No, he won't.
I'll tell him I'm going out to California for a few months.
He'll believe it.
And the rest of you'll never tell him.
When you planning to go?
Tomorrow.
No, Ma. The quicker the better.
Tomorrow we'll go to the raising of the new schoolhouse.
I'll tell Clint and Cathy there, and leave before they can stop me.
They'll both be mighty upset, Vance.
Maybe so, but they won't make a scene in front of all of our friends.
I wouldn't be too sure of that.
Clint thinks the sun rises and sets in you.
I know, Ma.
That's just why I'm going.
What's wrong?
My, you girls look pretty.
I have to keep an eye on you.
Go on, Clint.
Ray, tell the fellas to hurry it up.
We don't want to miss any of the fun.
Ninety, ninety-five, two.
How come you're only taking 200?
You all need it more than I do.
Give Ma the rest of my share.
Tell her how we got it and that it's rightfully ours.
- It isn't fair, giving up everything.
- Come on, take more than $200.
You gotta have a stake out West.
I'll get a job somewhere.
Don't worry.
Now, come on. Act natural.
I don't want Clint and Cathy to suspect anything.
CLINT:
Come on, fellas!
What kept you so long?
Greasing your hair for them girls at the picnic?
Hey, you missed!
One more!
Missed again!
Right this way, folks!
Give some money to build our school!
Right this way!
MAN:
Pull out those hundred dollar bills!
We want the money to build that schoolhouse over there!
There's one of the best roofers in the county!
We want the money to build that schoolhouse!
GIRL 1: Sing another one!
GIRL 2: Yeah, one more!
She's not a day over 20 years old.
She'll last.
What do you mean, going away?
Where?
An old army friend has a ranch out in California.
He needs a partner.
I've been getting restless anyway...
That's not your reason, Vance.
You're leaving because of me and Clint.
Maybe so.
I can't meet his eyes after what you told me.
We don't want you to go.
This is your home. We love you.
A home can be full of too much love.
Then one night it burns up, and everybody in it.
I can't face the others, knowing you left because of me...
...and they knowing it too.
I guess you'll have to learn.
You can't go. You know how I feel.
- Don't say it.
- You know that...
Even if it's true, don't say it.
Not now.
Not ever.
Cathy? What's the matter?
What's wrong?
- What's wrong?
- I told her I was going away.
And I was coming to tell you.
- Away? What do you mean?
- Vance! Ray! Brett!
These fellows want to talk to you.
Vance? That's Major Kincaid, and this gentleman's Mr. Siringo.
Howdy. Won't you light and join us?
- No, thanks. This won't take long.
- We hope.
I've been engaged to recover property lost or stolen during the war.
Well, that's good news.
We lost a lot of things around here.
Want our list?
No, we've got our own.
Three of you brothers were members of Randall's cavalry...
...a unit of which attacked a railroad station...
...on the morning of April 10, 1865.
Eight weeks ago.
By impersonating soldiers, you took an Army payroll...
...amounting to $ 12,250 from an officer who was on the train.
Those may have been your orders...
...but the war was already over...
...and had been since noon of the preceding day.
- Any idea what he's talking about?
- No.
He's got us mixed up.
We found one of the men who got away with you...
...and we recovered his share of the money.
- He told us who stole the rest.
- He's lying.
Don't be foolish. I've known you since you was knee-high.
I'd hate to see you get into trouble.
If you got the money, give it back.
We didn't steal any money, Ed.
Well, that's possible, but we mean to make sure.
The paymaster can identify the men who took the money.
We're taking you to him.
Someone wants to see us, you bring him here.
We're not leaving.
We hoped you'd make no trouble, but you're all three under arrest.
We're taking you into Tyler.
Get your horses.
You got no right to do this!
They never lied or stole from nobody.
Stay out of this, Clint.
Go on. Get the horses.
Vance.
Now, don't worry, Ma.
Everything's gonna be all right.
Don't you worry.
Don't worry, Martha.
I'll go with them.
If that man recognizes you, we're done for.
How can he?
We were bearded then.
He can't tell us now from Adam.
What happened, Mr. Vance?
You boys in some trouble?
Nothing serious, Jethro.
Just a little misunderstanding.
We'll get it cleared up right shortly.
- It's a frame-up.
- There must be something behind it.
- Sure there is.
- Go on, get me some hot water.
They want revenge on Randall's men for driving them crazy during the war.
Start making up charges, like stealing money or something.
- What'll they do with Vance?
- They'll put him in a stinking prison.
What's the matter, Clint?
Well, why did you say just Vance?
We're worried about all three of them.
Well, of course we are.
That's what I meant.
What was that?
[HORSE GALLOPING]
Somebody just rode up.
Clint? No, put that gun down!
You stay in here.
CLINT:
Who are you? What do you want?
- Is your name Reno?
- Yeah. What about it?
We're friends of your brothers.
Is there any of them around?
Vance, Brett or Ray?
No, why?
We come to warn him.
Some men are looking for him.
Too late. They arrested them this morning on some lying charge.
It was a lie, wasn't it?
- Sure.
- Where'd they take them?
To town. They're taking a train to Tyler to stand trial.
- Let's get going.
- I'll go with you!
Clint! Clint!
We've got to stop him.
Who are you, men? How do we know you're friends of Vance?
Don't worry, miss.
We know you well enough.
You're Cathy.
Vance must've showed us your picture a thousand times.
Ain't it natural that his brother wants to help get him free?
Good night, miss.
[TRAIN WHISTLES]
[TRAIN WHISTLES]
I understand how you might feel about this money.
Even if they don't identify you, they can send you to prison.
The three of you.
I don't want to send you to prison.
All I want is to recover the money.
I'll make you a fair proposition.
Tell me you'll give me the money.
I give you my word we'll drop the charges. Forget the whole thing.
This is your last chance.
If they identify you tomorrow, you'll get 10 years.
Even if they let you go, you'll be watched your whole life.
The money'd do you no good.
I know you've got it.
Here's the $20 bill you spent at that crossroad store.
You know, it's funny.
If the war had gone the other way...
...you might have been questioning him instead of me.
What do you say?
We haven't got all of it.
Only our shares.
Where's the rest?
I don't know.
That's no good. We want it all.
I'm willing to do what you say, but we can't give you more than we've got.
Then we've got no deal.
Sit still. Don't move.
Sit down, or you'll get shot.
Get his gun, Ray.
Get his gun and keys and unlock those cuffs.
Stop the train at that water tower!
Go on, grab the brakes!
Get out, quick!
Sit down!
Keep your seats and nobody'll get hurt.
- Listen, Mike...
- Get out, Vance. Sit down!
Pardee!
Get out!
[GUNSHOTS]
- Clint, what are you doing here?
- Did you think I'd let you down?
Get mounted and get out of here!
They got away!
We've got to get back to Bedford.
Conductor, telegraph descriptions of the men to the surrounding counties.
- Shoot on sight. They're armed.
- Yes, sir.
Engineer, back this train into Bedford, fast.
The Reno boys didn't plan the getaway.
They were as surprised as we were.
Believe what you like. They knew.
They had it timed to the split second.
Don't you agree?
It looks that way, but I'm not sure
I can agree with you.
If the escape was planned, why'd Vance confess?
- That's what I mean. He was...
- Are you defending this man?
You had your chance and you failed.
Now, I'm gonna get him my way.
And the money.
- All right, Clint. Get on back home.
- Why?
Go on before somebody sees you.
- A lot of thanks for helping you.
- I didn't want your help. None of you.
- You was being took to prison!
- I could've made a deal with Siringo.
We'll be halfway to the Mississippi by morning.
- Head down river, he can't catch us.
- Hold on, hold on.
We're gonna get off the road and settle this now.
Ed, Pardee, Mike.
I led you through four years of war, and I never steered you wrong, did I?
So you ought to know that nobody hates giving up more than I do.
But these men will hound us until we're dead or behind bars.
So you did take the payroll.
Why didn't you tell me the truth?
We felt we had a right to it, Clint.
We did have a right to it.
You told us that yourself.
What changed your mind?
Siringo and common sense.
He said he'd forget everything if we return the money.
I bet he'll still do it, in spite of that holdup. Nobody was hurt.
I vote we give it back.
The money isn't worth that risk.
I agree. We've been shot at enough for one lifetime.
What about you?
You two boys can do as you please.
I'm keeping my share.
- Me too.
- And me.
You'll never get away with it.
They'll scour the country.
- They'll shoot on sight.
- We'll take our chances.
Don't be stupid.
There's nothing in this but trouble.
Your trouble is, you lost your guts.
Come on, boys.
Hold it.
This deal is only good if we turn in all the money.
So if I gotta save your necks too, that's the way it is.
Get it. And their guns.
Now I'm going back to get our shares.
I'll meet you right after daybreak at Hanna's mill.
Brett, that means you and Ray too.
How do we know you aren't lying?
Maybe this here Siringo didn't make you any deal at all.
Yeah, and even if he did, how good is his word?
I trust it.
Clint.
Nobody knows you're in on this.
Go into town and tell Siringo
I'll bring the money tomorrow morning.
You come to the mill and give us his answer.
That satisfy you?
What choice have we got?
Go on, Clint. Get going.
And we thought he was our friend.
He is, Mike. Best one you ever had.
[CATTLE MOOING]
We found nothing so far.
If the money's here, they must have buried it.
Martha, if you know where it is or where the boys are...
...you better tell us.
But I don't know.
They had no money.
We haven't seen them since you took them off yesterday.
It's the truth. Can't you believe us?
We don't know more than what you said.
- Where's Clint?
- He went into town.
Sorry to have to do this.
We're leaving three men here, day and night.
What for?
Just in case your sons come back for any reason.
Martha.
Jethro.
Mr. Vance.
- Where did you come from?
- Don't ask questions. Just listen.
We're in trouble.
It may work out if you'll help us.
Well, you know I will.
These men will shoot them.
I can't stay here and do nothing.
How can we warn them?
Where are they?
I'm riding into town.
Someone there can help.
- Maybe they won't let you go.
- I can try.
[ROOSTER CROWS]
Jethro! What are you doing here?
Where did you get that?
Mr. Vance sent me for it, Miss Cathy.
- Where is he?
- Up in my cabin.
- Give it to me.
- I should bring...
There's a soldier outside, and if they catch you... Get down!
- Need any help, ma'am?
- No, thank you.
Let me throw the saddle on.
It's too heavy.
I can manage.
I do it myself every day.
Which one of these
Reno brothers is your man?
- None of your business!
- I'm just trying to be friendly.
The war's over, or ain't you heard?
Don't seem like it. Ransacking our house, tearing our barn apart.
Why not leave decent folks alone?
Decent folks don't go stealing money or holding up trains!
We got orders. Nobody's to leave here without being searched.
Well, go ahead. Search me.
Well, if anybody asks, you tell them I searched.
I don't want to get in no trouble.
Cathy!
- What are you doing?
- I brought the money. The others?
They're waiting. We'll give it back, then they'll let us go free.
They don't know that.
They got orders to shoot you on sight.
I must get to Siringo first.
Clint rode to say I was coming.
So give me the money and we'll...
Wait! Don't move.
You all right?
If we get across the swamp, there's a place you can hide. Willing to try?
They didn't see us.
Come on.
And after you've given the money back, will you still go away?
Yeah.
It won't help, Vance.
We won't ever forget each other.
You and I know that, Cathy.
But nobody else must ever know.
BRETT:
What did Siringo have to say?
He said to bring the money before dark and he'd drop charges.
- What about us?
- All of you.
You take a chance riding in because Kincaid don't trust you.
And he can't get word to him.
Vance should be here now.
That's what we figured.
I ran into Jethro. He said Vance came to his place after daylight.
Kincaid's men were watching.
Jethro fetched the money...
...and Cathy took it and went to meet Vance.
- Is that the girl in the farm?
- That's right. She's my wife.
- Your wife?
- She was Vance's girl.
Go ahead, Clint.
What else did old Jethro say?
Soldiers jumped him.
He made a run for it.
- Didn't Cathy come back home?
- No.
GAVIN: Probably rode a long way by this time.
In any direction.
- What do you mean?
- He's got the money, ain't he?
Are you saying that Vance would double-cross us?
Not only us. Didn't you know he was crazy about your wife?
BRETT:
You're wrong, Mike.
- He liked Cathy once, that ended...
- What are you lying to him for?
He carried her picture through the war.
FLEMING:
He was gonna marry her.
GAVIN: It's time you opened your eyes. He wanted her.
- Now he's run away with her.
KELSO: And with our money.
They probably had it all figured out.
Clint! Wait a minute!
Come on, Ray. We've got to find them before he does.
They could all be in on this.
Come on.
Nobody knows about this place except
Brett and Ray.
We used it on hunting trips.
You'll be safe here.
I'm worried about you. You got no way of knowing what Siringo told Clint.
If it's no, they'll kill you.
It's a chance I gotta take.
Clint will be waiting at the mill.
- What if he isn't?
- Go to town, give him back the money.
So you stay here and I'll send someone for you by nightfall.
Vance?
What makes you sure they're headed west?
You ain't in cahoots on this, by any chance?
Then you lose us and join them.
That could be the plan.
You think I'd send my wife out to get shot?
Maybe not. If her and Vance is put on, you've got us to settle with.
Ain't nothing put on with them.
They put one over on us.
Shut up. I don't wanna hear no more.
- Then find them. And fast.
- Don't worry, I've got more reason.
If he finds them, he won't listen. He's half crazy.
Vance wouldn't run out on us.
He's probably hiding out until...
Hey, hold on. I know where he might be. Let them ride on.
I was right.
That's Cathy's mare.
Then he went to the mill, taking the money with him.
When he doesn't find you, he'll go into town alone.
We figured that's how it was.
Something's come up you gotta know about.
- Clint thinks you run off with Vance.
- I did...
No, I don't mean like that.
He thinks you left him for good.
That's not true.
Whoever put that idea in his head?
Gavin's bunch. They think
Vance took the money and you.
I tried to reason with him.
He wouldn't listen. He's jealous.
If he finds Vance, there's no telling what he'll do.
- Let me talk to him. Where is he?
- Come on, we'll find him.
What proof do you want?
Your brothers cut loose to join them.
They was all in this together.
This one's leading us on.
You'll see if I am.
All I want is to find them if it takes the rest of my life.
Clint...
- Where is he?
- Better listen careful to her, Clint.
You believe what they told you?
I reckon I've always known.
This just plain showed me.
- Let me tell you. Listen...
- Quit lying to me!
I believed your lies like you wanted.
Like the night you stood at our window crying.
When you ran from me because of what Vance said.
No, listen, and let me...
- Give her the chance!
- For what, to deny it? She can't!
Go on, say I'm lying!
Say he weren't your lover!
Say you ain't laid awake thinking of him!
Wishing I was Vance!
Wishing you'd never married me!
Shut up! None of it's so.
Tell me he hasn't held you or kissed you.
- You're hurting me!
- You can't say it because it's true.
- You're lying! You love him!
- No! Stop it!
- You're lying! You love him!
- Stop!
- I know you do! I ought to kill you.
- You're crazier than a mad duck!
You would've killed her!
You know what you meant to each other as well as I do!
You're just trying to protect her.
Hold it, Ray.
Come on.
You're going home.
Go back where we found you.
Wait for Vance in case he returns.
Warn him. Tell him to stay there.
Now, get out of here.
Go on.
I sent her home. Now, you're going into town with us. Get mounted.
Hold it, Brett.
They're lying about her going home.
She's heading back to him.
We gotta follow her.
That's a lie!
Vance is on his way to find us.
With the money to meet Siringo.
You think we're gonna swallow that?
Pardee, get their guns.
Give Clint back his gun.
You can do what you want.
We're trailing her.
You're right.
They're still trying to throw us off.
Now, you two can go back to the mill or to Hades...
...but don't follow us.
Let's go, boys.
We gotta find Vance, but where?
If he's not at the mill, we'll try to catch him before he gets to town.
GAVIN: What'd I tell you?
She led us straight to him.
- Where is he?
- Don't know. Brett told you the truth.
- You're protecting him!
- Leave her alone. That ain't helping.
He wouldn't have left her unless he was coming back.
So we'll just sit here until he walks in.
VANCE:
Ray! Brett!
So now they're gunning for you. Clint with them.
They think you double-crossed them.
Maybe we can knock some sense into their heads before anybody gets hurt.
First we gotta get rid of this.
Ray, ride into town. Give it to Siringo, tell him what's happened.
Where are you going?
We'll get to the cave and wait.
You bring what help you can.
Now, get going.
Vance? He'll never give you the chance to explain now.
We tried. So did Cathy.
Clint came near to killing her for it.
He'll listen to me.
I'm warning you.
He's more dangerous than any of them.
That's him. With Brett.
Get out of sight. Watch her.
Wait until they get up close.
- They got here ahead of us.
- They're up there with her.
They must've seen us coming.
You stay here.
This is my job.
Any one of them is liable to shoot you.
Not Clint. He couldn't.
And he'd stop the man who tried.
You haven't seen his face.
Clint!
Can you hear me, Clint?
I know what you're thinking, Clint!
But you got it all wrong! Dead wrong!
All Cathy did was to bring me the money!
There's nothing else between us!
I swear it! Nothing at all!
Well, I know different, don't I?
I was going away, Clint!
And I'm still going, for good!
I had to square things with Siringo first. I've done it!
He couldn't have. He ain't had time to get to town and back.
It's a scheme.
He's trying to draw us out.
Listen to me, Clint! Ray's going in to take Siringo the money!
That'll give us clean hands, all of us!
Unless one of you loses his head now and adds killing to it!
He's lying to you about the money.
He's still got it on him.
He only came back for her.
And she knows it.
Why don't you answer me, Clint?
What's stopping you?
Can't you see he's just stalling?
Working closer until he can jump us?
Probably got Ray and Brett working behind us.
VANCE:
What's troubling you?
Well, go on.
You asked for him. Take him.
I got no reason to lie to you. I only came to tell you our trouble's over.
We can go home with nothing to fear!
Go home.
Go home to what?
Well, go on. Take him.
Now! Or I'll take him myself.
[CATHY SCREAMS]
Vance!
Come on! Let's get the money and get out of here!
Get away from him!
Leave him alone!
Clint, look out!
[GUNSHOTS]
Hey, don't move.
Just lie still.
Cathy, where's Vance?
I got to talk to him.
- Right here, Clint.
- Vance, I didn't mean it.
I know you didn't.
You don't have to tell me.
Everything's gonna be all right.
Everything's gonna be all right.
Fairy tales can come true
It can happen to you
If you're young at heart
For it's hard, you will find
To be narrow of mind
If you're young at heart
You can go to extremes
With impossible schemes
You can laugh when your dreams
Fall apart at the seams
And life gets more exciting with each passing day
And love is either in your heart
Or on its way
Don't you know that it's worth
Every treasure on earth
To be young at heart
For as rich as you are
It's much better by far
To be young at heart
And if you should survive
To a hundred and five
Look at all you'll derive
Out of being alive
And here is the best part
You have a head start
If you are among the very young at heart
'One! Two!
'Three! Four! '
'One! Two! Three! Four!
'Five! Six!
'Seven! Eight!
'Nine! Ten! '
Quarter?
Next week I'll take the black corner.
- Here's your crackers, Aunt Jessie.
- Thank you.
- Oh, who won the fight?
- Good night, Laurie.
Good night, Laurie.
Night, Pop. Good night, Aunt Jessie.
- Care to join me?
- No. When are you gonna stop eating?
- I'm hungry.
- Still?
It's very bad for you to eat just before you go to bed.
- I know.
- Oh, what have you got here?
Chicken, huh? Mmm.
Fran and the White Knight.
They're home early.
Good night.
Good night, Bob.
- Wonder why.
- I don't know.
One thing I love about Bob Neary, he's such a gentleman.
I love the way he jumps out of the car and holds the door open for her.
Amy! Laurie!
Aunt Jessie. Pop.
- Well, it happened tonight.
- What?
- We're engaged!
- Huh?
- It's the biggest!
- What's going on?
- Meet the future Mrs Robert Neary.
- The what?
- I'm engaged.
- You're engaged?
- Seven dates.
- Let me see.
The biggest, most vulgar diamond.
100 carats at least.
- Oh, at least.
- Tell us exactly what happened.
I guess I was just looking my most beautiful, what with Laurie's dress and Amy's brooch.
I could see he was... Well, it was my idea to go out on the terrace during the dance.
"Fran," he said,
"all I am, all I ever hope to be..."
Then he just stood there and looked... and looked...
Well, he looked a little fat.
Well, he is fat.
- Oh, Fran.
- This is wonderful!
So he is a little fat - who cares?
Don't say that! Let me see your ring.
- Isn't that something?
- It's the biggest thing I've ever seen.
- What's the matter, Pop?
- Nothing.
- You are happy, aren't you?
- I am if you are.
- Of course I am.
- Naturally, she's happy.
I think he's the biggest real estate operator in Connecticut, he's rebuilt half this town.
And he's coming to dinner tomorrow.
- When's the wedding, Fran?
- Oh... June, I guess.
- There goes our quartet.
- Unless Jessie takes up the harp.
This is your sister, your tin-ear sister, remember?
You'll have to get another harp player.
- It doesn't have to be a fancy dinner.
- I know.
Just the best linen, the best silver...
That must be Bob. I'll get it.
Oh, and it has to be duck tomorrow night.
He loves duck.
Oh, Bob?
Oh, just wonderfully. Everybody's so excited.
Yes, everybody.
Well, a little envious, naturally.
Girls, up, up.
What can I say?
Except you've made me the happiest...
Oh, don't be foolish.
I'll go on the diet with you.
- Amy?
- Mm?
Do you think she really loves him?
She's gonna marry him.
Oh, I know but they've only had seven dates.
It can happen.
It can happen the first time you see someone.
I know they write it and sing about it and all that stuff but don't tell me you buy it.
You're young, you can afford to be cynical.
Wait till you're my age, you'll turn romantic.
That's a nice thing to say after I practically brought you up.
Didn't I have the measles the same time you did, out of sheer companionship?
You character! You gave them to me.
I shared them.
There's a difference.
Well... Anyway, I kind of envy Fran, even if she has talked herself into it.
It's gotta be a good feeling.
- What do you say we make a deal?
- Hmm?
- Double or nothing.
- Double what?
Double wedding.
We find two guys with a good sense of humour.
That always helps.
That's one thing I've gotta have when I get married - lots of laughs.
That's the trouble with most of the marriages I've seen, Amy.
Not enough laughs.
Or?
Oh. Or we end up old maids on the hill, you and me.
Deal?
I asked you a question. Is it a deal?
I don't know.
- Hey, wait a minute.
- What?
- You're not holding out on me, are you?
- Oh, now, really.
Sure?
You know there isn't anyone.
Unless it's Ernie, the romantic plumber.
Oh. Poor Ernie.
- You know something?
- What?
I like him. I think he's very sweet.
Well, he is.
Isn't fair to call him a plumber either.
- What would you call him?
- He's the boss.
He doesn't go out on jobs any more since he owns the store.
Only reason he comes here to fix things is because of you, and you know it.
Like sinks and things.
He's on the disposal now. He's been working on it six weeks, it isn't fixed yet.
I wonder why.
Ah, well.
Ernie notwithstanding, after looking this town over I'd say the Tuttle family were sure of one old maid.
Two. We made a deal, remember?
Can't you just hear people saying,
"My, my, there go the Tuttle girls now,
"couple of Whistler's Mothers.
"Been together nigh on 60 years now."
- Good night, Laurie.
- Night.
Would you mind leaving the door open, please?
Thanks.
The night is dressed up for dreaming
And on the meadows below
A star falls out of the heavens
And fades
In the afterglow
The wind embraces the willow
The ivy clings to the tree
My arms are waiting to hold my love
Wherever my lover may be
And so I'll walk in the moonlight...
Awful pretty music.
Awful pretty.
Fix the sink.
Yes'm.
Well.
- That was lovely, really lovely.
- Thank you, Pop.
I have one criticism, however.
Oh, naturally.
If you would just look at the conductor once in a while.
Like this, Pop?
An orchestra, no matter how small, should have only once voice!
- The conductor's.
- Right.
You idiots. You're all idiots.
How three such beautiful girls can make three such horrible sounds.
- Now, your blood pressure.
- It's my blood pressure.
- You're my sister, not my doctor.
- Sure.
Amy, you're wanted in the kitchen. He won't leave until you're satisfied with his work.
- Thank you.
- That Ernie!
- I've got to get to work.
- Goodbye, sweetie.
- Where's my hat?
- In the hall.
- Goodbye, Pop.
- Where are you going?
- Upstairs to get beautiful for tonight.
- It'll take seven hours?
Face it, Pop, with what you gave me to start with, it'll take all of seven hours.
Where's my briefcase? I left it right here.
You left it upstairs. I'll get it.
I could've sworn I left it on that chair.
Oh, thanks.
What do you expect? Brahms?
That's as quiet as I can get it.
- I'll replace it if you like.
- No, it's much better, honestly it is.
Thanks.
Look at you. And look at those hands.
Oh, well...
You shouldn't go out on jobs with a shirt and tie and all.
You have men in overalls and you pay them.
I don't go out on jobs any more, Amy.
Just this one, cos it's on the way to work and... cos...
I know. Well, you'd better wash up now.
If you're gonna sell any of those nice white refrigerators you'd better look the part.
Not there.
- Upstairs.
- Sure.
- Ernie.
- Huh?
Take your coat off before you wash your hands.
Oh. Yeah.
- Hurry up, Laurie.
- Hello, Mr Tuttle.
- Just going upstairs to wash my hands.
- That's good.
- Thanks.
- I'll walk with you.
Good. Bye, Jess.
Hi, Mr Tuttle!
- Laurie, Laurie, it's happened!
- Is it Ladybird?
- Yeah, she's having pups. Seven already!
- You go ahead.
Mothers are more important than fathers.
- Hi!
- Get back! Hurry up!
It's just like you said, Laurie - right on the front lawn. No dignity!
- Are there really seven?
- Eight!
- Eight?
- Correction - nine.
Oh, he's so little.
- Hi.
- Hi.
- Number nine. The last, and the runt.
- Oh, that's awful.
Yep, life begins in frustration.
- Well, Mrs Ridgefield, congratulations.
- Thank you.
- I just can't thank you enough.
- Don't mention it.
- Your problems are just beginning.
- What?
- One too many came to dinner.
- Oh, I see.
Oh, dear. Well, what'll I do?
- Bottle-feed him.
- Me? I'm a busy housewife.
- I've got a large house to run...
- Bottle-feed him or you can drown him.
- Drown him?
- Easy, easy, you're a latecomer.
Call yourself a vet? You're supposed to save lives, not destroy them.
I'm not a vet.
- Bottle-feed him or drown him.
- Please let me take him, Mrs Ridgefield.
I always wanted you to have the best in the litter, Laurie, and he is the littlest.
- No, I want him, number nine.
- He's yours.
Well, that's settled. Oh, Miss um...
- Tuttle.
- You'll bottle-feed him, huh?
- I'll bottle-feed him.
- Good.
Hey, that's not old Gregory Tuttle's daughter?
Yes, she is, she lives right next door.
I don't know how to thank you.
Don't mention it.
Call me any time you have a litter.
Well, I will. Thank you!
- Cute little puppy, isn't he?
- I like him.
Oh, wait a minute, you don't think I was serious?
Do I look like I'd want to drown a puppy?
Well, do I?
- Not really.
- Shake.
- I'm an old friend of the family.
- You?
- Yeah.
- I never saw you before in my life.
Well, my father went to school with your father.
- He did?
- Yeah. My name's Burke, Alex Burke.
Oh. My name is Tuttle, Laurie Tuttle.
Hiya, Tuttle.
- Hiya, Burke.
- Hi.
Um, in this pocket
I have a letter to your father. Is he home?
Just missed him, he's on his way to the music foundation.
- He's the dean of faculty there.
- Wonderful.
I also have a letter to the president of the foundation. How do I get there?
Two blocks east of Lamont and there you are.
- The foundation?
- No, the traffic booth.
- Thanks.
- Only kidding.
The policeman there will tell you the rest of the way.
By the way, what are you having for dinner tonight?
Um, roast duck. Why?
Duck? Wonderful, it's my favourite.
You know something, what with the pups and dinner tonight, this is about the third happiest day of my life.
But nobody asked you to dinner.
Your father will. I'll see to it.
Those bottle feedings - for the first six weeks, two every night at 2am and 6am.
I'll see you.
Oh, don't set an extra place, don't bother.
- He won't even be here.
- You wanna bet?
He has a letter for Pop, that doesn't mean he'll be invited to dinner.
Not only will he come to dinner but he'll tell us where to sit.
And he'll do the carving, and dominate the conversation completely.
And I'll bet you he has two desserts.
- Oh, Laurie.
- My impression of Mr Burke.
- Sounds like a vacuum cleaner salesman.
- Foot in the door type.
You girls will have to share him because I'll be devoting my charms to Bob.
Laurie, here comes Pop.
- And alone.
- I don't believe it.
Well, I'll be...
Girls...
Mr Burke.
- What are you looking for?
- Paper.
The boy generally tries to lose it in this bush.
- There you are.
- Thanks.
- How are they doing?
- Fine. In great voice.
Mrs Ridgefield's got a sleepless night ahead.
Dogs... Bah! If they keep me awake, it's your fault.
They will. They're not only loud, they're off pitch, like German opera.
Your father was a great man and a great musician.
What would he say if he knew you had midwifed a litter of pups and, worse yet, disparaged Wagner?
My father taught me to love dogs and Mozart.
- Maybe not in that order.
- Bah!
Mr Tuttle, I don't understand your affection for that word.
Bah!
- Let me have your hat.
- Thanks.
Oh, I don't...
Something's wrong here.
- Pa!
- How wonderful to see you.
Did you have a nice day?
- Hello, Pop.
- Hello, darling.
Nice day at the conservatory?
Hiya, Burke.
Hiya, Tuttle.
Well, did I exaggerate?
No, they're pretty. All very pretty.
- Oh, thank you.
- Pop, won't you introduce us?
I'm sorry! Girls, this is Alex Burke.
He's full of opinions, one of which is that he can write good music on a time schedule.
He's opinionated, he's conceited, he's arrogant and disrespectful.
- But I like him.
- Thanks.
How about that big build-up you were gonna give me?
- I changed my mind.
- Oh?
Aren't you gonna mention my talents?
We talked about it.
They only have to look at you to see that you have no talent.
I'm Fran and you look talented, whatever you do.
- Thank you. I compose.
- I'm Amy, what do you compose?
- Anything and everything.
- Trash.
Ignore him. I've given up tone poems to work on a musical for the theatre.
- In New York?
- For next season?
New York. Whether it gets on next season depends on the efficiency of the producer.
He's given me a generous advance in return for which I shall deliver a complete and delightful score at 9am, September 1.
- You hope.
- I hope. Date of production is his problem.
- Evening.
- Hello. May I, er, help you?
- Oh, thanks.
- It's a pleasure.
- I thought you said you had three daughters.
- He has.
This is Alex Burke, son of my old friend.
Aunt Jessie.
Happy to know you, Aunt Jessie.
After all, a lot depends on you.
Let's put it this way, a lot depends on your dinner tonight.
What?
All the way home, I've been toying with your brother's invitation of board and room with this happy family.
- What?
- Don't get too enthusiastic.
It's not decided yet.
As a musician, I don't care where I sleep - attic, park bench - but about cuisine I'm a stickler.
Just a moment. You all know the president of the foundation.
- Tough customer, right? Cold-blooded.
- Ice water in his veins.
This young man talked him into giving him a job at the foundation, the argument being, he needed the income to work on this Broadway opera.
What's more, he did it in just seven minutes.
Correction - ten minutes, I timed it.
But that included the introductions and the goodbyes.
What do you want me to do?
After all, I have some affection for his father.
Um, somebody else expected?
- Yeah, Bob Neary.
- Oh, Bob Neary. Good.
Fran.
Bob.
Oh! Excuse me!
- Well, hello, Bob.
- Hello, Fran.
I drove around the block, didn't want to be early.
You're just in time.
Well! Hi, everybody!
- Hi, Bob.
- Amy, Laurie, Jessie.
- Hi, Bob. Alex Burke.
- Nice to know you.
- Flowers! For Aunt Jessie, no doubt.
- Er...
- There you are.
- Thank you. Thank you, Bob.
We might as well sit down, we're all hungry.
Roast duck tonight.
Why don't you and Fran sit over there?
- Pop...
- I know where I sit.
Amy, you sit here. Laurie, you're over here.
I'm in between. I'll get those, Aunt Jessie.
Thank you.
- May we start?
- Oh, sure.
Thank you.
Mmm. Aunt Jessie...
Come on, boy!
Come on! Number nine!
Here's what I call a clam!
Oh!
Come on, boy.
That's a boy, come on, come on.
There we go. That's a good boy.
That's enough exercise for one day.
You just sit here with me for a while and we'll read.
Boy, that water sure is good.
- Is that Alex's sweater?
- Uh-huh.
- What's that?
- It's an A for Alex.
- No, I don't mean this. What's this?
- Oh, notes, musical notes.
- Oh. Kinda like a monogram, huh?
- That's right.
I got a sweater at home, Amy, but it's not white.
- Would you like a monogram on it?
- I sure would. Would you, Amy?
Sure. What'll we use instead of notes?
Oh, yeah. What could we use?
Monkey wrench!
- Plunger!
- Oh, Ernie!
Well, I'll think about it awhile.
You call that music? Turn the thing off.
- It's a hit song, Pop.
- Bah.
- Wanna hear the words?
- No.
Good.
I'm ready, willing and able
And honey, now it's up to you
So lay your cards on the table
And tell me what you plan to do
I'm ready, I'm able and willing
To join you in a little fun
But I won't take second billing
I've got to be your number one
I'm ready to give you my heart, dear
I'm willing to hand you the key
And I'm able to say from the start, dear
It's never belonged to anyone else but me!
Oh, I'm ready, I'm willing and able
So if you want a love that's true
Just lay your cards on the table
Cos honey, now it's up to you
Check the chow.
I'm ready
Oh, yes, you know I'm ready, baby
I'm willing
Oh, yes, you know I'm willing, baby
I'm able
Oh, yes, you know I'm able, baby
Now I've stated my condition
I've got lots of ammunition
Ready, willing and I'm able
So if you want a love that's true
Just lay your cards on the table
Cos honey
Honey, now it's up to you
Where've you been?
I had to go half a mile to find some dry wood.
- Aren't you tired?
- I'm bushed.
Alex, it's finished!
That's fast work. Let's have a look at it.
- That's what I call a good job.
- Thank you.
Amy, from now on, you do all my sewing.
Any time.
Right.
How do you like it, Aunt Jessie?
It's beautiful. If you kids want dinner, you'd better get more clams.
More clams coming up.
What about it, Tuttle?
I'm with you, Burke!
Hey, you two are supposed to be digging!
I want elbows and bottoms. Dig!
Come on, Burke.
Wanna race to the far rock?
- Let's go.
- On your mark, get set...
Hold this, will ya? Go!
You know, I wonder why somebody hasn't thought about it before.
- What?
- About buying this strip of beach, tearing down those bungalows and putting up a whole string of hotels.
- Oh, Bob!
- It's not a bad idea.
That's what they got in Miami.
Whoever heard of beach hotels in Connecticut?
That's why it's a good idea.
If I could buy it in your name, it'd be a better idea.
Fran, I'd consider it, if you'd only set a date for our wedding.
We've only got a couple more weeks.
You can still become a June bride.
Let me have the summer, Bob.
We'll talk about it in the fall, huh?
OK, honey.
How would you like a big drink of water?
- Think you're big enough?
- I'm big enough.
Put me down! I'll make a deal with you.
If you can dig more clams than I can in ten minutes you can throw me in. OK?
It's a deal.
One.
Two.
Three, four.
- And five.
- I give up.
- City boy!
- You win.
Course I won. Six.
- Laurie.
- What?
There's something I'd like to say to you.
Is it about clams?
- Huh?
- No.
Yeah.
There's the male clam and the female clam.
No! I always thought...
Yep. This is the male clam.
A female clam is any clam you find with its mouth open.
- You know, yak-yak-yak-yak...
- Oh, you...!
- Why did you do that?
- I've been waiting all day for that.
All I wanted to do is... give you this.
I hope you like it.
Read it.
"For our girl, from me and Number Nine."
- Like it?
- Oh, Alex.
I love it.
Hold me in your arms
Tonight was meant to be
Hold me in your arms
Thrill me with your charms
Your lips were meant for me
Never let me go
Suddenly I know
I've never loved before
With every kiss my head is spinning
This is the moment I've waited for
Tonight is only the beginning
Hold me in your arms for evermore
Hold me in your arms
Tonight was meant to be
Hold me in your arms
Thrill me with your charms
Your lips were meant for me
Never let me go
Suddenly I know
I've never loved before
With every kiss, my head is spinning
This is the moment I've waited for
Tonight is only the beginning
Hold me in your arms
For evermore
- You've got a class at three. You coming?
- I got a half-hour yet.
- I'm waiting for Barney Sloan.
- Who?
A piano player, he's gonna help arrange this.
If you stole from the right composers you wouldn't need an arranger.
- When's he due?
- Right now.
Might not get here for a week, might not get here at all.
I thought only trombone players drank.
Barney doesn't drink, he's a little unpredictable.
That's an ideal collaboration - unpredictable scorer, unpredictable arranger.
- Well, I'll see you at the foundation.
- Yeah.
I got it.
Hi.
Hi.
Come in, come in.
- Glad to see you.
- Uh-huh.
Did you have a tough time finding the place?
Uh-uh.
Figures. Rug on the floor, piano, the smell of cooking from the kitchen.
Homes like these are the backbone of the nation.
- Where's the spinning wheel?
- Shut up. Did you miss the train?
- I ignored the train.
- Why? I sent you the fare.
Five bucks, I bet it on a horse.
A horse I could've bought for seven.
Had a lovely name that I can't remember.
You're late, Barney.
If I don't get out of here, I'll be late.
I got a class at the foundation, three to four.
Oh, incidentally, I got you that job we talked about.
- Attractive surroundings, I'm sure.
- It's a joint but it's convenient.
Downtown. You'll play piano and you'll sing.
Salary's small.
- Tips on the plate?
- Tips on the plate.
Every little bit helps.
Yeah.
It's no better, no worse than the job you had in New York.
Different class of people maybe.
Yeah.
Suburban drunks. They don't listen either.
When I get back tonight we'll work out a room.
Plenty of boarding houses around.
Meanwhile...
Your music must be lousy.
- You wouldn't be here if it were.
- You're too efficient.
Start wherever you want. I've got some of the overture and four of the songs.
You print nice. Real neat.
Barney, I gotta take off. If there's anything you need, there's a woman in the kitchen, name's Aunt Jessie.
- I know the type.
- So long!
See ya.
For all I know you might be a burglar with designs on the piano.
Alex told me to introduce myself.
Name's Barney Sloan.
You must be Aunt... something.
- Jessie.
- Yeah, Jessie.
Name fits right in with the curtains and the lamp.
Very domestic.
My name came first, curtains came after.
What type of aunt are you?
Gruff voice hiding a soft heart type, or the sweet, simple, "Snakes alive, I smell something burning in the kitchen" type?
Alex should have prepared me for you.
- Would you like a cup of tea?
- Sure.
If I threw in a couple of cakes, would you object?
How could you know I haven't eaten since yesterday?
I'm the near-sighted, you can't hide a thing from me type of aunt.
I see.
Well, you needn't look so noble.
Tea is just a little hot water.
I'll put the kettle on. I'll let you know what I think about you later.
- Hi!
- Hi. Home early.
- Did you get everything?
- I think so.
Good.
- Got a surprise for you.
- Really?
- Mmm.
- I could use one right about now.
It was so packed in that market I didn't think
I'd ever get waited on.
- What's that?
- The surprise.
- Who?
- Friend of Alex's,
I'm making him tea, just a little hot water.
- That's one of Alex's songs, isn't it?
- Mm-hm.
Hmm... I like what he's doing with it.
Hey - get set, you're in for something.
Sounds wonderful.
You a friend of Alex's?
We know each other. I orchestrate his stuff.
Oh.
My name is Laurie.
I, um... live here.
You got a cigarette?
Mm-hm.
You scared it.
Keep playing.
Now I know why they gave me this box of matches when I bought that thing.
Stubborn, aren't I?
- Thanks.
- You're welcome.
- Is that one of Alex's?
- Something of my own.
It's lovely.
Stinks.
You can feel that way if you want to.
I like it.
That all there is to it?
It's only got a middle.
It's only got... You mean there's no beginning and no end?
Just a middle.
You're going to finish it sometime, aren't you?
Do you think it's right to leave a song hanging in midair like that?
No face and no feet?
Why not?
Well...
If you finished it, people might get to like it.
You could even have a hit.
They wouldn't let me.
Who?
They. Or whoever it is that gives out the breaks.
What's your name for it?
Lady Luck? The Fates? Destiny?
Oh.
They've been having their innings for as long as I can remember.
You know what a glove man is?
I'm a glove man.
You shag flies in a hot sun all your life but you never go to bat.
Like, right off they said, "No parents?
Make him an offer, he'll be all right."
"Education? Grammar school's enough.
"Send him out to work."
So I cooperate.
And then they come up with a nice big depression, a fat one.
But I fooled them, I went out and got a job.
Six years later.
14 dollars a week,
I collected exactly two pay cheques and then they come up with a war.
"Greetings, my boy.
You too can be a private."
Don't laugh, it was serious.
This was my big chance.
I was ready to be a hero, a dead one even.
You know, lots of crowds, bands playing, me in a flag-draped coffin.
Ha! Did I get it?
No.
All they figured for me was a little grape juice in the leg.
Not quite enough to be a hero.
Lots of guys got shot so it'd just hurt a little bit.
Eight or nine years later, your leg gets a little stiff when it rains.
That's my good leg, my pedal foot, that I play the piano with.
There's more. You wanna hear more?
Yes. Yes, I do.
If you tell the whole story.
What about the talent they gave you?
Sure.
Sure, they said, "Let him have a little talent.
"Not enough to do anything great on his own but just enough to help other people.
"That's what he deserves."
Mix a little talent with the rest of that stuff and you get stumblebum Barney Sloan.
- Barney Sloan...
- Mm-hm.
That's my new name.
One I was born with was a little more Italian.
I changed it.
Figured I'd throw 'em off the track.
Not those babies.
You know you're taking the easiest way out.
- How do you figure?
- Anybody can feel sorry for himself.
Who asked you to listen?
If it makes you feel better to be insulting, you just go right ahead.
I believe a man decides his own destinies.
If he has enough courage and ambition...
Bite?
No, thank you.
Maybe it isn't my business, I don't know.
But if you go to work and finish that song, or any song for that matter...
They wouldn't like it. I tell you, they're up there working overtime on me.
What some people will do for time and a half...
I can see this is very painful for you.
Shall we talk about something else?
Why? Talking about my lousy luck is the only fun I ever have.
- Here's tea!
- Oh, Aunt Jessie, can you do something for him?
Sure. Get a net and send for the wagon.
Were you smiling just then?
I don't know. Was I?
- Do me a favour, will you?
- What?
Throw back your head and laugh.
Hilariously.
- Why?
- No reason.
Just laugh.
Ha. Heh-heh.
- I knew it.
- Knew what?
You don't know how to laugh.
I see what I'm up against - the gay young thing type.
Unimportant species.
It's not the quality of your laughter, it's your attitude.
Attitude?
I asked him to laugh and he wants to know why he should.
As if somebody has to have a reason to laugh.
- You don't think so?
- No.
- Do you?
- No.
There's a place for people like you who go around laughing for no reason at all.
- Do you want lemon or cream in your tea?
- Neither.
Don't be so contrary, you've got to have one or the other. You'll have lemon.
There.
Please, Aunt Jessie, don't be hard-boiled, it doesn't come off.
I'm gonna have some tea and figure this character out.
Wait till he has something to eat.
Maybe he'll be a little less vicious.
I'm not too happy with the lyric yet but I like it musically.
I'm anxious to see what you can do with it.
When did you come up with this one?
Just finished it about an hour ago.
Hey, boy, you workin' or playin'?
Assistant manager, you know the type.
"Come on now, everybody get on the ball."
Don't be a wise guy, Sloan.
- What was that?
- You're supposed to be working.
W-O-R-K-l-N-G.
That's very good.
Keep that up and you'll be manager.
So you don't like it here?
Suppose you pack up your...
Say, aren't you Lettie Bartell's father?
- That's right. You know Lettie?
- I went to school with her. I'm Laurie Tuttle.
Oh, say, sure! She talks about you all the time. Still does, in her letters.
- This is my sister, Amy.
- How do you do?
- Mr Burke.
- Hi.
- How is Lettie?
- Married with two children.
She's happy as a lark, living in Chicago.
- Say hello when you write to her.
- That I will.
- How come I never seen you here before?
- We came to hear Mr Sloan.
We'll be coming in quite often, as a matter of fact.
I hope you do, and I mean it.
You ready, Mr Sloan?
Any time, Mr Bartell. Any time at all.
Thank you. Well, enjoy yourselves, folks.
- Glad to have you aboard.
- Nice to see you.
I like that Bartell. Nice guy.
Two martinis and two vodka gimlets.
- Why don't they keep quiet?
- Don't worry, Barney's used to it.
There's a somebody I'm longin' to see
I hope that she
Turns out to be
Someone who'll watch over me
I'm a little lamb who's lost in the wood
- I know...
- Why not, baby? Why not?
Give me just one good reason why.
Buy me a drink.
Waiter!
...over me
Although I may not
Be the man some girls think of
As handsome
But to her heart
I'll carry the key
Won't you tell her, please, to put on some speed
Follow my lead
Oooh, how I need
Someone to watch
Over me
Nope, it's not fair.
You've improved an awful lot in one week, Mr Sloan.
- How's that? Better?
- You got me grinning like an idiot.
Good, you noticed the resemblance.
Say, you weren't by chance sneaking around my room yesterday while I was out?
Was I? I try not to leave fingerprints.
It's a fine thing. The minute a fella's back is turned, you hang up curtains.
Next time I'm putting flowerpots in.
- No flowers.
- Why not?
Well, they use up the oxygen.
Give me trouble and I'll be up there with a lace pillowcase.
- Lace?
- Lace.
You may object to living like a human being,
Mr Sloan, but you're gonna sleep like one.
My landlady has instructions to shoot...
When I'm finished with the room
I'm starting on you.
Look at yourself.
What's the matter with me?
What did you cut your hair with?
A lawn mower?
A penknife.
And look at your ties, always at half-mast.
Say, would you help me a minute, please?
Just hold that open.
There's something that you should know about the state of Connecticut.
What's that?
A crease in the pants is strictly constitutional.
It is!
Look, it's Pop's birthday, Barney.
I think a pair of pressed pants would be just the right note for tonight's party.
- I'll think about it.
- OK.
By the way, while I'm downtown, um... maybe you could do a little work for yourself, huh?
- Like what?
- Oh, finishing your song.
Forget about that song.
Think what a kick in the pants it'd be to them, your destinies, if you came up with a big hit, huh?
What good's a hit song?
Here we go again.
Yeah, it gets your picture in Life, and maybe get a new suit, a lot of hullabaloo, then one day I'm walking along and down comes a bolt of lightning.
Pow! D-E-D, dead.
Do you know that you're impossible?
Six to an even that's the way I leave the world - lightning. Bet?
All I know is that there's a straitjacket waiting for you with your number on it.
Like the spoon.
Uh...
I don't want you to think that that's spur of the moment stuff.
I planned it for a week.
It's pretty mild for a week's thought, isn't it?
It's just a friendly kiss.
Oh.
We're going to be good friends, aren't we, Barney?
Yes, sure.
I'll work at it.
We're gonna be such good friends that we won't even have to swap presents at Christmas.
Practical idea.
- Well, I...
- I know, you've gotta rush downtown.
Yeah.
See you later.
Don't forget the birthday pants.
It's constitutional.
Read all about it!
- You know what a parasite is?
- What?
Someone who doesn't do their share of pushing revolving doors.
I pushed.
Take one of these, will you?
For appearance's sake.
Why should I have a man around if I can't use him?
- Glad you bumped into me, huh?
- I planned it that way.
- OK, where's the car?
- Across the street in the lot.
- Laurie...
- Hmm?
I love you.
Laurie.
You came out for one present, you said, for your father.
Alex, come see these pedal pushers, they're adorable.
Yeah.
Laurie.
Only 8.95 too, that's very cheap.
Pedal pushers for your father?
He won't look good in 'em.
- Silly.
- Didn't hear me before, did you?
You said something?
Yeah, I said I loved you, Laurie.
- Oh. Wanna chase it?
- Not today.
I've been trying to tell you something for the last five minutes but you won't listen.
I love you, Laurie.
Yeah.
- Since when?
- Since the first moment I saw you.
It's tough for a guy to be original when he's in love.
- Well?
- Got your ticket?
Oh. Yeah.
I'll get your car.
That was in the nature of a proposal and I expect something in the nature of an answer.
- You know how I feel.
- How?
I adore you.
That's a good start.
We'll be married next week, huh?
- Alex, we can't get married next week.
- Why not?
Why can't we keep things as they are?
We have so much fun and laughs.
We can be married and have laughs.
- There have been cases.
- Have there?
Look, Laurie, get this through your head -
I love you and I need you.
Do you?
Of course I do. Even if I didn't need you, you need me to carry your bundles.
You know, I hadn't thought of that.
There's something else you should know about me.
- I always laugh at the wrong time.
- I know. I heard you.
I'll probably laugh all through the ceremony.
- What do you think I'll be doing?
- Crazy.
But it might be fun.
You mean that?
Mm-hm.
Good.
Stay there.
Could you hold these a minute, please?
Thank you.
Now...
Alberto, give-a the package-a back to the man. We gotta go home, it's late.
I cannot-a give him-a back the package.
Don't you see he is busy?
What do you mean, he's busy?
He's kissing her.
That's-a busy, no?
And he's doing a good job too.
- Well, we made it.
- I think.
Got you home safe and sound, didn't I?
All the fenders are still on.
Pretty good, isn't it?
Very good. Could you help an old friend here?
Thank you.
I never really wanted to marry anyone, not for a while.
I'm not just anyone, I'm an engaging personality. Let's tell the family.
Don't take the edge off the birthday party.
Let Pop have his moment, then we'll spring it.
OK.
We have lots to do before Pop comes home.
Yeah, we got lots to do.
Hey, Pop's doing all right. Lot of loot here.
- I could use one of these.
- It's a real honey.
Break it up, boys, here they come.
For he's a jolly good fellow
For he's a jolly good fellow
For he's a jolly good fellow
Which nobody can deny
Which nobody can deny...
Happy birthday!
Look at that!
Oh, look at this!
W-W-W... What do I say?
Say the same thing I did when I saw it - what is it?
It's a sound system, Jessie!
Don't you know?
- Music all over the house!
- Coming out of the walls.
- High fidelity!
- We all chipped in, Pop.
Oh, that tuner! The amplifier!
And look at that speaker. Three way!
It goes to 20,000 cycles.
You'll be able to hear those triangles now.
Sure, you're gonna be a real hep cat.
Hip. The word is "hip", Bob.
Only cubes say hep.
Wait a minute.
- Who's going to assemble this?
- Ernie!
- Well, of course, Ernie.
- Come on, Ernie.
Well, I guess I can handle it.
That's all high fidelity needs - a good plumber.
And for when Ernie gets it glued together.
Immolation scene the soprano will love.
Wait till you hear the flames licking her torso.
- That's not all, Dad. Here's some more.
- Handmade? Amy, you're a love.
Genuine cashmere.
Also handmade. Smoking jacket.
- Made from the sunroom curtains.
- Oh, Jessie!
- I happened to pass Tiffany's in New York.
- Tiffany's?
- Oh, Bob, that's too extravagant.
- It's a beauty.
It's Swiss, Pop.
Instead of chimes, it... yodels.
- There's something else.
- What's this?
- Barney!
- Uh?
You shouldn't have. It's very kind.
But I...
Try it on for size, Pop.
- Real sharp, huh?
- It looks wonderful on you.
Happy birthday, Dad.
- Laurie, I...
- I got it for you.
You don't mind, do you?
No. Thank you.
I guess that puts me in the same class with Robert J Neary.
I know his kind like a book.
He's the "I sold newspapers as a kid but look at me now" type.
- I have your type catalogued too, you know.
- Bet.
At a party you're the guy who always says,
"I never had a birthday party or ever got a present."
- Right?
- I pay.
So, rather than let you be corny...
From me to you.
With initials too.
Hey, these are good links.
Of course, I do my shoplifting at the finest stores.
All right, clear the decks!
Here comes the main event.
- Watch yourself.
- Oh, man! That's a real beaut.
One candle? Now that's touching.
We're bribing you to stay young, Pop.
Oh, I'll accept the bribe but there's no reason for it.
- Look at that cake!
- Did you bake it, Aunt Jessie?
- No, Fran did.
- In that case, I can't live without her.
We'll elope tonight, huh?
It's a date.
- Sure?
- Sure.
- Get those plates over here!
- Here we are.
Right, Pop, go to work.
Hurray!
All right. Every year on my birthday
I get sentimental and make a long speech but this year I'm going to be brief because I have more to be happy about than ever before.
Oh, it's a perfectly beautiful speech.
Cut the cake.
- OK.
- Nice big piece for me.
You get the first one.
How about telling him now, huh?
- Do you think so?
- Sure, why not?
There a lull and, er...
I forgot to, er... show you this.
Alex, it's beautiful!
Quiet, everyone! Hold it down to a dull roar, we have a commercial.
Alex and I are going to be married.
Married?
Uh-huh.
- How wonderful, Laurie.
- How about that!
It's great.
Sensational!
I surprised you, huh?
I'm marrying the wrong girl.
Have you set a date?
As soon as my laundry gets back.
It's been quite a day, hasn't it, Laurie?
First Pop, then you.
How about some coffee with this cake?
You haven't forgotten?
- It should be perking now.
- Let me help.
Amy, this marriage business isn't contagious, is it?
- Let her get the coffee.
- That's a good idea.
Let's see it under the light.
- I'm not sure if my daughter should marry...
- Oh... Isn't it?
- ...a composer who doesn't do arranging.
- Yes, it is.
You know, Laurie?
I think I'll beat you to the altar.
Fran!
Bob? You still want me to be a June bride?
Sure.
What did you say? Hey, Fran, you mean it?
- Hold this.
- Bring on marriage!
Hey, what's gotten into my family?
- I don't know what to say.
- Why say anything?
I propose a toast. A toast!
Come on, everyone.
- Let's make it to all of us.
- Punch for everybody.
If you put your head on my shoulder they wouldn't hear you crying so loud.
I can't help it, Aunt Jessie.
- Someone else will come along.
- Oh, no, you're wrong.
They will. In about six months, that's the usual time.
Don't contradict me.
I know about these things, being a spinster.
Aunt Jessie?
I have wonderful news. Bob and Franny...
- Amy? What's the matter, Amy?
- Nothing, nothing.
Why are you crying?
Amy can't get used to losing the baby of the family any more than I can.
Oh, you mustn't feel like this.
I'm not going away.
Nothing will really change.
- I know, it's just...
- Amy... we're all going to get married sooner or later.
We are.
We'll have housefuls of kids running all over the place.
Little violin players, little piano players.
Now, Amy, you like Alex, don't you?
Of course she does, we all do.
What is this, a taffy pull?
Come help me with the coffee.
- She's right, I'm just being sensitive...
- Are you sure it isn't Alex?
What I mean is, you never did seem to take to him like the rest of us.
Honest, Amy, he's so sweet and he's so much fun.
I... I know you'll learn to love him.
Laurie, stop that gab-gab-gabbing.
We need to get coffee to those people or no one's going to love anyone.
- Come on, darling.
- Amy, get those cups over there.
Laurie, you pour. No, let me do it. At least there's one steady hand in this family.
Oh, dear. Oh...
Let them come in and dunk it.
Your coffee, Barney.
It was just one of those things
Just one of those crazy flings
One of those bells
That now and then rings
Just one of those things
It was just one of those nights
Just one of those fabulous flights
A trip to the moon on gossamer wings
Yes, it was one of those things
If we thought a bit about the end of it
When we started painting that town
We'd have been aware
That our love affair was too hot
Not to cool down
So goodbye, goodbye, bye-bye, goodbye baby and amen
Here's hoping we meet now and then
It was great fun
But it was just one of those things
What are you doing here?
I could ask you the same question.
And some more besides.
Why haven't you been around lately?
Is our piano out of tune or something?
No, the pitch is fine.
I guess I just don't have a beat for The Wedding March.
Oh. Is that why you didn't show up at Franny's wedding?
Well, I figured Alex can handle that.
Today he'll probably play his own march and say "I do" at the same time.
I, er...
Just waiting around.
A guy owes me some bucks.
I don't feel like walking to New York.
Barney, why are you going to New York?
Just because I'm getting m...
It's still no reason why I have to stop trying to make a human being out of you.
Hey.
I brought chintz curtains into your life, remember?
- I'm not going to...
- Why do you have to look so beautiful?
Who, me?
You're getting married in an hour.
Another dream shot.
If that wasn't enough you come in here looking like a convention of angels.
Why does the sunlight have to hit you just right?
If your nose was shiny or your eyes were dull - anything to make it easier.
But look at you.
Well, a girl can't get married without a permanent, can't she?
It wouldn't be legal.
Nice going, honey.
Congratulations.
They take a guy out of the cold, introduce him to a family of real people -
Auntie Jessie, the old man - and then they throw a girl named
Laurie in his path.
After she gets a hammer lock on his heart they kick him out in the street.
New lease on the gutter.
Barney, listen to me.
No. You listen to me.
You've been telling me all along it's my fault, that I didn't put up a battle.
Well, now I'm full of fight.
I love you, Laurie.
I love you. Understand? Nobody gets you.
Barney, please.
Yes...
Your theory's all cockeyed, baby.
You got the judges and the referee and I accept the verdict.
What's more, I'll attend the wedding.
My smile will be as brave as Amy's.
Why Amy?
Don't tell me you don't know that she's got it real bad for Alex.
- What are you talking about?
- Just what I said.
When you're on the outside looking in you can see things other people can't.
- What do you mean?
- The night of the wedding announcement.
Poor Amy, her face was white as a sheet.
- She ran out of the room...
- That's not why...
She came back in and her eyes were red from crying and I knew why.
- Cos I understand all the Amys of the world.
- But I know why she was crying.
It was because I was getting married.
- Amy and I have always been close and...
- Sure, sure.
Barney, I don't believe you.
- You're trying to frighten me.
- Look... Go home, get married.
- People are waiting.
- You're lying!
Sure.
That's as good a word as any.
Now, why don't you go,
I have an important business appointment.
Go home.
Amy? Amy?
In here.
Oh. Do me a favour, will you?
Thanks.
I would if I could, but I can't.
My fingers are like jelly. Feel them.
- Oh, they're cold.
- Yeah.
So are yours.
You know, some guys can tie knots, some guys can't.
Me, I can't tie anything.
I know.
- Hey, come on.
- Now just hold still.
Hey, that's a steal from something.
If it is it's a good one.
Hold it, hold it, hold it.
- Leave me some air to say "I do".
- I'm sorry.
- There, I think I made it.
- Thanks.
- How about me? Any price tags showing?
- Uh-uh.
Striped trousers. Symbolic, eh?
- How do I look?
- You look very nice.
Thanks.
You're my love. I'll see you.
I'll see you.
I understand that things like this...
Pardon me, Reverend. What time have you?
- I have 3:08.
- Gregory, what time have you?
- Huh?
Oh. Er... 3:15.
- Excuse me.
- Yes.
Pardon me.
- Are we gonna have ice cream?
- Sure, they always have it at weddings.
- Have many weddings have you been to?
- Hundreds.
- What do you think happened?
- She's probably out walking.
All girls get wedding day nerves.
Didn't I take a walk?
But Laurie - what possessed her?
- It'll take 15 minutes to dress her.
- I know, I know.
- Pop, what time did you say you had?
- Er...
I told you. 3:15, Bob.
- I wonder what the kitchen clock says.
- It says stop acting like a pompous idiot.
I'm sorry.
I say we break out the champagne right now.
My first wedding day,
I could use some muscle tone.
That's probably Laurie now.
Never mind, Amy, I'll get it.
- Sign here.
- Aha, the wire we've been waiting for.
Humperdinck Appliance Company.
"You can't stay married without a deep freeze.
- "Our sale starts Monday. Easy terms."
- Yeah.
- It's for you, Amy.
- For me?
- It's from Laurie!
- Laurie?
- Is something wrong?
- What happened?
- Pop...
- What is it?
Amy, what is it?
She's married! Barney Sloan.
"Break the news to Alex.
Make him understand this is for the best.
"I found out just in time to avoid making a terrible mistake.
"Barney and I will be married by the time this reaches you. Alex will understand..."
Sorry, son.
What are we going to do?
Pop?
Well, don't just stand there, do something.
I can't go out and face all those people.
Somebody has to tell them.
I'll take care of it.
I'm sorry, Reverend Johnson, but the family wanted me to speak for them, to you and to their friends.
"Break the news to Alex.
Make him understand this is for the best.
"I found out just in time..."
This quiet hurts my ears.
I've only one in my orchestra now, Jess.
You'll soon have the whole family home for Christmas.
I'm just writing jokes to Laurie about it.
Well, let's take it from the top, Amy.
But play loud, will you?
All I ask is a little noise.
I guess there's no point in asking how it's coming, is there?
No, not much.
- It's my turn now.
- What does that mean?
I need your comfort.
I burned the stew.
Can't you salvage any of it?
Make a vegetable soup?
The vegetables... disappeared.
No matter. We'll get a decent meal at your father's on Christmas.
I guess that's why I burned the stew.
I was reading Aunt Jessie's letter over again.
It gets better every time.
Yeah.
Come on, I'll walk you to work.
- We'll eat on Joe again.
- Sure. Cold spaghetti and warm beer.
Sometimes it's warm beer and cold spaghetti.
- He's fickle, that's all.
- But the music is great.
Oh, that's ripped. Take it off and I'll fix it.
There's a fella named Sloan playing the piano there. Ever heard of him?
Yeah, I heard of him.
He's fair.
What's that?
Ever been to South America?
No.
Well, we nearly got there.
- When?
- Yesterday.
- You didn't tell me.
- I know.
It was a good idea. Some of the guys were going to put a combination together and go down there. Some place, any place.
What happened?
It takes money, sweetie, everything takes money.
300 bucks, one way, for two.
In the old days you could've gone, couldn't you?
What are you saying?
Two can't stow away as cheap as one.
Forget it, I got an idea.
- Why South America, Barney?
- Forget it!
They've gone, they got a piano player.
Besides it's summer down there now.
It's hot and it's green.
They got tropical storms.
Maybe I just wanted to give
South America's lightning a shot at me.
- It's only fair.
- Please, not that again.
Oh, where's your sense of humour?
I'm sorry, honey.
I was only kidding.
That for South America.
You haven't asked me what my idea is.
- Laurie?
- Hm?
You know how they say it in the songs, don't you? "You'll never know how much"?
How about you after all these months?
You know how much.
Crazy, mixed up character.
- It's only four months too.
- Five.
And you still love me?
That's nice.
I don't know though, maybe you're the one that's crazy.
- You said you had an idea.
- Yeah.
I was thinking we ought to live it up a little tonight.
- Go out for a fancy dinner, Chinese maybe.
- Sounds very good.
- What are we...?
- I got that figured out too.
How much did we pay for the piano?
- Oh...
- How much?
- You know as well as I do it was $100.
- Good.
Good, we can sell it back to this character for 75, he can make himself $25.
I'll starve first. You're going to finish that song and on this piano.
And a million more besides.
I proved something, I finished three songs, and on this piano.
- Yes, and two were published.
- And both of them died.
I'm no Alex Burke.
No, you've got more talent than Alex.
- Have I?
- Yes, you have.
So how come he eats while he works?
We need eating money.
- We'll get it too.
- How?
I don't know how but we'll get it.
Well, if we can't hock the piano, is there anything else you have in mind?
No, there's nothing else.
Yes, there is.
- What?
- That. The bracelet. His bracelet.
Sure, why not?
Unless you never got him out of your system.
As long as that's on your wrist he's living with us. Maybe you want that.
Well, hock it!
I'm sick and tired of hearing about
Alex Burke and his success. Get rid of it.
The funniest thing you've ever seen!
After the third round, I asked Maxy if he wanted to triple his bet -
- you should've see his face!
- It's quarter to three
There's no one in the place
'cept you and me
So set 'em up, Joe
I got a little story you ought to know
We're drinking, my friend
To the end of a brief episode
So make it one for my baby
And one more for the road
I got the routine
Put another nickel in the machine
I'm feeling so bad
Won't you make the music easy and sad
I could tell you a lot
But you've got to be true to your code
So make it one for my baby
And one more for the road
You'd never know it but, buddy,
I'm a kind of poet
And I got a lot of things to say
And when I'm gloomy
You simply gotta listen to me
Till it's all talked away
Well, that's how it goes
- And Joe I know you're getting...
- Good evening, Mrs Sloan.
- ...anxious to close
- Table down there.
So thanks for the cheer
I hope you didn't mind my bending your ear
But this torch that I found must be drowned
Or it soon might explode
So make it one for my baby
And one more for the road
The long
That long road
- Nice of you to pick us up, Ernie.
- Orders. Amy's orders.
- Amy still bossing you around, Ern?
- And it'll get worse after we're married.
- You and Amy?
- You bet. Soon too.
Come on.
Stick close, honey, I'm going to need you.
Laurie...
I almost forgot this.
Don't ask me how I got it.
It might be embarrassing.
Yes? Laurie!
Darling, good to see you.
Hello, Barney, I'm awfully glad you could make it.
Aunt Jessie!
Oh, you look so wonderful.
Doesn't she, Barney?
- Hello, Barney. Merry Christmas.
- Merry Christmas.
- Come in, you must be frozen.
- Hey, Laurie, I'm waiting for a hug!
Merry Christmas, sweetheart!
- Oh, the tree is beautiful.
- You really like it? I'm so glad.
- How did you do it without me?
- It was kinda hard, but we managed.
Honey, it's so good to see you.
Number Nine!
Oh, that's a good boy. You're such a sweet doggy, I missed you so much.
- Hey, you're getting fat. Isn't he?
- He's been eating regularly.
Oh, I love you.
Hiya, Tuttle.
Hiya, Burke.
- Alex, come and join the party.
- Stop making like a big composer.
- How's he been since the show, Pop?
- He wears his royalty cheques on his lapel!
I haven't collected a penny!
We're still in Philadelphia.
- You know, art, the theatre.
- He's a big hit, Laurie.
- We need to make it in New York.
- And all those critics.
Don't say that! They'll love it.
Merry Christmas, Barney.
Same to you. And congratulations,
I read your Philly notices.
- Your orchestrating helped a lot.
- You helped cover up what he stole!
You'll feel better after your dinner.
Oh, there's a bird in the oven.
Attagirl, Aunt Jessie, keep it practical.
Wait a minute, Amy.
Why waste good mistletoe?
Attaboy, Ernie! Come up for air!
Go man, go. That gives me an idea.
Come on, sweetheart.
- Oh, come on, Fran.
- Pop? I've waited a long time for this.
Move over.
- Oh!
- Tuttle, the Latin lover.
- Dinner!
- Aww.
Hold it, hold it.
We don't need any mistletoe, do we?
- No.
- OK, shoulders back, chin up.
- Ready?
- Yes.
- Well, thank you. Let's go to dinner.
- Oh, turkey!
- This is the second act ballad.
- What a good dinner...
- Shhh!
- Oh, sorry, Alex, but it was good.
You're right, it was. Would you sing, Laurie?
- Sure.
- I want to go on record, before the critics tear us apart - I like it.
- OK?
- OK.
So what, it's raining
It won't help complaining
The fundamental rules of nature still apply
Look up at the sky
There's a rising moon
For every falling star
Makes no difference
Just how sad or blue you are
One never knows about tomorrow
Just what another day may bring
One moment in your heart it's winter
Comes a rose and suddenly it's spring
There'll be times of sorrow
There'll be times of joy
And a bright tomorrow
For each girl and boy
Who knows what happiness is made
Just a kiss away from where you are
There's a rising moon
For every falling star
- Wonderful, Alex!
- Very nice piece.
- Play it again!
- I'd like to but I'd miss my train.
- Oh, that's a shame.
- I was lucky to get Christmas Eve off but the actors are working. Aunt Jessie.
- There was a show tonight?
- And tomorrow. We won't get an audience.
In Philadelphia, anything can happen.
- I'll get your coat.
- Thanks.
- Ernie, get Alex's bags.
- Yeah, hop to it, now.
I heard of henpecked husbands, but fiancs?
Can't you miss your train?
No one will believe you're a real composer if you show up at every rehearsal.
- Can I help it if I like good music?
- Good music? Let's send him away happy.
- Thanks.
- I think this is yours.
If it doesn't fit, it's mine.
Whoever said "out of sight, out of mind" was a liar.
Alex, I haven't had a chance to talk to you all evening.
- There's something I'd like to explain.
- You don't have to explain anything.
All I want to know is... are you happy, Laurie?
I love him very much.
You still haven't answered me.
Alex, I put something in your pocket.
I guess that answers my question.
You know something?
Marriage certainly agrees with you.
For a wife you're darned pretty.
- For a mother I'm darned pretty.
- Mother?
- I'm going to have a baby, Alex.
- No!
- Yes.
- Oh, that's wonderful news.
I'm glad. For you.
It was a tough fight, Ma, but we lost.
I might also add, we was robbed.
- I better congratulate Barney.
- Oh, no. No, don't. He doesn't know yet.
- What?
- I found out myself yesterday.
I'm saving the announcement for midnight.
It's my Christmas present to him.
- It's better than cuff links, don't you think?
- Yeah.
I don't know what Barney will give you back, but it'll never match it.
Or you.
Well...
I guess you better hurry, huh?
Yeah, I guess I'd better.
So long, Burke.
So long... Sloan.
- Well, just in time.
- All set to go, Alex?
- Yeah.
- I'll drive you to the station. It's no trouble.
Would you drop me at the drugstore to get some cigarettes?
Well, Jessie, here we go again.
Can I drive Alex to the station?
Some private stuff we need to discuss.
Fine with me. I'll get you your cigarettes and some cigars for myself.
- You can pick me up on the way back.
- Goodbye!
Let's go, we haven't got much time.
- Goodbye, Alex!
- Goodbye!
- Get in, Alex.
- Let's go.
I asked Bob to let me drive you to the station because I...
I wanted to say sorry for messing things up.
- It's ancient history. Forget it.
- Busting things up. That's my speed.
One saving grace though.
I always wind up at the bottom of the pile.
How have things been going for you?
- Not too bad.
- Working?
Yeah, here and there.
- Everything's all right, then.
- Why not?
Oh, I ran into Jake last week - he was on his way to South America and we got to talking about you.
- He said...
- Jake's a bigger liar than I am.
- Do me a favour, Barney?
- Ha. How much do you need?
I've been lucky lately.
Let me lend you some, tide you over.
If you ever get tired of being a nice guy,
Alex... It would bore me stiff.
- No, I can't take it, Alex.
- Why not?
Who knows? Maybe it's because
I'm a new man.
Or so they tell me.
The old Barney would've taken it.
The old Barney was no dope.
- Porter?
- Yes, sir?
Thanks for the lift, Barney.
And Merry Christmas.
- 'Board!
- Oh, Barney...
- Here.
- Wait a minute...
For Laurie. Use it, any way you think will make her happy.
Merry Christmas, Barney.
Yeah. Merry Christmas.
Oh, I think it's wonderful, Amy.
- Have you set the date, yet?
- No.
- Pretty soon, I hope.
- That's nice.
Isn't it funny how everything's worked out?
One short year.
Remember last Christmas?
You weren't married,
Fran wasn't married and Alex...
- Go ahead.
- You don't mind if I talk about him?
Of course not.
You know, you won't believe this, but...
I thought I was in love with Alex.
- Really?
- Well, I guess we all did.
Then your telegram came and we all fell apart.
Everybody except Ernie.
I'll never forget the way he took hold.
He was so calm and dignified.
I guess that's when it all started.
- You and the romantic plumber?
- Yes.
You know, Laurie, it's funny how you can be around somebody and not know how much they mean to you.
You and Barney for instance.
You couldn't have known how much you loved him when you first married him.
I know now.
Amy, I love him so much and yet I can't convince him that I do. Really.
But you married him.
Doesn't that prove that you love him?
It doesn't. He thinks he's a failure and nobody wants him.
He stays in the outside, Amy.
I can't bring him close.
Oh, darling.
Everything's going to be all right.
You just know that it is.
With the baby and all?
Now, could you imagine Barney as a father?
- No.
- Everything's going to be wonderful.
I hope so.
Oh, no!
It's Bob. He's had an accident.
Will you be quiet a minute, please?
St Joseph's Hospital. Right... Yes?
I'll bring his wife with me.
- Is he badly hurt?
- Yes, Fran, I'm sorry.
- The car's outside.
- Amy, Laurie, get the coats.
Pop. Oh, Pop.
Put this around you, Jess.
Poor Bob, I... I never made him happy.
- I didn't even try.
- Fran, you mustn't say that.
He's always been... so kind, so generous.
- I never showed any appreciation.
- You can make it up to him. He'll be OK.
- But suppose he's... Suppose he...
- Franny, please.
Fran...
It isn't Bob.
Laurie...
It's Barney.
He was driving Bob's car.
Barney... Barney.
- Laurie...
- Yes, darling?
They wouldn't even let me go out in style.
Have you got a cigarette?
Yes.
You're going to be fine.
Only lightning can get you.
You gave me your word, remember?
Lightning can be manufactured, you know.
- He needs rest now.
- Doctor, is he going to be all right?
- Is he?
- Please, Mrs Sloan...
No!
Barney, I won't let you quit.
You can't.
Darling, I love you so much and I need you.
Please...
We need you.
Barney... Barney...
We're going to have a baby.
Barney, can you hear me?
I'm going to have a baby.
Barney... Barney, I won't let you give up.
Barney!
Look!
Happy Easter, Lightning.
My love
Is ever you, my love
Now and forever you, my love
You walked into my lonely world
What peace of mind your smile unfurled
Yes, and because of you, my love
My wishful dreams came true, my love
In my uncertain heart
I am only certain of
How much I love you
My love
It's got a face and feet now.
How do you like it?
It's just wonderful.
Come on in and join the family.
Yes, and because of you, my love
My wishful dreams came true, my love
In my uncertain heart
I am only certain of
How much I love you
My love
- That's what I call real moving.
- I'm in love with my wife all over again.
It's beautiful.
- I'm so happy.
- Lightnin', congratulate your poppa.
- There you go.
- Come over here.
Fairy tales can come true
It can happen to you
If you're young at heart
For it's hard, you will find
To be narrow of mind
If you're young at heart
And if you should survive
To a hundred and five
Look at all you'll derive
Out of being alive
And here is the best part
You have a head start
If you are among the very young at heart
Where did you get that girl?
Oh, you lucky devil
Where did you get that girl?
Tell me on the level
Have you ever kissed her?
If she has a sister
Lead me, lead me
Lead me to her mister
Gee, I wish that I had a girl
I'd love her, I'd love her
Oh, goodness, how I'd love her
If you can find another
I'll take her home to Mother
Where? Where?
Where did you get that girl?
Five bows and an encore.
Not bad for a Tuesday night, huh?
They loved you, Jess.
Come on, I'll buy you a steak.
Hey, wait. I wanna watch
Mendoza's opening trick.
- What, again?
- Hi, Jess.
Bert, big news.
I just closed the deal for you.
Eighty weeks solid on the Orpheum time.
Two seasons straight.
How do you like that?
Watch this. It's terrific.
Here's your new song.
Hot off the presses.
"'Where Did You Get That Girl? '
Words by Bert Kalmar...
...co-author of 'Hello, Hawaii,'
'Oh! What a Pal Was Mary."'
- Am I an agent?
- Yeah, yeah. Now, look.
- Hey, what's going on?
- Magic is going on.
Come in.
- Oh, I thought you'd be dressed by now.
- Jess, listen. Come here.
I've got a great idea, an opening for the new act.
I come out in one, see?
I'm a magician.
- Oh, a magician.
- Yeah.
I'm in a full dress suit, medals on my chest...
...maybe a mustache and a little goatee.
Yes, I adore little goatees.
And you come on as my assistant.
I hand you my gloves...
Hey, wait a minute.
- You're not walking out on me, are you?
- Not yet.
- What you open the door for?
- Because I'm a nice girl, Mr. Kalmar.
And a nice girl always leaves the door open.
You know, we could fix all that so you won't have to worry about doors.
We could get married.
I'd like that.
Maybe someday when you're not so rushed, Bert.
So you don't have to propose in short pants.
Listen, Jess, I'm not kidding.
Neither am I.
You're too busy, Bert.
A big headliner, important songwriter.
A magician.
Now you're writing a play.
You want to be everything in show business all at once.
And I just want to be a wife.
You couldn't light in one spot long enough for the ceremony.
Okay, Jess.
But if you ever do decide to marry me, you'll speak right up, won't you?
You'll be the first to know.
Thanks, Jess.
Well, what about that magic idea?
Well, what's the matter?
- Just a couple of tricks for an opening?
- And for a finish, you saw me in half.
Next thing you know, you'll be doing a single.
"Kalmar The Magnificent."
Maybe you think I couldn't.
- Maybe I'll surprise you.
- Nothing you did would surprise me.
You know, sometimes I think you'd rather be a bad magician...
...than a good actor.
- How do I look?
- Beautiful.
- Do I need a flower?
- What for?
I think I need a flower.
- Pretty fancy, huh?
- Just wonderful.
- Telephone, Mr. Kalmar.
- Okay.
Be right back.
Clanahan's Paradise, the best beer on the island.
See Kendall The Great, miracles and marvels of magic.
And appearing on the stage right now,
The Four Little Boys in Gray.
Fifteen acts of...
Jimmy O'Leary said I've got a theory
She's different from all of your girls
She's not a queen
Like you see on the screen
And she ain't got
No diamonds or pearls
But she's mine, all mine
Giants 4, Philadelphia 2.
End of the seventh.
I told her I worked in a glue factory
And that's how she happened
To get stuck on me
- I'll take over.
- Thanks.
And she's mine, all mine
- Hey, Ruby.
- Yes, sir?
- Where you going?
- This is my supper hour.
I thought I'd go out for a catch.
Yeah? Well, take it on the hop to dressing room four.
Kendall The Great needs an assistant.
Say, Mr. Clanahan, would you mind...
...if I asked one of the acts to sing a song that I wrote?
It's called "On the Shores of Araby."
It goes like this:
I can't forget the night we met
On the shores of Araby
The moon lit up the sky
And love lit up your eyes
I kissed you once
I kissed you twice
As I held you gently
That night upon the shores of Araby
- I never...
- You wrote that?
Yes, sir. Words and music both.
Well, take it on the hop to dressing room four.
Kendall The Great needs an assistant.
Yes, sir.
Come in.
Mr. Kendall?
Ebbetts Field is that way.
No, I'm your assistant.
Mr. Clanahan said.
Okay. Take those boxes backstage and pile them up behind the drapes.
Yes, sir.
Now, when I'm on,
I'll give you signal like this:
Whenever you hear that you take the top box...
...shove an animal through the hole in the drapes and into the back of the table. Got it?
Animals, huh?
- I want them in just that order.
- Yeah.
Don't fool around with that goose.
He's vicious.
Well, they usually are.
Ladies and gentlemen, since time began...
...man has placed his trust in the witch doctor...
...the sorcerer and the voodoo.
Who dares to call them frauds?
Watch carefully, please.
Is this trickery or magic?
Now, I have here a gentleman's ordinary silk hat.
As you can plainly see...
...there are no secret pockets and no hidden springs.
I place the hat on the table.
Go on, get in there.
Go on, what are you waiting for?
And now, ladies and gentlemen, the identical hat.
I'll fill it from this pitcher of water.
Like this.
Is this trickery or magic?
- Oh, look, a goose.
- Now, but don't go near him. He's vicious.
Look.
I would like your attention, please.
Watch carefully.
Now think of a card.
Any card in the deck.
A scientific exhibition of mind over matter.
For my next deception,
I have here a little handkerchief...
What's going on...?
I'll be right back, Mr. Clanahan.
- You see a goose go by here?
- I saw a lot of them down there.
Watch carefully, please.
Ordinary hat. Ordinary drinking water.
I pour it in the hat like this:
Place it on my head like that.
- Where is he? Where is he?
- Just a minute, you.
That baseball player, if I ever lay my hands on him...
Get out of my theater and don't ever come back.
I ought to sue you for that performance.
I ought to take you to court, you small-time swami.
Oh, shut up.
- Hello.
- What are you doing here?
Charlie traced you for me.
Nice comedy routine, Bert.
That maniac in a baseball hat.
I was going great until then.
- I had them right there, I was killing them.
- Listen to him.
Every theater in the country is waiting for Kalmar and Brown...
...but Kendall The Great is killing them in Coney Island at 5 bucks a night.
What were you trying to prove?
That we ought to use magic in the act?
Not necessarily.
You know what magic is to me.
- It's a hobby. It relaxes me.
- You look relaxed.
Come in.
- Say, a couple of them got away.
- Get out of here!
Bert Kalmar.
That's Bert Kalmar, the songwriter.
Say, Mr. Clanahan, that's Bert Kalmar.
- I saw him at the Palace.
- Yeah. I heard you tell the rabbit.
I recognized him without his mustache.
Sure, sure. Here, son.
And don't look for another job right away.
Just take a nice, long rest.
Thank you. Thank you.
Now, with your kind indulgence we'd like to show you what happens...
...when two dancers get married.
Mr. and Mrs. Hoofer at home.
Thank you.
They loved you, Jess.
See them applaud?
- Bert, I was so nervous.
- So was I. You know...
- Sorry, Mr. Kalmar.
- My fault.
Flowers for you.
Oh, they're beautiful.
Who are they from?
The president and I. We chipped in.
- Bert, what is it?
- I don't know.
"Kalmar and Brown, who opened their new act to bravos last month...
...have been cancelled following an accident backstage.
Doctors say Kalmar will not be able to dance...
...for at least a year, possibly two."
I couldn't think of a tougher break.
It's Jessie I'm thinking about.
She can't just sit around waiting.
When you lay off too long, they think you're through.
And I'm not gonna let that happen to her.
Now, why can't she just pick up another partner and take out the same act?
Bert, I told you, the act needs your name.
She wouldn't make the expenses.
- You sunk a lot of dough into it, huh?
- Not much. Just everything I own.
- Hello.
- Hi, Jess.
- Hello.
- I've ordered breakfast.
- How are you, Charlie?
- Good.
- Hey, doughnuts?
- Sure.
Why did you have to go shopping?
No room service?
I figured we'd save the tip.
That wolf at the door might get pretty hungry.
I've got to catch a rehearsal down at Loew's.
- I'll see you, Jess. Bert.
- Bye, Charlie.
See you later.
Come here, honey.
Now, listen. That crack about the wolf at the door, that's out, see?
- You won't be around to meet him.
- No?
I've been talking to Charlie.
We figured you ought to go out as a single.
I can write a new routine.
Charlie guarantees the booking, says it's a cinch.
You boys have been wasting your time.
My plans are all set.
I always told you if ever I changed my mind...
...you'd be the first to know.
Of course, it took a broken kneecap to make you stop bouncing long enough.
But I'm satisfied.
Say, maybe you didn't hear me.
I just accepted your proposal.
Look, Jess...
I won't be bouncing for a long time yet.
And a fellow with a wife to support has to get around pretty fast, you know.
Well, I'm not a girl that needs a new sable every winter.
What about your writing, Bert?
Your play, your songs?
You don't have to click your heels in the air to write a lyric.
Now, wait a minute.
I'd like to write a great play, sure.
Who wouldn't?
And those songs, they're just a sideline for fun.
I never tried to make a living at it.
I'm not even sure I can.
Until I find out, l...
You don't want me hanging around your neck.
Is that it?
I didn't say that.
Now, don't be sore at me, huh?
I'm not sore.
But it isn't every day that a girl gets turned down.
Jessie, listen. Listen. Jessie!
Jessie!
Wish you could write another song like that.
- I could sure use it.
- I'll tell you a secret, Al.
- So could I.
- Well, what's the matter?
Oh, I don't know.
I just haven't hit on anything.
- I can't seem to get started.
- Oh, you will.
What do you hear from Jessie?
Oh, she framed a new act. Doing fine.
Say, what is that?
One of your new ones?
That?
Some Arabian song one of our pluggers wrote.
Plays it all day long, drives me nuts.
Get me Harry Ruby.
I think I'll throw him out of here.
Arabian song, huh?
Not a bad tune.
Yeah, it is kind of catchy.
Hello, Ruby, come in here, son.
Let you talk to him.
You know, an Araby song might be just the thing right now.
- Yes, chief?
- Oh, come in, Ruby.
Bert, this is Harry Ruby.
- Bert Kalmar.
- Hi.
Ruby, Mr. Kalmar wants to hear that Arabian song of yours.
Yes. You bet. Yes, sir.
It's called
"On the Shores of Araby That Night..."
"That Night With You."
I can't forget the night we met
On the shores of Araby
The moon lit up the sky
And love lit up your eye
- Hold it, wait a minute.
- Yeah, hold it.
- Who wrote that lyric?
- Well, I did.
Words and music both.
Well, you know, you haven't got an Arabian song there.
- You don't think so?
- No.
- Play it again, will you?
- Sure.
No, no. It's more like Dixie.
A Dixie tune.
Maybe Mississippi, Alabama, Tennessee.
Sure. Look.
Da-da-da-da in Tennessee
Gee, that's swell, Mr. Kalmar.
Tennessee.
Well, you boys go right ahead.
- Take all day if you want.
- Okay, Al. Great.
Let me see.
Da-da-da-da in Tennessee
Say, don't I know you?
Well, I don't think so, Mr. Kalmar.
Da-da-da-da in Tennessee
Down among...
You worked here long?
Oh, for a couple of months,
Mr. Kalmar.
- Have a cigar.
- Oh, gee, thanks.
I wanna be in Tennessee
That's it. Try it.
I wanna be in Tennessee
That ought to do it.
Here, take it from the top.
I wanna be in Tennessee
In my Dixie paradise
An angel's voice I hear
I mean my mammy dear
I'd give my soul if I could stroll
Down among those hills again
For all the world
Would not be dreary then
I'd love to go to sleep and know
That tomorrow I'd arise
Beneath those southern skies
Where songbirds harmonize
Lordy, hear my plea
Make me what I wanna be
A rolling stone just rolling home
To my sunny Tennessee
Gosh, that's wonderful, Mr. Kendall.
Thanks.
Kendall? Oh, I remember now.
The pigeons, the rabbits.
Oh, I remember you!
Please, Mr. Kendall...
I mean, Mr. Kalmar.
You pin-headed baseball player.
Do you realize what you did that night?
- It was the goose.
- Goose?
Goose? Five hundred people out front and...
You don't know that goose.
He was the meanest thing...
I knew I remembered that face.
I got a bad feeling the second I saw you.
You're a menace. Run away and hide before you do real damage.
Let bygones be bygones.
Get away from me. I should write a song with a jinx like you.
Here. As far as I'm concerned, it never left Araby.
Goose.
Oh, hello, Mr. Kalmar.
I got your message.
You write this ad?
"The nation's number one song hit,
'My Sunny Tennessee'...
...by that sensational new writing team,
Bert Kalmar and Harry Ruby."
- Well, yeah, you see, l...
- Who made you my partner?
- Well, nobody, but...
- Now, listen, kid.
You might as well understand something right now.
Because I wrote one song with you doesn't make us roommates.
I'm not teaming up with anybody.
Soon as I can swing this leg again,
I'd be back in vaudeville.
Until then, I'll write with anyone who happens to have a good tune.
- Now, is that clear?
- Sure, that's very clear, Mr. Kalmar.
Okay.
Where are the doughnuts?
Thanks, Johnnie.
Well, got any new tunes?
As a matter of fact, I've got a tune but I haven't thought of words for it yet.
Good.
My spikes. Al Schacht gave me those.
Al Schacht.
He's a pitcher in the big league.
Maybe you've heard of him?
Al Schacht?
- Play the tune.
- Sure.
Hey, have you got any with chocolate on top?
Coming up.
You don't like it, huh?
Sure, sure. It's a nice little tune.
You ought to do something with it sometime.
You ought to do something with that shirt too.
Real silk, $4.
You got any other tunes?
Well... Let's see, I...
Well, don't pull a ligament.
You know...
...there hasn't been a good
Japanese song for quite a while.
Got something here
I thought might work out.
I call it "So Long, Oo-long."
I figured the rhythm is something like this:
So long, Oo-long
How long you gonna be gone?
You got something to fit that?
Well, let's see.
How about this?
Wait a minute. Try that again, will you?
So long, Oo-long
How long you gonna be gone?
Now, wait a minute.
That's the same tune you just played.
Well, I know it.
Are you trying to put something over on me?
- Well, no, I thought it would fit.
- Well, it doesn't fit.
What's the matter with you, you only got one tune?
- I got plenty of tunes in me.
- Well, I've only heard one tune.
Yeah, I know.
Right now, all I got is one rotten tune.
Take it easy, kid.
Now, don't get excited.
- Don't get excited.
- Who's excited? I'm not excited.
I'll tell you what I'll do.
I'll leave this lyric. If you come up with something, give me a ring.
If you don't, well, don't worry.
See you around.
So long, Oo-long
How long you gonna be gone?
Your little Japanee
Will be waiting
Underneath the bamboo tree
So don't be too long, Oo-long
I'll long while you're away
Waiting for the day
When you come back to me
I'll sit and sigh
'Neath the oriental sky
Each day that I
Am left alone
In Nagasaki
So long, Oo-long
How long you gonna roam?
Please don't be too long
Oo-long, so long
Hurry back home
Ming Toy
Loved a boy
Happy little Japanee
Oo-long was his name
Set her heart aflame
- One day, he say
- Soon I got to go away
- When he leave
- Ming Toy grieve
Everybody hear her say
I'll sit and sigh
'Neath the oriental sky
Each day that I
Am left alone
In Nagasaki
So long, Oo-long
How long you going to roam?
Please don't be too long
Oo-long, so long
Hurry back home
- Hi, boys.
- Yes, sir, 10 cents.
Right. We have...
No, no, no. The Palace tonight.
I fixed it with Mrs. Carter DeHaven to hear your song.
- Well...
- Not that, the new one.
If she likes it, she'll introduce it next week.
Who's sorry now?
Who's sorry now?
Whose heart is aching
For breaking each vow?
Who's sad and blue?
Who's crying too?
Just like I cried over you
Right to the end
Just like a friend
I tried to warn you
Somehow
You had your way
Now you must pay
I'm glad that you're sorry now
Right to the end
Just like a friend
I tried to warn you
Somehow
You had your way
Now you must pay
I'm glad
That you're sorry now
Oh, that's great.
Looks like another hit.
You're making a habit of it.
- Thank you.
- We'll introduce it next week.
- Oh, good, thanks.
- Oh, Bert, how is your knee?
- Oh, better, better. Thank you.
- Wonderful. I'm glad. Excuse me.
- Boys, it was just great, that's all.
- Bert, swell.
Bert, I want a copy to send on to Jessie.
Can't you hear her sing it?
- Yeah, sure.
- It was like it was written for her.
Oh, I suppose you haven't heard the news.
- No.
- Well, it's not settled yet.
But she may team up with Bill Courtney next season.
They'll do an act like she used to do with you.
Well, it's not definite yet.
They ought to do all right.
He's a very talented guy.
- Yeah.
- See you later, Charlie.
Yeah, yeah. Good night.
Oh, me and my big mouth.
Yeah, he doesn't talk about her very much anymore.
Hey, where is she playing next week?
- Jessie?
- Yeah.
Montreal, at Queen's Theatre. Why?
I'll see you later.
Where did you get that girl?
Oh, you lucky devil
What's the matter?
Can't a fella dance if he feels like it?
- Well, I didn't say anything.
- What are you gaping at?
I'm not gaping.
I always look this way.
- You hurt your leg again, Bert?
- No. It's all right.
- I just gotta cut out those knee drops.
- Yeah.
You know what I think?
We ought to take a little vacation.
I mean it.
We've been working too hard.
We're tired.
It would do us good.
We could go to Miami Beach or New Orleans, Hot Springs or Montreal.
Why Montreal?
Oh, no reason. Nice little town.
Might be a nice place to work on that play you're always talking about.
Besides, I got some relatives up there...
...and we could get a good home-cooked meal.
Hey, Harry, I gave you a bum steer.
Jessie is not in Montreal next week, it's Buffalo.
Oh, thanks.
Well, I got relatives in Buffalo too.
I'm sweet Marie from gay Paris
This is my new car
It fill my heart with joy
To drive a Yankee boy
On the sly I wink my eye
When one come my way
I stop the motorcar
And then I say
Come on, papa
Hop in the motorcar
Sit by mama
And hold the hand
You start to raise for me
What they call the deuce
I'll be so sweet to you
Like the charlotte russe
Come on, papa
Beneath the shining star
Bounce your baby
Upon the knee
I give you the kiss
Like the mamselles do
Each time you ask for one
I give you two
And when you're in the car
You love mama
Ooh la la, ooh la la
Come on, papa
We make love to you
Like you want us to
But if you pooh-pooh me
I pooh-pooh you
But when you're in the car
Don't go too far
- Ooh la la
- Ooh la la
Come on, papa
Thank you.
Thank you.
And for my next number...
Ladies and gentlemen...
...we have two very well-known songwriters with us tonight.
Mr. Bert Kalmar and Mr. Harry Ruby.
Would you like to hear them sing one of their numbers?
- Hello, Jess.
- Hello, Bert.
- Hi, Harry.
- Hi, Jessie.
Well, what shall we do?
"Nevertheless"?
Yeah.
Maybe I'm right
And maybe I'm wrong
And maybe I'm weak
And maybe I'm strong
But nevertheless
I'm in love with you
Maybe I'll win
And maybe I'll lose
And maybe I'm in
For cryin' the blues
But nevertheless
I'm in love with you
- Somehow I know at a glance
- Somehow I know at a glance
- The terrible chances I'm taking
- The terrible chances I'm taking
- Fine at the start
- Fine at the start
- Then left with a heart that is breaking
- Then left with a heart that is breaking
Maybe I'll live a life of regret
And maybe I'll give
Much more than I get
But nevertheless
I'm in love with you
What's he gonna do, go back in vaudeville?
Yeah.
Hold it, Harry!
- Harry, wait!
- Wait!
Early riser, huh?
Ducked out without saying goodbye.
Guys, you both shouldn't have done this.
- You're on your honeymoon.
- Here's some candy.
- Oh, thanks, Bert.
- And a little fruit.
Oh, well, that will come in handy.
I like a little fruit once in a while.
Do you mind if I kiss the bride?
Bye, Harry.
And thanks for everything.
You know what I mean.
Oh, here, from me to you.
Well, now, thanks.
You shouldn't have done that.
- I wanted to.
- Oh, here's some newspapers.
And read a book sometime.
It might improve your brain.
All aboard!
Well...
We wrote a lot of good songs together, didn't we, Bert?
- We sure did, Harry.
- Well, bye, Jessie.
- Bye, Harry.
- Bert.
Bye, kid.
And good luck to both of you.
- Good luck to you, kid.
- Don't forget to write.
Yeah, I'll keep in touch with your bookings through Variety.
- So long.
- Bye-bye.
Not so very hungry this morning, sir?
- No, I'll just have some more coffee.
- And a couple of doughnuts.
- Yeah, a couple of doughnuts.
- Yes, sir.
- Harry.
- You alone? Why don't you join us?
Well, you're in Buffalo.
We canceled Buffalo, we're going on a honeymoon. Toast, Bert?
Thanks. We've also canceled Syracuse and
Rochester and 40 weeks next season.
That's a long honeymoon.
Where are you going, up the Congo?
We might buy a little house somewhere and settle down.
- How about Pelham, Bert?
- Pelham's nice. Coffee, dear?
- Yes, warm it.
- Well, what about the team?
Yeah, what about the team?
I don't know. Do you think it should be Kalmar and Ruby...
...or Ruby and Kalmar?
Either way.
First billing doesn't mean much to songwriters.
- Cream, dear?
- Yeah, just a little.
You mean you're not gonna do the act, that the team's Bert and me?
Oh, Jessie, you're wonderful.
Look, it's okay to admire my wife.
Would you mind taking your elbow out of my butter?
Oh, I'm sorry, Bert.
Oh, gosh.
Wait a minute. Start again, will you?
All alone Monday
Singin' the blues
I'll take it.
Here. Pick a card.
Any one.
- Ten of clubs.
- Yeah, that's all right.
Oh, just a moment, please.
Harry, telephone.
Thanks.
- Hello?
- Girl.
Oh, hello, Terry.
Yeah, I'm still working.
Yeah.
Yeah.
Oh, sure I do.
What?
No. Yeah.
Yeah.
Yeah. Okay. Bye.
It was a girl.
- Really?
- We didn't think it was your Uncle Max.
- How long has this been going on?
- Oh, a couple of months.
In fact, we're engaged.
Oh, Harry, that's wonderful.
She's sweet.
I know you'll like her, Jessie.
Why, sure we will.
- Hi.
- Hi, Joe.
All alone Monday
Singin' the blues
Hey, that's our tune.
All alone Tuesday
Reading the news
Say, that redhead's singing our new song.
That's Terry.
That's Terry?
- Harry, she's beautiful.
- Wait till you meet her.
On the shelf Wednesday
Till the dawn comes
By myself Thursday
Twirlin' my thumbs
Friday is my day
So I spend Friday all alone
On Saturday I
Dread the coming of Sunday
Monday the week starts anew
I'm certain I could endure
The week to the end
And I am sure
The days that I spend
Wouldn't be lonely
If I were only
All alone with you
On Saturday I
Dread the coming of Sunday
Monday the week starts anew
I'm certain I could endure
The week to the end
And I am sure
The days that I spend
Wouldn't be lonely
If I were only all alone
With you
- Hello, honey.
- How are you, dear?
- Miss Lordel, Mr. and Mrs. Kalmar.
- Hello.
- Jessie, Bert, Terry.
- How do you do?
- Hello, Terry.
- I'm glad to know all of you.
Mr. Kalmar, I wanna tell you about that number of yours, it's just terrif.
- It's sensashe.
- Thanks. You certainly sang it.
Oh, thank you.
Of course, Snooky rehearsed me in it.
- Snooky?
- Snooky.
This is Snooky.
- Hi, Snooky.
- Oh, she calls me Snooky.
Isn't he sweet?
Oh, I could just eat him up.
- Light me, please?
- I beg your pardon?
- Light me?
- Oh, yeah, of course. Sure.
Oh, that's terrif.
Do you know any more tricks?
Yeah. l...
I understand congratulations are in order, Miss Lordel.
Oh, well, thank you, but I haven't got the part yet.
She's trying out for a part in the Follies.
- Well, I really meant about you and Harry.
- Oh, Harry.
I thought you weren't gonna tell anybody yet.
They're my best friends,
I've got to tell them.
Oh, that music.
Oh, I've simply got to dance.
- Will you?
- Sure.
Oh, I can't dance in this.
Look, I've got to change.
Now, you be sitting right there when I get back.
You hear?
Bye.
What do you think of her?
Well, she's very peppy, isn't she?
Yeah, she's got a lot of life.
Boys. That's Phil Goodman
I'm sitting with...
...the big theatrical producer.
He loved your song and he wants it for his new show.
- Yeah?
- And that's not all.
He wants you to write the whole score.
- A Broadway show?
- Sure.
Words and music by Kalmar and Ruby.
Who did it, huh? Who did it?
- Let me shake the hand of the man...
- Terry. Terry singing our song.
That's who did it.
Oh, Bert.
You're here with me
I'm here with you
We need no secret rendezvous
We'll find romance
Where e'er we chance
To be
The sweetest theme
Runs through my dream
Each night I seem to see
A home for two
In view for you
And me
- She could do the Phyllis part.
- Yeah.
What is your name again?
- Eileen Percy.
- Any experience, Miss Percy?
- Stock mostly, two seasons.
- I'd like you to read something for us.
If you can handle lines,
I'd say the part's yours.
- Thank you.
- Mr. Goodman!
Mr. Goodman, boy, are we in luck.
I just found out that Terry Lordel is available.
Terry Lordel?
Yeah, that girl at the club the other night.
She's just a singer.
She can sing. She can act.
She can do anything.
She'd be great for the Phyllis part.
Wouldn't she, Bert?
- I don't know, Harry.
- Let her read the part, that's all I ask.
- When could you get her in?
- Anytime. Hey, Terry!
Come in here!
All alone Monday
Singing the blues
All alone Tuesday
Reading the news
Staring and blinking
Sitting there thinking
All alone
On the shelf Wednesday
Till the dawn comes
By myself Thursday
Twirling my thumbs
Friday is my day
So I spend Friday all alone
On Saturday I
Dread the coming of Sunday
Monday the week starts anew
I'm certain I could endure
The week to the end
And I am sure
The days that I spend
Wouldn't be lonely
If I were only all alone
With you
You're the understudy, huh?
It must be a pretty tough job.
You're so anxious to get out there.
I wouldn't worry, you'll get your chance.
- Well, I've already had my chance.
- How's that?
Well, I almost had a good part once, but they gave it to someone else.
Oh, that's a shame.
I wouldn't worry about it.
Somebody's bound to get sick some night.
- Not her.
- No, not Terry. She's plenty healthy.
Besides, I won't be here much longer.
I'm going out to Hollywood.
Well, movies, huh?
Well, I wish you all the luck in the world.
Thanks.
Ever anything I can do, let me know.
That's very nice of you, Mr. Ruby.
Good night.
Good night.
- Nice going, Terry.
- Oh, thank you, Mr. Kalmar.
Snooky.
Oh, fine.
- How's the third act coming?
- It isn't.
- I'm worried about him.
- Who, Snooky?
That girl is all wrong for him.
She'll ruin his life.
He's pretty crazy about her.
He's not responsible.
He ought to be chained up someplace.
You know, if Harry left town for a while that girl would be engaged...
...to four different fellas within a week.
Maybe we could get him out of town.
How?
Ship him off to boarding school?
He's a big boy now.
Wears long pants.
Could Al Schacht help?
Al Schacht?
That friend of Harry's, the big-league pitcher.
Al Schacht is down in Florida with the team.
How could he help?
- Well, he could ask Harry...
- Wait a minute.
I'll get Al to invite Harry down to Florida to work out with the Senators.
- Bert, that's exactly what I was saying...
- Say, that's an inspiration.
Western Union, please.
Why didn't I think of it before?
I really wouldn't know.
- Hey, Al, get a load of this.
- Let's see it.
Hey, Ruby, take it easy, will you?
Come on, Al. Throw a fast one.
Well, throw a slow one.
- Hey, Harry!
- What's the matter?
- You all right, huh?
- Hey, Harry.
- You all right?
- Yeah, I'm okay.
- You all right, Harry?
- I feel fine.
- How are you feeling there?
- Hey.
- Come on, I'll get it.
- Play ball. Play ball.
Hit it!
Nice going.
Come on, Ruby!
You moved it.
Lay out. I'll take this one.
- You all right?
- Yeah, I'm fine.
Sure you're okay?
Harry, want to try it again?
- Harry!
- Bert. How are you?
- You look great.
- I feel great.
- Had a good time, huh?
- A little charley horse there.
Where's Terry?
Didn't she get my wire?
Come here, I got news for you.
- She isn't sick?
- No.
- She's married.
- Well, that's good.
Married?
- When?
- Saturday night after the show.
Went to Greenwich with a saxophone player.
- I guess I shouldn't have left town.
- You made a wrong move, son.
- Want a drink?
- Yeah.
- What will it be?
- Grape juice, please.
Make it two.
Not to change the subject...
...but I've been kind of busy while you were away.
- Saturday night, huh?
- Yeah. Look.
- What's this?
- Play. My play. I finished it.
Oh, swell, Bert.
- They went to Greenwich, huh?
- Yeah. I want you to read it, Harry.
- I'd like your opinion.
- Sure.
I'm gonna produce it myself.
I'm putting up part of the cash.
I got a broker from Wall Street putting up the rest.
A saxophone player, huh?
You're not gonna let this thing throw you.
Because if you are,
I'm gonna feel terrible.
Oh, why should you feel terrible, Bert?
You had nothing to do with it.
A saxophone player.
I haven't slept a wink since I read it.
Look, Charlie,
I don't know anything about plays...
...but do you think Bert ought to produce this himself?
- Nobody else will handle it.
- What do you mean?
- This script been around to regular producers?
- Sure.
- What do they say?
- Nothing much.
A couple of them say it will be a sure-fire flop.
Well, did you tell Bert?
- You tell him.
- Oh, fine. That's all I'd have to do.
Look, I'm not worried about the dough he'll lose.
I'm thinking of Bert, his pride.
He's higher than a kite on this thing, and if it flops, he'll never get over it.
- Well, what do you want from me?
- I...
Look, can Bert handle this without that Wall Street guy?
- Not a chance.
- Well, then, call him off.
Tell him the play is no good.
Get him to pull out.
Harry, I can't.
If Bert is gonna fall on his face, maybe we just better let him.
He wouldn't let it happen to me.
Look, get that broker on the phone.
I'll talk to him myself.
What do you mean, he pulled out?
- Why would he pull out now?
- Bert, please.
All I know is that he's out, he doesn't want any part of it.
Well, I'm still asking you why.
Maybe Mr. Miller just decided he didn't like the play anymore.
- Was that it, Charlie?
- Yeah, just about.
He's a broker.
What does he know about plays?
Listen, I spent a lot of time on that thing.
It's not the first play I've written.
I've done six plays.
I tore them up because they weren't what I wanted.
Now I've got something, I know it.
And a broker says it's no good.
Oh, I thought it was your first play, Bert.
He hasn't talked much about it, but he's worked very hard.
Well, I'm no broker, but...
Well, anything I've got, you're welcome to, you know that.
No, no, no. It's all right, forget it.
I gotta go along.
I've gotta catch an act at the Fordham.
- So long, Bert.
- So long, Charlie.
- Harry.
- I'll see you later, Charlie.
Oh, look, Bert. Now, you're not gonna let this thing lick you, are you?
Because if you do, it's gonna lick me too.
I'd feel awful.
Why should you feel awful?
Is it your fault a broker doesn't know a good play when he sees it?
Try it this way:
- That ought to fix it.
- I don't think so.
- Too many notes.
- It's not too many notes. Look...
Hey, fellas, can we borrow your piano just a minute?
Well, listen.
I wanna be loved by you
Just you and nobody else but you
I wanna be loved by you alone
I wanna be kissed by you
Just you and nobody else but you
I wanna be kissed by you alone
Yeah. Come on. Come with us.
I wanna be loved by you
Just you and nobody else but you
I wanna be loved by you alone
I wanna be kissed by you
Just you and nobody else but you
Oh, I wanna be kissed by you alone
I couldn't aspire
To anything higher
Than fill a desire
To make you my own
I wanna be loved by you
Just you and nobody else but you
Oh, I wanna be loved by you alone
I couldn't aspire
To anything higher
Than fill a desire
To make you my own
I wanna be loved by you
Just you and nobody else but you
I wanna be loved by you
Don't know the time
Day or the season
I just know that I'm
Losin' my reason
By fallin' in love
Don't know the time
Day or the season
I just know that I'm
Losin' my reason
By fallin' in love
And since I'm in love
I'm up in the clouds
- Harry, what is it?
- Hey. What's the matter?
Steward said you wanted to see me.
- You all right?
- Sure, I'm fine.
Remember those lyrics you wrote for Jessie?
I think I got a tune for them.
"Thinking of You."
- You wrote it for me, Bert?
- Yeah. Yeah.
I wanted to surprise you, but not at 2:00 in the morning.
I thought you'd be interested.
Go ahead, Jessie, sing it.
Why is it I spend the day
Wake up and end the day
Thinking of you?
Oh, why does it do this
To me?
Is it such bliss
To be
Thinking of you?
And when I fall asleep at night
It seems
You just tiptoe
Into all my dreams
So I
Think of no other one
Ever since I've begun
Thinking of you
Oh, Bert.
- Nice tune, Harry.
- Oh, Harry, it's wonderful.
Thanks.
Thank you for the song, Bert.
It's beautiful.
You know, Harry never wrote a melody like that before.
He must be in love or something.
Why does he have to be in love?
Songwriting is a business.
You could write a love song in a subway train.
Not a love song like that.
You have to feel it.
Didn't you?
Oh, I think of you once in a while.
Thank you, darling.
All the same,
I still think Harry's in love.
Don't be silly. Just because he writes a romantic tune...
...that doesn't mean he has to be
Beethoven. Any good songwriter can...
Don't look now, but here comes Beethoven.
And Capri was impossible.
Actually impossible.
Pepi, dear, be a good little sweetheart and run along.
Al Schacht.
Go on home.
Back to third.
Go on home.
Back to third.
Go on home.
Back to third.
Al.
Get her up there, Al.
Higher.
Thank you.
- What about you, Harry?
- Me?
- Yeah.
- Give me the ball.
All right. Lift her up.
Higher.
Higher!
- Thank you!
- Oh, wait a minute.
You all right?
Yes. Okay.
- Ball took a bad hop.
- A bad hop. A bad hop.
We go to rehearsal in two weeks.
What do I tell Sam Harris?
The ball took a bad hop?
He'll be delighted.
You and your baseball. Every time
I turn around, you're playing baseball.
- That's for kids. Kid stuff!
- Well, I suppose magic's for grownups.
- What's magic got to do with it?
- Here, pick a card. Pick a card.
Don't let me see which one you take.
Ace of clubs? Right? Correct.
Hooray!
It's not the same thing at all.
We have no regular partnership.
- lf one of us breaks this up, it's okay.
- It's all right with me too.
- Then that's understood!
- Okay!
Okay, okay!
Now, play this thing again.
No, don't play it. Sing it.
Hooray for Captain Spalding
The African explorer
Did someone call me schnorrer?
- Hooray! Hooray! Hooray!
- Hooray! Hooray! Hooray!
How do you think it's going, Bert?
Pretty good so far.
- Walk around. See what they're saying.
- Okay.
- Wonderful first act, Mr. Ruby.
- Thank you.
Oh, hello. Hello there.
You don't remember me, do you?
Sure. You...
- The understudy in The Ramblers.
- That's right.
Last time we met, you were on your way to Hollywood.
How did you make out? All right?
- Pretty well.
- All right. Good.
Bert and I are thinking about going out...
Bert, you remember Miss...
- How do you do?
- Yes. How are you, Mr. Kalmar?
They're figuring on making a movie out of The Ramblers.
That's wonderful.
You must look me up.
We sure will.
- They're taking our picture.
- Yes.
One more, please.
Thank you.
The show must be okay, they're taking our picture.
- Well, good night.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Good night.
What do you mean, taking our picture?
- I don't suppose you know who that is.
- Don't you remember her?
She was the understudy in The Ramblers. Nice kid.
- You ought to see more movies.
- Why?
Come here, son.
See that sign?
There's your understudy.
She's a movie star?
Oh, she must think I'm crazy.
Wait a minute.
Now, how could anyone possibly think you're crazy?
Oh, come on.
I love you so much
I can't conceal it
I love you so much
It's a wonder you don't feel it
Yeah, it's all right. It's all right.
- You got any other tunes?
- Let me see.
I got something that'll fit.
Of course, you have to take off one word to make it "I love you so."
Let's hear it.
I love you so
I can't conceal it
It's a wonder that you don't feel it
I love...
Harry, cut it out, will you? For the last time,
I'm telling you, lay off that tune.
What's the matter with it?
He's been trying to sell it to me once a week since we met.
I can't help it, Bert.
I can't think of a title.
How can anybody ever think of a title for that thing?
- Oh, that's a nice title.
- What else can you say?
- Play that other thing.
- You don't like it.
I love it, I'm crazy about it.
Play it, will you?
Who do you think's gonna be in our picture?
- Who?
- That understudy.
I love you so much
I can't conceal it
I love you so much
It's a wonder you don't feel it
I love you so much
My eyes reveal it
I love you so much
It's a wonder you don't feel it
I've decided that I am through
With all this rambling about
I don't know what I'd ever do
Without you
I'm telling you
I love you so much
I can't conceal it
I love you so much
It's a wonder you don't feel it
- We love you so much
- I don't believe it
We can't conceal it
We love you so much
It's a wonder you don't feel it
- We love you so much
- I can't believe it
Our eyes reveal it
We love you so much
It's a wonder you don't feel it
Now, I've decided that I am through
With all this rambling about
We don't know what we'd ever do
Without you
You're telling me
We love you so much
- I can't believe it
- We can't conceal it
We love you so much
It's a wonder you don't feel it
- Because you love me so
- Because we love you so
Cut! Get a lily.
Print three and four.
- That was very nice, Eileen.
- Thank you.
- Sounded swell, Eileen.
- Thanks.
Don't you ever get tired of watching this?
Not the way you do it.
You should've been the star in the Broadway version.
- Oh, I don't know.
- Yes.
- You really think so?
- Sure. She'd have been great.
Why don't you go out and get a cup of coffee?
- Who wants coffee?
- Coffee's good for you sometimes.
My crazy friend Kendall The Great.
I mean it. How did we happen to pass you by?
- Well, it's a long story.
- I'm interested.
He's interested.
Well, I tried out for the part.
It was practically all set.
And a fellow brought in another girl.
A very pretty girl.
- He was a songwriter.
- Named Snooky?
- That's right.
- Snooky?
Whoever heard of a songwriter named...
Snoo... Me?
Oh, you mean that girl l...
You're a magician.
Make me disappear.
I can't forget
The night we met
- It looks lovely, Lennie.
- Thank you.
I'll let you know when to light it and bring it in.
The moon lit up the sky
And love lit up your eye
I kissed you once
I kissed you twice
And I held you gently
That night upon
The shores of Araby
- All right, so I wrote a lyric once.
- Oh, no, you didn't.
"My Sunny Tennessee" was a great song.
This is a very happy, happy anniversary.
Happy days.
- Get our boy here.
- I'm celebrating with my friends.
You know, this is the third time in my life I've had more than one drink.
- Very interesting.
- Yes, it is. Come here, Charlie.
Very interesting.
- I didn't say anything wrong.
- No, you said nothing at all.
Well, it's a great privilege to be with you boys tonight.
And I mean that.
- And I can say it in this room.
- It's a nice room.
You fellows have written lots of songs together.
But more than that, you've been friends.
That's the most important thing in the world, are friends.
- Shall I put some bicarbonate in this?
- It wouldn't hurt.
You know, you've got a friend, and you've got a friend.
And that's what I'd like to see.
Friends.
Very funny.
We'll spot it in our next picture.
- Here.
- Hey, look at that, huh?
Here, drink this.
Hey, I was just thinking.
The time Harry called Tony Miller.
You said, "Mr. Miller, if you back that play...
...you're gonna be the brokest broker that ever stepped on Broadway."
- Remember?
- Yeah.
What play was that?
Your play. You wrote it.
And your friend got you out of it.
And we went up to see him.
And when we told you...
...I will never forget the expression on your face...
...as long as I live.
Believe me, I'll never forget it.
Oh, hey, Bert, that was a long time ago.
I think I better get some coffee.
Charlie's got the talkers.
Just kidding, huh?
No, I always meant to tell you about it, Bert...
...but I just never got around to it.
I can understand that.
What was on your mind, Harry, when you crabbed that deal for me?
- What do you think?
- I'm asking.
Well, I didn't want you to flop.
That play wasn't too good, Bert.
You decided that.
Oh, why not? You're an expert.
Now, wait a minute. You're not gonna pull a peeve after all these years.
- What do you expect me to do?
- All right, I was wrong.
I just didn't want you to get hurt.
That's very touching.
Well, why else would I do it?
Whatever the reason, you had a sweet nerve.
What do you mean,
"whatever the reason"?
All I know is I wanted something very much.
And now I find out my partner did me out of it.
Well, I told you why, I was worried.
About me or yourself?
Oh, sure. Now I get it.
You think I didn't want you to have that play.
I was scared the play might click and bust up our partnership...
...and I couldn't lean on you anymore.
Is that what you meant?
If I believed that,
I couldn't be any sorer than I am now.
But you do believe it.
You must think I needed you pretty badly.
You must have thought so.
Not that badly.
Look, I'm not forgetting anything.
I know what I was when I ran into you:
A song-plugger.
But even without you,
I might have gotten somewhere.
It's just possible.
All by myself.
It's not too late to try.
Harry. Bert. Come on, it's time to cut the cake.
Come on. Everybody's waiting.
Harry. Bert.
- Come on.
- Make a wish.
- Make a wish.
- Make a wish, come on.
Hello, hello. Bert? Marty.
Say, some of the boys down here got ahold of a screwy item...
...for tomorrow's issue. Listen:
"Kalmar and Ruby split.
Songwriting team are calling it quits after a long and successful partnership.
Understood Kalmar will devote his time to stories and screenplay writing."
Say, will you tell the boys they're crazy?
Okay, Bert.
Sorry.
Print it.
Nice tune.
- Have you got any lyrics for it?
- No.
No words.
Ever hear from Bert?
No. He's writing those scripts.
Doing real well, they tell me.
You know,
Bert's really a smart fella.
Oh, that's nice too.
That's one of the nicest melodies you've ever written, Harry.
It's always been my favorite.
It seems
You just tiptoe
Into all my dreams
So I
Think of no other one
Ever since I've begun
Thinking of you
It's different from the rest.
You must've been very much in love when you wrote this one.
Well...
You wanna know something?
I think I wrote it too soon.
- Morning.
- Morning, Jess.
- Been working all night?
- Most of it.
There's a review of your picture in here.
- Oh, what did they say?
- You're a big man this morning.
"The story by Bert Kalmar is thoroughly enjoyable.
The dialogue neat and deftly turned."
- How's that?
- Let me see it. I love good notices.
Hey, did you see this?
They flew to Yuma last night.
She's a very nice girl, Bert.
Yeah.
Well, we didn't have to wire
Al Schacht this time, did we?
You didn't eat a thing.
I wasn't hungry.
- Just tired, huh?
- Oh, a little bit.
You are my lucky star
I saw you from afar
And so, ladies and gentlemen...
...we bring to a close another issue of The Songwriters' Parade.
Tonight's honored guests were
Arthur Freed and Nacio Herb Brown.
We'll be back again next week
to pay tribute once again...
... to the men
who write America's songs.
At that time we'll be happy to present
as our guests...
... Bert Kalmar and Harry Ruby.
Is that Phil Regan out of his mind or something?
I don't know.
Whoever told him to announce a thing like that?
A personal appearance.
- There's nothing so terrible about it.
- Nothing so terrible?
A radio show with two people who don't talk to each other?
- I wanna get that Regan on the phone.
- No. You can't do that.
- Why not?
- Because...
If Phil Regan was nice enough to think of you...
...the least you can do is to be there.
I'll take that.
He ought to know better...
...than to announce a thing like that without checking first.
What kind of a business is this?
- Kalmar and Ruby, he said.
- Hello?
- Kalmar and Ruby.
- Oh, hello, Eileen.
Like we were brothers or something.
- Well, I don't know.
- That doesn't mean I have to go.
- He ought to stop thinking...
- How's it going at your house?
- Well, hold on.
- This will be a great show. Great.
How can they do a thing like this?
I didn't okay it.
Tell him to get another voice because I'm not gonna be there.
Bert won't be there either.
What do they expect me to do...
...play the piano while Bert makes a microphone disappear?
It's a little early to tell yet, Jessie.
I know what you mean.
Keep your fingers crossed.
Who told them to do it?
Who put them up to it?
- lf they ever find out that we did this...
- What kind of routine are we supposed to do?
An argument for the benefit of our audience?
Look, Eileen, I'll call you back later.
We're on the air, boys, shake hands.
Come out fighting.
Oh, come on, Harry.
Ah, this whole thing's silly.
I don't like it, Eileen.
Oh, I know.
In a way it is embarrassing.
But after all, Regan was nice enough to think of you.
The very least you can do is be there.
- Eileen, Harry!
- Jessie, how are you?
How are you, Eileen?
You look wonderful. I'll take your hat.
- Hello, Bert.
- Hello, Eileen.
- Hi.
- Hi.
- Pull up a stool.
- Oh, thanks.
Well, it looks like we're stuck with this thing.
I guess so.
Got any ideas what we might do?
I found one of the old routines.
It might be okay.
That thing we did at the Friars, remember?
Sure.
Oh, sure. Sure. This is okay.
Want to rehearse?
Oh, I know the music.
You know the words?
Yeah, I know the words.
Well, I guess we don't have to rehearse.
I guess not.
Well, I'll see you tomorrow night,
I guess.
I guess so.
Oh, say...
I caught your picture the other night.
Nice job.
It's all right, I guess.
I hear you've been knocking out good tunes lately.
Oh, I've been kicking it around a little.
You got anything?
Sure. Sure, I've got one little tune
I've been working on.
Of course, you won't like it.
- What won't I like?
- What I got.
- I haven't heard it yet.
- Okay.
- Sounds vaguely familiar.
- Well, I told you you wouldn't like it.
I never said that. It's a nice tune, a very nice tune.
You never got a title for it, huh?
No, in fact, never did.
There was "La-Da-Dee-Da" and "Beep-Beep-A-Deep."
That's about all we got.
Let's see. We ought to get something for a tune like that.
Play that first part, will you?
Oh me, oh my
No. That's no good.
You know, that's not a bad tune.
- I could've been wrong about it.
- Well, you usually weren't.
Well, let me see.
I love you so
No, that's that thing we had before.
We'll get it. We'll get something.
Yeah, we'll get it.
Do you want to work on it?
We could knock it off this afternoon.
- Okay. Let's knock it off.
- All right.
I can't this afternoon. I just remembered there's a double-header at Wrigley Field.
It's not that I wanna go.
You see, I promised a fella...
- I see. Baseball is more important.
- No. No, I'll work with you tonight.
All night if you want to.
All right, if you want to.
No, wait a minute, I can't.
I've got a meeting tonight.
The magician's club.
The magician's club?
- Yeah.
- You've gotta do tricks, huh?
- No, I don't gotta do tricks.
- Yeah, you gotta make rabbits disappear.
No, I don't have to make rabbits disappear. I'm the president.
- Well, hooray!
- Yeah, hooray.
You should talk.
The nation's number one baseball fan.
- "Take him out. Take him out."
- Now it's my fault.
- I was willing to work.
- You don't want to work.
- You never wanted to work.
- What do you mean?
Every time I wanna do something, you're catching flies.
- Don't talk about me.
- I'll talk about you.
What about you, that sleight-of-hand stuff?
That dangling ropes in the air, pulling cigars out of your ears?
- Yeah?
- That's important for kids.
- For kids?
- Yeah, for kids!
I better get him out of here.
This is what I've been waiting for.
Come, sit down.
Keep your voice down.
I didn't wanna work, he says.
What about you?
I wouldn't write that song if you begged me.
- Begged you? I didn't even ask you.
- I guess you just can't help it, Harry.
I feel sorry for you.
You feel sorry for me?
You must think I'm just...
I can tell you what I think of you in three little words:
You're a dope!
"You're a dope."
Bert called me three little words, "You're a dope."
You are a dope
Three little words
Three little words
It fits. Hey, Bert! Bert!
This is my house.
Why should I walk out?
- You got it, Bert, the title of the song.
- What?
"Three Little Words." You got it.
You better hurry.
You might miss the baseball game.
Oh, anytime you're ready to go,
Eileen. I'm ready.
- Bye, Jessie.
- Bye, Harry.
- Bye, Eileen.
- Bye, Jessie.
Good evening. We're here tonight to pay tribute to two great pals of mine.
I know they've turned out many, many hits together.
I'm sure you've whistled their tunes and danced to their tunes...
...but I know you're gonna get a big kick out of meeting them in person tonight.
None other than Bert Kalmar and...
And Harry Ruby.
- Hello, Harry. Bert, how are you?
- How are you, Phil?
Here they are, ladies and gentlemen, going to sing a medley of their hit tunes.
I wanna be in Tennessee
In my Dixie paradise
An angel's voice I hear
I mean my mammy dear
And then we wrote...
- Who's sorry now?
- Who's sorry now?
- Who's sorry now?
- Who's sorry?
- I tried to warn you somehow
- I tried to warn you somehow
And then came...
I wanna be loved by you
Just you and nobody else but you
I wanna be loved by you alone
And then we sat down and wrote...
Why is it I spend the day
Wake up and end the day
Thinking of you?
And then we stood up and wrote...
So long, Oo-long
How long you going to roam?
Please don't be too long
Oo-long, so long
Hurry back home
Maybe I'm right
And maybe I'm wrong
And maybe I'm weak
And maybe I'm strong
But nevertheless
I'm in love with you
Maybe I'll win
And maybe I'll...
Oh, that's enough of that.
How would you like to hear a brand-new song?
One we just wrote yesterday.
Well, not exactly yesterday.
As a matter of fact, it took us about 10 years.
Phil, if you please?
Three little words
Oh, what I'd give for
That wonderful phrase
To hear those
Three little words
That's all I'd live for
The rest of my days
And what I feel in my heart
They tell sincerely
No other words
Can tell it half so clearly
Three little words
Eight little letters
Which simply mean
I love you
Wonderful, Bert, wonderful.
Thank you, Harry. Wonderful. Very good.
And now, we'll leave you with three little words: let's all dance.
Three little words
Oh, what I'd give for
That wonderful phrase
To hear those
Three little words
- Sorry.
- Darling.
- It was just wonderful.
- Bert, it was wonderful.
Harry, I always knew that was a great tune.
No other words
Can tell it half so clearly
Three little words
Eight little letters
Which simply mean
I love you
[ENGLISH]
% % [Orchestra]
[Man Narrating] The annual ball of the newspapermen of New York... is always a colorful and glamorous event.
Tonight's is no exception to that rule.
% % [Piano]
% % [Fanfare]
And now, ladies and gentlemen, the highlight of the evening.
For those of us in show business or newspapers... or who are just plain, ordinary music listeners... this is an occasion of special significance and pride.
For among those who are being honored here tonight... is a very wonderful singer and a very great lady... who has been named the most courageous entertainer of the year.
Ladies and gentlemen,
Miss Jane Froman.
% % [Orchestra]
% % [Piano]
[Jane]
% With a song in my heart%
% I behold%
% Your adorable face%
% Just as strong at the start%
[Man Narrating]
Jane Froman... radio, musical comedy... the movies, nightclubs... a lot of the stuff of which dreams are made.
But why the most courageous entertainer of the year?
Well, let's see.
Suppose we start here... at a radio station in Cincinnati... on a bright summer's morning a few years back... when suddenly there exploded from a taxicab... the figure of a young lady.
Then, as always, in a terrible hurry.
Oh! Oh, I'm so sorry.
Please forgive me.
- L... I just wasn't looking.
- Hmm.
- Forgive me, please.
- It's all right.
% % [Men Singing, Faint]
% And we're having trouble%
% Sure as you're born%
% Trying to find someone%
% To hoe that corn%
% Hoe that corn
'cause it's gotta grow%
% Can't you see that the liquor's low%
% Gotta have a jug to make us go%
% Who'll hoe that corn%
% Rube took Fanny to the fair today%
% They rode in on a load of hay%
% Don't expect 'em back till the end of May%
- % Who'll hoe that corn%
- % Zeb had 10 daughters but no son%
% Got 'em all married one by one%
% 'Cause he's pretty handy with that old shotgun%
% Who we got to hoe that corn%
% Little Elsie's just turned 10%
% Kinda peculiar
Don't like men%
% Keeps pretendin' she's a hen%
- % Who'll hoe that corn%
- [Blowing]
% Hoe, hoe that corn%
% Hoe, hoe, hoe hoe that corn%
% Hoe, hoe that corn%
% Everybody's gotta hoe that corn%
- [Blowing]
- % Who'll hoe that corn, a rippy-tippy%
- % Who'll hoe that corn%
- % Hot city papa, won't you play that jazz%
% Who'll hoe that%
% Corn% %
Okay, boys, write your names out and leave 'em with my secretary.
If anything comes up, she'll let you know.
- Wait a minute. Did you like it or didn't you?
- Very nice.
Then how 'bout giving us an answer now?
After all, we're pretty busy too.
Really? Where are you working?
We just finished eight weeks at the Palmer House in Chicago.
Before that, London, New York.
You name the spot, we were there.
Sorry, boys.
Looks like you're out of our class.
I don't think you'd be interested in anything we'd have to offer.
Besides, this is radio, you know, not vaudeville.
- [Door Closes]
- What a jerk.
Sure, he's a jerk.
They all are.
But that don't mean you gotta divulge the secret.
Besides, did it ever occur to you that maybe we weren't so hot either?
- Listen, Harry...
- This song of yours, it ain't no Berlin, brother.
Anytime you're not happy with the way things are going, do me a favor.
- Just say so.
- Nobody said anything about not being happy.
But a guy's got a right to wonder where all this is gettin' us.
By "all this," you wouldn't mean me and my big mouth, would you?
That sure don't help any.
In that case, maybe we'd be doing each other a favor if we just called it quits.
Well, I'm not suggesting it, but it's an idea.
Then consider it done.
Okay, pal.
See ya around.
Excuse me.
Are they through in there?
Utterly and emphatically!
Thank you.
Good morning.
I'm Jane Froman.
I'm sorry I'm late for my audition, but there was a terrible traffic jam.
Paul Whiteman spoke to you about me, remember?
- Paul Whiteman?
- Yes. I have his card here somewhere.
He heard me sing at the conservatory.
You're studying at the conservatory?
Yes, I'm in my second year studying voice harmony and theory. Here it is.
He wrote something on the back.
Mmm. Pops apparently thinks you're pretty good.
I dictated it, but he wrote it.
He did ask me to go with his band.
But I told him I didn't want to be known only as a band singer.
I'd rather be on the air.
You can understand that, can't you?
Oh, perfectly.
And what experience have you had?
Well, I've sung once with the Cincinnati Symphony.
And last month
I sang at one of Mrs. Taft's teas.
Mrs. Robert Taft's teas?
Mm-hmm. Before that, I had a week's engagement at the Grand Central Theater in St. Louis.
I was billed as the "Blues Singing Coed from Missouri U."
You don't say.
Well, you've had quite a career.
- What do you want to sing now?
- I brought several things along with me.
Let's see.
Do you know this one?
Well, I think I can handle it in my own humble way.
- % % [Picks Up Tempo]
- % I saw you last night%
% And got that old feeling%
% When you came inside%
% I got that old feeling%
- % The moment you... %
- Pardon me.
Pardon me.
May I ask what all this is about?
I understood you were looking for a hot singer.
May I give you some advice, Miss Froman?
- Well, certainly, if it's good advice.
- Okay.
You're a very nice-looking young lady.
I thoroughly approve of both your face and contour.
For all I know, you may even have a good voice.
- Shall I go on?
- Please do.
All right, then listen.
Having a good voice is a big help.
Let's call that God's contribution.
But in show business, you've got to have a lot more than just a pair of pipes.
You've got to know how to walk, how to smile, how to take a bow.
But most of all, what to do with your hands.
Look, you're singing a song, not waving to a bunch of immigrants at Ellis Island.
I'm sorry.
May I try it again?
Only if you'll sing it right... and not the way you think somebody else might like it, okay?
Okay.
From the heart.
% I saw you last night%
% And got that old feeling%
% When you came in sight%
% I got that old feeling%
% The moment you danced by%
% I felt a thrill%
% And when you caught my eye%
% My heart stood still%
% Once again I seemed to feel%
% That old yearning%
% And I knew... %
Come in. This is Miss Froman, one of Paul Whiteman's protgs.
- She mistook me for you. So I'm auditioning her.
- So I see.
- You're not the director?
- Uh-uh, he is.
- Show him your card.
- That won't be necessary. I'm on my way to lunch.
It'll only take a minute.
Read it.
Read what it says on the other side.
Hmm, but your appointment was for 11:00.
Some other time, perhaps.
Why not now?
I'll play for her.
Get over there.
Go on, where you can see her.
This you gotta hear.
Remember what I told you.
% % [Piano]
% I saw you last night%
% And got that old feeling%
% When you came in sight%
% I got that old feeling%
- % The moment... %
- No, no, no. That's not it at all.
- We're looking for a hot singer. One with a lot of...
- Verve?
- Exactly.
- How's this for tempo?
The Ellis Island version.
% % [Piano, Up-tempo]
% I saw you last night%
% And got that old feeling%
% When you came in sight%
% I got that old feeling%
% The moment that you danced by%
% You gave me that silly old, chilly old thrill%
% And when you caught my eye%
% My heart stood still%
% Once again I seemed to feel... %
Yeah, yeah, that's more like it.
I think we can find a spot for you.
Doing commercials.
Ten dollars a program.
- Ten dollars?
- Later, maybe we can take you on as a staff artist.
What does being a staff artist mean?
It means they can use you on as many shows as they like day or night, and will.
- If you don't want it, just say so. Yes or no?
- But I do want it very much.
Very well. Be in my office tomorrow at 10:00.
- We'll start you out on Jim's Toasty Peanuts.
- Oh, brother.
By the way, I seem to have forgotten your name... but this piano is for studio use only.
Our studio, not yours.
In the future, please remember that.
- Yes, sir.
- Good-bye, Miss Froman.
Good-bye.
- [Door Closes]
- And they wonder what's wrong with radio.
Joe Jerk. He doesn't know a good voice when he hears it.
- Do you?
- I know you've got a voice.
- Incidentally, my name's Ross. Don Ross.
- How do you do, Mr. Ross?
- I hope you're not sore at me.
- Why should I be?
Well, after all, I almost lost your job for you, didn't I?
Yes. But then, of course, you're right, he's wrong.
- How's that again, ma'am?
- Mr. Ross, give me credit for having a little sense.
Besides, now that
I've got the job, I'll do it my way.
Excuse me. Your way.
May I ask you just one more question, Miss Froman?
- As many as you'd like.
- Just one. How'd you like some lunch?
- Frankly, I'd love it.
- Okay, come on.
I'll buy you a peanut butter sandwich.
I might even make it Jims Toasty kind.
- After all, you gotta plug the product.
- [Laughs]
[Chimes]
- % Oh, nibble a bite, nibble a bite%
- % Jim's Toasty Peanuts%
- % Nickel a bag, nickel a bag%
- % Jim's Toasty Peanuts%
% Crispy, crunchy, toasty munchy, tasty and nutritious%
% Jim's ever-loving Toasty Peanuts%
% Delicious% %
[Don Narrating]
Staff artist. Yep, she was on her way.
She got the plugs in the morning and the songs at night.
% I'm through with love%
% I'll never fall again%
% Said adieu to love%
% Don't ever call again%
% For I must have you%
% Or no one%
% And so I'm through with love% %
[Don Narrating] Within a matter of months, the name of Jane Froman... was a feature on the major networks.
The first outside offer that made any sense... came from one of those great big movie palaces... on State Street with 3,000 seats... just itching to be filled each week.
I gave her arm a little twist, and she took it.
Got top billing too... right up there with the latest hit from Hollywood.
Incidentally, if you'll forgive me for pointing...
I was also on the bill that week... and strictly not by coincidence.
Leave us not emphasize that point however.
This was Jane's big chance.
% % [Drumroll]
% Hallelujah%
% Hallelujah%
% All you sinners%
% Gather round%
% Hallelujah%
% Hallelujah%
% All you sinners%
% I have found%
% A land where the weary forever are free%
% Come you sinners and just%
% Follow me%
% Forget your troubles and just get happy%
% You want to shoo all your blues away%
% Shout hallelujah
Come on, get happy%
% Get ready for the Judgment Day%
% The sun is shinin'
Come on, get happy%
% The Lord is waitin' to take your hand%
% Shout hallelujah
Come on, get happy%
% We're goin' to the promised land%
% We're headin' for the river%
% Wash your sins 'way in the tide%
% It's all so peaceful%
% On the other side%
% Forget your troubles and just get happy%
% You want to shoo all your blues away%
% Shout hallelujah
Come on, get happy%
% Climb higher%
% And higher%
% You gotta keep away from Satan%
% And his fire%
% We're headin'%
% For the river%
% Wash your sins 'way%
% In the tide%
% It's all so peaceful%
% On the other side%
% Forget your troubles and just get happy%
% You want to shoo all your blues away%
% Shout hallelujah
Come on, get happy%
% Get ready%
% For the Judgment Day% %
[Applause]
- Great, baby. Great.
- Don, just before I went on... the manager sent word they want to hold me for another week, maybe longer.
- Yeah, how much?
- Same as this week,
I suppose. Isn't that wonderful?
Sure, bighearted him.
[Applause Continues]
% % [Orchestra]
- All right, Miss Froman, if I could see you now.
- Certainly. I'll be right back.
- Hey, wait a minute. I'm in on this.
- In what way?
- I'm her manager.
- Since when?
Well, now, you know,
I never could remember dates.
She didn't say anything to me about a manager.
I'll bet she didn't say anything to you about a birthmark either, but she's got one.
- Right, Jane?
- Right.
Okay, let's go.
Okay, Ross, you win.
- A thousand a week, but on one condition.
- For you, anything.
That you get out of this theater, and stay out.
You're canceled as of now.
Is that clear?
For 750 a week,
I'd have argued.
At a thousand bucks, your slightest wish is law.
Here, honey, you have to sign too.
- Good night.
- Good night, Herman.
Don, you were fantastic.
A thousand a week, it's a fortune.
Now I can even pay the installments on this coat.
Did you see that baby's face?
I thought he was gonna explode.
Which, come to think of it, might have been quite an interesting sight.
- I feel terrible about you losing your job.
- What job?
A stooge on a bill with a dog act and a bunch of dumb acrobats.
Which reminds me, where would you like to eat?
Don't ask me.
I'm a stranger in town.
But I'm feeling mighty rich.
- Let's go somewhere we can't afford.
- Spoken like a leading lady.
Taxi. Taxi!
Of course, if you'd take my advice and get married... you wouldn't have to worry about where you're gonna eat.
We could just go home and eat.
- Please, let's not go into that again, not tonight.
- I'm sorry. I forgot.
- When you were five, your father tipped his hat and rolled away...
- Don, it's nothing to joke about.
Taxi. Taxi!
So one marriage goes on the rocks.
Does that mean they all have to?
- I've seen too much of the other side of it.
- Okay, okay.
Consider it unsaid, like a letter that didn't get sent.
But I can't forget it either. You've been so wonderful to me, all your help...
Tell you what you do. Send me a Christmas card signed "Gratefully yours."
Hey, taxi. Taxi!
You're so rich you can't even get a taxicab.
Come on. Let's walk up an appetite.
[Don Narrating]
She had Chicago eating right out of her hand.
But if you're in show business, there's only one town.
New York, they call it.
Baghdad-on-the-Hudson.
% % [Orchestra]
Good evening, ladies and gentlemen.
This is Tony Morello and his orchestra... coming to you from Radio City in New York.
Tonight we have a very special treat in store for you in the person... of a glamorous newcomer you've been reading about.
Now making her first radio appearance in New York City...
Miss Jane Froman!
[Applause]
% Blue moon%
% You saw me standing alone%
% Without a dream in my heart%
% Without a love of my own%
% Blue moon%
% You knew just what I%
% Was there for%
% You heard me saying a prayer for%
% Someone I really could care for%
% And then there suddenly appeared%
% Before me%
% The only one my arms%
% Will ever hold%
% I heard somebody whisper%
% Please adore me%
% And when I looked%
% The moon had turned to gold%
[Backup Singers]
% The magical moon%
% Blue moon%
% Now I'm no longer alone%
% Without a dream in my heart%
% Without a love of my own%
% And then there suddenly appeared%
% Before me%
% The only one my arms will ever%
% Hold%
% I heard somebody whisper%
% Please adore me%
% And when I looked%
% The moon had turned to gold%
- % Blue moon%
- % Blue moon Blue moon%
% Now I'm no longer alone%
% Now I'm no longer alone%
% Without a dream in my heart%
% Without a dream in my heart%
% Without a love%
% Of my own%
[Backup Singers]
% Blue moon% %
[Applause]
[Don Narrating] From that very first show, she was "in'"...a click.
In the words of the, shall we say, more conservative critics...
"a zooming wow, '"
"a hot canary, '" "the tops. '"
Offers poured in from everywhere... from big-name movie houses... top air shows like
Palmolive, Coca-Cola, Buick.
You didn't need a crystal ball to tell where all this was leading... right straight to her selection as the number one girl singer on the air.
Meanwhile, what about me?
Well, I'll bite. What about me?
Oh, I managed a few jobs here and there.
Hittin' the Follies in which Jane was a star.
The Pontiac program.
A trip to Hollywood for a movie test.
In fact, I was just back from that.
But my real job... my 24-hour-a-day job... was increasingly Jane.
[Jane]
Yes? Who is it?
[Raspy Voice] Lady, I'm workin' my way through barber college. I just wondered...
Don! I thought you were still in California.
- We all make mistakes. How are you, baby?
- I am fine. Come on in.
- Miss me?
- Like a front tooth.
- You don't show it.
- You dog. Just because I've put on four pounds.
- Where?
- Where do you think?
I played 18 holes of golf yesterday and rehearsed four hours trying to get it off.
What about you?
What about the picture?
If those birds think I'm gonna stay in Hollywood just to play a stooge for Victor Mature...
- Eighteen holes, huh? What'd you shoot?
- Never mind that.
I was so in hopes this would be the break you'd been waiting for.
You couldn't give me Hollywood.
Besides, if I'm out there, who's gonna run out and get you a jar of cold cream?
Suppose it wasn't as good a part as you'd hoped for.
It's not always the size of the part that matters.
Maybe if you'd talked to them, they'd have built it up.
Look, what's the use of kidding ourselves?
There wasn't any picture deal.
Just another wild-goose chase that some screwball agent dreamed up.
But who cares?
The Chief gives you a nice ride.
I slept like a Monday night audience both ways.
And now you.
What have you been up to, besides golf?
- Nothing of any interest.
- Is that so?
Then what's all this I read in Winchell's column about you and that Long Island polo player?
Oh, him? He's all right. He's fun.
Not a brain in his head.
Mm-hmm.
And all these flowers?
From some garden club, no doubt?
Or do you send them to yourself?
- Mind if I take a peek?
- I'm not sure I should let you.
But go right ahead.
Help yourself.
Who's this one?
Oh, just somebody who's down to his last million or two.
Tsk, tsk, tsk.
Reduced to that, eh?
So much for him.
Now, you were saying?
I wasn't saying anything.
But there was something you said about getting me a jar of cold cream when I need it.
Oh, that's just a way of talking.
Mind if I fix myself a drink?
Of course not.
I'll fix it for you. What'll it be?
- Scotch.
- And soda?
A little.
You know, it's true.
I have let you do things for me.
I'm the slave type.
I like doing them.
- Listen, you wanna know something?
- Mm-hmm.
I haven't got a polo pony to my name.
I haven't even got a million bucks.
- Imagine.
- But you know how I feel.
The question is, how do you feel?
All kidding aside, don't you think it's time we talked things over... got something settled?
I don't know what to say, Don.
You've been so wonderful to me.
You've taught me so much.
- But you're not in love with me, is that it?
- I didn't say that.
It's just that, well, I'm not sure.
You see,
I've never been in love before.
And you sort of expected someone to come along, like a knight on horseback?
I suppose every girl looks forward to a little fireworks.
You haven't been reading
True Confessions, have you?
It's possible.
It's also possible that
I'm in love with you.
Okay. That's good enough for me.
Let's say you are.
How about dropping down to city hall with me some morning?
They tell me there's been quite a run on marriages lately.
Maybe it's the war fever.
People hedging against the future.
Anyway, something's doing it.
- Do you really want me to do that, Don?
- Of course I do.
What do you think
I've been driving at all these months?
I've asked you so many times,
I'm beginning to sound like a roundelay.
Suppose I put it another way, for a change.
I'm a poor little sheep who's lost his way.
And you, baby, you're big business.
I need you.
You need me.
The perfect setup for matrimonial bliss.
Also, think how economical it would be if we ever went on tour.
Two for the price of one.
You're not still stewing about your mother and what happened to her marriage?
No, it's not that. It's...
It's just that
I want to be sure.
Maybe this is a silly thing to say, but I want a home, Don... a real home.
What do you call this... a shanty in old shantytown?
- I don't mean just a house.
- Look.
If it'll relieve your mind,
I give you my word... that as cook, dishwasher, lover boy,
I'll be strictly Phi Beta Kappa.
What more could you wish for than that?
I can't think of a single thing, Mr. Ross.
Then the answer is... yes?
[Don Narrating] I wouldn't say it was the most elaborate ceremony of the year... but as weddings go, it was all you could ask for...
- words, music...
- % % [Organ Hits Wrong Note]
Did I say "music'"?
Witnesses, kisses, even a shower of rice.
Yep, we were married and lived happily ever...
Well, at least we were married.
The orange blossoms came later when we drove out to California for our honeymoon.
But even that ended up on a movie stage... with Jane the star, and me... well, I could still play piano.
% % [Piano, Up-tempo]
% I'm the toast of the town%
% In my Paris gown%
% A little naughty but nice%
% If I seem rather gay%
% Little girls, they say%
% Are made of sugar%
% And spice%
% I'm the type that good time Charlies%
% And stage door Johnnies pursue%
% I'm the toast of the town%
% But I hope to settle down%
% With someone%
% Maybe you%
% If you're after love and laughter while you're young and free%
- % Come along with me%
- % With her%
- % Come along and see%
- % Yes, sir%
% Delmonico's, jolly shows fancy clothes, belles and beaus%
% Broke or millionaires%
% Who cares%
% On the gay white way%
% Invite your girlie to the gay white way%
% It's always early for the lights are glowing%
% Wine is flowing%
% They do a lot of Romeoing%
% On the gay white way%
% It's so exciting that the night turns to day%
% And every little miss likes a little mischief%
[Men]
% On the gay, gay, gay, gay, gay white way%
% It's so exciting that the night turns to day%
% And every little miss wants a little bliss%
% Needs a little kiss
Loves a little mischief%
% On the gay%
% White%
% Way% %
% % [Jane Singing Over Record]
[Don Narrating]
After Hollywood, it was New York again.
And for the next few years, more records, more air shows, more nightclubs.
All bigger and better than ever.
As she continued to skyrocket to fame...
I went on beating my brains out... trying to write what is called, for want of a better word, "music. '"
% % [Piano]
% % [Discordant Notes]
Don, why did you do that?
Oh, you're back.
Because it's no good, that's why.
Oh, you're crazy. It is good. It's wonderful.
I told you that when you first started it.
Listen, don't kid me. I'm the guy that wrote it, and I tell you it's no good.
- It'll never be any good!
- Now, don't be silly.
Come back here and play it.
Will you stop trying to give me that old build-up stuff.
And for heaven's sake, stop feeling sorry for me.
Nobody's feeling sorry for you. I'm just trying to get you to stop feeling sorry for yourself.
Now, come on. Stop acting like a two-year-old and play it.
Why is it you can sell me, sell everybody, but not yourself?
If you want to hear it, okay, but no riddles, please.
- Play it.
- % % [Piano]
% There's only one kind of lovin'%
% One kind of kissin'%
% The right kind%
% The right kind%
% There's only one kind of lovin'%
% That I've been missin'%
% The right kind%
% I'm tired of too many guys%
% With casual eyes%
% I know their lines from "A" to "Z"%
% I want a man%
% Who is no also-ran%
% Baby, where can you be%
% There's only one kind of heaven%
% Breakfast at 7:00%
% The right kind%
% The right kind%
% There's only one kind of livin'%
% Worth all the givin'%
% The right kind%
% I got the word from my heart%
% I heard from my heart%
% And we both agree%
% There's only one kind of lovin'%
% The right kind of lovin'%
% Your kind of lovin' for me%
% Ooh%
% The right kind%
% Ooh%
% The right kind%
% I want a man%
% Who is no also-ran%
% Baby%
% Where can you be%
% Ooh%
% Baby%
% Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh%
% Love me%
% I'll find him somehow%
% But, baby%
% As of now%
% There's only one kind of lovin'%
% The right kind of lovin'%
% No other lovin' I can see%
% 'Cause your kind of lovin'%
% That's for me% %
- See, what did I tell you?
- You didn't tell me a thing I didn't already know.
- I told you it wasn't any good.
- But I thought it went wonderfully.
- You heard the applause.
- Sure, they applauded. But not my song... you.
Oh, for heaven sakes.
Of course they applauded your song.
You could sing a nursery rhyme and they'd applaud. Now I'm really cooked.
- But, Don...
- I can just hear 'em now.
"What's Froman trying to do, make a songwriter out of her husband?
Can't he find anybody else to sing his tripe?"
I'm sorry.
I was only trying to help.
Sure, you were trying to help, but don't you see what you're really doing is killing me.
[Knocking]
- Yes? Thank you.
- Thank you, Joe.
Yes, Miss Froman.
Look, Don. If you really feel that way about it... why don't you stop trying to write songs?
Try something else for a while.
Nobody could write anything good feeling the way you do.
I thought it would get around to that.
Maybe I should get out of show business.
- I didn't mean that. You know I didn't.
- Okay, what did you mean?
You should stop worrying about me and what I do for a while and think about your own career.
What career... vaudeville that doesn't exist anymore?
There are plenty of jobs a man with your experience can do.
I suppose you call managing you nothing.
Of course it's something.
It's terribly important.
- But if it's going to make you unhappy and jealous...
- Jealous?
Well, that's a new one.
You seem to have forgotten... that the first time I saw you you didn't even know how to take a bow.
But, brother, you learned that one fast enough.
What's the use? It always ends up in the same old argument.
As you say, what's the use?
Don.
I know it isn't easy for you.
It isn't easy for any man being married to a woman in the spotlight.
- Why don't I give it up?
- [Closes Door]
- Are you crazy?
- If it's going to spoil our marriage, it isn't worth it.
Not to me anyhow.
We don't need a lot of money and a big house.
Let's start all over again.
Concentrate on you for a change.
No, thanks. Nobody's gonna make that kind of a sacrifice for me. Good night.
- Where are you going?
- Out.
- Aren't you gonna take me home?
- Maybe, maybe not. Who can tell?
% % [Jane Singing Over Radio]
- Double bourbon.
- Yes, sir.
[Laughing]
Well, well.
- Hello, Harry.
- How are ya, boy?
- Sit down. You need a drink.
- You said it.
- Fill her up, Clarence.
- Yes, sir.
- Some voice, huh?
- The best.
Listen. Answer me just one question, will ya?
But first, I wanna get this outta the way.
I don't mind taking a sock on the nose... but I don't want anybody crowning me with one of these.
What I wanna know is...
Now I'm not saying you're not a good Joe and an eager beaver... but honestly now, romantically speaking... what did a dame like
Jane Froman ever see in you?
Lay off, will you?
You're drunk.
Sure I'm drunk.
Tomorrow I'm gonna hate myself.
But tonight I still want to know why a dame... that's on top of the world ever married a guy like you.
- Answer me that.
- Did it ever occur to you that she might be in love with me?
Well, now that you ask me, frankly, no.
- Beat it, will you?
- Oh, now...
- Beat it!
- No hard feelings, pal.
I just like to know these things.
Well, see ya around.
% % [Singing Continues]
- Fill it up.
- Okay, sir.
[Don Narrating]Jane and I patched that one up, of course. We always did.
But something had happened to us... to our marriage.
Things had been said that neither of us would ever forget.
And now it was Sunday. I'd had to go out of town for the weekend.
It was the maid's day off, and Jane was in the house alone.
With the temperature hovering just above zero... naturally, the furnace wasn't going to let an opportunity like that slip by.
It didn't.
[Man]... the Associated Press reports the attack began shortly after dawn, Honolulu time... and continued for approximately two hours.
A bulletin just handed to me says the president has called... a special cabinet meeting for 8:30 this evening... and is preparing a message to Congress... presumably asking for a formal declaration of war.
I should think so.
But to get back to the A.P. Dispatch... indications are that more than
40 Japanese bombers... with the red circle of the rising sun clearly visible on their wings... suddenly appeared escorted by swarms of fighters.
Flying high, they suddenly dive-bombed seeking to destroy our entire Pacific Fleet... including aircraft carriers anchored in Pearl Harbor.
[Man #2]
Although no actual figures have been released... it is believed that the damage to the Fleet has been very great... and that the loss of life is staggering.
Say, Don, where the devil is Froman?
She's on in 12 minutes.
- Relax, relax. She'll be here.
- Something must have happened.
She's never been late.
Nothing's happened.
She had to play a camp show over in Jersey.
Probably had trouble getting away. I had a motorcycle escort waiting for her. She'll be here.
- See, what'd I tell you?
- How much time have I got?
- If you hurry, you've got...
- I'll make it. I'm all ready except for my dress.
- The makeup's still good.
- Oh, what a life.
- How'd it go?
- Wonderful.
Only I made the mistake of doing that Claudette Colbert routine.
It Happened One Night. Where I lift my skirt and pretend I'm thumbing a ride.
Pretty low trick, but those gobs ate it up.
Art lovers to the last man, no doubt.
By the way, I got a present for you.
Two of' em, in fact.
- What?
- From a fan of yours in Syracuse.
She brought it herself.
All breathless and dewy-eyed.
Oh, pretty.
She said to be sure to wear it for luck.
That was very sweet of her.
Did you thank her?
With accompanying gestures all the way to the door.
Put it there for me by my bag, will you?
What's the other present?
- Here you are.
- Seasick pills?
Uh-huh. They called from U.S.O. Headquarters.
They want you to be ready to leave for London on 24-hours' notice.
They do? Lucky for me
I got my shots today.
[Man Narrating] It was at this precise moment that I entered the story.
Together with an old friend,
I'd fought my way into the Roxy.
No small feat of arms in those days.
To see and hear a girl who had long been my favorite singer.
It's still my contention that in no single engagement of the war... were there so many high-ranking stomachs... so many high-ranking toes directly in the line of fire.
- [Moans]
- Sorry, sir.
% % [Orchestra]
% % [Backup Singers Harmonizing]
[Jane]
% Where are you%
% Where are you%
% Night%
% And a million stars%
% Are falling%
% From another world%
% I hear you calling%
[Jane]
% Calling%
% Oh, I know that we meet every night%
% And we couldn't have changed since the last time%
% To my joy and delight%
% It's a new kind of love%
% At first sight%
% Though it's you and it's I all the time%
% Every meeting's a marvelous pastime%
[Both]
% You're increasingly sweet%
% So whenever we happen%
% To meet%
% I greet you%
% With a song in my heart%
% I behold your adorable face%
% Just a song at the start%
% But it soon is a hymn to your grace%
% When the music swells%
% I'm touching your hand%
% It tells me%
% You're standing near%
% And%
% At the sound of your voice%
% Heaven opens its portals to me%
% Can I help but rejoice%
% That a song such as ours came to be%
% But I always knew%
% I would live life through%
[Both]
% With a song in my heart%
% For%
% You%
% At the sound of your voice%
% At the sound of your voice%
% Heaven opens its portals to me%
% Can I help but rejoice%
% Can I help but rejoice%
% That a song such as ours came to be%
% But I always knew%
% I would live life through%
[Both]
% With a song in my heart%
% For%
% You% %
[Don Narrating] Twenty-four hours later, shots and aching muscles notwithstanding...
Jane was on a plane bound for London by way of Bermuda and Lisbon.
In addition to the 12 members of the crew... there were 27 passengers aboard.
Among them, seven entertainers from the U.S. O... a few businessmen, several diplomats who... believe it or not, looked like diplomats... and a brigadier general of the air force... an elderly flyer of at least 34.
Ladies and gentlemen, may I have your attention for a moment, please?
On behalf of Captain Donovan and the crew,
I want to welcome you aboard.
It's all right to unfasten your seat belts now.
If anyone's dying for a cigarette, go ahead.
- I say, what's the weather ahead?
- Very good, sir.
It's a little on the chilly side, but indications are it'll be good all the way.
Now, for the benefit of those of you who may be making your first transatlantic flight... or who may be worrying about the war... all I can say is this ship has made
240 crossings without being shot at once.
Captain Donovan has flown at least a hundred crossings himself.
By the way, my name is John Burn.
I'm fourth officer aboard, which means I'm third copilot.
If there's anything that I or the stewards can do to make your flight more comfortable... please sing out.
Incidentally, each of you has been assigned a seat.
We'll appreciate it if you occupy the same seat on all takeoffs and landings.
I've forgotten why, but the company prefers it that way.
Which leads me to this.
This is called a Mae West.
Delicacy prevents my saying why.
[Passengers Chuckling]
While an emergency is very unlikely... it's still my duty to acquaint you with our landing procedure just in case.
But to get back to Miss West.
I wonder if you'd mind assisting me in demonstrating it, Miss Froman?
- Will it be becoming?
- On ladies of your coloring, it's practically irresistible.
Now we just slip it on like grandpa's vest.
That's right.
Now for the straps.
See, we cross the bottom straps in front.
Here we are.
You circle the waist.
Bring 'em back around.
- Then we tie them, snuggly.
- [Gasps]
- Too tight?
- Just a little.
I'll loosen it.
There you are.
Now for the top straps.
Uh, maybe you'd better do that.
- Can you get 'em out?
- I think so. Here we are.
That's right.
Now, just a simple knot.
- Or if you have strong feelings about such things, a bow.
- I like a bow.
There you are.
Isn't that attractive?
They tell me at Bergdorf and Goodman they're chewing their nails off with envy.
It's very simple to inflate too.
You pull these small knobs at the base of the jacket.
- [Air Releasing]
- [Gasps]
- [Laughter]
- Now you see why the navy calls 'em Mae Wests.
Thank you, Miss Froman.
May I help you get out of it?
- I think I can manage.
- Thank you again.
And thank you, ladies and gentlemen.
The stewards will now pass among you with playing cards and coffee.
The coffee's excellent.
The cards are probably marked.
Thank you, and have a nice trip.
He makes it sound so exciting,
I can hardly wait to be shot down.
Don't even mention such a thing.
I've just had a new permanent.
% And the skies are not cloudy%
% All day%
% Home%
% Home on the range%
% Where the deer and... %
Excuse me, ladies and gentlemen.
I hate to break this up, General... but the next time I'm at the Met,
I'll be glad to put in a word for you.
- I'll settle for Minsky's.
- That I can arrange.
We're now approaching Lisbon. We'll land on the Tagus River in exactly three minutes.
So take your seats, please, fasten your seat belts, and no smoking. Thank you.
- Three minutes. Step on it.
- It'll take me that long to get my face on.
I hope we get a chance to see some of Lisbon. I heard it's a beautiful city.
Me too. I've never been here.
We're right on schedule.
- What time is it?
- 6:44, Lisbon time.
Oh, my goodness.
I'm in the wrong seat.
It doesn't matter.
I'll take yours.
But that nice young man, Mr. Burn, told us to occupy the same seat.
What possible difference can it make whether
Jane Froman sits there or Jennifer March?
- To them, we're just seat numbers anyhow.
- Yes, I guess you're right.
But I can't imagine what I was thinking of.
[No Audible Dialogue]
[No Audible Dialogue]
- [Explosion]
- [Screaming]
[Air Raid Siren Wailing]
[Speaking Portuguese]
[Sirens Wailing]
[Chattering]
[Man]
Nurse? Nurse?
[Latin]
Hey, nurse.
Will somebody stop this babble long enough to tell me what shape I'm in?
Do I need an aspirin or an operation?
Nurse? Nurse?
- How many have been brought in?
- [Portuguese]
I thought I heard somebody say 15.
Fifteen out of 39.
I want to know how many.
[Portuguese]
[People Chattering In Portuguese]
Could I have some water?
Water, somebody?
How do you say...
Water? Agua?
Doesn't anybody around here speak English?
Take it easy, kid. You'll get water when the doctor says so and not before.
- You're an American.
- And what's wrong with that?
You keep still till the doctor gets finished.
- Is it bad?
- You'll be all right.
I'm supposed to be in London.
Will I be able to sing?
Like a nightingale in Berkeley Square.
Put this under your tongue.
Nurse, can you find out if a girl by the name of Jennifer March has been brought in?
Listen. Will you stop worrying about who's here and who isn't.
Leave that to St. Christopher or whose-ever business it is to take care of those things.
And you keep this thermometer under your tongue.
[Man Speaking Portuguese]
[Portuguese]
Senora, do you wish the truth?
Your right leg is almost severed below the knee.
It's a compound fracture.
There are also three broken ribs and a crushed left ankle.
It may be necessary to amputate your right leg.
If you do decide to amputate, would you please tell me first?
I will tell you.
- Get her ready for surgery immediately.
- Yes, Doctor.
What were they saying about him?
Nothing.
Nothing at all.
Just a lot of
Portuguese double-talk.
They don't think he has much chance, do they?
Where'd you get that idea?
He's fine.
The doctor was saying it would be just a waste of time to operate, wasn't he?
Wasn't he?
Look. They'll operate, and they'll save him.
I don't care what they say.
Or I'll burn this joint down.
All right, boys, she's all yours.
Take it easy.
Watch her leg now.
Good luck.
[Nurse Narrating] Now, don't ask me how we did it, but we pulled them through.
All 15 survivors, including John Burn.
Of course it was touch and go for some of them these past weeks... but we did it.
Unfortunately, Jennifer March, who had changed seats with Jane for that one landing... wasn't one of them.
Don't ask me how or why things like that happen either.
Any more than why, when they raised the plane... the only thing of Janes they recovered... was this little gold cross which had been given to her... by a kid from Syracuse she'd never even seen.
On the other hand, if you're interested in such things as courage and morale... drop around with a bottle of scotch some afternoon when I'm off duty... and I'll be glad to grant you an interview.
Because on that subject,
I am now an authority.
[John]
Mmm. Oh, boy.
Oh, if I could just get a little lower.
- Feel good?
- Oh, words fail me.
Nothing in the world like it.
I know.
I can stand pain... anything.
But to itch and not be able to scratch it... that I can't stand.
The man who thought of making these knitting needles out of plastic... so he can go around corners ought to get a D.S.C.
D.S.C., my eye.
He oughta be canonized.
- Ah, Miss Stomach Bump of 1943.
- All right.
- Open your traps and swallow these down.
- Not again.
You oughta be grateful I'm not still stickin' you in the caboose with a needle.
- Here you are.
- [John] Thank you.
[Gasps]
Mercy me! If it isn't a reptile!
- How'd this get in here?
- Why, I haven't the slightest idea.
- Go on. Drink it.
- Me? Drink that?
- Down the hatch.
- What are you trying to do, poison me?
- It's a tempting idea.
- General, you ought to be ashamed of yourself... scaring a poor angel of mercy like Clancy.
Listen. You couldn't scare this Flatbush Florence Nightingale...
- with Rommel's whole Africa Corps.
- Is that so?
Well, for that crack you're going to eat intravenously from now on.
Wait a minute, Clancy. There's something
I've been wanting to ask you.
First of all, how did you ever get to be a nurse?
Second, what are you doing over here?
Question one:
I was hit over the head... with a pair of forceps at birth... and when I came to,
I was in uniform.
Question two:
When the war broke out...
I joined an ambulance corps from Flatbush to get away from my relatives.
- Does that answer you?
- Right on the nose.
Okay. Here we go,
General Pershing.
Hey! Give us back our frog.
Ask the mother superior for it.
- She's gonna find it in her bed tomorrow morning.
- [Jane Laughing]
- Don't you just love her?
- I'm crazy about her.
I'd probably elope with her if I weren't already in love with you.
Oh, stop it.
I mean it, Jane.
I had no right to say that, did I?
No.
Even though it's true?
I know you're not happy the way things have been.
- [Door Opens]
- Good morning.
Oh, good morning, Father.
- How are you feeling today?
- Very well, thank you.
Good.
[Door Closes]
Shall I go on?
Or have I already said too much?
I admit there's a bond between us.
That's only natural after all we've been through.
And then being here together every day since the accident...
It's more than that.
You know it.
Ever since that first night, we've clung to each other.
We've depended on each other.
Maybe that's because we like the same things... the same books, the same music.
Jane, people can't go through what we've been through... and then go right on acting as if nothing had happened.
[Door Opens]
- Pardon me, but somebody's got company.
- Hi.
- Don!
- Remember me?
- Where in the world...
- Flew over. How else? F.D.R. Gave us a priority.
Wants me to bring you on home.
Let me look at you. I didn't know what to expect, a crack-up like that...
- but you look swell.
- Well, I'm all right.
They tell me you're gonna be fine.
Maybe a little operation or two on the leg... but at least everything's under control.
That's what they tell me too.
I hope they're right.
Don, this is Mr. Burn.
John, my husband, Don Ross.
- Oh, so youre John Burn, one of the pilots. How are you?
- Very well, thank you.
And this is Clancy. Miss Clancy.
- We met.
- Yes, in the room.
Look. I've got passage for us... on a Portuguese steamer sailing next Tuesday.
It may be a little rugged, but I want to get you home where we can really take care of you.
- Think you can make it?
- We'll make it.
Clancy! You'll go with us?
Remember those relatives
I was telling you about?
I just got a wire.
Two of them have been drafted.
They're just as likely to show up even here.
So it's back to Flatbush for me.
- You ready to go to your room?
- Uh, yes, please.
Why don't you come with us, Mr. Burn?
- I think I can fix it.
- Thanks. I'll wait and fly back.
But, John,
I thought you said we'd...
Sorry, l...
It's nice to have met you, Mr. Ross.
Yeah, sure.
Glad to have met you.
- See you later.
- You bet.
- Seems like a nice guy.
- He is.
- Hurt bad?
- His back... a couple of fractured vertebrae.
Tell me, did you have a nice flight over?
Yeah. Yeah, sure. Just a breeze.
Not a bump all the way.
[Don Narrating]
And then home sweet home... through submarine infested waters and straight into another hospital.
They'd done their best for her in Lisbon.
But now she needed more than the best.
She needed a miracle.
Oh, excuse me, Doctor.
I didn't know you were here.
- That's all right, Sister.
- I can come back later.
No, no. Come in.
- Aren't they lovely?
- [Jane] Beautiful.
Wouldn't you like one for your lapel, Doctor?
- May I?
- All doctors should wear roses in their lapels.
Then maybe they wouldn't look so serious and so infallible.
Also prettier.
I'll take those, Sister.
Thank you.
You must have a rich admirer.
Anybody I know?
- John Burn.
- Burn? He sent those all the way from Lisbon?
Well, he arrived in New York this morning.
Pretty quick work.
Well, Doctor?
Am I still photogenic?
It's a beautiful picture, but I'm afraid it's not such a pretty break.
That bone's not knitting the way it should.
What are we gonna do about it?
I know. Let's send it out to Max Factor in Hollywood.
He makes over old faces.
Maybe he can make over an old leg.
[Chuckling]
Well, that's a possibility.
In the meanwhile,
I would say a bone graft is indicated.
And that's a very delicate operation.
I can't guarantee success.
What percentage of such operations are successful, Doctor?
Oh, between 50% and 60%.
A great deal depends on the patient.
A good patient, one with a lot of desire to get well... can make a bad doctor look awfully good.
- Are you a good patient?
- Terrible. I'll probably kick and howl.
- When will you operate?
- Personally, I would say the sooner the better.
What would you say about tomorrow?
Well, I was booked to ride in the fourth at Belmont tomorrow.
- You can always be scratched.
- Then see that I am, Clancy.
No use our keeping the doctor on pins and needles any longer than we have to.
Will you come with me, Mr. Ross? I want to show these to Dr. Jameson, my associate.
- I'd like you to be present.
- Of course.
Take it easy.
I'll be right back.
They're gonna take my leg off, Clancy.
Who said so?
He didn't have to say so.
I know.
Ah, you don't want to pay any attention to doctors.
They gotta view with alarm, so that later they can point with pride.
You know?
Like... Like politicians.
[Phone Ringing]
I'll get it.
Hello?
Well, welcome home.
[Chuckling]
Sure, I'm true to you. Wait a minute.
- Who is it?
- Don't be so nosy. Here.
- Hello?
- Hi.
John! Where are you?
Doctor's Hospital.
I'm in the X-ray room trying to find out when they're gonna take this crate off me... after which, in case you didn't suspect it...
I'm gonna beat a path right straight to your door.
What do you know about that?
Well, l... I'm not gonna be able to see anybody for a while.
Well, how are you?
How was everything in Lisbon when you left?
Don't change the subject.
You have missed me, haven't you?
Never mind. Don't answer that.
I just wanted to hear your voice.
- All ready, Mr. Burn.
- Okay.
Sorry. I gotta run now. They want me to pose again. But I'll be seeing you.
Oh! Tell Clancy I love her too.
Good-bye.
Here you are. Thank you.
- You gonna see him?
- If he wants to come.
Is that wise?
No, I suppose it isn't, but...
[Crying]
Oh, Clancy, what am I going to do?
There, there.
None of that now.
I've never known anyone like him.
When he's with me,
I don't even hurt as much.
I've learned to lean on him so.
I know. I know.
I don't want to hurt Don.
But, Clancy, I'm in love.
For the first time in my life,
I'm really in love.
I've tried not to think about him.
I keep telling myself that nothing can come of it.
But I need him... and I want to see him.
[Crying]
What should I do?
Well...
The first thing you should do is blow your nose and powder it... before somebody comes back in here.
Here. Use this.
Now this is no time to get yourself all worked up emotionally... and start acting like a female.
When you're through with all this, you'll have plenty of time to decide.
But right now, let's do what the doctor said.
Give him a break. Right?
That's my girl.
[Groans]
[Slurring]
Clancy.
I'm here, honey.
Now you go back to sleep.
Rest is what you need.
- Clancy?
- How you feel?
Still a little woozy?
[Slurring, Indistinct]
Don't worry, kid.
It's still there.
Sister Marie! A piano?
Yes, Sister.
It's for Miss Froman.
She's going to rehearse for a new show.
Rehearse? In her condition?
Why, she can't even walk.
Dr. Taylor considers work a very good therapy, Sister.
Also, Miss Clancy says she can use...
I hope you'll pardon the expression, Sister... but Miss Clancy says she can also use a few "bucks."
Excuse me, Sister, they're waiting for us now.
- [Knocking]
- [Clancy] Come in.
Well, here we are.
Where would you like it?
Uh, right over here I think.
That oughta do right there.
Thank you very much.
I'll take care of that.
Thank you, fellas.
Thank you, Sister.
We'll try to be as quiet as we can.
Don't worry about the noise.
That heart case next door has gone home.
- You won't disturb a soul.
- Good.
Oh, I don't suppose you'd want any outsiders to hear you rehearse?
Well, I guess our secret will be safe with you,
Sister. Stick around if you want.
May I? Oh, thank you.
I'm so crazy about music.
I promise to be as still as a mouse.
It's all right.
Glad to have you.
First I'm gonna play your theme song.
This comes right after the opening number when the artists come on.
As the curtains part, you're sitting there... better still, standing... if we can figure some way to prop you up.
You're posing for this artist, the tenor...
That's you, Clancy.
Well, that's typecasting, all right.
[Don]
As it happens, you're nuts about Jane... but there are reasons why you can't tell her so yet.
I know one good reason.
I ain't a boy.
Well, he walks over to you, and you have a few lines of dialogue.
You know, love stuff. You say, uh,
"Blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah."
And then, Clancy, you say,
"Blah, blah, blah, blah..."
Who wrote this, Eugene O'Neill?
[Don]
After which, you go into your song.
I'll play it for you.
But before I play that...
I want to do the opening for you so you can picture the whole scene.
First we bring the artists on like this.
% Montparnasse%
% We are the artists of the Montparnasse%
% And though our paintings are comme ci comme ca%
% What do we care%
% Ooh, la, la%
% We love to share our savoir-faire in Montparnasse%
Right here we bring the chorus on, the models.
That's you, Sister. Step back by the door.
I'll tell you when to come on.
We're gonna have about
20 of the best looking dames we can find.
Typical artist models, which means they'll have on as little as the law allows.
This is their music.
% Montparnasse%
% We are the models and we pose for those we love%
That's you, Sister.
Come on.
And be sure and keep in step with the music.
- % Montparnasse We are the mo... %
- Don.
- Just a minute, if you don't mind.
- Yes?
Maybe Sister Marie doesn't want to be a model.
What? Oh, I'm sorry, Sister.
I didn't mean to offend you. L...
Oh, I'm not offended in the least.
Yeah, but l... You see, I sort of got carried away in it.
- Let me get you a chair.
- You mean you're not gonna use me anymore?
Well, after all, Sister, this is a bunch of chorus girls.
But it's the first time
I've ever been in a chorus.
And if I have to go back and tell the other sisters
I was fired, they'd never forgive me.
- But I couldn't ask you...
- Let me do it, Sister. I'm more the type.
- You can be the tenor.
- Oh, thank you.
Okay, professor.
Let's go. Swing it.
% Montparnasse%
% We are the models and we pose... % %
% % [Orchestral "Montparnasse'"]
[Clancy Narrating]
I'm here to tell the cockeyed world... stage history was made that night.
To be perfectly frank, none of us knew what to expect.
Here was a girl with a 35-pound cast on her leg... who'd have to be carried on and off the stage 22 times a performance... making her first public appearance since the accident.
The big question in all our minds was... would the audience take her this way?
More important still, could she stand the gaff?
There you are, honey.
- [Grunts]
- [Gasps]
- [Clancy] What'd you do? Are you hurt?
- No, I'm all right.
- What happened?
- I just dropped my handkerchief.
Watch your leg.
You know better than to lean over like that.
I wouldn't have caused this much excitement if I'd ridden in on a horse like Lady Godiva.
- That's a good act too, but your hair ain't long enough.
- Are you all right?
- Yes, of course.
- All right. Then clear. Clear the stage.
% % [Finale]
- Gee, I hope she's...
- Don't worry. She'll be fine.
% % [Orchestra Swells]
[Clancy Narrating]
Well, we had our answer.
They still wanted Froman.
But even while they were still cheering in Boston, we had to close.
That leg had begun to act up again.
Now the really rugged days were beginning.
Ahead lay long dreary weeks and months... of suffering, of uncertainty, bitterness, despair... more doctors, more consultations, more X-rays, more bone grafts.
Seldom if ever out of pain... excruciating pain.
Once or twice, near death itself.
In and out of a dozen hospitals, always facing another operation.
Ten, 20... So many in fact that even I began to lose track of them.
Twenty-one, 22...
Tumors, abscesses, nervous exhaustion... endless hours with psychiatrists... sometimes not caring whether she lived or died.
And always with the threat hanging over her head... that next time that leg would have to come off.
Here we are.
Mmm. That looks good.
[Sniffs]
- Smells good too.
- Hmm.
- What's the matter with you?
- I'm not hungry.
None of that now.
You've got to eat.
Why? Why do I have to eat?
I'm sick of it. I'm sick of all of it.
Why don't they just go ahead and cut it off and be done with it?
They know I'll never walk again.
Why don't they admit it?
- Who says you'll never walk again?
- I do.
And I'm fed up with hearing you and everybody else say that I will.
I know I'll never be a normal woman again.
I'll never dance.
I'll never go shopping.
I'll never do any of the things other women do.
I can't even remember what it was like to wear a decent pair of shoes.
So why go on fighting it and kidding myself?
I hope they do take it off.
I'll be glad to get it over with.
Now wait a minute. That's just about enough of that kind of talk.
Sure, you've had your share of it.
Do you think I've sat around here day after day watching you suffer... without knowing what you've been going through?
Why do you think
I stayed with you?
'Cause I thought you had it in you to keep on punching without feeling sorry for yourself.
But don't you see?
I'm tired of punching.
I'm tired of fighting.
I've had enough. I'm sick of it!
You're sick of it?
Well, I've got news for you.
This has been no picnic for me either.
But I said to myself, "This baby's got what it takes. Nothing's gonna get her down."
And now all of a sudden you start bellyaching.
Well, that's your business.
But let's get one thing straight right now!
Nobody feels sorry for themselves around me.
Nobody cries on my shoulder.
And the minute they start it, they can get themselves another girl.
Because I've got more important things to do with my life.
And if you've got your heart set on being a freak or an invalid... that's okay with me.
Of course you've still got your face and your voice.
That'd be enough for most women.
But not you.
Because you haven't got what it takes... guts!
[Crying]
[Clancy Narrating] Whether that bit of ham acting did it or not, I don't know.
All I do know is that we didn't have any more of that kind of talk.
In fact, as soon as the doctors gave the word... she was right in there pitching again.
With debts mounting daily, with doctors to be paid... nurses, hospital bills... it was work or else.
Under the circumstances,
New York's La Riviera was the answer.
- Good evening, Miss Froman.
- Hello, Joan.
% % [Orchestra]
Thank you.
Don, it's beginning to fill up. You know I never like to be out front before a show.
What's the matter?
Superstitious?
Like a bride about being seen on her wedding day?
I'm afraid it might spoil the illusion if they see me in a wheelchair or on crutches.
Sorry, but I thought this would be a good chance to talk... frankly and in public... where we couldn't go emotional.
What is there to talk about?
% % [Continues]
I happen to know how often you've been seeing John Burn.
Well, I've never tried to hide the fact that I've been seeing him.
It's... It's all been open and aboveboard.
That's beside the point.
All I want is a simple answer. Yes or no.
Me or him?
Do we have to decide that tonight?
I've got two shows to do.
You can't keep putting these things off forever.
Well, can't we wait just a few days until I can think more rationally?
- % % [Continues]
- You wouldn't have to think... if you'd just make up your mind not to see him again.
Would that solve anything?
Please, Don.
All right.
But what am I supposed to do?
Exit laughing?
Don't my feelings count?
I know it's a tragic thing that's happening to us, to our marriage...
Don't talk as if we'd done something wrong, because we haven't.
Okay. But there has to be a showdown sometime, and it might as well be now.
- [Jane]John.
- Hello.
- Hello, Burn. Glad you could make it. How are you?
- Fine, thanks.
I forgot to tell you. I asked Mr. Burn to have dinner with us tonight.
Slide in next to Jane for a minute while I make a phone call.
- What'll you have... scotch, cocktail?
- Uh, martini, thanks.
I'll send the waiter right over with it.
Excuse me.
- He didn't have to make a phone call.
- I know.
- He thinks it's time for a showdown.
- % % [Ends]
[Applause]
So do I.
- % % [Orchestra Resumes]
- What's the answer?
I'm not going to see you again.
Is... Is that what you want?
I don't know.
Maybe not.
But that's the way it has to be.
He's still my...
Responsibility?
My husband... for better or for worse.
I'll still write.
I'll still phone.
I won't answer.
% % [Continues]
It's really because you're not sure about your leg, isn't it?
As if that mattered... could affect the way I feel about you.
Max, would you help me back to my dressing room?
Certainly, Miss Froman.
- Jane.
- Please don't make it harder for me... by saying anything more now.
- Shall I go with you?
- No, thanks.
Max and I can manage.
Good night.
Good night.
% % [Continues]
- What? All alone?
- Yes.
- Now if you'll excuse me...
- What's your hurry? Stick around and watch the show with me.
- No, thanks. Not tonight.
- Oh, come on. Sit down.
You can't walk out just before Janes number.
You're gonna see one of the greatest entertainers in the business tonight.
- % % [Ends]
- Thank you.
- % % [Orchestra]
- [Applause]
% Embrace me%
% My sweet embraceable you%
% Embrace me%
% You irreplaceable you%
% Just one look at you%
% My heart grew tipsy in me%
% You and you alone%
% Bring out the gypsy in me%
% I love all%
% The many charms about you%
% Above all%
% I want my arms about you%
% Don't be a naughty baby%
% Come to mama
Come to mama, do%
[Laughing]
Well, I see we have the army with us tonight.
How would you like to come up here with me?
- Oh, come on.
- Go on. Go on up.
- Go!
- What's the matter?
- [Audience Murmuring]
- How do you do?
- Hello.
- My, you're attractive.
You goin' steady?
- Well, you are from now on.
- [Audience Laughing]
- You're a paratrooper, aren't you?
- Yes, ma'am.
Also, if I may say so, you're a very brave man to come up here.
- Tell that to my sergeant there.
- [Audience Laughing]
Whoop! Haven't you ever been taken for a ride before?
- Sure, but not like this.
- [Audience Laughing]
% I love all%
% The many charms about you%
% Above all%
% I want my arms about you%
Having trouble? Put it here.
Then I'll know where it is.
% Naughty baby%
% Come to mama
Come to mama%
% Do%
% My sweet embraceable%
% You% %
[Applauding, Cheering]
She always did go for a guy in uniform.
Oh, wait a minute.
You're not through yet.
- This field maneuver's just getting started.
- [Laughing]
Wouldn't you be more comfortable up here?
Oh, come on. It's not much of a jump for a paratrooper.
Now, isn't there some special song you'd like?
- I like 'em all.
- I know one.
- Oh, tell me, do you sing too?
- Not me.
- Can't you even hum a little?
- I'm afraid not.
All right. But if you change your mind, you just join right in.
- Okay?
- % % [Piano]
Joe, may we have a soft, soulful light, please?
That's it.
% Picture you upon my knee%
% Tea for two and two for tea%
% Me for you%
% And you for me alone%
% Nobody near us to see us or hear us%
% No friends or relations on weekend vacations%
% We won't have it known%
% That we own a telephone%
% Dear%
% Day will break and I'll awake%
% And start to bake a sugar cake%
% For you to take%
% For all the boys to see%
% We will raise a family%
- % A boy for you%
- % A girl for me%
% Can't you see%
% How happy we will be% %
[Applause]
% % [Orchestra]
Can't blame a guy for trying to hold on to a gal like that, can you?
I'd say any man who'd give her up is a fool.
% % ["Over There'"]
Clancy, how would you like to go overseas?
About as much as I'd like to get kicked in the head by a mule.
- Why?
- I was just thinking.
Why shouldn't I go over and finish what I started three years ago?
If I only had a jack to put on that queen.
Of course, I suppose the doctors will throw up their hands in holy horror.
Ah, phooey to doctors.
This deck has been stacked.
The army might think it's too great a nuisance carting me around.
They manage to cart around a lot of tanks and bazookas.
I know a couple of top sergeants that could handle it.
Well, certainly I'm no good to myself or anybody here.
Maybe I could do a little good over there.
What about, uh, "Buster"?
It should be a relief to him.
And the "Wild Blue Yonder"?
You know as well as I do that as long as there's a chance I might lose this leg. L...
That's where you're different from me.
If I had a bad leg and a guy was crazy about me, I'd figure I was lucky.
- Why?
- My love life might not be so vulnerable.
Vulnerable?
Look, this has nothing to do with you, you understand.
I'm talking about another couple of dames.
Pure hypothetical. See?
But just for the sake of argument... let's say one of them had the prettiest pair of legs in the world.
Regular pinup girl.
All the men beatin' their brains out tryin' to marry her... millionaires, dopes, playboys.
So she gets married, and three columnists swoon just writing about it.
But before you know it... she starts worrying about what's gonna happen... when maybe she hasn't got the prettiest legs in the world... and how nice it would be if she could sit back and relax and say to herself... there was something else he married her for.
Like maybe he was in love with her.
Or maybe he admired her spirit or her stamina or something.
- Clancy, you're wonderful.
- That's why the lovelorn all come to me for advice.
"Cuddles Clancy" they call me.
Okay, Beatrice Fairfax, my pogo sticks.
- Where you goin'?
- To tell Don.
- You need any help?
- Nope.
Call Mr. Stone at the U.S.O.
And ask him to come right over, will you?
- And tell him to bring my passport with him.
- On the double.
[Engine Revving]
[Revving Continues]
- What gives?
- Sure is stuck.
- Where you from, soldier?
- Kansas.
Kansas, huh? Well, this car belongs to another boy from Kansas, name of Eisenhower.
- Ya ever hear of him?
- No, ma'am. He must belong to another outfit.
Oh, yeah? Well, he's the toughest top sergeant you ever heard of... and you'll hear from him if you don't get your shoulders to that wheel.
Now come on.
Let's get goin'.
Yes, ma'am.
[Chattering]
Thanks, Captain.
All right. Settle down, men.
Settle down.
We have a special guest this afternoon... a young lady who's come all the way from New York to sing for you.
She tried to come over a couple of years ago, but things didn't work out.
This time she made it. I know you're going to like her. Miss Jane Froman.
[Whistling]
[Wolf Whistle]
How long do I have, Colonel?
As long as you wish,
Miss Froman.
Well, we may be here from now on.
I'm sure the men would love it.
I'm going to start with a favorite of mine.
After that, if there's something you'd like to hear, just sing out.
As Jimmy Durante would say,
"I got a million of em."
% % [Band Plays]
% Yes, it's a good day for singin' a song%
% And it's a good day for movin' along%
% Yes, it's a good day
How could anything go wrong%
% A good day from morning till night%
% Yes, it's a good day for shining your shoes%
% And it's a good day for losin' the blues%
% Everything to gain and nothin' to lose%
% 'Cause it's a good day from morning till night%
% I said to the sun
Good morning, Sun%
% Rise and shine today%
% You know you gotta get going if you're gonna make a showing%
% And you know you've got the right-of-way%
% 'Cause it's a good day for payin' your bills%
% And it's a good day for curing your ills%
% So take a deep breath%
% And throw away your pills%
% 'Cause it's a good day%
% From morning till night% %
[Clancy Narrating]
That was just the beginning... the beginning of a tour that was to take us over 30,000 miles... to seven countries.
% They're either too young or too old%
% They're either too gray or too grassy green%
% The pickings are poor and the crop is lean%
% What's good is in the army%
% What's left will never harm me%
% They're either too old or too young%
% So, darling you'll never get stung%
% Tomorrow I'll go hiking with that Eagle Scout unless%
% I get a call from Grandpa for a snappy game of chess%
% I'm finding it easy to stay good as gold%
% They're either too young or too old%
% They're either too warm or too cold%
% They're either too fast or too fast asleep%
% So, darling, believe me
I'm yours to keep%
% There isn't any gravy%
% The gravy's in the navy%
% They're either too fresh or too stale%
% There is no available male%
% I will confess to one romance
I'm sure you will allow%
% He tries to serenade me but his voice is changing now%
% I'm finding it easy to keep things controlled%
% They're either too young or too old%
% I'm either their first breath of spring%
% Or else I'm the last little fling%
% I either get a fossil or an adolescent pup%
% I either have to hold him off or have to hold him up%
% The battle is on but the fortress will hold%
% I'll never, never fail ya%
% While you are in Australia%
% And when you get to India
I'll still be what I've been to ya%
% I've looked the field over and lo and behold%
% They're either too young%
% Or too darn old% %
[Clancy Narrating]
Boy, did those birds eat it up.
This bunch even went
A-W-O-L for two weeks... hitchhiking over half of Europe to follow her around.
Anybody here from Missouri?
Oh, come on. Now there must be somebody here from Missouri.
- That state's still in the union, isn't it?
- [Soldiers Laughing]
Well, come on. Stand up.
Don't be bashful.
Let's see you.
- Oh, no. Not him.
- Why not? What's wrong with him?
- Shell shock. I'd better stop him.
- Leave him alone.
She can handle him.
Hi there.
What part of Missouri are you from?
Don't tell me you're from my own hometown. Not from Clinton.
Let me guess.
Saint Louis.
Independence?
[Chuckles]
All right. I give up. You tell me.
Ch... Char... Charlottesville.
Charlottesville, Missouri?
Vir... Virginia.
- Oh, Charlottesville, Virginia.
- [Soldiers Laughing]
Well, that's close enough to Missouri for me.
I suppose all the girls say this, but... haven't I seen you someplace before?
- Where?
- La...
La Riviera Club, New York.
Of course!
The piano. "Embraceable You."
Why, we did a whole act together.
How would you like me to sing something now just for you?
You name it.
If I know it, I'll sing it.
"I'll Walk Alone."
I love that song.
It's one of my favorites.
I can't believe it. That boy hasn't spoken
10 words since he came here.
% I'll walk alone%
% Because to tell you the truth%
% I'll be lonely%
% I don't mind being lonely%
% When my heart tells me%
% You are lonely too%
% I'll walk alone%
% They'll ask me why%
% And I'll tell them I'd rather%
% There are dreams
I must gather%
% Dreams we fashioned that night%
% You held me tight%
% I'll always be near you%
% Wherever you are each night%
% In every prayer%
% If you call I'll hear you%
% No matter how far
Just close your eyes%
% And I'll be there%
% Please walk alone%
% And send your love and your kisses%
% To guide me%
% Till you're walking beside me%
% I'll walk alone%
% Till you're walking%
% Beside me%
% I'll walk%
% Alone% %
Mr. Ross. Ready with your long-distance call to Miami.
Thank you.
Hello? Hello, Burn?
This is Don Ross in New York.
How are ya?
Don Ross? I'm fine.
How are you? How's Jane?
Well, she's fine. Still overseas, but about ready to head back home.
That's what I called you about.
I thought you might like to know
I won't be around when she lands.
Yeah, that's right. About time I started lookin' after myself for a change, isn't it?
When's she arriving?
How should I know?
You can check if you're interested.
What's that?
Why am I telling you all this?
Well, I'll tell ya, Burn.
I'm a great guy, see?
A little tight today maybe, but great.
I don't think you ever appreciated me.
Jane and I were washed up long ago.
I didn't want to walk out on her while she was still having trouble.
But now that she's doing okay again, why stick around and pretend?
Oh, by the way... next time you see her, will you tell her
I said this might make a great plot.
Girl meets boy.
Girl gets boy. Girl loses boy.
Where you gonna find a twist like that every day? Huh?
Okay. Good-bye.
See you around.
- [Chattering]
- Attaboy, mule-face.
[Man]
Hold it up so we can see it.
[Man]
Hey, mule-face, where'd you get them candles?
Reims Cathedral, you dope.
Where do you think we got 'em?
- What'd they cost you?
- Nothing. We stole 'em.
- % % [Drumroll]
- [Whooping]
Go on, you stupe!
Give it to her!
Yeah, while the candles are still burning.
What's the matter?
You got stage fright?
Hey, you guys!
Pipe down, will ya? Let's take it easy.
Miss Froman,
I ain't gonna make no speech.
- [Cheering]
- Ah, cut it out!
Well, maybe it ain't your birthday exactly... but you're going home tomorrow, and, before you go... us guys want to tell you just one thing.
Well, we want to thank you for comin'.
It sure meant a lot to us over here.
Mmm. Anyhow, this is for you.
Thank you.
- Thanks, fellas.
- Read the card.
You read it, Clancy.
"To Jane Froman, a great soldier...
"who, though wounded herself, didn't forget us wounded.
Bon voyage.
The Gang."
[Applauding]
Speech! Speech!
[Man]
Speech.!
- What can I say?
- Don't say. Use your breath and blow these out.
As you all know,
Clancy and l... we're going home tomorrow.
For the past three months, we've had the wonderful privilege... of doing over a hundred different shows for you men.
But there'll never be another night like this.
For that reason, the boys and the girls and myself... have worked out a special farewell number.
- Would you like to hear it?
- [Cheering]
Okay, let's go.
Clancy, catch.
- Sign her up!
- The Dodgers need you, Clancy.
[Chorus]
% The sweetest place in all the world%
% Is home%
[Jane]
% O beautiful%
% For spacious skies%
% For amber waves of grain%
% For purple mountain majesties%
% Above the fruited plain%
% America%
% America%
% God shed his grace on thee%
% And crown thy good%
% With brotherhood%
% From sea to shining%
- % Sea% %
- % % [Up-tempo]
% It's a great big wonderful home, sweet home%
% From the Hudson to San Francisco Bay%
% No matter where you're from or where you happen to roam%
- % It's heaven%
- % Yes, it's heaven%
% In the U.S.A. %
% Whoo-whoo%
% Give my regards to Broadway%
% Remember me to Herald Square%
% Tell all the gang at 42nd Street%
% That I will soon be there%
% Whisper of how I'm yearning%
% To mingle with the old-time throng%
% Give my regards to old Broadway%
% And tell them
I'll be there ere long%
% Grand Central Station%
% Ride around the nation%
% Chicago, Chicago%
- % That toddlin' town%
- % What a town What a town%
% Chicago, Chicago%
- % I'll see you around%
- % Do, do, do I love it%
- % Bet your bottom dollar you'll lose your blues in Chicago%
- % % [Chorus Scatting]
- % The town that Billy Sunday could not shut down%
- % That toddlin' town%
% On State Street
That great street%
- % I just want to say%
- % Hooray, hooray, hooray%
% They do things they don't do on Broadway%
% They never had it better on Broadway%
% They have the time the time of their life%
- % I saw a man he danced with his wife%
- % In Chicago%
- % Chicago, U.S.A. %
- % Wow-wow, wee-wee%
- % California, here I come%
- [Cheering]
% Right back where
I started from%
% Where bowers of flowers bloom in the sun%
% Each morning at dawning birdies sing and everything%
% A sun-kissed miss said
Don't be late%
% That's why I can hardly wait... Nah%
% Open up that golden gate%
% California, here I come%
- How about Texas?
- Ohio!
- I'm from Missouri!
- Oklahoma!
How about Texas?
Well, how about Texas?
% Carry me back to old Virginny%
% There's where the cotton and the corn and taters grow%
% There's where the birds warble sweet%
% In the springtime%
% There's where this old homesick heart%
% Am long%
% To go%
- Montana!
- Utah!
- Alabama!
- How 'bout Texas?
% Oh, fill the steins for dear old Maine%
% Shout till the rafters ring%
% Drink to Maine our alma mater%
% Let every loyal
Maine man sing%
Miss Froman?
Miss Froman?
Shh. Yes?
I just wanted to, uh...
- Oh, nothing.
- Well, come on. What is it?
What do you want to say?
Well, I just wanted to remind you that me, uh... l... I'm from Indiana.
For you, anything.
% Back home again%
% In Indiana%
% Through the fields%
% I used to roam%
% When I dream about the moonlight%
% On the Wabash%
% Then I long%
% For my Indiana home%
How about Texas?
- Texas? Never heard of it.
- % Whoo-whoo%
% I'm Alabamy bound%
% There'll be no heebie-jeebies hangin' round%
% Just gave the meanest ticket man on earth%
% All I'm worth%
% To put my tootsies in an upper berth%
% Just hear the choo-choo sound%
% I know that soon
I'm gonna cover ground%
% And then I'll holler so the world will know%
% Here I go
I'm Alabamy bound%
Texas!
We want Texas!
[Chanting Together]
We want Texas! We want Texas!
% The stars at night are big and bright%
% Deep in the heart of Texas%
% The prairie sky is wide and high%
% Deep in the heart of Texas%
% The sage in bloom is like perfume%
% Deep in the heart of Texas%
% Reminds me of the one I love%
% Deep in the heart of Texas%
% I wish I was in the land of cotton%
% Old times there are not forgotten%
% Look away, look away look away Dixieland%
% I wish I was in Dixie
Hooray, hooray%
% In Dixieland I'll take my stand to live and die in Dixie%
% Away, away away down south in Dixie%
% Away, away away down south%
% In Dixie%
[Screaming]
% % [Slow]
% Though we must part%
% We'll meet again someday%
% Somewhere in the U.S.A. %
% America, America%
% God shed his grace on thee%
% And crown thy good%
% With brotherhood%
% From sea to shining sea% %
[Blowing]
[Jane]
% It tells that you're standing near%
% And%
% At the sound of your voice%
% Heaven opens its portals to me%
% Can I help but rejoice%
% That a song such as ours came to be%
% But I always knew%
% I would live life through%
% With a song in my heart%
% For%
% You%
[Chorus]
% With a song in my heart% %
{{{ the end }}} 
Nell Wayne.
Hey, that's the dame you're looking for.
- Yeah.
- Not bad, not bad.
I see what you mean.
Come on, let's find the one that's breathing.
Hey, bud, where can we find Nell Wayne?
On-stage, 9:OO tonight.
We wanna see her now.
- The corporal here is a friend of Nelly's.
- Oh, that's great.
When she steps out of her limousine, he can wave to her.
Look, pal, you don't get it.
They're both from Youngstown, Ohio.
They've been like that since they were kids.
My, what an uncomfortable position for both of them.
"My, what an uncomfor..."
I'd like to hit him a shot...
Look, Mike, I wish you'd stop telling people...
...that Nell Wayne and I are like this:
- Why?
- Because we're not even like that:
- We don't even know each other.
- You came from the same town.
- You went to the same school.
- Your father was even her dentist.
But he was a lot of people's dentist.
- Did he fix your teeth?
- Well, sure.
What more do you want?
Your pivot tooth and hers can talk over old times.
- Oh, I don't know.
- Hey, there's Ruth Roman.
Hey, you can't go in there.
RICK:
Thanks and we'll see you tonight.
- All right, Miss Roman.
- Miss Roman?
- I'd like to ask you a question.
- Well, sure.
How do you feel about love?
Oh, what is this?
The Air Force conducting a survey?
No, ma'am.
But I've got a buddy outside...
Excuse us, will you, pal?
Miss Roman, Corporal Rick Williams,
United States Air Force.
- Hi, Rick.
- Hello.
- So you're from Youngstown?
- Yes, ma'am.
Does Nell know you're in town?
- No, ma'am.
- Good, we'll surprise her then. Come on.
- Where are we going?
- To the hotel.
They're all over there.
I've already explained we can't stay more than three or four days.
Look, Miss Roman, do you think we ought to barge in like this?
Look, if I were like that with somebody and he didn't come to see me...
...l'd never forgive him.
Sorry.
Someday I hope to have the pleasure of knocking you down in person.
- [SINGING] You're gonna lose your gal
- [SINGING] You're gonna lose your gal
- You don't know who's your gal
- You don't know who's your gal
You're acting like a two-time lover
Keepin' kisses undercover
- You'll wake up and soon discover
- You'll wake up and soon discover
- You're gonna lose your gal
- You're gonna lose your gal
You're gonna fret away
You're gonna fret away
- You're bound to get that way
- You're bound to get that way
Oh, how can you be so conceited?
Take her heart
And then you mistreat it
- You can't have your cake and eat it
- You can't have your cake and eat it
- You're gonna lose your gal
- You're gonna lose your gal
- And when she's gone
- And when she's gone
She won't come back
She won't come back
They don't come back
Won't come back
Once they're gone
- You're gonna be surprised
- You're gonna be surprised
You never realized
You never realized
That someone else can treat her nicer
Someone else can shoes-and-rice her
- Someone else will paradise her
- Someone else will paradise her
- You're gonna lose your gal
- You're gonna lose your gal
- And when she's gone
- And when she's gone
She won't come back
She won't come back
They don't come back
Won't come back
- Once they're gone
- Once they're gone
You're gonna find someday
The gal went thataway
Now you forgot to analyze her
With your love, you've been a miser
- Tomorrow you'll be sad but wiser
- Tomorrow you'll be sad but wiser
- You're gonna lose your gal
- You're gonna lose your gal
- You're gonna lose
- You're gonna lose
- You're gonna lose
- You're gonna lose
- You're gonna lose your gal
- You're gonna lose your gal
GORDON: Well, hello there.
DORIS: Hi.
Wipe the egg off your face, it's only Doris Day.
And the fella, if you care, is Gordon MacRae.
Thank you very much, Roman.
- Hello, corporal.
- Hi.
Sergeant.
Gee, Mr. MacRae,
I certainly am glad to meet you.
Play your cards right,
I can get you into pictures.
- Yeah?
- Second balcony next to me.
- Who buys the popcorn?
- Depends on who buys the tickets.
The boys are friends of Nell's.
Where is she?
She's antique shopping in Chinatown with Jimmy Cagney.
- Can you picture that?
- I got out of it...
...because I promised the producer
I'd take the boat ride to Alcatraz.
What's your hurry? The excursion boat doesn't leave for an hour yet.
I wanna make sure he got me a roundtrip ticket.
Well, so long, fellas.
- So long.
- Come on, fellas, sit down.
Well, as long as Nell isn't here,
I guess we better be getting along.
RUTH: Look, if you boys don't wanna wait...
...why don't you come backstage at the theater?
Oh, we're due back at the base at 6.
Yes. We're shoving off tonight.
Overseas.
RUTH:
Well...
...Nell would never forgive us if we let you get away without seeing her.
You guys look pretty hungry.
How about having a bite to eat, huh?
- Oh, no, we couldn't...
- Sure we could.
As of now, we've just canceled a previous engagement...
...that we didn't have.
Fine.
Room service?
You know, Doris,
I saw your first picture 47 times.
Forty-seven times?
- Did you, really?
- Yeah.
Hey, Ruth, meet the new president of the Doris Day Fan Club.
Yep, 47 times. All on account of a little difference of opinion...
...between me and a general.
- What was that?
He had influence and the first thing I know...
...l'm crew chief of a movie projector at the base theater.
Forty-seven times I had to run off that picture of yours.
Thanks a lot.
Your picture was in English.
You shoulve seen those foreign things they sent us.
There was one French film with English titles across the bottom of the screen?
Well, anyway, this girl, this French girl was standing in her boudoir.
And this French guy, he comes into the boudoir...
...he looks at her and he says:
[SPEAKING NONSENSE WORDS]
Then the English title comes across the bottom of the screen.
He said, "How's your mother?"
[WOMEN LAUGHING]
He doesn't do so good with the dialogue...
...but he certainly remembers all the action.
Oh, I don't know about that.
I remember dialogue too.
In the middle of Jimmy Cagney's picture
White Heat, the sound went off.
I raced to the screen, took over for Cagney...
...and nobody even knew the difference. Listen.
[IMITATING CAGNEY]
Pardo...
...l've been watching you.
So far, you ain't done anything
I can put my finger on.
But maybe that's what bothers me.
I don't know you and what I don't know, I don't trust.
To me, you're just a number and a face.
We'll keep it that way.
When I need your advice, I'll ask for it.
Now look here, pal.
I don't like people going on imitating me, you understand? I don't like it.
I'm not imitating you.
Since when is there a law against people talking like this?
Well, you know, there ought to be?
And between us, one of us is very bad.
[IN NORMAL VOICE] Oh, I don't know.
I think you do it even better than I do.
Had a little more practice.
DORIS: Jimmy, where's Nell?
- Shopping.
Somebody should have warned me.
That kid is headed for Antiques Anonymous.
Jimmy, meet Mike Nolan and Rick Williams.
- Mike. Rick.
- Hello, Mr. Cagney.
Sarge, you ever go shopping with a dame?
No, I usually go shopping for them.
Clever boy. I'll see you around.
RUTH: Bye, Jimmy.
DORIS: Bye, Jim.
- Say, Mr. Cagney?
- Yeah, son.
There's something I've wanted to ask.
- What is it?
- I've noticed in a lot of your pictures...
...before you're gonna hit a guy...
...you walk up and you do something like this:
Oh, you mean... this?
Yeah, that's right.
Why do you do that?
That's simple.
No belt.
- So long, son.
- So long, Mr. Cagney.
Say, he's quite a guy, isn't he?
Hey, I forgot to give him my autograph.
Sit down, you're making the place look shabby.
Nell should be here any minute.
Yeah, if you don't mind,
I think I'll wait for her in the elevator.
Sit down, relax.
Well, I really didn't wanna meet her like this.
Well, why didn't you say so?
He wants to meet her alone.
We can fix that.
We can wait in the next room.
- Come on.
- Sure.
Hey, Mike. Don't you leave me too.
What do you want me to stay here for?
I mean, after all, that's silly.
I don't even know the girl.
- Hello.
- Hello.
Where is everybody?
- In there.
- Oh.
I guess you don't remember me.
Should I?
Gosh, you sure look different.
Different from what?
From when you were a pompom girl.
- A pompom girl?
- Yeah, back in Youngstown High.
Oh!
You'll have to forgive me, corporal.
It was a long time ago.
So you're from Youngstown.
Yeah, I'm Rick Williams.
Yes?
My father was your dentist.
Oh, really?
Gee...
...your teeth sure turned out beautiful.
Thank you.
Dad still keeps your pictures in his office.
Those before and after things?
Just to show what a wonderful job braces can do.
How nice.
Yeah.
Well, it's been nice seeing you again, corporal.
Well, how's your father?
He's fine.
Youngstown sure misses your family.
Why, you can't get a good malt in the old town anymore.
That's too bad.
The fella that took over your father's shop?
Well, he cut the ice cream down to one scoop.
If you'll excuse me, corporal,
I have a few things to do.
- Goodbye.
- Bye.
Hi, Nell. I'm Rick's buddy.
If you're looking for Doris and Ruth, they're getting gussied up.
Hey, you better hurry up.
We haven't got much time.
NELL: Would somebody tell me what this is all about?
Waiting for you made the boys late.
So we're driving them back to Travis Air Base.
NELL:
But how can we?
- What about the premiere?
- We'll be back.
That's why we're dressing now so we can go straight to the theater.
Suppose we have a flat tire or something?
Kids, I can't be late. I've gotta tape an interview with Louella Parsons.
Honey, Rick's going overseas tonight.
Maybe he didn't tell you.
But I don't even know him.
He didn't know me until just a few minutes ago.
Doris and I guessed that an hour ago.
But he's been reading your publicity.
And besides, his father was your dentist.
You two have a lot in common.
Here, climb into this.
MAN 1: Travis tower to 95O4, into left-hand traffic runway, 2-1 left.
Altimeter 3O1 O.
MAN 2 [O VER RADIO]:
9504, roger out.
MAN 3 [O VER RADIO]:
Travis tower 4682, turning base.
MAN 1: Travis tower to 4682, base leg, check turning final.
[HORN HONKING]
- What's the trouble, Collins?
- Movie stars, sir.
And I can't let them in.
What a pity.
Anything I can do?
We've driven all the way from San Francisco.
Can't we see the boys take off?
Well, I think under the circumstances, that can be arranged.
- Thanks.
- Gee, thank you, sir.
Collins...
...give the girls a visitor's pass.
- I'll be responsible.
- Yes, sir.
Thank you, Collins.
- Say, how about some autographs?
DORIS: On the way out.
Thanks, captain.
Here I am in a convertible with three beautiful babes.
I should do what any red-blooded
American boy would do in this spot.
What's that?
Go over the hill.
RICK: We'll only be a minute.
- It's all right, don't hurry.
DORIS: Well, at least we know all about Youngstown.
- I had to talk about something.
- I've gotta give you credit, Nell.
For a gal who was roped into something, you certainly carried the ball.
If I took his mind off going to war even for a minute, I'm glad I came.
You really fixed things up this time.
Yeah, that's gratitude.
Movie stars out there to wave us goodbye and you're beefing.
Yeah, but they think we're flying off to war.
And so we are.
We're just not going all the way.
How am I gonna tell Nell
I'll be back in two days?
That all we do is fly back and forth between here and Honolulu.
We might just as well be hostesses for TWA.
Listen, buster, every quale in the world is looking for a pet hero to adopt.
If you tell her, you'll only make her unhappy.
So don't tell her.
Who knows?
You might even marry her.
Then she could send us an allotment.
Hey, buster, you forgot your swimming trunks.
Well, this is it, girls.
They won't let you go any farther but you can watch from over there.
MAN [O VER SPEAKERS]:
Your attention, please.
Alerting Military Air Transport
Flight 77.
All personnel,
report to passenger terminal...
... and stand by for call.
I guess that's our load.
Forty-eight hours from now...
...they'll be at the front.
Attention, transport control.
Passengers for Flight 30
now proceeding to aircraft.
In a picture once, I played a scene where I told a soldier goodbye.
Now that it's real...
...I don't quite know what to say.
Well, I'll be back.
I'm sure you will.
Here's something I want you to wear for good luck.
My mother gave it to my father during the First World War.
I can't get it off.
Hurry it up, will you, Rick?
This is no time to twist the girl's arm.
Don't move.
I wanna remember you just as you are now.
It's a picture I'll carry with me wherever I go...
...and as long as I'm away.
Stop being corny, Mike.
You can kiss us goodbye.
- I can?
- Yeah.
One at a time or both together?
Oh, brother, this is...
MAN 1: Are you Ruth Roman?
- Yeah, Ruth Roman, we're...
MAN 2: Aren't you Doris Day?
MIKE: Take it easy.
MAN 3: Can I have your autograph?
MIKE: Hey.
All right, come on, break it up, will you?
All right. Come on.
Back to your barracks, then.
Attention. Get... Fellas.
Hey.
- Sergeant Nolan?
- Yes, sir.
- Your flight is making up.
- Yes. In a minute, sir.
You're late already. Get going.
Yes, sir.
RUTH:
Well, I think that's very funny.
Seems my prize package has been discovered, colonel.
Proves you're a man of ideas, chaplain.
And good ones.
Men. Men, your flight's making up.
I think you'd better shove off.
- Sorry.
DORIS: Thank you.
- I'm sorry, bye.
- Bye-bye.
Good luck.
Oh, this is Colonel Callan, our base commander.
- Miss Day.
- How do you do?
- Hello.
- Miss Roman.
- Nice to meet you.
- And Miss Wayne.
- How are you?
- Hello.
- We were sort of surrounded.
- Yes, I can see that.
Say, before the word gets around...
...and everybody in the terminal comes out...
...suppose we all go over there.
- All right.
- All right.
Those guys sure messed things up.
Nell was gonna give me a good luck charm.
Oh, that's nothing.
Ruth and Doris were about to kiss me.
Their four lips against my two.
Oh, what beautiful odds.
Your attention, please.
All personnel,
Military Air Transport Flight 92...
... report to Gate 1 immediately.
Your attention, please.
The overseas transports fly in and out of here around the clock.
There's always a constant flow of men to fill them.
You mean this isn't unusual?
No, it's pretty much the picture any hour of the night or day.
RUTH:
Where will their next stop be?
Well, their destination is the closest airfield to the front.
Two days from now, they'll be ready to go into action with their units.
This waiting around to move out is the one thing that gets them down.
There's nothing to do but just wait.
The hours drag and they get pretty bored.
[PLAYING PIANO]
We even rigged this up.
Don't stop.
- Hi.
- Hi.
Hello.
- Gee, it sounds wonderful.
- Thank you.
That left hand sounds like it came from a way down yonder in New Orleans.
- No, ma'am. Hoboken, New Jersey.
RUTH: Oh?
Now you know that all good jazz comes from Hoboken, New Jersey.
What was the name of that?
Oh, that was just a little thing
I sort of whipped up for myself.
- Well, don't just sit there. Un-whip it.
- All right.
Hi, fellas.
Look, this whole thing is a surprise to us.
We didn't come prepared.
But we do have Doris Day.
How would you like to hear her do a number?
Well, Hoboken, what do we both know, huh?
MAN [O VER SPEAKERS]:
Attention, please.
All military personnel
for Special Flight 18...
... will depart on Flight 92.
Report to Gate 1 immediately.
That's me. I guess they just won't leave without me.
I'm sorry, Miss Day.
- You mean you have to go right now?
- I sure do. I'm glad to have met you.
Report to Gate 1 immediately.
Goodbye, good luck.
Anybody here play piano?
MAN: You don't need a piano.
- Well, I need something.
Hey, what's in the jukebox, my friend?
- How about "'S Wonderful?"
- It's wonderful.
["'S WONDERFUL" PLAYS
ON JUKEBO X]
[SINGING]
Wonderful
It's marvelous
You should care for me
It's awful nice
It's paradise
It's what I love to see
You've made my life so glamorous
You can't blame me
For feeling amorous
Oh, it's wonderful
It's marvelous
That you should care for me
My dears, it's four-leaf clover time
From now on
My heart's workin' overtime
Oh, it's wonderful
It's so marvelous
That you should care for me
It's wonderful, marvelous, glorious
It's glamorous
That you should care for me.
MAN:
Your attention, please.
All personnel for Flight 77,
report to Gate 3 immediately.
- Your attention, please.
- Seventy-seven is Rick's flight.
We didn't even get a chance to say goodbye.
Let's talk to the colonel.
I'm sure he can fix it.
- Yeah.
- Fine thing.
First my piano player, then my audience walks out.
You know, I feel like a second lieutenant up here.
Things ain't bad enough.
Now I gotta airlift those same guys...
...that fouled up the most beautiful day of my life.
For 2 cents, I'd go back there and really tell them off.
Here's a nickel.
- Oh, I don't wanna make a profit.
MAN 1: Come on, come on, let's go.
MAN 2:
Fireguard on Number 3.
MAN 1:
Start Number 3.
It happens every time we start an engine.
Here.
Ready to taxi.
MAN 3: The colonel wants Corporal Rick Williams.
Only take a minute.
Williams.
Hey, Williams.
- Get moving, the colonel wants you.
- Oh, yes, sir.
Hey, that's them.
- They must wanna see me too, sir.
- Say, you made a fast recovery.
Girls work better on me than Dramamine.
Yeah, well just lie down again, Rover, nobody asked for you.
Oh, skipper.
I almost missed you. In another minute, you'd have been gone.
Well, gee, is this plane being held up for me?
Well, us, with a little help from Colonel Callan.
I couldn't let you get away without this.
- I know it'll bring you luck.
MAN 1: Hey, what are you waiting for?
Stop stalling, Romeo, kiss her.
Come on, corporal, you're holding up the war.
- Once for me, corporal.
MAN 2: Kiss her.
What are you waiting for?
- You want her to show you how?
- I think I know what they wanna see.
MAN 3: Hey.
MAN 4: Hey, Rick.
Hey, Rick.
- Bye.
- Bye.
Bye. Write me.
Tower to 77.
Runway 2-1, right, cleared for takeoff.
Where's that one from?
CALLAN:
Same place the other one left for.
Sort of like Grand Central Station, isn't it?
CALLAN:
In a way.
The planes go out carrying troops to the war zone.
Then they come back as hospital ships, bringing the wounded home.
You've just told some of the boys goodbye.
- How about telling some hello?
- Okay.
- Hi, colonel.
- Hello there.
- Don't remember me, do you?
- You do look familiar to me.
A week ago today, I was on the carpet in your office.
Say, send that blond WAC around and I'll apologize to her.
Hi, babes.
Drop up and see me sometime.
And I thought I was doing him a favor by not putting him in the guardhouse.
- Well, hello.
- Well, hello. Welcome to California.
I sure am getting around.
Day before yesterday, they put this cast on my arm in Tokyo.
- Really?
- But what am I doing in Hollywood?
- Oh, this isn't Hollywood.
- What are you doing here?
We're the reception committee.
Hey, here's something even the draft board didn't even promise us.
You're only dreaming, boys, it isn't so.
Come on, over to the ambulance.
Seems as if we're snafuing the airlift.
See you fellas later.
Oh, colonel.
If John Wayne's up here, have him see me later.
Colonel, what happens to them now?
Tomorrow or the next day...
...we'll fly them to the general hospital that's closest to their homes.
That's the toughest waiting there is.
That waiting to get home.
It's a pity you have to get back to San Francisco.
There are 3OO boys at that hospital who didn't get a chance to see you.
- I'll flip you to see who calls the theater.
- I'll do it and I'll square you with Louella.
We're on.
MAN:
Right in here, boys.
Yeah, I think this spot's about as good as any.
Set them up as soon as possible.
The girls will be along any minute.
Hey, what goes, sir?
Company's coming.
Female. And pretty.
Better get through with that shave.
Girls?
Hey, nurse.
Just a minute.
Mom, there's nothing to be upset about.
Tomorrow, they're flying me to an army hospital in Philadelphia.
I'll call you and you can come and see for yourself.
Mom, will you let me talk to Joe?
Joe, will you please calm her down?
Now, don't you start it.
I tell you I'm okay.
CALLAN:
All right, fellas, here they are.
- Hi.
- Hi.
Holy mackerel.
Just drift around. You won't have any trouble getting acquainted.
Joe? Doris Day's coming straight at my bed.
No, I'm not out of my head.
My brother thinks I'm seeing things.
- Would you say hello to him for me?
- Sure.
Hi.
This is Doris Day. Honest, it is.
Well? Oh.
He doesn't even believe you.
He says if you're Doris Day, you'll have to prove it.
- Do you have to pay for this call?
- San Francisco newspaper pays for them.
Okay.
[SINGING] Come on along and listen
To the lullaby of Broadway
The hip hooray and ballyhoo
The lullaby of Broadway
Convinced?
He says for me to get off the line, he wants to talk to you.
Hi, Joe.
Wait till they see that in Omaha.
- Thanks, Miss Roman.
- You may call me Ruth.
Okay, Ruth. May I have your autograph,
Miss Wayne?
Sure.
- Do you know Jimmy Cagney?
- Mm-hm.
The quicker you get this cast off your arm...
...the quicker I'll get his autograph for you. Deal?
- You bet. Thanks.
- You're welcome.
Nurse.
Oh, nurse.
Hello, can I help?
You can remind that nurse that 1 O minutes ago, she started to shave me.
She looks pretty busy.
Say, maybe I can give you the once over lightly.
- Oh, you don't have to, Miss Roman.
- Quiet. I hear you're a big tipper.
Well, how do you like it? Close?
Oh, just as close as possible.
[SINGING]
You, you and you and you
Ought to be in pictures
You're wonderful to see
You ought to be in pictures
Oh, what a hit you would be
Your voice would thrill a nation
Your face would be adored
You'd make a great sensation
With wealth and fame your reward
And if you should kiss
The way you kiss
When we are all alone
You'd make every girl and man a fan
Worshipping at your throne
You ought to shine as brightly
As Jupiter and Mars
You ought to be in pictures
My star of stars
'Cause you do something to me
Something that simply mystifies me
Tell me why should it be
You have the power to hypnotize me
Let me live 'neath your spell
Do do that
voodoo that
You do so well
For you
Do something to me
That nobody else could do
That nobody else could do
- We thank you girls for coming up.
- We loved it.
I don't have to tell you the effect your visit had on the morale of those boys.
The boys did something for our morale too.
- Think you could come up again?
- We have to.
We had a ward and six rooms to go when they called lights out.
- I promised we'd be back.
- How soon?
- Hm. I'm in the middle of a picture.
- Oh, dear, so am I.
Well, I'm not.
As I pass the word around, there'll be others who'll want to come up with me.
Good.
You do the word-passing tomorrow.
Saturday morning, I'll have a plane at
Lockheed Airport at 9:3O to fly them up.
That's kind of short notice, isn't it?
The Air Force thrives on short notice.
You get them, we'll fly them.
Okay, colonel, we'll get them.
[SINGING]
What is this thing
Called love?
This funny thing called love
[SINGING]
Just who can solve its mystery?
Why should it make a fool of me?
I saw you there one wonderful day
You took my heart and threw it away
- That's why I ask the Lord
- That's why I ask the Lord
- In heaven above
- In heaven above
- What is this thing called love?
- What is this thing called love?
And then I saw you there
One wonderful day
You took my heart and threw it away
- That's why I ask the Lord
- That's why I ask the Lord
- In heaven above
- In heaven above
- What is this thing called love?
- What is this thing called love?
Cut.
Very good, kids, very good.
- Okay?
- Fine. Perfect.
- Can I play golf?
- Finish your game and go to brothers.
Okay, thanks. I'll be right back.
- I've gotta see how Ruth is doing.
- You and Gene are in the next shot.
- Okay.
- Fine.
- Got a cigarette, pappy?
- Right.
Look, Mr. Norris, if we have to phone everybody on the casting directory...
...we're going to load that plane tomorrow morning.
And I'm not gonna disappoint the boys.
Because I promised Colonel Callan we'd be up there.
Oh, Ruth, I wish you'd stop making me out a heel.
The whole purpose of our committee is to supply talent for camp shows.
But there's a set procedure for it.
First, they make an official request.
- Then we check it.
NELL: Mr. Norris.
There isn't time to check it.
We made a promise.
And we intend to keep it.
So in my book, you still add up to a heel.
Miss Riley, your boss, Louella Parsons, got me into this.
Get her on the phone and have her explain the facts of life.
Louella's on their side. And so am I.
And what's more, both of us wanna be counted in on the trip.
Louella was right when she said this adds up to a much bigger story...
...than Nell being in love with a soldier.
- Where did she get that idea?
- Honey, Louella's a reporter.
When a girl in this town ducks out on her first premiere...
...to say goodbye to a hometown boy, it must be love.
Oh, I shoulve guessed there was a romance.
- Congratulations, Nell.
- Thank you.
Nell, now that Mr. Norris knows the true story...
...see if you can break him down.
I'm waiting for Mr. Norris to say yes.
- Hello, colonel.
- Thought you were shooting today.
Wouldn't do much good.
The cast decided to come.
- It's nice to see you again.
- Nice to see you.
Meet Patrice Wymore.
- How do you do?
- Hello there, so nice to meet you.
Colonel Callan, this is Gordon MacRae.
- How are you, colonel?
- Glad to meet you.
This group is really gonna set the boys whistling.
Well, the all-girl band was Pat's idea.
- I hope the boys enjoy the show.
- I'm sure they will.
Hey, I think I'll do a little whistling myself.
You know something?
I might join you.
[BOTH WHISTLE]
[CHUCKLING]
[SINGING]
Listen to my story
About a gal named Liza
Liza, skies are gray
But if you smile on me
All the clouds'll roll away
Liza, Liza, don't delay
Come keep me company
And the clouds'll roll away
See the honeymoon is shinin' down
We should make a date
With Parson Brown
So, Liza, Liza, name the day
When you belong to me
And the clouds will roll away
Thank you very much. Now we have a great surprise in store for you.
We're gonna teach you what every soldier should know:
How to bake a pousse-caf cake.
We proudly present Chef Ebberly.
Chef, take a bow.
Noonan, where's the chef?
Got sick eating his cooking,
I'm gonna imitate him. Don't worry.
- Let's go, come on.
- Here we go, here we go.
- To help you, I'll read the commercials.
- Don't worry about it.
[IN ITALIAN ACCENT]
Hello, soldier boys. Hello.
Hello. Hello.
Well, boys, today is the day.
Today, I'm gonna teach you how to make a pousse-caf cake with 11 layers.
You ready? Good.
Let's commence, huh?
First thing what we gonna do, check everything what we gonna use.
First, we check our mixing bowl.
Mixing bowl? Mixing bowl?
Where are they?
Here's our mixing bowl.
Next, our mixing fork.
Here's our mixing fork.
Must be dainty, huh?
That's how you stir.
Next, your finger bowl.
Here's your finger bowl.
That's a few fingers.
Remember the old saying, cleanliness is next...
Well, now we gonna check all the liquors, what we gonna use, eh?
Show you how you're gonna do.
You read what she says on the outside...
...and then you gonna taste and make sure she's inside.
Start first with a bourbon.
That's bourbon.
Rum.
That's rum.
Vodka.
Gin.
That's a gin, I hate gin, I don't like it.
Blue Galliano.
Cherry Herring.
I like a Cherry Herring. I like.
Well, we all set.
We ready to begin, eh?
Why don't we begin with Layer Number 1, Blue Galliano, eh?
Blue Galliano.
Take your Blue Galliano...
Take your Blue Galliano and move your hands, sprinkle around your bowl.
Go the left, never to the right, up to the market.
What do you know, we're pushing it too much, your Blue Galliano.
I'll show you what we do in a case like those.
You take your glass, you tilt your bowl and you scoop, eh?
Boys, to save time, don't try to put them back in the bottle.
The tops are so small, you're gonna spill your drink, eh?
- Thank you very much.
- We're going to use flour.
We'll use Good Old flour, it's free-flowing.
You can keep it in wet places, it'll never harden or get lumpy.
Not good old, free-flowing flour. Chef?
Never, never. Thank you, Johnny.
- You're doing a wonderful job.
- Thank you, chef.
Take your free-flowing flour, put your free-flowing flour...
Next, what you gonna use is up to your own taste.
For instance, you could use bourbon.
You could use it.
Rum.
You could use it.
Blue Galliano.
Don't use.
Cherry Herring.
I like Cherry Herring. I like.
One dash hurts nobody, eh?
Now we use E-G-G, egg, John, yes.
We're gonna use Good Old eggs, they're not as costly as other eggs.
The reason being they've been stored...
...but they're as fresh as the day they were laid. Chef?
- John, you're doing a wonderful job.
- Thank you, chef.
Thank you, John, you're doing a wonderful job.
Thank you.
Break the egg easy.
Rum. Remember, let your fingers...
[CHICKS CHIRPING]
Hello, chicky.
Hello. Hello, chicky.
Now, we're ready for crme de menthe, huh?
Hold the crme de menthe in one hand, take your other hand and cup your hand.
Now, pour in the cup in your hand four drops, eh?
One, two, three, four.
And slowly open up your fingers.
And remember, you can use fingers to keep your hands because...
What are you gonna...?
Remember, you got your fingers like this.
Remember, you...
Forget it, you got your fingers...
...and keep your hands nice and clean because without them, who then?
Now we use fruit.
- Fruit.
- Thank you very much.
- Thank you.
- We're gonna use Good Old bananas.
Because Good Old bananas are real good. Chef?
- You're doing a wonderful John, job.
- Thank you, chef.
Thank you, John.
- You're doing a wonderful job.
- Thank you, chef.
Thank you, John, you're doing a wonderful job.
- Well, thank you, chef.
- Thank you, John.
You're doing a wonderful job.
- Thank you, chef.
- You're welcome.
Remember, when you got your fruit, don't bruise your fruit...
...because when you bruise your fruit you'll hurt your cake.
Take your fruit nice and gentle...
...and squeeze them in the pan nice and easy.
When you get them in going nice...
...remember, you got your fingers to keep your hands nice and clean.
Now you're gonna knead it.
When I say knead it,
I mean knead it...
...and when you get your knee in it, then you're getting pretty good.
- We have to get...
- Shut your face.
- Tommy.
- Now use your Cherry Herring.
- Chef... Tom, look...
- That's good Cherry Herring.
You know what you could do with this?
You could put it behind your ears, smells nice.
- Fellas, Chef...
- Use it for hair tonic if you want.
- Tommy.
- Want me to tell them the truth?
- Don't tell them.
- [IN NORMAL VOICE] I'm Irish.
- Chef, please.
- I'm an Irish tenor.
- Listen.
- We have to go.
- [SINGING] When Irish eyes are smiling
- Thanks.
Come on, chef. Let's get back there.
Thank you, fellas.
Hey, we'll see you later at the hospital, huh?
- Okay. We'll wait there.
- We'll be waiting for you.
- Lf that isn't a promise, we don't go.
- It's a promise.
It's nice of you girls to come down here to welcome the boys home.
When the word gets out, they'll be flying without the plane.
Hey, they're still out there, ain't they?
Yeah.
That gabby nurse is liable to keep them out there forever.
Look, buster, this is enough to drive a man crazy.
Those beautiful dames are waiting to fall in my arms...
...and you're making me hide like a dope.
- Now, be reasonable.
- You stay put, will you?
It's your big mouth that got me into this jam.
Telling everybody we're going off to war.
So now we're back. We're veterans.
You show your face out there and so help me, I'll slug you.
Take it easy.
We're both on the same side.
I'm not so sure.
Would you like to come aboard?
- Oh, sure.
- We'd love to.
We brought in 55 boys this trip.
Most of them were ambulatory cases.
They walk off and don't need litter.
- When did you leave Tokyo?
- Forty-seven hours, 1 O minutes ago.
We refueled and changed crews at Wake in Honolulu.
Look, you've forgotten someone.
NELL:
Rick.
Are you all right?
Don't you think you're a little big to be playing hide-and-seek.
I don't feel so good.
You scared me half to death.
I thought you were wounded.
Him? Wounded?
He only flies back and forth between here and Honolulu.
Well, well. I see we've landed.
When you're bragging around the barracks...
...about how I fell for your departing hero act...
...remember just one thing.
I think it was a low, contemptible trick.
Don't worry, kid.
She's just surprised to see you.
She's not gonna be the only one surprised.
According to the 716 newspapers that carry Louella Parsons' column...
...you're at the front.
You see, you oversold us, we overdid it, and now we're all in a spot.
Nothing that can't be fixed.
Just leave everything to me.
Haven't you fixed enough already?
Stay out of this, will you?
Boy, gee, Rick.
He wants me to stay out of it.
How do you like that?
That kis getting ready for a psycho ward.
You're the boy who can show him the way.
Yeah.
- In trouble, corporal?
- Yes, sir.
She's mad at me because I didn't come back wounded.
Oh, I guess she's got a right to be.
Buster, there's no limit to what a little brainwork can do.
Everything's under control.
Ruth walks me over to Louella Parsons.
"Miss Parsons," she says,
"Look who I found. Rick's buddy."
I says, "Hi, Louella.
Special orders turned us around in Honolulu."
She says, "Isn't that wonderful?"
Then everybody ran to tell Nell the big news.
You're in like a burglar, boy.
Life can be beautiful again.
Well, say something.
This malt tastes like goat's milk with a goat thrown in.
At a time like this, with love hanging in the balance with a silken thread...
...you're worried about a chocolate malt.
You keep acting like this, boy...
...and I think I can spring you out of the Air Force.
Have you seen
Louella Parsons' column?
Seen it? I've memorized it.
If Nell Wayne, beautiful Warner Bros. Starlet...
...isn't accepting any dates...
...it's because of Corporal Rick Williams, now overseas.
A boy from her hometown and her own private hero.
What a buildup.
The heroes of Waikiki Beach.
That's us.
It does taste like goat's milk.
Bah.
- Corporal Rick Williams to see you, sir.
- Send him in, sergeant.
- Corporal Williams.
- Colonel...
...could I have a little talk with you?
- Sure. What's on your mind, corporal?
Well...
...at least once a month now since I've been here...
...I put in a request to be transferred to a combat unit.
Nothing's happened.
That's probably because you're needed where you are.
Men flying the transports are doing a vital job.
But the same thing's happening to me that happened to the mice.
- Mice?
- Yes, sir.
You see, there was a scientist.
He was experimenting with some mice.
Well, he put them in a little chute and at one end there was some cheese.
But before they could get to the cheese, they fell through a trapdoor.
When they'd run at the cheese, they'd fall through the trapdoor.
Do you know what happened to those mice, sir?
Yes, I read the article.
They went crazy.
Exactly.
And that's just what the Air Force is doing to me.
All I do is fly back and forth...
...back and forth between here and Honolulu.
Look, sir, before I go out of my mind...
...I gotta fly out of here just once...
...and not have that trapdoor sprung on me at Hickam Field.
Corporal, with Miss Wayne up here, if your mind is still on mice...
...you'll be a credit to a combat unit.
Put in another request.
It'll have to go through channels but I'll speed it up.
Thank you, sir.
- Oh, Williams?
- Yes, sir.
Been up to the hospital lately?
- No, sir.
- Louella Parsons is looking for you.
Me, sir?
Come along.
- You can ride up with me.
- Yes, sir.
- All right, corporal.
- Yes, sir.
- Rick, darling.
- Hello.
We were ready to send a search party out for you.
- So you're Rick.
- Yes, ma'am.
Nell, I approve. I like him.
We were just about to join the others for lunch.
You come along too, Rick.
You're elected guest of honor.
Would you think it awful of me if I wanted to have lunch with Rick alone?
- We have so much to talk about.
- Why, of course not.
But don't you try any disappearing act.
I have a special reason for wanting the two of you...
...at the hospital auditorium tonight.
- Don't worry. We'll be there.
- That's a promise.
- Bye-bye.
- Goodbye.
- You can ride with me.
- Oh, thank you, colonel.
Be at the corporal's and Miss Wayne's disposal.
Yes, sir.
Why did you have to show up?
Couldn't you have found a rock to crawl under?
- Hey, what's going on? A minute ago...
- Get this straight.
We are a big human-interest story.
According to Louella Parsons...
...our romance was the start of Hollywood people coming up here.
They're doing a wonderful job.
Couldn't spoil it by telling them what a phony you are.
Oh, well, that's big-hearted of you.
Don't tell me you're not happy about it.
You're a big success, corporal.
Before the day's over, you'll probably be a sergeant.
Do me a favor, will you, and stop interfering in my life.
- Me, interfering?
- Yes, you.
Who started all this?
Who was it who came up to my hotel?
Who was it that blabbed to Louella Parsons? Who was it that...?
Never mind. Sergeant, stop the car.
- Where do you think you're going?
- Back to the barracks.
I'm posted in operations to go out tonight.
The troop is dying to meet you. So while they're here, we're gonna be together.
Suit yourself, but I'm going to bed.
MAN [O VER SPEAKER]: This is a special
night up here, men. Hollywood takes over.
And to get things started...
... here's Gordon MacRae
with a vocal assist by the Air Force.
[SINGING]
Let me stand
With the grip of the plow in my hand
On the good green acres of home
My land
Where a friend is treasured
And your wealth is measured
By the strength of heart
And hand
- Let me live
- Let me live
With the sun and the wind
And the rain
While I plant my acres
With golden grain
Let me build my love nest
With a stick and stone
On the good green acres
Of home
Everybody, sing.
MEN [SINGING]:
Let me stand with the grip
Of the plow in my hand
On the good green acres of home
My land
Where a friend is treasured
And your wealth is measured
By the strength of heart
And hand
MEN: Let me live with the sun
And the wind and the rain
While I plant my acres
With golden grain
Let me build my love nest
With a stick and stone
On the good green acres of home
My home
The good green acres
Of home
Where's Rick?
He hasn't shown up yet.
No?
Well, I'm expecting him any minute.
He probably overslept.
Well, what happens now?
After the note I sent him begging him to come here...
...if he doesn't show up, I'll...
- Take it easy, Nell.
Now, men, Nell Wayne and Gene Nelson,
assisted by the Cheerleaders...
... showing you what happens
when things don't come naturally.
"It's Magic!"
You know, things that I've done lately sure would frighten you.
If you care to listen, I'll enlighten you.
[SINGING]
I'm sure Houdini and his crew
Couldn't do the things I do
See what I mean?
I simply think of someone unattainable
That's when things become
So unexplainable
I merely turn my thoughts to her
And the miracles occur
When I recall her kiss
I suddenly go up like this, it's magic
Don't ask me why or how
I only know it's happening now
It's magic
And then those voices start
To fill the air
I hear a melody
And suddenly they're there
And then
To chase the gloom
Her smile makes all the roses bloom
It's magic
I just remove my gloves
And suddenly they're two white doves
It's magic
Oh, why I ask myself
If I can do all the things that I do
Why can't I find a magic way or word
To bring me you
Doo, doo, doo
Bah, bah
You, you, you, you're in trouble
Knew you'd be seeing double
Boo, boo
Bah, bah, ba doo bah
Don't! You won't like it
GENE: Oh no?
CHORUS: You'll be sorry
She's a doll
CHORUS: Doo, doo, doo, doo
Doo, doo, doo, doo
Doo-doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo
You sigh, the song begins
You sing and I hear violins play
It's magic
The stars desert the skies
And rush to nestle in your eyes
It's magic
Without a golden wand
Or mystic charm
Fantastic things begin
When I am in your arms
Why do I tell myself?
These things that happen
Are already true
When in my heart I know
The magic is my love
For you
Pardon me, sir.
Some newspaper people are here to see Miss Parsons.
She's in one of the hospital wards talking to the boys.
- Better phone her.
- Yes.
Wait. I can handle this.
Hi, fellas.
Well, what kept you?
Shock. Whoever heard of Louella Parsons cutting the working press in on a yarn?
This is one story she's willing to share with the opposition.
- What story?
- Spill it, George.
Well, it's simply this:
A planeload of show folks came up here and entertained the troops going out...
...and the wounded coming home.
The boys liked it. I think those coming after will like it too.
People of Hollywood would consider it a privilege to carry on what was started.
You bought yourself a deal, George.
You supply the talent,
I'll supply the planes.
You know,
I think I have a name for it.
I heard a Marine use it in a ward this afternoon.
He called it "Operation Starlift."
There's your story, boys.
MAN: We want all of it.
How did this thing get started?
Well, last week in San Francisco...
...when Nell Wayne and the gang were up for a premiere...
...a boy from Nell's hometown...
Hold it for another, Miss Wayne.
All right, get a little closer, corporal.
Gotta make this look good for your public.
Your nasty mind would come up with something like that.
MAN: Okay, one more now, let's make this a real goodbye shot.
Good. Then we'll make this the goodbye of goodbyes.
MAN: Miss Wayne, Mr. Rogers.
- Have her come in.
Have a seat, Nell.
Am I very much in the doghouse?
On Saturday, you girls sabotaged an entire day's shooting schedule.
Mr. Prinz said we didn't hold up anything.
Said he had plenty to shoot without us.
Mr. Prinz is a sucker for romance.
He's under the influence of the pictures he's made.
And speaking of romance...
...you know, Nell...
...I like the looks of this fellow.
Then I'm not fired?
No.
And listen to this.
- Miss Taylor, take this memo to Casting.
WOMAN: Yes, sir.
Effective today supply the Hollywood coordinating committee...
...with lists of contract talent available...
...for personal appearances at Travis Air Base.
That's wonderful, Mr. Rogers.
We supplied shows to the Armed Forces through the last war.
All they have to do is call on us and we're ready.
Happy? Then this will make you happier.
The base has asked for a special show for tomorrow.
Gary Cooper and Phil Harris are taking a troop up.
The Starlift plane leaves at 5.
With a little arranging, you can be on it.
I don't wanna go, Mr. Rogers.
- What? Why?
- It's a personal problem.
I'd rather not talk about it.
But I thought this is what you wanted.
I think I'd better go, Mr. Rogers.
- There you are.
- Hi, Mom.
Hello.
Honey...
...we've had the nicest surprise.
You must remember
Dr. And Mrs. Williams.
Hello.
I'm afraid l...
Rick's father and mother from Youngstown.
Oh, yes.
We were driving through to see Rick at the airbase.
They'd have gone right on...
...if they hadn't seen
Louella Parsons' article.
LOUISE:
Rick hadn't written us a word.
You can imagine how surprised we were.
You're in for a surprise too.
Rick's here.
- What?
- Uh-huh.
- Yes, he's upstairs, getting cleaned up.
DR. WILLIAMS: It was your das idea.
So instead of driving up to camp, we phoned Rick...
...he got himself a pass and flew down.
You shoulve seen his face when we met him at the airport.
- He had no idea we knew each other.
- He was absolutely speechless.
You know, I certainly am proud of those teeth of yours.
Thank you, doctor.
Hurry and get your makeup off.
Dinner's almost ready.
Excuse me, please.
Hello.
Why didn't you tell them the truth?
How could I tell them with your folks there?
- Have you told them?
- How could I with your folks there?
Great.
- How long will you be here?
- Until tomorrow evening.
Well, I guess
I'll have to stand it somehow.
Yeah, well, if gets too painful,
Dad will give you a shot of Novocaine.
- Rick, dear, have some more coffee.
- Oh, no thanks, Mrs. Wayne.
See, I'm full.
Well, thanks for a wonderful meal.
My, I just can't get over how Rick has grown.
Yes. Hasn't he?
Come on, Mom.
You said you were leaving the dishes.
If we're going to the movies, we better hurry.
- I'll be ready in a minute.
- Wait a minute. I better fix my hair.
Just a moment.
Who said you were going?
You kids don't wanna go out with us tonight.
It's Rick's only night in town.
Sure. Go out and hit some of the nightspots.
Here's the key to the car.
Well, see you at the hotel.
Whenever you get there.
SUE: Goodbye, have fun.
LOUISE: Good night.
And remember, be careful with that new car.
- Good night, honey.
- Good night, Dad.
Well, guess I'll have to make reservations.
Where would you prefer to go?
Mocambo's or Ciro's?
Suit yourself.
I suppose either one will have photographers...
...just waiting to take your picture.
- Usually.
Naturally.
Don't you people even sneeze or scratch your nose around here...
...without somebody snapping your picture?
Look, wherever we go tonight, we're gonna see people I know.
- You can at least try to act pleasant.
- Acting is your game, not mine.
Boy, if I ever get through tonight,
I'll deserve an Academy Award.
Well, then suppose we just skip the big performance.
- I'll see you in the movies.
- Where are you going?
Back to the hotel.
Oh, and here's your good luck charm.
- I was doing better without it.
- Thanks.
Good night.
Nell?
Come in, Dad.
What are you doing home? I thought you and Rick were out gallivanting.
We didn't go anywhere.
I was kind of tired.
- So was Rick.
- Oh?
- Where's Mom?
- Whipping up a snack.
- I was hungry. How about you?
- No thanks, Dad.
Well, good night, honey.
Dad?
Yes?
Dad.
Am I a phony?
Well...
...I never thought so.
But I could be prejudiced.
Rick thinks I'm a phony.
[LAUGHING]
Suppose you tell me what you two had the beef about?
Come on.
Some other time, Dad.
Okay, honey.
They'll be out here for breakfast tomorrow morning.
Now, if it was your fault, tell him you're sorry.
Even if it wasn't your fault, tell him you're sorry anyhow.
That's what your mother does with me and it's never failed yet.
Thanks, Dad.
See you in the morning.
- Hi, Louise. Hi, doc. Come on in.
LOUISE: Good morning.
- Isn't it a lovely day?
- Hi.
Yes.
- Where's Rick?
- Gone back to the base.
We put him on the plane at 6:OO this morning.
NELL:
Why?
He didn't have to go back until tonight.
Telegram came canceling his furlough.
The rascal put in for overseas duty and got it.
Rick's always been funny about goodbyes.
That's why he didn't wanna call you.
He said he'd write.
He wouldn't let us drive him up there.
And besides, we couldn't get on the base.
Well, I can.
Mom, would you call the airport...
...and make a reservation on the first plane to San Francisco?
MIKE:
The dope's ducking you again.
His group doesn't leave until tomorrow.
So to get off the base, he's going on a training flight to March Field.
I'm gonna tell operations colonel wants Rick's plane held.
If this doesn't work, come and see me in the guardhouse.
- I've got to see Colonel Callan.
- Have you got a pass?
I don't need a pass,
I've been here before.
I'm sorry.
I think you'd better wait here.
Lieutenant, you know
I'm allowed on the flight line.
Not with boys like these coming in.
[MEN WHISTLING AND HOOTING]
MAN 1:
Where's Frisco?
Our first bunch of rotation troops back from combat.
Twelve planeloads of those fellows coming in at 2O-minute intervals.
MAN 2:
Hey, Carl, let's go.
If you go out there, we'll never get this gang off the field...
...and we need the busses.
MAN 3: Lieutenant.
- Excuse me.
No luck, kid.
Rick's plane had already taken off.
Well, guess there's no use bothering the colonel about it now.
When that dope gets back, if he doesn't kick himself over the base, I'll do it.
Why, Mike...
...that's the first nice thing you've said to me all day.
- How about lunch?
- Got any money?
Come on.
You'll be notified when they leave March Field?
The minute they file their flight plan.
Thanks.
No word yet?
Hey, the Starlift plane is in.
Virginia Mayo is on it.
Anybody else?
Gary Cooper and Phil Harris and a bunch of others.
But I stopped looking when Virginia Mayo walked off.
Man, how I'd like to be trapped in a foxhole with about 12 like her.
What a way to win the Purple Heart.
They all went over to the hospital.
Mayo too.
I was just thinking that, uh...
Hm. That if we went over to the hospital...
Well, um...
- Come on, Mike.
- Easy, girl.
That's my saluting arm.
Oh, Miss Mayo, Miss Gibson, would you step in a little closer?
Well, look what I found.
Hi, you pretty things.
- Well, if it isn't Phil Harris.
- You got room for one more, doll?
Sure, come on in.
Okay, you can start shooting, son.
That camera ain't never had it so good.
Mr. Harris, you're crowding out
Miss Mayo and Miss Gibson.
Do you want them in too?
I'm sorry I usually work alone.
Now, let's see. Now, lay it on us.
I can't get you all in.
Mr. Harris, would you mind stepping out?
Well, no. Not at all.
This is my bad side anyway.
- Hi, colonel.
- Your turn's coming, Phil.
- Some of the nurses have cameras.
- Oh, yeah? Color or black and white?
Oh, colonel, is Gary Cooper really downstairs?
- Yes, he was a moment ago.
- Thanks.
Excuse me, mister.
Cooper? I could have them slapping my face while he's saying "yup."
Don't let her throw you.
Girls will be girls.
I know.
And I wouldn't want it any other way.
- Gin.
- You never shoulve thrown that nine.
He's got two of them stashed away.
You better get some sleep, kid.
Look, the jack is your play.
What's the top card? Eight.
See? Now he's got to discard a nine and then you go down with two.
Say, mister, you really know this game.
Look, son, I've been fooling with them little tickets all my life.
- You don't say.
- Right.
I make so much money playing cards
I can afford to play honest now.
- You've been pretty lucky.
- No, I ain't been pretty lucky.
You gotta understand them
52 little monsters.
Look, I figure a card is like a woman.
Pick it up, study it and just when you're deciding whether or not to hold it...
...put it down, somebody else picks it up.
The guy's a philosopher.
- How would you like to play his hand?
- Save your money, I'll just watch.
Oh I'm... I'm quitting anyway.
Make yourself comfortable.
Thanks, but look, stick around...
...and I'll stop after every hand and explain how I won it.
You know us country boys could use pointers.
- How much will it cost me?
- We'll just play for fun.
No, my father told me,
"Never play cards for fun."
How about a cent a point?
Well, okay.
I'll take another cent on Turner if you can stand it.
- Hey, count me in for a cent.
- I'll take two.
Don't leave me out.
I want a penny too.
Sounds like you all had the same father.
Look, you could lose a chunk of dough.
So can you.
[SPEAKS IN FRENCH]
That's French for I hate to do this to you, Mac.
I'll risk it. Cut for deal.
- You win, but I'll shuffle.
- We'll shuffle.
You guys must have taken your basic training in Las Vegas.
Well, where do you go to surrender?
Say, aren't you Phil Harris?
That's what's embroidered on my shorts.
[PHIL LAUGHS]
Your play, Phil.
[PHIL SPEAKS IN FRENCH]
Sounds like Phil Harris.
- Wanna meet him?
- Yeah, after I meet Virginia Mayo.
Mike, you've got a one-track mind.
That's right.
Now get me to the station.
NELL: Pardon us, please.
MIKE: Pardon.
[BAND PLAYING]
Mr. Rogers. What are you doing here?
Well, for one thing, I thought
I'd make sure you got to work tomorrow.
You didn't have to do that.
Besides, I wanted to see what was going on.
Woman at 3 o'clock.
WOMAN [SINGING]:
I may be wrong
But I think you're wonderful
I may be wrong
But I think you're swell
I like your style, say
I think it's marvelous
I'm always wrong so how can I tell
All of my hats are unsightly
All of my shoes are a crime
lf, dear, in you I picked rightly
It's the very first time
You came along, say
I think you're wonderful
I think you're grand
But I may be wrong
Wish I could trust my emotions
But sometimes I'm not very wise
I get the craziest notions
About the craziest guys
You're big and strong, oh, say
I think you're wonderful
I think you're grand
But I may be wrong
I've heard that all's fair
In love and war
So must you be so polite?
I may have been wrong
Many times before
But I'm all so right tonight
Oh, sergeant, you better close that, you're creating a draft.
Gee, Miss Wyman, that was wonderful.
I got the feeling you were singing just to me.
Well, I could hardly help it.
- Cigarette?
- Oh, yes, thanks a lot.
- Match?
- Oh, thanks a lot.
Marriage?
Thanks a lot.
[PEOPLE LAUGHING]
How long will you be? We're invited to dinner to the officers' mess.
You go ahead,
I got my own mess right here.
- Sounds like you're stuck.
- Stuck?
I'm climbing all over these guys.
Killing them.
- Gin.
- Oh, no.
Now, you see what you did?
You threw my timing off.
Pour it on him, boys.
- Count them up, curly.
- All right, all right.
Twenty, 3O...
You're out on all three games.
Somebody's been fooling with these figures.
- You're keeping the score.
- I don't trust nobody.
[WHISTLES]
Three hundred and eighty-six, sixty.
I'm sure grateful for these lessons.
You don't have to make a pig of yourself and take a postgraduate course.
Mr. Rogers phoned. He was worried about your missing dinner.
I told him you were dining with us.
Liver and onions.
I expected bread crumbs...
...ain't that what they feed pigeons?
- Don't be bitter, curly. Deal.
- I'm dealing, I'm dealing.
Mr. Rogers will pick you up on his way to the theater.
Tell him never mind.
I may have to enlist to get even.
I doubt if I can swallow or not.
My throat's been cut.
Did it get through?
Play.
[BAND PLAYS FANFARE]
Welcome home, fellas.
I'm Randy Scott, pinch-hitting for Phil Harris...
...who was supposed to be here emceeing the show.
Terrible thing happened to Phil up at the hospital.
He kibitzed himself into a gin rummy game.
Any of you Eighth Army men ever hear of a fella named Turner?
MEN:
Harris will be sorry.
I'm sure he'll be with us when he runs out to tear buckets.
Meanwhile, let's get on with the show.
When you men started flying the Pacific...
...l'm sure you all looked over the travel folders.
You saw beautiful pictures of lush island paradises.
And lovely maidens dancing beneath swaying tropical palms.
Did you find anything like that?
MEN:
No!
That's what we figured.
So here's Virginia Mayo...
...to give you her idea of your idea of what you expected to see.
[BAND PLAYING]
[PHONE RINGS]
- Hello.
- Is that Phil Harris?
- No, it's for Miss Wayne.
- Thanks.
Hello?
Thanks.
Rick's plane left March Field
3O minutes ago.
Still no Harris.
That's the name of the game.
Oh, somebody get a sling for my head,
1 O, 2O, 39, 45.
It's times like this my whole life passes before my eyes.
Blitzed again.
Pay the man for the lesson and let's go.
Wait a minute, will you?
I'm stuck 756 clams.
And I had to waste my time going to medical school.
Good night, boys.
Let's play one more game.
There's some money in my shoe you ain't got.
Can't you break this up?
Sorry, Mr. Harris, the game's over.
It's past visiting hours.
Well, that's a fine way to run a hospital.
Get a guy hooked and then close the place.
Does the Pentagon know you're running a clip joint?
Believe it or not, Phil,
I hate to take your money.
Believe it or not
I hate to give it to you.
It's been nice meeting you vultures.
- Good night.
- So long, fellas.
Here.
- What's this?
- My address. You I can beat.
[BOTH CHUCKLE]
Hi, girls. Harris is here.
Don't just sit there, go out of your minds.
- I see you're still alive and breathing.
- Honey, I feel like a baby boy.
- Well, powder your nose. You're on.
- Oh, those lucky people.
Now, fellas, a sadder, but wiser, Phil Harris.
Hi, fellas.
I can't tell you what it means to walk out here have you smiling...
...you're glad to see me, you're applauding...
...and I wanna tell you
I love you for it.
I've been with Jack Benny for 15 years.
And there ain't no money connected with that job.
So anything you can do to help me earn an honest buck I'll appreciate it.
MAN: How about Alice?
PHIL: What do you say, bud?
MAN:
How about Alice?
They told me when I married her she had money but I'll be darned if I can find it.
And I've looked everywhere.
I'd have been here sooner...
...but I was up in the hospital giving a money transfusion.
Man, did he cut me up.
You're laughing, it's a tragedy.
I'm a family man.
I got two little girls. One 7 and one 8.
Now they've gotta go to work.
[MEN WHISTLING]
Hey, fellas...
...how would you like to have a duffel bag shaped like that?
What is it, honey?
They're ready for your number...
...and I'm supposed to help you get dressed.
Well, help, help, help.
She's kidding, fellas,
I can dress myself.
She just has to comb my hair out.
[BAND PLAYING]
[SINGING] I was standin' in a bar room
In a little Texas town
Drinkin' double sarsaparillas
Just to wash my dinner down
Folks were dancin' to the jukebox
Were a very fine quartet
And a guy named Harris sang a song
Called "Smoke That Cigarette"
While the music was still playin'
Somethin' shook the whole room
All the women started screamin'
Till I couldn't hear the tune
Then I looked up to the doorway
And I saw him standin' there
It was Fearless Fred the Foreman
Dog-dirty and loaded for bear
It was a year to the day
Since he had last been to town
And he showed it by the way
He eyed the women up and down
Then he started in to cuss
At all the folks up at the bar
Till a ranger who was there
Cautioned Freddy to beware
Before he had gone too far
He said:
Look out, stranger,
I'm a Texas ranger...
...better take it nice and easy or you'll have to go.
Well, now Fred the Foreman
Wasn't bright
Or he'd just stopped right then
But he just ignored the ranger
And he started in again
He went down and grabbed Miss Lulu
The local dance hall queen
While the fella who was with her
Was so scared he near turned green
Then the ranger who was watchin'
Said that he had had enough
Because he'd been polite to Freddy
Now it was time that he got tough
When a woman isn't willin'
You can't grab her by the hair
You just don't do that and live
When there's a ranger standing there
He said:
Look out, stranger,
I'm a Texas Ranger.
Take your hands off that there woman or you'll make me mad.
Then the ranger turned to Lulu
To make sure she was all right
Freddy saw his chance
And hit that ranger wham
With all his might
But the ranger looked around
And said:
I think I felt a breeze.
Meanwhile Freddy held his broken hand
And felt quite ill at ease
I warned you, look out, stranger,
I'm a Texas Ranger.
Then the ranger swung at Freddy
And all the lights went out
[LULU SCREAMING]
[GUNSHOTS]
When the lights went on again
Some thieving dog, he stole my drink
And I swore out loud
I'd like to get my hands upon that gink
When I looked around
The only other person that I saw
Was the ranger sipping sarsaparilla
Calmly through a straw
Fearless Freddy rose up from the floor
And drew his.45
When the smoke had cleared
We found the ranger smiling and alive
It's a well-known fact in Texas
That a ranger's skin is hard
Even bullets never hurt, it's like a built-in bodyguard.
So remember, stranger
If you meet a Texas Ranger
- They're the roughest.
- Yeah!
- Toughest.
- Yeah!
Gentlemen you ever saw
And, gals, they're handsome critters too.
Yep.
Was it all right, fellas?
[MEN APPLAUDING]
Thank you. Now meet the principles.
Lulu, Virginia Gibson.
Fearless Freddy, Frank Lovejoy.
And the Texas Ranger, Gary Cooper.
That kis a nervous wreck.
[PHONE RINGS]
Yeah?
Okay, thanks.
They're on the ground, Miss Wayne.
Landed 1 O minutes ago.
- Which gate will they come through?
- Relax!
The whole crew has to pass through here on the way to check in.
Hey, Joe, where's Williams?
I don't know.
The minute we hit the field he took off like a scared rabbit.
That's funny.
I even told the tower to tell him you were waiting.
The guy's gotta be somewhere in the field.
Let's go find him.
It's too late, Mike.
Show's almost over. I've gotta leave.
Don't worry, kid.
I'll make him phone you before he gets away.
Mike, if I write him a letter, will you see that he gets it?
You bet. Even if I have to shove it down his throat.
MAN [O VER SPEAKER]: Miss Nell Wayne,
please report to Starlift plane immediately.
Miss Nell Wayne, please report
to Starlift plane immediately.
Tell him I'll be right there.
I did, 15 minutes ago.
That flight steward will be back here any second.
I'm almost finished.
Good thing.
The joint's running out of paper.
- Nell?
- Hm?
You won't need an envelope.
- Well, what will it be?
- Chocolate malt.
Not again, corporal.
You know you won't like it.
Try again. Maybe you'll surprise me.
- Miss?
- Yes, Miss Wayne?
What flavor does he want?
Chocolate, his usual.
- Would you trust me with it?
- With pleasure.
Thanks.
Thanks.
Hey, this is great.
First one I've made since I left Youngstown.
What is this, another publicity stunt?
Where's your photographers?
Please don't say anything else.
Read this first.
I wrote it when I thought
I wasn't going to see you again.
This letter makes me feel like a heel.
You talk too much.
MIKE [O VER SPEAKER]:
May I have your attention, please?
Due to mechanical difficulties...
... departure of the Starlift plane
is postponed until tomorrow.
Okay, Nell?
I wonder what happens when that pilot finds out he's missing a carburetor.
Goodbye, Rick.
- Promise to write.
- Every day.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye now.
[ENGLISH SDH]
Next Week, baby.
Songbird! Come here tonight and l'll dance With you free.
No, you don't. You gotta pay me.
Danny, come on.
Your breakfast. Come on.
Don't let Pop catch you talking to that.
Just being neighbourly.
He picked the neighbourhood.
Lay off. He Went broke.
The neighbourhood picked him.
Sit doWn and eat your breakfast. lt don't feel like the last day of school. Everything's so quiet.
Were you expecting a 21-gun salute?
Why not? At 3:00, it's all over.
Don't that make it kind of special?
TomorroW they call my name and give me a piece of paper. lt's for sure, isn't it, Danny?
- This time?
- Sure, kid. l'm a cinch.
You said that last year.
Pop bought all this junk for a graduation party, and there Was no graduation.
Old Mrs Pearson is the one that flunked me, but l shoWed her. l shoWed the old man, too. He's been
Waiting a year to have this party.
NoW he can stop bugging me.
He doesn't mean to bug you, he Wants to be proud of you.
Sure. l've been thinking a lot about the old house, Mimi, and about Mom. l Wish she could be here for the graduation. l really miss her. l miss her, too.
He misses her the most. lt's terrible to lean on someone so hard, you don't knoW you're leaning.
Never finding out until she isn't there any more. lt's been like stumbling around in the dark for him ever since.
When he sits there and Watches you graduate, he'll have eyes again for the first time in three years.
Then l'd better hurry.
Got a Whole day's Work ahead of me before Mrs Pearson.
HoW do you think that's been eating at him?
You Working in a joint like The Blue Shade.
One man in the family's gotta have a job.
Who cares Where you sWeep up? lt looks the same in the garbage truck.
- Danny, you got Pa all Wrong.
- Me and the World.
Look, Sis, Why are We fighting? lt's the last day of school.
- Yeah.
- Bye.
- Morning, Chico.
- Hi, Danny.
- Who's that?
- Maxie's friends.
They've been here all night.
Try to Work around 'em. See you.
OK. See you tonight.
Don't be like that. Come on, Ronnie,
Maxie said to be nice. l am being nice to you. l haven't spit in your eye yet.
That's very funny.
You better do What Maxie says.
He's the boss around here.
Hey, kid!
What happened to the music?
- The band Went home.
- Can you play the piano?
Leave him alone. He's just a busboy.
This joint's got a cabaret licence. l paid, l Want to be entertained.
Let's dance, honey.
That's enough entertainment.
- The band Went home.
- Busboy here Will sing us a song.
Hey, kid. Sing us a song and l'll buy you a drink.
Mister, l've gotta sWeep up. l appreciate it, but l'll be late for school.
School? The kid goes to school.
Ain't that nice? l Went to school once.
Bartender's school.
Ronnie, you ever go to school? l said, you ever go to school?
Wake up, stupid, l'm talking to you.
No, they never had to give you lessons.
Why, you...
- Let go of me, Will you?
- Forget it.
OK, OK, take it easy. l'll sing.
You hear that, Ralph?
The kid is gonna sing.
Don't ever try that again.
All right, What are you gonna sing?
Sing your school song.
You gotta have a school song.
An alma mater. The one With the Words about loyal and true.
You heard the lady. Go ahead.
Come on, kid. Jazz it up!
- Attaboy, kid.
- That's real nice, kid, real nice.
Here. What do you do for an encore?
Never mind.
Come on, honey, let's finish the dance. We don't need no music.
Hop it! What do you think l am? l knoW What you are.
Come here and be quiet.
You knoW What? lt's a lifetime study to find out Who you are!
To thine oWn self be true, and it folloWs as the day...
To thine oWn self be true... lf you can afford it. lf you'll excuse me, my mother is Waiting for me.
You never had a mother. Sit doWn!
You looking for trouble, too, kid?
No. l'm just looking to get out of here.
- Let me go With you.
- Get out and mind your oWn business.
- Get up! You're not a baby.
- Leave her alone.
Come on. Get out of here.
Oh, boy.
You're a pretty fancy performer, kid.
NoW you knoW What l do for an encore.
Go on, get out of here.
Taxi!
Come on, baby, have a drink. l guess l'll lose the job for this.
No, you Won't.
They Won't tell Maxie.
Maxie doesn't like to have his merchandise manhandled.
He'll loan me out to be mauled a little bit, but When it comes to a sock in the eye, that pleasure is for
Maxie Fields alone.
- Nice fella.
- Maxie? Yeah.
He Wouldn't like you. You knoW Why?
Because l like you.
Maxie hates everything l like.
Maxie's my benefactor.
He's the circus master, the cheese, the big cheese.
Big and green and mouldy.
You're drunk. lt's 8:00 in the morning. l had to be home by midnight, l forget Whose, or my convertible turns into a pumpkin.
Maxie turns everything into a pumpkin.
Danny, Why don't you kiss me?
All the Wrong people try to.
We're almost to the school.
Tell me Where you live. l Want to go to school With you. l used to love to go to school. l Was gonna be everything.
A nurse, and...a bus driver.
- You knoW What l am?
- You're in the circus.
That's right. l'm in the circus. l'm going in and explain everything.
You're going home,
Wherever that is.
Danny, Mrs Pearson marked you absent.
- We'll shoW Mrs Pearson.
- Where'd you pick that up?
Go on. You never seen anybody
With a feW too many?
- Tell him Where to take you.
- l'll be a good girl. lf you'll give me a kiss, l'll tell the man Where l live.
- HoW about that chick?
- Go on.
Danny, you're blushing.
One second, Danny.
Go ahead, Mrs Pearson.
Late on the last day of school, your mouth smeared With lipstick.
- HoW do you explain that, Mr Fisher?
- l don't think l can, Mrs Pearson.
You see, sir, this morning l Went in... l usually go in to sWeep up, see?
- But... Well, look, honey...
- Mr Fisher! l have been instructing for 20 years,
- and no one ever called me ''honey''.
- l believe you.
Mrs Pearson, let me talk to the boy.
Forgive me, sir, l've talked to the boy many times, and to What avail? ln an unprovoked display of violence, he attacked tWo of his classmates.
The boy has no conception of respect and discipline.
Under the circumstances, regretfully, perhaps, l have no choice.
Mr Fisher Will not be graduating tomorroW.
Danny, Wait a minute. l'd like to talk to you.
You knoW l'll have to go along With her?
- l Want you to knoW that l'm sorry.
- Thanks.
- l'll be seeing you next year.
- No, you Won't.
NoW, Wait a minute. Sit doWn, Danny.
Sit doWn, l said.
You've just been told that you're not graduating.
Doesn't that mean anything to you? l'm not graduating. That's it.
NoW What do you Want? l once had a son, Danny.
He lived 1 3 years.
Some hoodlums jumped him and he died.
What's that got to do With me?
Because you have all the earmarks of being a hoodlum,
- or Whatever you Want to call it.
- This isn't principal talk.
The more difficult the student, the more l try to lean over backWards.
Mr Evans, We moved into this neighbourhood three years ago. ln those three years l've shined shoes and dusted in a barbershop. l've done toWel duty in four different men's rooms. l've stacked chairs, sWept floors in every joint on Bourbon Street. lt's got so l look longer at a dame
With clothes on than one Without. l'm not a hoodlum, but l am a hustler. l've had to be for a very simple reason. My old man.
My mother Was killed in an accident three years ago. lt might as Well have gotten the old man, too, because he took himself right out of the line-up. He quit cold.
He lost the drugstore he oWned, he lost the house, and then finally What feW little jobs he's had since.
Maybe l could have liked school,
Mr Evans, but every time l Wanted to play ball, l had to Work.
Somebody had to.
AnyWay, noW l'm through. l'm through. l Wasn't aWare you Worked after school, Danny. lt's not the Working after school, it's the Working before. lt's been nice talking to you. l'm sorry l said What l did, Danny.
That's all right.
My life's a long Way from over yet, and you never knoW, you may be right.
That's him.
- Excuse me.
- You Danny Fisher?
- What about it?
- Let's take a Walk.
What's the beef?
They call me Shark.
This is Sal, and that's Dummy.
- l...
- All right.
You beat up my brother in school today, and l believe in an eye for an eye.
You go for the knife, l'll bash his brains out.
You go real fast. All right.
You're right about my brother.
He should learn a little manners.
So Would you like to hang out With us?
Why not? Wait a minute.
Wait. We get money.
Sometimes We get a lot.
We got something cooking for us tomorroW. lf you change your mind,
We'll be right here. l said no.
Thanks.
Good boy.
Fights real dirty.
Well?
What's the matter?
Old Lady Pearson flunked me. l'm not graduating.
- Danny, no.
- Danny, yes.
For the second year in a roW, yes. lf this keeps up much longer, l'll be a freshman again.
But you could go back another year.
Yeah? You don't make money in school.
Pop's been fired four times in the last year, and he hasn't got a job noW.
You're Working, l'm Working, and from noW on, full time, kid.
Well, guess Where l've been.
Got a quart of ice cream and this to go With it.
- A little special dessert...
- Papa, l Want to talk to you.
Good, Son. l Want to talk to you, too.
Mimi, you're gonna have to listen from the kitchen.
Let's see noW, Son.
Where do l begin?
Pop, you gotta understand...
NoW, l don't gotta nothing.
You gotta, cos l'm older than you. l go first.
Danny, l made some notes last year
When you Were supposed to graduate, and l think l still have them.
Yeah, here they are.
Kind of silly, isn't it?
A father making notes on things to say to his son.
- Pop...
- l can say it all in one breath. l'm proud of you, Son, because you Went back to school.
- Pa, there's something...
- l knoW all about it.
Mr Evans called me. l spent all afternoon With him.
We had a nice long chat together.
- l'm sorry, Pop.
- l'm sorry, too, Son, but things are gonna be different, that's Why We're celebrating.
We also had a talk
With that Mrs Pearson Woman.
She said that you could graduate before next year if you'd go to night school and learned a little discipline.
So that's hoW it's gonna be.
No more Working for you.
You'll do the going to school, l'll do the going to Work.
HoW many times...?
You've got to graduate if you ever
Want to take up a profession.
- Pa, We've been through this.
- l Want you to. l don't Want you Working on Bourbon
Street With bums all your life.
A profession sets a man apart from the World.
Like you? A registered pharmacist and you can't get a job.
You're Wrong about that, Danny.
An opening came up at the Regal Pharmacy, and they're sending me to see the manager.
- You haven't got the job.
- They'll hire me.
- Sure.
- They Will and l'll keep the job.
- Things Will be different.
- l'm not going back to school.
Look, Son, you didn't fail because your marks Were bad.
Mr Evans said you failed because of your attitude.
Anybody that disagreed With you got a punch.
- ls that What l brought you up for?
- No, Pa, it's not, but l stopped listening to you. l ran out of other cheeks.
Pop, When l Was just three feet high you took me to the circus.
You accidentally bumped into a guy, and he turned and punched you in the mouth.
And you knoW What you did?
Nothing. Nothing!
When they sWing at you, you gotta sWing back.
Maybe you can't, but l'm not taking after you. l'm going out and make a buck.
- Hi.
- Well, noW We're someWhere.
- l Was hoping you'd shoW.
- You said something about money.
That's What We Were talking about.
You knoW that five-and-dime on Charles Street?
We Were gonna pull a phoney fight, but my brother told me that you sing like a bird, and that's What you're famous for, singing and flunking.
- What's singing got to do With it?
- What a cube. l ain't never stole nothing before.
You're not gonna steal anything noW.
All you're gonna do is sing.
Here's the plan. That five-and-dime on Charles Street...
- Sings beautiful, don't he?
- He sure does.
- You sing nice.
- Thanks.
- You Were in on it, Weren't you?
- ln on What?
- Could l have a glass of Water?
- Certainly.
- What'll you have?
- l'll...
- Root beer?
- Yeah.
My, it's hot in here, isn't it? lsn't it? Don't you think so? lt's alWays hot this time of year.
My, that tastes good. Thank you.
- What's your name?
- Nellie.
- What time you get through Work?
- Why?
- l thought l might meet you.
- What do you think l am?
- l'd like to find out.
- Mr Mclntyre, Mr Mclntyre, hurry!
Look at the counter.
You gonna meet me after Work? l'm through at 10, so if you're here, l can't help but see you.
Thanks a lot, kid. l don't knoW hoW it happened! lt Wasn't my fault!
Mr Furst, l'm very careful about the accounts.
The books shoW it clearly.
There can't be any mistake.
Excuse me. A customer.
- Anything l can do for you, sir?
- Yes, sir, l came about the job.
- That job has been filled.
- The employment office said...
- l hired a man yesterday.
- But l've got to have the job.
The agency sent me. l have my diploma. l'm a registered pharmacist
With 25 years behind me.
- What's the trouble?
- Just a mistake about a job.
- What's the mistake?
- l Want a younger man.
He looks younger than me. We've had four younger men in three months.
Have you read his credentials? ls he good or incompetent?
- HoW do you tell that?
- l'll Wait over here.
- Give him an application.
- l don't have any.
Then give him the job.
- You start Work tomorroW morning.
- Thank you.
Chico, you better find somebody else.
- l can't Work nights any more.
- Up to you, Danny.
No complaints from this end.
The old man got a job today, and We made kind of a deal.
He Works, and l go to school.
Not really. l got an old man, give him a jug of Wine, he's happy.
- Danny.
- What's the matter, trouble?
No. We're gonna divvy up later.
That fence gave us over 90 bucks.
- Hello, Mr Fields.
- Hiya, kid.
- Hello there!
- Could l get by, please?
Don't you...
- Hey, you.
- That's Maxie Fields. Your boss.
- Hey, Mr Fields. HoW about that?
- Who's this guy, Ronnie?
The king of Yugoslavia.
HoW should l knoW?
Take your hand off me, Mr Fields.
HoW come you're so friendly
With the lady?
We met in Paris last year.
The king of France introduced us.
You're pretty fresh, boy.
Mr Fields, When you gonna put me on that payroll?
- l'll let you knoW.
- Thanks a lot, Mr Fields.
Hiya, Maxie, hoW you feelin'?
Same as usual?
You lookin' for an early grave?
He's your boss.
Him you don't fool With.
Why not? l'm the king of Yugoslavia.
No. He's king of everything.
He oWns the air you're breathin'.
- Only in here.
- He can shut it off real quick.
Why does a busboy look at you like that?
A busboy! Where did you meet him?
You're hurting me.
What are you talking about?
You knoW the kid. Don't lie to me. l'll break every finger you got.
Maxie, stop it, please. l heard him sing a song, that's all.
You do knoW him?
He sang here once for your big-shot friends. l told him he had a nice voice.
- That Was all?
- That's all.
Hey, you, kid. Come here.
Yeah, you, busboy.
Come on over here.
Lady says you sing. That right?
Better be right, cos if it ain't, then the lady is lying.
- OK, l sing. So What?
- Nothing.
Just making sure she Was telling the truth.
Hey, Jimmy. Just a minute.
Sure, boss. l Want to make sure it's the truth. l'd like to hear you.
- Go and sing a song for me.
- NoW?
Yeah, noW. Right noW.
And you better be a singer.
Ladies and gentlemen,
We have a little surprise.
There's a neW singer here... the busboy. On the level.
A good friend of Mr Fields says this guy can really go.
So let's give a good listen to...
What's your name, kid?
- Caruso!
- Caruso the busboy! Come on!
You're a singer, kid. l just got a dirty mind, that's all. Sorry, kid.
- Crazy, Danny! Crazy!
- That Was a great song.
- Give me my coat, kid.
- l sure Will.
That Was sWell. My name's LeGrand.
You Want to stop being a busboy? l just stopped. l oWn the King Creole doWn the street.
- Good for you.
- lt's a dying sWan, but maybe We can put you over and bring it back to life.
- Hello, Charlie.
- Well, hello, Rat.
Can't stand the Whisky at your joint? l like to see What the competition is doing. l Was gonna offer the kid a job myself. l beat you to it.
You alWays do, but l Wind up
With 'em sooner or later.
He handled Ronnie
When she Was a singer. NoW l do.
What do you say, kid? l got a date.
- HoW about one on me?
- Another time.
- Hi, Danny. We started Without you.
- HoW much did you get?
We got $95, and that's only the beginning.
- Pretty good.
- Here.
Come on, Dummy, come on.
Be glad you got that.
- HoW much did you give him?
- You got 30. Don't Worry. l asked you a question.
HoW much did you give him?
Five bucks. He's a dummy,
What does he need money for?
Five bucks?
Here you go, kid.
Come on, give me. lf he tries to take it back, you tell me. You understand?
NoW go on, beat it, kid. l don't think l Want you hanging around With us any more.
- You're trouble.
- l got neWs for you, buddy. l'm not gonna be around any more.
- l Wanna thank you.
- That's all right, pal.
- Good night, girls.
- Good night.
- Hi.
- Oh. Hello.
Don't give me that. l saW you looking.
You're pretty sure of yourself.
Not alWays. l Was scared this afternoon. l thought you Were gonna bloW the Whistle on me.
- l like you, that's Why.
- Where Would you like to go? l don't care. l mean, l don't knoW Why l'm here. l have to be home early.
My mother's old-fashioned.
- What about you?
- What do you mean?
Some friends of mine are having a party. HoW Would you like to go?
- l'm not exactly dressed.
- What's the difference?
We'll stop by for a half-hour and l'll take you home, OK?
Just for a half-hour? Then home?
- What can l do for you, sir?
- Where's the party?
- l beg your pardon?
- The party the fellas are having. lt's up in 205. lt looks like my friends are late.
Or maybe We're early.
What kind of a game are you playing? lt's no game. Honest. l like you.
- What's your name?
- Nellie. l told you in the store.
Oh, yeah. Nellie. l like you, Nellie.
- l like you a lot.
- What's your name?
George.
HoW much did this room cost you?
My name's Danny. Danny Fisher.
You comin' in? l don't knoW. l've never been to a place like this before.
But l Want to see you again. ls this the Way? l've been looking at the door of that lousy five-and-ten for a year.
And today When you
Walked in, l thought...
What are you baWling about?
Stop baWling. l like you.
That's the reason l'm crying. l like you more than l like anybody l knoW.
And l don't even knoW you.
That's Why l'm crying.
The party's over. Let's go. l guess this is it.
Good night, Danny. l guess l'd better go upstairs noW.
Good night. l didn't mean nothing by it, honest.
But you played up to me this afternoon. l thought you kneW the score. l'm sorry. l liked you right aWay, that's all. l better go noW.
Will l see you again, Danny? l don't knoW. You see, l'm pretty busy. l don't knoW. lf you ever have the time, l'd like to see you again.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Hey, schoolboy. l thought this Was gonna turn into a pumpkin.
You really shoWed Maxie.
You can sing.
- So do you, l hear.
- l used to.
Yeah, l met a guy named LeGrand.
Charlie?
He's a nice felloW. Smart, too.
- He sounded broke to me.
- He is.
- HoW smart do you call that?
- He oWns the King Creole.
The only place on Bourbon Street
Without Maxie's fingerprints on the cash register. That's smart.
That's a pretty piece of material.
You ought to have a dress made out of it.
- Don't you like it?
- l love it.
What do you say
We get together sometime and sing the old songs or anything else you Want to do? l'd like to. l can't. l'd really like to, but l can't.
- l get it.
- Maybe We'll meet by accident.
Tell me Where you think the accident
Will take place, and l'll be there. lt'll take place.
Just don't rush it.
- l'll be Waiting.
- You'd better go noW.
- What's the rush?
- Maxie'll be here. You'd better go.
Remember the cab, When you Wouldn't leave until l kissed you? l'm standing right here until you kiss me.
- l'll see you sometime.
- Boy, that's gonna be some accident.
- Mimi, is Pop aWake yet?
- He left long ago.
Mr Primont, for over 25 years, l've been doing the same Work, and l've filled a lot of prescriptions.
- NoW, in my opinion...
- l don't care. l'm running the store.
Of course, sir. All l'm saying is the mixture you're using...
Will you shut up and do things the Way l say or get out.
Put that jar back on the counter Where it belongs.
Yes, sir. Yes, sir. Danny.
- Pop.
- What a pleasant surprise.
- You been here long?
- No. l just Walked in.
- l Wanted to Wish you luck.
- Thank you.
- Would you like to sit doWn?
- No, l Wanted to talk to you, Pop, but you Were gone before l even turned over this morning.
- This job l keep.
- We'll talk about it tonight.
- Anything Wrong here?
- Uh...
Yes, l had a prescription filled here and l got the Wrong medicine.
- lt almost poisoned me.
- That pharmacist has left.
Lucky for you this gentleman knoWs What he's doing.
Thanks to you, sir, l'll be coming back. Good day, sir.
- Good day, sir. Call again.
- l Will.
- Well, hello.
- Hi. l figured you'd decided to stay With Maxie.
No, but... l don't knoW What to do, Mr LeGrand.
My old man
Wants me to go back to school.
Sit doWn.
What does he Want you to be?
He used to talk about me becoming president, but l think he gave up on that idea.
HoW much does a singing job pay?
Here you start at scale,
85 a Week. lf they like you, you get more.
HoW does it sound? lt sounds good, but... l never sang professionally before. l don't knoW if l can.
- You did it last night.
- Last night l Was mad.
So stay mad.
You've sold me. lf l could just sell my old man. lf you do as he says and go to school, What about after school?
No deal. He says l do the studying, he does the Working.
Only, l saW him do the Work.
You hate to see someone craWl, especially your oWn father. l pushed him into that job, but $85 a Week could get him out.
- Let me talk to him.
- l've knoWn him since l Was born.
- lnvite me to dinner.
- You're Wasting your time. lt's a free meal. You afraid of him?
- No.
- Then invite me.
You're invited.
29 Royal Street, all the Way up.
29 Royal.
- Ronnie says you're smart.
- Does she? She ought to knoW.
She could have had a career.
Not that she hasn't got one.
Maxie Fields.
There's a name for you.
Everything he touches turns to drink.
You knoW him all right.
KnoW him? Maxie and l go a long Way back. We Were kids together. l remember the first Words that came out of his mouth...
- ''Stick 'em up.''
- See you at dinner.
No, you don't understand hoW l feel, and you Won't Watch out for him like he's your oWn son, because he's not your son.
Mr Fisher, you keep speaking of Danny having a profession.
Singing is a profession. All right, so he's starting in the seWer.
SeWers run under the best cities, some lead to the fanciest plumbing at the Ritz.
But Danny isn't a plumber.
- What l meant...
- l knoW What you meant.
The ansWer is no. l'm sorry, Mr LeGrand.
You're not sorry.
Why don't you ask him What he Wants?
The boy has an unusual talent.
Let him think for himself.
You have no right to ask these questions.
Mimi, Will you please get Mr LeGrand's hat?
All right, Pop.
Thanks for dinner, Mimi.
You're some cook.
Thanks. l may be leaving empty-handed, but everyWhere else l'm full. l'm going out for a While, Pa. l'd like to speak to you again about this.
- Maybe have a drink, talk it over.
- l don't drink.
No, l didn't think you did.
Goodbye, Danny.
Why'd you bring a man like that here?
You didn't have to talk like that.
He thinks l can do a job for him.
But you don't care What he thinks or What l think, for that matter.
- What do you Want?
- A pink convertible.
- Then register at school.
- Pa, l got a very average brain. l'm not a brilliant student.
Do you understand?
- l don't Wanna craWl.
- ls that What l do?
You have no choice.
They got you on the run early.
No! That's not the truth! l've fought...
You fought! Sure, you fought!
You back-pedalled all the Way. l saW What happened today, Pa, and it's not gonna happen to me.
LeGrand's got 85 bucks a Week for me to be a performer.
- l'll take a chance.
- What about school?
- l Went.
- And failed. l'm through failing. lf you Were older l'd ask you for a drink With me.
- l'm old enough to have a drink.
- SWell. Let's go.
Not tonight. lt Would look kind of funny.
TomorroW night?
- l'll pick you up at nine.
- All right, it's a date.
You knoW, l Was Wondering, is there anything in particular a man of 40 says to a girl of 20?
- Say you're 38.
- Yeah.
- Sorry, Mr LeGrand.
- That's all right.
Mind if l have a drink
With your sister?
You knoW l don't care, but check With the old man.
- He Won't make a singer out of me...
- No, he's gonna make one out of me.
- Do We sign papers or shake hands?
- We shake hands.
After you open and you're a smash,
We'll sign papers.
- l'll be at the club tomorroW.
- Good.
Rock and roll at the King Creole!
The hottest shoW in toWn!
Fabulous Forty Nina doing the dance that started the Gold Rush!
And tonight, the neW sensation of Bourbon Street,
Danny ''Boom Boom'' Fisher!
The old man Wouldn't come?
Some father.
- He's a good father.
- But a lousy audience.
Here We go. You'll be great tonight. l heard you rehearsing.
- What songs you sing, folk songs?
- l guess so.
That's What l thought. What planet?
Just laughing it up. No offence.
- Nervous?
- A little. l Wanted you to knoW the place isn't full.
But half a house can hate you as hard as a full house.
As far as you're concerned, the place is jammed.
They're expecting the best. l'm glad you told me. l'm not nervous noW. l'm scared to death.
Just sing like you're mad, you'll be a smash.
The biggest Words in shoWbiz,
''You're on.''
Ladies and gentlemen, the moment you've been Waiting for.
King Creole presents a young man With a big future.
The sensation of Bourbon Street, the boy With the beat, Danny Fisher!
- Eddie! Put his name up in lights.
- Right.
- Hey, Danny.
- Hi.
You busy? OK. We got a date.
- Where?
- l'll shoW you.
We're almost there. lt's just around this bend. Wait till you see it.
You don't knoW hoW l Was hoping you'd come by. l don't even understand it. l mean, lots of fellas have come into the store asking for a date.
Just like you. Making cracks.
You Were even Worse.
You came in to rob the store.
But l Was looking for you When l came out.
Then you took me to that hotel, and l Went With you. l don't understand it. l thought l Was a nice girl.
You are a nice girl, Nellie. l've been thinking about that night, and l'm sorry.
Yeah, me, too. l told you before...
No, Danny, that's not
What l'm sorry about. lt's like everything just started With you. l guess both of us did something that day We'd never done before. l never robbed a store. There's a last time for everything, too.
- l didn't mean it.
- Wait. See that house over there?
Way over there? See it?
That used to be our house.
Pa bought it When l Was eight.
Kind of a birthday present.
We had a lot of happy times there. l'll buy that house back someday, or one just like it.
And l guarantee you, nobody's gonna take it aWay from me. Nobody. l told my mother about you. l told her l met a million-dollar boyfriend in a five-and-ten-cent store.
Danny, aren't you ever going to kiss me tonight?
Nellie, don't fall in love With me.
Love means getting married, having kids. l don't even knoW Who l am yet.
- Who do you have to be?
- l don't Wanna be like my old man.
Love, marriage, having kids. l Wanna be somebody first.
Do you knoW a better Way?
You could still kiss me.
Just leave it at that, Nellie.
For noW, anyWay.
Just so it Was you l Wanted to be With to shoW my house to.
Hurry up! Your breakfast is getting cold.
OK, l'm coming.
Big shot. Sing a feW songs and right aWay sleep all morning?
You're a little behind yourself.
Mr LeGrand kept me up half the night talking about you.
- What happened the other half?
- Why, you!
Charlie's a very fine man. l could like him a lot.
- You seen Pop this morning?
- For a minute.
Did he ask hoW it Went last night?
- l told him they all applauded.
- What did he say?
- You knoW Pop.
- What did he say?
He said Wash your hands before you bring him his lunch.
Sounds like Pop.
Here. l don't care hoW long you've been
Writing prescriptions.
Will you ever understand that l'm running the store? l understand, Mr Primont.
You understand, Mr Primont, you understand, Mr Primont!
That's What you're paid for. You can't teach an old dog neW tricks.
- l'm not an old dog.
- Don't ansWer me back!
Mop up this floor.
Go ahead and take it.
Mop over there.
Hey, Danny. You knoW you got this Whole street buzzin'?
- Yeah?
- They say you're the next somebody. l kneW you
When you Were singing for Watches. lt's a little early to reminisce, Shark.
Maxie Fields Wants to see you.
- l don't Wanna see him.
- l have to bring you.
Maxie's no guy to give the brush to.
He can get rough if he Wants to.
You knoW What l mean.
Let him make a reservation.
There's three shoWs a night.
That drugstore you just come out, that's Where your old man Works.
So?
Nothin'. l just go in there and get cigarettes once in a While. lf my old man Was getting knocked around like that, l'd help him.
- l been Working on it.
- l'll make you a deal.
You come see Maxie Fields, l'll try to Work up an angle.
You never can tell. You do me a favour, and l'll do you one.
Where's Fields? l'll take you to him. l'm on his payroll noW. l'm one of his boys.
And that drugstore situation, it'll clear up just like that.
- This is it. Come on, Walk right in.
- Hiya, pal. Shark treating you OK?
Up them stairs.
Maxie's expecting you.
- Aren't you coming?
- l'll Wait here.
- This is Where you live?
- This is Where l visit.
What's all the chatter?
Send the kid in.
Hi, Danny. l hear you're a smash.
Good neWs travels fast.
- Sit doWn. Care for a drink?
- No, thanks.
- Was there anything special?
- No, nothing special.
Just a friendly get-together. l'm interested in any neW attraction. lt's good for all of us.
Then again, you never knoW.
What's friendly one day is business the next.
You got good taste, Danny.
But you got to be able to afford it.
Ronnie Wants money even to serve a drink.
- Maxie, please.
- Serve the kid a drink. l don't Want a drink.
Ronnie Won a contest once.
Best legs in the state of...
- Where's that you're from, honey?
- Maine.
That's it. Maine.
ShoW the kid your legs.
Maxie, please.
You Won a contest With them legs.
Must have been 2,000 people Watching.
Don't be embarrassed.
ShoW the kid What Won.
All right, Maxie.
Pretty good, huh? There's nothing
Wrong With the rest of it. l gotta get going. l just Wanted this little chat, get to knoW you. l like to see people get ahead.
And like l said, Who knoWs?
Maybe someday We'll do business.
- You may be Working for me again.
- l don't think so, Mr Fields.
You never can tell.
After all, l saW you first. l admit, l Was put out When you quit to go With a crumb like LeGrand.
Charlie's no crumb.
He's a decent fella.
Oh, l forgot. l forgot about him and your sister.
This has been quite a Week for Charlie.
First, he finds a singer, then he finds a girl.
- You're some talented family.
- What are you trying to say? l got only one thing to say, kid. l don't like losing things. l don't mind taking, but l don't like to lose. Not even a busboy.
When l lose something, l Want it back, and l get it. That's all.
You got a long Way to go, boy.
Lots and lots of good luck.
ShoW him to the door, honey.
Don't come back here any more, Danny. Stay far, far aWay.
Thanks. l could give you the same advice.
As Maine goes, so goes Maxie Fields.
Maxie buzzed me. l Was doWnstairs, and he buzzed me.
- Shark!
- Yes, Mr Fields?
Come here, Shark. l Wanna talk to you. Get some ice, Ronnie.
Yes, Mr Fields.
What can l do for you?
Come on. Move it.
What have you got on this Fisher kid?
Nothing much. He helped us do a little job on the five-and-ten once.
Not big enough. l Wanna tWist real hard. Work on it.
That's funny, Mr Fields. l just got an idea. lt's his old man.
He Works in a drugstore...
Just in time, ladies.
Hope you made reservations.
- Wasn't Danny Wonderful tonight?
- Yes, Wonderful.
He gets better all the time.
- Hi, Danny.
- Nina? lf my girl Nellie comes by tell her l got something to take care of.
You're the boy Who can do it.
Boy, that kid is sure bringing in the business.
He's ruining my performance, there's nothing but Women out there.
They don't Want to see me.
Tonight one yelled, ''Leave it on!''
- Maybe l should do the strip.
- Why don't you?
Eddie? l'll be a little late for the next shoW.
There's old man Primont
With the dough for the bank. l hope he doesn't leave before Danny gets here. lt's almost 1 1 .
Just don't leave, mister, till Danny gets here.
- You sure he's gonna be here?
- He'll be here. l gotta hand it to you, Shark.
You sure are a good salesman.
Here comes the pigeon.
- l tried to get you on the phone.
- What for?
- Call it off. You don't oWe me.
- You Were hot for this before.
- l've been thinking...
- lt Works both Ways.
We get the money, you get this drugstore situation sorted.
- The old man Wouldn't...
- He Would if he could.
Look. Primont's getting ready to leave.
You go on home. You knoW Where the bank is, drop this off.
- l'll finish up the inventory.
- l hope it stops raining.
- Take my hat and coat.
- l didn't mean it that Way.
- No, go ahead and take it.
- Thank you.
All right, have it your Way, but don't you say you never had the chance.
All right, there he is.
There's Primont.
Are you With us or not? lt's for your old man, you knoW.
- That's Danny's father!
- We take him anyWay.
- Sharky, it's his old man!
- HoW do We knoW? We just play dumb.
Do you knoW Where Front Street is?
No, young man, l don't. l don't knoW Where Front Street is.
Can't figure this kid.
He's been in there for half an hour.
He looked sick When he came back.
- l've got to see Danny.
- So does that audience.
- He's in there, Nellie.
- Danny? lt's your father.
Mimi phoned from the hospital.
Some thugs beat him up.
She Wants me to bring you there.
Oh, no.
He Was going to the bank and they jumped him.
He's in bad shape, Danny.
Mimi and Charlie are at the hospital noW.
- ls he all right, Doc?
- He's alive. Just.
There's been damage to the brain.
We've relieved the pressure but he'll need another operation immediately, a delicate one.
Dr Martin Cabot has performed this kind of operation.
- ls he good?
- He's the best, but expensive.
- HoW expensive?
- A couple of thousand, maybe more. l'm still deep in hock, but maybe l can scrape up 500.
We'll get it some Way.
Dr Patrick. Where's this man?
Where's this Fisher?
Dr Cabot! lt took me a year to Wangle this dinner invitation. Lucy Pitman.
Anything for Maxie Fields. Thank you.
- You the boy?
- Yes, sir.
Mr Fields must be very fond of you.
Says you used to Work for him.
He Wanted to help out.
Let's go.
When you Work for Maxie Fields, it's better than Blue Cross.
What's the case?
They've been in there for hours.
Must be some kind of World's record.
- He made it.
- Thank God. l'm going home, no sense in going to that dinner party.
- Lucy gives me a pain anyWay.
- Thank you, Doctor.
He'll be all right.
May take a little While.
But he's a strong man.
A real fighter.
But, Doc, about Maxie Fields. HoW...
Strange man, isn't he?
Very coarse, vulgar, very poWerful.
Send him my best. l'll send him my bill.
Thank you, Doctor. l'll pay him back, Sis. l'll pay every cent. l got a lot of payin' back to do.
A lot of payin' back.
There'll be plenty of tables for everyone!
Just stay in line and don't go aWay.
This kid is absolutely sensational!
Just be patient, folks. lt Won't be very long noW.
- Good evening, folks.
- Hi!
- HoW's your father?
- Much better.
Let her through, folks.
Her brother pays the bills.
Sorry l'm late.
Just a final check on Pop.
- Everything OK?
- He's coming home tomorroW. lt's been a long four Weeks.
- What do you Want?
- Mr Fields Would like to see you.
- What about?
- Just Wants to see you.
- l don't Want to see him.
- You don't understand the job l got.
When Maxie says bring somebody, l gotta bring 'em.
So l'll make it short and sWeet.
He Wants to see you.
Here's the key to his apartment.
Just go upstairs and turn the lock.
You understand?
For a little guy, you make a lot of noise. l'm remembering a rainy night and a man carrying a bag of money.
Your old man's been in hospital about a month, ain't that right?
He gets out tomorroW. l'm real glad about that.
Just take this here key.
You knoW Where it is. l should have finished you off a long time ago.
Come on.
You're Working for Maxie, too?
- We're all Working for Maxie noW.
- That figures.
- Go right on up.
- Thanks, pal.
Come on in. l've been Waiting for you.
- lt's a nice night for an accident.
- Yeah.
Where's Fields? l'm supposed to see him.
You Want to see him?
Come With me.
There he is. Out and gone. lsn't he sWeet?
Every time l see him lying doWn, l keep looking at his chest, hoping.
But the pig keeps right on breathing.
- l guess he can't see me tonight.
- Danny, Wait.
He didn't Want to see you tonight.
He Wanted me to see you.
- What about?
- He Wants you to go to Work for him.
- What are you supposed to do?
- Whatever l can do about it.
- Your heart Wouldn't be in it.
- You Wouldn't miss it.
Would you like a drink?
Would you like a cigarette?
Shall We talk? Can l do anything for you? Anything at all?
The general idea is l'm supposed to befriend you.
- You knoW, for a...
- For a bum? A tramp? For What? l Was just gonna say you got a pretty good Way of talking.
A lot of tramps graduate school With honours.
- As a matter of fact, me.
- l flunked Without honours. l'm sorry, but l don't think l can handle this set-up.
- This is a set-up, isn't it?
- lt Was all fixed in advance.
You tell Maxie Fields that l Wasn't in the mood. l'll be square With him in a feW months, that's hoW l Wanna keep it.
- Danny, l Wish you Wouldn't go.
- This isn't the accident, honey.
That happened that first morning in The Blue Shade.
From then on, everything's been fixed like a crooked fight.
And you're Wrong about the heart. l do miss it. l miss it so much l may marry a girl because she has one to give.
- l'm not asking you to marry me.
- You're asking me something.
- You're a little tight, aren't you?
- l'm not tight. l'm drunk.
But l'll tell you What you are.
You're being rude, condemning me, and ignoring my God-given charms.
God didn't give you the charms for What you're using them for.
That's funny. And l read the instructions so carefully.
Please don't go. Come here. l Want to shoW you something.
Look.
What's he doing doWn there?
He has orders from the pig to clock your entrance and exit.
You're supposed to spend a feW hours here, and in those feW hours, acquire the habit of coming back. ln due time, Mr Fields Will approach you With a bill for my graciousness.
- Double-cross Charlie LeGrand.
- Exactly.
What if l leave noW?
Then the pig Will punish me for having failed. lf you Were kind, you'd stay for a feW hours and just pretend like you like me.
We could smoke some cigarettes, play some music.
Just make it seem as though l have charm. l could sing some songs for you. l used to be a singer, you knoW.
Yes, l did.
- You remember that one?
- Yeah. That's a real oldie.
Used to be my theme song. l ask you to stay because l hate to be punished by Mr Fields.
He's not a very sensitive man.
All right. l'll stay.
And l think you are charming.
- l don't use that Word, but you are.
- Thank you.
- Ronnie.
- l'm sorry.
Don't cry.
You'll Wake up the circus master.
- Danny, hold me. Hold me, please.
- What are you doing With this man?
- HoW'd you get into this?
- HoW do you get out?
- Go home, Danny. Go home.
- Ronnie...
No, no. Not in this house. l Wouldn't knoW if it Was because l Wanted you or Maxie did.
- Maxie has nothing to do With it.
- l Wouldn't be too sure.
Sorry to intrude. l don't mind you tWo Wrestling around, but as everyone knoWs,
Wrestling is all a fake.
Let's not forget
Who's supposed to Win: me.
- l told you, l Won't Work for you.
- lt's too bad. l Was hoping it could be arranged on some kind of a friendly basis.
But it can be done the other Way, too.
You listen to me, punk.
You're gonna Work at my club. l can do a lot for you, and l can do a lot against you.
Your old man's coming out of the hospital tomorroW.
Might not be good for his health if he kneW you put him there.
- lt Was an accident.
- Was it?
Somebody Was gonna get hit.
Too bad it Was him. lt Was all done because of you.
You don't think he'd mind?
You tell him. Or shall l?
- You do it, and l'll kill you.
- l got an easier Way.
Just sign this piece of paper.
There's nothing on it, l'll fill it in later.
- No, Danny. No!
- Shut up.
Or maybe l'll fill Charlie's place
With stink bombs every night. lf that's an unpleasant thought, hoW about real bombs?
You think l Wouldn't?
Easiest thing in the World.
Make it look like an accident.
Anything can be made to look like an accident. What do you say, kid?
That's more like it. Don't let me interrupt you any longer.
You Were just saying to her...
''Maxie has nothing to do With it.''
So noW you knoW.
That's hoW you get into it.
NoW Maxie's got you like he's got me. lt's too late.
You do something Wrong, and that makes you do something Worse.
And then you don't knoW the difference any more.
Danny, l'm so sorry.
Ladies and gentlemen, l Would just like to say thanks for everything.
You people have been Wonderful, and l'll never forget you. l Want you to knoW that l'll alWays be grateful. Thank you very much.
- Excuse me.
- What's the matter?
- Kid, that Was a great shoW.
- Thanks, Charlie.
What Was the curtain speech all about?
We never got around to signing those papers you talked about.
So What's the hurry?
There's no hurry. l just don't knoW hoW to tear up a handshake.
What do you mean? l'm quitting you, Charlie. l got a better offer from Maxie Fields.
You're no good, Danny. You belong on the street With the hoodlums. l thought you'd changed, but you belong With them.
You threW it all aWay.
You, me, everything.
Danny, is anything Wrong?
Are you all right?
Sure.
You sounded funny When you called. l got here as soon as l could. l told Mr Mclntyre it Was an emergency, l'd be right back.
Nellie, there's something l...
- What's the matter, Danny?
- Nothing.
Did you speak to Father Franklin yet? l stopped by this morning.
He's a Wonderful man.
He's knoWn me since l Was a little girl.
He Was so happy l finally found someone. He can't Wait to meet you.
- He's there noW if you...
- l can't, Nellie. l Wouldn't knoW What to say to him.
That's Why l had to see you. l think maybe too much has happened too fast.
You're sWell and l don't Want to hurt you, but something's happened.
A lot's happened. l Walked out on Charlie LeGrand last night...
And noW you're making the parlay. l guess so. For noW, anyWay.
That girl Ronnie, does she have anything to do With it? l don't knoW. Maybe. lt's all kinda mixed up.
See, the other night... l can't Walk in that church till l'm sure. l have to be getting back to the store. l can't afford to be fired from tWo places in the same day.
Are you sure?
There's no use talking about it any longer. A deal is a deal.
Mr Fields, l beg you. l'm not here to speak for my son. lt's my daughter.
Mr LeGrand has asked her to marry him. l just found out.
He's counting on Danny remaining at his club.
This could ruin their future, her chance for happiness.
Your boy's gotta think about himself. l can do more for him than Charlie.
- No, you don't understand.
- lt's you Who don't understand.
Mr Fields, the collector made the delivery.
- Good.
- lt's all taken care of.
- Good deal.
- ls there anything else?
That the face of...
That's the one Who almost killed me.
You're mistaken.
This man Works for me.
Mistaken? l'm not mistaken. l could never forget that face.
- What's he talking about?
- Beat it. Go on!
Wait. l don't care What you do to me. l'll go to the police. l don't think you Will. l don't think you'll go to the police.
You say a deal is a deal. l'll make you a deal.
Let Danny out of his agreement, and l'll forget l saW this man.
Otherwise, l go to the police.
You're OK, Mr Fisher. l gotta hand it to you.
But there's something you don't knoW maybe make you change your mind.
Pa, What are you doing here? lt Was an accident, Pa. l'm sorry.
Honest. l tried to stop 'em. l did it for you!
- You double-crossed me, didn't you?
- Who sent for you?
- You told him.
- Sure, he Was running to the police.
- l told you l'd kill you.
- Knock it off, kid.
- l told you...
- l'm Warning you!
No! leave him alone!
Leave him alone!
- You tramp! l oWn you!
- No, you don't oWn me!
You bought me! You don't oWn me! l meant to tell you that!
You disgust me! l hate you!
Every time you put your hands on me, you make my flesh craWl!
Go ahead, hit me! That's the only thing you're man enough to do!
Get out, Ronnie! Don't come back!
He's in the alley. Go around the block. Come in the other Way.
Danny, We knoW you're in here.
You come on out noW and you got a chance.
You can't get aWay.
Maxie's got the Whole toWn covered.
This is it, buddy.
This is the big get-even day.
We got a lot to settle up.
Danny, l kneW it Was your old man that night. l kneW it, and l slugged him anyWay, so come and get me.
Come out and get me, or We're coming in. l'll let you in on a secret.
We've been laughing at you ever since it happened.
You told me We'd tangle again.
Well, noW's your chance. Come on.
You got him?
Hold him. l Wanna put my mark on him.
Where is he?
Who's there?! lt's me, Pa, Danny.
Let me in, Will you?
- Go aWay!
- l can't. Please, let me in, Pa.
Please...
Please let me... l found out from Dummy What happened.
You've got to get out of here.
They're all after you.
You've got to hide.
Hurry, Danny. Hurry.
- Hello, Danny.
- Hello.
- HoW ya feel?
- l don't knoW yet.
You've been out of your head for tWo days.
Maybe even longer.
Where are We?
Just some place to run to. l've had this for years.
- What about Maxie? Does he...?
- No. Here there's no Maxie.
Here l don't have to think about Maxie or yesterday or today, or the day after. lt Was nice having someone to take care of.
- Thanks. Thanks for everything.
- Sure.
- What are you staring at?
- You look like a kid. l am. A 104-year-old kid. l guess it all started that first morning When you rescued me.
You had courage, and l admired that. l have so little myself.
You'd be surprised at all the happy endings l had figured out.
You see, Danny, girls like me, if We stick around for the finish, generally finish up pretty much the same Way.
Sooner or later, the party's over.
We go to our hometoWns and marry the first respectable guy Who asks us.
You'd be amazed hoW many do.
Only l never Wanted it that Way.
That's Why l kidded myself into thinking maybe you Were the one. l used to dream that maybe someday
Maxie and l Would be through, and l'd meet you someplace, and We'd run aWay.
We did. lt's never the Way you imagine it, is it?
Danny, l'm not proud. l haven't got much pride left. l knoW What can be and What can't be.
But do you think that maybe for a little While you could make it the Way l dreamed it?
That you could love me and... my dream could come true?
- lt Wouldn't be hard to love you.
- Then love me, Danny.
Take a day out of your life and love me.
Wait here. lt Was a lovely day for a little While.
Oh, no. l'm sorry.
Danny, l'm so glad you're back.
- l hope noW We...
- Not yet, Nellie. ln a little While, maybe, but not noW. l'll Wait. l have lots of time. lt'll be all right.
Good luck, Danny. by Idem
